"Take her to the moon for me." - Bing Bong (Inside Out)
["The Devil in the Dark"] impressed me because it presented the idea, unusual in science fiction then and now, that something weird, and even dangerous, need not be malevolent. That is a lesson that many of today's politicians have yet to learn.- Arthur C. Clarke
"We have a system that increasingly taxes work and subsidizes nonwork."  Milton Friedman
"Men fight for liberty and win it with hard knocks; their children brought up easy, let it slip away again, poor fools. And their grandchildren are once again slaves" - D. H. Lawrence
"Never drink and park. Accidents cause people."
"Is the poop deck really what I think it is?" -Homer J Simpson
"Where ever you go, there you are"
"You must remember to love people and use things, rather than to love things and use people." -Venerable Fulton J. Sheen
"The man who moves a mountain begins by carrying away small stones." - Confucius
"Everything I have undertaken, everything I have expatiated upon all my life is inseparable from what I have lived. I invented nothing. I"ve been the one and only secretary of my own sensations" - E.M. Cioran
"You"re not asking too much, but maybe you are asking the wrong person"
"Yet it is far better to light the candle, than to curse the darkness." - William L. Watkinson
"May you never forget how far you have come and all the miles you have traveled just to get to this place" -Morgan Harper Nichols
"If you dont try then you wont die." -akima
"The free soul is rare, but you know it when you see it - basically because you feel good, very good, when you are near or with them..."
"Regardless of where you might go, you will always end up on the graveyard" -Me
"I drink therefore I am." - W. C. Fields (died from alcohol-related stomach hemorrhage)
" nobody dies a virgin, life fucks us all"
"When I believe in my ability to do something, there is no such word as no." - Max Brooks (World War Z, pgs 159-160)
"A jellyfish, if you watch it long enough, begins to look like a heart beating..."
"Time is a sort of river of passing events, and strong is its current; no sooner is a thing brought to sight than it is swept by and another takes its place, and this too will be swept away." - Marcus Aurelius
"The greater danger for most of us lies not in setting our aim too high and falling short; but in setting our aim too low, and achieving our mark." - Michaelangelo
"Your soulmate will be the stranger you recognise" - R. H. Sin
"Where love rules, there is no will to power; and where power predominates, there love is lacking. The one is the shadow of the other" - C.G. Jung
"I don't care if you are black, white, straight, bisexual gay, lesbian, short, talk skinny, fat, rich, or poor, if you're nice to me I'll be nice to you, simple as that." -Eminem
"The most awful dirty in a human being is not being able to enjoy a clean soul" (William Ventura)
"If you Copy and Do Exactly what a Successful Man or Business Does then You Too Will end up Successful." Author unknown
60 Best Ever Inspirational Life Quotes To Live By - Fashion Lifestyle Blog
"If everything seems under control, you're not going fast enough"  Mario Andretti
"Good taste is the enemy of comedy."  Mel Brooks
"People seem to enjoy things more when they know a lot of other people have been left out of the pleasure."  Russell Baker
"Under capitalism, man exploits man. Under communism, it's just the opposite."  John Kenneth Galbraith
"The biggest communication problem is we do not listen to understand, we listen to reply." -Buhda
"Those who approach life like a child playing a game, moving and pushing pieces, possess the power of kings." - Heraclitus
"Those who are awake all live in the same world. Those who are asleep live in their own worlds." - Heraclitus
"I will never completely understand life but I can enjoy it" -Mioshi Williams
"The boisterous sea of liberty is never without a wave."  Thomas Jefferson
"Between what is said and not meant, and what is meant and not said, most of love is lost." - Khalil Gibran
"A first sign of the beginning of understanding is the wish to die." - Franz Kafka (by way of Rob Zombie)
"The concept of progress acts as a protective mechanism to shield us from the terrors of the future" -Frank Herbert
"The truth is, no one knows what is going to happen tomorrow, life is a crazy ride, and nothing is guarantee." -Eminem
"If you're dumb, surround yourself with smart people. If you're smart, surround yourself with smart people who disagree with you." - Aaron Sorkin
"It is nice to be important, but it is more important to be nice" - John Templeton
"A daily dose of daydreaming heals the heart, soothes the soul, and strengthens the imagination." - Richelle E. Goodrich
"Between what is said and not meant, and what is meant and not said, most of love is lost."-Khalil Jibran
"He who has never learned to obey cannot be a good commander." - Aristotle
"Only an armed people can be truly free. Only an unarmed people can ever be enslaved." - Aristotle
"Don"t underestimate the allure of darkness. Even the purest hearts are drawn to it". -Klaus Mikaelson
"Before you speak, ask yourself: Is it kind, is it necessary, is it true, does it improve the silence?" - Sathya Sai Baba
"I see now that the circumstances of one's birth are irrelevant. It is what you do with the gift of life that determines who you are." - Mewtwo
"When eating fruit, remember who planted the tree; when drinking clear water, remember who dug the well." -Vietnamese Proverb
"You have become the very thing you swore to destroy..." - Obi-Wan
"Just because you aren"t broken doesn"t mean you can"t be better" - me in the shower
"If journalism is good, it is controversial, by its nature. - Julian Assange
"Life is the most realistic game you will ever play. Increase your stats such as intellect or strength by going to the gym or library. Everyone will remember you for being a top player in life, but not everyone will remember you for being a top player in a video game."
"Capitalism is just spicy Communism" -Me
"Happiness lies not in the mere possession of money; it lies in the joy of achievement, in the thrill of creative effort." Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Hard times create strong men. Strong men create good times. Good times create weak men. And, weak men create hard times." -G. Michael Hopf
"In love it's essential that couples enjoy good habits,but it's bad to get used to the bad habit of living together without love" (William Ventura)
"One person's kink is another person's phobia." - Myself
"Dread it.. run from it.. destiny still arrives." - Thanos
"You have to surrender to the fact that you are of too many in a highly competitive field where it is difficult to stand out. Over time, through your work, you will demonstrate who you are and what you bring to the field. Just stay with it and keep working."  Lisa Kudrow
"Idleness is not doing nothing. Idleness is being free to do anything."  Floyd Dell
"I tend to live in the past because most of my life is there."  Herb Caen
"It's not that I'm afraid to die, I just don't want to be there when it happens."  Woody Allen
"The struggle you"re in today is developing the strength you need for tomorrow. Don"t give up."  Robert Tew
"It is easier for the world to accept a simple lie than a complex truth." - Alexis de Tocqueville.
"Strippers are the Google of the streets"-Dave Chapelle
"The more you know, the more you know you don't know." - Aristotle
"A friend of everyone is a friend of no one." - Aristotle
"All the art of living lies in a fine mingling of letting go and holding on."  Havelock Ellis
"The surest way to corrupt a youth is to instruct him to hold in higher esteem those who think alike than those who think differently." - Nietzsche
"One ought to hold on to one"s heart; for if one lets it go, one soon loses control of the head too." - Nietzsche
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." - Nietzsche
"You don't learn this stuff to use it later. You learn this stuff to be able to pass" - My maths teacher in my second to last year
"How can you achieve your 10 year plan in the next 6 months?" - attributed to Peter Thiel
"Hell isn't other people. Hell is yourself." - Ludwig Wittgenstein (on Sartre)
"Our bodies are apt to be our autobiographies." - Frank Gelett Burgess
"The Edge, there is no honest way to describe it. Because the only ones who know where it is, have already gone over." Hunter S. Thompson
"She wore a thousand faces all to hide her own" -Atticus
"She exists as in dreams. She has no sense of reality. She gets nervous because people are always interrupting her daydreams." - Clarice Lispector
"The secret of being miserable is to have leisure to bother about whether you are happy or not. The cure for it is occupation." -- George Bernard Shaw ("Misalliance") (1910)
"Experience is the name men give to their mistakes." -Oscar Wilde
"You can tell when someone has everything when they start throwing things away" - Myself.
"Not forgiving someone is like drinking poison and expecting the other person to die"- Nelson Mandela
"Every love story is a tragedy if you wait long enough."- The Handmaid"s Tale.
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education. " -Mark Twain
"I dont even wanna I dont know"- My biology teacher
"After a certain age, being messy is a sign of misery"  Porsche Williams
"We now face the danger, which in the past has been the most destructive to the humans: success, plenty, comfort, and ever-increasing leisure. No dynamic people have ever survived these dangers." John Steinback
"The surest way of spoiling a pleasure is to start examining your satisfaction." C.S. Lewis
"If you understand compound interest, you basically understand the universe." Robert Breault
"Walk the second mile." John Maxwell
"Keep erasing, and I will keep writing" -graffiti in downtown Cairo
"Have more than you show, and say less than you know."
"Music directly represents the passions of the soul. If one listens to the wrong kind of music, he will become the wrong kind of person." - Aristotle
"Everyone may not be good, but there's always something good in everyone. Never judge anyone shortly because every saint has a past and every sinner has a future." - Oscar Wilde
"Time is all you have. And you may find one day that you have less than you think."  Randy Pausch
"Doing nothing is very hard to do... you never know when you're finished."  Leslie Nielsen
"There was a star riding through clouds one night, and I said to the star, "Consume me"." - Virginia Woolf
"If you want to make an apple pie from scratch the first step is inventing the universe." - Carl Sagan
"You don't need another human being to make your life complete, but let's be honest. Having your wounds kissed by someone who doesn't see them as disasters in your soul, but cracks to put their love into, is the most calming thing in this world." - Emery Allen
"You don't need another human being to make your life complete, but let's be honest. Having your wounds kissed by someone who doesn't see them as disasters in your soul, but cracks to put their love into, is the most calming thing In this World." - Emery Allen
"Since the bicycle makes little demand on material or energy resources, contributes little to pollution, makes a positive contribution to health and causes little death or injury, it can be regarded as the most benevolent of machines." Stuart S. Wilson
"A society grows great, when old men plant trees who"s shade they will never sit in." - A Greek proverb. 
"The idea is to write it so that people hear it and it slides through the brain and goes straight to the heart." Maya Angelou
"What is the purpose of one's life but to be a very small cog in a very big wheel that moves in a forward motion. This wheel has been moving for three billion plus years. May it never stop." - Ravi Silari
"Whatever you hold in your mind on a consistent basis is exactly what you will experience in your life." - Tony Robbins
"Few people can see genius in someone who has offended them."  Robertson Davies
"Rage is the only quality which has kept me, or anybody I have ever studied, writing columns for newspapers."  Jimmy Breslin
"Under certain circumstances, profanity provides a relief denied even to prayer."  Mark Twain
"Parents were invented to make children happy by giving them something to ignore."  Ogden Nash
"Honest hearts produce honest actions." - Brigham Young
"a fervent, a solemn passion is conceived in my heart; it leans to you, draws you to my centre and spring of life, wrap my existence about youand, kindling in pure, powerful flame, fuses you and me in one."
"Overthinking will Destroy your Mood. Breathe and let go."
"We are no longer happy so soon as we wish to be happier."  Walter Savage Landor
"When joy is a habit, love is a reflex." - Bob Goff
"The world had teeth and it could bite you with them anytime it wanted"- Stephen King
"Put not your trust in money, but put your money in trust." - Oliver Wendell Holmes
"Annual income twenty pounds, annual expenditure nineteen six, result happiness. Annual income twenty pounds, annual expenditure twenty pounds ought and six, result misery." - Wilkins Micawber in David Copperfield by Charles Dickens
"People try to do all sorts of clever and difficult things to improve life instead of doing the simplest, easiest thing-refusing to participate in activities that make life bad." - Leo Tolstoy
"There was a young man who said though, it seems that I know that I know, but what I would like to see is the I that knows me when I KNOW that I know that I know."  Alan Wilson Watts
"If people tell you that you should live your life preparing for the future, do not believe them. Real Life is found only in the present." - Leo Tolstoy
"They said I can't rap about bein' broke no more They ain't say I can't rap about coke no more Slut, you think I won't choke no whore Til the vocal cords don't work in her throat no more?!"
"But I am very poorly today and very stupid and hate everybody and everything" - Charles Darwin
"My weaknesses... I wish I could come up with something. I'd probably have the same pause if you asked me what my strengths are. Maybe they're the same thing. " - Al Pacino
"I began to realize how important it was to be an enthusiast in life. If you are interested in something, go at it full speed. Embrace it with both arms, hug it, love it, and above all become passionate about it. Lukewarm is no good." -Roald Dahl
"I like any reaction I can get with my music. Just anything to get people to think. I mean if you can get a whole room full of drunk, stoned people to actually wake up and think, you're doing something." - Jim Morrison
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston Churchill
"Success is brief. We live between failures and aspirations." James Altucher
"The beauty of our system is that it isolates everybody. Each person is sitting alone in front of the tube, you know. It"s very hard to have ideas or thoughts under those circumstances. You can"t fight the world alone." - Noam Chomsky
"If you quietly accept and go along no matter what your feelings are, ultimately you internalize what you"re saying, because it"s too hard to believe one thing and say another. - Noam Chomsky
"If you can"t say no, it means nothing when you say yes."
"If you can"t say no, then it means nothing when you say yes."
"Learn to be a leader, by following" -Joe Fall
"Don't mistake my kindness for weakness. I am kind to everyone, but when someone is unkind to me, weak is not what you are going to remember about me." - Al Capone
"If the glove doesn"t fit, give up" -Charlie"s uncle
"The more one is absorbed in fighting Evil, the less one is tempted to place the Good in question."
" The past is the beginning of the beginning and all that is and has been but the twilight of dawn" -H. G. Wells
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks that others have thrown at him." -David Brinkley
"He who wants to do good knocks at the gate: he who loves finds the door open." - Rabindranath Tagore
"The enemy is within the gates; it is with our own luxury, our own folly, our own criminality that we have to contend." - Cicero
"He is his own best friend and takes delight in privacy whereas the man of no virtue or ability is his own worst enemy and is afraid of solitude." - Aristotle
"The difference between a learned man and an ignorant one is the same as that between a living man and a corpse." - Aristotle
"Life isn"t divided into genres. It"s a horrifying, romantic, tragic, comical, science-fiction cowboy detective novel. You know, with a bit of pornography if you're lucky."  Alan Moore
"It's easier to pretend a smile,than to pretend that you've always been happy" (William Ventura)
"The difference between a mountain and a molehill is your perspective." - Allen Neuharth
"If you just set out to be liked, you would be prepared to compromise on anything at any time,and you would achieve nothing."-Margaret Thatcher
"Failure is a bend in the road, not the end of the road. Learn from failure and keep moving forward." - Roy T. Bennett
"He who lives without folly isn't so wise as he thinks."  Francois de La Rochefoucauld
"Listening, not imitation, may be the sincerest form of flattery."  Dr. Joyce Brothers
"Trying to be a first-rate reporter on the average American newspaper is like trying to play Bach's 'St. Matthew's Passion' on a ukulele."  Bagdikian's Observation
"From one thing, know ten thousand things" Miyamoto Musashi
"What is the one Goal, if Completed, that could Change Everything?" Timothy Ferriss
"He who loses wealth loses much; he who loses a friend loses more; but he that loses his courage loses all." - Miguel de Cervantes
"How thoughtful of God to arrange matters so that, wherever you happen to be born, the local religion always turns out to be the true one." Richard Dawkins
"Imprisonment of the body is bitter; imprisonment of the mind is worse." -Thornton Wilder
"Imprisonment of the body is bitter; imprisonment of the mind is worse." - Thornton Wilder
"The souls of people, on their way to Earth-life, pass through a room full of lights; each takes a taper - often only a spark - to guide it in the dim country of this world. - Plato (continued below)
"There is, and there always has been, an unusually high and consistent correlation between the stupidity of a given person and that person's propensity to be impressed by the measurement of I.Q" -Christopher Hitchens
"The more you know, the less you fear." - Chris Hadfield
"Men do not care how nobly they live, but only how long, although it is within the reach of every man to live nobly, but within no man's power to live long." - Seneca
"Do not sing me your praises. Praises are for great men, and I am no great man."
"If you want different outcomes than the ones you're getting, you have to do different things. If you want things to change a little bit, you have to change the way you think and behave a little bit. If you want things to change a lot, you have to change the way you think and behave a lot."
"Life is tough, darling, but so are you." - Unknown
"Only mediocrity can be trusted to be always at its best." - Max Beerbohm
"You all quit breathing, your fogging up my window." - my bus driver
"Be the change you want to see in yourself"- anonymous
"There's some pain that needs a solution, and some pain that needs a story" -Gianpiero Petriglieri
"Challenges are what make life interesting and overcoming them is what makes life meaningful." - Joshua Marine
"Our doubts are traitors, / And make us lose the good we oft might win / By fearing to attempt." - William Shakespeare,
"Sometimes when you"re in a dark place you think you"ve been buried, but you"ve actually been planted." - Christine Caine
[Looking for] Quote about the tragedy that the brightest minds go to work for the financial sector rather than change the world
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people."- Eleanor Roosevelt
"I would rather be governed by the first 2,000 people in the telephone directory than by the Harvard University faculty." -- William F. Buckley, Jr. (1961)
"I would rather be been governed by the first 2,000 people in the telephone directory than by the Harvard University faculty." -- William F. Buckley, Jr. (1961)
"We only obey laws that coincide with the ones we make"  Count Bass D
"Great men are like eagles, and build their nest on some lofty solitude." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Great men are like eagles, and build their nest on some lofty solitude." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Almost all of our sorrows spring out of our relations with other people." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Almost all of our sorrows spring out of our relations with other people." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"He who cannot be a good follower cannot be a good leader." - Aristotle
"I"d rather regret the things I"ve done than regret the things I haven"t done." - Lucille Ball
"I like long walks, especially when they are taken by people who annoy me." - Fred Allen
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"It is easier to turn a mountain into dust than to create love in a heart that is filled with hatred."  Hazrat Ali (RA)
"Difficult as it is really to listen to someone in affliction, it is just as difficult for him to know that compassion is listening to him." -Simone Weil
"It's a dangerous business going out your front door."  J. R. R. Tolkien
"Die? I should say not, dear fellow. No Barrymore would allow such a conventional thing to happen to him."  John Barrymore
"Antonym, n.: The opposite of the word you're trying to think of."  Unknown
"No man is rich enough to buy back his past." - Oscar Wilde
"To become a spectator of one's own life is to escape the suffering of life." - Oscar Wilde
"We are all alone, born alone, die alone, andin spite of True Romance magazineswe shall all someday look back on our lives and see that, in spite of our company, we were alone the whole way. I do not say lonelyat least, not all the timebut essentially, and finally, alone...
"Intelligence is a very valuable thing, and usually it comes far too late." - Alfie Solomon
"Man is condemned to be free, for once he is thrown into the world, he is responsible for everything he does." - Jean Paul Sartre
"Nothing is permanent, so you should be happy with what you got" -Thiru the Dosa man
"Good is the enemy of Best."
"It"s a dog-eat-dog world and I"m wearing Milk Bone underwear." Cliff Clavin (Cheers)
"A happy marriage is a long conversation which always seems too short."  Andre Maurois
"A man is a success if he gets up in the morning and goes to bed at night, and in between he does what he wants to do." - Bob Dylan
"Everything in moderation, including moderation." - Oscar Wilde
"Only entropy comes easy." - Anton Chekhov
"I may not have gone where I intended to go, but I think I have ended up where I needed to be." - Douglas Adams
"We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit." - Aristotle
"When you love what you do, you don't count hours, you just count the joy on people's faces as they leave the theatre." - Patrick Ward
&gt; "Birds born in a cage think flying is an illness." by Alejandro Jodorowsky
"You truly know when you've become an adult when you are allowed to eat more biscuits than you have hands"
"There he goes. One of God's own prototypes. Some kind of high powered mutant never even considered for mass production. Too weird to live, and too rare to die." - Hunter S. Thompson, Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas.
"Any dream dreamed too long becomes a nightmare, and from those, we awake screaming" -Andrzej Sapkowski
"Wrong does not cease to be wrong because the majority share in it." - Leo Tolstoy
"I used to think my life was a tragedy, but now I realize it's a comedy." - Joker
"Admit it. The cookie dough is usually better than the actual cookies." - Unknown
"Happiness lies in the joy of achievement and the thrill of creative effort." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"She gave me this cactus, said 'It's kinda like me It'll hurt you to hold it, but it blooms every spring'"
"Life without pain has no meaning." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Life without pain has no meaning." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"I don"t want to earn my living; I want to live." - Oscar Wilde
"You can"t change the past but you can forge the future by living in the present"
"Where some have a self, a starting point, most people have a void, because they are so busy projecting themselves as this or that, dedicating their lives to actualize a concept of what they should be like." -Bruce Lee
"I would venture to guess that Anon, who wrote so many poems without signing them, was often a woman." - Virginia Woolf
"Sometimes you must Hurt in order to Know, Fall in order to Grow, Lose in order to Gain, because life's greatest lessons are learned through Pain." - Masashi Kishimoto
"When everyone knows you"re a monster, you needn"t waste time doing every monstrous thing." - Leigh Bardugo (Six of Crows)
"You are enough to drive a Saint to madness, or a King to his knees"
"The measure of a man is what he does with power."  Plato
"We don't pick who we fall in love with"
"Fervor is the weapon of choice for the impotent."  Frantz Fanon
"There's always somebody who is paid too much, and taxed too little - and it's always somebody else."  Cullen Hightower
"The louder he talked of his honor, the faster we counted our spoons."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Health nuts are going to feel stupid someday, lying in hospitals dying of nothing."  Redd Foxx
"Do It Or Do Not Do It: You Will Regret Both."
"Some people never go crazy. What truly horrible lives they must lead"  Charles Bukowski
"I can live with no responsibility whatsoever, but the price I pay is that nothing matters. Or I can reverse it and everything matters, but I have to take the responsibility that is associated with that." - Jordan Peterson
"Life is but thought."  Sara Teasdale
"Happiness is not something you postpone for the future; it is something you design for the present." - Jim Rohn
"The first step towards getting somewhere is to decide you"re not going to stay where you are." JP Morgan
"If someone tells you that you hurt them, you don"t get to decide that you didn"t."
"Bloodshed gives way to more bloodshed. Hatred breeds more hatred. Until all of the violence soaks into the land, carving rivers of blood. And no matter how many times it happens, they never learn. Humans are made up of violent, miserable fools." -fullmetal alchemis
"May you find what you seek." - unknown origin (ancient curse)
"Suck my ass dickboys, I'm going to the fuckin' moon!" - Neil Armstrong
"Either America will destroy ignorance or ignorance will destroy the United States" - W.E.B. DuBois
"There is nothing more insulting than success." -Arsepick
"Every great dream begins with a dreamer. Always remember, you have within you the strength, the patience, and the passion to reach for the stars to change the world." - Harriet Tubman
"I don't let thy demons get the best of me" -You
"Nothing is as Dangerous as an Ignorant Friend; A Wise Enemy is to be Preferred." -Jean de La Fontaine.
"I'll believe that a corporation is a human when Texas executes one." --Bill Moyers
"If you get tired, learn to rest, not to quit."
"You change how you want to change, don't let anyone do the changing for you"
"Some people don't accept change, those people will judge you for how they perceived you when they first met you and got to know you, when change comes along they won't like it, they will be against it, they will entrap you and try and stop the change, don't let them change you, be yourself"
"What a nonsense question is "How did we exist?" while we are vanishing with our own hands. Ezhel
"Rise above the storm and you will find the sunshine " -UNKOWN
"It was character that got us out of bed, commitment that moved us into action, and discipline that enabled us to follow through." - Zig Ziglar
"Sanity may be madness but the maddest of all is to see life as it is and not as it should be."- Don Quixote
"Enlightenment is not like a sudden realization of something mysterious. Enlightenment is nothing but awakening from illusions and returning to the reality of life." - Kosho Uchiyama
"everybody may not think of life the same way.. but everybody sure as hell does experiences the pain they receive in life the same way" - Unknown
"Sometimes there just isn't enough time or energy"
" In the end, it's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years. " - Abraham Lincoln
"One can be the master of what one does, but never of what one feels." - Gustave Flaubert
" We judge ourselves by what we feel capable of doing,while others judge us by what we have already done." - Longfellow
"Happiness is a choice. You can choose to be happy. There"s going to be stress in life, but it"s your choice whether you let it affect you or not." - Valerie Bertinelli
"I used to think my life was a tragedy, but now I realize it's a comedy." - Joker
"Sometimes I think that the one thing I love most about being an adult is the right to buy candy whenever and wherever I want." - Ryan Gosling
"Be your own spectator; seek your own applause."  Seneca
"It is difficult to find happiness within oneself, but it is impossible to find it anywhere else." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Sometimes life coughs up coincidences no writer of fiction would dare copy" -Stephen King (11/22/63)
"Those who forget good and evil and seek only to know the facts are more likely to achieve good than those who view the world through the distorting medium of their own desires." - Bertrand Russell
"No man sees far, most see no farther than their noses." - Thomas Carlyle
"Gold medals aren"t really made of gold. They"re made of sweat, determination, and a hard-to-find alloy called guts." - Dan Gable
"As you get older, you start realizing that outer beauty is ephemeral, while inner beauty can last a lifetime" -Spanishdict app sentence for yesterday's word-of-the-day
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"We must not honor all the opinions of men but some and not others, and not of all men, but some." - Socrates
"Hating someone makes them important. Forgiving them makes them obsolete."
"We must learn to live together as brothers or perish together as fools." - Martin Luther King JR.
"Choosing to be positive and having a grateful attitude is going to determine how you're going to live your life. Joel Osteen
"If you love a flower, don"t pick it up. Because if you pick it up it dies and it ceases to be what you love. So if you love a flower, let it be. Love is not about possession. Love is about appreciation." - Osho
"God, grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, courage to change the things I can, and wisdom to know the difference." - Reinhold Niebuhr
"We need not to be let alone. We need to be really bothered once in a while. How long is it since you were really bothered? About something important, about something real?"  Ray Bradbury
"I haven't spoken to my wife in years. I didn't want to interrupt her."  Rodney Dangerfield
"To disagree with three-fourths of the British public is one of the first requisites of sanity."  Oscar Wilde
"All of us learn to write in the second grade. Most of us go on to greater things."  Bobby Knight
"We can understand one another; but each one is able to explain only himself" - Hermann Hesse
"To do the useful thing, to say the courageous thing, to contemplate the beautiful thing: that is enough for one man's life." T. S. Eliot
"Tomorrow is a hope, never a promise." - Lamb (Kindred)
"I was like you once. I had feelings like you. Y'know. I cared." -Babywolfrl
"We never love a person, but only qualities." -Blaise Pascal
"Sometimes people try to destroy you, precisely because they recognize your power  not because they don"t see it, but because they see it and they don"t want it to exist." - Bell Hooks
"They muddy the water,to make it seem deep"-Friedrich Nietzche
"The present time has one advantage over every other - it is our own."  Charles Caleb Colton
"If I cannot do great things. I can do small things in a great way." - Martin Luther King JR.
"The time you want your life to keep going, is the time when you're about to take it from yourself" -Babywolfrl
"Friendship is the hardest thing in the world to explain. It"s not something you learn in school. But if you haven"t learned the meaning of friendship, you really haven"t learned anything." - Muhammad Ali
"Mostly it is loss which teaches us about the worth of things." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"What people commonly call fate is mostly their own stupidity." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"If you have a garden and a library, you have everything you need." - Cicero
"Television is the first truly democratic culture - the first culture available to everybody and entirely governed by what the people want. The most terrifying thing is what people do want." - Clive Barnes
"Being part of a family doesn't mean being raped by dad" - Gregg Turkington
"He who cannot put his thoughts on ice should not enter into the heat of dispute." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"The achievements of an organization are the results of the combined effort of each individual." - Vince Lombardi
"People always ask where did my country go. The answer is nowhere, the people inside it just went crazy" - Anonymous
"The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why." - Mark Twain
"And god said "love your enemy". I obeyed him and loved myself." -Kahlil Gibran
"Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player That struts and frets his hour upon the stage And then is heard no more: it is a tale Told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, Signifying nothing."-Shakespeare, Macbeth.
"The woman who steals your gaming headset is the woman who steals your heart." -My boyfriend
"Actually, the best gift you could"ve given her was a lifetime of adventures."- Lewis Carroll
"A winner never stops trying." - Tom Landry
"If you don't build your dream someone will hire you to help build theirs." - Tony A. Gaskins Jr.
"Ask, "Why is this so unbearable? Why can"t I endure it?" You"ll be embarrassed to answer." - Marcus Aurelius
"There is no such thing as "away". When we throw anything away it must go somewhere." - Annie Leonard. A friendly reminder to avoid single-use plastics, unnecessary packaging and to try and reduce how much we throw out! We don"t have time to wait, the time for change is now 
"Man is a mystery. It needs to be unravelled, and if you spend your whole life unravelling it, don't say that you've wasted time. I am studying that mystery because I want to be a human being." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"While there's life, there's hope" -Stephen Hawking
"The safest way of not being very miserable is not to expect to be very happy." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Happiness belongs to those who are sufficient unto themselves. For all external sources of happiness and pleasure are, by their very nature, highly uncertain, precarious, ephemeral and subject to chance." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Happiness belongs to those who are sufficient unto themselves. For all external sources of happiness and pleasure are, by their very nature, highly uncertain, precarious, ephemeral and subject to chance." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"To be consistent is to walk up the stairs. You can go ahead and run, but just know that you will have to fall harder than anyone else"
: "As a man thinketh in his heart, so is he" Proverbs 23:7
"Friendship is always a sweet responsibility, never an opportunity." - Khalil Gibran
 Freedom of speech is not simply a freedom to think and say what you wish, but to speak for yourself, to speak from the heart, and to be accountable for your words.   Ian Mccallum
"Is not always guilty who pleads guilty,but the circumstances that force him/she to be" (William Ventura)
"I used to think my life was a tragedy, but now I realize it's a comedy." - Joker
"And when at last you find someone to whom you feel you can pour out your soul, you stop in shock at the words you utter; they are so rusty, so ugly, so meaningless and feeble from being kept in the small cramped dark inside you so long." Sylvia Plath
""the truth will set you free" was the first lie"
"Freedom is the right to tell people what they do not want to hear." - George Orwell
"There are people who think that everything one does with a serious face is sensible."  Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
"Some are born great, some achieve greatness, and some hire public relations officers."  Daniel J. Boorstin
"When ideas fail, words come in very handy."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Duct tape is like the force. It has a light side, a dark side, and it holds the universe together...."  Carl Zwanzig
"The bad fortune of the good turns their faces up to heaven; the good fortune of the bad bows their heads down to the earth" - Lucius Annaeus Seneca/ Saadi
"The heart is the only thing that can be captured easily and when tangled the hardest thing to set free"
"Imagination is more important than knowledge. Knowledge is limited. Imagination encircles the universe."  Albert Einstein
3 drinks in, first time posting here
"Dying together sucks a little less than dying alone."
"In order to have great happiness you have to have great pain and unhappiness, otherwise how would you know when you"re happy?" - Leslie Caron
"Normal is a myth. Everyone has issues they're dealing with." - Sally Jackson, The Lightning Thief Musical
"If you can't feed a hundred people, then feed just one."  Mother Teresa
"I am fond of pigs. Dogs look up to us. Cats look down on us. Pigs treat us as equals." -Winston Churchill
"Compassion for animals is intimately associated with goodness of character, and it may be confidently asserted that he who is cruel to animals cannot be a good man." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Man is the only animal who causes pain to others with no other object than wanting to do so." - Arthur Schopenhauer
" Dead people receive more flowers than the living ones because regret is stronger than gratitude."- Anne Frank
"Fashion changes, but style endures." - Coco Chanel
"Men have died from time to time, and worms have eaten them, but not for love" - William Shakespeare
"Abstract art: a product of the untalented sold by the unprincipled to the utterly bewildered. " - Al Capp
"A clever person solves a problem. A wise person avoids it." - Albert Einstein
"It"s so sad to think that for the most part the person who you trust the most is the one that always lets you down"-Thy quote king
"People who work together will win, whether it be against complex football defenses, or the problems of modern society." - Vince Lombardi
"So many parents are their child's first bully."
"A reader lives a thousand lives before he dies, The man who never reads lives only one." -George R.R. Martin
"Trust takes years to build, seconds to break , and forever to repair." -UNKOWN
"Other people are quite dreadful. The only possible society is oneself"- Oscar Wilde
"Since I no longer expect anything from mankind except madness, meanness, and mendacity; egotism, egotism, cowardice, and self delusion, I have stopped being a misanthrope"
"When you read, don't just consider what the author thinks, consider what you think" - - Tom Schulman, Dead Poets Society
"Lucky as it may seam to be, but after running out of friends to play with, Russian roulette starts to get boring." - OP
"Freedom in general may be defined as the absence of obstacles to the realization of desires." - Bertrand Russell
"Only optimists commit suicide, optimists who fail at being optimists" - Emil Cioran
"I have no objection to anyone's sex life as long as they don't practice it in the street and frighten the horses." - Oscar Wilde
"The man who says his wife can't take a joke, forgets that she took him." - Oscar Wilde
"I'm ten times richer than my big brother Bob, but he's got a haircut, he's got a real job!"-George Therogood
"Finding good players is easy. Getting them to play as a team is another story." - Casey Stengel
"Inspiration exists, but it has to find you working." -Pablo Picasso
"I think religion's greatest trick wasn't convincing someone there was a God who was all powerful. I think it was convincing someone else that you couldn't ridicule the idea." - Ricky Gervais
"Against boredom even gods struggle in vain" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Here's the thing: Copyright is fundamentally, irreparably incompatible with the Internet. It's now up to every country if they want the Internet, or if they would rather stay in the pre-1980 analog ages." - Rick Falkvinge
"A weak mind is not able to lift with the necessary force the weight of its weakness" (William Ventura)
"We are the worst creatures but we have the best sex" - me
"Fuck what you cannot destroy and destroy what you cannot fuck. " (by drunken me)
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Don't change your limits rather challenge your limits "
"Typos are very important to all written form. It gives the reader something to look for so they aren't distracted by the total lack of content in your writing."  Randy K. Milholland
"What this country needs is more free speech worth listening to."  Hansell B. Duckett
"My doctor gave me two weeks to live. I hope they're in August."  Ronnie Shakes
"A physicist is an atom's way of knowing about atoms."  George Wald
"Christians, Jews, Jainas, Mohammedans - everybody is lying. They all talk of God, heaven and hell, angels and all kinds of nonsense, without knowing anything at all." - Osho.
"(Love)...only strikes the lucky twice; once so you will know the price and once for crazy faith." - Alison Krauss (Crazy Faith)
"Hero-worship is strongest where there is least regard for human freedom" - Herbet Spencer
"The trouble with having an open mind, of course, is that people will insist on coming along and trying to put things in it." - Terry Pratchett
"I attribute my success to this: I never gave or took any excuse - Florence Nightingale"
" Years of LOVE have been forgot, in the HATRED of a minute."- EDGAR ALLAN POE.
"The most effective way to do it, is to do it."  Amelia Earhart
"Depths of oppression create heights of character" - Nelson Mandela
"Failure is the condiment that gives success its flavor." - Truman Capote
"That"s what true love is. Always wanting what"s best for someone, even if that doesn"t include you." What does this mean exactly?
"The nice thing about standards is that you have so many to choose from." Andrew S. Tanenbaum
"Example is not the main thing in influencing others. It is the only thing." - Albert Schweitzer
"Just because you do not take an interest in politics doesn't mean politics won't take an interest in you." Pericles
"Go forth and set the world on fire" -Saint Ignatius. "Fun fact: If you set the world on fire, you"ll be arrested for arson" -My sister, who went to a Jesuit school
"The only person that will truly be there for you a hundred percent of the time is yourself so in reality you should never rely on other people to do things for you that you are more than capable of doing yourself" -Thy quote king
"There's a river on my skin There's a dragon in the dark Nothing scares me more Than the silence of your heart" lyrics from Beth Hart- You belong to me
"A man can be himself only so long as he is alone; and if he does not love solitude, he will not love freedom; for it is only when he is alone that he is really free." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"I don't want to go to heaven. None of my friends are there." - Oscar Wilde
"Don't explain your philosophy. Embody it." - Epictetus
"It's not necessarily what a family is supposed to look like. But it is what it is. It's about a connection and bond that everyone can identify with." - Queen Latifah
"When a stupid man is doing something he is ashamed of, he always declares that it is his duty." - George Bernard Shaw
"Tough old world, baby. If you're not bolted together tightly, you're gonna shake, rattle, and roll before you turn thirty." -Stephen King (via character Jack Torrance)
"Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Wishing is not enough; we must do."  Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe
"The pessimist sees difficulty in every opportunity. The optimist sees opportunity in every difficulty."  Winston Churchill
"Love is something you don't have that you give to someone who doesn't want it."  Jacques Lacan
"Bigamy Is Having One Spouse Too Many. Monogamy Is the Same." -Disputed Attribution (Erica Jong, H.L. Mencken, Oscar Wilde and others)
"Bigamy Is Having One Spouse Too Many. Monogamy Is the Same." - Disputed Attribution (Erica Jong, H.L. Mencken, Oscar Wilde and others)
" You don't have to be great to start, but you have to start to be great." - Zig Ziglar
"We can complain because rose bushes have thorns, or rejoice because thorn bushes have roses." - Disputed/Unknown (Abraham Lincoln, Oscar Wilde and others)
"Bran thought about it. 'Can a man still be brave if he's afraid?' 'That is the only time a man can be brave,' his father told him." - George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
"We won't be distracted by comparison if we're captivated with purpose." - Bob Goff
"Not to feel exasperated, or defeated, or despondent because your days aren't packed with wise and moral actions. But to get back up when you fail, to celebrate behaving like a human--however imperfectly--and fully embrace the pursuit that you've embarked on." - Marcus Aurelius
"I try to avoid criticizing people when they are right. If they genuinely deserve criticism, I will not need to wait long for an occasion where they are wrong." -- Eliezer Yudkowsky
"Ka is a wheel, all it knows how to do is turn..." -Roland Deschain (Stephen King, Dark Tower series)
"Insanity is relative. It depends on who has who locked in what cage." - Ray Bradbury
"I used to think my life was a tragedy, but now I realize it's a comedy." - Joker
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world."
"I have a theory that the truth is never told during the nine-to-five hours."  Hunter S. Thompson
"I can picture in my mind a world without war, a world without hate. And I can picture us attacking that world, because they'd never expect it."  Jack Handey
"The more I want to get something done, the less I call it work."  Richard Bach
"Do not condemn the judgement of another because it differs from your own. You may both be wrong."  Dandemis
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"I wondered if any wilderness would be more desolate than this! And then I remembered another of the kind  the home I"d left behind" - Mirza Ghalib
"If people say outside and looked at the stars each night, I"ll bet they"d live a lot differently." - Calvin and Hobbes
"They always say time changes things, but you actually have to change them yourself."  Andy Warhol
"Evil begins when you begin to treat people as things." - Terry Pratchett
"We have to demand more from our illegals, it's unacceptable." - Aries Spears
"Talent hits a target no one else can hit; Genius hits a target no one else can see." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Our greatest fear should not be of failure but of succeeding at things in life that don't really matter"-Francis Chan
"I cannot"
"You don't love someone for their looks, or their clothes or their fancy car, but because they sing a song only you can hear." - Disputed/Unknown (frequently misattributed to Oscar Wilde and others)
"I like hearing myself talk. It is one of my greatest pleasures. I often have long conversations all by myself. Sometimes I am so clever I don't understand a single word of what I am saying." - Oscar Wilde
"You don't love someone for their looks, or their clothes or their fancy car, but because they sing a song only you can hear." - Disputed/Unknown (frequently misattribured to Oscar Wilde and others)
"A libertarian is an anarchist who wants a strong police force available, to protect him from his slaves."  Kim Stanley Robinson
"Prayer is like masturbation. It feels good to the person doing it, but does nothing for the person they"re thinking about." -Some random Redditor
"The happiness of most people we know is not ruined by great catastrophes or fatal errors, but by the repetition of slowly destructive little things."  Ernest Dimnet
"Let no man pull you low enough to hate him."- Martin Luther King,Jr.
"I am searching for the bones of your father but cannot distinguish them from those of a slave."  Diogenes of Sinope (replying to Alexander the Great who asked why he was staring at a pile of bones)
"I am not a member of any organized political party. I am a Democrat." - Will Rogers
"Optimism, as I define it, has to do with knowledge. It's not a prediction of the future, it's an explanation of failure. If you explain failure as being inevitable or due to some insuperable malevolent force or just the way things are, then that's a recipe for stasis, which is a recipe for failure"
"Every person that you meet knows something you don't; learn from them." - H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"Satire, first and foremost, is a form of validation" - Rudolf P Belmar
"If you know someone who"s depressed, please resolve never to ask them why. Depression isn"t a straightforward response to a bad situation; depression just is, like the weather." - Stephen Fry [Continued Quote in Comments]
"Grab a paper plate and masturbate into it. That felt good right? Now put them semen back in your penis. Doesn"t work? Kinda like how you can"t take back the words you say." - dennismiller2024
"I hate when people tell me they've been a fan of my work since the 5th grade. Leaves me wondering, like, are you in middle school or are you a brain surgeon" - Rucka Rucka Ali
"Everything that is really great and inspiring is created by the individual who can labor in freedom." - Albert Einstein
"Never mistake motion for action" - Ernest Hemingway
"Never mistake motion for action" - Ernest
"They say true love only comes around once and you have to hold out and be strong until then. I have been waiting. I have been searching. I am a man under the moon, walking the streets of earth until dawn. There's got to be someone for me. It's not too much to ask. Just someone to be with...
"They say true love only comes around once and you have to hold out and be strong until then. I have been waiting. I have been searching. I am a man under the moon, walking the streets of earth until dawn. There's got to be someone for me. It's not too much to ask. Just someone to be with...
"If the path before you is clear, you"re probably on someone else"s." - Joseph Campbell
"Is not the person who gives more that should be recognize all the good that he/she does,but the one who with less shows the desire to give more" (William Ventura)
"A fanatic is one who can"t change his mind and won"t change the subject." - Winston Churchill
"If the baby doesn't cry, it doesn't get the nipple." -Turkish proverb
"You can"t go back and change the beginning, but you can start where you are and change the ending." - C. S. Lewis
" Never give up without a fight"
"The world doesn"t care about your opinion, it only wants you to echo theirs" - the Truth
"Laziness is nothing more than the habit of resting before you get tired."  Jules Renard
"Everybody lies, but it doesn't matter because nobody listens."  Nick Diamos
"Three o'clock is always too late or too early for anything you want to do."  Jean-Paul Sartre
"Quotation, n: The act of repeating erroneously the words of another."  Ambrose Bierce
"It makes for happiness to be what you can, when you cannot be what you would." -- Girolamo Cardano
''I gave up trying to understand people long ago. Now I just let them try to understand me!'' -- Charles Schulz
"Intelligence is the ability to avoid doing work, yet getting the work done." - Linus Torvalds
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The wild, cruel beast is not behind the bars of the cage. He is in front of it." - Axel Munthe
"For a man like me may be judged by those who look back, I did what I did to tell those who look back what they shouldn't do. As what I do is for the betterment of my people, but ultimately exposes the evil within my pure heart."
"Speak to your children as if they are the wisest, kindest, most beautiful and magical humans on earth, for what they believe is what they will become." - Brooke Hampton
"A pure hand needs no glove to cover it."  Nathaniel Hawthorne
"...the worst monsters are those we bring with us" -Altered Carbon, S1.Ep3: In a Lonely Place
"There"s a fine edge to new grief, it severs nerves, disconnects realitythere"s mercy in a sharp blade. Only with time, as the edge wears, does the real ache begin." - Christopher Moore, A Dirty Job
"Capturing a moment in a photo gives you the chance to forget it, but how else can you hold that same happiness in your hand?"
"In order to hold off the Forces of Darkness, you will need a number two pencil and a calendar, preferably one without pictures of kitties on it." - Christopher Moore, A Dirty Job
"Even after all this time the sun never says to the Earth, "You owe me." Look what happens with a love like that, it lights up the whole sky." - some guy
"Hesitating in a time essential moment is thinking, and thinking is doing nothing at that moment." -ME
"I had no shoes and I pitied myself. Then I met a man who had no feet, so I took his shoes." - Dave Barry
"Selfishness is not living your life as you wish to live it. Selfishness is wanting others to live their lives as you wish them to." - Oscar Wilde
"A bore is someone who deprives you of solitude without providing you with company." - Oscar Wilde
"I"m saying you"ve already done plenty of things to regret, you just don"t know what they are..." - Roger Rueff
"The mass of men lead lives of quiet desperation. " - Henry David Thoreau
"Success is going from failure to failure without losing your enthusiasm" - Abraham Lincoln
"If our minds like an attic what is our responsibility in order to maintain it?"
"We have empty conversation filled with empty words with most people. And when those who come along whose words are filled with life, love, and wonderment, we notice them that much more, so that we will never let them go."
"Don't explain your philosophy. Embody it." - Epictetus
"If Prometheus was worthy of the wrath of heaven for kindling the first fire upon earth, how ought all the gods honor the men who make it their professional business to put it out!" -John Godfrey Saxe
"When you vote, you are exercising political authority, you're using force. And force, my friends, is violence. The supreme authority from which all other authorities are derived." - Robert A. Heinlein, Starship Troopers
"The biggest men and women with the biggest ideas can be shot down by the smallest men and women with the smallest minds. Think big anyway."--Kent Keith:
"You're either a massive outlier, and haven't taken the fact that others might say it more than you, or you've massively underestimated how many people exist." -Anoymous Redditor
"Those who have blood on their hands" - Abb Pierre
"The circulation of confidence is better than the circulation of money." - James Madison
"To be good, and to do good, is all we have to do." - John Adams
"If scum rules the world,only more scum is born"- Eustass "Captain" Kidd
"To age truly was to suffer the ultimate treason, that of one's body against oneself." - Brandon Sanderson
"Opportunity is missed by most people because it is dressed in overalls and looks like work." - Thomas Edison
"Freedom discovers man the moment he loses concern over what impression he is making or about to make." Bruce Lee
"Every single time you help somebody stand up, you are helping humanity rise."  Steve Maraboli
-H.Jackson Brown, Jr.
"An eye for an eye makes the whole world blind." - attributed to Gandhi.
"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal." - Albert Camus
"Commitment means staying loyal to what you said you were going to do long after the mood you said it in has left you."
"Every man, wherever he goes, is encompassed by a cloud of comforting convictions, which move with him like flies on a summer day."  Bertrand Russell
"If a thing isn't worth saying, you sing it."  Pierre Beaumarchais
"Is sloppiness in speech caused by ignorance or apathy? I don't know and I don't care."  William Safire
"Man is the only animal that laughs and has a state legislature."  Samuel Butler
"Masses are always breeding grounds of psychic epidemics" - Carl Jung
"If you close your mind in judgements, and traffic with desires, your heart will be troubled. If you keep your mind from judging, and aren't led by the senses, your heart will find peace." Tao Te Ching
"Suspicious looking stranger flashes you a dangerous grin. Shadows across your window... Was it only trees in the wind? Every breath a static charge, a tongue that tastes like tin. Steely-eyed outside to hide the enemy within." -Neil Peart (Rush - The Enemy Within)
 Steve Jobs
"When they said sit down I stood up"- Bruce Springsteen
"Don't be too eager to rid yourself of your burdens. Your burdens are what shape you." - J. Scott Savage, Far World:Water Keep
"Life is suffering. It is hard. The world is cursed. But still, you find reasons to keep living."  Princess Mononoke
"The man who makes no mistakes does not usually make anything." Edward Phelps
"Religion is like a blind man looking in a black room for a black cat that isn't there, and finding it." - Disputed/Unknown (Emerson, Oscar Wilde and others)
"They've promised that dreams can come true - but forgot to mention that nightmares are dreams, too." - Oscar Wilde
"Religion is like a blind man looking in a black room for a black cat that isn't there, and finding it." - Oscar Wilde
"I thought I was strong, but that's because I had never been broken before" -me
"I"m sorry Wendy but I just don"t trust something that bleeds for 5 days and doesn"t die" - Mr Garrison
"The snake which cannot cast its skin has to die. As well the minds which are prevented from changing their opinions; they cease to be mind." Friedrich Nietzsche
"To become a spectator of one's own life is to escape the suffering of life." - Oscar Wilde
"Be your own spectator; seek your own applause."  Seneca
"Its not a good post unless the first comment says it's shit" - u/NotOnLand
"The accumulation of all powers, legislative, executive, and judiciary, in the same hands, whether of one, a few, or many, and whether hereditary, self-appointed, or elective, may justly be pronounced the very definition of tyranny." - James Madison
"By failing to prepare, you are preparing to fail." - Benjamin Franklin
"There"s no excuse to be bored. Sad, yes. Angry, yes. Depressed, yes, Crazy, yes. But there"s no excuse for boredom, ever."  Viggo Mortensen
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." -Mark Twain
"" - Napalm Death 1989
"Desire is the key to motivation, but it"s determination and commitment to an unrelenting pursuit of your goal  a commitment to excellence  that will enable you to attain the success you seek."Mario Andretti
"Do not forget that potatoes are better with potato sauce." - bertilssons
"This field, this game: it's a part of our past, Ray. It reminds us of all that once was good and that could be again. Oh...people will come Ray. People will most definitely come." - James Earl Jones
"Ability is what you're capable of doing. Motivation determines what you do. Attitude determines how well you do it."- Lou Holtz
"What makes the desert beautiful is that somewhere it hides a well..." Antoine de Saint-Exupry, The Little Prince
"Do what got you invited." - Tupac Shakur
"Its important to remind yourself that this is not a race. Do what you can do today. You will get to where you are going. Progress happens in layers. " (-Audrey Kitching)
"We wait to escape from the ways we escape."
"We can tell the world that there is life after death, but the world really seems to be wondering if there is life before death." -Shane Claiborne
"RRRRRRRIGHT THROUGH THE COUNTER STRIKE, OH i fucking love it, its like having fun except go fucking kill yourself riot just go fucking kill yourself"hashinshin
 What is freedom of expression? Without the freedom to offend, it ceases to exist.   Salman Rushdie
"The report of my death was an exaggeration." - Mark Twain
" Think positive,Follow your heart,that's a good place to start" - Eri Hunt
"Ever notice that 'What the hell' is always the right decision?" ---Marilyn Monroe
"There are no uninteresting things, only uninterested people."  G.K. Chesterton
"Sooner or later, we all sit at the banquet of our consequences." - Robert Louis Stevenson
"Of all the infirmities we have, the most savage is to despise our being." Montaigne
"If you never heal from what hurt you, you will bleed on people who didn't cut you." - Unknown
"I don't know anything, but I do know that everything is interesting if you go into it deeply enough." - Richard Feynman
"Don't fuck with a scorpion unless you're prepared to get stung!"
"In the morning,  solitude;  that nature may speak to the imagination, as she does never in company." - Pythagoras
"I always find it more difficult to say the things I mean than the things I don't."  W. Somerset Maugham
"Faith is, at one and the same time, absolutely necessary and altogether impossible."  Stanislaw Lem
"The optimist proclaims that we live in the best of all possible worlds; and the pessimist fears this is true."  James Branch Cabell
"Death must be so beautiful. To lie in the soft brown earth, with the grasses waving above one's head, and listen to silence. To have no yesterday, and no tomorrow. To forget time, to forgive life, to be at peace." - Oscar Wilde
"You should sit in meditation for twenty minutes every day  unless you"re too busy. Then you should sit for an hour." - Zen proverb
"Held within the Pleasure Dome decreed by Kubla Khan. To taste my bitter triumph, as a mad immortal man. Nevermore shall I return, escape these caves of ice. For I have dined on honeydew, and drunk the milk of Paradise." -Neil Peart (Rush - Xanadu)
"I know I'm stupid..I know I'm stupid but yet I'm smarter than almost everyone I meet" - Joe Rogan
"We are here to laugh at the odds and live our lives so well that Death will tremble to take us." - Charles Bukowski
"Go in the libraries and read great people, write so that you learn how to think, and talk so that you learn how to speak. It will make you unbelievably powerful." - Jordan Peterson
"It"s been a rough week for the Democrats, and it"s only Monday" Sean Hannity 4/1/2019
"Worry never robs tomorrow of its sorrow, it only saps today of its joy."  Leo Buscaglia
"I"m selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can"t handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don"t deserve me at my best."-Marilyn Monroe
"Trust the over-thinker who tells you they love you. They have, most assuredly, thought of every reason not to." -LK Pilgrim
"You think, "Okay, I get it, I"m prepared for the worst", but you hold out that small hope, see, and that"s what fucks you up. That"s what kills you." -Stephen King
"Where we have strong emotions, we're liable to fool ourselves." - Carl Sagan
"Men are anxious to improve their circumstances, but are unwilling to improve themselves, they therefore remain bound." - James Allen
"People who say they don't care what people think are usually desperate to have people think they don't care what people think." - George Carlin
"Today should remind us that we should never be scared to fail all failure does is set you back but the time of the setback is completely up too you push yourself too be the best you and never doubt your true self"-Thy quote king
"Nature likes to hide" - Heraclitus
"And now here is my secret, a very simple secret: It is only with the heart that one can see rightly; what is essential is invisible to the eye."
"The day the child realizes that all adults are imperfect, he becomes an adolescent; the day he forgives them, he becomes an adult; the day he forgives himself, he becomes wise" - Alden Nowlan
"One can have no smaller or greater mastery than mastery of oneself" - Leonardo Da Vinci
"Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups." - George Carlin
"The oldest, shortest words - 'yes' and 'no' - are those which require the most thought." - Pythagoras
"People who go from relationship to relationship never have a relationship with themselves." - Unknown
"If my life wasn't funny it would just be true, and that's unacceptable." - Carrie Fisher
"The more we value things outside our control, the less control we have." - Epictetus
"It is difficult to get a man to understand something, when his salary depends upon his not understanding it." - Upton Sinclair
"You probably wouldn"t worry about what people think of you if you could know how seldom they do." - Olin Miller
"I'm in an abusive relationship with life. It keeps beating the hell out of me, and I'm too much of a coward to leave."
"I was made to work; if you are equally industrious, you will be equally successful." Johann Sebastian Bach.
"If it weren't for baseball, many kids wouldn't know what a millionaire looked like."  Phyllis Diller
"My favorite thing about the Internet is that you get to go into the private world of real creeps without having to smell them."  Penn Jillette
"All men are frauds. The only difference between them is that some admit it. I myself deny it."  H. L. Mencken
"I believe that banking institutions are more dangerous to our liberties than standing armies. "  Thomas Jefferson
"I prefer to be Optimistic and Wrong rather than Pessimistic and Right" - Elon Musk
"Piss on a stick and call me pregnant" - Crayator
"'Shreds of black cloud loom in overcast skies. The Necromancer keeps watch with his magic prism eyes. He views all his lands and is already aware of the three helpless invaders trapped in his lair...' -Neil Peart (Rush - The Necromancer)
"My house is more expensive than your bag" my 5 year old sisters bully
"In reality, though, the first thing to ask of history is that it should point out to us the paths of liberty. The great lesson to draw from revolutions is not that they devour humanity but rather that tyranny never fails to generate them." -- Pierre Elliott Tradeau
"I wanted the whole world or nothing." - Charles Bukowski
"Here cometh April again, and as far as I can see the world hath more fools in it than ever."  Charles Lamb
"Money can't buy happiness but you can't buy anything without it." - Author Unknown
"We think too much and feel too little." - Charlie Chaplin
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough."
"one who cannot reign his will into submission will forever be a slave to his senses". -Unknown.
"What the superior man seeks is in himself; what the small man seeks is in others." - Confucius
"Each minute wounds, and the last minute kills." - Latin proverb
"Each minute wounds; the last one kills." - Latin sundial proverb
"The crap WANTS to hit the fan, which is why it keeps flying itself toward it. The military's job is to keep it away, the Lo2's job is to make sure it sprays the Aldokk as much as possible when it does hit." - Anonymous: Attributed to a Lord of Oblivion agent who [REDACTED]
"Before hesitating, understand this; the Aldokk have chosen this path, and so the Aldokk MUST pay." - Jahraku Veanhil, The Soldier of Wrath and the main character of THE SOVEREIGN SPECIES, COMING OF THE ALDOKKTIDE.
"Dumbledore watched her fly away, and as her silvery glow faded he turned back to Snape, and his eyes were full of tears. "After all this time?" "Always," said Snape." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." - William Shakespeare, All's Well That Ends Well
"It is not a lack of love, but a lack of friendship that makes unhappy marriages." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr., A Testament of Hope: The Essential Writings and Speeches
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"Never forget that everything Hitler did in Germany was legal." -Martin Luther King
"A man chooses, a slave obeys." - Andrew Ryan, Bioshock
"While you are giving up, someone else is achieving your dream"
"The sad truth of reality is no matter how good of a person you are or the person you have become you are always gonna be the villain is someone"s story"
"Is that what the critics are digging? Them critics better stop having coffee."  Miles Davis
"Comedy with an agenda is not funny, because it"s not meant to make people laugh, it"s meant to make people agree." -Drew Gooden
"People are rewarded in public for what they've practiced for years in private" - Tony Robbins
"People pay for what they do, and still more for what they have allowed themselves to become. And they pay for it very simply; by the lives they lead." - James Baldwin
"Son, we live in a world that has walls, and those walls have to be guarded by men with guns." -Colonel Nathan R. Jessep
"If you could do good things for other people, then you have a moral obligation to do those things." -Uncle Ben (The Amazing Spider-Man, 2012)
"For beautiful eyes, look for the good in others; for beautiful lips, speak only words of kindness; and for poise, walk with the knowledge that you are never alone." Audrey Hepburn
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"Keep your face always toward the sunshine - and shadows will fall behind you." - Walt Whitman
"The only time a woman really succeeds in changing a man is when he is a baby." - Natalie Wood
"The only time a woman really succeeds in changing a man is when he is a baby. - Natalie Wood"
"Education is what remains after one has forgotten what one has learned in school." - Albert Einstein
"A gray day is not only able to steal the blue from the sky,it's also capable of clouding our feelings and make it rain sadness" (William Ventura)
"A woman passion goes beyond a passionated desire that ends in bed;her passion goes first to the respect that is given to her,to equality and love that beggins when she ends up being loved" (William Ventura)
"You can never underestimate the stupidity of the general public."  Scott Adams
"So much of what we call management consists in making it difficult for people to work."  Peter Drucker
"Women want mediocre men, and men are working hard to become as mediocre as possible."  Margaret Mead
"Living in a vacuum sucks."  Adrienne E. Gusoff
"Just because my path is different doesn't mean I'm lost"
"Like a steely blade in a silken sheath, we don't see what they're made of. They shout about love, but when push comes to shove, they live for the things they're afraid of." -Neil Peart (Rush - The Weapon)
"yeah" - yeah-man
"Tact is the ability to describe others as they see themselves."  Abraham Lincoln
"You cannot make a revolution with silk gloves" - Joseph Stalin
"Reassurance is the act of making the present, a safe space" - Rudolf P Belmar
"You can"t believe everything you read on the internet." - Thomas Jefferson
"The government of today has no right telling us how to live our lives, because the government of 200 years ago already did" - Jack Kelly
"I ask not for a lighter burden, but for broader shoulders" -Atlas
-Unknown
"Don't gain the world and lose your soul, wisdom is better than silver or gold." -Bob Marley
"Properly read, the Bible is the most potent force for Atheism ever created" - Isaac Asimov
"Your cash ain't worth a thing if you don't spend it." - Marcus (Borderlands video game)
"A man is as unhappy as he has convinced himself he is." - Seneca
"I'm not in your imagination, you're in mine." - Kid.
"Love her, but leave her wild " -To kill a Mockingbird
"National pride has evil consequences. Prefer pride in humanity. German pride gave us Hitler, American pride gave us Trump, British pride gave us Brexit. If you must have pride, be proud that Homo sapiens could produce Darwin, Shakespeare, Mandela, Einstein, Beethoven" - Richard Dawkins
"A failure is not always a mistake, it may simply be the best one can do under the circumstances. The real mistake is to stop trying" - B.F SKINNER
"Science can destroy religion by ignoring it as well as disproving its tenants. No one ever demonstrated, so far as I am aware, the nonexistence of Zeus or Thor, but they have few followers now." -Arthur C. Clarke (Childhood's End)
"We cannot choose our external circumstances, but we can always choose how we respond to them." - Epictetus
"We do not "come into" this world; we come out of it, as leaves from a tree...Every individual is an expression of the whole realm of nature, a unique action of the total universe." - Alan Watts
"Nothing bleeds hate more than ignorance"
"Education is the passport to the future, for tomorrow belongs to those who prepare for it today." - Malcolm X
"The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why." - Mark Twain
"Man is by nature a social animal; an individual who is unsocial naturally and not accidentally is either beneath our notice or more than human. Society is something that precedes the individual. - Aristotle (continued below)
"Where your talents and the needs of the world cross, therein lies your vocation. These two, your talents and the needs of the world, are the great wake up calls to your true vocation in life... to ignore this, is in some sense, is to lose your soul." - Aristotle
"You can"t make waves until you have established that there is water in the ocean." - Phil DelNegro
"The medicine of forgiveness can never be insufficient in the pharmacy of the heart" (William Ventura)
"Work hard in silence, let your success be your noise." - Frank Ocean
"I have long been of the opinion that if work were such a splendid thing the rich would have kept more of it for themselves."  Bruce Grocott
"Cockroaches and socialites are the only things that can stay up all night and eat anything."  Herb Caen
"I have such poor vision I can date anybody."  Garry Shandling
"Politics is applesauce."  Will Rogers
" The mountain holds the sunrise in the prison of the night, til bursting forth from rocky chains, the valley floods with light." -Neil Peart (Rush - The Fountain of Lamneth)
"The only way we can overcome our fear of emptiness is to stop feeding it"
"Education is the key to success in life, and teachers make a lasting impact in the lives of their students." - Solomon Ortiz
"Every Problem is a special Challenge from which we can learn and prosper to new heights of achievement "  Robin Sharma
"Self Mastery is the DNA of Life Mastery"  Robin Sharma
"The worst thing happened to you that could happen to any fighter. You got civilized." - Rocky III
"Words are, of course, the most powerful drug used by mankind."  Rudyard Kipling
"Luck is What Happens When Preparation Meets Opportunity."- Roman philosopher Seneca
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Look deep into nature, and then you will understand everything better." - Albert Einstein
"The most important relationship we can all have is the one you have with yourself, the most important journey you can take is one of self-discovery. To know yourself, you must spend time with yourself, you must not be afraid to be alone. Knowing yourself is the beginning of all wisdom."-Aristotle
"Excellence is never an accident. It is always the result of high intention, sincere effort, and intelligent execution; it represents the wise choice of many alternatives - choice, not chance, determines your destiny." - Aristotle
"Wrestlings real, people are fake" - Jake Roberts
"Reading makes a full man, meditation a profound man, discourse a clear man." - Benjamin Franklin
"Give thyself time to learn something new and good, and cease to be whirled around." - Marcus Aurelius
"By 2005 or so, it will become clear that the internet's impact on the economy has been no greater than the fax machine's"--Paul Krugman (1998)
"When you want to succeed as bad as you want to breathe, then you will be successful!" - Eric Thomas
"Hard work is a prison sentence only if it does not have meaning." - Malcolm Gladwell
"Wealth is not an absolute. It is relative to desire. Every time we yearn for something we cannot afford, we grow poorer, whatever our resources. And every time we feel satisfied with what we have, we can be counted as rich, however little we may actually possess." - Alain de Botton
"I need to find a way to show people how much I love them, despite all my words and actions"- Maria Bamford
"You should never regret anything in life if it"s good than it"s wonderful and if it"s bad it"s experience"
"Society is a social construct." - Jack Freeman, 2019
"By nature of definition only the coward is capable of the highest heroism."
"If there is a God, he's a great mathematician." - Paul Dirac
"If we are honest - and scientists have to be - we must admit that religion is a jumble of false assertions, with no basis in reality." - Paul Dirac
"An inconvenience is only an adventure wrongly considered; an adventure is an inconvenience rightly considered." - G. K. Chesterton
"Learn to ask of all actions, 'Why are they doing that?' Starting with your own." - Marcus Aurelius
"Learn to ask of all actions, 'Why are they doing that?' Starting with your own." Marcus Aurelius, Meditations Book 10 Chapter 37 (Hays)
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power." - Abraham Lincoln
"The Truth is we're all on our way out. Act accordingly."
"Education is not the filling of a pail, but the lighting of a fire." - William Butler Yeats
"Fortune always favors the brave, and never helps a man who does not help himself." - P. T. Barnum
"I have no special talents. I am only passionately curious." - Albert Einstein
"He wrapped himself in quotations- as a beggar would enfold himself in the purple of Emperors."  Rudyard Kipling
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger, more complex, and more violent. It takes a touch of genius -- and a lot of courage -- to move in the opposite direction."  E. F. Schumacher
"A motion to adjourn is always in order."  Robert Heinlein
"In the sky, there are always answers and explanations for everything: every pain, every suffering, joy, and confusion." - Ishmael Beah
"looking back you get yourself together... looking back you get to go on... looking back you see that you get to change your mind about yourself and you get to go on..." -Henry Rollins, Alien Blueprint
"If I feel like my song is sung, I don't care if it's short. And I feel like my song is sung. -Johnny Cash
"The more things change, the more they are the same."  Alphonse Karr
"The greatest prison people live in is the fear of what other people think." - David Icke
"You can imprison a man, but not an idea. You can exile a man, but not an idea. You can kill a man, but not an idea." - Benazir Bhutto
"If more of us valued food and cheer and song above hoarded gold, it would be a merrier world." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"People who wonder if the glass is half empty or full miss the point. The glass is refillable."  Unknown
"Education is not preparation for life; education is life itself." - John Dewey
"The beauty of women is like a flower; marriage is their winter." -Unknown
"The gratification of any worthwhile idea is in the being that feels it." - ?
"Trusting in Strategies Impairs your Ability to Strategize" - A Buddhist Poker Theorist
"Tragedy is just comedy that hasn"t come to fruition. One day we will laugh at this. We will laugh at everything." - Matt Haig
"I surrounded myself with haters to know my weakness but the problem is they are back biting bitches"-surya
"Is the internet going to stay free?"  Aaron Swartz
"Fashion is the art of conforming faster than anyone else."  Anonymous
"...the line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart?" - Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"Knowledge will forever govern ignorance, and a people who mean to be their own governors, must arm themselves with the power knowledge gives." -James Madison
"The moral of the story is: I chose a half measure, when I should have gone all the way. I"ll never make that mistake again."
"The elevator to success is out of order. You'll have to use the stairs... one step at a time." - Joe Girard
"As you grow older, you will discover that you have two hands, one for helping yourself, the other for helping others." - Audrey Hepburn
"Dreams don"t work unless you take action. The surest way to make your dreams come true is to live them." - Roy T. Bennett
"Some people are born on third base and go through life thinking they hit a triple." - Unkown Author, but frequently misattributed to Barry Switzer
"Theres only 2 kinds of people, people that look at porn and people that lie about looking at porn, and I dont look at porn" -Alex Jones.
"What makes the desert beautiful is that it hides, somewhere, a well." - Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"Hard times create strong men. Strong men create good times. Good times create weak men. And, weak men create hard times." -G. Michael Hopf
"Don't ask for security, ask for adventure. Better to live 30 years full of adventure than a 100 years safe in the corner."  Jim Rohn
"I learned that people can easily forget that others are human." - a prisoner in the Stanford Prison Experiment (1971)
"I hold ambition of so light a quality that is is but a shadow's shadow."  William Shakespeare
"Integrity without knowledge is weak and useless, and knowledge without integrity is dangerous and dreadful."  Samuel Johnson
"A prose writer gets tired of writing prose, and wants to be a poet. So he begins every line with a capital letter, and keeps on writing prose."  Samuel McChord Crothers
"Smoking is one of the leading causes of statistics."  Fletcher Knebel
"I wish there was a way to know that you're in the good ol' days before you've actually left them" - Andy Bernard [The Office Finale]
"The days grow shorter and the nights are getting long, feels like we're running out of time. Every day it seems much harder tellin' right from wrong, you got to read between the lines." -Triumph - Fight the Good Fight
"Art is never finished, only abandoned" -Leonard da Vinci.
"Family and friendships are two of the greatest facilitators of happiness."
"That's the End Game"-Tony Stark (Age of Ultron)
"Are we to have a censor whose imprimatur shall say what books may be sold, and what we may buy? .. Is a priest to be our inquisitor, or shall a layman, simple as ourselves, set up his reason as the rule of what we are to read, and what we must believe?"  Thomas Jefferson
"Everything that is beautiful and noble is the product of reason and calculation."  Charles Baudelaire
"Motivation is what gets you started. Habit is what keeps you going." -Jim Rohn-
"Hell is much better."-Freddie Mercury
"Those who do not learn from the past are condemned to re-live it." George Santayana.
"Doubt is just the obstacles of life it is meant to slow you down and stop you from achieving what you want to achieve but you can overcome all obstacles with hard work and dedication"(Thy quote king)
'Choose always the way that seems the BEST, however rough it may be. Custom will soon render it easy and agreeable." Pythagoras
"Cauliflower is nothing but cabbage with a college education." - Mark Twain
"If you do what you've always done, you'll get what you've always gotten"- Tony Robbins
"The nine most terrifying words in the English language are "I'm from the government, and I'm here to help." -Ronald Reagan 1989
"Do what is right, not what is easy nor what is popular." - Roy T. Bennett
"My girlfriend used to smoke after sex, so we started using lube."  Jimmy Carr
"Fight apathy! Or don"t..." - Unknown (random graffiti in Fallout: New Vegas)
"One who suffers before it is necessary, suffers more than necessary.." -Seneca
"The smallest deed is better than the greatest intention." - John Burroughs
"Everyone thinks of changing the world, but no one thinks of changing himself." - Leo Tolstoy
"As machines become more and more efficient and perfect, so it will become clear that imprfection is the greatness of man." - Ernst Fischer
"A tiger doesn't lose sleep over the opinion of sheep"
"They say the best men are born out of their faults and that they often improve later on, more than if they"d never done anything wrong." -Shakespeare (found in A Man Called Ove)
"Reader, suppose you were an idiot. And suppose you were a member of Congress. But I repeat myself." -Mark Twain
"We feel sorry because we cry, angry because we strike, afraid because we tremble..." - William James
"You may never know what results come of your actions, but if you do nothing, there will be no results." -Mahatma Gandhi
"You may never know what results come of your actions, but if you do nothing, there will be no results." - Mahatma Gandhi
"I will love the light for it shows me the way, yet I will endure the darkness because it shows me the stars." -Og Mandino
"I will love the light for it shows me the way, yet I will endure the darkness because it shows me the stars." - Og Mandino
"An artist respects the silence, it serves the foundation of creativity" -Angry Trumpet Man
"You have to starve yourself to death to have a life here in America, unless you have a good job. Then your probably fat."
"Water doesn't have a certain shape. Soldiers don't have a certain cause. In this world, change is constant." - from a tv show
"Pride grows on the human heart like lard on a pig." - Alexsandr Solzhenitsyn
"What comes, will go. What is found, will be lost again. But what you are is beyond coming and going and beyond description. You are It." (-Rumi)
"The basic fact about human existence is not that it is a tragedy, but that it is a bore. It is not so much a war as an endless standing in line." H.L. Mencken
"We crave for new sensations but soon become indifferent to them. The wonders of yesterday are today common occurrences." - Nikola Tesla
"We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them." - Albert Einstein
"Grudges are for those who insist that they are owed something; forgiveness, however, is for those who are substantial enough to move on." - Criss Jami
"In the country of the blind, the oneeyed person is not in charge. The oneeyed person is in a freak show."  After a proverb; see HG Wells
"Learn to listen. People just want to be heard. To feel that their voice matters. Give them a listening ear. Show them that in the chaos of this world, someone is concerned and can empathize with them, free from judgment. Be that person for someone. Show your ability to care." Ismail Menk
"Restlessness is an itch that, if left unscratched, is a curse" -Seth Barnes
"Strong minds discuss ideas, average minds discuss events, weak minds discuss people." - Socrates
"Don"t walk behind me; I may not lead. Don"t walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend."  Albert Camus
"The little cares that fretted me, I lost them yesterday Among the fields above the sea, Among the winds at play." - Unknown
"The moment you doubt whether you can fly, you cease forever to be able to do it." - J. M. Barrie, Peter Pan
"The moment you doubt whether you can fly, you cease for ever to be able to do it." - J. M. Barrie, Peter Pan
"There's no harm in hoping for the best as long as you're prepared for the worst." - Stephen King
"There is a God part in you. The consciousness. The pure Self. Learn to listen to the voice of that Power."  Amit Ray
"A question opens the mind. A statement closes the mind." -Robert Kiyosaki
"We are bits of stellar matter that got cold by accident, bits of a star gone wrong."  Sir Arthur Eddington
"Television is more interesting than people. If it were not, we would have people standing in the corners of our rooms."  Alan Corenk
"A wise man gets more use from his enemies than a fool from his friends."  Baltasar Gracian
"I'm just a person trapped inside a woman's body."  Elayne Boosler
"Spirits fly on dangerous missions imaginations on fire. Focused high on soaring ambitions consumed in a single desire. In the grip of a nameless possession. A slave to the drive of obsession. A spirit with a vision is a dream with a mission." -Neil Peart (Rush - Mission)
"Everyone knows what it's like to feel sad, but not everyone understands what it's like to feel depressed" - J
"Mankind must put an end to war - or war will put an end to mankind." John F. Kennedy
"The truth is, immigrants tend to be more American than people born here." - Chick Palahniuk
"You can't climb the ladder to success with your hands in the pocket" -Arnold Schwarzenegger
"Climate is what we expect, weather is what we get." - Mark Twain
"Just because it's in print doesn't mean it's the gospel" - Michael Jackson
"Money without skills is dangerous"
"The best way to keep your friends is not to give them away."  Wilson Mizner
"What if God was a her"  Common
"It seems, in fact, as though the second half of a man's life is made up of nothing, but the habits he has accumulated during the first half." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"It seems, in fact, as though the second half of a man's life is made up of nothing, but the habits he has accumulated during the first half." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"A negative mind will never give you a positive life."  Unknown
"A thousand words will not leave so deep an impression as one deed." - Henrik Ibsen
"Failure doesn't mean you are a failure it just means you haven't succeeded yet." -Robert H. Schuller-
"Joy can only be real if people look upon their life as a service and have a definite object in life outside themselves and their personal happiness." - Leo Tolstoy
"Anybody can become angry - that is easy, but to be angry with the right person and to the right degree and at the right time and for the right purpose, and in the right way - that is not within everybody's power and is not easy." - Aristotle
"My life has been full of terrible misfortunes, most of which never happened." - Michel de Montaigne
"The best asset is your own self. You can become to an enormous degree the person you want to be." - Warren Buffett
[Request] Looking about a quote about perfection
" Love your people like yourself; cultivate the affections, maintain the discipline, of the army; protect the fortunes of the rich, relieve the necessities of the poor." Justin II
"The future is scary for a lot of pepole but I promise you the future is a lot scarier when it becomes the past"
"Everybody is self-made but only successful people admit it." - Earl Nightingale
"If you want a picture of the future, imagine a boot stamping on a human facefor ever And remember that it is for ever." George Orwell
"Long Dong Silver, he rented that 3 times before he finally bought it" -Random C-Span Prank Caller
"Named must your fear be before banish it you can." - Yoda
"Desire is a contract that you make with yourself to be unhappy until you get what you want." - Naval Ravikant
"Boxing is a sport of self-control. [Click for full quote.]"  Cus D"Amato
"The problem with beauty is that it's like being born rich and getting poorer." Joan Collins
"The whole object of travel is not to set foot on foreign land; it is at last to set foot in one"s own country as a foreign land." - G.K. Chesterton
"Sometimes you don't realize your own strength, until you come up against your greatest weakness" - Susan Gale
"No one should be defined by the challenges they"ve faced, rather the strength it took to rise above them, and the knowledge gained along the way"
"Do not let your fire go out.... The world you desire can be won, it exists, it is real, it is possible, it is yours." - Ayn Rand
"If your plan is for one year, plant rice. If your plan is for 10 years, plant trees. If your plan is for 100 years, educate children." - Confucius
"If your plan is for one year plant rice. If your plan is for 10 years plant trees. If your plan is for 100 years educate children." - Confucius
"Believe half of what you see and none of what you hear." -- Anonymous
"Respect yourself and others will respect you." - Confucius
"The way of learning is none other than finding the lost mind." - Mencius
"The most important things are the hardest to say, because words diminish them." - Stephen King
"One day, this amazing, Important, and memorable time that you are experiencing, will become a one sentence line in a story"- Nasser
"The Hell Law says that Hell is reserved exclusively for them that believe in it. Further, the lowest Rung in Hell is reserved for them that believe in it on the supposition that they'll go there if they don't." -- the Principia Discordia
"Don"t tell people how to do things, tell them what to do and let them surprise you with their results." - George S. Patton Jr.
"If you fall  I"ll be there."  Floor
"Hope will never be silent." - Harvey Milk
"Not failure, but low aim, is the crime. In great attempts it is glorious even to fail." -Bruce Lee
"A man travels the world over in search of what he needs and returns home to find it."  George Moore
"The things that come to those that wait. May be the things left by those that got there first." - Steven Tyler
"I always like walking in the rain so no one can see me crying."  Charlie Chaplin
"That which has always been accepted by everyone, everywhere, is almost certain to be false."  Paul Valery
"I hate music, especially when it's played."  Jimmy Durante
"I stand by all the misstatements that I've made."  Dan Quayle
"There cannot be a crisis next week. My schedule is already full."  Henry Kissinger
" Mystic rhythms, capture my thoughts and carry them away. Nature seems to spin a supernatural way. Mystic rhythms, under city lights, or a canopy of stars. We feel the powers and we wonder what they are." -Neil Peart (Rush - Mystic Rhythms) We feel the push and pull Of restless rhythms from afar
"Whenever you find yourself doubting how far you can go, just remember how far you have come."  Unknown
"The quieter you become, the more you are able to hear" - Ram Dass
"What's broken can always be fixed but what's fixed will always be broken." -Jens Lekman
"Silence is the mother of truth."  Benjamin Disraeli
"Empty your mind, be formless. Shapeless, like water. If you put water into a cup it becomes the cup. You put water into a bottle it becomes the bottle. You put water into a teapot, it becomes the teapot. Now, water can flow or it can crash. Be water my friend." - Bruce Lee
"Looking back on one's life, you realize love was the answer to everything."
"Our business is our business, none of your business." ---- Daisy Shah
"Appreciate what you have before it becomes what you had." - Anonymous
"Don"t look for big things, just do small things with great loveThe smaller the thing, the greater must be our love." - Mother Teresa
"Who you are, what you think, feel and do, what you love  is the sum of what you focus on"  Gallagher
"The great use of life is to spend it for something that will outlast it." William James
"If you cry because the sun has gone out of your life, your tears will prevent you from seeing the stars." -Rabindranath Tagore
"If you cry because the sun has gone out of your life, your tears will prevent you from seeing the stars." - Rabindranath Tagore
[Help] I"m trying to remember a quote, but I can"t remember all the words. The part I do remember is about an angel leaving to go back to heaven after living among humans, when someone asks, "what was the worst part?" And the angel replied about dulled senes, how his eyes blurred his vision, etc
"With every increase in the degree of consciousness, and in proportion to that increase, the intensity of despair increases: the more consciousness the more intense the despair." Sren Kierkegaard
"Let us consider that we are all insane. It will explain us to each other; it will unriddle many riddles."  Mark Twain
"We can judge our progress by the courage of our questions and the depth of our answers, our willingness to embrace what is true rather than what feels good." -Carl Sagan
"One of the nice things about problems is that a good many of them do not exist except in our imaginations." - Steve Allen
"Carry out a random act of kindness, with no expectation of reward, safe in the knowledge that one day someone might do the same for you." -Princess Diana
"I believe that the practice of compassion and love  a genuine sense of sisterhood and brotherhood - is the universal religion. It does not matter whether you are a Buddhist or a Christian, Hindu, Muslim, or Jew, or whether you practice religion at all. H.H. the Dalai Lama (continued below)
"I believe that the practice of compassion and love  a genuine sense of sisterhood and brotherhood - is the universal religion. It does not matter whether you are a Buddhist or a Christian, Hindu, Muslim, or Jew, or whether you practice religion at all.  H.H. the Dalai Lama (continued below)
"Maybe in order to understand mankind, we have to look at the word itself. Basically, it's made up of two separate words  "mank" and "ind." What do these words mean? It's a mystery, and that's why so is mankind." - Jack Handey
"No matter what happens in life, be good to people. Being good to people is a wonderful legacy to leave behind."  Taylor Swift
"Though we travel the world over to find the beautiful, we must carry it with us or we find it not." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Between stimulus and response, there is a space. In that space is our power to choose our response." - Viktor Frankl
"When the news is all bad, when you're sour and blue. When you start to get mad you should do what I do. Tell Yourself How Lucky You Are. So be happy you're here, think of life as a thrill and if worse comes to worse and we all know it will thank your lucky star you"ve gotten this far." - Seussical
"The Best Lack All Conviction While the Worst Are Full of Passionate Intensity" - W. B. Yeats
"The best way to not feel hopeless is to get up and do something" - Barack Obama
"In revolution there are only two types of men, those who cause them and those who profit by them" -Napoleon Bonaparte
"What saves a man is to take a step. Then another step. It is always the same step, but you have to take it." - Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Don"t change your mind just because people are offended; change your mind if you"re wrong." - Criss Jami
"Souls tend to go back to who feels like home." -N.R. Hart
"What"s the difference?" I asked him. "Between the love of your life, and your soulmate?" "One is a choice, and one is not."
"I belong to my beloved, and my beloved is mine." - Jamie McGuire, Beautiful Disaster
"So it"s true, when all is said and done, grief is the price we pay for love." - E.A. Bucchianeri, Brushstrokes of a Gadfly,
"She wanted something else, something different, something more. Passion and romance, perhaps, or maybe quiet conversations in candlelit rooms, or perhaps something as simple as not being second." - Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
"Moments, when lost, can't be found again. They're just gone." - Jenny Han, The Summer I Turned Pretty
"Romance is thinking about your significant other, when you are supposed to be thinking about something else." - nicholas sparks
"Nowadays people know the price of everything and the value of nothing" -Oscar Wilde
"It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets." - Voltaire
"Only in the agony of parting do we look into the depths of love." - George Eliot
"The soul is dyed the color of its thoughts. Think only on those things that are in line with your principles and can bear the light of day. The content of your character is your choice. -Heraclitus (continued below)
"Sell a man a fish, he eats for a day. Teach a man how to fish, you ruin a wonderful business opportunity." -Karl Marx
"The soul is dyed the color of its thoughts. Think only on those things that are in line with your principles and can bear the light of day. The content of your character is your choice. - Heraclitus (continued below)
"If you do not tell the truth about yourself you cannot tell it about other people." Virginia Woolf
"The propagandist's purpose is to make one set of people forget that certain other sets of people are human." - Aldous Huxley
"There is not a righteous man on Earth who does what is right and never sins" (Ecclesiastes 7:20).
"We are so accustomed to disguise ourselves to others that, in the end, we become disguised to ourselves."  Franois de la Rochefoucauld
"Just be who you wanna be, man!" Jonathan Levi
"If you feel happy in other people's happiness, and sad in other people's sorrow, He made no mistake by making you a human." - Vikas Yadav
"Impossible is just a big word thrown around by small men"- ALI
"Man is so made that he can only find relaxation from one kind of labor by taking up another."  Anatole France
"'Tis better to be silent and be thought a fool, than to speak and remove all doubt."  Abraham Lincoln
"Some men are born mediocre, some men achieve mediocrity, and some men have mediocrity thrust upon them."  Joseph Heller
"I was walking down the street wearing glasses when the prescription ran out."  Steven Wright
"Who are you why do you hide in the darkness and listen to my private thoughts." -William Shakespeare
"Don"t be satisfied with stories, how things have gone with others. Unfold your own myth." - Rumi
"Autumn shows us how beautiful it is to let things go."
"After climbing a great hill, one only finds that there are many more hills to climb." -Nelson Mandela-
"Where there is much freedom there is much error." - Friedrich Schiller
"We"ve all lost something, and I"ve seen what loss can do to people. But if we gave up every time we lost, then we"d never be able to move forward" -Ruby Rose
"People who don't know how to keep themselves healthy ought to have the decency to get themselves buried, and not waste time about it." - Henrik Ibsen
"You will never be happy if you continue to search for what happiness consists of. You will never live if you are looking for the meaning of life." - Albert Camus
"The most important things in life are invisible to the eye." - Fred Rogers
"To be true to one"s own freedom is, in essence, to honor and respect the freedom of all others." - Dwight D. Eisenhower
"Social media is making us forget how to interact with people in real-life. For some, posting what they want others to see helps them feel better about themselves, making them feel they"re connected to others. But technology isn"t life. Spend more time with people! Not devices." - Mufti Ismail Menk
"Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"A person who longs to leave the place where he lives is an unhappy person." - Milan Kundera
"The Jew is immunized against all dangers;
"Eat your heart out, Van Halen!" - George Harrison
"Study while others are sleeping; work while others are loafing; prepare while others are playing; and dream while others are wishing." - William Arthur Ward
"You can't stop the waves, but you can learn to surf." - Jon Kabat-Zinn
"If you don"t understand, ask questions. If you"re uncomfortable about asking questions, say you are uncomfortable about asking questions and then ask anyway." - Chimamanda Ngozi Adichie
"Someone else"s success does not equal a failure for you." - Joe Rogan
"You will soon have your God, and you will make it with your own hands." -- Deus Ex
"One of the unspoken rules of the code (they were all unspoken) was that preparation for a camping trip should involve absolutely no planning." - Kid Camping from A Fine and Pleasant Misery, by Patrick McManus
"Life"s battles don"t always go To the stronger or faster man, But sooner or later the man who wins Is the man WHO THINKS HE CAN." by NAPOLEON HILL.
"Some people see the glass half full. Others see it half empty. I see a glass that's twice as big as it needs to be." - George Carlin
"Paranoia is a byproduct of being consistently right."  Sherlock Holmes
"Never tell anyone he has no talent. That you may not say. That you do not know. That is the one absolute prohibition laid down." MARTHA GRAHAM, QUOTED IN Martha: The Life and Work of Martha Graham, Agnes de Mille
"Just like in bodybuilding, failure is also a necessary experience for growth in our own lives, for if we"re never tested to our limits, how will we know how strong we really are? How will we ever grow?" - Arnold Schwarzenegger
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." - Jiddu Krishnamurti
(Request)/(help) I"m looking for a good quote about Writing or Gaming for me to put on my Wattpad profile.
"Everything will be okay in the end. If it's not okay, it's not the end." -John Lennon
"If work was a good thing, the rich would have it all and not let you do it." - Elmore Leonard
"Everything will be okay in the end. If it's not okay, it's not the end." - John Lennon
"If you find a path with no obstacles, it probably doesn't lead anywhere." - Frank A. Clark
"You are as useful as a flat vibrator"
"You're a huge genius, Carlitos." -Don Genaro (Tales of Power)
"Sometimes maybe good, sometimes maybe shit" - Gennaro Gattuso succinctly summarizing life
"In our time together, you claimed a special place in my heart, one I'll carry with me forever and that no one can ever replace." - Nicholas Sparks, Dear John
"Sometimes you wake up from a dream. Sometimes you wake up in a dream. And sometimes, every once in a while, you wake up in someone else's dream. " - Richelle Mead, Succubus Blues
"thus with a kiss I die" - William Shakespeare, Romeo and Juliet
"The heart is an arrow. It demands aim to land true." - Leigh Bardugo, Six of Crows
"They say there is no man that can be wrong one hundred present of the time but you sir are most definitely doing a great effort in that direction" Levi Ashcol
"We are each our own devil, and we make this world our hell." - Oscar Wilde
"The birds not only live in freedom by carrying their wings,they're also free because they fly away from those who intend to imprison them" (William Ventura)
"Knowledge is knowing a tomato is a fruit; wisdom is not putting it in a fruit salad." - Miles Kington
"In front of a broken mirror we can only see an incomplete beauty or a face made pieces" (William Ventura)
 The heart has its reasons, of which reason knows nothing  - Blaise Pascal, French thinker
"Do not let what you cannot do interfere with what you can do."  John Wooden
"Real orgies are never so exciting as pornographic books."  Aldous Huxley (Point Counter Point, 1928)
"It is nobler to declare oneself wrong than to insist on being right - especially when one is right."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"The Constitution gives every American the inalienable right to make a damn fool of himself."  John Ciardi
"I phoned my dad to tell him I had stopped smoking. He called me a quitter."  Steven Pearl
"My one regret in life is that I am not someone else."  Woody Allen
"Poop washes off." -Every new mother to every new father, everywhere.
"If you can't fill out a form, then you're not ready for life." - My Dad, 2019.
'Jesus Christ himself isn"t worth 500 times his median workers" pay': Disney heiress criticizes CEOs for high salaries
"Set aside a certain number of days, during which you shall be content with the scantiest and cheapest fare, with coarse and rough dress, saying to yourself the while: "Is this the condition that I feared"" - Seneca
"Love is the desire to understand so as to love even more. That's what love is."- Prof. Plinio Correra de Oliveira
"There is nothing like a dream to create the future."  Victor Hugo
"The greatest glory in living lies not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall." -Nelson Mandela-
"Nothing material is intrinsically valuable, except in whatever promise of happiness it carries" - Matthew Killingsworth
"Make a game plan and stick to it. Unless it's not working." - Yogi Berra
"Men are not against you, they are merely for themselves" -Gene Fowler
"Force happiness unto others until they feel happier than you do, and hope they do the same." -Unknown
"Build a legacy not your bank valance."  Zillionaire Manzi
"If you step into someone else's shoes you have no idea if they'll fit" - is this a quote?
"To love means loving the unlovable. To forgive means pardoning the unpardonable. Faith means believing the unbelievable. Hope means hoping when everything seems hopeless." -Gilbert K. Chesterton
"To love means loving the unlovable. To forgive means pardoning the unpardonable. Faith means believing the unbelievable. Hope means hoping when everything seems hopeless." - Gilbert K. Chesterton
"Charity is certainly greater than any rule. Moreover, all rules must lead to charity." - St. Vincent de Paul
"Everything not saved will be lost." Nintendo "quit screen" message
"they worried that I spent too much time alone, clinging to the notion that socializing was therapeutic. So was electroshock, I reminded them." Miss Peregrine's Home for Peculiar Children
"I fear no evil, the shadow is mine and so is the valley" - Can someone me find the origin of this quote based off Psalm 23:4?
"The greatest danger for most of us is not that our aim is too high and we miss it, but that it is too low and we reach it." - Michelangelo
"The only thing worse than being blind is having sight but no vision." - Helen Keller
"The palest ink is better than the sharpest memory." -Chinese Proverb
"It takes an intelligent ear to listen to jazz." - Art Blakey
"Keep trying, stay humble, trust your instincts. Most importantly, act. When you come to a fork in the road, take it." - Yogi Berra
"Imperfection is beauty, madness is genius and it's better to be absolutely ridiculous than absolutely boring" - Marilyn Monroe
" Blame is a neat little device that you can use whenever you don't want to take responsibility for something in your life. Use it and you will avoid all risks and impede your own growth."
"Every gambler knows that to lose is what you're really there for." - U2, Every Breaking Wave
"People and their managers are so busy worrying about doing things right, that they hardly have time to worry about doing the right things." - Stephen Covey
"I"m not a businessman, I"m a business, man"  Jay Z
"Impossible is a word only to be found in the dictionary of fools."-Napoleon Bonaparte
"It is inexcusable for scientists to torture animals; let them make their experiments on journalists and politicians." - Henrik Ibsen
"Look into any man's heart you please, and you will always find, in every one, at least one black spot which he has to keep concealed." - Henrik Ibsen
"Liberty, as we all know, cannot flourish in a country that is permanently on a war footing, or even a near war footing. Permanent crisis justifies permanent control of everybody and everything by the agencies of central government." - Aldous Huxley
"The biggest communication problem is we don"t listen to understand, we listen to reply."
"The best books are yet to be written. The best paintings have not been painted. The best governments are yet to be formed. The best is yet to be done by you." John Erskine
"I know that we are part of this universe, we are in this universe, but perhaps more important than both of those facts is that the universe is in us. When I look up [instead of feeling small in a big universe] I feel big because my atoms came from those stars." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"There is nothing outside of yourself that can ever enable you to get better, stronger, richer, quicker, or smarter. Everything is within. Everything exists. Seek nothing outside of yourself."
"Who doesn't value a woman doesn't value his own life;who doesn't have the courage to love her doesn't love himself,and whoever mistreats her by hurting her skin and her love hurt himself,because with her skin and her love,she paid the price of her value for being a mother and be loved" (William V.)
"Lies are like children: they're hard work, but it's worth it because the future depends on them."  Pam Davis
"I think age is a very high price to pay for maturity."  Tom Stoppard
"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome."  Isaac Asimov
"I told the doctor I broke my leg in two places. He told me to quit going to those places."  Henny Youngman
"Be  don't try to become" - Osho
"If we want the rewards of being loved we must submit to the mortifying ordeal of being known" -Tim Kreider
"I am king of the Romans and above grammar." Sigismund, Holy Roman Emperor
"The man who is swimming against the stream knows the strength of it."  Woodrow Wilson
"Our doubts are traitors and make us lose the good we oft might win by fearing to attempt." - William Shakespeare
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it." -Charles R. Swindoll-
"The way to right wrongs is to turn the light of truth upon them." - Ida B. Wells
"There is always a risk in being alive, and if you are more alive, there is more risk." - Henrik Ibsen
"The costliness of keeping friends does not lie in what one does for them, but in what one, out of consideration for them, refrains from doing." -Henrik Ibsen
"The costliness of keeping friends does not lie in what one does for them, but in what one, out of consideration for them, refrains from doing." - Henrik Ibsen
"I proceeded to smoke him like a cigar and no-scope him from existence." -Jez the Titan Slayer, Slayer of all Titans
"I am one of those people who thrive on deadlines. Nothing brings on inspiration more readily than desperation." - Harry Shearer
"Selling out is usually more a matter of buying in. Sell out, and you"re really buying into someone else"s system of values, rules, and rewards." - Bill Watterson
"A hug is like a boomerang, you get it back right away." - Bil Keane
"If someone shows you their true colors, don't try to repaint them."
"Anyone who has the power to make you believe absurdities has the power to make you commit injustices." - Voltaire
"Things are only impossible until they are not." Capt. Jean-Luc Picard
"Looking up at the stars, I know quite well/That, for all they care, I can go to hell" W.H. Auden
"Nothing, everything, anything, something: if you have nothing, then you have everything, because you have the freedom to do anything without the fear of losing something." Jarod Kintz
"Advice is what we ask for when we already know the answer but wish we didn't." - Erica Jong
"The driver is safer when the roads are dry, and vice versa."
"Society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in." - Greek Proverb
"The most dangerous thing about weed is getting caught with it"  Various
"Life"s most persistent and urgent question is, "What are you doing for others?"."  Martin Luther King Jr.
"i had everything going for me, except myself" - Harry Nilsson
"There's no I in team. There is if you spell it wrong"
"The future comes slowly, the present flies and the past stands still forever." - Friedrich Schiller
"When you are not happy with your life, always think that someone is happy simply because you exist." -Friedrich Schiller
"When you are not happy with your life, always think that someone is happy simply because you exist." - Friedrich Schiller
"So the problem is not so much to see what nobody has yet seen, as to think what nobody has yet thought concerning that which everybody sees." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"The worst thing a son of a bitch can do is turn you into a son of a bitch." - Frank Oppenheimer
"Beyond the very extreme of fatigue and distress, we may find amounts of ease and power we never dreamed ourselves to own; sources of strength never taxed at all because we never push through the obstruction" - attributed to William James
"Reflect upon your present blessings of which every man has many - not on your past misfortunes, of which all men have some." - Charles Dickens
"The chances that you will wake up are in direct proportion to the amount of truth you can take without running away." - Anthony De Mello
"Most of what we call management consists of making it difficult for people to get their work done." - Peter Drucker
"A person who is not inwardly prepared for the use of violence against him is always weaker than the person committing the violence" - Solzhenitsyn
"Those who bring sunshine to the lives of others cannot keep it from themselves."  James Matthew Barrie
"Raise your words, not your voice. The rain grows flowers, not thunders." -Rumi
"War does not decide who is right, but only who is left." -Anonymous
"The world will always choose convenience over reality. It's easier to hate, blame and fear than it is to understand. No one wants the truth; they want entertainment." -Chris Colfer
"Develop a passion for learning. If you do, you will never cease to grow." - Anthony J. D"Angelo
"Assessment is a structured way of exploring the forces, trends, opportunities and threats in the external environment, and looking at how and how well the organization"s products and services meet customer and other stakeholder needs." - The Institute Way
"What worries you, masters you." - John Locke
"A man cannot be comfortable without his own approval."  Mark Twain
"Freedom is not choice, but the lack of compulsion to have to choose" - Rudolf P Belmar
"I do not fear death. I had been dead for billions and billions of years before I was born, and had not suffered the slightest inconvenience from it." -Mark Twain
"It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets."  Voltaire
"I can't understand why a person will take a year to write a novel when he can easily buy one for a few dollars."  Fred Allen
"Free advice is worth the price."  Robert Half
You will find the love you seek when you become the love you are 
...
"If something is wrong, fix it now. But train yourself not to worry, worry fixes nothing." Ernest Hemingway
"In fair weather prepare for foul."  Thomas Fuller
"The world looks more beautiful if you look at it from a distance, we too might need some distance in our lives" - Lim Jaebeom
"Fascism should be more appropriately called Corporatism because it is a merger of state and corporate power." -Benito Mussolini
"Faced with the choice between changing one's mind and proving that there is no need to do so, almost everyone gets busy on the proof." - John Kenneth Galbraith
"I did just enough work to pass. In my opinion it would have been wrong to do more than was just sufficient, so I worked as little as possible." -Manfred von Richthofen, The Red Baron
"The time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." - Bertrand Russell
"The secret to creativity is knowing how to hide your sources." - Albert Einstein
"People are just as happy as they make up their minds to be." - Abraham Lincoln
"How do you get so empty? Who takes it out of you?" Ray Bradbury
"Reality is merely an illusion, albeit a very persistent one." - Albert Einstein
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"You've wandered all over and finally realized that you never found what you were after: how to live. Not in syllogisms, not in money, or fame, or self-indulgence. Nowhere." -Marcus Aurelius
"You've wandered all over and finally realized that you never found what you were after: how to live. Not in syllogisms, not in money, or fame, or self-indulgence. Nowhere." - Marcus Aurelius
"Inner light is unceasingforever luminous and clear. Even in the darkest of circumstances, you can trust that it is always there." Tenzin Wangyal, "The Light Is Always There"
"Every gun that is made, every warship launched, every rocket fired signifies in the final sense, a theft from those who hunger and are not fed, those who are cold and are not clothed...Under the clouds of war, it is humanity hanging on a cross of iron." - Dwight D. Eisenhower
"Be warned, of what foolish men and women might do when in love, be warned even more of what foolish men and women might do when they think they are in love." -Unknown
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful about what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Everybody wants heaven but nobody wants dead"  Nas
'Nothing human is foreign to me.' Michel de Montaigne
"Little keys can open big locks, Simple words reflect great thoughts. Know that your smile can cure heart blocks, so keep on smiling because, It Rocks!"
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days before you've actually left them." -Andy Bernard
"Adequacy is the enemy of excellence." - Peter Drucker
"In the language of love when a dictation of the heart comes out,it must always be written in the notebook of the soul and with a pencil that never manage to erase it feeling" (William Ventura)
"When a man lies, he murders some part of the world. These are the pail deaths which men miscall their lives. All this I cannot bear to witness any longer. Cannot the kingdom of salvation take me home?" -Cliff Burton
"To let me dangle at a cruel angle Oh, my feet don't touch the floor Sometimes you're half in and then you're half out But you never close the door. " - Florence and the Machine, What kind of man loves like this?
"I can think, I can wait, I can fast" in the Book - Siddhartha by Hermann Hesse
"When a man plays a woman in a dress, you're halfway there. It's inherently funny. When a woman plays a man, for whatever reason, it's not that instant kind of funny."  Tina Fey
"Many a man who falls in love with a dimple make the mistake of marrying the whole girl."  Evan Esar
"It was no wonder that people were so horrible when they started life as children."  Kingsley Amis
"The human brain starts working the moment you are born and never stops until you stand up to speak in public."  George Jessel
"All too often, I find myself engrossed by the attainments of others; as a result, I neglect that such greatness lies dormant within myself; within each of us."  Unknown
"A hundred times every day I remind myself that my inner and outer life depend on the labours of other men, living and dead, and that I must exert myself in order to give in the same measure as I received and am still receiving."  Albert Einstein
"There is nothing good or bad, but thinking makes it so."  William Shakespeare
"Discourtesy is unspeakably ugly to me." -Hannibal Lecter
"It doesn't interest me what you do for a living. I want to know what you ache for, and if you dare to dream of meeting your heart's longing. It doesn't interest me how old you are. I want to know if you will risk looking like a fool for love, for your dreams, for the adventure of being alive."
"That which we obtain too easily we esteem too lightly. It is dearness only which gives everything its value. Heaven knows how to put a proper price on its goods." Thomas Paine
"There are two kinds of human beings: those who want certitude and those who want understanding." - Richard Rohr
"The key is not to prioritize what's on your schedule, but to schedule your priorities." -Stephen Covey-
"I distrust those people who know so well what God wants them to do, because I notice it always coincides with their own desires." - Susan B. Anthony
"If someone tells you they hurt you, you don"t get to decide you didn"t."
"God will provide the victuals, but He will not cook the dinner."
"The difference between being online and being physically among people is a bit like the difference between pornography and sex; it addresses a basic itch, but it's never satisfying." -Johann Hari
"If people misunderstand you, do not worry. It is your voice that they hear, but what goes through their mind is their own thoughts." - Rumi
"If people misunderstand you, do not worry. It is your voice that they hear, but what goes through their mind is their own thoughts." Rumi
" Find out who you are and do it on purpose". - Dolly Parton
"A learned fool is more a fool than an ignorant fool." -- Moliere
"I exaggerate because I want to be understood." R.O.K
"I exaggerate because I want to be understood."
"A shaky child on a bicycle for the first time needs both support and freedom. The realization that this is what the child will always need can hit hard." Sloan Wilson
"Baking and love go hand in hand, for as one bakes a tasty treat and fills the room with its sweet aroma, the true joy is to take what has been made and share it with another." - Heather Wolf
"To scream falsehood over anything that would oppose you is the way of the witless demagogue." - Malcador the Sigillite
"I"d rather die for a cause that is going to live than live for a cause that is going to die" O. Tambo
"Depth of friendship does not depend on length of acquaintance." - Rabindranath Tagore
"A message to all girls..." - Cipher (OC)
"A message to all girls..." - Ciphet (OC)
"One of the symptoms of an approaching nervous breakdown is the belief that one's work is terribly important." - Bertrand Russell
"The fairest rules are those to which everyone would agree if they did not know how much power they would have."  John Rawls
" A wise man told me, don't argue with fools. Cause people from a distance can't tell the difference. " - Jay-Z
"There came a time when the risk to remain tight in the bud was more painful than the risk it took to blossom."  Anas Nin
"The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting." Sun Tzu
"Because wherever I sat  on the deck of a ship or at a street caf in Paris or Bangkok  I would be sitting under the same glass bell jar, stewing in my own sour air." - Sylvia Plath, The Bell Jar
"I am not an angel,' I asserted; 'and I will not be one till I die: I will be myself. Mr. Rochester, you must neither expect nor exact anything celestial of me - for you will not get it, any more than I shall get it of you: which I do not at all anticipate." - Charlotte Bront, Jane Eyre
"Sometimes when I'm alone, I take the pearl from where it lives in my pocket and try to remember the boy with the bread, the strong arms that warded off nightmares on the train, the kisses in the arena." - Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
"Romance is the glamour which turns the dust of everyday life into a golden haze. " - Elinor Glyn
"My only love sprung from my only hate! Too early seen unknown, and known too late! Prodigious birth of love it is to me, That I must love a loathed enemy." - William Shakespeare
"When one is in love, one always begins by deceiving one's self, and one always ends by deceiving others. That is what the world calls a romance." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"We are told that talent creates its own opportunities. But it sometimes seems that intense desire creates not only its own opportunities, but its own talents." -Bruce Lee
"If you feel that you are indispensable, put your finger in a glass of water, withdraw it, and note the hole you have left."
" BE CONFIDENT BE BRAVE DON'T LET LIFE MAKE YOU AFRAID"
"You never have the wind with youeither it is against you or you"re having a good day."  Daniel Behrman
"To exist is to change, to change is to mature, to mature is to go on creating oneself endlessly." -Henri L Bergson
"The single most important distinction in lifeis to distinguish between an opportunity to be seized and a temptation to be resisted."  Rabbi Lord Jonathan Sacks
"Baffle you with bullshit" - an old saying which may apply to the Bible.
"That's the funny thing about havin' a kid. They come with their own set of problems; make everything else you were worried about seem kinda silly."  Greg Garcia
"In journalism, there has always been a tension between getting it first and getting it right."  Ellen Goodman
"We are here on Earth to do good to others. What the others are here for, I don't know."  W. H. Auden
"For three days after death hair and fingernails continue to grow but phone calls taper off."  Johnny Carson
"If you truly want to be respected by people you love, you must prove to them that you can survive without them".
"Any escape might help to smooth the unattractive truth. But the suburbs have no charms to soothe the restless dreams of youth." -Neil Peart (Rush - Subdivisions)
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live." - Norman Cousins
"Create the highest, grandest vision possible for your life, because you become what you believe"
"To hold a pen is to be at war."  Voltaire
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can"t practice any other virtue consistently." - Maya Angelou
"You can't guarantee everybody loves you, but you can guarantee you love yourself."
" Love only grows by sharing. You can only have more for yourself by giving it away to others. " - Brian Tracy
"The world is full of lonely people afraid to make the first move" -Green Book
"The key to success is to focus our conscious mind on things we desire not things we fear." -Brian Tracy-
"Our Founding Fathers objected to taxation without representation. They should see it today with representation." - Anonymous
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut
"We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit." Aristotle
"I see now that the circumstances of one's birth are irrelevant. It is what you do with the gift of life that determines who you are." - Mewtwo, Pokemon
"I noticed everyone who is for abortion has been born." - Ronald Reagan
"It's hard to be humble, when you're as great as I am." Muhammad Ali
"Don't stay in bed, unless you can make money in bed." George Burns
"Having everything you ever wanted is amazing, until it is taken from you. Then you're only left with yourself, and the soul-killing thought that you weren't worth it."
"The scars that you can't see are the hardest to heal.". -Nao Tomori
"I'm not intimidated by the stars that someone wears on their shoulders. I'm not intimidated by the military industrial complex and what they're pushing for." Tulsi Gabbard
"Every phenomenon that happens in the human world is caused by people for their own convenience." -Takano Miyo
"Sometimes it takes a long time to learn how to play like yourself." -Miles Davis
"goats are like mushrooms, if you shoot a duck, i'm scared of toasters" -Carlos Garcia (lmao, it's actually a real quote)
"We"re all going to die, all of us, what a circus! That alone should make us love each other but it doesn"t. We are terrorized and flattened by trivialities, we are eaten up by nothing." - Charles Bukowski
"There is no such thing as an ugly color. There is such a thing as an ugly color combination." - Douglas Finch, artist and interior designer in New York
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world."- Gandhi Ji
"The bar for people is so low these days that decent people seem to be superb, while awful people are more and more becoming the norm."
"If it seems a childish thing to do do it in remembrance that you are a child." - Frederick Buechner
"I'm the tower of power, too sweet to be sour. I'm funky like a monkey. Sky's the limit and space is the place!" -- Randy Savage
"Success does not consist in never making mistakes but in never making the same one a second time." - George Bernard Shaw
" A single moment of misunderstanding is so poisonous, that it makes us forget the hundred loveable moments spent together within a minute." - Unknown
"Bitch, if pornography didn"t exist, the world would be in flames right now. We would have lost the ozone layer 20 years ago. Pornography saved humanity, can"t ban that shit." -Penguinz0
"We who think we are about to die will laugh at anything." - Terry Pratchett, Night Watch
"Love and compassion are necessities, not luxuries. Without them humanity cannot survive." - Dalai Lama
"I can picture in my mind a world without war, a world without hate. And I can picture us attacking that world, because they'd never expect it." - Jack Handey
"There are these two young fish swimming along and they happen to meet an older fish swimming the other way who nods at them and says 'Morning, boys. How's the water?' And the two young fish swim on for a bit and then eventually one of them looks over at the other and goes 'What the hell is water?'"
"You have spared me any possibility of ending up as anything other than who I am. And for that, I thank you." - Captain Jack Sparrow
"When one is in love, one always begins by deceiving one's self, and one always ends by deceiving others. That is what the world calls a romance." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"I"ve been fighting to be who I am all my life. What"s the point of being who I am, if I can"t have the person who was worth all the fighting for?" - Stephanie Lennox, I Don't Remember You
"I wonder how many people don't get the one they want, but end up with the one they're supposed to be with." - Fannie Flagg, Fried Green Tomatoes at the Whistle Stop Cafe
"You"re dangerous," he says. "Why?" "Because you make me believe in the impossible" - Simone Elkeles, Rules of Attraction
"Here [in Vietnam] you see a lot of signs for dogs and cats, you think it is a pet shop but it's not"
"When you believe in a thing, believe in it all the way, implicitly and unquestionable." -Walt Disney-
"A girl phoned me the other day and said "Come on over, there's nobody home." I went over. Nobody was home."  Rodney Dangerfield
"Good judgement comes from experience. Experience comes from bad judgement."  Unknown
"Old age is not so bad when you consider the alternatives."  Maurice Chevalier
"TV is chewing gum for the eyes."  Frank Lloyd Wright
"Not only is my glass half empty, it's not what I ordered. [...] Not only is it not what I ordered, there's a chip in the rim!" -Catherine Tate
"If you cry because the sun has gone out of your life, your tears will prevent you from seeing the stars" - Rabindranath Tagore
"Imagine a man, when it all began. The pilot of Enola Gay, flying out of the shock wave on that August day. All the powers that be and the course of history, would be changed for evermore." -Neil Peart (Rush - The Manhattan Project)
"The further a society drifts from truth, the more it will hate those who speak it." - George Orwell
"He who searches for evil, must first look at his own reflection." - Confucious
"Imperfection is perfect." - Unknown
"Plodding wins the race."  Aesop
"We do not argue with those who disagree with us, we destroy them." -Benito Mussolini
"Never feel sorry for the choices people make; feel sorry for the people who those choices hurt."
"All the liabilities in this world are due to the inadequacies of the person involved."
"You gotta fight every day to keep mediocrity at bay." - Van Morrison
"The ordinary modes of human thinking are magical, religious, social, and personal. We want our wishes to come true; we want the universe to care about us; we want the approval of those around us; we want to get even with that s.o.b who insulted us at the last tribal council." John Derbyshire
"Don"t make a habit out of choosing what feels good over what"s actually good for you." - Eric Thomas
"I feel that it is healthier to look out at the world through a window than through a mirror. Otherwise, all you see is yourself and whatever is behind you." - Bill Withers
"Music is a moral law. It gives soul to the universe, wings to the mind, flight to the imagination, and charm and gaiety to life and to everything." - Plato
"The more often we see the things around us - even the beautiful and wonderful things - the more they become invisible to us...Because we see things so often, we see them less and less." --Joseph B. Wirthlin
"Take care of your body. It"s the only place you have to live."JIM Rohn
"You can be lonely anywhere, but there is a particular flavour to the loneliness that comes from living in a city, surrounded by millions of people," -Olivia Laing
(My own) hold your hopes high but your head higher.
"Reading fills your mind, writing empties it." -E.R. Hughes
"That's the thing about suicide. Try as you might to remember how a person lived his life, you always end up thinking about how he ended it."
"Tension is who you think you should be. Relaxation is who you are." - Chinese Proverb
"I just wish people would believe in me the way 2.2 billion people believe in a giant man in the sky." - A student from my school
"We don't rise to the level of our expectations, we fall to the level of our training." - Archilochus
"Everybody thinks that everybody knows about everybody else, but nobody knows anything about themselves because they"re all worried about everybody else" -Jack Johnson
"Whatever you decide to do, make sure it makes you happy!" - Paulo Coelho
"If you"re not making mistakes, then you"re not making decisions."  Catherine Cook
"I'm gay" -Pink guy
" Everyone wants happiness no one wants pain, but you can't have a rainbow without a little rain. " -UNKOWN
"One day Alice came to a fork in the road and saw a Cheshire cat in a tree. "Which road do I take?" she asked. "Where do you want to go?" was his response. "I don"t know," Alice answered. "Then," said the cat, "it doesn"t matter." - Lewis Carroll, Alice in Wonderland
"Courage isn"t having the strength to go on  it is going on when you don"t have strength." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Honesty helps. You get a long way in life as far as I'm concerned. You tell the truth, ask for help, instead of saying I know what I'm doing." - Penny Marshall
"More people would learn from their mistakes if they weren"t so busy denying that they made them."
"It's easy to be a naive idealist. It's easy to be a cynical realist. It's quite another thing to have no illusions and still hold the inner flame." - Marie-Louise von Franz
"Nothing stunts advancement like doing what's expected of you." - Sun-In-Shadow (Elder Scrolls character)
"I think everybody should get rich and famous and do everything they ever dreamed of so they can see that it's not the answer." -Jim Carrey
"Hate no one, no matter how much they have wronged you. Live humbly, no matter how wealthy you have become. Think positively, no matter how hard life is. Give much, even if you have been given little and forgive those who have wronged you." - Hazrat Ali, (Radi-Allahu anhu)
"Old George Orwell got it backward. [click for full quote]"
"One of the illusions of life is that the present hour is not the critical, decisive hour. Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year. No man has learned anything rightly, until he knows that every day is Doomsday." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"There is no such thing as "fun for the whole family.""  Jerry Seinfeld
"One man that has a mind and knows it can always beat ten men who haven't and don't."  George Bernard Shaw
"The pursuit of happiness is a most ridiculous phrase; if you pursue happiness you'll never find it."  C. P. Snow
"Perhaps in time the so-called Dark Ages will be thought of as including our own."  Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger, more complex, and more violent. It takes a touch of genius -- and a lot of courage -- to move in the opposite direction."- Albert e instein
"The Speed of Love--- Love is born with solar flares, from two magnetic poles. It moves towards a higher plane, where two halves make two wholes." -Neil Peart (Rush - The Speed of Love)
"I don't know if love was the one who hurts or the one we are loving."
"Nearly all men can withstand adversity, to truly test a man"s character give him power"
"The best often die by their own hand just to get away, but those left behind can never quite understand why anybody would ever want to get away from them." - Charles Bukowski
"Changes and progress very rarely are gifts from above. They come out of struggles from below." - Noam Chomsky
"We are preaching our own funeral as we go through this life" - (Unknown)
"Not all storms come to disrupt your life some come to clear your path."
"Peace and justice are two sides of the same coin."  Dwight D. Eisenhower
" All that we call human history is the sad tale of man trying to find something other than God which can make him happy." - C.S. Lewis
"If it is easy it is not love." - Unknown
"There"s many a pessimist who got that way by financing an optimist." - Anonymous
"Our attitude towards others determines their attitude towards us." -Earl Nightingale-
"Canada is like an old cow. The West feeds it. Ontario and Quebec milk it. And you can well imagine what it's doing in the Maritimes." - Tommy Douglas
"The achievement of socialism requires the solution of some extremely difficult socio-political problems: how is it possible, in view of the far-reaching centralization of political and economic power, to prevent bureaucracy from becoming all-powerful and overweening?" - Albert Einstein
"Its a lot stronger than a shark." Jason Momoa
"There is not one among us in whom a devil does not dwell; at some time, on some point, that devil masters each of us...It is not having been in the dark house, but having left it, that counts" - Theodore Roosevelt
"We live in a society with few, if any, coming-of-age rituals." -David Perrell
"When I became a man I put away childish things, including the fear of childishness and the desire to be very grown up." -- CS Lewis
"Lesbian Nazi Hookers abducted by UFOS and forced into weight-loss programs!" - "Weird Al" Yankovic, UHF
"Its the perfect old person's murder weapon! The moth ball!" - Burton Guster, Psych
"You are too concerned with what was and what will be. There is a saying: Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, but today is a gift. That is why it is called the present."-Master Oogway (Kung fu Panda)
"Never feel sorry for yourself. Only assholes do that." - Haruki Murakami, Norwegian wood (1987.)
"Middle class was a dream sold to countless Americans as a good goal toward which they should strive. Yet in reality, it is really only close to "good" &amp; probably better decribed as a mousetrap with a big fat piece of cheese on it". - Grant Cordone
"Both optimists and pessimists contribute to society. The optimist invents the aeroplane, the pessimist the parachute." - George Bernard Shaw
"Beautiful music is the art of the prophets that can calm the agitations of the soul; it is one of the most magnificent and delightful presents God has given us." - Martin Luther
"Music... will help dissolve your perplexities and purify your character and sensibilities, and in time of care and sorrow, will keep a fountain of joy alive in you." - Dietrich Bonhoeffer
"The aim and final end of all music should be none other than the glory of God and the refreshment of the soul." - Johann Sebastian Bach
"Racism isn't born, folks, it's taught. I have a two-year-old son. You know what he hates? Naps! End of list." Denis Leary
"Sometimes the Bible in the hand of one man is worse than a whisky bottle in the hand of (another)... There are just some kind of men who - who're so busy worrying about the next world they've never learned to live in this one, and you can look down the street and see the results." - Harper Lee
"I refuse to accept the view that mankind is so tragically bound to the starless midnight of racism and war that the bright daybreak of peace and brotherhood can never become a reality... I believe that unarmed truth and unconditional love will have the final word." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"The greatest gift of life is friendship, and I have received it."  Hubert H. Humphrey
"I"ve got a dream that"s worth more than my sleep." Eric Thomas
"Courage doesn"t always roar. Sometimes courage is the little voice at the end of the day that says I"ll try again tomorrow." - Mary Anne Radmacher
"Giving up our values in the name of security is to lose the battle in advance" - Captain Pike
"I lie to myself all the time. But I never believe me" - Ponyboy Curtis from "The Outsiders"
"Sometimes I wonder if there's something wrong with me. Perhaps I've spent too long in the company of my literary romantic heroes, and consequently my ideals and expectations are far too high." - E.L. James, Fifty Shades of Grey
"Come sleep with me: We won't make Love, Love will make us." - Julio Cortzar
"I'm not sentimental--I'm as romantic as you are. The idea, you know, is that the sentimental person thinks things will last--the romantic person has a desperate confidence that they won't." - F. Scott Fitzgerald, This Side of Paradise
"And he took her in his arms and kissed her under the sunlit sky, and he cared not that they stood high upon the walls in the sight of many." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"The big print giveth and the small print taketh away."  Tom Waits
"In regards to parenting, kids need two things...a compass and a fence."
"Some people want it to happen, some wish it could happen, and others make it happen." Michael Jordan
"Gratitude is the attitude that sets the attitude for living"
"without Bach, God would be a complete second rate figure" Emil Cioran
'To you, I'm an atheist. To God, I'm the loyal opposition.' - Woody Allen
"Ambition for money sooner or later turns out to be expensive" (William Ventura)
"The day will come when in this evil society,the bad guys will kill the dead to prevent them from living their lives quietly" (William Ventura)
"Some are so far behind in a race they believe they're leading." - Junior Soprano
"You know, it"s funny how often a person"s sharp tongue can end up cutting their own throat." -Klaus Mikaelson
"As is a tale, so is life: not how long it is, but how good it is, is what matters."  Seneca
"The trouble with fighting for human freedom is that one spends most of one's time defending scoundrels. For it is against scoundrels that oppressive laws are first aimed, and oppression must be stopped at the beginning if it is to be stopped at all." - H. L. Mencken US editor (1880 - 1956)
"I don't like to commit myself about heaven and hell-you see, I have friends in both places."  Mark Twain
"An intellectual is a man who takes more words than necessary to tell more than he knows."  Dwight D. Eisenhower
"The two most common elements in the universe are Hydrogen and stupidity."  Harlan Ellison
"If there is anything the nonconformist hates worse than a conformist, it's another nonconformist who doesn't conform to the prevailing standard of nonconformity."  Bill Vaughan
"M-O-O-N. That spells moon. Tom Cullen knows that. Everybody knows that. Laws, yes." -Stephen King (The Stand)
"When you judge another, you do not define them, you define yourself." -Wayne Dyer-
"No matter how unwelcome the implications of a logical argument may be, it must be allowed to stand or fall on its merits not its desirability or political utility." - Theodore Hill
''The universe we observe has precisely the properties we should expect if there is, at bottom, no design, no purpose, no evil and no good, nothing but blind pitiless indifference""- Richard Dawkins
"The bitterness of poor quality remains long after the sweetness of low price is forgotten" -Every mechanic I"ve ever taken my car to for repairs.
"Procrastination is like masturbation because in the end you're only fucking yourself." -Monty Python
"Monogamy is like being a vegetarian. You can choose to be healthy, you can be ethical, it can be a wonderful decision but because you've chosen to be a vegetarian doesn't mean bacon stops smelling good." - Dr. Christopher Ryan
"Think where man's glory most begins and ends, and say my glory was I had such friends."  William Butler Yeats
"No individual raindrop ever considers itself responsible for the flood."
"Holding on to anger is like grasping a hot coal with the intent of throwing it at someone else; you are the one who gets burned" - Buddha
"Do one thing every day that scares you." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Even After All this time The Sun never says to the Earth, "You owe me." Look What happens With a love like that, It lights the whole sky". -Hafez Shirazi
"At least two-thirds of our miseries spring from human stupidity, human malice, and those great motivators and justifiers of malice and stupidity: idealism, dogmatism and proselytizing zeal on behalf of religous or political ideas."  Aldous Huxley
"If you dream big, its pieces are still big even if it"s broken"
"There are two ways of spreading light -- to be the candle or the mirror that reflects it." -Edith Wharton
"One sees great things from the valley; only small things from the peak."
"Without education, we are in a horrible and deadly danger of taking educated people seriously." - G.K. Chesterton
"Wir mussen wisen. Wir weden wissen. We must know. We will know."-David Hilbert
"To myself I am only a child playing on the beach, while vast oceans of truth lie undiscovered before me."-Sir Isaac Newton
"Trust nature, then trust yourself." -Bloodhound from Apex Legends
"Never explain - your friends do not need it, and your enemies will not believe you anyway." - Elbert Hubbart
"Destroy the fear that causes you to stay when you know you should leave." -perry poetry
"The pessimist complains about the wind; the optimist expects it to change; the realist adjusts the sails." - William Arthur Ward
"Beware the quiet man. For while others speak, he watches. And while others act, he plans. And when they finally rest... he strikes." - Anonymous
"A person often meets his destiny on the road he took to avoid it." - Jean de la Fontaine
"Do what you love to do and do it with both seriousness and lightness. At least then you will know that you have tried and that whatever the outcome, you have traveled a noble path." - Elizabeth Gilbert
"You will always be fond of me. I represent to you all the sins you never had the courage to commit." - Oscar Wilde
"Anyone who can appease a man's conscience can take his freedom away from him." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky, The Grand Inquisitor
"There are three Powers, three unique Forces upon earth, capable of conquering for ever by charming the conscience of these weak rebels--men--for their own good; and these Forces are: Miracle, Mystery and Authority." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky, The Grand Inquisitor
"You are more than just what you look like. You are far more valuable than the clothes on your back. You are priceless simply by being yourself." -Dylan M. Baer
"When you want to succeed, as bad as you want to breathe, then you"ll be successful," - Eric Thomas
"Only a true best friend can protect you from your immortal enemies." - Richelle Mead, Vampire Academy
"When love is not madness it is not love." - Pedro Calderon de la Barca
"I cannot fix on the hour, or the spot, or the look or the words, which laid the foundation. It is too long ago. I was in the middle before I knew that I had begun." - Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
"I can feel Peeta press his forehead into my temple and he asks, 'So now that you've got me, what are you going to do with me?' I turn into him. 'Put you somewhere you can't get hurt." - Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
"Twas brillig, and the slithy toves did gyre and gimble in the wabe; All mimsy were the borogoves, and the mome raths outgrabe." - Lewis Carroll
"We must learn not only to burn certain stages in our lives,but also to throw the ashes into oblivion" (William Ventura)
"Facing it, always facing it, that"s the way to get through. Face it." Joseph Conrad
"Trust me, you can dance" - Alcohol
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"After morning sex, it is usually all downhill for the day. Good thing is, you probably do not care." - Clay Copeland
"I choose to be happy now. I don"t need any more stuff, better weather, a bigger budget or a smaller body, or to be any different from who I already am. Now everything is fine and I am happy."
"The greatest mystery of all; what you"ll learn when you actually listen"
"We may not imagine how our lives could be more frustrating and complex--but Congress can."  Cullen Hightower
"A little learning is a dangerous thing but a lot of ignorance is just as bad."  Bob Edwards
"A committee is a cul-de-sac down which ideas are lured and then quietly strangled."  Sir Barnett Cocks
"Eternity is a mere moment, just long enough for a joke."  Hermann Hesse
"Hello, brother" - a Muslim man a moment before being the first victim in the Christchurch mosque shooting
"Closed for my protection, open to your scorn. Between these two directions, my heart is sometimes torn." -Neil Peart (Rush - Open Secrets)
"You always own the option of having no opinion. Things you can't control are not asking to be judged by you. Leave them alone."  Marcus Aurelius Antoninus (121180 ..)
"Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored." - Aldous Huxley
"Never wish life were easier, wish that you were better." - Jim Rohn-
"The mark of the immature man is that he wants to die nobly for a cause, while the mark of the mature man is that he wants to live humbly for one." -Salinger
"When going gets tough, you don't want a criminal lawyer. You want a 'criminal' lawyer."
"Men do not differ much about what things they will call evils; they differ enormously about what evils they will call excusable." - G.K. Chesterton
"Men do not differ much about things they will call evils; they differ enormously about what evils they will call excusable." - G.K. Chesterton
"Nothing is impossible. The word itself says 'I'm possible'!"
"The gayest stuff comes out of the straightest people and the straightest stuff comes out of the gayest people" - Me
"Man is tormented by no greater anxiety than to find someone quickly to whom he can hand over that great gift of freedom with which the ill-fated creature is born." - Fyodor Dostoevsky, The Grand Inquisitor
"Peacefully they will die, peacefully they will expire in Thy name, and beyond the grave they will find nothing but death. But we shall keep the secret, and for their happiness we shall allure them with the reward of heaven and eternity." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky, The Grand Inquisitor
"Procrastination is the art of keeping up with yesterday." - Don Marquis
"All that was great in the past was ridiculed, condemned, combated, suppressed  only to emerge all the more powerfully, all the more triumphantly from the struggle." - Nikola Tesla
"When You Want To Succeed As Bad As You Want To Breathe, Then You Will Be Successful." - Eric Thomas
"The blood of the covenant is thicker than the water of the womb"
"Pain is temporary. It may last for a minute, or an hour or a day, or even a year. But eventually, it will subside. And something else take its place. If I quit, however, it will last forever." - Eric Thomas
"Sex can wait, masturbate!" - Will Ferrell on Safe Sex, SNL 1996
"Sometimes I wonder if people don't want freedom as much as they want meaning." -Zadie Smith
"Don't get distracted by mistakes grom the past. We are here now. That alone makes the present unique."
"We won't be distracted by comparison if we're captivated with purpose." - Bob Goff
"No one is born hating another person because of the color of his skin, or his background, or his religion. People must learn to hate, and if they can learn to hate, they can be taught to love, for love comes more naturally to the human heart than its opposite" - Nelson Mandela
""In the course of such things as debate and discourse, I feel there is a series of questions any mind would do well to ask of itself. [...]" (Continued)
"Earn the spotlight by being entertaining. Don't demand the spotlight by being an asshole." -u/bobcat_copperthwait
"I smell blood and an era of prominent madmen." - W.H. Auden
"There is no avoiding war; it can only be postponed to the advantage of others." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"A ship is always safe at the shore, but that is not what it is built for."  Albert Einstein
"The right man in the wrong place can make all the difference in the world"  Half Life 2 - G-Man
"To be prepared for war is one of the most effective means of preserving peace." - George Washington
"The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants." - Thomas Jefferson
"Sometimes I think the surest sign that intelligent life exists elsewhere in the universe is that none of it has tried to contact us." - Bill Watterson
"In the land of the blind, the one-eyed man is king." - Erasmus
"I don't swallow Plan B I just swallow the nut" - Cardi B
12 Easy Ways to Increase the Happiness in Your Life!
"Perhaps one did not want to be loved so much as to be understood." - George Orwell
"I can tell you I have the support of the police, the support of the military, the support of the Bikers for Trump  I have the tough people, but they don"t play it tough  until they go to a certain point, and then it would be very bad, very bad." -Donald Trump
"If you start chopping Jalapenos and then go touching your Jalopenis, whether you wash your hands or not, it's going to burn anyway." -Craig Tomspoon-
"This tremendous world I have inside of me. How to free myself, and this world, without tearing myself to pieces. And rather tear myself to a thousand pieces than be buried with this world within me." - Franz Kafka
"Sometimes the smallest things take up the most room in your heart" - Winnie the Pooh.
"Sometimes it takes darkness and the sweet confinement of your aloneness to learn, anything or anyone that does not bring you alive is too small for you" - David Whyte
"If only it were all so simple! If only there were evil people somewhere insidiously committing evil deeds, and it were necessary only to separate them from the rest of us and destroy them...
"Time is a gypsy caravan. Steals away in the night, to leave you stranded in dreamland." -Neil Peart (Rush - Dreamline)
"The dead know only one thing. That it is better to be alive." -Private Joker (Full Metal Jacket)
"It's amazing how relaxing it is not to pretend you know more than you do." - Christopher Hitchens
"It is not a bad idea to get in the habit of writing down one's thoughts. It saves one having to bother anyone else with them."  Isabel Colegate
"I'm all in favor of keeping dangerous weapons out of the hands of fools. Let's start with typewriters."  Solomon Short
"There it was, hidden in alphabetical order."  Rita Holt
"Arithmetic is being able to count up to twenty without taking off your shoes."  Mickey Mouse
"It's not only you, everybody is alone." - Mr. R, My English Teacher
"Without action, the best intentions in the world are nothing more than that: intentions." - Jordan Belfort
"There is no diet that will do what eating healthy does. Skip the diet. Just eat healthy." Anonymous
"The secret of happiness is something to do."  John Burroughs
"Most of us know how to say nothing; few of us know when." - Anonymous
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams." - Dr. Seuss
"Find the person who will love you because of your differences and not in spite of them and you have found a lover for life." Leo Buscaglia
"Setting goals is the first step in turning the invisible into the visible." -Tony Robbins-
"Revolutions, like trees, must be judged by their fruit." -- Ignazio Silone
"A childish mind will turn to noble ambition" - Zelda, Ocarina of Time
"Give a man a fish, and he"ll eat for a day. Teach him how to fish, and he"ll sit in a boat and drink beer all day." - George Carlin
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
"It's like Chlamydia"
"May the darkness within you find peace in the light." The Umbrella Academy
"Kill the extremes and there'll ve no one left, control them and they'll only be limits"
"The first step to solving a problem is recognizing there is one"
"Kll the extremists and there'll be no one left, control them and they'll only ve limits".
"Have you ever noticed that anybody driving slower than you is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?" - George Carlin
"Everybody Gangsta Till A Nigga Pulls Up On Horseback"- Sun Tzu
"Life is one big lesson. You have to know when to take notes, and when to prepare for the tests." -Me-
"Science, since people must do it, is a socially embedded activity..."
"Our ambition is exactly proportioned to our powers. The height of the pinnacle is determined by the breadth of the base. Every man has this call of the power to do something unique, and no man has any other call." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Between stimulus and response, man has the freedom to choose" -Victor Frankl
"Remember people only rain on your parade because they're jealous of your sun and tired of their shade." -Kim Kardashian
"It's not a quote if you just made it up on the spot as you were posting. Try out /r/aphorisms"
"Familiarity breeds contemptand children."  Mark Twain's Notebook, 1894
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"A phosphorescent wave on a tropical sea is a cold fire. The pattern of moonlight on the bedroom floor is a cold fire. The flame at the heart of a pawnbroker's diamond is a cold fire. The look in your eyes as you head for the door is a cold fire." -Neil Peart (Rush - Cold Fire)
""To know" and "to comprehend" are distinctly different. Although one knows, one can"t comprehend without first putting knowledge into practice. Merely studying medicinal benefits won"t cure an illness. Zen is thus something which one can"t comprehend until it is put into practice."  Dgen Zenji
"It is during our darkest moments that we must focus to see the light." - Aristotle
"If you love somebody, let them go, for if they return, they were always yours. If they don't, they never were." - Kahlil Gibran
"If music be the food of love, play on, Give me excess of it; that surfeiting, The appetite may sicken, and so die." - William Shakespeare, Twelfth Night
"The very essence of romance is uncertainty." - Oscar Wilde, The Importance of Being Earnest and Other Plays
"A woman should be treated like an expensive perfume,without letting it break and without wanting it to never end" (William Ventura)
"We can"t help everyone, but everyone can help someone."  Ronald Reagan
"The shoemaker can recognize the material with which he makes his shoes,but never the the steps and the prints that it leaves after walking through differente places" (William Ventura)
"When in trouble, when in doubt. Run in circles, scream and shout." -Handling the Undead-
"Always assume stupidity before malevolence." - Jordan Peterson
"That's the problem with drinking, I thought, as I poured myself a drink. If something bad happens you drink in an attempt to forget; if something good happens you drink in order to celebrate; and if nothing happens you drink to make something happen." - Charles Bukowski, Women
"That"s really good advice and all, and it"s so inspiring, and I know it probably opened the eyes of a lot of people, but it wasn"t said by that person that you said it was" - some random Redditor in the comments
"Life is a constant cycle of realising how dumb you were 5 yeras ago"
"Genius is one percent inspiration and ninety-nine percent perspiration." -Thomas Edison-
"I get a lot of cracks about my hair, mostly from men who don't have any."  Ann Richards
"Politics is not the art of the possible. It consists in choosing between the disastrous and the unpalatable."  John Kenneth Galbraith
"The significant problems we have cannot be solved at the same level of thinking with which we created them."  Albert Einstein
"To my embarrassment I was born in bed with a lady."  Wilson Mizner
"What need is there to weep over parts of life? The whole of it calls for tears."  Lucius Annaeus Seneca
2019 Happy Holi Wishes and Quotes to Convey Your Life colourful
"Making sex is like Chinese dinner. It aint over til you both get your cookies. Remember that I said that." -Alec Baldwin (Outside Providence)
"Hardships often prepare ordinary people for an extraordinary destiny."  C.S. Lewis
"Every burden is a blessing."  Walt Kelly
'We came down on them like a flood, We went out among their cities, We tore down the idol-temples, We shat on the Buddha's head!' - Mahmud al-Kashgari on the Qara-Khanid conquest of Khotan in the 11th century
"To love is human. To feel pain is human. Yet to still love despite the pain is pure angel." Rumi (1207-73)
"The first to apologise is the bravest. The first to forgive is the strongest. The first to forget is the happiest." Ali Ibn Abi Talib (7th century)
"The reason dogs have so many friends is because they wag their tails and not their tongues." - Anonymous
"The difference between stupidity and genius is that genius has its limits." - Albert Einstein
"Live like every night is Saturday night, but every morning is Monday morning." - Pat McNamara
"Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free speech because you have nothing to say." -Edward Snowden
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do. So throw off the bowlines. Sail away from the safe harbor. Catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore. Dream. Discover."  Mark Twain
"The secret of getting ahead is getting started."  Mark Twain.
"You're unique. Just like everyone else." - Margaret Mead
"As life goes on it becomes tiring to keep up the character you invented for yourself, and so you relapse into individuality and become more like yourself everyday." -Agatha Christie
"Once you settle into a story about your pain, you are extremely reluctant to challenge it. It's like a leash you put on your distress to keep it under some control." -Johann Hari
"It's okay to have a different opinion, thats what's being human is about. But whats not okay is someone else oppressing you for it" Me (probably)
" Opportunities multiply as they are seized. " - Sun Tzu
"Expectation is the beginning of all heartaches." -William Shakespeare
"Your peace is more important than driving yourself crazy trying to understand why something happened the way it did."
"There's a certain sadness that comes to one who falls in love, the same sadness which is echoed once that love ends."
"If You"re Going Through Hell, Keep Going" -Winston Churchill
"Don't compare your life to others. There's no comparison between the sun and the moon. They shine when it's their time."
"If you don"t like how the tables are turned, turn the tables." -Mr. Stein
"Liberals feel unworthy of their possessions. Conservatives feel they deserve everything they've stolen." -- Mort Sahl
"Republicans believe in God. Democrats believe in Santa Claus." -- Mort Sahl
"When "I" is replaced with "we" even illness becomes wellness." Malcolm X
"Failure is simply the opportunity to begin again, this time more intelligently." - Henry Ford
"We carry a sensitive cargo, below the waterline. Ticking like a time bomb, with a primitive design. Behind the finer feelings - this civilized veneer, the heart of a lonely hunter guards a dangerous frontier." -Neil Peart (Rush - Lock and Key)
"There are two sides to every story, and then there are the screenshots." -UNKOWN
"Because in the end, you won"t remember the time you spent working in the office or mowing your lawn. Climb that goddamn mountain." - Jack Kerouac
"All it takes is one generation to brainwash a population and convince them that reality doesn't exist." - Marie Lu, Prodigy
"Double mindedness; the mid way between dreams and realities" - Ernest Agyemang Yeboa
[SARCASM]-"Life"s good, you should get one."
"Everyone writes a story. You can be one of the main or supporting characters in their stories but can also be an enemy to someone's story no matter how good you are to others'."
"I don't have a girlfriend. But I do know a woman who'd be mad at me for saying that."  Mitch Hedberg
"The whole dream of democracy is to raise the proletarian to the level of stupidity attained by the bourgeois."  Gustave Flaubert
"Go, and never darken my towels again."  Groucho Marx
"A child becomes an adult when he realizes that he has a right not only to be right but also to be wrong."  Thomas Szasz
"They didn"t agree on much. In fact, they didn"t agree on anything. They fought all the time and challenged each other ever day. But despite their differences, they had one important thing in common. They were crazy about each other." - Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
"I heard what you said. I"m not the silly romantic you think. I don"t want the heavens or the shooting stars. I don"t want gemstones or gold. I have those things already. I wanta steady hand. A kind soul. I want to fall asleep, and wake, knowing my heart is safe. I want to love, and be loved."
"And I'm suppose to sit by while you date boys and fall in love with someone else, get married...?" His voice tightened. "And meanwhile, I'll die a little bit more every day, watching." - Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
"The best love is the kind that awakens the soul and makes us reach for more, that plants a fire in our hearts and brings peace to our minds. And that's what you've given me. That's what I'd hoped to give you forever" - Nicholas Sparks
"Either war is obsolete or man is." - Buckminster Fuller
"We have people with abilities to hurt you for 4 months in 4 words"
"A world when night be not, be not a world for me." -"unknown Jamaican man"
"Only rainbows after rain, the sun will always come again. Its a circle, circling. Around again, it comes around again" - Andy Grammer
"Very often, all the activity of the human mind is directed not in revealing the truth, but in hiding the truth." - Leo Tolstoy
"When you are content to be simply yourself and don't compare or compete, everyone will respect you." - Lao Tzu
"You never change things by fighting the existing reality. To change something, build a new model that makes the existing model obsolete." - Buckminster Fuller
"To live is to think."  Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Have you ever noticed that anybody driving slower than you is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?" - George Carlin
"The world is full of lonely people afraid to make the first move" - The green book
"I had only a little time left and I didn't want to waste it on God." - Albert Camus, The Stranger (1942)
"If nobody makes you do it, it counts as fun."
"Do not be embarrassed by your failures, learn from them and start again." -Richard Branson-
"Everyone misinterpreted the fall, and the rebellion, but history is written by the victors... and sometimes the Devil has his day.
"You cannot use your friends and have them too."
"Be alone," said Tesla. "That is the secret of invention; be alone, that is when ideas are born."
"Be polite, be efficient, and have a plan to kill everyone you meet." -Valve, 2009
"You never really understand a person until you consider things from his point of view... Until you climb inside of his skin and walk around in it."  Harper Lee
"If I am the fatheror godfatherof reality TV, I don"t want to take responsibility for all of the bastards that followed." - John Langley, creator of "Cops"
"If my critics saw me walking over the Thames they would say it was because I couldn't swim." - Margaret Thatcher
"Be strong enough to stand alone, smart enough to know when you need help, and brave enough to ask for it."  Ziad K. Abdelnour
"Death is not the opposite of life but an innate part of it. By living our lives, we nurture death." - Haruki Murakami, Norwegian Wood
"These are the days that must happen to you." - Walt Whitman
"Jar Jar's the key to all this, if we get Jar Jar working. 'Cause he's a funnier character than we've ever had in the movies." -- George Lucas
"As long as you structure your life in a way where your happiness is dependent upon something you cannot control, then you will experience pain" - Tony Robbins
"One smile, can start a friendship. One word, can end a fight. One look, can save a relationship. One person can change your life."
"Every society has the criminals it deserves." -Emma Goldman
"One day, the universe will end, one day it will all be over, then we'll all go to milways. Until then, Dennys will suffice." -My mom on a road trip
"I don't have problem with anyone. It's their agendas that I am worried about"- Atharva Dahivalkar
"A million zeros joined together do not, unfortunately, add up to one." - Carl Gustav Jung
"I"ll read my books and I"ll drink coffee and I"ll listen to music, and I"ll bolt the door." - J.D. Salinger
"Spontaneity has its time and place." - Gibby in the movie, "The Sure Thing"
"The moment I stop having fun with it, I'll be done with it." -Drake
"Some of the greatest battles will be fought within the silent chambers of your own soul." Ezra Taft Benson
"(It"s never over), she"s the tear that hangs inside my soul forever" - Jeff Buckley
"Tamagotchi has been died for years it was allmost died when i was 6 and right now i am 10" - Some random kid from a Tamagotchi Party On review
"A man who procrastinates in his choosing will inevitably have his choice made for him by circumstance...but beware of looking for goals: look for a way of life. Decide how you want to live and then see what you can do to make a living within that way of life." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Learn to enjoy every minute of your life. Be happy now. Don't wait for something outside of yourself to make you happy in the future. Think how really precious is the time you have to spend, whether it's at work or with your family. Every minute should be enjoyed and savored." - Earl Nightingale
"In every big thing or achievement there are always obstacles, big or small. The reaction one shows to such obstacles is what counts, not the obstacle itself." -Bruce Lee
"The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why."  Mark Twain.
"The possession of anything begins in the mind." -Bruce Lee
"Some women choose to follow men, and some women choose to follow their dreams. If you're wondering which way to go, remember that your career will never wake up and tell you that it doesn't love you anymore." - Lady Gaga
"You can't force love, I realized. It's there or it isn't. If it's not there, you've got to be able to admit it. If it is there, you've got to do whatever it takes to protect the ones you love." - Richelle Mead, Frostbite
"If a man writes a book, let him set down only what he knows. I have guesses enough of my own." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable." - Jess C. Scott, The Intern
"There is no pretending," Jace said with absolute clarity. "I love you, and I will love you until I die, and if there is life after that, I'll love you then." - Cassandra Clare, City of Glass
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr., A Testament of Hope: The Essential Writings and Speeches
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Whatever you decide to do, make sure it makes you happy." Paulo Coelho
"We either make ourselves miserable or make ourselves strong. The amount of work is the same." - Carlos Castaneda
"Everybody thinks they a gangster until the day they need to real gangster shit" - Plato
"In spite of her superficial independence, her fundamental need was to cling. All her life was an attempt to disprove it; and so proved it. She was like a sea anemone -- had only to be touched once to adhere to what touched her." - John Fowles, The Magus
"A waist is a terrible thing to mind."  Jane Caminos
"There is no excellent beauty that hath not some strangeness in the proportion."  Sir Francis Bacon
"Reality is the leading cause of stress amongst those in touch with it."  Jane Wagner
"Though I am not naturally honest, I am so sometimes by chance."  William Shakespeare
"Its not communism its common sense" - Rutger Bregman
"Dream is not that you see in sleep. Dream is something that does not let you sleep." - APJ Abdul Kalam
"Since I cannot prove a lover, To entertain these fair well-spoken days, I am determined to prove a villain And hate the idle pleasures of these days." - Elliot Rodger
"You ask: who shall write the history of our revolution. Nobody. Except merely its external facts." -Thomas Jefferson in a letter to John Hamilton
"And yet again at the beginning of each day we must stand erect and courageous, ready to meet any of the days hardships. What we accomplished yesterday might be great, but it only matters in so much as a foundation on which we build upon. Let each day be a complete masterpiece of itself." -E.R.
"I"m a success today because I had a friend who believed in me and I didn"t have the heart to let him down." -Abraham Lincoln
"Gratitude is a quality similar to electricity: it must be produced and discharged and used up in order to exist at all." - William Faulkner
"Sometimes a pinch of Sadism is the ingredient that makes victory taste that little bit sweeter"-Andrea Pirlo
"The only Zen you find on the tops of mountains is the Zen you bring up there" - Robert M. Pirsig
"Courage is the ladder on which all the other virtues mount."  Clare Boothe Luce
"Neo, sooner or later you"re going to realize, just as I did, that there"s a difference between knowing the path and walking the path."  Morpheus
"Nostalgia is a liar in how it montages our best memories while emitting our truths"
"Out of 100 men, one will read the Bible, the other 99 will read the Christian." - D.L. Moody
"Go, because you want to. Because wanting to leave is enough." - Cheryl Strayed
"Remember, the storm is a good opportunity for the pine and the cypress to show their strength and their stability." - Ho Chi Minh
"Perhaps one reason we are fascinated by cats is because such a small animal can contain so much independence, dignity, and freedom of spirit. Unlike the dog, the cat's personality is never bet on a human's. He demands acceptance on his own terms." - Lloyd Alexander
"Insanity: doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results." -Albert Einstein-
"The best time to plant a tree was 20 years ago, the second best time is now" -unknown
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." -Albert Einstein-
"Why bother with statistics when reality has already given you the answer?"
"Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so." - Douglas Adams
"It took 14 billion years to make you and only 90 to fuck it up" - Exurb1a
"If you're feeling remorseful that you can't live up to your peers' expectations, then they're probably expecting too much from you." -- My father
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"All men are equal as all pennies are equal, because the only value in any of them is that they bear the image of the King" -- GK Chesterton
"A story has no beginning or end: arbitrarily one chooses that moment of experience from which to look back or from which to look ahead." Graham Greene
"Never waste energy on worries or negatives thoughts. All problems are brought into existence- drop them." - Bruce Lee
"They say there are strangers, who threaten us, all immigrants and infidels. They say there is strangeness, too dangerous, in our theatres and bookstore shelves. Those who know what's best for us must rise and save us from ourselves" -Neil Peart (Rush - Witch Hunt)
"The days are long enough for those who use them." - Leonardo Da Vinci
"Give a man a million ideas, and he shall not bring solutions anymore" - Chinese proverb
"We are only as strong as we are united, as weak as we are divided." - Dumbledore
"We become succesful by what we get and we become happy by what we give"- Jay Shetty
" Your mind will always believe everything you tell it. Feed it hope, feed it truth, feed it with love " -UNKOWN
"When we honestly ask ourselves which person in our lives mean the most to us, we often find that it is those who, instead of giving advice, solutions, or cures, have chosen rather to share our pain and touch our wounds." - Henri Nouwen
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." - John F. Kennedy
"Don't believe the crap you see from these people, the fake news. ... What you're seeing and what you're reading is not what's happening." Donald J Trump
"We swallow greedily any lie that flatters us, but we sip only little by little at a truth we find bitter."  Denis Diderot
"Since I cannot prove a lover, To entertain these fair well-spoken days, I am determined to prove a villain And hate the idle pleasures of these days." - Elliot Rodger
"Success will ruin your life." - Tom Clancy
"Treat a person as he is, and he will remain as he is. Treat him as he could be, and he will become what he should be."
"Dont wait until January 1st." - Humble the Poet
"I am thankful for all of those who said NO to me. It"s because of them I"m doing it myself."  Albert Einstein
"Never in the field of human conflict was so much owed by so many to so few." - Winston Churchill
"Always be yourself, express yourself, have faith in yourself, do not go out and look for a successful personality and duplicate it." - Bruce Lee
"Man, what fucks me up the most is I can"t tell if she"s the devil or a test.."
"The sunrise, of course, doesn't care if we watch it or not. It will keep on being beautiful even if no one bothers to look at it." - Gene Amole
"Freedom of the press is limited to those who own one."  A. J. Liebling
"There are three rules for writing the novel. Unfortunately, no one knows what they are."  W. Somerset Maugham
"Girls are always running through my mind. They don't dare walk."  Andy Gibb
"Any reviewer who expresses rage and loathing for a novel is preposterous. He or she is like a person who has put on full armor and attacked a hot fudge sundae."  Kurt Vonnegut
"Everything in life revolves around sex, except sex. Sex revolves around power. "- Dorian Gray
"Lions don"t lose sleep over the opinions of sheep" -Adapted from the Latin "Leonum non refert quid oves censeant"
"There will always be a reason why you meet people. Either you need them to change your life or you"re the one that will change theirs. - Angel Flonis Harefa"
"How complicated and unpredictable the machinery of life really is" -Kurt Vonnegut
"It is hard to fail, but it is worse never to have tried to succeed." - Teddy Roosevelt
"Peacefully they will die, peacefully they will expire in Thy name, and beyond the grave they will find nothing but death. But we shall keep the secret, and for their happiness we shall allure them with the reward of heaven and eternity." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky, The Grand Inquisitor
"Go as far as you can see; when you get there you'll be able to see farther." -Thomas Carlyle-
"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude." -Maya Angelou
"I think we risk becoming the best informed society that has ever died of ignorance." - Rubn Blades
"At times I think and at times I am."  Paul Valery
"You don't have to be great at something to start, but you have to start to be great at something."-Zig Ziglar-
"If you don't like it, you can shove it. But you don't like it, you love it." - Rivers Cuomo
"Relationships don't end because two people did something wrong to each other. - They end because two people are something wrong for each other." Mark Manson
"My courage always rises with every attempt to intimidate me." -Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
"You ain"t no different than a homeless person just cuz you gotta house"- some black man on the street.
"Democracy cannot succeed unless those who express their choice are prepared to choose wisely. The real safeguard of democracy, therefore, is education." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Where you see wrong or inequality or injustice, speak out, because this is your country. This is your democracy. Make it. Protect it. Pass it on." - Thurgood Marshall
"The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity. The fears are paper tigers. You can do anything you decide to do. You can act to change and control your life; and the procedure, the process is its own reward." - Amelia Earhart
"The most important knowledge is that which guides the way you lead your life." - Leo Tolstoy
"No matter how different the substance of a love might be at different ages in a person's life, I know that love still has to weigh the same. You feel that weight on your shoulders and in your stomach and on your heart no matter how old you are." - Colleen Hoover
"Without music, life would be a mistake." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Dance is the physical representation of music expressed through the soul"
"Live Fast, Eat Ass" -Elon Musk
"Sometimes you don"t need warmth to warm your heart. Sometimes you just need a loyal dog, a sunny sky and the wide open snowy prairies of Canada" - Unknown.
"Your problem is you are too busy holding on to your unworthiness." Ram Dass
"I'd rather be hated for who I am, than loved for who I am not"-Kurt Cobain
"Man is tormented by no greater anxiety than to find someone quickly to whom he can hand over that great gift of freedom with which the ill-fated creature is born." - Fyodor Dostoevsky, The Grand Inquisitor
"A society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in." -Greek Proverb
"You know you have no love life when a 'hot date' is nothing more to you than an ingredient for the dish that you're taking to potluck."
"Lust's passion will be served; it demands, it militates, it tyrannizes" - Marquis de Sade
"Lust's passion will be served; it demands, it militates, it tyrannizes" - Marquis de Sade
"It sometimes takes an open mind to open minds." -u/tanj_redshirt
"Think of the Web as a big bathroom wall. And everyone has a marker."
"All lies and jest, still a man hears what he wants to hear and disregards the rest..." -Simon and Garfunkel (The Boxer)
"When government surveillance and intimidation is called "freedom from terrorism" or "liberation from crime", freedom and liberty have become words without meanings." - Deus Ex
"The great enemy of truth is very often not the lie but the myth. We enjoy the comfort of opinion without the discomfort of thought" - John F. Kennedy
"The great enemy of truth is very often not the lie but the myth. We enjoy the comfort of opinion without the discomfort of fact" - John F. Kennedy
"When government surveillance and intimidation is called "freedom from terrorism" or "liberation from crime", freedom and liberty have become words without meanings." -- Deus Ex
"Whoever is trying to bring you down, Is already below you" - Anonymous
"If people tell you that you should live your life preparing for the future, do not believe them. Real Life is found only in the present." - Leo Tolstoy
"The moon is a loyal companion."
" stay away from negative people. they have a problem for every solution " - Albert Einstein
"Which is worse? the wolf who cries before eating the lamb or the wolf who does not." - Leo Tolstoy
"Seize the moments of happiness, love and be loved! That is the only reality in the world, all else is folly." - Leo Tolstoy
"Atheism turns out to be too simple. If the whole universe has no meaning, we should never have found out that it has no meaning..." - C.S. Lewis
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"I think it would be great if you born on Earth an die on mars. Just hopefully not on the point of impact" -Elon Musk
"If an egg is broken by an outside force, life ends. If broken by an inside force, life begins. Great things always begin from the inside." Jim Kwik
"The good thing about forbidden love,is that they're not prohibited by law,and we have the freedom to be addicted regardles of their effect or consequence" (William Ventura)
"It is a good rule in life never to apologize. The right sort of people do not want apologies, and the wrong sort take a mean advantage of them."  P. G. Wodehouse
"When a true genius appears in this world, you may know him by this sign, that the dunces are all in confederacy against him."  Jonathan Swift
"Men are generally idle, and ready to satisfy themselves, and intimidate the industry of others, by calling that impossible which is only difficult."  Samuel Johnson
"Half of the American people have never read a newspaper. Half never voted for President. One hopes it is the same half."  Gore Vidal
"WE ARE HERE TA' DRINK YOUR BEER, AND STEAL YOUR RUM AT THE POINT OF A GUN. YOUR ALCOHOL, TA' US WILL FALL, 'CAUSE WE ARE HERE TO DRINK YOUR BEER" -Alestorm
"You need to learn to turn down the fear and turn up the faith."
"The higher we are placed, the more humbly we should walk." - Cicero
"Mistakes can happen, but if it happens again it stops being a mistake and starts being a choice."-FORT2ADIUVAT
"The glass is neither half-full nor half-empty. The glass is twice as big as it should be."
"This is the real secret of life  to be completely engaged with what you are doing in the here and now. And instead of calling it work, realize it is play." - Alan Watts
"A common mistake that people make when trying to design something completely foolproof is to underestimate the ingenuity of complete fools." - Douglas Adams
"May the flowers remind us why the rain was so necessary." Xan Oku
"Go for it baby! Life ain't no dress rehearsal." - Tallulah Bankhead
"Luck is a dividend of sweat. The more you sweat, the luckier you get." --Ray Kroc
"I struggle so deeply to understand how someone can pour their entire soul, blood and energy in to someone without wanting anything in return." - Rupi Kaur
"All the gods, all the heavens, all the hells are within you"
"Please do not call me a God as it is a disgrace to my name, to Kristijan Bralo. Gods are infallible and so they never evolve, to be equated with such static trash is an insult of the utmost proportions!" - Kristijan Bralo
"The day that i wasted today is the tomorrow that the person who died yesterday so badly wish for"
"You gotta be mature enough to understand that you have some toxic traits too. Its not always the other person." -UNKOWN
"If you want to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first create the universe." -Carl Sagan, American Astronomer
"You have power over your mind - not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength." - Marcus Aurelius
"I must uphold my ideals, for perhaps the time will come when I shall be able to carry them out." - Anne Frank
"And you tell me over and over and over and over again my friend, you don't believe we're on the eve of destruction." -Barry McGuire
"Hello, my name is Inigo Montoya. You killed my father, prepare to die."-Mandy Patinkin
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"If you are a dreamer come in If you are a dreamer a wisher a liar A hoper a pray-er a magic-bean-buyer If youre a pretender com sit by my fire For we have some flax golden tales to spin Come in! Come in!" - Shel Silverstein
"One ought, every day at least, to hear a little song, read a good poem, see a fine picture, and, if it were possible, to speak a few reasonable words." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, Wilhelm Meister's Apprenticeship
"Trees are poems the earth writes upon the sky, We fell them down and turn them into paper, That we may record our emptiness." - Kahlil Gibran
"Debates conceal rather than reveal the truth. Truth is revealed in solitude." - Leo Tolstoy
"I am always with myself, and it is I who am my tormentor." - Leo Tolstoy
"I am not alone, I still have my despair with me."
"It is in the nature of the people to kick the one who has fallen". -Aeschylus
"Hated you for leaving me, you were my muse for so long. Now I"m drained creatively, and I miss you on my team." - Jillian Banks
"Is dying really a problem? You don't even have to do anything to die! Oh, how I yearn for all things to be so simple in life!" - Kristijan Bralo
"I can believe anything, provided that it is quite incredible."  Oscar Wilde
"For every action there is an equal and opposite government program."  Bob Wells
"I can't understand why people are frightened of new ideas. I'm frightened of the old ones."  John Cage
"A book of quotations . . . can never be complete."  Robert M. Hamilton
"We all agreed the whole word stinks so no one is going to take a bath anymore"-issac brock
"From woman, man is born; within woman, man is conceived; to woman he is engaged and married. Woman becomes his friend; through woman, the future generations come. So why call her bad? From her, kings are born. From woman, woman is born; without woman, there would be no one at all." - Guru Nanak
"A good laugh is sunshine in the house."  William Makepeace Thackeray
"I've just got to...the same again but, keep it on, and get it in." -Jeremy Wade, 'Body Snatcher'
"Fortnite sucks ass." -Mahatma Gandhi
"A hero need not speak, for when he is gone, the world will speak for him." -Halo 3
"Think I lost myself somewhere in between. Finding out who I am, confusing it with what I dream."  EDEN
"They buried us, but they didn't know we were seeds." - Dinos Christianopoulos
"Only the guilty hide behind a curtain of innocent, for the innocent have nothing to hide" - Anonymous
"It wasn't until I started drinking alone that I found the company...suitable(?)"
"If life is a bitch, make it your bitch." -Unknown
"Rebellion without truth is like spring in a bleak, arid desert." - Khalil Gibran
"Wether a bots made of old parts new parts or spare parts, you can shine no matter what you're made of."-Bigweld, 2005.
"Paul Manafort getting such little jail time for such serious crimes lays out for the world how it's almost impossible for rich people to go to jail for the same amount of time as someone who is lower income. In our current broken system justice isn't blind it's bought." - Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez
"People are people people." - Neil "Sully" Sullenberger.
"Paul Manafort getting such little jail time for such serious crimes lays out for the world how it's almost impossible for rich people to go to jail for the same amount of time as someone who is lower income and our current broken system justice isn't blind it's bought." - Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez
"A society grows great when old men plant trees in whose shade they know they shall never sit"  an ancient Greek proverb
"Laws control the lesser man... Right conduct controls the greater one." - Mark Twain
"Weed is an excuse to hate people" u/Sieran
"Greatness needs alot of things but it doesn't need an audience" -Nike
"Talent does what it can; genius does what it must."
"Take care to get what you like, or you'll be forced to like what you get." - George Bernard Shaw
"Stay away from negative people. They have a problem for every solution." Attributed to Albert Einstein
"I like beautiful melodies telling me terrible things." - Tom Waits
"To learn who rules over you, simply find out who you are not allowed to criticize." - Voltaire
"Someone once told me that human beings have three dimensions: how you see yourself, how others see you, and how you want others to see you. The closer the distance between the three dimensions, the more at peace you are and the more stable you become." -Marwa Rakha
"They shoot without shame, in the name of a piece of dirt. For a change of accent, or the color of your shirt. Better the pride that resides, in a citizen of the world. Than the pride that divides, when a colorful rag is unfurled." -Neil Peart (Rush - Territories)
"It is easier to turn a mountain into dust than to create love in a heart that is filled with hatred" - Imam Ali
"Don't say you don't have enough time. You have exactly the same number of hours per day that were given to Helen Keller, Pasteur, Michelangelo, Mother Teresa, Leonardo da Vinci, Thomas Jefferson, and Albert Einstein." - H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"The frustration and riots going on today are all about personal things. Everybody has wars within themselves and that comes out as a war against other people" -Jimi Hendrix
"We are a nation full of people doing jobs where the real job is to look like you are doing the job." - Rusty Guinn
"When death comes knocking on my door, I will deal with it by the ACT of dying! Now that I'm alive, let us ACT out and celebrate life!" -Kristijan Bralo
"A poem begins as a lump in the throat, a sense of wrong, a homesickness, a lovesickness." - Robert Frost
"To be nobody but yourself in a world which is doing its best day and night to make you like everybody else means to fight the hardest battle which any human being can fight and never stop fighting." - e.e. cummings
"Painting is poetry that is seen rather than felt, and poetry is painting that is felt rather than seen." - Leonardo da Vinci
"I have loved the stars too fondly to be fearful of the night." - Sarah Williams
"Most people never ask. And that's what separates the people that do things from the people that just dream about them. You gotta ask." -Steve Jobs
"There is no greatness where there is no simplicity, goodness and truth." - Leo Tolstoy
"Without knowing what I am and why I am here, life is impossible." - Leo Tolstoy
"If I didn"t define myself for myself, I would be crunched into other people"s fantasies for me and eaten alive."  Audre Lorde
"If you are distressed by anything external, the pain is not due to the thing itself, but to your estimate of it; and this you have the power to revoke at any moment." - Marcus Aurelius
"Patriotism is not enough. I must have no hatred or bitterness towards anyone" - Edith Cavell
'I never dreamed of success, I worked for it'
"Invention is the mother of necessity."  Thorstein Veblen
"Do I contradict myself?/ Very well then I contradict myself,/ (I am large, I contain multitudes.)"  Walt Whitman
"He can compress the most words into the smallest ideas of any man I ever met."  Abraham Lincoln
"When people are free to do as they please, they usually imitate each other."  Eric Hoffer
"You can have anything in life if you will sacrifice everything else for it." -J.M. Barrie
"A good traveler has no fixed plans and is not intent upon arriving." - Laozi
"What is called genius is the abundance of life and health."  Henry David Thoreau
"Let's not make a mountain of a molehill. A pond into a pool. A simple mistake into a catastrophe. Let us keep things on their own level and see them according to their given gravity." -E.R. Hughes
"English is the first global lingua franca, which puts it in a very useful position, not because it is better than other languages, but simply because it got there first, and there is no major expansion of globalization to shift the balance to another language. "
"My piece of bread only belongs to me when I know that everyone else has a share, and that no one starves while I eat." - Leo Tolstoy
"There is something in the human spirit that will survive and prevail, there is a tiny and brilliant light burning in the heart of man that will not go out no matter how dark the world becomes." - Leo Tolstoy
"We are to precious to let disappoint enter our mind"-NL Beno Zephine
"At the end of the day life will throw a lot of shit at you. The best you can do is try your best to come out smelling good" - Me (Just made it up)
"The nervous tissue seems endowed with a very extraordinary degree of plasticity, either outward forces or inner tension can, from one hour to another, turn that structure into something different than it was." -William James
"Being strong isn't the ability to show no emotion - it's the ability not to be afraid to show them" - My brother (Might not be exact wording- said this a long time ago).
"Be curious, not judgmental." - Walt Whitman
"He never resented an insult... and it was not that he seemed to have forgotten or intentionally forgiven the affront, but simply that he did not regard it as an affront." (p.16, The Brothers Karamzov)
"You educate a man; you educate a man. You educate a woman; you educate a generation." - Brigham Young-
"I"m still an atheist, thank God." - Luis Bunuel
"You educate a man; you educate a man. You educate a woman; you educate a generation." - Brigham Young
"A birthday is just the first day of another 365-day journey around the sun. Enjoy the trip." -- Unknown
"When opportunity knocks, only a fool looks the other way." -Cid
"We shouldn't mind the punchs that gives us life,if we have the ability to relieve our pains" (William Ventura)
"If you're reading this... Congratulations, you're alive. If that's not something to smile about, then I don't know what is." - Chad Sugg, Monsters Under Your Head
"Tell me, what is it you plan to do with your one wild and precious life?" - Mary Oliver
"Every heart sings a song, incomplete, until another heart whispers back. Those who wish to sing always find a song. At the touch of a lover, everyone becomes a poet." - Plato
"I wonder how many people I've looked at all my life and never seen" John Steinbeck
"Facts that threaten people's livelihood and self-esteem are simply not absorbed." -Daniel Kahneman
"Kindness is the language the blind can see and the deaf can hear" Mark Twain
"Many people have ideas on how others should change; few people have ideas on how they should change." - Leo Tolstoy
"It is easier to produce ten volumes of philosophical writings than to put one principle into practice." - Leo Tolstoy
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger, more complex, and more violent. It takes a touch of genius  and a lot of courage  to move in the opposite direction." - E.F. Schumacher
"You can"t just turn on creativity like a faucet. You have to be in the right mood. What mood is that? Last-minute panic."  Bill Watterson
"I must find the strength somehow. God knows I have before, and God knows I will now." - Myself
"[Detractors] are just wrong, and that's okay. They just don't see it yet. That's what I would tell myself to keep those moments of doubt, only moments."  Lisa Kudrow
"Men are not against you; they are merely for themselves."  Gene Fowler
"The major difference between a thing that might go wrong and a thing that cannot possibly go wrong is that when a thing that cannot possibly go wrong goes wrong it usually turns out to be impossible to get at or repair."  Douglas Adams
"All generalizations are dangerous, even this one."  Alexandre Dumas
"True joy is a serious thing." - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"When you have a partner, you don"t need an enemy," Samuel Goldwyn, Hollywood producer.
"Find something completely unrelated to your passions or what you do for a living to protect those passions and what you do for a living." - Peter McKinnon
,,To live in hearts we leave behind is not to die." - Thomas Campbell
"Don"t get lost trying to love the world, some things are ugly, you don"t have to force yourself to see otherwise. We aren"t made to be that selfless"
"Prosperity tries the fortunate, adversity the great."  Rose Kennedy
"Nothing is troublesome that we do willingly."
"No brain, more pain."
"He who says he can and he who says he can't are both right in the end"
"Never be afraid to try something new. Remember, amateurs built the ark; professionals built the Titanic."
"Real wisdom is not the knowledge of everything, but the knowledge of which things in life are necessary, which are less necessary, and which are completely unnecessary to know." - Leo Tolstoy
"Patience is waiting. Not passively waiting. That is laziness. But to keep going when the going is hard and slow - that is patience. The two most powerful warriors are patience and time." - Leo Tolstoy
"Money is worthless unless some people have it and others do not."
"Always give before take. If you keep on taking, there will be nothing left for people to give. If you keep on giving, there will always be something for you to take."
"A sad story will only make you cry once, but a funny story can make you laugh a thousand times." - Unknown Author
"Mountains are there to be climbed." - Ole Gunnar Solskjaer
"We often wait for that knock of opportunity, though I've found it's better to just grab a chainsaw and cut open your own fucking door." - Don Roff
"The only concepts the mind cannot truly master are the ones that it cannot envision in the first place." -- A thought I had a while back
"Logical validity is not a guarantee of truth."  David Foster Wallace
"May be hurting me was more important than winning for you" - Abhishek RK
"Champagne for my real friends and real pain for my sham friends."  Tom Waits
"Life moves pretty fast. If you don"t stop and look around once in a while, you could miss it."  Ferris Bueller
"My own business always bores me to death; I prefer other people's." - Oscar Wilde
"I love deadlines. I love the whooshing noise they make as they go by." - Douglas Adams
"Texting is a brilliant way to miscommunicate how you feel, and misinterpret what other people mean."-UNKOWN
"If we extend unlimited tolerance even to those who are intolerant, if we are not prepared to defend a tolerant society against the onslaught of the intolerant, then the tolerant will be destroyed, and tolerance with them." - Karl Popper
"We live in an age when you say casually to somebody 'What"s the story on that?' and they can run to the computer and tell you within five seconds. That"s fine, but sometimes I"d just as soon continue wondering. We have a deficit of wonder right now." - Tom Waits
"Time will say nothing but I told you so." - W.H. Auden
"No need for bombs, when hate will do"-Ulysses, New Vegas
"your brain gets smart but your head gets dumb " - Smash mouth
"The salvation of mankind lies only in making everything the concern of all" - Aleksandr I. Solzhenitsyn
"We all need validation. Some people get it through their looks, others get it through their ideas, some people get it from themselves. We live in a world of narcissism." -Unknown
"You talk when you cease to be at peace with your thoughts." - Kahlil Gibran, The Prophet
"We love the things we love for what they are." - Robert Frost
"Music expresses that which cannot be put into words and that which cannot remain silent" - Victor hugo
"May you be for ever blessed for that moment of bliss and happiness which you gave to another lonely and grateful heart. Isn't such a moment sufficient for the whole of one's life?" -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"May you be for ever blessed for that moment of bliss and happiness which you gave to another lonely and grateful heart. Isn't such a moment sufficient for the whole of one's life?" - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Just because things could've been different doesn't mean they would've been better." - Unknown
"I have no desire to crow over anybody or to see anybody eating crow, figuratively or otherwise. We should all get together and make a country in which everybody can eat turkey whenever he pleases."-- Harry S. Truman
"To me, boxing is like a ballet, except there's no music, no choreography, and the dancers hit each other." - Jack Handey
"Patience is not passive. On the contrary, it"s concentrated strength." -Bruce Lee
"So many great people are dead, and so many assholes I know are still alive. Karma's bullshit. I wish it was true, but it ain't." - John Waters
"Weak people get revenge, strong people forgive, and intelligent people ignore"
"Look down at me and you see a fool, Look up at me and you see a god, Look straight at me and you see yourself." Charles Manson
"Knowledge will give you power, but character respect."- Bruce Lee
"Enjoy your youth" sounds like a threat. -Regina Spektor
"It never hurts to keep looking for sunshine" - Eeyore.
"We don"t receive wisdom; we must discover it for ourselves after a journey that no one can take for us or spare us."  Marcel Proust
"Love is a striking example of how little reality means to us."  Marcel Proust
"The regularity of a habit is generally in proportion to its absurdity."  Marcel Proust
"Remember, Sully, when I promised to kill you last?.... I lied." - Arnold Schwarzenegger.
**Democracy is beautiful in theory; in practice it is a fallacy. You in America will see that someday.** -Benito Mussolini
"There is no good lighting that is healthy and for our well being without proper darkness."  Roger van der Heide
"Here's a rule I recommend: Never practice two vices at once."  Tallulah Bankhead
"A man can sleep around, no questions asked, but if a woman makes nineteen or twenty mistakes she's a tramp."  Joan Rivers
"If at first you don't succeed, find out if the loser gets anything."  Bill Lyon
"Life is like my Sister, I want a ride it all night long"
"Life moves pretty fast. If you don't stop and look around once in a while, you could miss it" - Ferris Bueller
"The doctor said with this Alzheimer"s thing, life is like a deck of cards. You got a full deck, you just can"t control the shuffle." -Chief (Rescue Me on Hulu, S2 E2)
"The art of writing is the art of discovering what you believe."  Gustave Flaubert
"A lady"s imagination is very rapid; it jumps from admiration to love, from love to matrimony in a moment." Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
"One ought, every day at least, to hear a little song, read a good poem, see a fine picture, and, if it were possible, to speak a few reasonable words." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe, from Wilhelm Meister"s Apprenticeship.
"Being rich is not about how much money you have or how many homes you own; it's the freedom to buy any book you want without looking at the price and wondering if you can afford it." - John Waters
"If you go home with somebody, and they don't have books, don't fuck 'em!" - John Waters
"All the president is, is a glorified public relations man who spends his time flattering, kissing, and kicking people to get them to do what they are supposed to do anyway."- Harry S. Truman
"Everyone's a whore. We just sell different parts of ourselves" - Thomas Shelby, Peaky Blinders.
"Nothing turns on a man more than a girl having a big fat heart"
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal; it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston Churchill
"I just like being a piece of furniture in your weird life" Juno
"I just want to be a piece of furniture in your weird life..." Juno
"When the storm breaks, each man acts in accordance with his own nature. Some are dumb with terror. Some flee... some hide... And some spread their wings like eagles and soar on the wind." - Elizabeth The Golden Age
"Atoms are like, really, really small. You could probably fit them all in this room, if you could catch them." - Niels Bohr
"Men have become the tools of their tools." - Henry David Thoreau
"Is it better to out-monster the monster or to be quietly devoured?" -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Is it better to out-monster the monster or to be quietly devoured?" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"What we once enjoyed and deeply loved we can never lose, For all that we love deeply becomes a part of us." - Helen Keller
"What we once enjoyed and deeply loved we can never lose. For all that we love deeply becomes a part of us." - Helen Keller
"It takes something more than intelligence to act intelligently." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"It takes something more than intelligence to act intelligently." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Happiness does not lie in happiness, but in the achievement of it." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"snippity snap, i am on crack"
"What is fascinating about marriage is why anyone wants to get married." - Alain de Botton
"If cynicism and love lie at opposite ends of a spectrum, do we not sometimes fall in love in order to escape the debilitating cynicism to which we are prone?" Alain de Botton
" The longer you live in the past, the less future you have to enjoy. " -UNKOWN
"Anyone who believes that exponential growth can go on forever in a finite world is either a madman or an economist". -Kenneth Boulding
"Artificial intelligence will spot who is hiding under a fake emotion, so start learning how to be honest now!, before it's too late." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"True success is having the freedom to be yourself." - Kathy Kolbe
"The world itself is the will to power - and nothing else! And you yourself are the will to power - and nothing else!" -Friedrich Nietzsche
"A total acceptance of yourself brings about a total transcendence of yourself." - Adyashanti
"The world itself is the will to power - and nothing else! And you yourself are the will to power - and nothing else!" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"An individual in a crowd is a grain of sand amid other grains of sand, which the wind stirs up at will." -Gustave Lebon
"If at first you don't succeed, look in the trash for the instructions."
"Too many people spend money they haven"t earned to buy things they don"t want to impress people they don"t like."  Will Smith
"And do not mix the truth with falsehood or conceal the truth while you know [it]."  [ Quran 2:42]
"A person often meets his destiny on the road he took to avoid it." - Jean De La Fontaine
"To be nobody but yourself  in a world which is doing its best, night and day, to make you like everybody else  means to fight the hardest battle which any human being can fight  and never stop fighting." - E.E Cummings
"Someone who eats pancakes and jam can't be so awfully dangerous. You can talk to him." - Tove Jansson, Finn Family Moomintroll
"Life is a gift." - Lucien LaCroix, Forever Knight
"Winning may not be everything, but losing has little to recommend it."  Senator Dianne Feinstein
"There is always more misery among the lower classes than there is humanity in the higher."  Victor Hugo
"The only reason for being a professional writer is that you can't help it."  Leo Rosten
"What some call health, if purchased by perpetual anxiety about diet, isn't much better than tedious disease."  George Dennison Prentice
"My opinions may have changed, but not the fact that I am right." -Ashleigh Brilliant
"There are two kinds of writer: those that make you think, and those that make you wonder." - Brian Aldiss
" WHO THE FUCK WANTS TO BE NORMAL NOW " - NICOLAS WINDING REFN.
"When you doubt, abstain."  Ambrose Bierce
"I am patient with stupidity, but not with those who are proud of it." - Edith Sitwell
" So many messages, so little content,
"New love is the best cure for old love gone bad" -Atticus
"Rare as is true love, true friendship is rarer." - Jean de La Fontaine
"One thing I don"t like about having computers in the home is that it cheats people out of the experience of becoming" - Kurt Vonnegut 1999
"My technique is don"t believe anything. If you believe in something, you are automatically precluded from believing its opposite." - Terence McKenna
"Life is not a spectacle or a feast; it is a predicament." - George Santayana
"Beyond the internal mess is clear space, a clear mind. And there"s no better placeindeed, no other placeto meet your true self." Joan Duncan Oliver, "The Sound of Silence"
"Everybody has the right to be stupid, but some people abusive the privilege" -Joseph Stalin
"Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeah! Yeaaaah!" -Bono
"Attention is the rarest and purest form of generosity." -Simone Weil
"Effort makes the man  ask any woman."
"There are things that have to be forgotten if you want to go on living."
"in the process of investigation, those with the most to lose will undoubtedly fumble around suspects and evidence, as if their pointing hand is on a swivel, crossing out suspect after suspect until they end up confused and with more questions than answers"
"I am hard at work being idle"
"There's no problem that can't be ignored if we really put our minds to it." -King Ralph 1991
"I am not a psychopath, Anderson. I am a high-functioning sociopath. Do your research." - Sherlock Holmes
"Is life so wretched? Isn"t it rather your hands which are too small, your vision which is muddied? You are the one who must grow up." - Dag Hammarskjold
"Small choices become actions, actions become habits and habits become our way of life." - Unknown
"If I had my way, any man guilty of golf would be ineligible for any office of trust in the United States." - Henry Louis Mencken (1880/09/12  1956/01/29)
"Life itself is your teacher and you are in a state of constant learning." - Bruce Lee
"Vishnu was trying to persuade the Prince that he should do his duty and, to impress him, takes on his multi-armed form and says, "Now I am become Death, the destroyer of worlds."" - Bob Oppenheimer, after flushing his his goldfish down the toilet while the poor thing was still alive.
"We live in a strange world where the poor walk miles to get food and rich walk miles to digest it." Ismail Menk
"I"ve always respected a prostitute more than a politician. The prostitute only sells what"s between their legs, politicians sell what"s between their ears" -my father
"We are like butterflies who flutter for a day and think it is forever." - Carl Sagan
"Before you diagnose yourself with depression or low self-esteem, first make sure you are not, in fact, just surrounded by assholes." -Sigmund Freud
"I have always noticed that whenever a radical takes to Imperialism, he catches it in a very acute form." -- Winston Churchill (1903)
"A pessimist sees the difficulty in every opportunity; an optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty." -- Winston Churchill
"Too many hands on my time, too many feelings. Too many things on my mind. And when I leave, I dont know what im hoping to find. And when I leave, I dont know what im leaving behind." -Neil Peart (Rush - The Analog Kid)
"When the universe has crushed him, man will still be nobler than that which kills him, because he knows that he is dying, and of its victory the universe knows nothing." - Pascal
"Stupidity can win for a moment, but it can never really succeed because the nature of humans is to seek freedom. Rulers can delay that freedom, but they cannot stop it." - Ai Weiwei
"Yes, it"s crazy. Love is either crazy or it"s nothing at all." - Milan Kundera
"God will not have his work made manifest by cowards." -Ralph Waldo Emerson.
"Always remember that you are absolutely unique. Just like everyone else." - Margaret Mead
"Do not watch the petals fall from the rose with sadness, know that, like life, things sometimes must fade, before they can bloom again". -Tetsuya Nomura
"Only the very weak-minded refuse to be influenced by literature and poetry." - Cassandra Clare, Clockwork Angel
"I love you as certain dark things are to be loved, in secret, between the shadow and the soul." - Pablo Neruda, 100 Love Sonnets
"I love you without knowing how, or when, or from where. I love you simply, without problems or pride: I love you in this way because I do not know any other way of loving but this, in which there is no I or you, so intimate that your hand upon my chest is my hand, so intimate that when I fall aslee
"I gave up caring about anything, and all the problems disappeared." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"I gave up caring about anything, and all the problems disappeared." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life. Don't be trapped by dogma. Don't let the noise of other's opinions drown out your own inner voice. Have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow already know what you truly want to become." - Steve Jobs
"Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life. Don't be trapped by dogma Don't let the noise of other's opinions drown out your own inner voice. Have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow already know what you truly want to become." - Steve Jobs
"Not everything that can be counted counts, and not everything that counts can be counted." - William Cameron
"Buried deep within you, beneath all the years of pain and anger, there is the potential to make yourself a better man. And that is what it is to be human. To make yourself more than you are." - Captain Jean-Luc Picard
"Just as good, isn't." -- Julia Child
"The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"If you want to overcome the whole world, overcome yourself." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"He who masters the grey everyday is a hero." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"After a year of therapy, my psychiatrist said to me, "Maybe life isn't for everyone." - Larry Brown
"r/quotes is the reason i have a total of 20000 upvotes on r/im14andthisisdeep" my roommate
"God made Truth with many doors to welcome every believer who knocks on them." - Khalil Gibran
"Today is yesterday"s pupil"  Benjamin Franklin
"The worldly life has been created as a place of testing. The wise person should fully habituate himself to patience." Ibn al-Jawzi
"When a man is wrapped up in himself, he makes a pretty small package."  John Ruskin
"Women need a reason to have sex. Men just need a place."  Billy Crystal
"Whatever you do will be insignificant, but it is very important that you do it."  Mahatma Gandhi
"The opposite of a correct statement is a false statement. But the opposite of a profound truth may well be another profound truth."  Niels Bohr
"I used to care what people thought about me, until one day I tried to pay my bills with their opinions." - Unknown
"Of course I"ll hurt you. Of course you"ll hurt me. Of course we will hurt each other. But this is the very condition of existence. To become spring, means accepting the risk of winter. To become presence, means accepting the risk of absence" Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"The more refined and subtle our minds, the more vulnerable they are."  Paul Tournier
"I do not lie to those I help, for if I did I would not truly be helping them, but giving them false hope."
"All my wolves begin to howl, i am waking up the time is now"
"You remember your first love because they show you, prove to you, that you can love and be loved, that nothing in this world is deserved except for love, that love is both how you become a person, and why." -John Green (*Turtles All The Way Down*)
"We are a way for the cosmos to know it self." - Carl Sagan
"Blessed are those who can laugh at themselves, for they shall never cease to be amused."
"People speak sometimes about the "bestial" cruelty of man, but that is terribly unjust and offensive to beasts, no animal could ever be so cruel as a man, so artfully, so artistically cruel." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"People speak sometimes about the "bestial" cruelty of man, but that is terribly unjust and offensive to beasts, no animal could ever be so cruel as a man, so artfully, so artistically cruel." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"You have to take the good with the bad,..."
"Problems that remain persistently insoluble should always be suspected as questions asked in the wrong way." - Alan Watts
"God is dead. God remains dead. And we have killed him. How shall we comfort ourselves, the murderers of all murderers? What was holiest and mightiest of all that the world has yet owned has bled to death under our knives: who will wipe this blood off us?" - Friedrich Nietzsche [continued below]
"Wealth is the number of things one can do without." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"So, when a person loses their composure it isn"t their skills and virtues that are troubled, but the spirit in which they exist, and when that spirits calms down so do those things." - Epictetus
"Choice is power." &lt;- Richard Joseph Banks
"You shouldn"t give circumstances the power to rouse anger, for they don"t care at all." - Marcus Aurelius
"Anyone can catch your eye, but it takes someone truly special to catch your heart."
"Every moment spent in unhappiness is a moment of happiness lost."  Leo Buscaglia
" A champion is defined not by their wins but by how they can recover when they fall." -Serena Williams
"Anger is a thief who steals away the nice moments."
"Atheists often create God in their own image in order to judge, convict and then expeditiously dispatch him according to human standards of morality." - Unknown
...for if Mr. Lincoln was not what they said he was  what were they? Henry Adams, on the savaging of Abraham Lincoln by William Thackeray and other English intellectuals *The Education of Henry Adams*
"From within or beyond, a light shines through us upon things, and makes us aware that we are nothing, but the light is all."
"You never have to change anything you got up in the middle of the night to write." - Saul Bellow
"We delight in the beauty of the butterfly, but rarely admit the changes it has gone through to achieve that beauty." - Maya Angelou
"If you're reading this... Congratulations, you're alive. If that's not something to smile about, then I don't know what is." - Chad Sugg, Monsters Under Your Head
"Most men, the herd, have never tasted solitude. They leave father and mother, but only to crawl to a wife and quietly succumb to new warmth and new ties. They are never alone, they never commune with themselves" -Hermann Hesse
"To go wrong in one's own way is better than to go right in someone else's." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"To go wrong in one's own way is better than to go right in someone else's." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Imagine being on your knees at your father's funeral beside his casket, saying goodbye to him  and then you have nine orgasms right there. While your whole family is standing behind you,". -Guy who can"t stop cumming.
"Dead people receive more flowers than the living because regret is stronger than gratitude" Anne Frank
"The cleverest of all, in my opinion, is the man who calls himself a fool at least once a month."- Fyodor Dostoevsky
"It is better to be unhappy and know the worst, than to be happy in a fool's paradise." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"The future is the place of all potential monsters. The problem is how do you exist in a world full of monsters. You have to be monstrous enough to contend with the monsters but civilized enough so that you"re not a monster yourself" - Jordan Peterson
"If you want to know what a man"s like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals"- Sirius Black ( Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire, J.K Rowling)
"I think a role model is a mentor  someone you see on a daily basis, and you learn from them."  Denzel Washington
"Years may wrinkle the skin, but to give up enthusiasm wrinkles the soul."  Samuel Ullman
"Happiness is like a butterfly; the more you chase it, the more it will elude you. But if you turn you attention to other things, it will come and sit softly on your shoulder." Henry David Thoreau
"Fill us with love is necessary when the emptiness is filled by other things" (William Ventura)
"Every day is a new day. It is better to be lucky. But I would rather be exact. Then when luck comes you are ready" (The Old man And the Sea by Ernest Hemingway)
"The effect you have on others is the most valuable currency there is" -Jim Carrey
"A loose cannon eventually points your way"
"Another possible source of guidance for teenagers is television, but television's message has always been that the need for truth, wisdom and world peace pales by comparison with the need for a toothpaste that offers whiter teeth *and* fresher breath."  Dave Barry
"Water, taken in moderation, cannot hurt anybody."  Mark Twain
"One machine can do the work of fifty ordinary men. No machine can do the work of one extraordinary man."  Elbert Hubbard
"I don't mind what language an opera is sung in so long as it is a language I don't understand."  Sir Edward Appleton
"Communism: Great Idea. Wrong Species." - E. O. Wilson
"A kind word can be uttered in a few seconds, yet its effects last a lifetime." Dr Yasir Qadhi
"There"s no magic cure for stress BUT there is hope, Happiness, and skills that can be taught, learned, practiced" -UNKNOWN
"The first step toward success is taken when you refuse to be a captive of the environment in which you first find yourself." - Mark Caine
"Self-mastery is the DNA of life mastery" - Robin Sharma
"We need never be ashamed of our tears" -Charles Dickens
"Everything has been figured out, except how to live."  Jean-Paul Sartre
"There are mysteries to the universe we were never meant to solve. But who we are, and why we are here are not among theme. Those we carry inside." -Optimus Prime (Transformers 4)
"Every zoo is a petting zoo if you man the fuck up." - Anonymous
"The stars are matter, we're matter, but it doesn't matter." -Don Van Vliet (Captain Beefheart)
"Dream as if you'll live forever. Live as if you'll die today." - James Dean
"Only in the agony of parting do we look into the depths of love." - George Eliot
"Failures are infinitely more instructive than successes." George Clooney
"After Buddha was dead, his shadow was still shown for centuries in a cave - a tremendous, gruesome shadow. God is dead; but given the way of men, there may still be caves for thousands of years in which his shadow will be shown. -And we- we still have to vanquish his shadow, too." - F. Nietzsche
"Pray as though everything depended on God. Work as though everything depended on you." - Saint Augustine
"Love is the only sane and satisfactory answer to the problem of human existence." - Erich Fromm
"Today you are You, that is truer than true. There is no one alive who is Youer than You." -Happy Birthday Dr. Seuss!
"'Cause we're living at the mercy of the pain and the fear. Until we get it, forget it, let it all disappear" -Mike Shinoda
"Hope shines so bright that it's a new form of sight, for you don't need a talented tongue to understand what the angels have sung!" &lt;- Richard Joseph Banks
"In every job that must be done there is an element of fun. Find the fun and snap, the job's a game." - Mary Poppins
"Another day, another Doug"-Korg
"He who fights with monsters should be careful lest he thereby become a monster and if thou gaze long into an abyss the abyss will also gaze into thee". -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Some cause happiness wherever they go others whenever they go". -Oscar Wilde
"Life moves pretty fast. If you don't stop and look around once in a while, you could miss it." - Ferris Bueller
"So you must match time"s swiftness with your speed in using it, and you must drink quickly as though from a rapid stream that will not always flow." - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"We are going to die and that makes us the lucky ones. Most people are never going to die because they are never going to be born. We won the lottery of birth, how dare we whine at our inevitable return to that prior state from which the vast majority have never stirred." - Richard Dawkins
"If it is to be, it is up to me." - Unknown
"Sometimes I'll start a sentence and I don't even know where it's going. I just hope I find it along the way." - Michael Scott, The Office
"The world only exists in your eyes. You can make it as big or as small as you want." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Mistakes are always forgivable, if one has the courage to admit them." - Bruce Lee
"It"s better to be prepared for an opportunity and not have one, then to have an opportunity and not be prepared"- Les Brown
"The great breakthrough in your life come when you realize that you can learn anything you need to learn to accomplish any goal that you set for yourself. This means there are no limits on what you can be, have or do " brian tracy
"Only through suffering can we find ourselves." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"To love is to suffer and there can be no love otherwise." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Knowledge will give you power, but character respect."- Bruce Lee
"People are shallow things, if anyone has been a bit more than they do, they're jealous and if one has less, they look down on him. A small difference makes them angry and hateful, sadly it's especially true for those like us who have nothing"-Berserk
"People who are blinded because they don't want to see the reality of love,are unable to read other people feelings" (William Ventura)
"You can't ever do anything brave if you're wearing the straight jacket of 'What will people think?' " --Brene Brown.
"Babies are cool, until you've done everything to do with 'em and you get bored. That's why T.V. shows about babies don't last more than a year."  Gregory Thomas Garcia, Alan Kirschenbaum
"The nice part about being a pessimist is that you are constantly being either proven right or pleasantly surprised. "  George F. Will
"I only know two pieces; one is 'Clair de Lune' and the other one isn't."  Victor Borge
"I feel like a Prada bag being sold at the flea market"- my friend, about being on tinder
"What is your name? Rose which smell sweet would be named the same." -(idk)
"Change is hardest at the beginning, messiest in the middle and best at the end." - Robin Sharma
"The whole secret of life is to be interested in one thing profoundly and in a thousand things well."  Horace Walpole
"Blackholes were made when God divided by Zero!"
"Beneath those pecs there beats a heart" (Leon Wieseltier)
"We Generate FEARS While We Sit. We Overcome Them By ACTION."  Dr. Henry Link
"Tomorrow is today with some delay"
"I have lived a long life and had many troubles, most of which never happened." - Mark Twain
"The death of a child is the greatest reason to doubt the existence of God." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"The death of a child is the greatest reason to doubt the existence of God." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"There are things which a man is afraid to tell even to himself, and every decent man has a number of such things stored away in his mind." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"There are things which a man is afraid to tell even to himself, and every decent man has a number of such things stored away in his mind." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Competition does a much more effective job than government at protecting consumers." - Thomas Sowell
"Isn't history ultimately the result of our fear of boredom...?" - Cioran, History &amp; Utopia.
"I got my own back." -Maya Angelou
"In reality there is perhaps no one of our natural passions so hard to subdue as pride. Disguise it, struggle with it, beat it down, stifle it, mortify it as much as one pleases, it is still alive, and will now and then peek out and show itself."  Benjamin Franklin
"People's hearts aren't so easily swayed". -Tokisaki Kurumi
"Test post, please ignore." -/u/qgyh2
"People seldom do what they believe in. They do what is convenient, then repent." -Bob Dylan
"It's not true that I had nothing on. I had the radio on." - Marilyn Monroe
"That's why they call it the American Dream, because you have to be asleep to believe it." - George Carlin
"Don't follow the river if the sea is full of mud" - me
"Positive thinking is not about expecting the best to happen. It is about accepting that whatever happens is for the best" -UNKOWN
"[W]hen it comes to justice, there is no easy way to get it. You can't sugarcoat it. You have to take a stand and say, 'This is not right.'" - Claudette Colvin
"If you wish to glimpse inside a human soul and get to know a man ... just watch him laugh. If he laughs well, he's a good man." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"A society should be judged not by how it treats its outstanding citizens but by how it treats its criminals." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"A society should be judged not by how it treats its outstanding citizens but by how it treats its criminals." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"The flower that blooms in adversity is the rarest and most beautiful of all." - Walt Disney Company, Mulan
"And now here is my secret, a very simple secret: It is only with the heart that one can see rightly; what is essential is invisible to the eye." Antoine de Saint-Exupry, The Little Prince
"What's meant to be will always find a way" - Trisha Yearwood
"Our world will not die as a result of the bomb, as the papers say - it will die of laughter, of banality, of making a joke of everything, and a lousy joke at that." Carlos Ruiz Zafn - The Shadow of the Wind
"If the Final Hour comes while you have a palm-cutting in your hands and it is possible to plant it before the Hour comes, you should plant it." Prophet Mohamed PBUH.
"There are 10^11 stars in the galaxy. That used to be a huge number. But it's only a hundred billion. It's less than the national deficit! We used to call them astronomical numbers. Now we should call them economical numbers."  Richard Feynman
"Why be a man when you can be a success?"  Bertolt Brecht
"It is well that war is so terrible - otherwise we would grow too fond of it."  Robert E. Lee
"Rest satisfied with doing well, and leave others to talk of you as they please."- Pythagoras
"Not every person you love is going to love you the same amount. And that's ok. Love isn't a contract. It's a present." - Me
"It"s the greatest samurais that let their sword rust in the scabbard" - Barney Stinson (HIMYM)
"You have someone waiting for you, too. There"s somewhere that you belong, Edward. You should go and find out where. Belonging is the very best thing there is." -Faye Valentine
"I hope for nothing. I fear nothing. I am free." -Nikos Kazantzakis"s epitaph
"To be proud of standing tall, you must first spend a lot of time on the ground" -2kliksphilip
"Everything's got a moral, if only you can find it."  Lewis Carroll
"Yet why were these gentle beings unhappy? They possesed a delightful house and every luxury; they had fire to warm them when chill", and delicious viands when hungry; they were dressed in excellent ent clothes; and, still more, they enjoyed one another's company and speech, interchanging each day-
"It's life that matters, nothing but life - the process of discovering, the everlasting and perpetual process, not the discovery itself, at all." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Our culture has accepted two huge lies. The first is that if you disagree with someone"s lifestyle, you must fear or hate them. The second is that to love someone means you agree with everything they believe or do. Both are nonsense." -Rick Warren
"Young wives are the leading asset of corporate power. They want the suburbs, a house, a settled life, and respectability. They want society to see that they have exchanged themselves for something of value." -- Ralph Nader
"There are things which a man is afraid to tell even to himself, and every decent man has a number of such things stored away in his mind." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"There are things which a man is afraid to tell even to himself, and every decent man has a number of such things stored away in his mind." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Above all, don't lie to yourself. The man who lies to himself and listens to his own lie comes to a point that he cannot distinguish the truth within him, or around him, and so loses all respect for himself and for others. And having no respect he ceases to love." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Above all, don't lie to yourself. The man who lies to himself and listens to his own lie comes to a point that he cannot distinguish the truth within him, or around him, and so loses all respect for himself and for others. And having no respect he ceases to love." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"When it came time to throw bricks through that Starbucks window, you left me all alone." -Laura Jane Grace of Against Me!
"Don"t try." - Charles Bukowski
"If you or a loved one has been diagnosed with mesothelioma you might be entitled to financial compensation" Law USA
"Perseverance and spirit have done wonders in all ages." - George Washington
"A wise man supports a cause, a fool supports a side" - Ginno Rey Menguito.
"If being good at something was easy, everyone would do it."
"The more we attempt to eliminate those things which offend us, the more we become offended by smaller things" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Gotta have oppesites dark and light, light and dark in painting it's like life gotta have a little sadness once in a while so you know when the good times come" - Bob Ross
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says I"m possible"  Audrey Hepburn
"The day the child realizes that all adults are imperfect, he becomes an adolescent; the day he forgives them, he becomes an adult; the day he forgives himself, he becomes wise." - Alden Nowlan
"All wars in history were miscalculated. With the sort of weapons we both have, can we afford any miscalculation?"
"He's old enough to know what's right, and young enough not to choose it. He's noble enough to win the world, but weak enough to lose it." -Neil Peart (Rush - New World Man)
"When an Anarchist is poor he breaks laws; when he is rich he makes them. In neither case does he ever dream of obeying them." - G. K. Chesterton
[In the Universe it may be that] Primitive life is very common and intelligent life is fairly rare. Some would say it has yet to occur on Earth." - Stephen W. Hawking
"Success seems to be connected with action. Successful people keep moving. They make mistakes but don"t quit."  Conrad Hilton
"If Trump isn't impeached then where is the bar? He needs to go to set a precedent that his type of governing will not be tolerated in this country." - Bill Maher
"Children are pure. They know I'm the strongest." - MASK de Smith, Killer 7
"There are known knowns and there are known unknowns and there are unknown unknowns, things we don't know we don't know" ,unknowm,comment section of a exurb1a vid.
"Philadelphia is closed on weekends" -George Carlin
"When we walked away, it was a very friendly walk" - Donald Trump 2019
"Right or wrong, it's very pleasant to break something from time to time." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Right or wrong, it's very pleasant to break something from time to time." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"There is one path in the world that none can walk but you. Where does it lead? Don"t ask, walk!" -Nietzsche
"Hold fast to dreams, For if dreams die Life is a broken-winged bird, That cannot fly." - Langston Hughes
"Sometimes you wake up. Sometimes the fall kills you. And sometimes, when you fall, you fly." - Neil Gaiman, Fables &amp; Reflections
"When we love, we always strive to become better than we are. When we strive to become better than we are, everything around us becomes better too."
"In life there are few who are born yo give love,and many others who died expecting to receive it" (William Ventura)
"In life there few who are born to give love,and many others who died expecting to receive it" (William Ventura)
"Truly great men must, I think, experience great sorrow on the earth." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"A man who lies to himself, and believes his own lies, becomes unable to recognize truth, either in himself or in anyone else, and he ends up losing respect for himself and for others." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"A man who lies to himself, and believes his own lies, becomes unable to recognize truth, either in himself or in anyone else, and he ends up losing respect for himself and for others." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Why are you gay?" -Ugandan news reporter interviewing an lgbtq+ activist
"There is only one happiness in this world, to love and be loved - George Sand" -my 3 year old son who is a lot smarter and wiser than me.
"The further a society drifts from the truth, the more it will hate those that speak it." - George Orwell
"she danced in a symphony of colour to the sound of her own emptiness"
"The grass is always greener once you don't have to mow a lawn anymore."  Randy K. Milholland
"I'm glad I didn't have to fight in any war. I'm glad I didn't have to pick up a gun. I'm glad I didn't get killed or kill somebody. I hope my kids enjoy the same lack of manhood."  Tom Hanks
"Foolish writers and readers are created for each other."  Horace Walpole
"Eternity's a terrible thought. I mean, where's it all going to end?"  Tom Stoppard
20+ love quotes read and share
"Fighting for peace is like screwing for virginity."- George Carlin
"Remember, nothing lasts. Next year, you"re unlikely to be in the same place that you are now. Things happen, people change. That"s life. New happenings await you. New blessings. New trials. New opportunities. So always be aware and keep your focus. Change is the only constant." -Ismail Menk
"You cannot get through a single day without having an impact on the world around you. What you do makes a difference and you have to decide what kind of a difference you want to make." - Jane Goodall
"You can never plan the future by the past."  Edmund Burke
"Yo momma so fat, Elmo raped a butt penis"
"We are who we pretend to be, so we have to be careful about what we pretend to be" -Kurt Vonnegut
"If one wanted to crush and destroy a man entirely, to mete out to him the most terrible punishment, all one would have to do would be to make him do work that was completely and utterly devoid of usefulness and meaning." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"I think the devil doesn't exist, but man has created him, he has created him in his own image and likeness." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"I think the devil doesn't exist, but man has created him, he has created him in his own image and likeness." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"So plant your gardens and decorate your own soul, instead of waiting for someone to bring you flowers." - Jorge Luis Borges
"I may be small but I will die a colossus." - Ludleth of Courland [Dark Souls 3]
"There is an old illusion. It is called good and evil." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"And if your friend does evil to you, say to him, ''I forgive you for what you did to me, but how can I forgive you for what you did to yourself?" -Friedrich Nietzsche
"And if your friend does evil to you, say to him, ''I forgive you for what you did to me, but how can I forgive you for what you did to yourself?" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Show me a hero and I'll write you a tragedy." - Jon Moxley
"The music business is a cruel and shallow money trench, a long plastic hallway where thieves and pimps run free, and good men die like dogs. There's also a negative side." -Hunter Stockton Thompson
"HEY NICO, IT'S YOUR COSIN, LET'S GO BOWLING!"
"If you ever get in real trouble, don"t panic. Sit down and think about it. Remember two things, always. There must be some way out of it and there must be humor in it somewhere." - Louise Fitzhugh
"If you ever get in real trouble, don"t panic. Sit down and think about it. Remember two things, always. There must be some way out of it and there must be humor in it somewhere." -- Louise Futzhugh
"There are only three things one should do for work..." - Dr. Nick Dinos
"I will fuck you till you love me, bitch." Mike Tyson
"Nobody is too busy, it"s just a matter of priorities " - unknown
"Choose your gut because your gut knows what you heart hasn"t learned yet"
"You should worry less about who you might offend and care more about who you might inspire."  Tim Allen
"Magic is believing in yourself, if you can do that, you can make anything happen." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"The best slave is the one who thinks he is free." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"you are wrong, you lose," -Alex Trebek
"That person who helps others simply because it should or must be done, and because it is the right thing to do, is indeed without a doubt, a real superhero." - Stan Lee
"With adversity you are shocked to higher levels, much like a rain storm that is so violent, but yet afterwards all plant grows." -Bruce Lee
"If you want to test cosmetics, why do it on some poor animal who hasn't done anything? ... So, rather than seeing if perfume irritates a bunny rabbit's eyes, they should throw it in Charles Manson's eyes and ask him if it hurts." - Ellen DeGeneres,
"I like it when you smile. But I love it when I am the reason."
"Courage is the commitment to begin without any guarantee of success." -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Courage is the commitment to begin without any guarantee of success." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Too many parents make life hard for their children by trying, too zealously, to make it easy for them." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"New beginnings require you to let go of old beginnings."
"Planning to write is not writing. Outlining . . . researching . . . talking to people about what you"re doing, none of that is writing. WRITING is writing."  E. L. Doctorow
" Don't wait, but create the most lovable moment of your life; right here, right now". -AMY
"Yoga is the fountain of youth. You're only as young as your spine is flexible."-Bob Harper
"Those who flee temptation generally leave a forwarding address."  Lane Olinghouse
"My grandmother started walking five miles a day when she was sixty. She's ninety-seven now, and we don't know where the hell she is."  Ellen DeGeneres
"In science one tries to tell people, in such a way as to be understood by everyone, something that no one ever knew before. But in poetry, it's the exact opposite."  Paul Dirac
"In the end, everything is a gag."  Charlie Chaplin
"No matter how badly someone treats you, never drop down to their level. Remain calm, stay strong, and walk away."
"To not give a f*ck about adversity, you must first give a f*ck about something more important than adversity." - Mark Manson
"Drawing on my fine command of the English language, I said nothing." -Robert Benchley
"Art is the only way to run away without leaving home." - Twyla Tharp
" Fascism begins the moment a ruling class, fearing the people may use their political democracy to gain economic democracy, begins to destroy political democracy in order to retain its power of exploitation and special privilege. " - Tommy Douglas
"Follow what makes you happy till it's last consequences." - Nobody
"If you want something you never had, you have to do something you"ve never done" (President Thomas Jefferson)
"Comedian's ultimate job is to release brain cum. " - Jimmy Carr
"you are what you believe yourself to be"
"The wonderful thing about patience, unlike commodities, is the more we use it, the more we offer it, the more we have." - Allan Lokos
"A nation that keeps one eye on the past is wise. A nation that keeps two eyes on the past is blind" - Anonymous, found on a wall in Belfast
"If you must be affected by other people"s misfortunes, show them pity instead of contempt. Drop this readiness to hate." - Epictetus
"Everything before the word "but" is horse shut" - Ned Stark
"If anyone can refute meshow me I"m making a mistake or looking at things from the wrong perspectiveI"ll gladly change. It"s the truth I"m after, and the truth never harmed anyone. What harms us is to persist in self-deceit and ignorance." - Marcus Aurelius
"The birth of heavy metal should have been aborted" - Ginger Baker of Cream
"One should not give sympathy to a mask worn by its beholder - Anonymous
"When you tear out a man"s tongue, you are not proving him a liar, you"re only telling the world that you fear what he might say." - unknown
"The computer works so fast because it does not think." Unknown
"The worst thing that can happen to a good cause is not to be skillfully attacked, but to be ineptly defended."  Frdric Bastiat, Economic Sophisms, 1964
"A wise man gets more use from his enemies than a fool from his friends." - Baltasar Gracian
"The secret is not to give up hope. It's very hard not to because if you're really doing something worthwhile I think you will be pushed to the brink of hopelessness before you come through the other side" - George Lucas
"The most wonderful youth is a youthful mind when you are no longer young" -Paul Leotard
"Find your joy and let it run your life" -Cleo Wade
"We are more often frightened than hurt; and we suffer more from imagination than from reality" - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"I have never been perfect,but nor do you"
"We do not have to visit a madhouse to find disordered minds; our planet is the mental institution of the universe." -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"We do not have to visit a madhouse to find disordered minds; our planet is the mental institution of the universe." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful about what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut, Mother Night
''don't argue with idiots, they'll beat you with their experiences. And drag you to their level.''
"Nothing is permanent in this wicked world- not even our troubles." - Charlie Chaplin
"Our friends show us what we can do; our enemies teach us what we must do." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Sin writes histories, goodness is silent." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"What is not started today is never finished tomorrow." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Books are mirrors: you only see in them what you already have inside you." - Carlos Ruiz Zafn
"Destroying rainforest for economic gain is like burning a Renaissance painting to cook a meal." E. O. Wilson
"Some people look for a beautiful place, others make a place beautiful."- Hazrat Inayat Khan
"the best way to keep a secret is to never have one" - Julian Assange
"This year for my birthday I want to learn how to think on my own."No woman ever
"This is not the end. It is not even the beginning of the end. But it is, perhaps, the end of the beginning."- One of the founding Kingsman
"Learn from yesterday, live for today, hope for tomorrow" - Albert Einstein
"The trouble about trying to make yourself stupider than you really are is that you very often succeed."  C. S. Lewis
"Life is full of misery, loneliness, and suffering - and it's all over much too soon."  Woody Allen
"Vote early and vote often."  Al Capone
"The best measure of a man's honesty isn't his income tax return. It's the zero adjust on his bathroom scale."  Arthur C. Clarke
"There"s no money in poetry, but then there"s no poetry in money either." - Robert Graves
"I did decide to walk on a messy road, but I refuse to be petty"
"Im going to get a tattoo over my whole body, only taller." -Stephen Wright
"To the world you might be one person, but to one person, you might be the world. Kindness is the golden chain by which our world is bound together." -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"To the world you might be one person, but to one person, you might be the world. Kindness is the golden chain by which our world is bound together." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"And when you think it's impossible, just remember to say this piece of advice I got from a very wise woman: I did my best, and my best is good enough." - Hannah Beachler at Academy Awards 2019
"If you live off a man"s compliments, you"ll die from his criticism." - Cornelius Lindsey
"I've come to appreciate the planet we live on. It's a small ball in a large universe. It's a very fragile ball but also very beautiful. You don't recognize that until you see it from a little farther off." - Guion "Guy" Bluford Jr., combat pilot, astronaut, and first African-American in space
"He is the happiest man who can see the connection between the end and the beginning of life." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"That was one of the virtues of being a pessimist: nothing was ever as bad as you thought it would be."
"And so the endless cycle of life comes to an end - meaningless and grim. Why did they live and why did they die? No reason... For in the end, nature is horrific and teaches us nothing." - Futurama
"The most confused you will ever get is when you try to convince your heart and spirit of something your mind knows is a lie." - Shannon L. Alder
"It was such a lovely day I thought it a pity to get up." - W. Somerset Maugham
"Unless one reads every day, thorns grow in the mouth" a quote from the Analects of Confucius
"The master has failed more times than the beginner has tried"- Stephen McCranie
"The master has failed more times than the beginner has tried"- Stephen McCranie
"You can easily judge the character of a man by how he treats those who can do nothing for him." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Every day we should hear at least one little song, read one good poem, see one exquisite picture, and, if possible, speak a few sensible words." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Television is by nature the dominator drug par excellence. Control of content, uniformity of content, repeatability of content make it inevitably a tool of coersion, brainwashing, and manipulation." - Terence McKenna
"My technique is don"t believe anything. If you believe in something, you are automatically precluded from believing its opposite." - Terence McKenna
"The most common form of despair is not being who you are," Sren Kierkegaard
"I make all my decisions on intuition. But then, I must know why I made that decision. I throw a spear into the darkness. That is intuition. Then I must send an army into the darkness to find the spear. That is intellect." -Ingmar Bergman
"The wonderful thing about patience, unlike commodities, is the more we use it, the more we offer it, the more we have." - Allan Lokos
"Why do we fall sir? So that we can learn to pick ourselves up." -Alfred Pennyworth
" If you can fill the unforgiving minute With sixty seconds" worth of distance run, Yours is the Earth and everything that"s in it, Andwhich is moreyou"ll be a Man, my son! " - If by Rudyard Kipling
"Do not let fake people hide the love that is around you and inside you, they are so weak, Love life and yourself and everyone you love." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Only after the last tree is cut, and the last river poisoned. Only after the last fish is caught, will we find that money cannot be eaten." Lamb of God - Reclamation
"...one of the aims of totalitarianism is not merely to make sure that people will think the right thoughts, but actually to make them less conscious." George Orwell ("Politics vs. Literature") (Sept. 1946)
"...the family, ... in the modern world is the sole refuge from the State..." -- George Orwell ("Review of The Reilly Plan" [Tribune - January 25, 1946])
"I've often felt that dreams are answers to questions we haven't yet figured out how to ask." - Fox Mulder
"Originality is being different from oneself, not others." - Philip Larkin
"I don"t want to take up literature in a money making spirit, or be very anxious about making large profits, but selling it at a loss is another thing altogether, and an amusement I cannot well afford." -- Lewis Carroll
"We are all here for some special reason. Stop being a prisoner of your past. Become the architect of your future." - Robin Sharma
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Everything can be taken from a man but one thing: the last of the human freedomsto choose one"s attitude in any given set of circumstances, to choose one"s own way." - Viktor E. Frankl (Man's Search for Meaning)
"The mind, unconquered by violent passions, is a citadel, for a man has no fortress more impregnable in which to find refuge and remain safe forever."  Marcus Aurelius
"Positive thinking isn"t ignoring life"s problems, it"s understanding that God can make a way out for you if you sincerely try." Omar Suleiman
"If I accept you as you are, I will make you worse; however, if I treat you as though you are what you are capable of becoming, I help you become that." - Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe
"If women don't exist,all the money in the world would have no meaning."
"I have only one superstition. I touch all the bases when I hit a home run."  Babe Ruth
"We do not know what we want and yet we are responsible for what we are - that is the fact."  Jean-Paul Sartre
"Conceit is God's gift to little men."  Bruce Barton
"A vacuum is a hell of a lot better than some of the stuff that nature replaces it with."  Tennessee Williams
"College is like voluntarily taking poison, then smiling as it goes down your throat" Bradley Irvine song 'Potato Chips and Sadness'
"You can't talk peace and have a gun" - Francis Magalona
"Hunger never saw bad bread." -Benjamin Franklin (Poor Richard's Almanack)
"If you see somebody that's hurting, don't look away. And if you are hurting, even though it might be hard, try to find that bravery within yourself to dive deep and go tell somebody." -Lady Gaga
"Life is a dangerous thing. Insecurity is the price of living. Only those who died and those who will never be born are absolutely safe." Alija Izetbegovi, Notes from Prison, 1983-1988.
"They can conquer who believe they can."  Virgil
"When childhood dies, its corpses are called adults." - Brian Aldiss
" I love walk in the woods coz there no place on the streets"- Amy
"What one fool can do, another can. " - ancient simian proverb
"A satisfied life is better than a successful life. Because our success is measured by others, but our satisfaction is measured by our own soul, mind and heart." - The Minds Journal
"Learning to let thinking come and go, we can eventually understand a thought as a thought and a word as a word, and with this understanding we can find a measure of freedom from thoughts and words." - Norman Fischer
"Perhaps the biggest mistake I made in the past was that I believed love was about finding the right person. In reality, love is about becoming the right person. Don"t look for the person you want to spend your life with. Become the person you want to spend your life with." - Neil Strauss
"Anything can become phallic if you stroke it long enough" Elton John
"They project onto you their flaws."
"If anyone cares, and they really shouldn"t... Tonight, I"m wearing Hanes, adidas, and IZOD. Too comfy for the red carpet and all too happy to be on the couch watching anything but the Oscars" - Loren Weisman
"But what can be done, the one who loves must share the fate of the one he loves." -Mihail Bulgakov, The Master and Margarita.
"I want to be clear that I condemn bullying and harassment of any kind and in any space." -Bernie Sanders
"Luck comes to those who look for it and thinking positive is its best ally"
"Every living being is an engine geared to the wheel work of the 'YOU-niverse'. Though seemingly affected only by its immediate surrounding, the sphere of external influence extends to infinite distance."  Nikola Tesla
"Behold a Republic! Whose every man is a King, but no one wears a crown." - William Jennings Bryan
"Let's go!" - Yuri Gagarin, during the launch of Vostok 1, the first manned orbit of the Earth
"What"s more important to you; your part in the play, or the play itself?" - The Lutece Twins, Bioshock Infinite burial at sea chapter 2
"My growth came when I realized that I don"t have to experience life the way I have been told to." -unknown
"We train young men to drop fire on people, but their commanders won't allow them to write "fuck" on their airplanes because it's obscene!" - Colonel Kurtz (Apocalypse Now)
"If God is all good, he cannot be all powerful, and if he is all powerful, then he cannot be all good" - Lex Luthor, Batman vs Superman: Dawn of Justice
"A comfort zone is a beautiful place, but nothing ever grows there" Unknown
"We don't fight against the things we hate, we fight to protect the things we love. That's how we win dummy" quote from Last Jedi
"It gets easier Every day it gets a little easier But you gotta do it every day  that"s the hard part. But it does get easier." - Jogging Baboon
"It gets easier. Every day it gets a little easier. But you gotta do it every day  that"s the hard part. But it does get easier" - Jogging Baboon
"There's nothing wrong at all with having a cause you're willing to fight for, but if you're suddenly willing to kill people for the sake of your cause, then you may want to take a few steps back and reconsider your motives for a moment!" -- My uncle
"Everything was grand then. Your worst enemy -- he wasn't so bad. The ants in the grass -- they were just, you know, doin' their thing." -Matt Dillon, Drugstore Cowboy (full quote in textbox)
"It is dangerous to be right when the government is wrong." - Voltaire
"Where the people fear the government you have tyranny. Where the government fears the people you have liberty." - John Basil Barnhill
"How the mind gears itself for its environment. The mind can go either direction under stress-toward positive or toward negative: on or off...."
"I would rather be optimistic and wrong, than pessimistic and right."-Elon Musk
"With so many leaders than ever before, leadership should be redefined and thought of as an ever present form hewing and contorting around us, and occasionally coming to rest inside us." - Ravi Silari
"Principles for the Development of a Complete Mind: Study the science of art. Study the art of science. Develop your senses- especially learn how to see. Realize that everything connects to everything else." - Leonardo da Vinci
"It is not the destination you should enjoy, but the journey."
"I will not sacrifice my kingdom for a handful of gold."
"We are told No, you're unimportant, you're peripheral - get a degree, get a job, get a this, get that, and then you're a player. You don't even want to play that game. - Terence McKenna [continued below]
"You have to take seriously the notion that understanding the universe is your responsibility, because the only understanding of the universe that will be useful to you is your own understanding." - Terence McKenna
"Smile to life,even when its jokes are in bad taste and demand cheers" (William Ventura)
"Everything, of worth, on Earth, is there; to share." - Morrissey
"It is not the answer that enlightens, but the question." - Eugne Ionesco
"There is no stigma attached to recognizing a bad decision in time to install a better one."  Laurence J. Peter
"Anybody caught selling macrame in public should be dyed a natural color and hung out to dry."  Calvin Trillin
"The trouble with our times is that the future is not what it used to be."  Paul Valery
"Whenever people agree with me I always feel I must be wrong."  Oscar Wilde
"Either get busy living or get busy dying" - Morgan Freeman
"Either get bust living or get busy dying"- Morgan Freeman
"Hard work will set you free." - Bernie Sanders
"It's one of the greatest fallacies, it seems to me, that time gives much of anything but years and sadness to a man. And memory. Yes, and memory. Without that, time would be unarmed against us."
"Don"t worry about failures, worry about the chances you miss when you don"t even try." - Jack Canfield
"To deny that there was this dark side of life would be like pretending that the cold of winter was somehow only a temporary illusion, a way station on the way to the higher "reality" of long, warm, pleasant summers. But summer, it turned out, was no more real than the snow that melted in wintertime
"Culture is a perversion. It fetishizes objects, creates consumer mania, it preaches endless forms of false happiness, endless forms of false understanding in the form of squirrelly religions and silly cults. - Terence McKenna [continued below]
"No, I will not yield!" - Bernie Sanders
"The man who does not value himself, cannot value anything or anyone."  Ayn Rand
"Healthcare in the US is about applying eugenics to poor people unable to be productive"
"In life, you'll realize there is a role for everyone you meet. Some will test you, some will use you, some will love you, and some will teach you. But the ones who are truly important are the ones who bring out the best in you. They are the rare and amazing people who remind you why it"s worth it."
"Good advice is a wise man's friend, of course; but sometimes it just flies on past, and all you can do is wave." --Leif Enger (Peace Like a River)
"Do I look like someone who WANTS to pay the IRS?!" - The Joker 
"HODOR". - Hodor
"I cannot be bought, compromised, detoured, lured away, turned back, deluded, or delayed. I will not flinch in the face of sacrifice, hesitate in the presence of adversity, negotiate at the table of the enemy, ponder at the pool of popularity, or meander in the maze of mediocrity."
"Those without sin, cast the first stone." Jesus
"Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent. Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent. Is he both willing and able? Then whence cometh evil? Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God." -Epicurus-
"One must be a fox in order to recognize traps, and a lion to frighten off wolves" - Niccol Machiavelli
"The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom." - Isaac Asimov
"It ain't that I'm too big to listen to the rumors, it's just that I'm too damn big to pay attention to them. That's the difference." -Andre Young-
"If everything is under control, you are going too slow." -Mario Andretti
"It ain't that I'm too big to listen to the rumors, it's just that I'm too damn to pay attention to them. That's the difference." -Andre Young-
"I think it's stupid to live your life in preparation for the next life" - Alex Honnold, free solo climber
"Psychedelics are illegal not because a loving government is concerned that you may jump out of a third story window. Psychedelics are illegal because they dissolve opinion structures and culturally laid down models of behaviour and information processing. - Terence McKenna [continued below]
"The current state of knowledge can be summarized thus: In the beginning, there was nothing, which exploded." -Terry Pratchett
"If you touch one thing with deep awareness, you touch everything." -Thich Nhat Hanh
"If you touch one thing with deep awareness, you touch everything." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"A satisfied life is better than a successful life. Because our success is measured by others, but our satisfaction is measured by our own soul, mind and heart." - The Minds Journal
"When it hurts to move on, just remember the pain you felt hanging on." -Unknown
"It"s not our abilities that show what we truely are, it is our choices" -Dumbledore
"Life is a journey full of unexpected miracles" - Unknown.
"Good, Better, Best. Never let it rest. 'Til your good is better and your better is best." - St. Jerome.
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched. They must be felt with the heart" - Helen Keller
"All art is quite useless." Oscar Wilde (in the preface of "The Picture of Dorian Gray")
"The problem of poisonous people,is that they crawl to harm and don't reconize that their venom makes them human snakes" (William Ventura)
"When fascism comes to the Unites States, it will be called anti-fascism" - Huey Long
"A liar begins with making falsehood appear like truth, and ends with making truth itself appear like falsehood." - William Shenstone
"I once wanted to become an atheist, but I gave up - they have no holidays."  Henny Youngman
"Newspapermen learn to call a murderer 'an alleged murderer' and the King of England 'the alleged King of England' to avoid libel suits."  Stephen Leacock
"I feel like a fugitive from the law of averages."  William H. Mauldin
"Letting go means to come to the realization that some people are a part of your history, but not a part of your destiny." - Steve Maraboli
"Service to others is the rent you pay for your room here on earth." Muhammad Ali
"Sometimes truth isn't good enough, Sometimes people need their faith rewarded ! " - Batman
"The world of reality has its limits; the world of imagination is boundless."  Jean-Jacques Rousseau
"We cannot tear out a single page of our life, but we can throw the whole book in the fire." - George Sand
"You are free, and that is why you are lost." - Franz Kafka
"Capitalism is the fullest expression of anarchism, and anarchism is the fullest expression of capitalism." - Murray Rothbard
"Strength doesn"t come from what you can do. It comes from overcoming the things you thought you couldn"t"
"Tough times never last, but tough people do" - Robert H. Schuller
"Hope is the one thing stronger than fear"
"I never let my friends do stupid things...alone"
"Almost nothing material is needed for a happy life, for he who has understood existence." - Marcus Aurelius
"It"s not what you think you are that counts, it"s what they THINK you are." Andy Warhol
"Adversity makes men, prosperity makes monsters."-Victor Hugo
"To be or not to be, that is the question" - Bob Marley
"Death is close enough at hand so we do not need to be afraid of life." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Death is close enough at hand so we do not need to be afraid of life." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Another thing that makes us human beings unique is that we have been given reasoning minds. Our minds work with our bodies and senses, sifting, analyzing, storing and transmitting knowledge. And still another unique part of us is the heart, not the bodily heart but the spiritual one, which feels...
"Be mindful of the company you keep. They could be the cause of your unhappiness or even downfall." Ismail Menk
"Beware of euphemisms. Radical changes in vocabulary are usually admissions that reality is unwelcome or indefensible." Victor Davis Hanson
"The strongest people are not those who show strength in front of us but those who win battles we know nothing about"
"Have more than you show. Speak less than you know"- William Shakespeare
"Bad things do happen; how I respond to them defines my character and the quality of my life. I can choose to sit in perpetual sadness, immobilized by the gravity of my loss, or I can choose to rise from the pain and treasure the most precious gift I have - life itself." -Walter Anderson
"Bad things do happen; how I respond to them defines my character and the quality of my life. I can choose to sit in perpetual sadness, immobilized by the gravity of my loss, or I can choose to rise from the pain and treasure the most precious gift I have - life itself." - Walter Anderson
"I am simply here to help save the world. Nothing is more important than love." - Jussie Smollett
"ISSA BURNIN' PROGRAM" -unknown, 2011
"People settle for far too little in life." C.S. Lewis
"You have to be odd to be number 1" -Dr. Suess
"That"s because sperm smeels like orange."  u/FireGogglez
"Where the lips are silent, The heart knows a thousand ways to speak." - Rumi
"A good book is the precious lifeblood of a master spirit, embalmed and treasured up on purpose to a life beyond life."  John Milton
"I will take care of me for you, if you will take care of you for me. "  Jim Rohn
"I am not a human being, I am dynamite." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Every high degree of power always involves a corresponding degree of freedom from good and evil." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Every high degree of power always involves a corresponding degree of freedom from good and evil." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I am heavy weapons guy, and THIS is my weapon" Mikhail, 2009
"I was never really insane, except on occasions where my heart was touched." Edgar Allan Poe
"When something bad happens you have three choices. You can either let it define you, let is destroy you, or you can let it strengthen you." - Dr. Seuss
"Nothing is either good or bad, but thinking makes it so." - William Shakespeare
"Fascism is cured by reading and racism is cured by travelling." - Miguel de Unamuno
"You only live once, but if you work it right, once is enough."  Greg Plitt
"I am certain there is too much certainty in the world."  Michael Crichton
"England and America are two countries separated by a common language."  George Bernard Shaw
"A cucumber should be well-sliced, dressed with pepper and vinegar, and then thrown out."  Samuel Johnson
"I'm an idealist. I don't know where I'm going, but I'm on my way."  Carl Sandburg
"Koranic teaching still insists that the sun moves around the earth. How can we advance when they teach things like that?" -- Taslima Nasrin Time magazine, 31st Jan 19942629083463.html
...
"Have more than you show. Speak less than you know"- William Shakespeare
"For a calm and more peaceful life, quit listening to gossip and learn to ignore what others are saying about you. Look for the good in everything. Learn to be positive and spread goodness. Always remember to be grateful for your life." Ismail Menk
"There will be a day where the market has no innovation. This will be a very dull and bleak time"  Anonymous
"The treacherous are ever distrustful." - Gandalf the Grey (from Lord of the Rings by J.R.R. Tolkien)
"One has to pay dearly for immortality; one has to die several times while one is still alive." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Everything good is the transmutation of something evil: every god has a devil for a father." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"There's no cure for being a cunt." - Ser Bronn of the fucking Blackwater
"One day, the Great European war will come out of some damned foolish thing in the Balkans." -Otto von Bismarck
"All things are subject to interpretation whichever interpretation prevails at a given time is a function of power and not truth." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Most folk are about as happy as they make up their minds to be." -Abraham Lincoln
"Inside every cynical person is a disappointed idealist." -George Carlin
"What gets us into trouble is not what we don"t know, it"s what we know for sure that just ain"t so." -Mark Twain
"One day my name will be associated with the memory of something tremendous  a crisis without equal on earth, the most profound collision of conscience, a decision that was conjured up against everything that had been believed, demanded, hallowed so far. I am no man, I am dynamite." - F. Nietzsche
"Stand up for what you believe in even if you are standing alone" - Sophie Scholl
"I searched for God and found only myself. I searched for myself and found only God." - Rumi
"In all fairness, Nala (from The Lion King) has really good fuck me eyes! They just say bone me!" - Alistair, my fianc (who I'm going to marry in 4 months)
"President Business is going to end the world? But he's such a nice guy! He's made such awesome stuff like dairy food, TV shows, news, coffee, surveillance cameras, all history books, our voting machines... wait a minute." - Emmet (The LEGO Movie)
"Listen, if you start worrying about the people in the stands, before too long you"re up in the stands with them." - Tommy Lasorda
"Do what I need just to make it, but I won"t ever sell my soul to Satan." - Lil Toenail (Wake Up)
"If it"s not fun, why bother?" -Reggie Fils-aime
"Please don"t ban me." -jazz941
"Tell me... where should I go? To the left, where nothing is right? Or to the right, where nothing is left?" - Itachi Uchiha
"first they say we cant build mosques on ground zero. now we cant build the amazon headquarters. maybe we should go live in the fucking Woods" - wint (@dril)
"Smile, it is the key that fits the lock of everybody's heart" Anthony J. D'Angelo
"You got a big ass motherfucker about 6'7"-6'8", 450lbs, High on PCP and Methamphetamine, twerkin' butt ass nekit on a table inside a McDonald's at 3 in the morning. If that isn't America, I dont know what is." Jerrick Sear
"Gotta have opposites; dark and light, light and dark in painting. It"s like in life. Gotta have a little sadness once in a while so you know when the good times come." -Bob Ross
"Don't let shit get you down, for the winter will always be bitter of the summer's warmth. Let's suffer in the cause; there's always cost in a cause." - Unknown
"Masses are always breeding grounds of psychic epidemics." -Carl Jung
"I love it when someone says something is impossible, it makes doing it and proving them wrong all the more rewarding"
"It"s amazing how uncommon common sense is"
"Night is the darkest just before the dawn" - Harvey Dent
"Create a posse of dead people. Create an entourage of heroes. Put their pictures on your wall, and keep them in your mind." David Brooks
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Everybody dies but not everybody lives"
"It is easy to proclaim all souls equal in the sight of God; it is hard to make men equal on earth." -- James Baldwin
"To live happily is an inward power of the soul." - Marcus Aurelius
[Love Quote] Love is too young to know what conscience is. William Shakespeare
"How do you let go of attachment to things? Don"t even try. It"s impossible. Attachment to things drops away by itself when you no longer seek to find yourself in them." - Eckhart Tolle
"I wish to die knowing that I took a fleeting instant of eternity and fashioned from it a lifetime." -Robert Breault
"I wish to die knowing that I took a fleeting instant of eternity and fashioned from it a lifetime." - Robert Breault
"No one has ever changed the world by doing what the world has told them to do."-Eddy Zhong, technology entrepreneur
"The pure reality of those who claim to be pure,is that when we discover that they lie,they don't want to admit that they're impure" (William Ventura)
"The Catholic Church treats gay people and unwed mothers worse than child rapists."
"Sweatpants are a sign of defeat. You lost control of your life so you bought some sweatpants." - Karl Lagerfeld
"The Machiavellian mind must know how to adapt flexibly to fit into stereotypes. A person who has fit into a stereotype does not raise undue suspicion." - Ravi Silari
"Life is good whether you travel all around the globe, or if you on the porch everyday playing your dominoes." - Kota the friend
"There are two types of leadership; one embodies prevailing sentiment, the other one creates the sentiment. A group or society requires both types of leadership to remain stable and to grow." - Ravi Silari
"There are two types of leaders: those who represent and embody the prevailing public sentiment, and those who create it." - Ravi Silari
"Our uniqueness makes us special, makes perception valuable but it can also make us lonely. This loneliness is different from being 'alone' You can be lonely even surrounded by people. The feeling i'm talking about stems from the sense that we can never fully share the truth of who we are." -Amy Tan
"Mesmerized by mythology, Hypnotized by ideology, Antagonized by reality, Vandalized by insanity, Desensitized by fraternity, Sanitized by policy, Jeopardized by lunacy, Penalized by apathy And living in the world of reality." -Yoko Ono "Hell in paradise"
"Being alive is making choices between love and hate, between holding out your hand or closing it into a fist. I don't have easy answers Markus You have to accept the world as it is or fight to change it." -Carl (Detroit Become Human)
"We ain't a sharp species. We kill each other over arguments about what happens when you die, then fail to see the fucking irony in that." -@shitmydadsays on Twitter
"Ah! Memory impairment: the free prize at the bottom of every vodka bottle!"  Chuck Lorre, Steven Molaro and Eric Kaplan
"My parents only had one argument in forty-five years. It lasted forty-three years."  Cathy Ladman
"The cat could very well be man's best friend but would never stoop to admitting it."  Doug Larson
"My Karma ran over your dogma."  Unknown
"If you want to build a ship, don"t drum up the men to gather wood, divide the work, and give orders. Instead, teach them to yearn for the vast and endless sea."
"If you want to build a ship, don"t drum up the men to gather wood, divide the work, and give orders. Instead, teach them to yearn for the vast and endless sea." - Antoine de Saint
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched - they must be felt with the heart".
"You can agree and disagree about whatever the fuck you want, just don't be a cunt about it" -IHE
"Those who do not want to imitate anything, produce nothing." Salvador Dal
"It's not the face, but the expressions on it. It's not the voice, but what you say. It's not how you look in that body, but the thing you do with it. You are beautiful." - Stephenie Meyer
"Ideas shape the course of history."  John Maynard Keynes
"Fearlessness is like a muscle. I know from my own life that the more I exercise it, the more natural it becomes to not let my fears run me."
"The most courageous act is still to think for yourself. Aloud."
"Never blame any day in your life. Good days give you happiness, bad days give you experience, and the worst days give you a lesson." -Sukhraj S. Dhillon
"You're always haunted by the idea that you're wasting your life."
"Life's worth nothing if you don't take risks"- Dan Conner
"There is more to life than increasing its speed" - Gandhi
"People say nothing is impossible, but I do nothing everyday." A.A. Milne, Winnie-the-Pooh
"The imagination is a dimension of nonlocal information." - Terence McKenna
"If you don't have a plan, you become part of somebody else's plan." - Terence McKenna
"Science flies you to the moon. Religion flies you into buildings."
!
"Some people are so poor, all they have is money" -Bob Marley
"But it Didn"t." -Captain Jack Sparrow (Pirates if the Caribbean)
"Forgiveness is the final form of love." - Reinhold Niebuhr
"Love is the only sane and satisfactory answer to the problem of human existence." - Erich Fromm
"Music is my escape. It silences the world and my worries." Unknown
"America did not exist. Four centuries of work, of bloodshed, of loneliness and fear created this land. We built America and the process made us Americans - a new breed, rooted in all races, stained and tinted with all colors, a seeming ethnic anarchy..." - John Steinbeck
"The grass is only greener on the other side of the fence if you're willing to put in the work to water it." - Unknown
"there was a time in my life where I chugged pickle juice for attention."
"Funny thing about being in the limelight. You never know when the lights will come crashing down on your head." -- Bill Lewis
"No single raindrop thinks it caused the flood".
"Criticism is something we can avoid easily by saying nothing, doing nothing, and being nothing."  Aristotle
"You can"t wake a person who is pretending to be asleep." -Navajo proverb.
"If Andy king was ready suck d**k to save the fyre festival then Nancy Pelosi knows how to save our country"
"Insanity in individuals is something rare - but in groups, parties, nations and epochs, it is the rule." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Love is the only sane and satisfactory answer to the problem of human existence." - Erich Fromm
"There comes a moment in history when ignorance is no longer a forgivable offense, a moment when only wisdom has the power to absolve." Dan Brown
"The mediocre teacher tells. The good teacher explains. The superior teacher demonstrates. The great teacher inspires" (William Arthur Ward)
"The problem is not to find the answer, it's to face the answer." - Terence McKenna
"The desire to be loved is the last illusion. Give it up and you will be free." - Margaret Atwood
"Calm mind brings inner strength and self-confidence, so that's very important for good health" ( Dalai Lama)
"Make time for fitness, or make time for sickness." - Firas Zahabi
"The sun is a daily reminder that we too can rise again from the darkness, that we too can shine our own light"
"Stupidity assumes two forms, it speaks or is silent. Mute stupidity is bearable." -Bruce Lee
"The grass is greener where you water it"
"Tragedy is when I cut my finger. Comedy is when you walk into an open sewer and die."  Mel Brooks
"The last time anybody made a list of the top hundred character attributes of New Yorkers, common sense snuck in at number 79."  Douglas Adams
"To be a book-collector is to combine the worst characteristics of a dope fiend with those of a miser."  Robertson Davies
"I have left orders to be awakened at any time in case of national emergency, even if I'm in a cabinet meeting."  Ronald Reagan
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, and today is a gift. that's why they call it present" Master Oogway (Kung Fu Panda)
"One day, someone showed me a glass of water that was half full. And he said, "Is it half full or half empty?" So I drank the water. No more problem." -Alejandro Jodorowsky
"One day, someone showed me a glass of water that was half full. And he said, "Is it half full or half empty?" So I drank the water. No more problem." - Alejandro Jodorowsky
" If someone tells you, "You Can't" they're showing you THEIR limits not yours."-anonymous
"I didn't think; I experimented."  Anthony Burgess
"If you think things hard enough, they become true. But if you have sadness inside, all the comes out of you head is sadness" -Silvana De Mari
"Human beings evolved to let their ideas die instead of them."
"To those who would try to impose socialism on the United States, we again deliver a very simple message: America will never be a socialist country." - Donald Trump
"End each day with a positive thought and a clear mind. No matter how difficult things were today, tomorrow is an opportunity to make it better." -- Bill Lewis
"We keep thinking of deity as a kind of fact, somewhere; God as a fact. God is simply our own notion of something that is symbolic of transcendence and mystery. The mystery is what"s important." - Joseph Campbell
"One must imagine Sisyphus happy." - Albert Camus
"He swings her around, and they kiss, reduced to just two wet mouths while the city around them, it disappears." - Chuck Palahniuk, Haunted
"Good things come to those who wait but it"s usually faster if you do it yourself"
"No man is more unhappy than he who never faces adversity. For he is not permitted to prove himself." - Seneca
"Most men ahead of their time tend to be overlooked in the present." - Wernher Von Braun, Project Blue Book.
"Freedom is the freedom to say that two plus two make four. If that is granted, all else follows." -1984 by George Orwell
"You can make a list with all you want to find in a man, but even if you find him, he'll never be enough. The heart wants what it needs. " overheard it in a movie
"Well begun is half done" - Aristotle
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream" - C.S.Lewis
"Why wont you die, mothertrucker" me right now
"I think there is a world market for about five computers." Thomas J. Watson (1943)
"The darker the night, the brighter the stars." Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Never underestimate how much assistance, how much satisfaction, how much comfort, how much soul and transcendence there might be in a well-made taco and a cold bottle of beer." - Tom Robbins
"You think you're opressed ? Ha ha, try being a gamer "
"People will find transformation and transcendence in a McDonald's hash brown if it's all they've got." -Patton Oswalt
"Everyone has good things in his life, we just need to constantly remember them" -unkown
"People will find transformation and transcendence in a McDonald's hash brown if it's all they've got." - Patton Oswalt
"How happy is the blameless vestal's lot! The world forgetting, by the world forgot. Eternal sunshine of the spotless mind! Each pray'r accepted, and each wish resign'd" By Alexander Pope from the poem Abelard to Eloisa.
"The worst outcomes can come from the best intentions." - wizards second rule, Sword of Truth.
"Where there is no love, pour love in, and you will draw love out." - John of the Cross
"My success is measured by my willingness to keep trying." - Unknown
"The more one tries to emulate others, the more the world misses out on the originality of oneself. Originality is rather easy, duplicating others is hard. Hence self-acceptance is one form of wisdom, because wisdom is about saving time."- Ravi Silari
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams" - Dr Suess
"Ours is a divine journey; therefore, this journey has neither a beginning nor an end... This journey has a goal, but it does not stop at any goal, for it has come to realize that today's goal is only the starting point of tomorrow's journey." - Sri Chinmoy
"Science is a way of thinking much more than it is a body of knowledge." - Carl Sagan
"Change is scary but it is scarier not to change."
"I say that a man must be certain of his morality for the simple reason that he has to suffer for it."  G. K. Chesterton
"In the part of this universe that we know there is great injustice, and often the good suffer, and often the wicked prosper, and one hardly knows which of those is the more annoying."  Bertrand Russell
"The creator of the universe works in mysterious ways. But he uses a base ten counting system and likes round numbers."  Scott Adams
"The real art of conversation is not only to say the right thing at the right place but to leave unsaid the wrong thing at the tempting moment."  Dorothy Nevill
"Don't you understand that we need to be childish in order to understand? Only a child sees things with perfect clarity, because it hasn't developed all those filters which prevent us from seeing things that we don't expect to see." - Douglas Adams
"There's a lot of humiliation in living, but that's okay, for if the gods are always laughing, then surely at times they must be laughing with us." - J. Andrew Schrecker
"Little minds are tamed and subdued by misfortune; but great minds rise above them."  Washington Irving
"...my choice is to tell the truth" -DR Maurice Bucaille
"I write my own destiny, forged by my experiences and paths I choose to take." - David Calleja
"Live your dream, and share your passion." - Holstee Manifesto
"Christianity, if false, is of no importance, and if true, of infinite importance, the only thing it cannot be is moderately important." - C.S. Lewis
"We meet no ordinary people in our lives." - C. S. Lewis
"Stop wearing your wishbone where your backbone ought to be." - Elizabeth Gilbert
"The best part about sex is not cumming, that's the destination. The sex is the journey and should be enjoyed in and of itself. One can have good sex and not cum, and one can have bad sex where one cums everywhere." - unknown
"We never find out the strength of the evil impulse inside us until we try to fight it." - C. S. Lewis
"You cannot express the holy in terms made for the profane, but you can discuss the profane in terms made for the holy." - Nassin Nicholas Taleb
"The main reason to go to school is to learn how not to think like a professor." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"The greatest obstacle to enlightenment is getting past your delusion that you are not already enlightened." - Ramana Maharshi
"The difference between your will and God's will is the tension that you create."
"Prayer is an act of love. Words are not needed." - Teresa of Avila
"It is love alone that gives worth to all things." - Teresa of Avila
"If you are going through hell, keep going" - Winston Churchill
"In the end, only three things matter: how much you loved, how gently you lived, and how gracefully you let go of things not meant for you." - Unknown
"Across the millennia, an author is speaking clearly and silently inside of your head, directly to you. Writing is perhaps the greatest of human inventions, binding together people who never knew each other, citizens of distant epochs." - Carl Sagan
"It is a strange sensation to hold someone close and lose them at the same time."
"Experience is what you have after you've forgotten her name" (Milton Berle)
"If you aim at nothing, you will hit it every time." -Zig Ziglar
"What makes earth feel like hell is our expectation that it should feel like heaven." Chuck Palahniuk
"I got to light out for the territory ahead of the rest, because Aunt Sally she"s going to adopt me and sivilize me, and I can"t stand it. I been there before." - Mark Twain
"Death, therefore, the most awful of evils, is nothing to us, seeing that when we are, death is not come, and when death is come, we are not." -Epicurus
"Now that I no longer desire all, I have it all without desire." - John of the Cross
"The accident is your training. Life is a choice. You can choose to be a victim or anything else you"d like to be."  Socrates, from Peaceful Warrior
"People in the world pay little heed to reason where their own interests are involved." - Teresa of Avila
"It is great wisdom to know how to be silent and to look at neither the remarks, nor the deeds, nor the lives of others." - John of the Cross
"The one thing that"s missing but that will soon be developed, is a reliable e-cash." - Milton Friedman
"Poetry heals the wounds inflicted by reason."  Novalis
"An apple a day keeps the doctor away"
"What the world needs is more geniuses with humility, there are so few of us left."  Oscar Levant
"I was so naive as a kid I used to sneak behind the barn and do nothing."  Johnny Carson
"She had a pretty gift for quotation, which is a serviceable substitute for wit."  W. Somerset Maugham
"The only thing worse than a man you can't control is a man you can."  Margo Kaufman
"To reach satisfaction in all, desire its possession in nothing. To come to the knowledge of all, desire the knowledge of nothing. To come to possess all, desire the possession of nothing. To arrive at being all, desire to be nothing." - John of the Cross
"To reach satisfaction in all, desire its possession in nothing. To come to the knowledge of all, desire the knowledge of nothing. To come to possess all, desire the possession of nothing. To arrive at being all, desire to be nothing. - John of the Cross
"To reach satisfaction in all, desire its possession in nothing, To come to the knowledge of all, desire the knowledge of nothing. To come to possess all, desire the possession of nothing. To arrive at being all, desire to be nothing." - John of the Cross
"To reach satisfaction in all desire its possession in nothing, To come to the knowledge of all desire the knowledge of nothing. To come to possess all desire the possession of nothing. To arrive at being all desire to be nothing." - John of the Cross
"There are many ways of going forward, but only one way of standing still."  Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Far away there in the sunshine are my highest aspirations. I may not reach them, but I can look up and see their beauty, believe in them, and try to follow where they lead." - Louisa May Alcott
"Walk as if you are kissing the earth with your feet." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"There are plenty of ways that you can hurt a man and bring him to the ground. You can beat him, you can cheat him, you can treat him bad and leave him when he's down" - Another One Bites The Dust
"There are plenty of ways that you can hurt a man. You can beat him, you can cheat him, you can treat him bad and leave him when he's down." - Another One Bites The Dust
"Silence is never-ending speech. Vocal speech obstructs the other speech of silence. In silence one is in intimate contact with the surroundings. Language is only a medium for communicating one's thoughts to another. Silence is ever speaking." -Ramana Maharshi
"Silence is never-ending speech. Vocal speech obstructs the other speech of silence. In silence one is in intimate contact with the surroundings. Language is only a medium for communicating one's thoughts to another. Silence is ever speaking." - Ramana Maharshi
"It is better that we should die on our feet than live on our knees"- Franois-Nel Babeuf
"Sorry"
"Don"t ever aim your doubt at yourself. Laugh at yourself, but don"t doubt yourself." -Alan Alda
"Disorder in the society is the result of disorder in the family." - St. Elizabeth Ann Seton
"Picasso is a communist. Neither am I."  Salvador Dali
"The inner machinations of my mind are an enigma" - Patrick Star
"They will envy you for your success, for your wealth, for you intelligence, for your looks, for your status - but rarely for your wisdom." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"One more person around us is enough to make our life more exciting" -Manga My Girl
"Fall in love with the process and the results will come."  Eric Thomas
"You'll have bad times, but it'll always wake you up to the good stuff you weren't paying attention to." Robin Williams in Good Will Hunting
"Do not make the mistake of treating your fortune (future) like a Lady. Fortune is a ***** and as with all ****** it will only satisfy you through bribery, coercion, or...violence. Fortune is a ***** and so there are times it must be beaten into place" - Niccolo Machiavelli
"Loneliness is like starvation: you don"t realize how hungry you are until you begin to eat." - Joyce Carol Oates
"Some days are for falling in love with people, some days for cities, and some for your time in solitude." - Akif Kichloo
"Nothing I do is done by some caricature or different version of myself  all the mistakes and uncertainty and jokes and good-words are 100% me."
"Who's Laughing. Clearly not all the people who just eploded." Carl The Llama
"Atheists express their rage against God although in their view He does not exist." - C. S. Lewis
"They will envy you for your success, for your wealth, for you intelligence, for your looks, for your status - but rarely for your wisdom." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"Remember that wherever your heart is, there you will find your treasure." -Paulo Coelho
"Fall down seven times, stand up eight" - Japanese Proverb.
"You don't have a soul. You are a Soul. You have a body." - C. S. Lewis
"Apart from the body does the world exist? Has anyone seen the world without the body?" - Ramana Maharshi
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." Albert Einstein
"In life there are storms that usually leave us tormented,and others in which we survive without having to torment ourselves" (William Ventura)
"I say let the world go to hell, but I should always have my tea" Fyodor Dostoevsky, Notes from Underground
"It is justice, not charity, that is wanting in the world."
"Tact is the knack of making a point without making an enemy."  Isaac Newton
"I hate television. I hate it as much as I hate peanuts. But I can't stop eating peanuts."  Orson Welles
"Personally I'm always ready to learn, although I do not always like being taught."  Sir Winston Churchill
"Ambition is a poor excuse for not having sense enough to be lazy."  Edgar Bergen
"A leader should have higher grit and tenacity, and be able to endure what the employees can"t."  Jack Ma
"All thinking men are atheists" - Ernest Hemingway
"I have not failed. I"ve just found 10,000 ways that won"t work." - Thomas A. Edison
"A genuine martyr is the victim of his life wish, not his death wish."
"Defeating a sandwich only makes it tastier" - Rotkaka Tageve
"The way to love anything is to realize that it may be lost." - Gilbert K. Chesterton
"A man does not know what he is saying until he knows what he is not saying." - Gilbert K. Chesterton
"Simply put, it"s what"s called a first person shooter, the view being you being in first person as you"re playing and for the simplest explanation, shooting at other people."- ESports expert Chris Golden
"A Lobster, When Left High And Dry Among The Rocks, Has Not Instinct And Energy Enough To Work His Way Back To The Sea, But Waits For The Sea To Come To Him. If It Does Not Come, He Remains Where He Is And Dies, Although The Slightest Effort Would Enable Him To Reach The Waves" - Dr. Orrison Swett
"And you have no obligation to kindness. You can be as kind as often as you want. Kindness is not a currency, and if you treat it like one, then that is not kindness. Within you, there is all the kindness you will ever need." -Iain S. Thomas
"If this isn't nice, what is?" - Kurt Vonnegut
"If you end up with a boring miserable life because you listened to your mom, your dad, your teacher, your priest, or some guy on tv telling you how to do your shit, then you deserve it." - Frank Zappa
" Beauty is how you feel inside, and it reflects in your eyes. It is not something physical." -Sophia Loren
"God created the plants on day three before He created the sun on day four. If you think plants are going to survive for billions of years without the sun, you need to study more biology." - Kent Hovind on why the days of creation must be 24 hours
"Some talk to you in their free time, and some free their time to talk to you"-UNKOWN
"Being touched is proof of one's existence"
"Being touched is also confirmation of one's existence"
"Some people are so far behind in the race that they actually believe they"re leading." -Junior Soprano
"People who drink to drown their sorrows should be told that sorrow knows how to swim." - Ann Landers
"The quieter you become, the more you are able to hear" - Rumi
"I don't have time to hate whoever hates me. I'm too busy loving whoever loves me" - Renato Russo
"Life is yoghurt and im lactose intolerant"
"Chance is the pseudonym of God when he did not want to sign." - Thophile Gautier
"It is a sign of weakness to avoid showing signs of weakness." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"For life to be really fun, what you fear should line up with what you desire." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"I've noticed that everyone who is for abortion is already born" -Ronald Reagan
"Tonight I dine on turtle soup." - Shredder
"sometimes you reach a point where you should not worry about falling down but about making the fall softer" - Eliot Coldwater
"The Thoughts in my mind is like The Code in the IDE" - Mounssif Bouhlaoui
"A common mistake that people make when trying to design something completely foolproof is to underestimate the ingenuity of complete fools" - Douglas Adams.
"But I know, somehow, that only when it is dark enough can you see the stars." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"The sword of a poor person is always accompanied by a hunger shield" (William Ventura)
"Nearly one-half of all Americans are torsos."  Demetri Martin
"He was one of those men who think that the world can be saved by writing a pamphlet."  Benjamin Disraeli
"Count Hermann Keyserling once said truly that the greatest American superstition was belief in facts."  John Gunther
"Every hero becomes a bore at last."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The master has failed more times than the beginner has even tried."
"If you change the way you look at things, the things you look at change." - Wayne Dyer
"It's always too early to quit."  Norman Vincent Peale
"Time and space always change, but there is something which is eternal and changeless.Let us try to find out that which is changeless and which always exists." - Ramana Maharshi
"To manifest wisdom means simply to step back and seeto reflect, inquire, be aware, be disciplined, and be focused not once in a while, but all of the time, moment to moment. This life is precious and fleeting. Pay attention." - Seido Ray Ronci
"Keep in your mind and life, balance before all else. Start with balance, learn what it means to live a balanced life, to dwell in the lighter and darker places. Seek understanding with yourself, and attain balance" -me
"Trials are but lessons that you failed to learn presented once again, so where you made a faulty choice before, you can now make a better one, and thus escape all pain that what you chose before has brought to you"- A Course in Miracles
"I used to dream that I was in a musical, because, in a musical, nothing dreadful ever happens." Selma Jekov (played by bjork in Dancer In The Dark)
"In each life, a little rain must fall" - TV Magician
"Where you spend your money is where your heart is" -Tim Allen
"Work destroys your soul by stealthily invading your brain during the hours not officially spent working; be selective about professions " - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"They will envy you for your success, for your wealth, for you intelligence, for your looks, for your status - but rarely for your wisdom." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"Religion isn't so much about telling man that there is one God as about preventing man from thinking that he is God." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"Hollywood's only allegiance these days is to money. If they think there's cash to be made by making films with a conscience, then you might see a revival of that kind of film-making. Otherwise, forget it." -andrew niccol
"Love is not two people gazing at each other, but two people looking ahead together in the same direction." (-Antoine de Saint-Exupery)
"Those who think religion is about 'belief' don't understand religion, and don't understand belief." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"You will never know for sure if someone is an asshole until he becomes rich." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"When you arise in the morning, think of what a precious privilege it is to be alive  to breathe, to think, to enjoy, to love." -- Aurelius,
"My battery is low and it"s getting dark." - Last message received from Opportunity rover on Mars
113 Cute Happy Quotes to make your day!
"There's rock, but it's the roll that counts." - Keith Richards
"In one corner we have The United States, and in the other corner, the contender, we have The United States"
"Cowardice asks the question 'is it safe?' Expediency asks the question 'is it politic? Vanity asks the question 'is it popular? But conscience asks the question 'is it right?'" - Martin Luther King
"What would you think about if you had 60 seconds left to live? Its been said your entire life flashes before your eyes. The most important moments go by in an instant - the people you love, the people you've lost, the people who made a difference." - Darcey Oake
"In wine there is wisdom, in beer there is Freedom, in water there is bacteria." - Benjamin Franklin
"There is no greater sorrow than to recall in misery the time when we were happy." - Dante Alighieri
"What we cry, what we contend for, in our world of toil and blood, it all lies beneath the notice of the hacker we call God." Thomas Pynchon
"Atheists are just modern versions of religious fundamentalists: both take religion too literally." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"The first one who uses 'but' has lost the argument." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"We have more possibilities available in each moment than we realize." (-Thich Nhat Hanh)
"There is only one thing worse than boredom, and that is the fear of boredom." - E.M. Cioran
"Children have never been very good at listening to their elders, but they have never failed to imitate them." - James Baldwin
"When it comes to nature versus nurture i choose neither. We are built from a DNA blueprint and born into a world of scenario and circumstance we don't control" - Hannibal Lecter (Hannibal tv series).
" Friends show their love in times of trouble, not in happiness."-Euripides
"Trouble on my left, trouble on my right I've been facing trouble almost all my life"-Cage The Elephant
"No object is mysterious, the mystery is your eye" Elizabeth Bowen
"You never know how much you really believe anything until its truth or falsehood becomes a matter of life and death to you." - C. S. Lewis
"Is there a difference between a man who thinks that honesty is the best policy, and an honest man?" - C. S. Lewis
"The more you sweat in peace, the less you bleed in war." -Norman Schwarzkopf
"A man does not know what he is saying until he knows what he is not saying." - Gilbert K. Chesterton
"It is a sign of weakness to avoid showing signs of weakness." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"We are here, playing basketball, riding horses, riding jet skis, having fun together. But what of the lives of the average people?" -Kim Jong-un
"Love is never lost. If not reciprocated, it will flow back and soften and purify the heart." - Washington Irving
75 Digital Marketing Quotes by Top Marketers  Must Read
"Be less curious about people and more curious about ideas." - Marie Curie
{Chess Quote} If your opponent offers you a draw, try to work out why he thinks he's worse off. - Nigel Short
"Winners don't do different things. They do things differently."-Shiv Khera
"There are some defeats more triumphant than victories."-Michel de Montaigne
"To be poor and dependent is very nearly an impossibility."  William Cobbett
"Either the United States will destroy ignorance or ignorance will destroy the United States."  W.E.B. Du Bois
"Literature is an occupation in which you have to keep proving your talent to people who have none."  Jules Renard
"A fine quotation is a diamond on the finger of a man of wit, and a pebble in the hand of a fool."  Joseph Roux
"No such thing as a man willing to be honest- that would be like a blind man willing to see." - F. Scott Fitzgerald.
"Friendship is Love without his wings!"  Lord Byron
"When you"re too scared to move, there"s a simple fix. I"m not saying easybut simple. Just lean forward. That"s all you need to do. Keep it up long enough and you"ll fall on your facebut your body won"t let you. It will automatically put a foot outand now you"re moving forward. Repeat as needed."
"An idea starts to be interesting when you get scared of taking it to its logical conclusion." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"If you know, in the morning, what your day looks like with any precision, you are a little bit dead - the more precision, the more dead you are." -Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"If you know, in the morning, what your day looks like with any precision, you are a little bit dead - the more precision, the more dead you are." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"Live the full life of the mind, exhilirated by new ideas, intoxicated by the romance of the unusual"-Hemingway
"The first principle is that you must not fool yourself, and you are the easiest person to fool" -Richard Feynman.
"Atheists are just modern versions of religious fundamentalists: both take religion too literally." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"My battery is low and it"s getting dark"-Oppy
"To see the future one needs to know how one got to the present. The present is the culmination of the events of the past, thus to see what is ahead one must turn around to see what lays behind." - Eduardo Galeano
"The suffrage by lot is natural to democracy, as that by choice is to aristocracy." -- Charles de Secondat
"The most incredible thing about miracles is that they happen." - Gilbert K. Chesterton
"Humility is not thinking less of yourself, it's thinking of yourself less." - C. S. Lewis
"Spend your free time the way you like, not the way you think you"re supposed to." - Susan Cain
"We loved with a love that was more than love..." Annabel Lee, Edgar Allan Poe 
"The real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new landscapes, but in having new eyes." Marcel Proust
"I'm nobody I'm a tramp, a bum, a hobo I'm a boxcar and a jug of wine And a straight razor ...if you get too close to me" -Charles Manson
"Every nation mocks other nations. And all are right."-Arthur Schopenhauer
"It is amazing how complete is the delusion that beauty is goodness." -- Leo Tolstoy
"You forget what you want to remember, and you remember what you want to forget." (Author :Cormac McCarthy Novel: The road)
"... to many people, calling themselves Socialists, revolution does not mean a movement of the masses with which they hope to associate themselves; it means a set of reforms which "we," the clever ones, are going to impose upon "them," the Lower Orders." George Orwell
"... to many people, calling themselves Socialists, revolution does not mean a movement of the masses with which they hope to associate themselves; it means a set of reforms which "we," the clever ones, are going to impose upon "them," the Lower Orders." George Orwell
"Three bowls do I mix for the temperate: one to health, which they empty first; the second to love and pleasure; the third to sleep. When this bowl is drunk up, wise guests go home. The fourth bowl is...
"I learned not to be afraid of silence when I 'm alone;but to be afraid when it starts talking" (William Ventura)
"Sometimes looking for a healthy advice,we find that counselors are sicker" (William Ventura)
"Lack of direction, not lack of time, is the problem. We all have twenty-four hour days." - Zig Ziglar
"This year, be structured enough for success and achievement and flexible enough for creativity and fun."  Taylor Duvall
"Words are but symbols for the relations of things to one another and to us; nowhere do they touch upon absolute truth." -Nietzsche
"Hardship often prepares an ordinary person for an extraordinary destiny." - C. S. Lewis
"The real great man is the man who makes every man feel great." - Gilbert K. Chesterton
"Children have never been very good at listening to their elders, but they have never failed to imitate them." - James Baldwin
"George Washington, as a boy, was ignorant of the commonest accomplishments of youth. He could not even lie."  Mark Twain
"We are so accustomed to disguise ourselves to others that in the end we become disguised to ourselves."  Francois de La Rochefoucauld
"I don't know half of you half as well as I should like; and I like less than half of you half as well as you deserve."  J. R. R. Tolkien
"They certainly give very strange names to diseases."  Plato
"Pain is nothing compared to what it feels like to quit." - Unknown
"All I ever wanted was to reach out and touch another human being not just with my hands but with my heart." - Tahereh Mafi, Shatter Me
"Life is what you make it. Always has been, always will be." - Grandma Moses
"Love the giver more than the gift."  Brigham Young
[V-Day | Click for full quote] "And just when the sweet confusion is so intense you think you're gonna die... you kind of do. Leaving you alone in your separate body, but the one you love is still there. [...] You can go to heaven and come back alive."  Andrew Martin (Bicentennial Man, 1999 film)
"Fight, not for the bounty, fight, not for the glory, for for love." Brentalfloss, Metroid:Fight for love
[V-Day | Click for full quote] "If I ask you about women, you'd probably give me a syllabus of your personal favorites. You may have even been laid a few times. But you can't tell me what it feels like to wake up next to a woman and feel truly happy."  Sean Maguire (Good Will Hunting, 1997 film)
"You have to systematically create confusion, it sets creativity free. Everything that is contradictory creates life." - Salvador Dali
"The only way to prevent hearing aids is hearing aids". -Probably Jesus, 2019
"The smallest actual good is better than the most magnificent promises of impossibilities"
"In life, unlike chess, the game continues after checkmate." - Isaac Asimov
"Don"t criticize them; they are just what we would be under similar circumstances." - Abraham Lincoln
"The trouble about man is twofold. He cannot learn truths which are too complicated; he forgets truths which are too simple."
"The human heart has a tiresome tendency to label as fate only what crushes it. But happiness likewise, in its way, is without reason, since it is inevitable." - Albert Camus
"He who has felt the deepest grief is best able to experience supreme happiness." - Alexandre Dumas
"It is in the darkness that one finds the light." - Meister Eckhart
"Science doesn't prove anything, All it does is remove uncertainty." - Michael Stevens
"The best argument against democracy is a five minute conversation with the average voter." -Churchill
"You are an ocean. There are waves crashing inside of you. Don't let anyone treat you like you are just another drop of rain." - F.E Marie
"The Negus has three choices: attack and be defeated, wait for our attack and our subsequent victory or retreat" -Pietro Badoglio
"Politicians are the same all over. They promise to build bridges even when there are no rivers" -Nikita Khrushchev
"A lot of us are afraid to face ourselves, and that is why we run from growth, love, or opportunity. Instead, we run into anxiety." - S.Mcnutt
"Man cannot live without joy; therefore when he is deprived of true spiritual joys it is necessary that he become addicted to carnal pleasures." - St. Thomas Aquinas
"Each night counts for something or else we'd all go mad." - Charles Bukowski, What Matters Most Is How Well You Walk Through the Fire
"Wisdom is not communicable. The wisdom which a wise man tries to communicate always sounds foolish." - Herman Hesse, Siddhartha
"He had already learned there was only one day at a time and that it was always the day you were in. It would be today until it was tonight and tomorrow would be today again." - Ernest Hemingway, The Last Good Country
"People say nothing is impossible, but I do nothing every day." - A.A. Milne
"If God had wanted you to live, he would not have created ME!"
"As democracy is perfected, the office of president represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron."
"When you're happy you enjoy the music. When you're sad you understand the lyrics." - Frank Ocean.[More Below]
"We are all born with a divine fire in us. Our efforts should be to give wings to this fire and fill the world with the glow of its goodness." (A.P.J. Abdul Kalam from Wings of Fire)
...and their content and cheerfulness were restored.
"You don't know who is important to you until you actually lose them." -Mahatma Gandhi
"You don't know who is important to you until you actually lose them." - Mahatma Gandhi
'You don't know who is important to you until you actually lose them." -Mahatma Gandhi
'You don't know who is important to you until you actually lose them." - Mahatma Gandhi
"If you're reading this... Congratulations, you're alive. If that's not something to smile about, then I don't know what is." - Chad Sugg
"Judge nothing, you will be happy. Forgive everything, you will be happier. Love everything, you will be happiest." - Sri Chinmoy
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live." - Norman Cousins
"Sorrows are our best educator. A man can see further through a tear than a telescope." -Bruce Lee
"Be so busy loving your life that you have no time for hate, regret or fear."  Unknown
"Imagination is more important than knowledge. For knowledge is limited, whereas imagination embraces the entire world, stimulating progress, giving birth to evolution." -Albert Einstein
"Oh what a tangled web we weave, when first we practice to deceive." Walter Scott
"The absence of love is more potent than the presence of it." -Me
"Hope is the thing with feathers That perches in the soul And sings the tune without the words And never stops at all." - Emily Dickinson
"Live life with no excuses, travel with no regret" - Oscar Wilde
"Try not to become a man of success. Rather become a man of value."
"The English language was carefully, carefully cobbled together by three blind dudes and a German dictionary."  Dave Kellett
"Love has no place in a lawyer's office."  Elizabeth Aston
"Sure I'm for helping the elderly. I'm going to be old myself some day."  Lillian Carter
"Here's something to think about: How come you never see a headline like 'Psychic Wins Lottery'?"  Jay Leno
"The pursuit of knowledge is never-ending.The day you stop seeking knowledge is the day you stop growing" - Brandon Travis Ciaccio
"Children must be taught how to think, not what to think" - Margaret Mead
"No greater glory, no greater honor, is the lot of man departing than a feeling possessed deep in his heart that the world is a better place for his having lived." - Robert Sengstacke Abbott, founder and editor of The Chicago Defender, the most widely circulated black newspaper in the US
"When god became lonely he created man, Or was it When man became lonely he created god."
"The only way to discover the limits of the possible is to go beyond them into the impossible."  Arthur C. Clarke
"Only the paranoid survive." -Andy Grove
"There is nothing more confusing than a person who gives good advice but sets a bad example"
"She may have murdered him, but at least he didn't touch her."
"There"s nothing as unstoppable as a freight train full of fuck-yeah." - Jen Sincero
.
"I am as bad as the worst, but thank God I am as good as the best." Walt Whitman.
"If you are lonely when you are alone, you are in bad company" - Jean Paul Sartre
"A power to dispose of estates forever is manifestly absurd. The earth and the fullness of it belongs to every generation" -- Adam Smith, economist
"Either risk it or regret it"
"There is a principle which is a bar against all information, which is proof against all arguments and which cannot fail to keep a man in everlasting ignorance - that principle is contempt prior to investigation." Herbert Spencer
"It's so much darker when a light goes out than it would have been if it had never shone." - John Steinbeck
"There is only one difference between a madman and me. The madman thinks he is sane. I know I am mad." - Salvador Dali
"I do not take drugs. I am drugs." - Salvador Dali
"If you've tried everything, you would have what you want by now"
"Ernest Hemingway once wrote, 'The world is a fine place and worth fighting for.' I agree with the second part." - Andrew Kevin Walker, screenplay for Se7en
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"The deeper the wound, the more private the pain."
"Music is a way to express everything one wants to say, which cannot be spoken with mere words but refuses to remain silent." - lvaro H. Lopes
"Always be in a company that motivates you toward a positive direction." Imam Malik
"When reality becomes farcical, satire becomes ambiguous and certainty is virtually impossible to achieve" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The brain is wider than the sky." -Emily Dickinson
"Hope is a good thing, maybe the best of things, and no good thing ever dies."  Andy Dufresne From The Shawshank Redemption
"If you want a happy ending, that depends on where you stop the story" -Orson Welles
"Happiness is a person's perspective on life, and that which makes them smile."
"Pride affects men in all walks of life. Look around, and one shall see men being prideful in contempt, anger, intelligence, and even misery. Pride knows every man, and every man knows pride."
"Like a midget at a urinal, I had to stay on my toes." -Frank Drebin
"When you know your "why" then your "what" has more impact, because you"re working towards your purpose." - Michael Jr.
"So far you've survived 100% of your worst days. This too shall pass."
"Don't let your happiness depend on something you may lose." - C. S. Lewis
"Integrity is doing the right thing, even when no one is watching." - C. S. Lewis
"If you asked me for my new year resolution, it would be to find out who I am."  Cyril Cusack
"Fate rarely calls upon us at a moment of our choosing" Optimus Prime
"The bible has no place for tyrannical anthropocentrism unconcerned for other creatures" -Pope Francis
"I wasn't there to compete. I was there to win." - Arnold Schwarzenegger
"America means freedom and there's no expression of freedom quite so sincere as music." - Glenn Miller
"Let gratitude be the pillow upon which you kneel to say your nightly prayer. And let faith be the bridge you build to overcome evil and welcome good." - Maya Angelou
"Nothing exists except atoms and empty space, everything else is opinion." - Democritus
"I work, I want to do something, and I"ve forgotten that everything will end, that there is - death" - Tolstoy
"I've stopped drinking, but only while I'm asleep."  George Best
"If I only had a little humility, I'd be perfect."  Ted Turner
"Try to learn something about everything and everything about something."  Thomas H. Huxley
"There is no reason for any individual to have a computer in his home."  Ken Olsen
"I'm afraid of what will come of me when I die if there is a god, but I'm more afraid of what will come of me if there isn't." - My great grandfather on his death bed.
"It is not how much time you spend in practice but how much effort you put makes you a champion." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"History is a slaughterhouse that extends forever." - Jordan Peterson
"But then I have not totally accepted that I am no longer a child. Once I do that I will have to accept responsibility for everything I do." -Carrie Fisher
"The only thing worth stealing is a kiss from a sleeping child"
"Just as a candle cannot burn without fire, men cannot live without a spiritual life."  Buddha
"Fallings just like flying except theres a more Permanent destination." -Moriarity
"You'll never know your limits until you push them" - Scott Kelly
"There is someone that I love even though I don't approve of what he does. There is someone I accept though some of his thoughts and actions revolt me. There is someone I forgive though he hurts the people I love the most. That person is......me." - C. S. Lewis
"Life is not fair, it never was and it isn't now and won't ever be. Don't fall into the trap. The entitlement trap, the feeling that you are the victim. You are not. " - Matthew McConaughey
"My heart is at ease knowing that what was meant for me will never miss me, and that what misses me was never meant for me"
"Play to have a great game, not to avoid having a bad one." - Unknown
"Forgiveness does not mean excusing." - C. S. Lewis
"Music is the answer to the mystery of life. The most profound of all the arts, It expresses the deepest thoughts of life."- Arthur Schopenhauer
"The effect of music is so very much more powerful and penetrating than is that of the other arts, for these others speak only of the shadow, but music of the essence."-Arthur Schopenhauer
"I'm so embarrassed. I with everybody was dead." -Bender, Futurama.
"I have observed that those who have accomplished the greatest results are those who "keep under the body"; are those who never grow excited or lose self-control, but are always calm, self-possessed, patient, and polite."  Booker T. Washington: Up From Slavery: An Autobiography.
"Only after we realize the failure of our value systems can we understand just what value our values truly have." - Nietzsche
"Misattributed quotes circle the globe a thousand times before the truth even begins to think about putting on pants." -Tim Riley, director of the National Churchill Museum at Westminster College
"We don't beat the Grim Reaper by living longer, we beat the Grim Reaper by living well." - Randy Pausch
"There are two types of people in this world- butterflies and flowers. The butterfly"s job is to fly around and see the world, come back and tell the flower what it saw. Trevor, you are a butterfly and I am a flower." -Trevor Noah"s mother
"Closing your eyes every night, without a worry in your heart, a stone in your shoe, or a regret in your mind, is a privilege only the Honorable can grasp and bind".- Me 2018
"We all agree that forgiveness is a beautiful idea until we have to practice it." - C. S. Lewis
"Life is too deep for words, so don't try to describe it, just live it." - C. S. Lewis
''We can't help everyone, but everyone can help someone.'' -Ronald Reagan
16 Lessons we could learn from John Mcafee
"Every man always has handy a dozen glib little reasons why he is right not to sacrifice himself" - Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"Life is a series of natural and spontaneous changes. Don't resist them; that only creates sorrow. Let reality be reality. Let things flow naturally forward in whatever way they like."-Lao Tzu
"This year I just wanna go on more adventures. Be around good energy. Connect with people. Learn new things. Grow."  Anonymous
"Wanting to be someone else is a waste of the person you are." - Kurt
"Most of our pain originates and is felt between our ears." - Mokokoma
"I always love it when I see you laugh with your soul and wish that the moment get paused forever"
"Judging is preventing us from understanding a new truth. Free yourself from the rules of old judgments and create the space for new understanding." -Steve Maraboli
"If voting changed anything, the government would make it illegal."
"It is easier to land a man on the moon than to change the school system." -M.Z.Riffi
"Creativity is as important as literacy" - Ken Robinson
"Knowledge is power, if you know it about the right person."  Ethel Mumford
"Military justice is to justice what military music is to music."  Groucho Marx
"The nice thing about standards is that there are so many of them to choose from."  Andrew S. Tanenbaum
"A compromise is the art of dividing a cake in such a way that everyone believes he has the biggest piece."  Ludwig Erhard
"When you run for your life, you will become the one deciding how you use your time. You will be the one deciding that you are not going to pour out your life anymore. You will no longer allow the school system or the work system to decide what you do with your time." -Sunday Adelaja
"The colour or intensity of a smoke doesn"t determine the type of fire that forms the smoke." - Agbor Jenet
"A healthy diet is a solution to many of our health-care problems. It's the most important solution." - John Mackey
"How Inquisitive men, waste their perishing time."-Rod Serling
"When men speak ill of thee, live so as no one will believe them." Plato
"Man is so made that when anything fires his soul, impossibilities vanish."  Jean de La Fontaine
"You can die at any time, but living takes true courage " (Kenshin Himura from Ruroni Kenshin)
"No tree can grow to heaven unless its roots reach down to hell" - Carl Jung
"Suicide is never the answer. You gotta outlive your enemies" - Satan on Twitter
"Hiroshima took nine seconds. Changchun took five months." -Zhng Zhnglng, "White Snow, Red Blood"
"Post Malone, I like your talent but hate everything else about you" -My Father
"Take no prisoners, take no passengers. If you're lucky enough to be on the boat you had better be rowing." - unknown
"Care about others but don"t care about what others think"
"You never know what you can do until you try, and very few try unless they have to." - C. S. Lewis
"If you love deeply, you're going to get hurt badly. But it's still worth it." - C. S. Lewis
"There must be security for all or no one is secure. Now, this does not mean giving up any freedom except the freedom to act irresponsibly." Klaatu, The Day the Earth Stood Still (1951)
"Lots of things happen after you die. They just don't involve you." -Louis C.K.
"Hell is empty. All the devils are here." William Shakespeare, "The Tempest"
"I hadn't been aware there were doors closed to me until i started knocking on them." (-Gertrude B. Elion)
''Never judge an eagle by the opinion of turkeys." -Matshona Dhliwayo
"The best and only way to get more time is by not wasting it." - Unknown
"I was raised to treat the janitor with the same respect as the CEO" - Tom Hardy
"What else could I say? Everyone is gay / What else could I write? I don't have the right / What else should I be? All apologies."
"Nothing is permanent in this wicked world  not even our troubles." (sir charles spencer chaplin)
"Even the thinnest anything, has two sides to it. Let's seek to examine both sides to everything before we judge" - Dr. Jacent Mpalyenkana
"We are more than the bodies we inhabit," Fawkes said. "They're little more than clothes, and yet we judge so much by them." Michael J. Sullivan
"People that have trust issues only need to look in the mirror. There they will meet the one person that will betray them the most." - Shannon L.
"And you? When will you begin that long journey into yourself? " - Rumi
"To be wronged is nothing, unless you continue to remember it." - Confucius
"What one fool can do, another can" (Ancient Simian Proverb)
"Some people bring out the worst in you, others bring out the best, and then there are those remarkably rare, addictive ones who just bring out the most. Of everything. They make you feel so alive that you"d follow them straight into hell"
"So far, about morals, I know only that what is moral is what you feel good after and what is immoral is what you feel bad after."
"If you want to be happy, treat others the way you would want them to treat you and do/focus on things that make you happy" - Ola Englund
"Don't be reckless with other people's hearts and don't put up with people who are reckless with yours." - Mary Schmich
"There are moments when one has to choose between living one"s own life, fully, entirely, completely-or dragging out some false, shallow, degrading existence that the world in its hypocrisy demands"
"Don't judge a man by where he is, because you don't know how far he has come." - C. S. Lewis
"Education without values, as useful as it is, seems rather to make man a more clever devil." - C. S. Lewis
"Even those who show a heart of steel,sooner or later find a feeling that's capable of melting and make from their steel a door that encloses love" (William Ventura)
"There is no greater threat to the critics and cynics and fear-mongers than those of us who are willing to fall, because we have learned how to rise." - Brene Brown
"If you fell down yesterday, stand up today." -Wells
"Men reject their prophets and slay them, but they love their martyrs and honor those whom they have slain."
"When everything seems to be going against you, remember that the air plane takes off against the wind, not with it." Henry Ford
"If you're not the lead dog, the scenery never changes" - tv ad.
"Every pain gives a lesson and every lesson changes a person"
"I"d say go to hell, but I never want to see you again." - Sylvia Plath
"King of the ice, king of the snow. King of your mum but your dad don't know."
"The town where I grew up has a zip code of E-I-E-I-O."  Martin Mull
"We are here and it is now. Further than that all human knowledge is moonshine."  H. L. Mencken
"The future will be better tomorrow."  Dan Quayle
"A national debt, if it is not excessive, will be to us a national blessing."  Alexander Hamilton
"Rising strong after a fall is how we we cultivate wholeheartedness in our lives. It's the process that teaches us most about who we are." - Brene Brown
"The only easy day was yesterday."
"we may be scattered we may be cracked we may be near annihilation but we will survive" -Caden hensley
"Be faithful to that which exists within yourself."  Andre Gide
"we may be scattered we may be cracked we may be near annihilation but we will survive" -Caden hensley
"A harmless man is not a good man. A good man is a very, very dangerous man who has it under voluntary control." -Jordan Peterson
"You begin saving the world by saving one person at a time; all else is grandiose romanticism or politics."
"Do not pray for an easy life, pray for the strength to endure a difficult one"-Bruce Lee
" Let us not look back in anger, nor forward in fear, but around in awareness." James Thurber
"Humans are ever changing, to find yourself is impossible. It"s learning to enjoy the search that"s important" - Keegan Hill
"When the whole world is running towards a cliff, he who is running in the opposite direction appears to have lost his mind." - C. S. Lewis
"The greatest evils in the world will not be carried out by men with guns, but by men in suits sitting behind desks." - C. S. Lewis
"Give a man a plane ticket and he will fly for a day. Push a man from a plane and he will fly for the rest of his life." - Abraham Lincoln
"No battle plan survives first contact with the enemy"
"If you want to fly, give up things that weigh you down."
"Help them up, but don't carry them."
"A healthy outside starts from the inside." - Robert Urich
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"What you resist, will persist."-Carl Jung
"All men should strive to learn before they die what they are running from, and to, and why." -James Thurber
"People sometimes mistake their own shortcomings for those of society and want to fix the Cities because they don"t know how to fix themselves."-Isaac Asimov
"I believe that I am in hell, therefore I am there." - Arthur Rimbaud
"My imagination is a monastery and I am its monk." - John Keats
"A comedian can only make fun till someone is laughing at his jokes." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The man who easily destroys himself,is the one who has never learned to rise from his own destructions" (William Ventura)
"Our experiences instantly become part of the lens through which we view our entire past, present, and future, and like any lens, they shape and distort what we see"- Daniel Todd Gilbert.
"Be careful around free things,you just might be the product." -Me
"We hope that, when the insects take over the world, they will remember with gratitude how we took them along on all our picnics."  Bill Vaughan
"There is scarcely anything in the world that some man cannot make a little worse, and sell a little more cheaply. The person who buys on price alone is this man's lawful prey."  John Ruskin
"An idealist is a person who helps other people to be prosperous."  Henry Ford
"There's no secret about success. Did you ever know a successful man who didn't tell you about it?"  Kin Hubbard
"The Hindu god Shiva is simultaneous destroyer and creator. Who you were yesterday is laid waste to give rise to who you are today." - Hannibal, Hannibal Lecter
"My definition of a free society is a society where it is safe to be unpopular."  Adlai Stevenson
"If you are not learning from your own mistakes, same would happen again and again in other forms."
"Choose something that you'll never get tired of doing even during weekends and you'll never have to work a day in your life."
"If you are not learning from your own mistakes, same would happen again and again in another forms."
"Our mindset will always be the number one factor in determining our level of success /failure, so better make it right."
"Words are but the signs of ideas."  Samuel Johnson
"The reason why I lost my lamp was that the thief was superior to me in vigilance. He paid however this price for the lamp, that in exchange for it he consented to become a thief: in exchange for it, to become faithless."  Epictetus
"The safest road to hell is the gradual one - the gentle slope, soft underfoot, without sudden turnings, without milestones, without signposts." - C. S. Lewis
"He is one of those people who would be enormously improved by death." -Hector Hugh Munro
"He is one of those people who would be enormously improved by death." - Hector Hugh Munro
"Sometimes people use thought to not participate in life." - The Perks of Being a Wallflower, Stephen Chbosky
"With the ever-growing impact of science on our lives, religion and spirituality have a greater role to play in reminding us of our humanity. There is no contradiction between the two. Each gives us valuable insights into the other." - His Holiness the 14th Dalai Lama
"Before we search for God, God is searching for us." - Abraham Heschel
"The door to God is the insecurity of not knowing anything. Bear the grace of that uncertainty and all wisdom will be yours." - Adyashanti
"God is a comedian with an audience that is too afraid to laugh."
"If you eat your hand, you're not gonna be hungry for lunch." - John Bender
"Coach lands in the runway at the exact same time as first class." -Steve Jobs in the movie Steve Jobs.
"The imagination is a weapon, those who don't use it die first"
"Old ways won"t open new doors." -Unknown author
"We live on a placid island of ignorance, in the midst of black seas of infinity, and it was not meant that we should voyage far."-H.P. Lovecraft
"The paradox is that when resistance is fully accepted, the resistance disappears." - Adyashanti
"Silence is the only teaching and the only teacher that is there all the time." - Adyashanti
"Give me six hours to chop down a tree and I will spend the first four sharpening the axe." - Abraham Lincoln
"Happiness is an allegory, unhappiness a story." - Leo Tolstoy
"They all strive to deviate from the norm, but collectively swarm to be all the same."  Jake Smith ("The Woods", 2002 The White Buffalo song)
"Acts of hate rooted in fear is a virus too. And it will eat your brains faster than any Talker (Zombie)." - Z Nation, Lt. Roberta Warren
"I think we should stop asking people in their twenties what they want to do and start asking them what they don't want to do"
"I've missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I've lost almost 300 games. 26 times, I've been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I've failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed." - Michael Jordan
"Every act of rebellion expresses a nostalgia for innocence and an appeal to the essence of being." - Albert Camus
"Eighty percent of married men cheat in America. The rest cheat in Europe."  Jackie Mason
"If you make people think they're thinking, they'll love you; But if you really make them think, they'll hate you."  Don Marquis
"For most men life is a search for the proper manila envelope in which to get themselves filed."  Clifton Fadiman
"A specification that will not fit on one page of 8.5x11 inch paper cannot be understood."  Mark Ardis
"Violence, naked force, has settled more issues in history than has any other factor, and the contrary opinion is wishful thinking at its worst. Breeds that forget this basic truth have always paid for it with their lives and freedoms." -Mr. Dubois, *Starship* *Troopers*
"Violence, naked force, has settled more issues in history than has any other factor, and the contrary opinion is wishful thinking at its worst. Breeds that forget this basic truth have always paid for it with their lives and freedoms." - Mr. Dubois, *Starship Troopers*
"Hope was a letter I never could send, love was a country we couldn"t defend." - Gregory Alan Isakov
"Hope was a letter i never could send, love was a country we couldn"t defend." - Gregory Alan Isakov
"The larger a country, the less easy for its real opinion to be ascertained. That is, factions might not, in the end, consist of wise, knowledgeable &amp; reasonable men. They might consist of passionate, ignorant &amp; irrational men..led to hold counterfeit opinions by persuasive men" - James Madison 1791
"Love makes six words feel like" - Seven.
"True friends are like stars; you can only recognize them when it"s dark around you."  Bob Marley
"Curiosity will conquer fear even more than bravery will."  James Stephens
"The Internet came along and some good things happened, but some very bad things happened" - DJT
"Words have no power to impress the mind without the exquisite horror of their reality."-Edgar Allan Poe
"You have to believe the impossible is merely preposterous" -Dwight (Futurama)
"It is the time you have wasted for your rose that makes your rose so important."
"Human beings are fundimentally incompetent, its only our motivation that varies." - Jeremy Hardy.
"You were born with wings, why prefer to crawl through life?" - Rumi
"If you ever feel down, just remember you were the fastest and strongest sperm."
"True freedom is to be free from the desire to be free from anything." - Adyashanti
"I choose a lazy person to do a hard job. Because a lazy person will find an easy way to do it." - Bill Gates.
"Love is when the other person's happiness is more important than your own"-H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"My life motto is: Always be nice. Never tell anyone in particular to shut up. Be one with the peace, not in addition to it, and not in opposition to it. "
"This is where we are right now, as a whole..
"It is true that neither the ancient wisdoms nor the modern sciences are complete in themselves. They do not stand alone. They call for one another." - Thomas Merton
"The current national accounting system (GDP) treats the earth as a business in liquidation." Herman Daly - Economist
"When dealing with people, let us remember we are not dealing with creatures of logic. We are dealing with creatures of emotion, creatures bristling with prejudices and motivated by pride and vanity." -Dale Carnegie
"Toxicology reports don't tell the real story - in fact, they won'r even qualify as CliffsNotes in my book."
"I'm worried for the day that computers pass the Turing Test, not because they'll be getting smarter but because we will have gotten so dumb we can't tell the difference anymore." -Douglas Rushkoff
"Obstacle is not a Failure ! Learning step of Patience and Perfection.. If you pass the Obstacles by Patiance and Perfection, Victory is Yours.." -- Unknown
"I left in love, in laughter, and in truth and wherever truth, love and laughter abide, I am there in spirit." -Bill Hicks
"At the still point of the turning world. Neither flesh nor fleshless; Neither from nor towards; at the still point, there the dance is, ............. (T. S. Eliot)
"An ordinary man seeks freedom through enlightenment. An enlightened man expresses freedom through being ordinary." - Adyashanti
"The greatness of a man is not in how much wealth he acquires, but in his integrity and his ability to affect those around him positively." - Bob Marley
"Silence is the only teaching and the only teacher that is there all the time." - Adyashanti
"Never assume that loud is strong and quiet is weak"
"The paradox is that when resistance is fully accepted, the resistance disappears." - Adyashanti
"It's just another day" -Paul McCartney
"It is true that neither the ancient wisdoms nor the modern sciences are complete in themselves. They do not stand alone. They call for one another." - Thomas Merton
"Package the demise of a civilization as entertainment, and it shall be consumed as entertainment" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The biggest embrace of love you'll ever make is to embrace yourself completely. Then you'll realize you've just embraced the whole universe, and everything and everybody in it." - Adyashanti
"Love has taught me that it doesn't matter what you learn from it,but what you're able to teach when it comes to loving someone" (William Ventura)
"60% of the time, it works every time." -Brian Fantana
"The poorer we are inwardly, the more we try to enrich ourselves outwardly." -Bruce Lee
"Screaming at children over their grades, especially to the point of the child"s tears, is child abuse, pure and simple. It"s not funny and it"s not good parenting. It is a crushing, scarring, disastrous experience for the child." -Ben Stein
*************** Victory is Yours ***************
"My education was dismal. I went to a series of schools for mentally disturbed teachers."  Woody Allen
"It's never just a game when you're winning."  George Carlin
"Procrastination isn't the problem, it's the solution. So procrastinate now, don't put it off."  Ellen DeGeneres
"The only thing wrong with immortality is that it tends to go on forever."  Herb Caen
"I don"t think you"re human if you don"t get nervous."  Sidney Crosby
"If she"s amazing, she won"t be easy. If she"s easy, she won"t be amazing. If she"s worth it, you won"t give up. If you give up, you"re not worthy." Bob Marley (happy belated birthday Bob - yesterday 2/6)
"If things seem under control, you are just not going fast enough."  Mario Andretti
"We fear violence less than our own feelings. Personal, private, solitary pain is more terrifying than what anyone else can inflict." - Jim Morrison
"Often the difference between a successful person and a failure is not one has better abilities or ideas, but the courage that one has to bet on one"s ideas, to take a calculated risk and to act."  Andre Malraux
"You can"t outwit fate by standing on the sidelines placing little side bets about the outcome of life. Either you wade in and risk everything you have to play the game or you don"t play at all. And if you don"t play you can"t win."  Judith McNaught
"I am still learning."  Michelangelo
"If life was easy it wouldn't be worth livin', God always gives his best soldiers the worst missions" -Calenraps
"Only those who play to win. Only those who risk to win. History favors risk-takers. Forgets the timid. Everything else is commentary."  Iveta Cherneva
"There is only one way to avoid criticism: do nothing, say nothing, and be nothing."  Aristotle
"If you do what you"ve always done, you"ll get what you"ve always gotten."  Tony Robbins
"He who is cruel to animals becomes hard also in his dealings with men. We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals."-Immanuel Kant
"I refuse to accept other people"s ideas of happiness for me. As if there"s a one size fits all standard for happiness."  Kanye West
"At 350 pounds you're a person, at 400 pounds you're a place" - Jim Croce
"Be mindful of what you toss away, be careful of what you push away, and think hard before you walk away."
"I am fearful when I see people substituting fear for reason." - Klaatu (The Day The Earth Stood Still)
"The world is an illusion, but an illusion which we must take seriously." -Aldous Huxley
"The world is an illusion, but an illusion which we must take seriously." - Aldous Huxley
"All gods are homemade, and it is we who pull their strings, and so, give them the power to pull ours." - Aldous Huxley
"Here, in the United States, we are alarmed by new calls to adopt socialism in our country. ... Tonight, we renew our resolve that America will never be a socialist country," - President Donald Trump.
"Should you conclude that life is objectionable or that nothing mattersdo not waste our time..." - Thomas Ligotti
"What happens in life echoes in eternity"
"Mysticism is the art of union with Reality." - Evelyn Underhill
"Even as a child I felt in my heart two opposite emotions: the horror of life and the ecstasy of life." - Charles Baudelaire
"Some people will say that words like scum and rotten are wrong for Objective Journalism -- which is true, but they miss the point. It was the built-in blind spots of the Objective rules and dogma that allowed Nixon to slither into the White House in the first place." - Hunter S. Thompson
"There's two types of instructors in this world. Those who explain things so they can look smart; and those who explain things so others can learn." - Unknown
"Religions are the cradles of despotism." - Marquis de Sade
"People say nothing is impossible, but I do nothing every day." - A. A. Milne
"I may be a sorry case, but I don't write jokes in base 13." - Douglas Adams on his use of the number 42 in The Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy
"I'll bet there aren't too many people hooked on crack who can play the bagpipes" - George Carlin
"In order to have a break through you have to break something." - Joe Polish
"Duct tape, Well, it"s like the Force. It"s got a light side and a dark side and it binds the whole universe together." - Adam Savage
"When life gives you a hundred reasons to break down and cry, show life that you have a million reasons to smile and laugh."
"Fiction does not become fact because it looks good. Fiction does not become fact because you wish it were true. Fiction does not become fact because it has turned into popular opinion. Remember this before reading the news, views, opinions or commentary." - Loren Weisman
"Everyone has a photographic Memory, some just don't have film." - Steven Wright
"Everything is funny, as long as it's happening to somebody else." - Will Rogers
"Courage is fear holding on a minute longer" - George S. Patton
"The significance of man is that he is insignificant and is aware of it."  Carl Becker
"Health consists of having the same diseases as one's neighbors."  Quentin Crisp
"The trouble with normal is it always gets worse."  Bruce Cockburn
"Some people feel the RAIN, others just get wet" - Bob Marley
"A dog is the only thing on earth that loves you more than you love yourself." Josh Billings
"Rules are for the obedience of fools and the guidance of wise men"
"A leader can't lead until he knows where he's going."  John Locke (Lost, 2004 ABC Series)
"Motivational quote."  Somebody (Somewhere, 2019 quote)
"The simplest recipe for joy that there is, is to stop and recognize what"s already around us."
"People cling to their rotten memories, and you can"t pry them loose. These things keep them busy. They avenge themselves for the injustice of the present by smearing the future inside them with shit. They"re cowards deep down, and just. That"s their nature." - Louis-Ferdinand Cline
"Do we, do we know When we fly, When we, when we go, Do we die?" - System of a Down. (Question!)
"I believe that if life gives you lemons, you should make lemonade... And try to find somebody whose life has given them vodka, and have a party." - Ron White
"You can do better." - Mom.
'The unexamined life is not worth living."-Socrates
"If you stick a knife in my back nine inches and pull it out six inches, there"s no progress. If you pull it all the way out that"s not progress. Progress is healing the wound that the blow made. And they haven"t even pulled the knife out much less heal the wound." -Malcolm X
"I have more scars than I will ever show you. They"re mine and I earned them. I stitched the wounds myself because you were afraid of the blood. Now, they have hardened with time. They no longer hurt. They simply serve as tattoos of weaker times when you weren"t there" D. Charles (me)
"We live as we dream - alone. While the dream disappears, the life continues painfully." - Joseph Conrad
"Learn when to stop talking and just listen, when to stop adding color to what is perfectly clear in black &amp; white."
"Those who seem as if they will not survive are sometimes those who thrive" -Myself
"This is the terror: to have emerged from nothing, to have a name, consciousness of self, deep inner feelings, an excruciating inner yearning for life and self-expression and with all this yet to die."
"Prepare, prepare, prepare. When the pressure is on, you don"t rise to the occasion; you fall to your highest level of preparation." - Chris Voss
"In a world of limited resources, our wealth is at the expense of the poor. To put it simply, if we have it, others cannot." - Richard J. Foster
"Life is a battle you can fight for your life or let life beat you down "
"Divinity reveals herself in all things. Everything has Divinity latent within itself." - Giordano Bruno
"One does not fix to dwell on the chaos within their mind" - Unknown
"To me the honour is sufficient of belonging to the universe...Not even Death can rob me of that honour, for nothing can alter the fact that I have lived." Wilhelm Barbellion
"Upon learning that the messenger is himself the bad news, it becomes quite necessary to shoot him" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Nothing is as frustrating as arguing with someone who knows what he's talking about." - Sam Ewing
"Life is too short to waste one single second with someone who doesn't appreciate and Value you"
"Those who do not fear the sword they wield have no right to wield a sword at all. -Shuhei Hisagi" (Bleach)
"Give me the liberty to know, to utter, and to argue freely according to conscience, above all liberties." - John Milton
"I love you as certain dark things are to be loved, in secret, between the shadow and the soul."
"If you suspect two people which are in love is a lie, but they are not hurting anyone or themselves in the process of that lie, leave them alone. Love cannot be understood to those outside of it at times, and some lies can become truths in the magic of intimacy."
"You don"t need to own the universe just to see it."
"This world is a comedy to those that think, a tragedy to those that feel." -- Horace Walpole
"In wartime, truth is so precious that she should always be attended by a bodyguard of lies." -- Winston Churchill
"An autobiography is the story of how a man thinks he lived." - Herbert Samuel, 1st Viscount Samuel
"He's turned his life around. He used to be depressed and miserable. Now he's miserable and depressed." - Harry Kalas
"For while there is power in acceptance, there is also merit to ambition." Somebody called Dustin.
"Another broken son from a broken home. Another troubled youth with nowhere to go. I've become a man despite you."
"Many men talk like philosophers and live like fools."-Philip K. Dick
"If you are depressed you are living in the past. If you are anxious you are living in the future. If you are at peace you are living in the present." - Lao Tzu
"If you are depressed you are living in the past. If you are anxious you are living in the future. If you are at peace you are living in the present." - Lao Tzu
"Sisterhood is the most powerful catalyst I have had in my life, and it has not only changed my career, but it has changed my life", Swati Bhattacharya
"It breaks my heart that pirates spend their whole lives following a map, when the real treasure is the friendships they build a long the way"- Twitter
"What nation wants to be oppressed by another that is stronger? Yet what nation is there that has not oppressed its neighbour? Where is the people that has not robbed the wealth of another?" - Dead Sea Scrolls
"Have the courage to be ignorant of a great number of things, in order to avoid the calamity of being ignorant of everything."  Sydney Smith
"The men who really believe in themselves are all in lunatic asylums."  G. K. Chesterton
"Never express yourself more clearly than you are able to think."  Niels Bohr
"By the pricking of my thumbs, something wicked this way comes." - Shakespear.
"Maybe you did not notice it, but something happens to everyone." Cesare Pavese
"We humans are meant to work and sweat in order to earn a living and those of us who try to get rich quick all get divine retribution along the line , that's the lesson , *unfortunately we easily forget the lessons we've learned and then we have to learn them all over again* " -Jet Black from Cowboy
"Dreams are necessary to life."  Anais Nin
"Living systems are never in equilibrium. They are inherently unstable. They may seem stable, but they"re not. Everything is moving and changing. In a sense, everything is on the edge of collapse." Michael Crichton, Jurassic Park
"The more prohibitions you have the less virtuous people will be." - Unknown
"Expose yourself to your deepest fear; after that, fear has no power, and the fear of freedom shrinks and vanishes. You are free. " Jim Morrison
"When it feels scary to jump, that is exactly when you jump. Otherwise you end up staying in the same place your whole life and that I can"t do."  J. C. Chandor, A Most Violent Year
"Politics is like shoes. There's a left and a right, but eventually you will want to go barefoot."  Jean-Luc Godard
"If a little dreaming is dangerous, the cure for it is not to dream less but to dream more, to dream all the time." - Marcel Proust
"I will never give up. I will keep fighting until the end. Get up, you"ll be alright" - Jim Kelley
"A single dream is more powerful than a thousand realities." - J. R. R. Tolkien
"Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities." - Voltaire
"You do realize that behind many celebrities, politicians and other popular figures tweets, they have PR, publicists, strategists, crisis management teams &amp; others that help pen their posts." Shared this with a 22 year old that was convinced I was an idiot for saying it. Loren Weisman
"You do realize that behind many celebrities, politicians and other popular figures tweets, they have PR, #publicists, strategists, crisis management teams &amp; others that help pen their posts." Shared this with a 22 year old that was convinced I was an idiot for saying it.- Loren Weisman
"In science one tries to tell people, in such a way as to be understood by everyone, something that no one ever knew before. But in poetry, it's the exact opposite." - Paul Dirac
"don't mind me, i'm just sippin sum thee."
"I looked up at the sky; the pure, wonderful stars were still there, burning." Jack Kerouac
'What you have witnessed since Christopher Hitchens"s opposition to the 1991 invasion of Iraq is something unique in natural history: the first ever metamorphosis of a butterfly into a slug'.  George Galloway.
"The meaning of life is just to be alive. It is so plain and so obvious and so simple. And yet, everybody rushes around in a great panic as if it were necessary to achieve something beyond themselves." - Alan Watts
"That which is held in secret tends to eventually be shouted from the rooftops." -Old Proverb
"Home is not where you are born; home is where all your attempts to escape cease." - Naguib Mahfouz
"Change happens when the pain of change becomes less than the pain of staying the same." - Dr. Henry Cloud &amp; Dr. John Townsend, Boundaries in Dating
"You're dead if you aim only for kids. Adults are only kids grown up, anyway." - Walt Disney
"What if you slept? And what if, in your sleep, you went to heaven and there plucked a strange and beautiful flower? And what if,when you awoke,you had the flower in your hand? Ah, what then?" - Samuel Taylor Coleridge
"The ninety and nine are with dreams, content but the hope of the world made new, is the hundredth man who is grimly bent on making those dreams come true." - Ted Olson
"Work begins when the fear of doing nothing at all finally trumps the terror of doing it badly." - Alain de Botton
"The easiest thing to waste is the time you get to spend on Earth" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Life can be meaningful enough to justify its suffering." - Jordan B. Peterson
''ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA OOORRAAAAA'' Jotaro Kujo
"We are shaped by our thoughts; we become what we think. When the mind is pure, joy follows like a shadow that never leaves" - Buddha
"A mind is like a parachute. It doesn't work unless it is open" Frank Zappa
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you." - Maya Angelou
"Your past has a way of sneaking up on you. You'll hear broken echoes of it everywhere, like a bad replay. You get mad at everyone for reminding you about it, even if it's all in your head."  Max Payne (Max Payne 2: The Fall of Max Payne, 2003 videogame)
"The mind won't accept death if it has no meaning" - an anime I can't remember
"The upper classes are... a nation's past; the middle class is its future."  Ayn Rand
"Normal is not something to aspire to, it's something to get away from."  Jodie Foster
"Ask yourself whether you are happy and you cease to be so."  John Stuart Mill
"There are two types of people--those who come into a room and say, 'Well, here I am!' and those who come in and say, 'Ah, there you are.'"  Frederick L Collins
"Impossible is a word to be found only in the dictionary of fools."Napoleon Bonaparte
"Let it be still, and it will gradually become clear" - Lao Tzu
"Don"t look at society and ask how you can fit in, look at yourself and ask how society can fit in with you."
"When someone is properly grounded in life, they shouldn't have to look outside themselves for approval." - Epictetus
"In spite of myself, and all of these nursery songs, My heart beats with a ceaseless longing of a yearning to belong" Nick Mulvey - Cucurucu
"The real treasure begins in the breaking. The body breaks, things change, life ends. Only when impermanence is fully apprehended do we really have the chance to serve, to give without bargaining."- Bonnie Myotai Treace
"Do things you hate and you will end up in Hell, as a Daemon." - Dave Archer
"There is a principle which is a bar against all information, which is proof against all arguments and which cannot fail to keep a man in everlasting ignorance  that principle is contempt prior to investigation." - Unknown / AA
"There is a principle which is a bar against all information, which is proof against all arguments and which cannot fail to keep a man in everlasting ignorance  that principle is contempt prior to investigation." - Herbert Spencer
"Love is a form of hope, and like hope, love abides in the face of everything." -The Doctor
"The universe consists of 5% protons, 5% neutrons, 5% electrons and 85% morons." Frank Zappa
"To cry often; to win the respect of stupid people, to leave the world a bit worse; this is to have failed." -Some Random Guy on the Internet
"Well Done is Better than Well Said" -Benjamin Franklin-
"Actually, we're all just looking for someone who likes our screw just as loose as it is." - German Proverb
"Once you discover one simple fact, and that is everything around you that you call life, was made up by people that were no smarter than you." -Steve Jobs- Apple Inc Founder
"There is more stupidity than hydrogen in the universe and it has a longer shelf life." Frank Zappa
" We hang the petty thieves and appoint the great ones to public office. " - Aesop
"Work for a cause not for applause, live life to express not impress" Unknown
"Violence, after all, is no mystery. It"s peace that"s the mystery. Violence is the default. It"s easy. It"s peace that is difficult: learned, inculcated, earned" - Jordan B. Peterson
"I said don't let your future be destroyed by my past, she said don't let my door hit your ass" - Mark Hoppus.
"Your time is limited, so don"t waste it living someone else"s life. Don"t be trapped by dogma, which is living with the results of other people"s thinking." -Steve Jobs- Apple founder
"Most people are not just comfortable in their ignorance, but hostile to anyone who points it out." -Plato
"Life is not that complicated. You get up. You go to work. Eat three meals. You take one good sh%^ and you go back to bed. What's the fu$%ing mystery?" George Carlin
"Don"t tell me what was said about me. Tell me why they were so comfortable to say it to you." - Shirish Kunder
"Be thankful for what you have. You have no idea how many people would love to have what you've got."
"Men only think about their past right before death, as if they were searching frantically for proof they were alive."- Spike, Cowboy Bebop
"People don't notice whether it's winter or summer when they're happy " Anton Chekhov
"We accept the love we think we deserve." Stephen Chbosky
"One good reason to only maintain a small circle of friends is that three out of four murders are committed by people who know the victim." -George Carlin
"If work is so terrific, how come they have to pay you to do it?" -George Carlin
"If work is so terrific, how come they have to pay you to do it?" - George Carlin
"One good reason to only maintain a small circle of friends is that three out of four murders are committed by people who know the victim." - George Carlin
"It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live."-Marcus Aurelius
"America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves." -Abraham Lincoln
"The only thing worse than making a mistake is defending it." - Shirish Kunder
"We don"t have a say in the matter, but let"s not admit that to ourselves."
"We don"t have a say in the matter, but let"s not admit that to ourselves"
"To laugh often; to win the respect of intelligent people, to leave the world a bit better; this is to have succeeded." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"What do you do from morning to night?" "I endure myself." - Emil Cioran
"It delights me to put wings to happiness;it's the only way to feel free and to be able to fly away from sadness" (William Ventura)
"America is the biggest gangsta in the world" -2pac
"No propositions astonish me, no belief offends me, whatever contrast it offers with my own." - Montaigne
"What's done cannot be undone."  William Shakespeare
"It takes hundreds of nuts to hold a car together, but it takes only one of them to scatter it all over the highway."  Evan Esar
"Last year I went fishing with Salvador Dali. He was using a dotted line. He caught every other fish."  Steven Wright
"Anything can happen in life, especially nothing." Michel Houellebecq
"When your work speaks for itself, don't interrupt."  Henry J. Kaiser
"I hold it to be the inalienable right of anybody to go to hell in his own way." - Robert Frost
"In hell there is no other punishment than to begin over and over again the tasks left unfinished in your lifetime." - Andre Gide
"I haven't walked through hell, but I have walked through earth and that's closer than I'd like to get"
"Put a dime in the bank." Which Bengals coach said it?
"I"d climb every mountain and swim every ocean just to be with you"
"A good movie is three good scenes and no bad ones." Howard Hawks
"They come from the end of the line mostly... they're the poor, the unwanted... They have no place in our society yet they're the ones fighting it's wars... I guess that's what it takes to make a man tough enough to be a grunt." - PVT Taylor, Platoon
"What they are, I am not at liberty to disclose, but we will not stand for the Fucking signs being removed. It may be very amusing for you British, but Fucking is simply Fucking to us. What is this big Fucking joke? It is puerile." - Police chief Kommandant Schmidtberger
"The quality of life is more important than life itself." - Alexis Carrel
"To be aflame with silence, with joy, is wisdom. It is not through logic but through love. It is not through words but through a wordless state called meditation or a state of no-mind, satori, samadhi." - Rajneesh
"Give the person you love your honesty respect trust and passion or be prepared to watch from the sidelines while someone else does it."- Charles J. Orlando
"I"ve dreamed a lot. I"m tired now from dreaming but not tired of dreaming. No one tires of dreaming, because to dream is to forget, and forgetting does not weigh on us, it is a dreamless sleep throughout which we remain awake. In dreams I have achieved everything. " -Fernando Pessoa
"Arguing over the internet is like competing at the Special Olympics. It doesn't matter who wins or loses, at the end of the day, you're all still retarded."-Unknown
"In spite of everything you've done for them, eventually they will hate you. Why bother?  Green Goblin.
"A patriot must always be ready to defend his country against his government." -Edward Abbey
"No matter what you do it's bound to be a waste of time in the end so you might as well go mad." - Jack Kerouac
"Accept a proverb out of wisdom's schools - barbers first learn to shave by shaving fools" - John Wolcot
"Commit to loving yourself completely. It"s the most radical thing you will do in your lifetime." - Andrea Gibson
"I am living today as someone I had not yet become yesterday and tonight I will borrow only pieces of who I am today to carry with me to tomorrow." - Andrea Gibson
"to die backwards, to fall upwards is "...
"Exceed the limits and rise above expectations." - PsycloneFX
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things you didn"t do than by the ones you did do."
"Sweeping into a pan: the narrow line of dust that defies its edge." James W. Hackett
"Sometimes it's more convenient to live in the clouds,than to live under a sun where it doesn't rain love" (William Ventura)
"Success is the ability to go from failure to failure without losing your enthusiasm."
"Loyalty is based on anticipation of reward. A Machiavellian individual should do their best to cultivate this anticipation in others, and they will be loyal as long as the possibility of reward is there. A wise Machiavellian leader is always dangling carrots that seem within reach." - Ravi Silari
"The past is a puzzle, like a broken mirror. As you piece it together, you cut yourself, your image keeps shifting. And you change with it. It could destroy you, drive you mad. It could set you free."  Max Payne (Max Payne 2: The Fall of Max Payne, 2003 videogame)
"To feel this great urge to hold and embrace you. I slowly dry out. I shrink and shrink until I'm gone. Nothing to make out of me, oh what the hell went wrong? My heart gets pulled out into your direction. It's no use, you have forsaken me."  Anneke Van Giersbergen (Shrink, 1997 The Gathering song)
"[...] I"m the one you always seem to read about. The fire inside my eyes has long gone out. There"s nothing left for me to say or do, 'cause all that matters disappeared when I lost you."  Steven Wilson (Postcard, 2011 Steven Wilson song)
"It is a paradoxical but profoundly true and important principle of life that the most likely way to reach a goal is to be aiming not at that goal itself but at some more ambitious goal beyond it."  Arnold Toynbee
"Politics is the skilled use of blunt objects."  Lester B. Pearson
"No one can have a higher opinion of him than I have, and I think he's a dirty little beast."  W. S. Gilbert
"Income tax returns are the most imaginative fiction being written today."  Herman Wouk
"A book read by a thousand different people is a thousand different books." - Andrei Tarkovsky
"The past does not cause the problem in the present. Recreating the problem in the present that might have been shaped in the past creates the problem." Michael Kerr
"Spoon feeding in the long run teaches us nothing but the shape of the spoon." - E. M. Forster
"They"ll love me when I"m dead" - Orson Welles
"Divide each difficulty into as many parts as is feasible and necessary to resolve it." Rene Descartes
"Be silly, be honest, be kind." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The human heart is not personal: the more we fathom our own hearts, the more we find there the being of others and, beyond that, the very heart of the world itself." - Reggie Ray
"One cannot use an evil action with reference to a good intention." -Thomas Aquinas
"No man truly has joy unless he lives in love." - Thomas Aquinas
"One cannot use an evil action with reference to a good intention." - Thomas Aquinas
"Not everything that is more difficult is more meritorious." - Thomas Aquinas
"The strongest men are the most alone." - Henrik Ibsen
"You can do anything, but not everything." - David Allen
"Any idiot can call Einstein a moron." - Unkown
"Quality is not an act, it is a habit."
"Like a moth to a flame. My wings burn away. When things are too beautiful I smash them to pieces. The more that you love me insecurity releases. I'll be the one that's to blame so, I'll sell my soul to blaze. Like a moth to a flame."  Chad Gray ("Moth", 2014 Hellyeah song)
"The most fucked up joke life can play on you is letting you meet the right person at the wrong time."
"Life is like toilet paper, the closed you are go the end, the faster it seems to go" -some guy from extreme cheapskates
"The point of modern propaganda isn't only to misinform or push an agenda. It is to exhaust your critical thinking, to annihilate truth." - Garry Kasparov
"Naw" - Rosa Parks
"Naw" - Rosa Parks
"She had never dreamed there could be so much pain in a life when there was nothing physically wrong. She hurt all the time."  Stephen King
"Two sure ways to fail: Think and never do, or do and never think."  Zig Ziglar
"Nothing created has ever been able to fill the heart of man. God alone can fill it infinitely." - Thomas Aquinas
"Challenges are what how we make use out of it." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The greatest kindness one can render to any man consists in leading him from error to truth." - Thomas Aquinas
"The things that we love tell us what we are." - Thomas Aquinas
''You must not fight too often with one enemy, or you will teach him all your art of war.'' -Napoleon Bonaparte
"People are born to be loved and things are there to be used. The problem is that things are being loved and people are being used" - Dalai Lama
"The best revenge is to improve yourself." -Imam Ali (AS)
"love is like a sin..my love...for the one who feels it the most" Massive attack -paradise circus
"To achieve total happiness, never let the past nor the future alter your present state of mind."
"The greatest success of Mohammad's life was effected by sheer moral force without the stroke of a sword." - Edward Gibbon (1737-1794)
"The world is so totally and wonderfully meaningless that being able to be happy is not luck: it is pure art." Ren Magritte
"If smoking marijuana causes short-term memory loss, what does smoking marijuana do?" - David Crosby
"What is past is past, never go back. Not for excuses. Not for justification, not for happiness. You are what you are, the world is what it is." - Mario Puzo (The Last Don)
"Critics search for ages for the wrong word, which, to give them credit, they eventually find."  Peter Ustinov
"Ninety-eight percent of the adults in this country are decent, hard-working, honest Americans. It's the other lousy two percent that get all the publicity. But then--we elected them."  Lily Tomlin
"Sometime they'll give a war and nobody will come."  Carl Sandburg
"J.F.K.--The Man and the Airport"  Unknown
"Television is altering the meaning of "being informed" by creating a species of information that might properly be called disinformation. Disinformation does not mean false information. It means misleading information  misplaced, irrelevant, fragmented or superficial information....
"He who has learned to disagree without being disagreeable has discovered the most valuable secret of negotiation." - Chris Voss
"Everyone thinks they're the hero of their own story" -Handsome Jack
"Heat. Pressure. And time. The three thingd that make a diamond, are also the three things that make a waffle."
"Those who tell the stories rule society." -Plato
"[He who] makes his appeal to feeling, to an oracle within his breast, tramples underfoot the roots of humanity. ... human nature only really exists in an achieved community of minds. The anti-human... stay[s] within the sphere of feeling" - Hegel
"Every failure is a step to success."  William Whewell
"he that sows lies in the end shall not lack of a harvest, and soon he may rest from toil indeed while others reap and sow in his stead" - J.R.R. Tolkien
"it is necessary that i should die for my people; but my spirit will rise from the grave and the whole world will know i was right." Adolf Hitler
"What does it take to become a saint? Will it." - Thomas Aquinas
"The greater the difficulty, the greater the glory." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"..Born into this. Into hospitals which are so expensive that it"s cheaper to die. Into lawyers who charge so much it"s cheaper to plead guilty. Into a country where the jails are full and the madhouses closed. Into a place where the masses elevate fools into rich heroes..." - Charles Bukowski
"I don"t need a key to the building, I"m the fucking architect" - PsycloneFX
"There"s no point in playing fair with a system that"s already cheating." -PsycloneFX
"He was jeopardizing his traditional rights of freedom and independence by daring to exercise them." Catch-22, by Joseph Heller
"May America be an Asylum to the persecuted of the earth!" - George Washington
"In the end, we know God as unknown." - Thomas Aquinas
"Because we cannot know what God is, but only what He is not, we cannot consider how He is but only how He is not." - Thomas Aquinas
"To be benevolent rather than malevolent is probably the true feature of our species."
"We think of Stalin - a man arguably worse than Hitler - as a much better person, that's because he was on our side. Sure Stalin was a psychopath, but unlike Hitler, he was our psychopath." My history teacher Mr Carter.
"To one who has faith, no explanation is necessary. To one without faith, no explanation is possible." -Thomas Aquinas
"To one who has faith, no explanation is necessary. To one without faith, no explanation is possible." - Thomas Aquinas
"It is better to remain silent and be thought a fool, than to speak and remove all doubt." Abraham Lincoln
"The care of human life and happiness, and not their destruction, is the first and only legitimate object of good government." Thomas Jefferson (1809)
"Whoever gives nothing has nothing. The greatest misfortune is not to be unloved, but not to love." Albert Camus
"I don"t think that people accept the fact that life doesn"t make sense. I think it makes people terribly uncomfortable." David Lynch
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and they don"t want anyone else to feel like that." - Robin Williams
"All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given to us." -J.R.R. Tolkien
"Fortune favors the prepared mind." - Louis Pasteur
"When injustice becomes law duty becomes law." -Thomas Jefferson
"Books are the carriers of civilization. Without books, history is silent, literature dumb, science crippled, thought and speculation at a standstill." - Barbara Tuchman
"A Harmless Man Is Not A Good Man. A Good Man Is A Very Dangerous Man Who Has That Under Voluntary Control" -Jordan Peterson
"A collector of memories of love never exhibits and puts on sale his beautiful collection" (William Ventura)
''If you want to conquer fear, don't sit home and think about it. Go out and get busy.'' -Dale Carnegie
"It was that kind of a crazy afternoon, terrifically cold, and no sun out or anything, and you felt like you were disappearing every time you crossed a road." J.D. Salinger,
"I fancied you'd return the way you said, But I grow old and I forget your name. (I think I made you up inside my head.)" -Sylvia Plath
"If something is important enough, even if the odds are against you, you still do it."  Elon Musk
"God, how I ricochet between certainties and doubts."
"Don't raise your voice, improve ypur arguments" - Harvey Specter
"I don't believe in an afterlife, so I don't have to spend my whole life fearing hell, or fearing heaven even more. For whatever the tortures of hell, I think the boredom of heaven would be even worse." - Isaac Asimov
"[...] Please don't give up, Des. Because all we really need to survive is one person who truly loves us. [...]"  Penelope Widmore to Desmond Hume (Lost, 2006 ABC series)
"Well, the telling of jokes is an art of its own, and it always rises from some emotional threat. The best jokes are dangerous, and dangerous because they are in some way truthful."  Kurt Vonnegut
"Laws are like sausages. It's better not to see them being made."  Otto von Bismarck
"An epigram often flashes light into regions where reason shines but dimly."  Edwin P. Whipple
"Don't accept rides from strange men, and remember that all men are strange."  Robin Morgan
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
" Only Those Who Will Risk Going Too Far Can Possibly Find Out How Far They Can Go "
"We must make the best of those ills which cannot be avoided."  Clarence Day
"Difficulties break some men but make others. No axe is sharp enough to cut the soul of a sinner who keeps on trying."  Nelson Mandela
"Never half-ass two things. Whole-ass one thing." - Ron Swanson (Parks and Rec)
"Government remains the paramount area of folly because it is there that men seek power over others - only to lose it over themselves." -Barbara Tuchman
"Government remains the paramount area of folly because it is there that men seek power over others - only to lose it over themselves." - Barbara Tuchman
"Talent is something you make bloom. Instinct is something you polish."
"Perfect is perception and perception is all that they can see."- Witt Lowry
"The whole art of Conservative politics in the 20th century is being deployed to enable wealth to persuade poverty to use its political freedom to keep wealth in power."  Aneurin Bevan
"There's love at first sight, and love at first fuck. Choose your path."
"[...] It takes a long time to realize how truly miserable you are, and even longer to see that it doesn't have to be that way. Only after you give up everything can you begin to find a way to be happy."  Cuddlywhiskers (BoJack Horseman, 2016 Netflix series)
"History is the unfolding of miscalculations." - Barbara Tuchman
"Don't sweat the petty things, pet the sweaty things." -Unknown
"(...) You can build a prison of stone and steel, but you merely present the prisoner with a challenge. Any truly determined man will find a way out. But love... love is the perfect prison. Inescapable (...)"  Wilson Fisk (Marvel's Daredevil, 2018 Netflix series)
"Heeded my words not, did you? Pass on what you have learned. Strength. Mastery. But weakness, folly, failure also. Yes, failure most of all. The greatest teacher, failure is. Luke, we are what they grow beyond. That is the true burden of all masters." master yoda the last jedi (2017)
"Theology being the work of males, original sin was traced to the female." -Barbara Tuchman
"Theology being the work of males, original sin was traced to the female." - Barbara Tuchman
"Everyone sees what you appear to be, few experience what you really are." -Niccol Machiavelli
"A man is not old till regret takes the place of dreams."
"What can be asserted without evidence can also be dismissed without evidence." -Christopher Hitchens
"What can be asserted without evidence can also be dismissed without evidence." -Christopher Hitches
"There are ways of dying that don't end in funerals. Types of death you can't smell." Haruki Murakami
"Any man dies with a clean sword, I will rape his fucking corpse." -The Hound.
"There is strength in numbers... And I am two or three at least!!" - Minsc
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile but is morally treasonable to the American public." - Theodore Roosevelt
"May you find what you seek" - Ancient quote of unknown origin
"The best giving is the absence of possessiveness." - Atisha
"I intend to leave this life so shattered there's gonna have to be a thousand separate heavens for all of my flying parts." - Andrea Gibson
"Look up to those above you, not to those below you. "
"We should love others truly, for their own sakes rather than our own." -Thomas Aquinas
"We should love others truly, for their own sakes rather than our own." - Thomas Aquinas
"Of all the pursuits open to men, the search for wisdom is most perfect, more sublime, more profitable, and more full of joy." - Thomas Aquinas
"The best giving is the absence of possessiveness." - Atisha
"No one can tell what goes on in between the person you were and the person you become. No one can chart that blue and lonely section of hell. There are no maps of the change. You just come out the other side. Or you don"t."
"We will fight it? Why?" Atreus asked. "Because you are frightened by it," Kratos replied. - God of War 4.
"Men argue. Nature acts." - Voltaire
"Be softer with you. You are a breathing thing, A memory to someone. Home to a life." - Nayyirah Waheed
"When you feel like quitting, think about why you started."  Unknown
"Once you replace negative thoughts with positive ones, you'll start having positive results."- Willie Nelson
"Happy families are all alike; every unhappy family is unhappy in its own way."  Leo Tolstoy
"Indecision may or may not be my problem."  Jimmy Buffett
"Success didn't spoil me, I've always been insufferable."  Fran Lebowitz
"You cannot simultaneously prevent and prepare for war."  Albert Einstein
"It"s not the years in your life but the life in your years that counts." Adlai Stevenson
"We all change, when you think about it. We're all different people, all through our lives... but that's ok, that's good, you gotta keep moving, so long as you remember all the people that you used to be!" -The Doctor
"You don't have to burn books to destroy a culture. Just get people to stop reading them." - Ray Bradbury
" The Man On Top Of The Mountain Didn't Fall There " _ Vince Lombardi _
"A man who gives his children habits of industry provides for them better than by giving them fortune."  Richard Whately
"I want to take you to a place of pure magic... It's the place athletes call the "zone". Buddhists call "satori" and ravers call "trance". I call it the Silver Desert. It's a place of pure light that holds the dark within it. It's a place of pure rhythm." - Gabrielle Roth
"In man, the things which are not measurable are more important than those which are measurable." - Alexis Carrel
"No, you will die!" - Emperor Palpatine
"Propaganda is to a democracy what a bludgeon is to a totalitarian state." -Noam Chomsky
"There is only one boss: the customer. And he can fire everybody in the company, from the chairman on down, simply by spending his money somewhere else." --Sam Walton
"The best way of increasing the [average] intelligence of scientists would be to reduce their number." - Alexis Carrel
"I get there fastest with the mostest" - confederate general Nathan Bedford Forrest when asked how he wins battles
'I'm alone so I won't turn out like you want me to.' - three days grace
"Of all the things that drive men to sea, the most common disaster, I've come to learn, is women." - Charles Johnson
"He who is not angry when there is just cause for anger is immoral. Why? Because anger looks to the good of justice. And if you can live amid injustice without anger, you are immoral as well as unjust." - Thomas Aquinas
"Be so good they can"t ignore you."  Steve Martin
"There are years that ask questions and years that answer." (-Zora Neale Hurston)
"I"d cut my soul into a million different pieces just to form a constellation to light your way home. I"d write love poems to the parts of yourself you can"t stand. I"d stand in the shadows of your heart and tell you I"m not afraid of your dark." - Andrea Gibson
"The Internet is the first thing that humanity has built that humanity doesn't understand." - Eric Schmidt
"The things you own end up owning you." -Tyler Durden
"I have decided to stick with love. Hate is too great a burden to bear." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Watch your thoughts, they become words; watch your words, they become actions; watch your actions, they become habits; watch your habits, they become character; watch your character, for it becomes your destiny." Frank Outlaw
"Forests may be gorgeous but there is nothing more alive than a tree that learns how to grow in a cemetery." -Andrea Gibson
"Let friendship creep gently to a height; if it rushes to it, it may soon run itself out of breath." -Bruce Lee
"Forests may be gorgeous but there is nothing more alive than a tree that learns how to grow in a cemetery." - Andrea Gibson
"Sometimes the break in your heart is like the hole in the flute. Sometimes it"s the place where the music comes through." - Andrea Gibson
"War means fighting, and fighting means killing!" - Nathan Bedford Forrest, confederate cavalry commander
"Business is a money game with few rules and a lot of risk."  Bill Gates
"War means fighting, and fighting means killing!" Nathan Bedford Forrest, confederate cavalry commander
"Civilization is the progress toward a society of privacy. The savage's whole existence is public, ruled by the laws of his tribe. Civilization is the process of setting man free from men." - Ayn Rand
"Matter is the most spiritual thing you will ever find."
"Nutrition isn"t just about eating, it"s about learning to live."  Patricia Comptton
"In the land of the blind, the one-eyed man is stoned to death."  Joan D. Vinge
"Perpetual devotion to what a man calls his business, is only to be sustained by perpetual neglect of many other things."  Robert Louis Stevenson
"I may not have gone where I intended to go, but I think I have ended up where I needed to be."  Douglas Adams
"When you go into court you are putting your fate into the hands of twelve people who weren't smart enough to get out of jury duty."  Norm Crosby
"If anyone has a vested interest in space solar power, it would have to be me." - Elon Musk
"We must love them both, those whose opinions we share and those whose opinions we reject, for both have labored in the search for truth, and both have helped us in finding it." - Thomas Aquinas
"You live only as long as the last person who remembers you."  Akecheta (Westworld, 2018 HBO series)
"Never push a loyal person to where they no longer care." Unkown
"People can be so quiet about their pain, that you forget they are hurting. That is why it is so important to always be kind." - Nikita Gill
"People are strange: they are constantly angered by trivial things, but on a major matter like totally wasting their lives, they hardly seem to notice."
"One believes things because one has been conditioned to believe them." - Aldous Huxley
"Just leave me alone, I know what to do." -Kimi Raikkonen, 2012 Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
"True wisdom is knowing what you don"t know" - Confucius
"A Machiavellian mind should surround itself with people who have something to lose; the more the better. It is foolish and dangerous to surround itself with people who have nothing to lose." - Ravi Silari
"Youth is a flower of which love is the fruit; happy is he who, after having watched its silent growth, is permitted to gather and call it his own."  Edmond Dants (The Count of Monte Cristo, 1844 Alexandre Dumas' novel)
"Compare yourself to who you were yesterday, not to who someone else is today." - Jordan B. Peterson, 12 Rules For Life: An Antidote To Chaos
"Seek what sets your soul on fire" - Nina Zagozdzon
"My life, my life has to be like this.It has to keep going up" -Jay Gatsby
**Nirvana** has been defined as having just enough life to enjoy being dead - Jim Holt
"Wake me up before I change again, remind me the story that I won"t go insane. Tell me why it"s always the same, explain me the reason why I"m in so much pain." -Infected Mushroom
"He who is in love with himself has at least this advantagehe won't encounter many rivals." - G. C. Lichtenberg
"The line was crossed, by choice. Love shattered, by product of selfish dishonesty. It was never clear cut, but you shine light unto with every passing day. Illuminating your imperfections as you attempt to move forward, with a plan leading you nowhere." -Usher Gii
"Of all the things that drive men to sea, the most common disaster, I've come to learn, is women." - Charles Johnson
"Good fences make good neighbors." - Robert Frost
"In this world, whenever there is light, there are also shadows. As long as the concept of winners exist, there must also be losers. The selfish desire of wanting to maintain peace causes wars and hatred is born to protect love." - Madara Uchiha
"Do you know why this is my favorite tree? Because it"s tipped over, but still growing." -Moonee, from the film The Florida Project
"Success isn't a result of spontaneous combustion. You must set yourself on fire." - Arnold H. Glasow
"Beauty is terror. Whatever we call beautiful, we quiver before it." - Donna Tartt
"Let me tell you one thing about ignorance: it ain"t picky" - my Uncle Gary
"A sane person to an insane society must appear insane."- Kurt Vonneg
"A sane person to an insane society must appear insane.- Kurt Vonneg
"Before I die, I want to be somebody"s favorite hiding place, the place they can put everything they know they need to survive, every secret, every solitude, every nervous prayer, and be absolutely certain I will keep it safe. I will keep it safe." - Andrea Gibson
"We dance round in a ring and suppose, but the secret sits in the middle and knows." - Robert Frost
"You're not going to master the rest of your life in one day. Just relax. Master the day. Then just keep doing that every day."  Unknown
"I am not what happened to me, I am what I choose to become." - Carl Jung
"A computer lets you make more mistakes faster than any other invention with the possible exceptions of handguns and Tequila" - Mitch Ratcliffe
"The phrase "action speaks louder than words," is most easily proven by a swift kick to the genitals."  Devin J. Monroe
"Nothing is more admirable than the fortitude with which millionaires tolerate the disadvantages of their wealth."  Rex Stout
"God help those who do not help themselves."  Wilson Mizner
"Good breeding consists of concealing how much we think of ourselves and how little we think of the other person."  Mark Twain
"I tried not to look at things. I tried not to think about when it was that my existence became less about the things that make up people's lives, and more about the holes that losing those things leave behind, but I wasn't doing a very good job at it."  Max Payne (Max Payne 3, 2012 videogame)
"He who is afraid to ask is ashamed of learning."
"When you have to shoot, shoot, don"t talk." Tuco-The Good, The Bad, The Ugly.
"When you stain your tongue with slander, backbiting and gossip, your spirituality goes down significantly. You may think you"re harming the other person but in actual fact, you"re harming yourself. So learn to hold your tongue because it has the power of life and death." Ismail Menk
"We can tell other people about -- having faith. What we had faith in. What we found important enough to fight for. It's not whether you were right or wrong, but how much faith you were willing to have, that decides the future."  Solid Snake (Metal Gear Solid 2: Sons of Liberty, 2001 videogame)
"We can tell other people about -- having faith. What we had faith in. What we found important enough to fight for. It's not whether you were right or wrong, but how much faith you were willing to have that decides the future."  Solid Snake (Metal Gear Solid 2: Sons of Liberty, 2001 videogame)
"Peace is its own reward."  Mahatma Gandhi
"Intelligence is almost useless to the person whose only quality it is." - Alexis Carrel
"Man cannot remake himself without suffering, for he is both the marble and the sculptor." - Alexis Carrel
"Far... but near, is the relationship between a man and a woman."
"Sometimes the only way to stop evil and increase love is through war" - Dennis Prager
"It is not the strongest of the species that survive, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." --Charles Darwin
"Research your own experience. Absorb what is useful, reject what is useless, add what is uniquely your own."--Bruce Lee
"If you"re not going thick and pumped and deep and long, boys, like what are you doing" - dickstacy
"A belief in hell and the knowledge that every ambition is doomed to frustration at the hands of a skeleton have never prevented the majority of human beings from behaving as though death were no more than an unfounded rumor." - Aldous Huxley
"Follow you Heart to the last consequences, you will suffer and die anyways..." -
"Courage is showing bravery when you're just as fearful as everybody else around you" -Dylan O'Brien
"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing" - Edmund Burke
"The more informed you are, the less arrogant and aggressive you are" - Nelson Mandela
"Simplicity is the ultimate sophistication" - Leonardo da Vinci
"I"ve never seen any life transformation that didn"t begin with the person in question finally getting tired of their own bullshit."
"The two most dangerous obstacles to personal growth and wisdom are complacency and arrogance" - /u/rdrum
"I always get to where I'm going by walking away from where I've been" -Pooh Bear
"The ultimate expression of power is self control" - Joe Duncan
"If you think you are too small to be effective, you have never been in the dark with a mosquito!" - unknown author
"Look at the sunset from the sun's point of view." - Steven Wright
"Lifeis a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing." - Shakespeare (Macbeth)
"It certainly is not your leg! That leg belongs to the U.S. government. It's no different than a gear or a bedpan. The Army has invested a lot of money to make you an airplane pilot, and you've got no right to disobey orders." --Nurse Cramer in Catch-22, by Joseph Heller
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read."
"Hope is for those who do not live in grace" -old mexican man to Fernando Sucre (Prison Break)
"Once you know your limits, You Can Begin To Break The Barriers."
"Courage is what it takes to stand up and speak; Courage is also what it takes to sit down and listen."  Winston Churchill
"We earth men have a talent for ruining big, beautiful things-Ray Bradbury
"And now here is my secret, a very simple secret; it is only with the heart that one can see rightly, what is essential is invisible to the eye." -Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"And now here is my secret, a very simple secret; it is only with the heart that one can see rightly, what is essential is invisible to the eye." - Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"The secret to life is meaningless unless you discover it yourself." - W. Somerset Maugham
"To know even one life has breathed easier because you have lived. This is to have succeeded." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"An act of love brings as result,the end of a war,or the uneasiness of a peace" (William Ventura)
"If you ever understand that your life is worthless,then you haven't understood what you're worth to others;nor have you understood the value that God placed on you" (William Ventura)
"Believe in yourself &amp; you will be unstoppable."  Unknown
"So this is how liberty dies. With thunderous applause."  George Lucas
"A cynic is not merely one who reads bitter lessons from the past, he is one who is prematurely disappointed in the future."  Sidney J. Harris
"Every crowd has a silver lining."  Phineas Taylor Barnum
"There is no kind of dishonesty into which otherwise good people more easily and frequently fall than that of defrauding the government."  Benjamin Franklin
"A person often meets his destiny on the road he took to avoid it."
"Live Each Day As If It Was Your Last" - Steve Jobs
"Our entire life - consists ultimately in accepting ourselves as we are."  Jean Anouilh
"You're not your mistakes and the fears you think." - Witt Lowry
"Humor is the evil of men said with the innocence of a child." -- Miguel Gila
"You don't know peace 'till you've had suffering."
"Nothing of me is original. I am the combined effort of everyone I"ve ever known" Chuck Palahniuk
"If you reveal your secrets to the wind, you should not blame the wind for revealing them to the trees." -Khalil Gibran
"If you reveal your secrets to the wind, you should not blame the wind for revealing them to the trees." - Khalil Gibran
"Trust him not with your secrets, who, when left alone in your room, turns over your papers." - Johann Kaspar Lavater
"I am a damned sight smarter man than [Ulysses S] Grant. I know more about military history, strategy, and grand tactics than he does ... I'll tell you where he beats me though and where he beats the world. He doesn't give a damn about what the enemy does out of his sight" - William T Sherman
"Nobody, knowing that he is steeped in moral sewage from head to toe, should rave and rage at the filth on his neighbor"s shoe."--Anthony Esolen:
"What is done cannot be undone, but one can prevent it happening again"-Anne Frank
"If the women don't find you handsome, they should at least find you handy.". - Red Green
"If you have good thoughts, they will shine out of your face like sunbeams and you will always look lovely." -Roald Dahl
[Discussion point] For a sub which has at it's core thought provoking observations, this place doesnt foster nearly enough comments, this seems backward and antithetical to the whole idea of social media.
"Music is the wine that fills the cup of silence"- Robert Fripp
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Nothing makes us so lonely as our secrets." - Paul Tournier
"Take risks and follow your heart so you won"t be disappointed when your life flashes before your eyes and it"s too late." -Me but pretty sure it was influenced by Prince EA
"The secret to my success is that I bit off more than I could chew and I chewed as fast as I could." - Paul Hogan
"I think the secret to a happy life is a selective memory. Remember what you are most grateful for and quickly forget what your're not." - Richard Paul Evans
"Our culture has accepted two huge lies. The first is that if you disagree with someone"s lifestyle, you must fear or hate them. The second is that to love someone means you agree with everything they believe, say, or do.
"The biggest challenge after success is shutting up about it." - Criss Jami
"You shouldn"t judge someone just because they don"t conform to society"s standards of sexual normalcy." - Kazuma Kiryu
"There"s more to life than sex and being a virgin does not detract from your masculinity and capabilities."
"Porn is the only thing jews give away for free. That should raise a huge fucking red flag." -u/Diarrhea_Van_Frank
"The crows not only settle for taking your eyes out,but before take them out,they tell you that you have beautiful eyes" (William Ventura)
"You don't have to see the whole staircase, just take the first step."  Martin Luther King
"Only those who will risk going too far can possibly find out how far one can go." - T.S. Eliot
"The genius of Einstein leads to Hiroshima." - Pablo Picasso
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas A. Edison
"If the terrorists hated freedom, the Netherlands would be fucking dust." -- David Cross
"A liar is sooner caught than a cripple." -- Spanish proverb
"No foreign policy-no matter how ingenious-has any chance of success if it is born in the minds of few and carried in the hearts of many."  Theodore Roosevelt
"I hope life isn't a big joke, because I don't get it."  Jack Handey
"I hate life, I hate death and everything in between just doesn't interest me."  Chris Rapier
"Akula kotorya ne plavayet, tonet" - Arrow
""When injustice becomes law, resistance becomes duty""Thomas Jefferson
"I tremble for my country when I reflect that God is just." - Thomas Jefferson
"Without wearing any mask we are conscious of, we have a special face for each friend."  Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr.
"If future generations are to remember us with gratitude rather than contempt, we must leave them more than the miracles of technology. We must leave them a glimpse of the world as it was in the beginning, not just after we got through with it." - Lyndon B. Johnson
"I knew that if I failed I wouldn't regret that, but I knew the one thing I might regret is not trying." --Jeff Bezos
"The smartest people who have ever lived never needed to tell people about their intelligence." -- Unknown
"I've memorized all the answers from Trivial Pursuit." Dominic O'Brien.
"The first step in compassion is to notice the other"s need. It all begins with the simple act of attention."-Daniel Goleman
"The first step in compassion is to notice the other"s need. It all begins with the simple act of attention."-Daniel Goleman
"The first step in compassion is to notice the other"s need. It all begins with the simple act of attention."- Daniel Goleman
"The easy confidence with which I know another man"s religion is folly teaches me to suspect that my own is also." -Mark Twain
"All nature is but Art, unknown to thee; All Chance, Direction, which thou canst not see; All Discord, Harmony, not understood; All partial Evil, universal Good" Alexander Pope
"Between stimulus and response there is a space. In that space is our power to choose our response. In our response lies our growth and our freedom." -Viktor E. Frankl
'Fascism is the stage reached after communism has proved an illusion.'
"If you're dumb, surround yourself with smart people. If you're smart, surround yourself with smart people who disagree with you." - Aaron Sorkin
"They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety." - Benjamin Franklin
"In heartbreak, it is an odd cruelty that silence hurts us more than any words." -Unknown
"In a relationship with women, I prefer a short craziness rather than lifelong foolishness." Unknown Actor
"We realized that the version of the world they rendered for us was not the world they really believed in..." - Jeffrey Eugenides
"Everyone is a moon and has a dark side which he never shows to anybody." -- Mark Twain
"Religion is the result of investing a great deal of intelligence into ignorance. It arises when the people's need for illusion runs deep." - Trevor Goodchild, villain of Aeon Flux
"When a friend is in trouble, don't annoy him by asking if there is anything you can do. Think up something appropriate and do it." - E. W. Howe
"The way out of trouble is never as simple as the way in." - E. W. Howe
"When life puts you in tough situations, don't say 'why me' say 'try me.'"  Unknown
50 Amazing Quotes to Live By - Famous Quotes Daily
"Have patience. All things are difficult before they become easy." - Saadi
"The secret of success without hard work is still a secret" - author unknown
"I was not a child prodigy, because a child prodigy is a child who knows as much when it is a child as it does when it grows up."  Will Rogers
"Not even computers will replace committees, because committees buy computers."  Edward Shepherd Mead
"When you"re dumb enough for long enough, you"re gonna meet someone too smart to love you, and they"re gonna love you anyway, and its gonna go so poorly."  Ballad of the Bruised Lung, Neil Hilborn
"If you spend too much time thinking about a thing, you"ll never get it done. Make at least one definite move daily toward your goal." - Bruce Lee
"It is not how old you are, but how you are old."  Jules Renard
"The greatest thing in the world is for a man to be able to do something well, and say nothing about it." - E. W. Howe
"If you don't learn to laugh at troubles, you won't have anything to laugh at when you grow old." - E. W. Howe
"You're tryin' to be different, that makes you not different" Witt Lowry
"You have your way. I have my way. As for the right way, the correct way, and the only way, it does not exist." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"We waste our whole life preparing for the future; not realizing that the only way to be happy is to embrace each moment." - Kyle D. Jones
"Becoming a refugee is never their first choice" - Malala Yousafzai
"The right man in the wrong place can make all the difference in the world" - Half-life 2
"Don"t look back, you"re not going that way"...Anon
"In order terminate a pregnancy, you have to still a heartbeat, switch off a developing brain, and, whatever the method, break some bones and rupture some organs." - Christopher Hitchens
"IT" will fuck you up and weave a nest for a clutch of mad scrabblings"...Description of Stephen King"s, "IT", over on r/books...credit to u/Valkiras
"No man chooses evil because it is evil; he only mistakes it for happiness, the good he seeks." - Mary Shelley
"No man chooses evil because it is evil; he only mistakes it for happiness, the good he seeks." - Mary Shelley
" 'Tomorrow will be a good day' is an excellent lie to tell yourself because just like that it might just become true." -Unknown
"Ordinarily he was insane, but he had lucid moments when he was merely stupid." -Heinrich Heine
"Don't let the fear of losing be greater than the excitement of winning" [Robert Kiyosaki]
"Of how many a man may it not be said that hope made a fool of him until he danced into the arms of death!" - Arthur Schopenhauer, Studies in Pessimism
"Man is often lost in a technological, physiological, astrological lack of logical existence that can best be described as a whole lot of nothing lightly dashed with an obvious hint of Scotch."
"Most people put off till tomorrow that which they should have done yesterday." - E. W. Howe
"A man forgets his good luck next day, but remembers his bad luck until next year." - E. W. Howe
"When the heroes go off the stage, the clowns come on." -- Heinrich Heine
"Experience is a good school. But the fees are high." -- Heinrich Heine
"We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence then, is not an act, but a habit." -Aristotle
"You must not forget that a monster is only a variation, and to a monster the norm is monstrous." - John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"If this was quoted from a famous person, it would have way more upvotes" - a typical person
"Having money is not everything, not having it is" - Kanye West
"Scared? Good. We don't grow when we stay inside our comfort zone."  Unknown
"Want of foresight, unwillingness to act when action would be simple and effective, lack of clear thinking, confusion of counsel until the emergency comes, until self-preservation strikes its jarring gong  these are the features which constitute the endless repetition of history."
"We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light."
"If nobody spoke unless he had something to say, the human race would very soon lose the use of speech."  W. Somerset Maugham
"There are only two kinds of scholars; those who love ideas and those who hate them."  Emile Chartier
"If all the rich people in the world divided up their money among themselves there wouldn't be enough to go around."  Christina Stead
"Until you make the unconscious conscious, it will direct your life and you will call it fate." -Carl Jung
"Don't think, just do."  Horace
"You don"t have to burn books to destroy a culture, you just have to get people to stop reading them."
"You might not remember why an octant is important but you'll remember the fat man who stood on the desk to explain it." - my high school algebra teacher, Mr. Kinsler
"Beauty of whatever kind, in it's supreme development, invariably excites the sensitive soul to tears" Edgar Allan Poe
"The world is a tragedy to those who feel, but a comedy to those who think." - Horace Walpole
"Don't worry about failures, worry about the chances you miss when you don't even try." --Jack Canfield
"It is necessary to meditate early, and often, on the art of dying to succeed later in doing it properly just once." - Umberto Eco
"What is life if not the shadow of a fleeting dream?" - Umberto Eco
"Every great thinker is someone else's moron." - Umberto Eco
"Be fearless in trying new things, whether they are physical, mental, or emotional, since being afraid can challenge you to go to the next level." Rita Wilson
"Knowing others is wisdom. Knowing yourself is enlightenment." Lao Tzu
"The thing about happiness is that you only know you had it when it's gone. I mean, you may think to yourself that you're happy. But you don't really believe it. You focus on the petty bullshit, or the next job, or whatever." (continued below)
"The thing about happiness is that you only know you had it when it's gone. I mean, you may think to yourself that you're happy. But you don't really believe it. You focus on the petty bullshit, or the next job, or whatever." (Continued in comments)
"What a world this would be if we all had hearts like dogs"
"Opportunities don't happen. You create them." -- Chris Grosser
"A time is coming when men will go mad, and when they see someone who is not mad, they will attack him, saying, "You are mad; you are not like us."" -St. Anthony the Great (4th Century)
"A genius is one who is most like himself" Thelonious Monk
"You will enrich your life immeasurably if you approach it with a sense of wonder and discovery, and always challenge yourself to try new things." Nate Berkus
"You are confined only by the walls you build yourself." - unknown
"Sometimes you're flush and sometimes you're bust, and when you're up, it's never as good as it seems, and when you're down, you never think you'll be up again, but life goes on."
"I have the absolute confidence not to be number two, but then I have enough sense also to realize that there can be no number one." -Bruce Lee
"Only I can change my life. No one can do it for me." - Carol Burnett
"Don't dare judge me now, you already did back then. If you judged different I could've had friends." Ill Bill, 'Anatomy of a School Shooting'
6 Movie quotes, regardless of whether you like the movie or not. (If I am publishing this post in an incorrect subreddit, it is communicated to me and will be deleted.)
"The fascination of shooting as a sport depends almost wholly on whether you are at the right or wrong end of the gun."  P. G. Wodehouse
"Nothing ever goes away."  Barry Commoner
"Howard Hughes was able to afford the luxury of madness, like a man who not only thinks he is Napoleon but hires an army to prove it."  Ted Morgan
"The case has, in some respects, been not entirely devoid of interest."  Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
"Land got stolen throughout history. That's how it works" - guy at confrontation.
"Whatever you think, be sure it is what you think; whatever you want, be sure that is what you want; whatever you feel, be sure that is what you feel." -T. S. Eliot
"I don't believe in God now. I can still work up an envy for someone who has a faith. I can see how that could be a deeply soothing experience." - Jack Nicholson (Wikipedia).
"When music fails to agree to the ear, to soothe the ear and the heart and the senses, then it has missed the point." - Maria Callas
"... the digital experience scrambles how we make sense of the real world. Technology may have liberated us from the old gatekeepers, but it also ... brought the incessant nightmare of high school-clique drama to every human endeavor. It also skewed our experience of daily reality. ..."
"Promises are like pie crusts, made to be broken." -- Vladimir Lenin
"Never think that war, no matter how necessary, nor how justified, is not a crime." -- Ernest Hemmingway
"It's better to be a lion for a day than a sheep all your life."  Elizabeth Kenny
"If a nation loses its storytellers, it loses its childhood." - Peter Handke
"We are all apprentices in a craft where no one ever becomes a master." - Ernest Hemingway
"Not a wasted word. This has been a main point to my literary thinking all my life." Hunter S. Thompson
"If you can tell stories, create characters, devise incidents, and have sincerity and passion, it doesn"t matter a damn how you write".  Somerset Maugham
"If you don"t read the newspaper, you"re uniformed. If you read the newspaper you"re misinformed." -Denzel Washington
"The squeaky wheel does not always get the oil; sometimes it is noticed, and the wheel gets replaced outright." - Ravi Silari
"In any case, to wear an improper expression on your face (to look incredulous when a victory was announced, for example) was itself a punishable offence. There was even a word for it in Newspeak: FACECRIME, it was called." - 1984, George Orwell
"Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars." - Khalil Gibran
"When suffering knocks at your door and you say there is no seat for him, he tells you not to worry because he has brought his own stool." -Chinua Achebe
"When suffering knocks at your door and you say there is no seat for him, he tells you not to worry because he has brought his own stool." - Chinua Achebe
"Comparison is the thief of joy" - Theodore Roosevelt
"Life is just a big bowl of fancy assorted cashews" - Patrick Star
"We are not enemies, but friends. We must not be enemies. Though passion may have strained, it must not break our bonds of affection. The mystic chords of memory will swell when again touched, as surely they will be, by the better angels of our nature." -Abraham Lincoln
"People who have tried it, tell me that a clear conscience makes you very happy and contented; but a full stomach does the business quite as well, and is cheaper, and more easily obtained." - Jerome K. Jerome
"To live your greatest life, you must first become a leader within yourself. Take charge of your life, begin attracting and manifesting all that you desire in life." Sonia Ricotti
'chopping up my evil clone. maybe some day that'll feel weird' - ash williams from ash vs the evil dead
"In spite of the cost of living, it's still popular." - Kathleen Norris
"No one is actually dead until the ripples they cause in the world die away." -Terry Pratchett
"When you visualize, then you materialize. If you"ve been there in the mind, you"ll go there in the body." Dr Denis Waitley
"Before you judge a man, walk a mile in his shoes. After that who cares?... He's a mile away and you've got his shoes!" - Billy Connolly
"Before you judge a man, walk a mile in his shoes. After that who cares?... He's a mile away and you've got his shoes!" - Billy Connolly
"Thoughts become things. If you see it in your mind, you will hold it in your hand." Bob Proctor
"Life is easy." - Nobody
"If you're gonna have a flaw, might as well have fun with it." - Unknown
"Scarcity doesn't go away, it just changes." - Unknown
"It is possible that humans do not become better by getting better, but it is given that they become worse by preventing others in getting better" - Villy Srensen
"Success will come to you for variety of reasons. May be because you are lucky, you have good connections, or you are particularly clever. Out of all these variables, the only variable you can change is how hard you work" - Jason Nazar
"You"re mistakes do not define you"
"Different doesn"t mean wrong"
"Be the weirdo who dares to enjoy." - Elizabeth Gilbert
"What is mind? No matter. What is matter? Never mind." -Homer Simpson
"The difference between ordinary and extraordinary is that little extra" - Unknown
"Learning to ignore things is one of the great paths to inner peace" - Robert j. Sawyer
"Stay true to what you believe in" - Hacksaw Ridge
"Perhaps if you know you are insane then you are not insane. Or you are becoming sane, finally. Waking up." - Philip K. Dick,
"An expert is a man who has made all the mistakes which can be made in a very narrow field." - Niels Bohr
"I am unable to describe exactly what is the matter with me; now and then there are horrible fits of anxiety, apparently without cause, or otherwise a feeling of emptiness and fatigue in the head." - Vincent van Gogh
"An inability to be guided by a "healthy fear" of bad consequences is a disastrous flaw." - Daniel Kahneman
"You are neither right nor wrong because people agree or disagree with you." - Benjamin Graham
"A smile is the chosen vehicle for all ambiguities." - Herman Melville
"They say seeing is believing, but I'd never swear to it." - Neil Jordan's The Company of Wolves
"One lower level employee can do more harm to a company than any CEO could do good."
"You will never find an atheist in a fox hole"
"What you manifest is before you"-the art of racing in the rain
"Don"t walk in front of me I may not follow Don"t walk behind me I may not lead Walk beside me just be my friend" - Albert Camus
"Do you know what's the greatest lie in the human history? That power can be inocent" - Lex Luthor in Dawn of Justice( 2016)
"...to wear an improper expression on your face (to look incredulous when a victory was announced, for example) was itself a punishable offense. There was even a word for it in Newspeak: face crime, it was called."
"Do something today that your future self will thank you for."  Unknown
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"It is said that it is better to have loved then lost, than never to have never loved at all. I feel... differently. Regret can consume a man so deeply, that it will blacken his heart and swallow his soul." - Nikolai Belinski, CoD Zombies
"What we think, or what we know, or what we believe is, in the end, of little consequence. The only consequence is what we do."  John Ruskin
"After all, all he did was string together a lot of old, well-known quotations."  H. L. Mencken
"Reading this book is like waiting for the first shoe to drop."  Ralph Novak
"Classical music is the kind we keep thinking will turn into a tune."  Kin Hubbard
"If you don't give people the chance to change then in your own eyes, they will never change."
"First things first, know your priorities, do it one by one and step by step. " -Me
"The value of life is taught through the loss of it, yet having lost many we still lose sight of its true value"  Anonymous
"Life is easy." - Nobody
"To Grow in Life, Be Willing to Suffer"- David Goggins
"I'm a killer when I'm paralyzed, Wake me up I'm terrified, Only seem to terrorize, Can't wake up I'm scared to die" - 'Phobetor' by iamJakeHill
"...The marvellous was perhaps incommunicable: the moon of Bengal is not the same as the moon of Yemen, but it deigns to be described with the same words." - Jorge Luis Borges (Averroes' Search)
"Our intelligence is imperfect, surely, and newly arisen; the ease with which it can be sweet-talked, overwhelmed, or subverted by other hardwired propensities -- sometimes themselves disguised as the cool light of reason -- is worrisome." Carl Sagan and Ann Druyan, 1992
"Cole me on the panny sty"
"Airports see more sincere kisses than wedding halls. The walls of hospitals have heard more prayers than the walls of churches."
"And that's the way it is."  Walter Cronkite
"This is ten percent luck Twenty percent skill Fifteen percent concentrated power of will Five percent pleasure Fifty percent pain And a hundred percent reason to remember the name" -from 'Remember the name' by Fort Minor
"If there's no point in living then there's no point in suicide either"
"As long as we desire, we can do without happiness: we expect to achieve it. If happiness fails to come, hope persists, and the charm of illusion lasts as long as the passion that causes it....
"The great masses of the people... will more easily fall victims to a big lie than to a small one." - Adolf Hitler
"I never lose. I either win or I learn" - Nelson Mandela
"The last 10 percent it takes to launch something takes as much energy as the first 90 percent." --Rob Kalin
"You can be a lot of things in this life but by far the best things you can be is yourself" - unknown
"Storms Make Trees Grow Deeper Roots". - Dolly Parton
"If a 'religion' is defined to be a system of ideas that contains unprovable statements, then Gdel taught us that mathematics is not only a religion, it is the only religion that can prove itself to be one." - John D. Barrow
"Everybody can be great, because everybody can serve." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"It does not really matter what we expect from life, but what life expects from us. We have to stop asking about the meaning of life, and instead think to ourselves as those who are being questioned by life-daily and hourly." -Viktor E. Frankl
"Between stimulus &amp; response, there is a space. In that space is our power to choose our response." - Viktor Frankl
"Politics will help you understand the world until you don't understand it anymore." - Heather Morris, The Tattooist of Auschwitz.
"My choice isn't what I breathe in, it's what I exhale... And right now, in this moment, I feel a need for all of us to breathe fire." - Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." -- Herman Melville
"No human race is superior; no religious faith is inferior. All collective judgments are wrong. Only racist make them." - Elie Wiesel
"Outliving beauty"s outward with a mind that cloth renew swifter than blood decays" - William Shakespeare
"Write Drunk, Edit Sober" - Peter De Vries
"Things need not have happened to be true. Tales and dreams are the shadow-truths that will endure when mere facts are dust and ashes, and forgot." - Morpheus
"A secret remains a secret until you make someone promise never to reveal it." - Fausto Cercignani
"Good judgement comes from experience and...experience comes from bad judgement." - Anonymous
"The question is not what you look at, but what you see."- Henry David Thoreau
"I didn't murder anybody, Sheriff. They died from terminal stupidity."  Frank Castle (Marvel's The Punisher, 2019 series)
"You attract the right things when you have a sense of who you are" - Amy Poehler
"WHAT CAN THE HARVEST HOPE FOR, IF NOT FOR THE CARE OF THE REAPER MAN?" - Terry Pratchett
&lt;&lt;I wanted to fathom her secrets; I wanted her to come to me and say: "I love you,"[...]&gt;&gt;- "The Gambler", Fyodor Dostoevskij.
"Some scientists claim that hydrogen, because it is so plentiful, is the basic building block of the universe. I dispute that. I say there is more stupidity than hydrogen, and that is the basic building block of the universe." - Frank Zappa
"Most of us prefer to surround ourselves with opinions that validate what we already believe. You notice the people who you think are smart, are the people who agree with you. Funny how that works." - Barack Obama
"Sometimes you miss the memories, not the person"
"Wise men, when in doubt whether to speak or to keep quiet, give themselves the benefit of the doubt, and remain silent." - Napoleon Hill
"Tension is who you think you should be. Relaxation is who you are."  Chinese Proverb
"I loved the words you wrote to me, but that was bloody yesterday. I can't survive on what you send every time you need a friend." W. Bragg.
"Feelings are just visitors let them come and go" - Mooji
"Life isn"t about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself" George Bernard Shaw
"To know objects only through dissecting and cataloguing them is to miss their full reality. It is to fall asleep amidst the mystery and to become numb to the wonder of this great Earth." - John Daido Loori
"You are free, and that is why you are lost". -Franz Kafka
"You are free, and that is why you are lost". -Franz Kafka
"I felt like anything rather than rejoicing at the downfall of a foe who had fought so long and valiantly, and had suffered so much for a cause" - Ulysses S. Grant after the Confederate surrender
. "The most important thing is to enjoy your lifeto be happy it"s all that matters. Audrey Hepburn
"I do not, therefore, say that the word "progress" is unmeaning; I say it is unmeaning without the previous definition of a moral doctrine, and that it can only be applied to groups of persons who hold that doctrine in common." - G.K. Chesterton
"Listen one hundred times. Ponder one thousand times. Speak once." - attributed to a Turkish proverb
"A smart man makes a mistake, learns from it, and never makes that mistake again.But a wise man finds a smart man and learns from him how to avoid the mistake altogether." -Roy H. Williams
"A smart man makes a mistake, learns from it, and never makes that mistake again.But a wise man finds a smart man and learns from him how to avoid the mistake altogether." - Roy H. Williams
"My dear, how can I make you perceive that there is no danger where there is nothing but love and understanding?" - Shirley Jackson
"Fear is the relinquishment of logic, the willing relinquishment of reasonable patterns. But so, it seems, is love. Love is the relinquishment of logic. The willing relinquishment of patterns. We yield to it or we fight it. But we cannot meet it halfway." - The Haunting of Hill House
"Fear is the relinquishment of logic, the willing relinquishment of reasonable patterns. But so, it seems, is love. Love is the relinquishment of logic. The willing relinquishment of patterns. We yield to it or we fight it. But we cannot meet it halfway." - Haunting of Hill House
"A child becomes an adult when he realizes that he has a right not only to be right but also to be wrong." - Thomas Szasz
"Tradition is the passing on of the fire and not the worshipping of the ash." Jean Jaurs (Disputed origins)
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop."  Unknown
"All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"When you stand alone and sell yourself, you can"t please everyone. But when you"re different you can last"  Don Rickles
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." Charles Darwin
"Ann Coulter isn't interested in re-opening the government. She wants clicks and eyeballs." - Charlie Dent
"At some point you"ll realize trying to be excepted by people is a pointless waste of time. You"ll look back at the years spent trying to make them happy, when you could have been making you happy. The sooner you except yourself, the sooner you"ll find your closest friends."
"I didn't murder anybody, Sheriff. They died from terminal stupidity."  Frank Castle (Marvel's The Punisher, 2019 series)
"At some point you"ll realize trying to be excepted by people is a pointless waste of time. You"ll look back at the years spent trying to make them happy, when you could have been making you happy. The sooner you except yourself, the sooner you"ll find closest friends."
"How is it possible to find meaning in a finite world, given my waist and shirt size?"  Woody Allen
"He who asks is a fool for five minutes, but he who does not ask remains a fool forever."  Chinese Proverb
"Our scientific power has outrun our spiritual power. We have guided missiles and misguided men."  Martin Luther King Jr.
"One of the first duties of the physician is to educate the masses not to take medicine."  Sir William Osler
"A man who has something to die for, lives like a hero. But a man with nothing to live for, dies like a demon."
"Gas, grass, or ass. Nobody rides for free." - Ed Kemper, "Mindhunter"
"The thief believes everyone is of his condition" - Spanish proverb
"See: life is a never-ending upward spiral. And if you think at any point you"re allowed to stop climbing, I"m afraid you"re missing the point. Because the joy is in the climb itself." - Mark Manson
"We are not makers of history. We are made by history."  Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Of all the things that can boost emotions, motivation, and perceptions during a workday, the single most important is making progress in meaningful work." - Teresa Amabile
"Communism forgets that life is individual. Capitalism forgets that life is social, and the kingdom of brotherhood is found neither in the thesis of communism nor the antithesis of capitalism but in a higher synthesis. It is found in a higher synthesis that combines the truths of both." -MLK
"I see now that the circumstances of one's birth are irrelevant. It is what you do with the gift of life that determines who you are." - Mewtwo (Takeshi Shudo)
"Don't educate your children to be rich. Educate them to be happy, so they know the value of things, not the price." - Victor Hugo
"Be a pussy, or get pussy, it's up to you." - Sebastian B.
"Never saw off the branch you are on, unless you are being hanged from it." -Stanislaw Jerzy Lec
"Never saw off the branch you are on, unless you are being hanged from it." - Stanislaw Jerzy Lec
"The stupid neither forgive nor forget; the naive forgive and forget; the wise forgive but do not forget." - Thomas Szasz
"I have no fear of death, but withering repulses me. A man should disappear discreetly, without inconveniencing anyone. A slow death is a curse. If I knew how to pray, I would pray for a quick death." - Aharon Appelfeld
"You"re only here for a short visit. Don"t hurry, don't worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way." Walter Hagen
" Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." Oscar Wilde
"Be happy for this moment. This moment is your life" - Omar Khayyam
"If you miss the moment, you miss your life." - John Daido Loori
"Don't educate your children to be rich. Educate them to be happy, so they know the value of things, not the price." - Victor Hugo
"Stop saying 'post-truth'. What you mean is 'post-intellectual honesty'. The truth is still there and we can still find it even if it takes a couple extra steps." - Georg Carlinski
"In the end, we will not remember the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." MLK
"You're going to go through tough times - that's life. But I say, 'Nothing happens to you, it happens for you.' See the positive in negative events." - Joel Osteen
"Lighten up, just enjoy life, smile more, laugh more, and don't get so worked up about things" - Kenneth Branagh
"The internet is the first thing that humanity has built that humanity doesn't understand, the largest experiment in anarchy that we have ever had." - Eric Schmidt
"When you can"t find the sunshine, be the sunshine"
"People only ask questions when they"re ready to hear the answers. "
"If you cannot find the truth right where you are, where else do you expect to find it?" - Dogen
"Only you and nobody else has the power to choose who enters in your life,and in the same way,the power to remove them" (William Ventura)
"Life is a journey , with problems to solve , lessons to learn , but most of all, experiences to enjoy "
"Remove 'shoulds' from your vocabulary this year. Start your journey of self-love now."  Kelly Martin
"My theory is that all of Scottish cuisine is based on a dare."  Mike Myers
"My theory is that if you look confident you can pull off anything - even if you have no clue what you're doing."  Jessica Alba
"My pessimism extends to the point of even suspecting the sincerity of the pessimists."  Jean Rostand
"The world tolerates conceit from those who are successful, but not from anybody else."  John Blake
"If Donald Trump is not a Russian intelligence and political asset, how can you tell the difference? - Rick Wilson, author of NYT #1 bestseller 'Everything Trump Touches Dies'
"I can forgive ,but I cannot forget." is only another way of saying "I will not forgive." Forgiveness ought to be like a cancelled note torn in two and burned up, so that it never can be shown against one.Henry Ward Beecher
"There are times when being strong is the only option." -Adam Scythe
"Failure is success if we learn from it."  Malcolm Forbes
"If you don"t find a way to make money while you sleep, you will work until you die."  Warren Buffett
"Do not be dismayed by the brokenness of the world. All things break. And all things can be mended. Not with time, as they say, but with intention. So go. Love intentionally, extravagantly, unconditionally. The broken world waits in darkness for the light that is you." - L.R. Knost
"It's not our job to toughen our children up to face a cruel and heartless world. It's our job to raise children who will make the world a little less cruel and heartless." - L.R. Knost,
"He cares about you, thats for certain. Hes not like most people, he doesn't want to feel for you, because he is scared of getting hurt. He'd rather stay mad at the world than risk being a part of it." -Curtis Hoyle
"Nobody knows what Frank is doing except Frank. And he doesn't give a damn what anybody else thinks." -Curtis Hoyle
"Luck is a dividend of sweat. The more you sweat, the luckier you get." --Ray Kroc
"Blood doesn't make brothers closer than that." -Curtis Hoyle
"The future doesn't exist. It hasn't happened yet. The past doesn't exist. It has already happened." -John Daido Loori
"The future doesn't exist. It hasn't happened yet. The past doesn't exist. It has already happened." - John Daido Loori
"There are times when the mind is dealt such a blow it hides itself in insanity. While this may not seem beneficial, it is. There are times when reality is nothing but pain, and to escape that pain the mind must leave reality behind." - Patrick Rothfuss
"To know objects only through dissecting and cataloguing them is to miss their full reality. It is to fall asleep amidst the mystery and to become numb to the wonder of this great Earth." - John Daido Loori
"No government in the world fights fascism to the death. When the bourgeoisie sees power slipping from its grasp, it has recourse to fascism to maintain itself." - Buenaventura Durruti
" You are depressed because you should be. You are entitled to your depression...." -Walker Percy
"If you want to make God laugh, show him your plans." - Pete Castiglione
"You understand but you do not love God." "No." "You do not love Him at all?" he asked. "I am afraid of Him in the night sometimes." -Hemingway
"If I were running The View I'd fire Rosie. I'd look her right in that fat ugly face of hers. I'd say 'Rosie, you're fired.'" - Donald Trump
"If I were running The View I'd fire Rosie. I'd look right at her fat ugly face and say 'Rosie, you're fired.'" - Donald Trump
"How much more grievous are the consequences of anger than the causes of it." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"Find somebody that"s undeserving of your compassion, and give it to them, because I guarantee you that they"re the ones that need it the most." -Christian Picciolini
"When you're born you get a ticket to the freak show. When you're born in America, you get a front row seat." - George Carlin
"It's a luxury to pursue what makes you happy -- it's a moral obligation to pursue what you find meaningful." -JP
"It is very hard to live with silence. The real silence is death and this is terrible. To approach this silence, it is necessary to journey to the desert. You do not go to the desert to find identity, but to lose it, to lose your personality, to be anonymous." - Edmond Jabes (continued below)
"A humble person doesn't fear to kneel or ask for forgiveness;but the arrogant one remains firm in his arrogance" (William Ventura)
"Don't complain. Just work harder."  Unknown
"Life always offers us a second chance ... it is called tomorrow"
"Every person takes the limits of their own field of vision for the limits of the world."  Arthur Schopenhauer
"A good many young writers make the mistake of enclosing a stamped, self-addressed envelope, big enough for the manuscript to come back in. This is too much of a temptation to the editor."  Ring Lardner
"Some editors are failed writers, but so are most writers."  T. S. Eliot
"Censorship, like charity, should begin at home; but, unlike charity, it should end there."  Clare Booth Luce

"The internet is the first thing that humanity has built that himanity doesn't understabd." - Eric Schmidt
"One Zen master said, The whole universe is my true personality. This is a very wonderful saying... If you want to see what you truly are, open the window, and everything you see is in fact the expression of your inner reality. Can you embrace all of it?" - Adyashanti
"A certain amount of opposition is a great help to a man. Kites rise against, not with, the wind."  Lewis Mumford
"The Greater the Darkness, the Greater the Possibility for Light." -unknown
"Why should we worry about what others think of us, do we have more confidence in their opinions than we do our own?"  Brigham Young
"There is no reason why because it is dark you should look at things differently from when it is light." - Ernest Hemingway, The Sun Also Rises
"Some men are always on top of their game. I am mostly always confused." - Charles Bukowski, "Love Is a Dog from Hell"
"...You who handle poverty badly will handle riches equally badly... money does not change the sickness, only the symptoms." - John Steinbeck, The Winter of Our Discontent
"Bacon makes the world go "round"
"The problem with internet quotes is that you can"t always depend on their accuracy." - Abraham Lincoln
"If we lived forever, maybe we'd have time to understand things... But as it is, I think the best we can do is try to open our eyes. And appreciate how strange and brief all of this is..." - Edith Finch
"The victim of mind-manipulation does not know that he is a victim. To him, the walls of his prison are invisible, and he believes himself to be free." - Aldous Huxley
"Life is an echo. What you send out comes back. What you see in others exists in you." - Zig Ziglar
"A friend is someone who gives you total freedom to be yourself" - Jim Morrison
"Train up a child in the way he should go  but be sure you go that way yourself." - C.H. Spurgeon
"Turning the leaf over until it crumbles" - LayEmDown315
"Old age is making me rather cranky." - Cicero
13 Amazing Quotes About Successful Life
"People think they are so smart than when academics are arguing about the solution to a problem, people argues about if there is a problem"
"If they are doing it and they are enjoying their day why you're stopped?! why cuz you are a failure? you're an introvert? NO!, you're the best, don't be shy to do anything, all you need to do is believe in your self, don't be trapped inside your own body, you will find yourself." - khulaid jamal
"Life is sacred? Who said so, God? Hey, if you read history you'll realize that God is one of the leading causes of death...has been for thousands of years. Hindus, Muslims, Christians, Jews, all taking turns killing each other because God told them it was a good idea." - George Carlin
"Anyone who tells you he has some way of leading you to spiritual enlightenment is like somebody who picks your pocket and sells you your own watch..." -Alan Watts
"Success will come to you for variety of reasons. May be because you are lucky, you have good connections, or you particularly clever. Out of all these variables, the only variable you can change is how hard you work" - Jason Nazar
"Everyone has a plan until they get punched in the face" - Mike Tyson
"You will lose everything." - Dark Souls II
"There are so many people out there who will tell you you can't. What you've got to do is turn around and say 'watch me.'"  Unknown
"The invisible and the non-existent look very much alike." - Delos McKown
"You will continue to suffer if you have an emotional reaction to everything that is said to you. True power is sitting back and observing things with logic. True power is restraint. If words control you that means everyone else can control you. Breathe and allow things to pass."
"Don't let someone who has done nothing tell you how to do anything"
"School is learning things you don't want to know, surrounded by people you wish you didn't know, while working toward a future you don't know will ever come."  Dave Kellett
"The statistics on sanity are that one out of every four Americans is suffering from some form of mental illness. Think of your three best friends. If they're okay, then it's you."  Rita Mae Brown
"This paperback is very interesting, but I find it will never replace a hardcover book - it makes a very poor doorstop."  Alfred Hitchcock
"He who hesitates is not only lost, but miles from the next exit."  Unknown
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther
"The love of one's country is a splendid thing. But why should love stop at the border? There is a brotherhood among all men. This must be recognized if life is to remain. We must learn the love of man." - Pablo Casals
"The most beautiful people we have known are those who have known defeat, known suffering, known struggle, known loss, and have found their way out of those depths." -Elisabeth Kubler-Ross
"The most beautiful people we have known are those who have known defeat, known suffering, known struggle, known loss, and have found their way out of those depths." - Elisabeth Kubler-Ross
"The truth is you don"t know what is going to happen tomorrow. Life is a crazy ride, and nothing is guaranteed." Eminem
"One good reason to only maintain a small circle of friends is that three out of four murders are committed by people who know the victim." -George Carlin
"One good reason to only maintain a small circle of friends is that three out of four murders are committed by people who know the victim." - George Carlin
"Hate is baggage. Life's too short to be pissed off all the time. It's just not worth it." - Danny Vinyard, American History X
"I hold it to be the inalienable right of anybody to go to hell in his own way." - Robert Frost
"If you try to fail, and succeed, which have you done?" - George Carlin
"Better to do something imperfectly than to do nothing flawlessly." - Robert H. Schuller
"I"ll love you with all the madness in my soul." -Bruce Springsteen
"Always bear in mind that your own resolution to succeed is more important than any other one thing." --Abraham Lincoln
"The more you try to avoid suffering, the more you suffer, because smaller and more insignificant things begin to torture you, in proportion to your fear of being hurt. The one who does most to avoid suffering is, in the end, the one who suffers most." - Thomas Merton
"We need to be clear that there is no such thing as giving up one's privilege to be 'outside' the system. One is always in the system."
"The most important step a man can take. It's not the first one, is it? It's the next one. Always the next step, Dalinar." - Brandon Sanderson, Oathbringer
"I forget who it was that recommended men for their soul"s good to do each day two things they disliked: it was a wise man, and it is a precept that I have followed scrupulously; for every day I have got up and I have gone to bed." - W. Somerset Maugham
"Being alone really make you realize all you got is yourself" - xxxtenctation
"Difficulties strengthen the mind, as labor does the body." - Seneca
"Service to others is the rent you pay for your room here on earth" - Muhammad Ali
"If you see beauty in something, don't wait for others to agree" - Sherihan Gamal
"Great star! What would your happiness be, if you had not those for whom you shine!" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The person you marry will be your biggest career decision" - Sheryl Sandberg
"People who say they don"t care what people think are usually desperate to have people think they don"t care what people think." - George Carlin
"No one has the power to shatter your dreams unless you give it to them."-Maeve Greyson
"You don't remember the times your dad held your handle bars. You remember the day he let go." - Lenore Skenazy
"Dream your own dreams, achieve your own goals. Your journey is your own and unique." - Roy T. Bennett
"We cannot predict the future, but we can invent it."  Dennis Gabor
"Time is a strange fellow. He gives more than he takes, and he takes all." - E.E. Cummings
"People often say that this or that person has not yet found himself. But the self is not something one finds, it is something one creates." -Thomas Szaz
"If I don't die, good. If I die, it's not my problem anymore."
"Some men storm imaginary Alps all their lives, and die in the foothills cursing difficulties which do not exist." - E. W. Howe
"I could hold you for a million years, to make you feel my love" -Bob Dylan
"The liar becomes a mathematical problem when we can't calculate,nor find the result in his lies" (William Ventura)
"The superior man lets himself be guided; he does not go ahead blindly, but learns from the situation what is demanded of him and then follows." -Bruce Lee
"The difference between someone you consider a genius and someone you consider crazy, is not in their radical ideas, but in the fact that one succeeds in preaching to you his idea, and the other one fails" (me)
"Cruel people do not create war, war creates cruel people" _me_
"More is lost by indecision, than by wrong decision" - Unknown
"Life is a joke when you don"t take it seriously" -Chicken of Wisdom
"Life is a joke when you don"t take it seriously"
"Listen, strange women lying in ponds distributing swords is no basis for a system of government" - Anarchist Peasant in Monty Python and the Holy Grail.
"What the new year brings to you will depend a great deal on what you bring to the new year."  Vern McLellan
"Every passing minute is a chance to turn it all around" - Cameron Crowe
"I became insane with long intervals of horrible sanity" - Edgar Allan Poe
"Don't ever take a fence down until you know the reason it was put up."  G. K. Chesterton
"I'm a great believer in luck, and I find the harder I work the more I have of it."  Thomas Jefferson
"Man is the only animal that can remain on friendly terms with the victims he intends to eat until he eats them."  Samuel Butler
"You can no more win a war than you can win an earthquake."  Jeannette Rankin
"I'm sick of not having the courage to be an absolute nobody."
"To summarize: it is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it." - Douglas Adams
"You want to live but do you know how to live? You are scared of dying and tell me, is the kind of life you lead really any different from being dead?" - Seneca
"Everyone thinks they have the best dog, and none of them are wrong" -WR Purche
"Property is theft. Nobody "owns" anything. When you die, it all stays here." - George Carlin
"Every animal is sad after coitus except the human female and the rooster." - Galen of Pergamon
"When you're born you get a ticket to the freak show. When you're born in America, you get a front row seat." - George Carlin
"Your tragic fate is looking so clear, yeah it's your fucking nightmare!" M. Shadows Avenged Sevenfold
"Being happy doesn't mean that everything is perfect. It means that you decided to look beyond the imperfections." - Unknown
"Every moment waited is a moment wasted" - David Deida
"Let us be grateful to people who make us happy; they are the charming gardeners who make our souls bloom." -Marcel Proust
"People always tell me "Have a nice day." Well what if I don't want to? What if I want to have a crappy day?" - George Carlin
"I am not a vegetarian because I love animals; I am a vegetarian because I hate plants." - A. Whitney Brown
"I was thinking about how people seem to read the Bible a whole lot more as they get older; then it dawned on me  they"re cramming for their final exam." - George Carlin
"See the truth about high school is everyone has problems but no one gives a f*ck" -filthy frank
"If it"s true that our species is alone in the universe, then I"d have to say that the universe aimed rather low and settled for very little." - George Carlin
"She was the kind of girlfriend God gives you young, so you'll know loss the rest of your life." - Junot Daz,
"Mankind is not likely to salvage civilization unless he can evolve a system of good and evil which is independent of heaven and hell." - George Orwell
"The safest road to hell is the gradual one - the gentle slope, soft underfoot, without sudden turnings, without milestones, without signposts." - C. S. Lewis
"There is no such thing as a hyphenated American who is a good American. The only man who is a good American is the man who is an American and nothing else." - Teddy Roosevelt
"Is there any meaning in my life that the inevitable death awaiting me does not destroy?" - Leo Tolstoy
"The way out of trouble is never as simple as the way in." - E. W. Howe
"We will fight it? Why?" Atreus asked. "Because you are afraid of it," Kratos replied. - God of War 4.
"I walked by an office the other day on which I saw a sign that said, "Safe Space." I immediately felt unsafe. Rarely does anyone really feel "safe" when so many people are struggling just to avoid offending everybody else." -- Randall Smith
"Happiness is a how; not a what. A talent, not an object."
"Any person capable of angering you becomes your master; he can anger you only when you permit yourself to be disturbed by him." - Epictetus
"Life is like an ocean. Don't try to control the waves - learn to surf instead."
"College is a fountain of knowledge where all the kids go to drink."
"Truth doesn"t care about acceptance or dismissal, it"s energies too focused on the empirical; no, the ever wily time has the forsaken luxury of that particular self conscious annoyance, and its neurosis blankets all who observe it. "-Finneagan
"The moment you start arguing with an ignorant fool, you have already lost." - Imam Ali AS
'Life taught me to fear leaving this world without having impact on the people that I love. '
"Delay is the deadliest form of denial." --C. Northcote Parkinson.
"The only person you are destined to become, is the person you decide to be"- Ralph Waldo Emmerson
"You are known to me now. [] You are old and I leave you to the grave. May every recollection of your false life cling to you and cast it's darkness on your deathbed."
"Okay, look, Hamlet. Kill your Uncle. He killed me, he sucks, you don't owe him shit. But leave your mother to her conscience, and for God's sakes don't get all rapey with her. [Later] Look, Hamlet, you had one job...." Ghost, Hamlet, Shakespeare (paraphrased / modernized).
"If you choose not to decide, you still have made a choice". -Neil Peart
"Everyone"s a whore, Grace. We just sell different parts of ourselves." - Thomas Shelby
"And how did we then face the odds / Of man's rude slapstick, yes, and God's? / Quite at home and unafraid, Thank you, /In a game our dreams remade." -Kurt Vonnegut (Slapstick)
"Some men are alive simply because it is against the law to kill them." - E. W. Howe
"There is no standard normal. Normal is subjective. There are seven billion versions of normal on this planet" - Matt Haig
"Beware the advice of successful people; they don"t seek company." - Scott Adams
"I am not what happened to me, I am what I choose to become." - Carl Jung
"Approach the new year with resolve to find the opportunities hidden in each new day."  Michael Josephson
" Winning isn't everything... It's the ONLY THING!" - Vince Lombardi 
"A problem solved is a problem caused." - Karl Pilkington
"When a thing ceases to be a subject of controversy, it ceases to be a subject of interest."  William Hazlitt
"When I woke up this morning my girlfriend asked me, 'Did you sleep good?' I said 'No, I made a few mistakes.'"  Steven Wright
"After twelve years of therapy my psychiatrist said something that brought tears to my eyes. He said, 'No hablo ingles.'"  Ronnie Shakes
"There are two things people want more than sex and money: Recognition &amp; Praise". Mary Kay Ash
"You will never follow your own inner voice until you clear up the doubts in your mind." - Roy T. Bennett
"I don't want my stomach to be a graveyard. I want it to be a garden." - Joey Carbstrong
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." -Dr. Seuss
"Learn to rest, not to quit" - bansky
"Innocence ain't all it's cracked up to be, you know. Innocent little kids rip the wings off flies, because they don't know any better. That's innocence." - Joe Hill, NOS4A2
"When men are not regretting that life is so short, they are doing something to kill time." - E. W. Howe
"Yes, I'm sick, officer. Sick from the disease eating away at me inside. Sick of people who don't appreciate their blessings. Sick of those who scoff at the suffering of others. I'm sick of it all" - John Kramer
"He claims that men are mere props, and that no matter how exquisite, a lie will remain a lie." Aldia Scholar of the First Sin - Dark Souls 2
"There will come a time when you believe everything is finished. That will be the beginning." --Louis L'Amour
"The secret to life is meaningless unless you discover it yourself." - W. Somerset Maugham
"I feel like I'm waiting for something that isn't going to happen" -Unknown
"When a friend is in trouble, don't annoy him by asking if there is anything you can do. Think up something appropriate and do it." - E. W. Howe
"I think that inside every adult is the heart of a child. We just gradually convince ourselves that we have to act more like adults." - Shigeru Miyamoto, creator of Super Mario Bros.
"The human brain starts working the moment you are born and never stops until you stand up to speak in public." - George Jessel
"Don"t cling to a mistake just because you spent a lot of time making it." - Aubrey de Grey
"The time is always right to do what is right" -Martin Luther King Jr.
"Love, n. A temporary insanity curable by marriage." - Ambrose Bierce,
"A real secret is something which only one person knows." - Idries Shah
"Ken, I grew up in Dublin. I love Dublin. If I grew up on a farm, and was retarded, Bruges might impress me. But I didn't so, it doesn't." Martin McDonagh.
"Donald, let's face it. And I'm not being funny. I mean no disrespect, but you're a cunt. You're a cunt now, and you've always been a cunt. And the only thing that's going to change is that you're going to be an even bigger cunt. Maybe have some more cunt kids." Martin McDonagh.
"There are two types of people in this world. 1: The people who know what"s coming next." -Christopher Kamy
"The past is like a worm; Even when you cut it into pieces and bury it deep underground it will still come out crawling" -Diavolo (JJBA)
"You learn much more about yourself when you're down than when you're up." - TB
"Laziness is the most powerful motivator."
"Do a good deed an throw it into the sea" -Egyptian Proverb
"Death Ends A Life, Not a Relationship" Mitch Albom
"The birth of a man is the birth of his sorrow. The longer he lives, the more stupid he becomes, because his anxiety to avoid unavoidable death becomes more and more acute. He lives for what is always out reach! His thirst for survival in the future makes him incapable of living..." - Chuang Tzu
"I have no regrets. I have spent so much of it building up this country. There's nothing more that I need to do. At the end of the day, what have I got? A successful Singapore. What have I given up? My life." - Lee Kuan Yew
"I dream my painting and I paint my dream." - Vincent Willem van Gogh
"When Helen died, I lost everything. Until that dog arrived on my doorstep. A final gift from my wife. In that moment I received some semblance of hope. An opportunity to grieve unalone. And your son took that from mestole that from meKILLED THAT FROM ME!" --John Wick from the movie John Wick
"The man who can keep a secret may be wise, but he is not half as wise as the man with no secrets to keep." - E. W. Howe
"the time when any couple has found its balance, and passion has quieted from its early scream, but gratitude is still abundant; what no one realizes are the golden years." - from the novel Less
"None of us are getting out of here alive, so please stop treating yourself like an after thought". -Anthony Hopkins
"Most people want to get what they want, whereas the secret is to want what you get at this moment." -Eckhart Tolle
"Most people want to get what they want, whereas the secret is to want what you get at this moment." - Eckhart Tolle
" Move FAST and Break Things!" Mark Zuckerberg 
"Do you accept that you're a murderer - and do you accept the suffering that is life? Or... Do you renounce all suffering and worries- and submit yourself to eternal rest?" - Philio
"One resolution I have made and try to always keep, is this  to rise above the little things."  John Burroughs
"There are those who say that time heals all wounds. But you know that not to be true. At its best, time may dull the deepest wounds; it cannot make them disappear," Robert Mueller
"The truth that makes men free is for the most part the truth which men prefer not to hear."  Herbert Agar
"Happiness is nothing more than good health and a bad memory."  Albert Schweitzer
"Nothing shocks me. I'm a scientist."  Harrison Ford
"The bottom line is, we don't have to be a liberal tree hugger to care about a changing climate. All we have to be is a human living on this planet" - Katharine Hayhoe
"Now I'm blocked but right between those two windows, a long time ago, I used to be it" -Exit.
"Look at you! Came to kill people with your bare hands, and now away you go with no more glory than a man sideswiped by a Greyhound bus! And that's all the glory you deserve!" I said. "That's all that any man at war with pure evil deserves."
" And it seemed to me, in those last couple of days, that the distance on the scale between lousy and excellent is nothing compared to the distance between excellent and perfect." -- Spider Robinson
"I don't believe in an afterlife, so I don't have to spend my whole life fearing hell, or fearing heaven even more. For whatever the tortures of hell, I think the boredom of heaven would be even worse." - Isaac Asimov
"If you are irritated by every rub, how will your mirror be polished?" (-Rumi)
"Happiness is not having what you want, but wanting what you have."
"If you conquer all the world yet lose your Self, all that you gain is a wreath around your broken skull."
"An intelligent hell would be better than a stupid paradise." - Victor Hugo
"The distance between insanity and genius is measured only by success." - Unknown
"I choose my friends for their good looks, my acquaintances for their good characters, and my enemies for their good intellects." - Oscar Wilde
"Not how long, but how well you have lived is the main thing" Seneca
"If you love someone and you're not afraid to lose 'em, you'll probably never love someone like I do" - Lukas Graham
"Fine, I"ll come to dinner. But I"m gonna stare at his wife"s boobs so hard that when they go into the kitchen to clean up, it WILL be discussed."
"No relationship is ever a waste of time. If it didn"t bring you what you wanted. It taught you what you don"t want"-Unknown
"They say I laught at everything but in fact I laught at them and they think they are everything." -Jacinto Benavente
"The night has come! The night will never end!" - Aldokk battle cry
"You can fail at something you hate, so you may as well do what you love"-Jim Carey
"Our ability to grow weary of hate fuels our enormous capacity to be kind." -- JB Pritzker - Inauguration Address
"Telling good from unadulterated evil is simple enough. The real difficulty, though, lies in telling the truly good from the seemingly good. Some powers appear in disguise. One must be alert." -- Amos Oz ("A Perfect Peace")
"If you wish to glimpse inside a human soul and get to know the man, don"t bother analyzing his ways of being silent, of talking, of weeping, or seeing how much he is moved by noble ideas; you"ll get better results if you just watch him laugh. ..."  Feodor Dostoyevsky
"Success is having to worry about every damm thing in the world, except money." -- Johnny Cash
"Telling good from unadulterated evil is simple enough. The real difficulty, though, lies in telling the truly good from the seemingly good. Some powers appear in disguise. One must be alert." -- Amos Oz (*A Perfect Peace*)
"Do not underestimate the determination of a quiet man" - Iain Duncan Smith
"Plata o Plomo?" - Pablo Escobar
(Jack London) I would rather be ashes than dust! I would rather that my spark should burn out in a brilliant blaze that it should be stifled by dryrot.
"The more complex the systems, the less conviction in people. Conviction will be drained out of us. Devices will drain us, make us vague and pliant." -Don DeLillo
"Even if thieves carve you limb from limb with a double-handed saw, if you make your mind hostile you are not following my teaching." - Unknown, part of a scripture linked to Buddhism.
"The few own the many because they possess the means of livelihood of all ... The country is governed for the richest, for the corporations, the bankers, the land speculators, and for the exploiters of labor."  Helen Keller
"Those who promise us paradise on earth never produced anything but a hell." - Karl Popper
"Looking at cleavage is like looking at the sun. You don't stare at it. It's too risky. Ya get a sense of it and then you look away." - Jerry Seinfeld
[Quotes] Once you see the results, it becomes an addiction.
"You had a little life so you decided to go to the Baird school to put yourself in the market for a big one [...] If you don't sing now, [...] probably your last words you'll ever hear yourself say just before you croak, gonna be ; "Have a nice day and come back soon!" -Al Pacino, Scent of a woman
"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude."  Maya Angelou
"When truth is replaced by silence, the silence is a lie"  Yevgeny Yevtushenko
"Somewhere, something incredible is waiting to be known." - Carl Sagan
"I am not the King. Jesus-Christ is the King. I'm just an entertainer." - Elvis Presley
"I don"t believe in astrology; I"m a Sagittarian and we"re sceptical." - Arthur C. Clarke
"No one gossips about other people's secret virtues."  Bertrand Russell
"It's a recession when your neighbor loses his job; it's a depression when you lose yours."  Harry S Truman
"Facts are stupid things."  Ronald Reagan
"Operationally, God is beginning to resemble not a ruler but the last fading smile of a cosmic Cheshire cat."  Sir Julian Huxley
"the past can"t hurt you anymore. not unless you let it." -v-
"Under the spreading chestnut tree I sold you and you sold me" - George Orwell
"That which does not kill us make us stronger" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"A belief in hell and the knowledge that every ambition is doomed to frustration at the hands of a skeleton have never prevented the majority of human beings from behaving as though death were no more than an unfounded rumor." - Aldous Huxley
"A belief in hell and the knowledge that every ambition is doomed to frustration at the hands of a skeleton have never prevented the majority of human beings from behaving as though death were no more than an unfounded rumor." - Aldous Huxley
"Confidence is quiet. Insecurities are loud." - Unknown
"Corpses should be thrown out quicker than dung." -Heraclitus
"Winning is a habit. Unfortunately so is losing." - Vince Lombardi Jr.
"When I'm dead just throw me in the trash." - Frank Reynolds (Danny DeVito)
"Most people work just hard enough not to get fired and get paid just enough money not to quit." - George Carlin
"The rules of engagement in The Twilight War are to expect the unexpected, think the unthinkable, and do the impossible." - Klain Kelridgalei: Supreme Commander of all Verendeian Forces
"Just cause you got the monkey off your back doesn't mean the circus has left town." - George Carlin
"When you"re accustomed to privilege, equality feels like oppression"
[Question] I am trying to find the perfect quote for a gift I am making. I'll give this to my SO on our wedding day.
"We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them." - Albert Einstein
"Human beings are the only creatures on Earth who claim a god, and the only living thing that behaves like it hasn't got one." -Hunter Stockton Thompson
"The coward is always the first in the grave." - Captain Phillips film
"No matter what you do, the tides of time will wash away your sand castle. So there's no sense in reaching for some foolhardy notion of immortality when there is real work to be done, with real people, right now." -John Green
"Mukbang is a Gangbang of your stomach." - Unknown
"Idle people are often bored and bored people, unless they sleep a lot, are cruel. It is not an accident that boredom and cruelty are great preoccupations in our time." -Renata Adler
"Idle people are often bored and bored people, unless they sleep a lot, are cruel. It is not an accident that boredom and cruelty are great preoccupations in our time." - Renata Adler
"Opportunities don't happen. You create them." -- Chris Grosser
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." -Oscar Wilde
"School is like swordfighting with your anus. It can get really awkward, nobody knows how to do it, and you feel terrible aftwerwards." (Anonymous, 2015)
"Don't force your smiles, don't feed your frowns. Instead do your best to feed others' smiles and let your negative emotions be known without forcing frowns. This is the apex of communicating your emotions." - My father
"If a little dreaming is dangerous, the cure for it is not to dream less but to dream more, to dream all the time." - Marcel Proust
"There are many ways of going forward, but only one way of standing still."  Franklin D. Roosevelt
"My ambition is handicapped by laziness." - Charles Bukowski
"Thats not a threat. Thats a promise."
"Well, you must give yourself the means to succeed, and you don"t have the means to give yourself the means to succeed"
"I don't pop Xanax because pills are for pussies. I'm never scared of being human, I'm not afraid of feeling feelings"
"Live your life to the fullest and always focus on the positive side"
"This year, be structured enough for success and achievement and flexible enough for creativity and fun."  Taylor Duvall
"It doesn' matter how much gold a pirate has accumulated,if he doesn't carry wealth in his heart and its feelings" (William Ventura)
"A happy man is too satisfied with the present to dwell too much on the future." - Albert Einstein.
"In learning you will teach, and in teaching you will learn." - Phil Collins
"Once you've learned to study in a bathing suit on the grass with muscled men throwing frisbees over your head, you can accomplish almost anything."  Susan Rice
"Consistency is the last refuge of the unimaginative."  Oscar Wilde
"Barometer, n.: An ingenious instrument which indicates what kind of weather we are having."  Ambrose Bierce
"Good government never depends upon laws, but upon the personal qualities of those who govern. The machinery of government is always subordinate to the will of those who administer that machinery. The most important element of government, therefore, is the method of choosing leaders."- Frank Herbert
"People sin so much...that they need to hide behind religions,there is a carnival of religions out there" Raman Raghav 2.0
"He is one of those people who would be enormously improved by death." -Hector Hugh Munro
"He is one of those people who would be enormously improved by death." - Hector Hugh Munro
"You ever have the feeling you lost something important, only to discover it was never there to begin with?" -Beck (Mosquitoland by David Arnold)
"You can be a king or a street sweeper, but everybody dances with the grim reaper."  Robert Alton Harris
"War is rich old men protecting their property by sending middle class and lower class young men off to die. It always has been." - George Carlin
"Anger cannot be dishonest."  Marcus Aurelius
"There is is something they would lose if you were not there." -Bishop TD Jakes Make a difference in someone's life today by being appreciative of them to add value to their life and yours.
"To the dumb question "Why me?" the cosmos barely bothers to return the reply: Why not?" - Hitchens
"What's the point in having a mind if you don't use it to make judgements?" - Sarah J. Maas
"I'm going to kill the lights." "Don't kill the lights." "Fine. I'm going to euthanize the lights." - Dialogue between me and my friend
"Liberty this word that the human dream feeds, there's no one to explain, and there's no one who doesn't understand" - Ceclia Meireles
"There's a peace that fills you when you've given up that last shred of dignity" -Malcom in the Middle
"We build too many walls and not enough bridges." - Joseph Fort Newton (important notes on attribution in description)
"I almost lost a thumb last week ... found it in my bowling bag".
"You cannot find peace by avoiding life." - Virginia Woolf
"One day your life will flash before your eyes. Make sure it"s worth watching." Gerald Way
"We're all slowly dying, just some of us get to choose how."
"When I look in your eyes, and you"re looking back in mine, everything feels not quite normal. Because I feel stronger and weaker at the same time, I feel excited and at the same time terrified. The truth is I don"t know what I feel, except I know what kind of man I want to be."
"Parents should leave books lying around marked "forbidden" if they want their children to read."  Doris Lessing
"I've learned that the safest looking roads in life often have the most dangerous destinations." - fat woman from 'My 600 Pound Life'
"Don"t just teach your children to read Teach them to question what they read. Teach them to question everything." - George Carlin
"A man who says he is willing to meet you halfway is usually a poor judge of distance." -- Unknown
"Good, better, best. Never let it rest. 'Til your good is better and your better is best." - St. Jerome
"The people is dumb and, since it is the one who pays, it is just to talk dumb to please it." - Lope de Vega
"Good interpersonal communication should convey as much relevant information as possible with as little ego as possible." - Ravi Silari
"It is true that integrity alone won't make you a leader, but without integrity you will never be one." - Zig Ziglar
"Love yourself first and everything else falls into line" Lucille Ball
"Our knowledge has made us cynical, our cleverness hard and unkind. We think too much and feel too little: More than machinery we need humanity; More than cleverness we need kindness and gentleness. Without these qualities, life will be violent and all will be lost." - Charlie Chaplin
"There is autotune where a voice can be enhanced, embellished and gently shifted or corrected to pitch. Then there is auto tuna which stinks to high hell in the excess of making people sound talented that have little to none at all." - Loren Weisman
"Everything you read in the newspapers is absolutely trueexcept for the rare story of which you happen to have firsthand knowledge." Knoll's Law of Media Accuracy (Erwin Knoll, editor, "The Progressive")
"Tell people an invisible man in the sky created all things, they believe you. Tell them what you've painted is wet, they have to touch it to believe." - George Carlin
"The truth is, Pavlov's dog trained Pavlov to ring this bell just before the dog salivated." - George Carlin
"Excuses are the rocks where our dreams are crushed." Tim Fargo
"Just cause you got the monkey off your back doesn't mean the circus has left town." - George Carlin
"Some people have no idea what they're doing, and a lot of them are really good at it." - George Carlin
[insert Marcus Aurelius quote here]
"Don't waste your energy trying to change opinions ... Do your thing, and don't care if they like it." - Tina Fey, Bossypants
"We all know what fear is,but we don't have the capacity to face it when it truly scares us" (William Ventura)
"Little science takes you away from God but more of it takes you to Him." - Louis Pasteur
"When you start alienating people, they start to escalate." - Chuck Palahniuk
"The government isn't your house, where you invited your clan for a barbecue. If you think those who are out of your clan's bubble is your enemy, then you should lead a mafia, not a country" - Unknown
"Be happy with what you have while working for what you want."  Unknown
"He who wants to do good knocks at the gate: he who loves finds the door open." - Rabindranath Tagore
"If you pick the corn out of your poop, you can eat it again" - North Korean defector.
"Don't criticize what you can't understand" - Bob Dylan
"We do on stage things that are supposed to happen off. Which is a kind of integrity, if you look on every exit as being an entrance somewhere else."  Tom Stoppard
"Some have been thought brave because they were afraid to run away."  Thomas Fuller
"Almost all absurdity of conduct arises from the imitation of those whom we cannot resemble."  Samuel Johnson
"Preserving health by too severe a rule is a worrisome malady."  Francois de La Rochefoucauld
"I never want to be away from you again, except at work, in the restroom or when one of us is at a movie the other does not want to see." - Lemony Snicket
"Life never end when you are in it." - Lemony Snicket, The Beatrice Letters
"Everything you read in the newspapers is absolutely trueexcept for the rare story of which you happen to have firsthand knowledge." Knoll's Law of Media Accuracy (Erwin Knoll, editor, "The Progressive")
"When the multitude hate a man, it is necessary to examine the case. When the multitude like a man, it is necessary to examine the case." - Unknown
"The more complicated the order, the bigger the asshole. If you walk into a Starbucks and order a 'decaf grandee, half soy, half lowfat, iced vanilla, double-shot, gingerbread cappuccino, extra dry, light ice, with one Sweet-n'-Low and one NutraSweet,' ooooh, you're a huge asshole." - George Carlin
"Eyes only see what they know. When they don't find what they are looking for, they say there is nothing." - Francisco Etxeberra, forensic anthropologist
"The greatest success of Mohammad's life was effected by sheer moral force without the stroke of a sword." - Edward Gibbon
"Millions saw the apple fall, but Newton was the one who asked why."  Bernard Baruch
"I suddenly remembered my Charlemagne: "Let my armies be the rocks and the trees  and the birds in the sky." " - Henry Jones, Sr (Sean Connery)
"The third petition of the Lord's Prayer is repeated daily by millions who have not the slightest intention of letting anyone's will be done but their own." - Aldous Huxley
"Know what's weird? Day by day, nothing seems to change. But pretty soon, everything's different." - Bill Watterson
"But with the same spirit of honesty that we criticize Hitler, we should also acknowledge that there were no good guys in WWII. The Soviets were genocidal idiots; the Americans nuked civilians; the British delighted in fire-bombing citizens." - Brett Stevens
"Don"t change so people will like you; be yourself and the right people will love you." - Unknown
"The ninety and nine are with dreams, content but the hope of the world made new, is the hundredth man who is grimly bent on making those dreams come true." - Ted Olson
"Don't talk unless you can improve the silence." - Jorge Luis Borges
"I tried not to look at things. I tried not to think about when it was that my existence became less about the things that make up people's lives, and more about the holes that losing those things leave behind... but I wasn't doing a very good job at it."  Max Payne (Max Payne 3, 2012 videogame)
"Women can fake orgasms, but men can fake love." - Bo Burnham
"Don't force your smiles, don't feed your frowns. Instead feed others' smiles and let your negative emotions be known without forcing frowns."
"Do not force your smiles, do not feed your frowns. Instead do your best to feed each others' smiles and let your negative emotions be known without forcing frowns. This is the apex of communication." - My Dad
"If you don't like the road you're walking, start paving another one" Dolly Parton
"First, you judged me by the cover. You were given another chance, but you went to the wrong chapter and made assumptions without any context. This time, I will make sure that you go through everything. Cover to cover, word by word."
"Well fed devils behave better than famished saints." - D.L. Smith
"It is a joy to be hidden, but a disaster not to be found." - D.W. Winnicott
"Either write something worth reading or do something worth writing." -Benjamin Franklin
"The buck stops with everybody." - Donald J. Trump, 10 January 2019
"The greatest success of Mohammad's life was effected by sheer moral force without the stroke of a sword." - Edward Gibbon (1737-1794) Considered the greatest British historian of his time.
"But life is short and truth works far and lives long: let us speak the truth." - Arthur Schopenhauer, philosopher
"I was beginning to learn that your life is a story told about you, not one that you tell."
"One person's greatest weakness is another's greatest strength. Who knows what you may be able to offer if you open up your heart to being kind." - Mother Teresa
"The only people with whom you should try to get even are those who have helped you."  John E. Southard
"Those who dare to fail miserably can achieve greatly." - John F. Kennedy
"Some people see things that are and ask, Why? Some people dream of things that never were and ask, Why not? Some people have to go to work and don't have time for all that." - George Carlin
"A successful marriage requires falling in love many times, always with the same person."  Mignon McLaughlin
"You get what you specialize in, you"re the universe, and everything you would like is within you."
"What we have is not who we are; what we are is what we have."
"Action is eloquence." Volumnia in Coriolanus
"If you asked me for my new year resolution, it would be to find out who I am."  Cyril Cusack
"There are two kinds of truth; The truth that lights the way and the truth that warms the heart. The fist of these is science and the second is art." - Raymond Chandler
"If men could only know each other, they would neither idolize nor hate."  Elbert Hubbard
"Hollywood is a place where they'll pay you a thousand dollars for a kiss and fifty cents for your soul."  Marilyn Monroe
"My life has no purpose, no direction, no aim, no meaning, and yet I'm happy. I can't figure it out. What am I doing right?"  Charles M. Schulz
"One doesn't have a sense of humor. It has you."  Larry Gelbart
"There are two types of people in this world; people who watch child pornography and the ones that lie." - Jeremiah Phillips
51 Best Falling In Love Quotes
"People, they love blood. They love action. Not this talky, depressing, philosophical bullshit." -Michael Keaton
"How can you prove whether at this moment we are sleeping, and all our thoughts are a dream; or whether we are awake, and talking to one another in the waking state?" - Plato
"Dare to Be When a new day begins, dare to smile gratefully. When there is darkness, dare to be the first to shine a light. When there is injustice, dare to be the first to condemn it. When something seems difficult, dare to do it anyway. When life seems to beat you down, dare to fight back.
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"True terror is to wake up one morning and discover that your high school class is running the country"-Kurt Vonnegut
"We cannot put off living until we are ready."  Jose Ortega y Gasset
"Some rise by sin, and some by virtue fall." Escalus in Measure for Measure
"The surest sign that intelligent life exists elsewhere in the universe is that it has never tried to contact us." - Bill Watterson
"To me it"s like I want every moment to be a moment of realness. All the time. I don"t want that feeling to be temporary like it would only come in my last moments of life."
"Take 10 lives you're a murderer, take 1000 you're a warrior."
"The child must know that he is a miracle, that since the beginning of the world there hasn't been, and until the end of the world there will not be, another child like him." - Pablo Casals
"You can"t win unless you learn how to lose." - Kareem Abdul-Jabbar
"Money can't buy happiness but it can buy a pleasant form of misery"
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." - John F. Kennedy
"If there is no struggle, there is no progress." - Frederick Douglass
"Where there is a wall, there is tranquility " -Jim Acosta
"You are never too old to reinvent yourself."  Steve Harvey
"In nature there is no death, Only a reshuffling of atoms." GJ (in Top of the Lake)
"To think is easy. To act is difficult. To act as one thinks is the most difficult."  Johann Wolfgang Von Goeth
"A Mistake Repeated More Than Once is a Decision"
"It is the most violent people who go for love and peace" - John Lennon
"If you can't get rid of the skeleton in your closet, you'd best teach it to dance." - George Bernard Shaw
"Gods who pretend to make a sacrifice by dying, but who are really immortal" - Douglas E Krueger.
"I am alone. I look at the heavens and think them empty. And if not empty, I find the idea of worshiping whatever dwells there obscene. It doesn't change what is right. If there is nothing in this world but what we make, brothers...let us make good."  Beta Ray Bill
"I don't have a quick analogy for it, but I suppose [it's like] if you ... had to row a boat across the Atlantic Ocean....."-Nick Offerman Cont.
"Nothing is as frustrating as arguing with someone who knows what he's talking about." - Sam Ewing
"I am alone. I look at the heavens and think them empty. And if not empty, I find the idea of worshiping whatever dwells there obscene. It doesn't change what is right. If there is nothing in this world but what we make, brothers...let us make good."  Beta Ray Bill
"I am alone. I look to the heavens and think them empty. And if not empty, I find the idea of worshipping whatever dwells there obscene. It doesn't change what is right. If there is nothing in this world but what we make, brothers... Let us make good." -Beta Ray Bill
"You build a wall to keep something unwanted out  or to hold something precious in." - Jodie Picoult
"Crikey means gee whiz, wow! Crikey, mate. You're far safer dealing with crocodiles and western diamondback rattlesnakes than the executives and the producers and all those sharks in the big MGM building." - Steve Irwin
"Catholics gloat because they hold the truth" u/emmanuelbassil
"Its always better to be lucky than good, but its more important to be able to distinguish which is which." -- The Good Vibe Tribe
"You should always go to other people's funerals, otherwise, they won't come to yours." - Yogi Berra
"The road to success is dotted with many tempting parking spaces." - Will Rogers
"Is not possible to receive love if we don't give a sample of it in return,and then we can receive it back" (William Ventura)
"If my life is going to mean anything, I have to live it myself."  Rick Riordan
"John Calhoun, if you secede from my nation, I will secede your head from the rest of your body"- Andrew "Old Hickory" Jackson
"Forgiveness is giving up your right to hurt someone back. When you forgive someone you agree to forfeit any revenge that you previously felt needed to be extracted."  Archibald Hart
"Fall down seven times, get up eight." - A Japanese proverb
"There are things we won't say, so this day I believe if self-doubt was a religion it would be the only thing we believed in" - Lionheart
"You are far more than what you ThInK you are; you need nothing; don't take life serious; play and have fun with everything."
"How much more grievous are the consequences of anger than the causes of it." - Marcus Aurelius,
"If we wish to free ourselves from enslavement, we must choose freedom and the responsibility this entails." - Leo Buscaglia
"One of these days, you"re going to wake up and realise, that you"re beautiful, powerful and magical as fuck. That will be the day you stop running after people who don"t see your worth. That will be a really good day." - Brooke Hampton.
"We used to look up at the sky and wonder at our place in the stars, Now we just look down and worry about our place in the dirt."- Jonathan Nolan
"God must have been the product of an intelligent designer, and that designer must have been the product of another designer, and so on ad infinitum" - Douglas E Krueger.
"A husband is like a fire, he goes out when unattended."  Evan Esar
"I went into a McDonald's yesterday and said, 'I'd like some fries.' The girl at the counter said, 'Would you like some fries with that?'"  Jay Leno
"In America, through pressure of conformity, there is freedom of choice, but nothing to choose from."  Peter Ustinov
"At the age of eleven or thereabouts women acquire a poise and an ability to handle difficult situations which a man, if he is lucky, manages to achieve somewhere in the later seventies."  P. G. Wodehouse
"Life is boring and futile..."
"This year I just wanna go on more adventures. Be around good energy. Connect with people. Learn new things. Grow."  Anonymous
"You fail to recognize that it matters not what someone is born, but what they grow to be!"-Albus
"Sometimes you just have to pee in the sink" - Charles Bukowski
"Our character is what we do when we think no one is looking."  H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"The only gateway is existence" -kittyonmeth
"The pain from the past makes the pleasure feel better" -Wax
"Most of us have two lives. The life we live, and the unlived life within us. Between the two stands Resistance." - Steven Pressfield
"It is the quality of one"s convictions that determines success not the number of followers." -Remus Lupin
"Humans think they are smarter than dolphins because we build cars and buildings and start wars etc., and all that dolphins do is swim in the water, eat fish and play around. Dolphins believe that they are smarter for exactly the same reasons." - Douglas Adams
"He's turned his life around. He used to be depressed and miserable. Now he's miserable and depressed." - Harry Kalas
"I did not hit her, its bullshit, I did not hit her, I DID NOT! Oh, hi Mark." - Johnny from The Room
"If the experience of the Third Reich teaches us anything, it is that a love of great music, great art and great literature does not provide people with any kind of moral or political immunization against violence, atrocity, or subservience to dictatorship." - Richard J. Evans
"Even among men lacking all distinction he inevitably stood out as a man lacking more distinction than all the rest, and people who met him were always impressed by how unimpressive he was." Joseph Heller in Catch-22
"To steal ideas from one person is plagiarism; to steal from many is research." - Steven Wright
"Gender 34: If It Exists On The Internet, There"s a Gender Of It"- Me in a group chat 5 minutes ago..
"People who live in glass trailers shouldn't throw crack rocks" - Radio Show I Used To Listen To
"What we do in life echoes in eternity."  Maximus Decimus Meridius (Gladiator, 2000 movie)
"Who dares to teach must never cease to learn." - John Cotton Dana
"Even now, as broken as you may feel, you are still so strong. There"s something to be said for how you hold yourself together and keep moving, even though you feel like shattering. Don"t stop. This is your healing. It doesn"t have to be pretty or graceful. You just keep going." - Maxwell Dawuoh
"If you are saying the same thing as everyone else, then why would and why should anyone think you are different from everyone else." Loren Weisman
" You must never give into despair. Allow yourself to slip down that road and you surrender to your lowest instincts. In the darkest times, hope is something you give yourself. That is the meaning of inner strength." - uncle Iroh from avatar: the last Airbender
"I"m not upset that you lied to me, I"m upset that from now on I can"t believe you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Brevity is the soul
"You might wanna put your toothbrush away. I don"t wanna get poop shit all over it." - My Roommate
"The most important message of a crucifix, was how cruel supposedly sane human beings can be when under orders from a superior authority." -Kurt Vonnegut
"If you"re in it then get in it; if you"re not in it then get out of it."  Zig Ziglar
"You didnt deserve the 1000th time i gave you,and neither did i" -unknown
"If everything seems to be going well, you have obviously overlooked something." - Steven Wright
"According to a new survey, 90% of men say their lover is also their best friend. Which is really kind of disturbing when you consider man's best friend is his dog." - Jay Leno
"There is a fine line between consideration and hesitation. The former is wisdom, the latter is fear." -- Emperor Izaro Phrecius
"Love is like a fart. If you have to force it, it"s probably crap." - A Bathroom Stall
"Before you judge a man, walk a mile in his shoes. After that who cares?... He's a mile away and you've got his shoes!" - Billy Connolly
[NEW YEAR"S RESOLUTION TIP] | "Long term consistency trumps short term intensity" - Bruce Lee
"Look at the day, look at the sunlight, the grass, and the trees. Its a good day to die" - who said this?
"First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Every day has an individual identity, a name of its own. That name is the date. It's good to reflect on the day at its end to find closure. Let not days blend together." - Ravi Silari
"Sleep does not close the day; looking back on the day and finding satisfaction and closure with what one has done closes the day. Every day has an identity, let not the days blend together." - Ravi Silari
"We don't stop playing because we grow old; we grow old because we stop playing." -George Bernard Shaw
"Any woman who thinks the way to a man's heart is through his stomach is aiming about 10 inches too high."  Adrienne E. Gusoff
"You know what's interesting about Washington? It's the kind of place where second-guessing has become second nature."  George W. Bush
"What I look forward to is continued immaturity followed by death."  Dave Barry
"Oh, I don't blame Congress. If I had $600 billion at my disposal, I'd be irresponsible, too."  Lichty and Wagner
"This man claims he can change the destiny of one who will change the destiny of the world." - Sage, on Buddha's Father
"Some men try to buy their happiness; others try to earn it. Yet, others still, just buy cheese instead and discover happiness was there before them all along." - Albert Einstein
"Ageing is an extraordinary process, whereby you become the person you always should have been" - David Bowie
"Be happy in the moment, that's enough. Each moment is all we need, not more." - Mother Teresa
"Being prepared to die is one of the great secrets of living." - George Lincoln Rockwell
"The person who can bring the spirit of laughter into a room is indeed blessed."  Bennett Cerf
"Just because it's a software fix, doesn't mean it's a software problem"
""I can"t" will thwart you, stop you, slow you down, turn you around and cause you to move backwards if you let it. But if you have the proper mindset, "I can"t" will do nothing but make you that more determined to get to your goal."  CT Fletcher
'Don't tell me what you value, show me your budget, and I'll tell you what you value.' -Joe Biden
"The bad news is you"re falling through the air, nothing to hang on to, no parachute. The good news is, there"s no ground." - Chgyam Trungpa.
"Crocodiles are easy. They try to kill and eat you. People are harder. Sometimes they pretend to be your friend first." - Steve Irwin
"You can make anything work with brute force and ignorance" - My teacher
"Positivity is only upheld by the efforts of positive people." - Ravi Silari
"Life is a sexually transmitted disease and the mortality rate is one hundred percent." - R. D. Laing
"It's only through the efforts of positive people is positivity in general maintained." - Ravi Silari
"Even as a child I felt in my heart two opposite emotions: the horror of life and the ecstasy of life." - Charles Baudelaire
"Beware the quiet man. For while others speak he watches. And while others act he plans. And when they finally rest... he strikes" - Adam McKay
"When we see a stranger for a brief moment on the street, we know nothing about their lives, or who they are. Any commentary we wish to make is determined by our preconceived ideas about them. We are limited to the lens of our own experience." Jamie Windsor
"Every angel is terrifying." - Unknown
"We can tell other people about -- having faith. What we had faith in. What we found important enough to fight for. It's not whether you were right or wrong, but how much faith you were willing to have, that decides the future."  Solid Snake (Metal Gear Solid 2: Sons of Liberty, 2001 videogame)
"The most difficult subjects can be explained to the most slow-witted man if he has not formed any idea of them already; but the simplest thing cannot be made clear to the most intelligent man if he is firmly persuaded that he knows already, without a shadow of doubt, what is laid before him"
"Victory does not favor the righteous or the wicked; it favors the prepared." - Unknown
"A good conscience is a continual Christmas." Benjamin Franklin
"What sort of philosophers are we, who know absolutely nothing of the origin and destiny of cats?" - Henry David Thoreau
"What people call "love" it's just a chemical reaction that compels animals to breed. It hits hard, then it slowly fades, leaving you stranded in a failing marriage. I did it, your parents are gonna do it, break the cycle Morty, focus on science." -Rick
"I have never killed any one, but I have read some obituary notices with great satisfaction." - Clarence Darrow
"We must beleive that there is one God or supreme Monarch that we may fear &amp; obey him &amp; keep his laws &amp; give him honour &amp; glory." - Isaac Newton
"If you think nobody cares if you're alive, try missing a couple of car payments." - Earl Wilson
"I have measured out my life with coffee spoons."  T. S. Eliot
"Honesty without tact is cruelty"
"If you have good thoughts they will shine out of your face like sunbeams and you will always look lovely." -Roald Dahl
"You often feel tired, not because you've done too much, but because you've done too little of what sparks a light in you." - Alexander Den Heijer
"Jobs fill your pockets, but adventures fill your soul."  Jaime Lyn
"The day i say i do is the day where the rest of my life begins" - me
"All positivity is only held up and exists because of the efforts of positive people." - Ravi Silari
"Insane people are always sure that they are fine. It is only the sane people who are willing to admit that they are crazy."  Nora Ephron
"People everywhere confuse what they read in newspapers with news."  A. J. Liebling
"Against logic there is no armor like ignorance."  Laurence J. Peter
"Everyone thinks of changing the world, but no one thinks of changing himself."  Leo Tolstoy
"Standing on a street corner waiting for no one is power." - Gregory Corso
" If society is not labeling you as a FREAK in your industry, you're not doing enough!" -Grant Cardone
"Silently, one by one, in the infinite meadows of heaven, Blossomed the lovely stars, the forget-me-nots of the angels" - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"You're the reason I took a rope and lassoed the moon/to prove that when it comes to you, there's nothing I won't do" - Prince
"Big Chungus" Martin Luther King 1958
"Happiness starts with you. Not with your relationships, with your job, not with your money, but with you!"
"Positivity is only maintained by the efforts of positive people." - Ravi Silari
"You are not done with a book until you pass it to another reader."  Donalyn Miller
"I know what I have to do now. I gotta keep breathing. Because tomorrow the sun will rise. Who knows what the tide could bring" -Tom Hanks in Cast Away
"Evil is measured by what a villain does when nothing will stop him" - The Sovereign Species, Book 2 (Me)
"He who is cruel to animals becomes hard also in his dealings with men. We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals." -Immanuel Kant
"He who is cruel to animals becomes hard also in his dealings with men. We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals." - Immanuel Kant
"Everything is part of the learning curve, everything is an opportunity. The hardest of setbacks gives one the greatest opportunities for growth." - Ravi Silari
"We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals." -Immanuel Kant
"We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals." - Immanuel Kant
"Lust is to the other passions what the nervous fluid is to life; it supports them all, lends strength to them all ambition, cruelty, avarice, revenge, are all founded on lust." - Marquis de Sade
"Is our skin to keep the world out or our bodies in?" - Hands Like Houses
"The cheesecake was smooth and lush, with the personality of a warm and well-to-do uncle who knows a hundred dirty jokes and will die of sexual exertions in the arms of his mistress." - Don DeLillo
"A man doing evil knowing he is doing evil, has his own limits. A man doing evil believing he is doing good will destroy the world."
"Miracles are not contrary to nature, but only contrary to what we know about nature." - Saint Augustine
"Early bird gets the worm, but it's the late worm that doesn't get eaten by the early bird"
"Pushing people away prevents loss but stunts growth." - Matthew Mercer
"Creativity is intelligence having fun!" - Albert Einstein 
"Days like today are why I drink. Days like tomorrow are why I shouldn"t."
"If you could see even a fraction of what's possible for you, you would fall to your knees and cry."  Laura McKowen
"We must not allow the clock and the calendar to blind us to the fact that each moment of life is a miracle and mystery." - H. G. Wells
"The pen will always be waiting for your hand, and the paper does not know time." - Ravi Silari
"A famous explorer once said, that the extraordinary is in what we do, not who we are."Lara Croft, Tomb Rider
"The pen will always wait for your hand, and the paper knows no time." - Ravi Silari
"Yes, certainly. Please enjoy a bread we, the Undead army, put our all into making." - A quote from "THE DEMON LORD"S URBAN DEVELOPMENT" I really needed to share
"Sunshine is delicious, rain is refreshing, wind braces us up, snow is exhilarating; there is really no such thing as bad weather, only different kinds of good weather." - John Ruskin
"The way the world underestimates me will be my greatest weapon" Calista
"I haven't been everywhere, but it's on my list." - Susan Sontag
"Everyone has talent. What is rare is the courage to follow the talent to the dark place where it leads." - Erica Jong
"If God brings you to it, He will see you through it" anonymous
"Uuuuuuuuuuh yeah waluigi"
"Delve deep down enough into political hypocrisy, and you'll find power snaking its way." - Ravi Silari
"Monster is a relative term. To a canary, a cat is a monster. We're just used to being the cat."
"It takes but a moment to look back at the day at its end, to think about the good deeds one has done." - Ravi Silari
"It takes just a moment to look back on the day and see what good deeds one has done.It will give one many moments of satisfaction." - Ravi Silari
"It takes just a moment to look back on the day and see what good deeds one has done. By reflecting, it might give you a lifetime of satisfaction." - Ravi Silari
"All conflict comes down to ideas against ideas, words against words. But whoever has the numbers, a majority against a minority, their ideas will prevail, regardless of if those ideas are good or bad." - Ravi Silari
"I found a fossil when I was four. My mum said 'it's just life that had come and gone and died before our time, love.' Our time is coming and running out at the same rate."
"I bet if you tracked this sub for a day, 3/4 of the quotes would be spurious or misattributed." --Me.
"One way to measure the quality of a relationship is by how quickly a dispute in the relationship is resolved." - Ravi Silari
"We sit by and watch the barbarian. We tolerate him in the long stretches of peace, we are not afraid. We are tickled by his irreverence; his comic inversion of our old certitudes and our fixed creed refreshes us; we laugh." - Hilaire Belloc
"I"m not entitled to have an opinion on this subject unless I can state the arguments against my position better than the people do who are supporting it. I think that only when I reach that stage am I qualified to speak." - Charlie Munger
"You know nothing for sure...except the fact that you know nothing for sure." - John Kennedy
"Sex is as important as eating or drinking and we ought to allow the one appetite to be satisfied with as little restraint or false modesty as the other." - Marquis de Sade
"Nobody will ever win the Battle of the Sexes. There's just too much fraternizing with the enemy."  Henry Kissinger
" There is no nonsense so gross that society will not, at some time, make a doctrine of it and defend it with every weapon of communal stupidity."  Robertson Davies
"You can be a rank insider as well as a rank outsider."  Robert Frost
"I'm astounded by people who want to 'know' the universe when it's hard enough to find your way around Chinatown."  Woody Allen
"An illusion is not a distorted reality, indeed, the reality itself is already distorted." - WrongMonk
"Let no man pull you so low as to hate him."
"Conversation, like certain portions of the anatomy, always runs more smoothly when lubricated." -Marquis de Sade
"Conversation, like certain portions of the anatomy, always runs more smoothly when lubricated." - Marquis de Sade
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Only the dead have seen the end of war" - Plato
"People learn from their failures, but it's just as important to learn from your successes. It's too easy in the celebrations of success, to forget to think, about why you have succeeded and others have not." - Ravi Silari
"Accepting yourself and loving who you are automatically changes what you attract, tolerate, and allow into your life. "
"I need to launch the USS Brownfish" - woman on Ray Donovan.
"Life is nothing until it is lived; but it is yours to make sense of, and the value of it is nothing else but the sense that you choose..." Jean-Paul Sartre
"Believe and act as if it were impossible to fail."  Charles Kettering
"The impulse to cruelty is, in many people, almost as violent as the impulse to sexual love - almost as violent and much more mischievous." - Aldous Huxley
"To know that we know what we know, and to know that we do not know what we do not know, that is true knowledge." - Nicolaus Copernicus
"Everything will be okay in the end. If it's not okay, it's not the end." - John Lennon
"The man who asks a question is a fool for a minute, the man who does not ask is a fool for life." - Confucius
"The goal of a leader should be to build a group that can run effectively even in the absence of a leader." - Ravi Silari
"All things are in the Universe, and the universe is in all things: we in it, and it in us; in this way everything concurs in a perfect unity." - Giordano Bruno
"The goal of a leader should be to build a group that can run effectively even in the absence of a/the leader." - Ravi Silari
"If an injury must be done to someone, it must be so severe their vengeance must not be feared".- Niccolo Machiavelli
"I've seen the needle and the damage done / A little part of it in everyone / But every junkie's like a settin' sun" - Neil Young
"Something will grow from what you are going through. And it will be You"
"If someone says it"s raining and another person says it"s dry, it"s not your job to quote them both. It"s your job to look out the window and find out which is true."
"There are two kinds of suffering. There is the suffering you run away from, which follows you everywhere. And there is the suffering you face directly, and so become free." - Ajahn Chah
"My Goal is to not wake up at forty with a bitter realization that I've wasted my life in a job I hate, because I was forced to decide on a career in my teens" - Daria
"What's daunting isn't the predicament you're in, but the choice you'll have to make."( from Perfect Match drama)
"Ten years I devoted to the duty you charged me. Ten years I looked after those who'd died at sea. And finally, when we could be together again, you weren't there. Why weren't you there?" - Davy Jones
"Many of you know that I got my name, Barack, from my father. What you may not know is Barack is actually Swahili for 'That One.' And I got my middle name from somebody who obviously didn't think I'd ever run for president." -Barack Obama
"A person who won't read has no advantage over one who can't read." - Mark Twain
"Some books are parties to which you are invited, full of friends who are there even when you have no friends." -Rebecca Solnit
"Some books seem like a key to unfamiliar rooms in one"s own castle." -Kafka
"Absolute, true and mathematical time, of itself, and from its own nature flows equably without relation to anything external." - Isaac Newton
"And thence arise certain prejudices, for the removing of which it will be convenient to distinguish them into absolute and relative, true and apparent, mathematical and common." - Isaac Newton
"Whenever anybody would come by, I would cram my notes into my desk drawer and pretend to work on my office work." Albert Einstein
"The ego is like a tired old dog. We can never kill it, so put it out on the back porch, let it rest there, and step around it." - Carlos Castaneda
"You cannot teach a man anything, you can only help him find it within himself" - Galileo
"God has eyes for everyone,even for those who prefer to be blind to the love that's in him" (William Ventura)
"The confidence of a leader waxes and wanes like any human being. The difference is when waning they're better at not showing it." - Ravi Silari
"The lament is a human complain that affect many people,and that fortunately is an essencial way of life the option to lament" (William Ventura)
"Lack of activity destroys the good condition of every human being, while movement and methodical physical exercise save it and preserve it."  Plato
"Cowards never start, weak never finish, strong never quit." -CJ Chan
"Asking a working writer what he thinks about critics is like asking a lamppost how it feels about dogs."  Christopher Hampton
"It is said that power corrupts, but actually it's more true that power attracts the corruptible. The sane are usually attracted by other things than power."  David Brin
"Television is a new medium. It's called a medium because nothing is well-done."  Fred Allen
"I passionately hate the idea of being with it, I think an artist has always to be out of step with his time."  Orson Welles
"One of the first things I think young people... should learn is how to see for yourself and listen for yourself and think for yourself. -Malcolm X 1964
"It's good to compartmentalise your mind. Imagine boxes, containing issues from one aspect of your life from spilling over into another. With time, you won't have to imagine boxes. You'll naturally come to have a structured, clear and organised mind." - Ravi Silari
"When skirting around an argument how good to smile, nod and agree, reassure, and walk away having absorbed nothing. It's a cold Machiavellian tool in the box, a way one can put out smoldering fires." - Ravi Silari
"When listening to something one does not agree with, one should smile, nod and agree, and walk away having absorbed nothing. Whoever puts out a smoldering fire won't get burnt." - Ravi Silari
"Luck is what you have left over after you give 100 percent." Langston Coleman
"There is nothing which we receive with so much reluctance as advice."  Joseph Addison
"It took me fifteen years to discover I had no talent in writing, but I couldn"t give it up because by then I was too famous."  Robert Benchley
"Generations to come will scarce believe that such a one as this ever in flesh and blood walked upon this earth. (said of Mahatma Gandhi)" - Albert Einstein
"The greater someone's emotional involvement and ties to something, the harder it is to find freedom from worry. One must interact with something being prepared to let it go at any moment; freedom from worry is a source of happiness." - Ravi Silari
"You know what 'FAILING' stands for? It stands for 'Finding An Important Lesson, Inviting Needed Growth." - Gary Busey
"For everything that happens, there happens to sooner or later be a perfect justification." - Ravi Silari
"The aim is to balance the terror of being alive with the wonder of being alive." - Carlos Castaneda
"Grief is tremendous, but love is bigger. You are grieving because you loved truly."
"Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars." - Khalil Gibran
"Xans don"t make me who I am" -Literally lil Xan
"For last year"s words belong to last year"s language and next year"s words await another voice. And to make an end is to make a beginning."  T.S. Eliot
"Who has not asked himself at some time or other: am I a monster or is this what it means to be a person?" - Clarice Lispector
"Everything passes, Everything changes, Just do what you think you should do." - Bob Dylan
"The truth that many people never understand until it is too late is that the more you try to avoid suffering, the more you suffer." - Thomas Merton
"A revolution without dancing is not a revolution worth having." -Emma Goldman
"A fracture heart because of sadness,can affect not only our life,but the bones of the soul" (William Ventura)
"It doesn't matter the number of times we end up adding downs and losses in our life,if we have the zero option to start subtracting or adding numbers again,and have a better result" (William Ventura)
"The secret of being a bore is to tell everything."  Voltaire
"When men are pure, laws are useless; when men are corrupt, laws are broken."  Benjamin Disraeli
"There is only one thing a philosopher can be relied upon to do, and that is to contradict other philosophers."  William James
"Why isn't there a special name for the tops of your feet?"  Lily Tomlin
"Somebody said I"m the Ernest Hemingway of 140 characters." - Donald Trump (November 2015)
"I was never really insane except upon occasions when my heart was touched." Edgar Allan Poe
"The person who yields in an escalating argument is not necessarily the weaker one, if they see that the value of the relationship is more important to them than the argument, they are in fact the wiser one." - Ravi Silari
"The White House may have been cavalier about a shutdown because they didn't fully understand what it entailed and we quote the Trump administration which had not anticipated a long-term shutdown recognized only this week the breadth of the potential impact."
"Walk twenty miles and the accent might change, walk twenty more and the language might change. Walk another forty, a hundred, but the people don't change." - Ravi Silari
"A man who suffers or stresses before it is necessary, suffers more than is necessary." - Seneca the Younger
"The person who can stay silent during an argument is usually the winner, for they have drained the other person's energy at no cost to themselves." - Ravi Silari
"The art of being happy lies in the power of extracting happiness from common things."  Henry Ward Beecher
"Flying is the art of being able to throw yourself at the ground and miss" - Douglas Adams
"The world is an illusion, but an illusion which we must take seriously." -Aldous Huxley
"The world is an illusion, but an illusion which we must take seriously." - Aldous Huxley
"If we evolved a race of Isaac Newtons, that would not be progress. For the price Newton had to pay for being a supreme intellect was that he was incapable of friendship, love, fatherhood, and many other desirable things. As a man he was a failure; as a monster he was superb." - Aldous Huxley
"Perhaps it is a mystery, tho maybe it"s a shame, that goodness leads a quiet life with little to proclaim, while all about this peopled place opinions and blame are flung at lonely listeners, who listen to complain." Nikolas Rosinsaw, 1884
"Love is giving someone the ability to destroy you, and trusting them not to do it"
"When I was a carpenter, I once worked with this Russian lady architect. I would tell her, "Look, I"m terribly sorry, but I want to change that half an inch," and she would say "No limit for better." I think that is a worthy credo." - Harrison Ford
"War, police shootings, and conflict in general, no matter how justified it may be, should never be met with applause or fanfare; but rather a somber acceptance if its necessity."
"Don"t downgrade your dreams just to fit your reality. Upgrade your conviction to match your destiny." -Stuart Scott
"Wisdom is knowing I am nothing, Love is knowing I am everything, and between the two my life moves." -Nisargadatta Maharaj
"I wont let go until ive ripped out your soul"-third hokage (naruto S3 ep23)
"Old people make good clerics and druids, but contrary to popular belief, are terrible wizards" - Moose Hole
"Time has an inclination of lending value to words." - Ravi Silari
"The deepest sin against the human mind is to believe things without evidence." - Aldous Huxley
"The goal in life is to discover that you"ve always been where you were supposed to be." - Aldous Huxley
"We all make choices in life, but in the end our choices make us." Bioshock
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky
"My grandma always said that God made libraries so that people didn't have any excuse to be stupid." - Joan Bauer
"Life is like a game of cards. The hand you are dealt is determinism; The way you play it is free will." - Jawaharlal Nehru
"When you buy a product, you don"t just buy the product: you buy everything that company stands for." - Ashley Asti
"You Create your own opportunities" - Guy Kawasaki
"Nothing of value is free. Even the breath of life is purchased at birth only through gasping effort and pain." - Robert A. Heinlein
"When will you learn that there isn't a word for everything?" - Nicole Krauss, The History of Love
"Man cannot remake himself without suffering, for he is both the marble and the sculptor." - Alexis Carrel
"It's just a game, you are a child, a creative elf living as a jewel inside the crown of a big frog: have fun!" - Me on 6g of Psilocybin
"You were born an original. Don"t die a copy."  John Mason
"Most ignorance is vincible ignorance. We don't know because we don't want to know." - Aldous Huxley
"The lioness does not try to be the lion. She embraces her role as the lioness. She is powerful, strong, and nurturing. She does not mistake her meekness for weakness. The world needs more kind, compassionate, humble, faithful, persevering, confident, fierce, bold, pure, and tender-hearted women."
20 years from now men will learn that the women empowerment was bitching empowerment.
"Before you get all butt-hurt and offended, ask yourself why it bothers you so much. Maybe the problem is you, not it. Only the weak are constantly offended by things that have nothing to do with us."  Larry Winget
"Humanity celebrates its laurels; it does not come to rest on them." - Ravi Silari
"Lose your mind and come into your senses." Fritz Perls
"Travel as much as you can . As far as you can. As long as you can. Life's not meant to be lived in one place" -Will smith
"Do not live your life trying to impress someone else, and do not live your life trying to be someone you're not, and do not live your life making yourself miserable just to amount to someone else's idealism. You don't want your life to be the structure of someone else's dream." - XXXTENTACION
"In short, oddities only strike ordinary people. Oddities do not strike odd people. This is why ordinary people have a much more exciting time; while odd people are always complaining of the dulness of life." G.K. Chesterton
"Everyone has a purpose in life. Perhaps yours is watching television."  David Letterman
"Lawyers, I suppose, were children once."  Charles Lamb
"If we don't succeed, we run the risk of failure."  Anonymous
"It is always the best policy to speak the truth--unless, of course, you are an exceptionally good liar."  Jerome K. Jerome
"Watch out for the man whose stomach doesn't move when he laughs." - Cantonese proverb
"If everybody in the world showed empathy to each other, if people took the time to put themselves in other people's shoes before acting or speaking, then there would be no requirement for sympathy in the world." - Ravi Silari
"If everybody in the world showed empathy to each other, if people took the time to put themselves in other people's shoes before acting or speaking, then there would be no requirement for sympathy in the world." - Ravi Silari
"No one can escape betraying their intentions. Even hiding intentions, or downplaying them, there is intention behind that also. Psychology is like a spotlight, when turned on it illuminates absolutely everyone and their behaviours." - Ravi Silari
"Announcing your plans is a good way to hear God laugh" -- David Milch
"And you have to realize that you cannot hope to console yourself for your grief by writing. You cannot deceive yourself by hoping for caresses and lullabies from your vocation." Natalia Ginzburg.
"If youth knew; if age could."  Sigmund Freud
"The Universe does not judge you if you have lived a good or bad life. That distinction is a human invention. While we try to live up to good by this invention all our lives, only at the end of our life would we have the right to say that there is no judgement." - Ravi Silari
"The Universe does not judge you if you have lived a good or bad life. That distinction is a human invention. While we try to live up to good by this invention all out lives, only at the end of life would we have the right to say there is no judgement." - Ravi Silari
"The more things change, the more they stay the same" -Jean-Baptiste Alphonse Karr
"Disdain the things you cannot have. Ignoring them is the best revenge." - Robert Greene
"When I hear somebody sigh, Life is hard, I am always tempted to ask, "Compared to what?'"  Sydney Harris
"Hell isn't merely paved with good intentions; it's walled and roofed with them. Yes, and furnished too." - Aldous Huxley
"There are only two timeframes which matter; Today, and 10 years from now. If you focus on these two points in time, the rest will take care of itself." - Unknown
"Losers Lose, and you"re a loser,"
"The honest truth is that I'm not just a 'slowflake millineal'. Despite every moment showing the opposite I have your temper, dad, and I judge everyone every bit as much as you, mom. The difference is I know I'm wrong and I ignore those thoughts and crush that anger to make the world better."
"[French cuisine] is not honest food. Everything's covered in sauces. Who knows what's underneath?" -Duchess of Buccleuch, "Victoria" season 2 episode 5 (BBC)(2017)
"Most of one's life is one prolonged effort to prevent oneself thinking." -Aldous Huxley
"Most of one's life is one prolonged effort to prevent oneself thinking." - Aldous Huxley
"When you"re good at something, you"ll tell everyone. When you"re great at something, they"ll tell you." - Walter Payton
"Balanced as all things should be" - Thanos
'He who possesses art and science has religion; he who does not possess them, needs religion." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Verily the lust for comfort murders the passion of the soul, and then walks grinning in the funeral." - Kahlil Gibran.
"There's a lot of Black guys with little weiners" - Black lady on TMZ.
"When there is no enemy within, the enemy outside can do you no harm." - African proverb
"If you're searching for enlightenment in politics, you should probably find a better religion." David Harsanyi
"Life is too short to safely remove USB" -unknown
"As martyrs have said since time immemorial, 'No man may take my life from me, for I lay it down'. This is not a suicide, this is a revolutionary sacrifice protesting the conditions of an inhumane world." - Jim Jones, Reverend of the Peoples Temple
"As martyrs have said since time immemorial, 'no man can take my life from me for I who lay it down'. This is not a suicide this is a revolutionary sacrifice protesting the conditions of an inhumane world." - Jim Jones, Reverend of the Peoples Temple
"Where there is a great deal of free speech there is always a certain amount of foolish speech." -- Winston Churchill
"When eagles are silent, the parrots begin to jabber." -- Winston Churchill
"You can volunteer to take life seriously, but it is going to get you. You know they're going to win over you. It's harsh. You can either break down and complain about how miserable your life is, or have a go at it and survive. I think that's the basis of it all" - Billy Connolly, January 2019
"If you want your children to be intelligent, read them fairy tales. If you want them to be more intelligent, read them more fairy tales." - Albert Einstein
"The words that come the soul shouldn't be denied entry to the ears of the heart" (William Ventura)
"Lifes a garden dig it"
"People intoxicate themselves with work so they won't see how they really are." - Aldous Huxley
"An unexciting truth may be eclipsed by a thrilling lie." - Aldous Huxley
"One often meets his destiny on the road he takes to avoid it" - Oogway
"Be thankful if one offers you generosity, be warned if someone offers you excess generosity." - Ravi Silari
"The great tragedy of Science - the slaying of a beautiful hypothesis by an ugly fact."  Thomas H. Huxley
"The trouble with America is that there are far too many wide-open spaces surrounded by teeth."  Charles Luckman
"At times one remains faithful to a cause only because its opponents do not cease to be insipid."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Imagination is more important than knowledge..."  Albert Einstein
"I choose a lazy person to do a hard job. Because a lazy person will find an easy way to do it." - Bill Gates
"Stop shaking the ladder you little shit" My grandad, mere seconds before he passed away.
"It always seems impossible until it's done"
"Germans are capable of only work or war" u/emmanuelbassil
"Stop trying to change the world since it is only the mirror. Man"s attempt to change the world by force is as fruitless as breaking a mirror in the hope of changing his face. Leave the mirror and change your face. Leave the world alone and change your conceptions of yourself." -Neville Goddard
"If he doesn"t build the wall, the next president will be a Democrat." - Ann Coulter.
"We must be willing to let go of the life we have planned, so as to have the life that is waiting for us."  E. M. Forster
"When one sees in a Machiavellian way that everyone around them is a filter of information, one can begin passing information selectively through the filters for a tactical effect. Information flows through people like streams. Some end, others turn into rivers." - Ravi Silari
"Politics is show business for ugly people" - Bill Miller
"No matter if those 9-5 hours kill us, we won"t waste one grain of sand in these glasses of ours." -McCody
"It's one thing to disagree with a person for their views, it's another thing to belittle a person for their views." - Ravi Silari
"When one sees in a Machiavellian way that everyone around them is a filter of information, one can begin passing information selectively through the filters for a tactical effect. Information flows through people like streams. Some end, other turn into rivers". - Ravi Silari
"The arc of the moral universe is long, but it bends towards justice." - Dr. King
...
"A career path is rarely a path at all. A more interesting life is usual a more crooked, winding path of missteps, luck and vigorous work. It is almost always a clumsy balance between the things you try to make happen and the things that happen to you." - Tom Freston
"The most valuable of all education is the ability to make yourself do the thing you have to do, when it has to be done, whether you like it or not." - Aldous Huxley
"As Alighier from holy heaven, I am covered up with the rotten hell."
"Don"t conform to societal norms, because life is much more better when you stick to your own path."
"The best of humanity is borne out of suffering. Good rarely comes from privilege, but they are outnumbered ten or a hundred to one." - Ravi Silari
"The propagandist's purpose is to make one set of people forget that certain other sets of people are human." -Aldous Huxley
"The propagandist's purpose is to make one set of people forget that certain other sets of people are human." - Aldous Huxley
"Nobody is against you, everyone is just for themselves" - Unknown
"When the president does it, that means that it is not illegal." - Richard Nixon
"If religion is a reaction of man, and nothing more, it seems to me that it represents a human desire for wrongdoers to be punished." - Vince Gilligan
"I enjoy sharing my books as I do my friends, asking only that you treat them well and see them safely home." - Ernest Morgan
"A big gun doesn"t make a big man." - Commander Cody
"You know what the scariest thing is? To not know your place in this world. To not know why you're here... That's... That's just an awful feeling." - Mr. Glass
"Hindsight is 20/20"
"A good act doesn't wash out the bad, nor bad the good. Each has it's own reward." - Stannis Baratheon, A Clash of Kings
365 Opportunity
"Let your dream devour your life, not your life devour your dream." - Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Sports don't build character. They reveal it." - Heywood Hale Broun
"describing my pain is like talking to the deaf trying to describe colour to a blind man."
"I'm running from the shadow of my former shadow's life Sometimes I wonder if I was ever really there? Right now it feels like killing time"
"It's not about being fearless, it's about acting in spite of fear." - Veronica Roth
"I may not be there yet but I am closer than I was yesterday." - Jos N. Harris
"Thunderbolt and lightning, very very frightening me!" - Galileo
"If you are not criticized, you may not be doing much."  Donald H. Rumsfeld
"I don't know anything about music. In my line you don't have to."  Elvis Presley
"Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear - not absence of fear."  Mark Twain
"Learn from yesterday, live for today, hope for tomorrow"
"Raw arrogance, exposed to values, checked by society, reworked through the fires of mistakes, and beaten by the hammer of regular work, turns into quiet confidence. An arrogant person is always raw material, a confident person is always a finished product." - Ravi Silari
"Every person that comes into our life comes for a reason; some come to learn and others come to teach." -Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Every person that comes into our life comes for a reason; some come to learn and others come to teach." - Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"The sweetest of all sounds is praise."  Xenophon
"Have a nice day, if it is a nice day, which I doubt." - Eeyore
"Suffering becomes beautiful when anyone bears great calamities with cheerfulness, not through insensibility but through greatness of mind." - Aristotle
"This is my own private domicile and I will not be harassed... bitch!" - Jesse Pinkman, Breaking Bad
"Do not allow your ego to muddle your mind. Instead, fill it with the enthusiasm of a child, until it erupts like a supernova." Memos Mine
"Do not allow your ego to muddle your mind. Instead, fill it with the enthusiasm of a child, until it erupts like a supernova." [-Memos Mine](https://www.memosmine.com/the-mine/category/the-memos/)
"Politics is nothing more than figuring out what people want, why they want it, and how they plan to get it. When one figures out and knows all three, one can begin to talk about power." - Ravi Silari
"Your actions reveal how badly you want something. If you keep saying something is a priority but you never act on it, then you don"t really want it. It"s time to have an honest conversation with yourself. Your actions reveal your true motivations."
"Reminding someone of their past mistakes does not solve the problem. It is easy to condemn one for one's mistakes even if that person has repented. Rather, in that moment look back to the good deeds they have done after their mistake/s, and you will spare that person much pain." - Ravi Silari
"If you have a job where you're doing what you love, you never work a day in your life" - Kanye West
"Reminding someone of their past mistakes does not solve the problem. It is too easy to condemn one for one's mistakes even if that person has repented. It is like comparing two different human beings within one body. People can really change that much." - Ravi Silari
"Do not hate. Hate is not so good and to be paranoid is a bust. Feel love that comes from us and try to feel love that you can offer at least from within yourselves, for yourselves" - Christine Christopher Christian Weston Chandler
"The secret of genius is to carry the spirit of the child into old age, which means never losing your enthusiasm." - Aldous Huxley
"War, war never changes...". -Fallout: A Post Nuclear Role Playing Game 1997
"Most people are other people. Their thoughts are someone else's opinions, their lives a mimicry, their passions a quotation." - Oscar Wilde
"Love lasts for a lifetime, resentment lasts forever."
"What the majority of people consider to be 'reasonable' is that about which there is agreement, if not among all, at least among a substantial number of people; 'reasonable' for most people, has nothing to do with reason, but with consensus." - Erich Fromm
"The only lies for which we are truly punished are those we tell ourselves." - V. S. Naipaul
"Laugh and the world laughs with you, snore and you sleep alone." - Anthony Burgess
"The pleasures of ignorance are as great, in their way, as the pleasures of knowledge." - Aldous Huxley
[Looking for a quote and google is no help]something to the effect of if we found a way to create a perfect world, humans would shatter it just to see what happens. Can anyone direct me to the originator of this?
"Know the difference between a catastrophe and an inconvenience. To realize that it"s just an inconvenience, that it is not a catastrophe, but just an unpleasantness, is part of coming into your own, part of waking up." - Bruce Lee
"When pain, misery, or anger happen, it is time to look within you, not around you." - Sadhguru
"Never lend books, for no one ever returns them; the only books I have in my library are books that other folks have lent me." - Anatole France
"How can we win, when fools can be kings?" - Matt Bellamy
"War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength." -George Orwell
"Strategy is an art form. Those who plan for the future without following rules, rules here today and gone tomorrow, are artists. It is a subjective experience, and like all arts, deliver immense pleasure when a strategy is executed properly and is successful." - Ravi Silari
"You're fresh to the the new year. I'm already three years into it." - Drunk Uber Passenger
"All straight men are into traps - some are just in denial." - Manila Luzon
"We become what we think about." - Earl Nightingale
"If we confine something to one place, it will only get ruined. If we bring it out and make it beneficial for others as well, that art form would exist forever." - P. K. Narayanan Nambiar (Mizhavu Instrument Grandmaster)
"To say that a man is made up of certain chemical elements is a satisfactory description only for those who intend to use him as a fertilizer."  Herbert J. Muller
"Beauty is in the eye of the beholder and it may be necessary from time to time to give a stupid or misinformed beholder a black eye."  Miss Piggy
"Man is a clever animal who behaves like an imbecile."  Albert Schweitzer
"The penalty for laughing in a courtroom is six months in jail; if it were not for this penalty, the jury would never hear the evidence."  H. L. Mencken
"May All Your Troubles Last As Long As Your New Year"s Resolutions!" - Joey Adams
"The best way out is always through." -Robert Frost
"Popularity should be no scale for the election of politicians. If it would depend on popularity, Donald Duck and The Muppets would take seats in senate." - Orson Welles
"Race hate isn't human nature; race hate is the abandonment of human nature." - Orson Welles
"I think in terms of the day's resolutions, not the years'."  Henry Moore
"I like many things in this world and a few persons- I like you, for example; but after they are served I have no love to waste upon the irreclaimable mass of brutality that we know as "mankind." Compassion, yes; I am sincerely sorry that they are brutes." - Ambrose Bierce in a letter
"Fear leads mankind into the abyss of ignorance." - Ravi Silari
"Now this is not the end. It is not even the beginning of the end. But it is, perhaps, the end of the beginning." -Churchill
"The only people we can think of as normal are those we don"t yet know very well." -Alain de Botton
"Memories are so much worse in the dark." - The Doctor
"You gotta just take a deep breath... and give up. The system is rigged against you! Your hard work and talent will never pay off." - Bo Burnham
"Oompa Loompa Doopa-Dee-Dah If you're not greedy, you will go far! You will live in happiness to, Like the Oompa Loompa Doopa-Dee-Doo! Doopa-Dee-Doo!" -Roald Dahl
"People will come to love their oppression, to adore the technologies that undo their capacities to think." - Aldous Huxley
"But can you do this?!?!'. -Pewdiepie
"The Old Year has gone. Let the dead past bury its own dead. The New Year has taken possession of the clock of time. All hail the duties and possibilities of the coming twelve months!" - Edward Payson Powell
"Darkness, the truest darkness, is not the absence of light. It is the conviction that the light will never return. But the light always returns to show us things familiar, Home, Family, and things entirely new, or long overlooked. It shows us new possibilities and challenges us to pursue them..."
"It is difficult to respect an elder who does not understand a youth's longing to demonstrate their own wisdom."
"What is hell? I maintain that it is the suffering of being unable to love." -Dostoevsky
"Many times we find ourselves disappointed in a person's response, later to find only we shouldn't have ever asked in the first place."
"Actually, buffalo wings don"t come from buffalos, they come from chickens." -Neil DeGrasse Tyson
"The greatest illusion of this world is the illusion of separation. Things you think are separate and different are actually one and the same. We are all one people, but we live as if divided." -Guru Pathik
"a real man never worries about mistakes until it's too late " electroboom
"Don"t worry about the world coming to an end today. It is already tomorrow in Australia."  Charles Schulz
"Nothing ever ends poetically. It ends and we turn it into poetry. All that blood was never once beautiful. It was just red." -Kait Rokowski
"I made no resolutions for the New Year. The habit of making plans, of criticizing, sanctioning and molding my life, is too much of a daily event for me."- Anas Nin
"It has been said by some physicians, that life is a forced state. The same may be said of freedom. It requires efforts, it presupposes mental and moral qualities of a high order to be generally diffused in the society where it exists." - John C. Calhoun
"Did you ever feel, as though you had something inside you that was only waiting for you to give it a chance to come out? Some sort of extra power that you aren't using - you know, like all the water that goes down the falls instead of through the turbines?" -Aldous Huxley
"Live every week like it's Shark Week" -Tracy Jordan/Morgan 30 Rock
"Did you ever feel, as though you had something inside you that was only waiting for you to give it a chance to come out? Some sort of extra power that you aren't using - you know, like all the water that goes down the falls instead of through the turbines?" - Aldous Huxley
'If you do start to feel a shadow, or a shadow of a shadow of happiness grab hold with both hands and let it slowly draw you closer the sunset painted horizon" - Unknown
"New year - a new chapter, new verse, or just the same old story? Ultimately we write it. The choice is ours." - Alex Morritt
"If I had asked people what they wanted, they would have said faster horses." - Henry Ford
"Keep on going, and the chances are that you will stumble on something, perhaps when you are least expecting it. I never heard of anyone ever stumbling on something sitting down." - Charles F. Kettering
"it's better to go too far than not far enough"
"If most of us remain ignorant of ourselves, it is because self-knowledge is painful and we prefer the pleasures of illusion." - Aldous Huxley
"How strong is your purpose if you live another mans word, it"s takes a wise man to always over stand and observe". -Melanin 9, Strange Fruit
"Dropping the reputation of others does not lift you up"
"You are never too old to set a new goal or dream a new dream" - CS Lewis
"The great enemy of clear language is insincerity. When there is a gap between one's real and one's declared aims, one turns as it were instinctively to long words and exhausted idioms, like a cuttlefish spurting out ink."  George Orwell
"You live and learn. At any rate, you live."  Douglas Adams
"Truth is beautiful, without doubt; but so are lies."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"A friend is someone who will help you move. A real friend is someone who will help you move a body."  Unknown
"When in doubt, refrain from trusting your heart and gut instinct. Rather, ask what are the probabilities and trust them. The odds never lie, and prove a solid bedrock for decision making at any time, but they prove especially useful while your emotions are troubled." - Ravi Silari
"Let 2019 be the year of living fearless and free." - Mark Anthony
"Each iteration is meant to be better."
"Creativity is intelligence having fun." -Albert Einstein
"Great spirits have always encountered opposition from mediocre minds." - Albert Einstein
"Wherever the choice has had to be made between the man of reason and the madman, the world has unhesitatingly followed the madman." - Aldous Huxley
"The people of tomorrow might look back upon this time and say that half the world was economically unproductive every night due to sleep. If technology develops, there is a chance the people of tomorrow might not require sleep, and per 24-hrs global economic output might double." - Ravi Silari
"The people of tomorrow might look back upon this time and say that half the world was economically unproductive every night due to sleep. If technology develops, there is a chance the people of tomorrow might not require sleep, and every day global economic output will be double." - Ravi Silari
"A block is a two-way transaction, by one to inflict hurt on the other. As long as both users exist and maintain accounts, this contract exists. But what if the blocked packs up and leaves? The blocker will go their whole life smugly, while the blocked will live even more smugly." - Anon
"Life itself is only a vision; A dream. Nothing exists, but an empty space and you. And you are but a thought." -Satan (The Adventures of Mark Twain)
"We can"t direct the wind, but we can adjust the sails. For maximum happiness, peace, and contentment, may we choose a positive attitude."  Thomas S. Monson
"Only optimists commit suicide, optimists who no longer succeed at being optimists. The others, having no reason to live, why would they have any to die?" - Emil Cioran
"Almost none of us commit suicide, and almost all of us self-destruct. In some way, in some part of our lives. We drink, or we smoke, we destabilize the good job, and a happy marriage. But these aren't decisions, they're...they're impulses." Dr. Ventress (Annihilation)
"I don't know about your true form, but the weight of your ego sure is pushing the crust of the earth toward the breaking point." - Jim Butcher
"No one is useless in this world who lightens the burdens of another."  Charles Dickens
"The more powerful and original a mind, the more it will incline towards the religion of solitude." -Aldous Huxley
"The more powerful and original a mind, the more it will incline towards the religion of solitude." - Aldous Huxley
"Someday when we die we will lose all our possessions, our power, our family, everything. Our freedom, peace and joy in the present moment is the most important thing we have. But without an awakened understanding of impermanence, it is not possible to be happy."
"The Earth is littered with the ruins of empires that once belived they were eternal."-Camille Paglia
"All gods are homemade, and it is we who pull their strings, and so, give them the power to pull ours." - Aldous Huxley
"Nothing in nature is random..... A thing appears random only through the incompleteness of our knowledge." - Baruch Spinoza
"Don"t trust what you see, even salt looks like sugar" -Salt and Sugar guy
"Consistency is contrary to nature, contrary to life. The only completely consistent people are dead." -Aldous Huxley
"Consistency is contrary to nature, contrary to life. The only completely consistent people are dead." - Aldous Huxley
"The key to longevity is to learn every aspect of music that you can" - Prince
"Aspire to be the person you pretend to be to be when your trying to get laid...if you can be that person all the time you will have a much better life" -Joe Rogan
"We are worthy of love and belonging now. Right this minute. As is." - Bren Brown, The Gifts of Imperfection
"A lot of parents will do anything for their kids, except let them be themselves" - Banksy
"Beware of being too rational. In the country of the insane, the integrated man doesn't become king. He gets lynched." - Aldous Huxley
"Don't try to behave as though you were essentially sane and naturally good. We're all demented sinners in the same cosmic boat - and the boat is perpetually sinking." - Aldous Huxley
"Always pray to have eyes that see the best in people, a heart that forgives the worst, a mind that forgets the bad, and a soul that never loses faith in God."
"If you will it, it is no dream; and if you don't,a dream it is and a dream it will stay." - Theodor Herzl
"A man who fears suffering is already suffering from what he fears." - Michel de Montaigne
"It was neither possible nor necessary to educate people who never questioned anything." Joseph Heller in Catch-22
"When love is seen and felt with the eyes of the heart,it's powerful and invisible to those who don't feel and are blind of love" (William Ventura)
"A sentimental person doesn't destroy feelings,only builds sentimental shelters for those who seek a heart where to live" (William Ventura)
"Those who try to be great are cursed," Sir Shadow said. "They have to worry about failure and perfection. No true artist says, "I"m great.""
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently."
"Just worry about yourself, cause I'ma get mine" - 'N Sync
"The only function of economic forecasting is to make astrology look respectable."  John Kenneth Galbraith
"You can't wait for inspiration. You have to go after it with a club."  Jack London
"Not a shred of evidence exists in favor of the idea that life is serious."  Brendan Gill
"Suffering is the sandpaper of our incarnation. It does its work of shaping us." - Ram Dass
"Be happy for this moment. This moment is your life." Omar Khayyam
"When I look into the eyes of an animal I do not see an animal. I see a living being. I see a friend. I feel a soul." - A. D. Williams
"Suffering is permanent, obscure and dark, And shares the nature of infinity." - William Wordsworth
"Build a man a fire, and he'll be warm for a day. Set a man on fire, and he'll be warm for the rest of his life." - Terry Pratchett
"You are frightened of everything. You call it caution. You call it common sense. You call it practicality. You call it playing the odds, but that's only because you're afraid to call it by its real name, and its real name is fear." - Mick Farren
"Every man regards his own life as the New Year's Eve of time."  Jean Paul
"Anxiety and nervousness is merely a form of excitement" -Dj
"The man who smiles when things go wrong has thought of someone to blame it on." - Robert Bloch
"Clothes make the man. Naked people have little or no influence on society." - Mark Twain
"When you have solved all the mysteries of life you long for death, for it is but another mystery of life." - Khalil Gibran
"Neither pleasure nor pain should enter as motives when one must do what must be done." - Julius Evola
"Don"t count the days, make the days count" - Muhammad Ali
"The original writer is not he who refrains from imitating others, but he who can be imitated by none." --Chateaubriand
"When suffering knocks at your door and you say there is no seat for him, he tells you not to worry because he has brought his own stool." -Chinua Achebe
"When suffering knocks at your door and you say there is no seat for him, he tells you not to worry because he has brought his own stool." - Chinua Achebe
"Boredom is a disease worse than cancer, drugs cure it." - Doug Stanhope
"It is not worth the bother of killing yourself, since you always kill yourself too late." - Emil Cioran
"There is only one corner of the universe you can be certain of improving, and that's your own self." - Aldous Huxley
"A comedian does funny things. A good comedian does things funny" - Buster Keaton
"It"s easy to forget what a sin is in the middle of a battlefield" - Solid Snake
"You forget a thousand things every day pal, make sure this is one of them." -Michael De Santa GTA V
"The sky is any color you want it to be if you never bother to look up" - Me
" The corruption of society occurs when wealth becomes the primary pursuit of the individual, ahead of virtue." - Aristotle
"Treat everyone like a gentleman, not because they are, but because you are" - Ed Sabol
"Have you ever noticed that anybody driving slower than you is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?" - George Carlin
"I would rather live in a world where my life is surrounded by mystery than live in a world so small that my mind could comprehend it." - Harry Emerson Fosdick
"Age is just a number, whats wrong with wrinkles, they are a record of every smile" -Dj
"Surround yourself with people who talk about visions and ideas, not other people." Akin Olokun
"You are like a hurricane, there's calm in your eye" - Neil Young
"Life is short, Break the Rules. Forgive quickly, Kiss slowly. Love truly. Laugh uncontrollably And never regret ANYTHING That makes you smile." - Mark Twain
"I do not keep a diary. Never have. To write a diary every day is like returning to one's own vomit" Enoch Powell
"Most people treat the present moment as if it were an obstacle that they need to overcome. Since the present moment is life itself, it is an insane way to live." - Eckhart Tolle
"when angry count to 4, when very angry swear" -Mark Twain
"Don't be distracted by criticism. Remember - the only taste of success some people get is to take a bite out of you." - Zig Ziglar
"While I thought that I was learning how to live, I have been learning how to die." - Leonardo da Vinci
10 Best Love Quotes For Him/Her
"Everyday I admire animals more,because they behave better than human animals" (William Ventura)
"Rich or poor makes no difference to talent." - Ravi Silari
"Ask your child what he wants for dinner only if he's buying."  Fran Lebowitz
"If you look good and dress well, you don't need a purpose in life."  Robert Pante
"I hate the outdoors. To me the outdoors is where the car is."  Will Durst
"There's only one way to have a happy marriage and as soon as I learn what it is I'll get married again."  Clint Eastwood
"Smile in the mirror. Do that every morning and you'll start to see a big difference in your life." Yoko Ono
"Evil is evil, lesser, greater, middling, makes no difference. The degree is arbitrary, the definition blurred. If I'm to choose between one evil and another, I'd rather not choose at all." -Geralt Of Rivia The Witcher 3
"One must have something to die for in order to have something to live for." -Carlos Castaneda
"One must have something to die for in order to have something to live for." - Carlos Castaneda
"We pass through this world but once."  Stephen Jay Gould
"Saving one person will not change the world, but surely for that one person, the world will change forever" - Russel Howard
"I don't care whether you love me or not. I don't know what life is going to bring, the only thing I know is that I'll love you forever, I'll like you for always, As Long as I'm living you'll be my everything" - Kushen Thimira AKA Cipher
"Take time to deliberate; but when the time for action arrives, stop thinking and go in." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Beware of those who weep with realization, for they have realized nothing." - Carlos Castaneda
"I'd rather regret doing something than not doing something" - James Hetfield
"If people did not do silly things, nothing intelligent would ever get done." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Before anything else, preparation is the key to success." - Alexander Graham Bell
"Don't let the fear of losing be greater than the excitement of winning." - Robert Kiyosaki
"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have." - Thomas Jefferson
"Some people try to be tall by cutting off the heads of others." - Paramhansa Yogananda
"Life will bring you pain all by itself. Your responsibility is to create joy." - Milton Erickson
"A man of knowledge lives by acting, not by thinking about acting." -Carlos Castaneda
"A man of knowledge lives by acting, not by thinking about acting." - Carlos Castaneda
"You don't have to see the whole staircase, just take the first step." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"We love what we love. Reason does not enter into it. In many ways, unwise love is the truest love. Anyone can love a thing because. That's as easy as putting a penny in your pocket. But to love something despite. To know the flaws and love them too. That is rare and pure and perfect." P. Rothfuss
"Only the feeblest of men take jobs in the government."
"There's a saying that goes, The universe gives you a whisper, then a nudge, then a push and then an anvil on your head." - Sara Genn
"Real men ride swans." -Paul Flynn
"Men are born ignorant, not stupid; they are made stupid by education." -Bertrand Russell
"Experience doesn't necessarily correlate with wisdom. 'I know better' is the catchphrase that has been used by the old to subjugate youth since centuries, when it is the youth that innovate and find new efficiencies and build upon the old." - Ravi Silari
"How people treat you is their karma; how you react is yours." - Wayne Dyer
"Some people want to go on vacations to their dreams, others build their dreams to come home to." - Unknown
"Watching a baby being born is a little like watching a wet St. Bernard coming in through the cat door."--Jeff Foxworthy
"I fear not the man who has practiced 10,000 kicks once, but I fear the man who has practiced one kick 10,000 times." - Bruce Lee
"The less you talk, the more you're listened to" - Pauline Phillips
"But what creature could be so low as to go about in bands, to murder others of its own blood?" -T.H. White, The Once and Future King
"Letting go means to come to the realization that some people are a part of your history, but not a part of your destiny." - Steve Maraboli
"There is only one woman in the world. One woman with many faces. - Nikos Kazantzakis
"Some people can't stand being alone. I love solitude and silence. But when I come out of it, I'm a regular talking machine. It's all or nothing for me." -Celine Dion
"I have forgotten to stay positive or everyone else has forgotten to stay negative" - Unknown
"Great minds have purposes; others have wishes." - Washington Irving
"Never take a path that has no heart in it. You can't lose if your heart is in your work, but you can't win if your heart is not in it." - Carlos Castaneda
"The more attached to things you are, the less you can love them." - Psilocybe Cubensis
"The things we know best are the things we haven't been taught."  Marquis de Vauvenargues
"Television is for appearing on - not for looking at."  Noel Coward
"O Lord, help me to be pure, but not yet."  Saint Augustine
"Either this man is dead or my watch has stopped."  Groucho Marx
"How can two people hate so much without knowing each other?" -Batman The Killing Joke
"On a big, flying ball of dirt no one gets out clean. That"s why they bury you when you"re done." -This guy
"Smile, my boy. It's sunrise." -Robin Williams's Last Lines
"The less you talk, the more you're listened to."  Pauline Phillips
"When you need an answer, look over your left shoulder and ask your death." - Carlos Castaneda
"The world is a dangerous place to live in, not because of the people who are evil, but because of the people who do nothing about it." -Albert Einstein
"It's as if the entire world's fallen in love with their insanity." -David Draiman
"We must rather say that by nature men are only unequal" - Hegel
"No storyteller has been able to dream up anything as fantastically unlikely as what really does happen in this mad Universe." - Robert A. Heinlein
"If one realises even the wisest owl cannot comprehend 1% of what humans know, one can shift this scale to realise humans themselves might be comprehending only 1% of what there is to know in the Universe, and without further evolution the rest will always be out of our reach." - Ravi Silari
"The universe as we know it is a joint product of the observer and the observed." - Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
"I always arrive late at the office, but I make up for it by leaving early." - Charles Lamb
"One Zen master said, The whole universe is my true personality. This is a very wonderful saying... If you want to see what you truly are, open the window, and everything you see is in fact the expression of your inner reality. Can you embrace all of it?" - Adyashanti
"You can do a right thing simply by not doing the wrong thing." - Ravi Silari
"What I like about the costume is that anybody reading Spider-Man in any part of the world can imagine that they themselves are under the costume. And that"s a good thing." - Stan Lee
"Country music is like the Bible, there are 1000 different versions and you pick whatever adheres to your tastes." -Me
"I'm sure the universe is full of intelligent life. It's just been too intelligent to come here." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Blessed is the man who, having nothing to say, abstains from giving us wordy evidence of the fact." --George Eliot
"The fools of the world have been those who have established religions, ceremonies, laws, faith, rule of life." - Giordano Bruno
"Worry never robs tomorrow of its sorrow, but only saps today of its strength." - A.J. Cronin
"I beg you, reject antiquity, tradition, faith, and authority! Let us begin anew by doubting everything we assume has been proven!" - Giordano Bruno
"The ego is like a tired old dog. We can never kill it, so put it out on the back porch, let it rest there, and step around it." - Carlos Castaneda
"If you pay close enough attention, people will show you who they really are. When they do, believe them." - Unknown
"The distinction between good and evil is meaningless if one does not have the freedom to choose between them." - Jim Butcher
"People who worked for the public welfare, were not led by an impulse of the heart to care for the public good, but reasoned from intellectual considerations that it was a right thing to take interest in public affairs, and consequently took interest in them." -Leo Tolstoy
"The Cave You Fear to Enter Holds the Treasure That You Seek." -Joseph Campbell
"If you knew success was a certainty, what would you attempt to do?"
"Hell on earth would be to meet the man you could have been"
"Happiness is an attitude. We either make ourselves miserable, or happy and strong. The amount of work is the same." -- Carlos Castaneda
"Truth does not change because it is, or is not, believed by a majority of the people." - Giordano Bruno
"Opportunities do not float like clouds in the sky. They"re attached to people. If you"re looking for an opportunity, you"re really looking for a person." - Reid Hoffman
"Always look on the bright side of life" - Eric Idle
"A pessimist sees only the dark side of the clouds, and mopes; a philosopher sees both sides, and shrugs; an optimist doesn't see the clouds at all - he's walking on them."  Leonard Louis Levinson
"Transported to a surreal landscape, a young girl kills the first woman she meets and then teams up with three complete strangers to kill again."  Rick Polito
"What's another word for Thesaurus?"  Steven Wright
"This country has come to feel the same when Congress is in session as when the baby gets hold of a hammer."  Will Rogers
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it."Charles R. Swindoll
"The big secret of psychoanalysis is that the sexual act does not exist." - Jacques Lacan
"French fries. Or, as I call them, surrender potatoes." - me
"Never overlook the power of simplicity." - Robin S. Sharma
"I find television very educating. Every time somebody turns on the set, I go into the other room and read a book." - Groucho Marx
"One faces the future with one's past."  Pearl S. Buck
"All your sorrows have been wasted on you if you have not yet learned how to be wretched." - Seneca
"To understand one's person, you must ask what is one's motivation. Then, their past decision makings will become clear, and predictions on their future decisions can be attempted." - Ravi Silari
"To understand one's person, you must ask what is one's motivation. Then, their past decision makings will become clear, and predictions on their future decisions can be attempted." - Ravi Silari
"To understand one's person, you must ask what is one's motivation. Then, their past decision makings will become clear, and predictions on their future decisions can be attempted." - Ravi Silari
"To understand one's person, you must ask what is one's motivation. Then, all their past decision making is clear, and a prediction on their future decisions can be attempted." - Ravi Silari
"Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry, and narrow-mindedness" -Mark Twain
"There are only two tragedies in life: one is not getting what one wants, and the other is getting it." - Oscar Wilde
"It"s easier to fool people than to convince them that they"ve been fooled."  Unknown.
"Life is about the exception to the rule" -Friend of mine
"I looked into Paraside and I saw that the majority of its people were the poor. And I looked into Hell and I saw that the majority of its people are women." - Muhammad
"We may be in the universe as dogs and cats are in our libraries, seeing the books and hearing the conversation, but having no inkling of the meaning of it all." William James
"There's nothing more childish than the desire to grow up." - Unknown
"Trying to be happy by accumulating possessions is like trying to satisfy hunger by taping sandwiches all over your body." -Carlin
"It is necessary to meditate early, and often, on the art of dying to succeed later in doing it properly just once." - Umberto Eco
"Every great thinker is someone else's moron." - Umberto Eco
"I love deadlines. I like the whooshing sound they make as they fly by." Douglas Adams
"What I am really saying is that you don"t need to do anything, because if you see yourself in the correct way, you are all as much extraordinary phenomenon of nature as trees, clouds, the patterns in running water, the flickering of fire, the arrangement of the stars, and the form of a galaxy. You
"Everything before the word BUT is horse shit"
"There is always some madness in love. But there is also always some reason in madness" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"You cannot shake hands with a clenched fist." - Indira Gandhi
"Don"t be in a hurry to condemn because he doesn"t do what you do or think as you think or as fast. There was a time when you didn"t know what you know today."  Malcolm X
"Shoot your mouth if you know where you're aiming (...) Talking trash to the garbage around you."
"We never think entirely alone; we think in company, in a vast collaboration; we work with the workers of the past and of the present." --Sertillanges
"The storm had not the power to disturb my tranquility - it had the wisdom to stir my soul." -Me
"I believe that what we become depends on what our fathers teach us at odd moments, when they aren't trying to teach us. We are formed by little scraps of wisdom." - Umberto Eco
"Maybe man is incapable of peace. Maybe that is what differentiates man from a vegetable." - William Faulkner
"He came dancing across the water with his galleons and guns, looking for the new world in that palace in the sun" - Neil Young
"Don't dream so thoroughly that you refuse to start the journey." - Me
"I inhaled books like other people breathe oxygen. I didn't just read for knowledge or pleasure, I read to live." - Yeonmi Park, In Order to Live: A North Korean Girl's Journey to Freedom
"All I know is no iraqi ever called me n***er, no iraqi ever locked me up, no iraqi ever robbed me; but american pigs in uniforms have." - Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez in Highschool debate club
"it takes getting everything you ever wanted and then losing it, to know what true freedom is" - Lana Del Rey
"We have nothing to lose, nothing to gain, nothing we desired anymore- except to make our lives into a work of art." - Lana Del Rey
"What I have also learned in life is that people are (generally) nicer than what we give them credit for." - /u/PriorSearch
"The essence of philosophy is that a man should so live that his happiness shall depend as little as possible on external things"......... Epictetus
"People make decisions long before they think they make them." - Anon
"An intellectual is a person who has discovered something more interesting than sex." - Aldous Huxley
"Never give a party if you will be the most interesting person there."  Mickey Friedman
"Early morning cheerfulness can be extremely obnoxious."  William Feather
"Love thy neighbour as yourself, but choose your neighbourhood."  Louise Beal
"The Democrats stand for nothing except 'I wish I was a Republican'." - Frank Zappa
"Errors using inadequate data are much less than those using no data at all." - Charles Babbage
"He marveled at how much things had changed since his family broke the one-child policy when his younger sister was born. "The production brigade went to my home and took all valuable things from us, including the iron pot, and removed the door of our house."
"It's discouraging to think how many people are shocked by honesty and how few by deceit." - Nol Coward
"I"m in an amazing position in my life, but I"m still working like I"m not" - Conor McGregor
"And not unlike the birds, we all sing songs to celebrate, to mourn, or just hang on." - Tim McIlrath
"Death is a stripping away of all that is not you. The secret of life is to "die before you die" --- and find that there is no death." - Eckhart Tolle
"Cherish your human connections: your relationships with friends and family."  Joseph Brodsky
"I"m terrified to lose him for good, so I sell myself short and take what I can from him, even though I know I deserve better." - Colleen Hoover
"Knowing Is Not Enough; We Must Apply. Wishing Is Not Enough; We Must Do."  Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe
"The child is the father of the man" from the poem *My Heart Leaps Up* By William Wordsworth 1807
(#Chess) You cant separate your body from mind (Bobby Fischer)
"You have to be very fond of men. Very, very fond. You have to be very fond of them to love them. Otherwise they're simply unbearable." -Marguerite Duras
"It is necessary that I should die for my people, but my spirit will rise from the grave and the world will know I was right" - Adolf Hitler, April 1945
"The nearer people approach old age the closer they return to a semblance of childhood, until the time comes for them to depart this life, again like children, neither tired of living nor aware of death." - Desiderius Erasmus
"We"re all bad in someone"s story"  Unknown
"Man is a god in ruins." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"At the end of the day, you are a monster in someone else"s story"
"Don't praise the day till the sun has set" - Polish Proverb
"You don't start a business out of greed or the pursuit of money. You do it for the pursuit of freedom." - Kevin O'Leary
"It is necessary to meditate early, and often, on the art of dying to succeed later in doing it properly just once." - Umberto Eco
"The heart is a living museum. In each of its galleries, no matter how narrow or dimly lit, preserved forever like wondrous diatoms, are our moments of loving and being like." (-Diane Ackerman)
"Both the man of science and the man of action live always at the edge of mystery, surrounded by it." - J. Robert Oppenheimer
"While it is always best to believe in oneself,a little help from others can be a great blessing." - Uncle Iroh in Avatar: The Last Airbender
"Happiness is an inside job and has very little to do with substances, money, possessions, pleasure or circumstances"--Mathew Kelley
"Honesty is its own reward." -
"Life is like a movie; if you are sad-drama, if you are afraid-suspense, if you are angry-action, when you look in the mirror-horror. Now you are smiling - that"s comedy."-unknown
"The World is not dying, it is being killed, and those that are killing it have names and addresses" - Sam Hyde
"Should my wealth melt away it would deprive me of nothing but itself - if yours were to depart you would be stunned and feel you were deprived of what makes you yourself. My wealth has a certain place; in your case it has the highest place. In short, I own my wealth, your wealth owns you." - Seneca
"Do you know at this very moment you are surrounded by eternity? And do you know that you can use that eternity if you so desire?" - Carlos Castaneda
"In every day, there are 1,440 minutes. That means we have 1,440 daily opportunities to make a positive impact." - Les Brown
"If you are going through hell, keep going." -- Winston Churchill
"Good artists copy. Great artists steal. The best artists create." - O.P.
"Digital information cannot be said to truly exist unless that information has two or more copies."
"Digital information does not exist unless that information has two or more copies." -Unknown
"Keep your expectations low and you will never be disappointed." - Kratos
20 seconds of insane courage can change your life in insane ways. UNKOWN
"The world," Aelin said, "will be saved and remade by the dreamers, Rolfe." - Sarah J. Maas
"If you stay in Beverly Hills too long you become a Mercedes."  Robert Redford
"We are continually faced with a series of great opportunities brilliantly disguised as insoluble problems."  John W. Gardner
"Human beings are seventy percent water, and with some the rest is collagen."  Martin Mull
"Advertising is a valuable economic factor because it is the cheapest way of selling goods, particularly if the goods are worthless."  Sinclair Lewis
"The important things are always simple; the simple things, always hard." - Murphy's law of combat
"Science cannot solve the ultimate mystery of nature. And that is because, in the last analysis, we ourselves are a part of the mystery that we are trying to solve." - Max Planck
"I will honor Christmas in my heart, and try to keep it all the year."  Charles Dickens
"Keep your expectations low and you will never be disappointed." - Kratos
"One believes things because one has been conditioned to believe them."
"There is music in your soul. A wild and untamed sort of music that speaks to me. It defies all the rules and laws you humans set upon it. It grows from inside you, and I have a wish to set that music free." - S Jae Jones, Wintersong
"The test of our progress is not whether we add more to the abundance of those who have much, it is whether we provide enough for those who have little" - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"We are travelers on a cosmic journey, stardust, swirling and dancing in the eddies and whirlpools of infinity. Life is eternal. We have stopped for a moment to encounter each other, to meet, to love, to share. This is a precious moment. It is a little parenthesis in eternity." - Paulo Coelho
20 seconds
"All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given to us" - Gandalf (Tolkien)
"If you want to treat a child, you gotta think like a child"
"We have a limit, a very discouraging, humiliating limit: death. That's why we like all the things that we assume have no limits and, therefore, no end. It's a way of escaping thoughts about death. We like lists because we don't want to die." - Umberto Eco
"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome" - Isaac Asiimov
"It is important to do what you don't know how to do. It is important to see your skills as keeping you from learning what is deepest and most mysterious. If you know how to focus, unfocus. If your tendency is to make sense out of chaos, start chaos." - Carlos Castaneda
"Good artists create... Great artists steal" -picasso
"In the universe there is an immeasurable, indescribable force which shamans call intent, and absolutely everything that exists in the entire cosmos is attached to intent by a connecting link." - Carlos Castaneda
"Rome, they say, wasn't built in a day, or romance built in a night" - Fats Waller
"You are only young once, but you can be immature forever." -- John P. Grier
"Isn't Freedom a cage itself?"  Me
"Isn't Freedom is a cage itself?"  Me
"If you aren't in the moment, you are either looking forward to uncertainty, or back to pain and regret." - Jim Carrey
"It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it... anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job." - Douglas Adams
"We should only make heroes out of our future selves."
"A man with a conviction is a hard man to change. Tell him you disagree and he turns away. Show him facts or figures and he questions your sources. Appeal to logic and he fails to see your point." - Leon Festinger
"If someone doesn"t value logic, what logical argument could you provide?" - Sam Harris
"We are better throughout the year for having, in spirit, become a child again at Christmastime." -Laura Ingalls Wilder
"The problem with the designated driver program, it's not a desirable job, but if you ever get sucked into doing it, have fun with it. At the end of the night, drop them off at the wrong house."  Jeff Foxworthy
"The smaller the mind the greater the conceit."  Aesop
"A government that robs Peter to pay Paul can always depend on the support of Paul."  George Bernard Shaw
"2 is not equal to 3, not even for large values of 2."  Grabel's Law
"Haven't you struggled? Haven't I struggled? Hasn't Civilization struggled? Today, struggling is still primitive in some parts of the world. In others, struggling is highly sophisticated." - Anon
"The power of imagination makes us infinite."
"A moral compass can only point you in the right direction, it can't make you go there." - Grissom, CSI
"Maybe Christmas, the Grinch thought, doesn't come from a store."  Dr. Seuss
"The world is incomprehensible. We won't ever understand it; we won't ever unravel its secrets. Thus we must treat the world as it is: a sheer mystery." -Carlos Castaneda
"The world is incomprehensible. We won't ever understand it; we won't ever unravel its secrets. Thus we must treat the world as it is: a sheer mystery." - Carlos Castaneda
"Even if knowledge isn't true, it's still knowledgeable." -My Dad
"There's nothing any of us can do. We're all screwed" -Red Foreman
"You can lead a heart to love, but you can't make it fall." - George Strait
"Yesterday, the first day of the year, I looked into the future and trembled. Life is dreadful and hazardous  I envy anyone who is well and truly dead." - Nietzsche
"There is a theory which states that if ever anyone discovers exactly what the Universe is for and why it is here, it will instantly disappear and be replaced by something even more bizarre and inexplicable. There is another theory which states that this has already happened." - Douglas Adams
"Don"t hate the playa, hate the game" - Jesus
"Either God created humans, or humans created God... Looks like they can not live one without the other."
"I'm not gone. I'm scattered into so many pieces, sprinkled on your life like new snow." - The Haunting of Hill House
"The trouble with the rat race is that even if you win, you're still a rat." - Lily Tomlin
"The love we found we carry with us so we're never quite alone." Muppets Christmas Carol
[OC] Life is too broad for your fixtures...
"Above all, do not lie to yourself. A man who lies to himself and listens to his own lie comes to a point where he does not discern any truth either in himself or anywhere around him, and thus falls into disrespect towards himself and others." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"The human eye is a wonderful device. With a little effort, it can fail to see even the most glaring injustice." - Richard K. Morgan,
"I have come to believe that the whole world is an enigma, a harmless enigma that is made terrible by our own mad attempt to interpret it as though it had an underlying truth." - Umberto Eco
"The most important thing a father can do for his children is to love their mother." -- Henry Ward Beecher
"To be free in our world it's necessary first to be righteous and not to mistreat life,nor to its freedom" (William Ventura)
"No man can achieve the prize of being love by a woman,without first being rewarded by the love of God" (William Ventura)
"Technology is a useful servant but a dangerous master." - Christian Lous Lange
"I am not the earthquake of estrogen, I am the tornado of testosterone"- Slimcicle
"Love is a fire. But whether it is going to warm your hearth or burn down your house, you can never tell." - Joan Crawford
"To have a right to do a thing is not at all the same as to be right in doing it." - G.K. Chesterton
"Some people ask the secret of our long marriage. We take time to go to a restaurant two times a week. A little candlelight, dinner, soft music and dancing. She goes Tuesdays, I go Fridays." - Henny Youngman
"To lack feeling is to be dead, but to act on every feeling is to be a child." - Brandon Sanderson
"Apparently it is not good - and indeed it hinders the creative work of the mind - if the intellect examines too closely the ideas already pouring in, as it were, at the gates." - Friedrich Schiller
"There's a whiff of the lynch mob or the lemming migration about any overlarge concentration of like-thinking individuals, no matter how virtuous their cause."  P. J. O'Rourke
"Examinations are formidable even to the best prepared, for the greatest fool may ask more than the wisest man can answer."  Charles Caleb Colton
"The remarkable thing about Shakespeare is that he really is very good, in spite of all the people who say he is very good."  Robert Graves
"Formerly, when religion was strong and science weak, men mistook magic for medicine; now, when science is strong and religion weak, men mistake medicine for magic."  Thomas Szasz
"All power is within you. You can do anything and everything. Believe in that." - Swami Vivekananda
"Nature always works imperfectly, like an artist who is a master of his craft, but still works with a trembling hand." - Dante Alighieri
"Being evil feels like being good, being wrong feels like being right, and hurting people feels like helping them."
"Santa Claus has the right idea - visit people only once a year." - Victor Borge
"Somebody set up us the bomb." - Mechanic, Zero Wing
"There's no use doing a kindness if you do it a day too late."  Charles Kingsley
"Staying positive doesn"t mean you have to be positive all the time. I means even on hard days, you know there are better days to come" -unkown
"Staying positive doesn"t mean you have to be happy all the time. It means you know there are better days to come" -unknown
"A hungry stomach, an empty pocket and a broken heart can teach the best lessons of life." by Abdul Sattar Edhi
"People often avoid making decisions out of fear of making a mistake. Actually the failure to make decisions is one of life's biggest mistakes." -Noah Weinberg
"People often avoid making decisions out of fear of making a mistake. Actually the failure to make decisions is one of life's biggest mistakes." - Noah Weinberg
"And in the end, it"s not the years in your life that count, but the life in your years" -Abraham Lincoln
"A lie can travel half way around the world while the truth is putting on its shoes." - Charles Spurgeon
"We are all mortal until the first kiss and the second glass, which is something everyone knows, no matter how small his or her knowledge." - Eduardo Galeano
"But I will forgive myself and start to let it go; accept that who you chose to be was out of my control and though it might be hard to begin again, I"ll write myself a brand new story with a happy end. I survived, so tonight I am taking back my life and I"ll show you that I am not nothing".
"It"s funny because we ask God to change our situation, not knowing he put us in the situation to change us." - Unknown
"Santa Claus has the right idea - visit people only once a year."-- Victor Borge
"Nothing in Moderation We all loved him."-- Ernie Kovacs
"Blame it on a Black, blame it on a White, blame on a gun, blame it on a Muslim. Everyone wanna blame him, blame her, just blame it on the motherfucker killing everyone! " - Logic
"Make manure from shit." - A human who understands revenge can only lead to more suffering...
'Oh... you were going to let that, stop you..?' -Cpt. Edward MacPhail 1917
'Oh... you were going to let that, stop you..?' -Cpt. Edward MacPhail
"I've collected many weapons over the years, the soldiers made me flinch, the assassins made me bleed, the champions made me hurt. Be thankful, you're the first to ever require me deploying the only member of your kind that made me scream. - ?: A villain from one of my unpublished stories.
"Precision beats power, timing beats speed." -Conor mcGregor
"Conservatives divide the world in terms of good and evil while liberals do it in terms of the rich and poor." - Dennis Prager
"The thing that sustains people through life is the lifting a worthwhile burden." -Jordan Peterson
"What you allow, is what will continue"-Unknown
"When you believe a lie for too long, the truth doesn't set you free. It tears you apart." - Takeshi Kovac, Altered Carbon
"If you're low enough and the ideal is high enough, the ideal itself is so judgmental and so detached for you that it starts to look to you like your enemy" - Jordan B. Peterson
"Accept - then act. Whatever the present moment contains, accept it as if you had chosen it. Always work with it, not against it." - Eckhart Tolle
"I've waited a long time to show these flowers how pretty you are." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
"Women do not find it difficult nowadays to behave like men, but they often find it extremely difficult to behave like gentlemen." -- Compton Mackensie
"If you hate a person, you hate something in him that is part of yourself. What isn't part of ourselves doesn't disturb us." - Hermann Hesse
"There was time before organisms experienced consciousness, and there will be time after."
"Love is the lung of life,and hatred is the smoke that contaminates it and hurts it" (William Ventura)
"When you are wrestling for possession of a sword, the man with the handle always wins." -Neal Stephenson
"I'd rather lose for free than pay to win."
"Only i can change my life , nobody can do it for me"
6. "One of the most glorious messes in the world is the mess created in the living room on Christmas Day. Don"t clean it up too quickly." -Andy Rooney
"Nothing is permanent in this wicked world......not even our troubles" ---Charlie Chaplin
Don Draper
"People who have no weaknesses are terrible; there is no way of taking advantage of them."  Anatole France
"When they discover the center of the universe, a lot of people will be disappointed to discover they are not it."  Bernard Bailey
"Everyone wants to be Cary Grant. Even I want to be Cary Grant."  Cary Grant
"It is fun to be in the same decade with you."  Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Fear is wisdom in the face of danger" -Sherlok Holmes
"Make it simple, but significant." Don Draper
"The past cannot be changed. The future is yet in your power."
"A false friend and a shadow attend only when the sun shines." - Benjamin Franklin
"Cry. Forgive. Learn. Move on. Let your tears water the seeds of your future happiness." - Steve Maraboli
"Give them nothing, but take from them everything" - King Leonidas in the movie 300.
"Success is doing what you want to do, when you want, where you want, with whom you want, as much as you want."  Tony Robbins
"A man is a product of his thoughts, what he thinks; he becomes." by Gabdhi
"Hell is other people" - Jean-Paul Sartre
"Every positive value has its price in negative terms... the genius of Einstein leads to Hiroshima." - Pablo Picasso
"Anyone who maintains absolute standards of good and evil is dangerous. As dangerous as a maniac with a loaded revolver." - Tom Robbins
"The real test is not whether you avoid this failure, because you won't. It's whether you let it harden or shame you into inaction, or whether you learn from it; whether you choose to persevere." - Barack Obama
"Little Ani?" - Watto
"When you want to help people, you tell them the truth. When you want to help yourself, you tell them what they want to hear." - Thomas Sowell
"Life is not that complicated. You get up, go to work, eat 3 meals, take one good shit and then go back to bed. What's the fucking mystery?" -George Carlin
"Truth is not only violated by falsehood; it may be equally outraged by silence." - Henri Frederic Amiel
"Truth isn't truth." - Rudy Giuliani
"If to be kind is to be weak....then I won't be kind."
"All our vices are virtues gone wrong"
"The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom." - Isaac Asimov
"Having money's not everything, not having it is." - Kanye West
"The road that is built in hope is more pleasant to the traveler than the road built in despair, even though they both lead to the same destination." - Marion Zimmer Bradley
"When life gives you melons, you might be dyslexic" - Jay McLean, Where the Road Takes Me
"When god became lonely he created man, Or was it When man became lonely he created god."
"People who claim that they're evil are usually no worse than the rest of us... It's people who claim that they're good, or any way better than the rest of us, that you have to be wary of." -Gregory Maguire
"People who claim that they're evil are usually no worse than the rest of us... It's people who claim that they're good, or any way better than the rest of us, that you have to be wary of." - Gregory Maguire
"Stupid Woman" - Jeremy Corbyn
"Man cannot discover new oceans unless he has the courage to lose sight of the shore."  Andre Gide
"Women do not find it difficult nowadays to behave like men, but they often find it extremely difficult to behave like gentlemen." -- Compton Mackensie
"Is my mental illness improving or has the world just gone insane?" - unknown
"Conquer yourself, village, world"?
"I like boring things." - Andy Warhol
"Thinking is one of the greatest gifts of life, it is also one of lifes greatest burdens" - me, unless someone else has said it before.
"We understand how dangerous a mask can be. We all become what we pretend to be."
"The best ideas come as jokes. Make your thinking as funny as possible."  David M. Ogilvy
"Happiness is not achieved by the conscious pursuit of happiness; it is generally the by-product of other activities."  Aldous Huxley
"Although golf was originally restricted to wealthy, overweight Protestants, today it's open to anybody who owns hideous clothing."  Dave Barry
"Now we sit through Shakespeare in order to recognize the quotations."  Orson Welles
"A man chooses... A slave obeys." - Andrew Ryan
"The only time I set the bar low is for limbo." - Michael Scott, The Office
"The only thing standing between you and your dreams is....reluctance." - Carroll Bryant
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"You can never go home again." - Thomas Wolfe
"Dream in a pragmatic way."  Aldous Huxley
"You miss 100% of the shots you don"t take."  Wayne Gretzky
"You can"t defeat the demons you keep playing with." - Unsure of author.
"Because the world is so full of death and horror, I try again and again to console my heart and pick the flowers that grow in the midst of hell." -Hermann Hesse
"Because the world is so full of death and horror, I try again and again to console my heart and pick the flowers that grow in the midst of hell." - Hermann Hesse
"Give me your tired, your poor, your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, the wretched refuse of your teeming shore," she wrote. "Send these, the homeless, tempest-tossed to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!" -Lady Liberty
"Everything you add to the truth subtracts from the truth." - Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"You don't remember what happened. What you remember becomes what happened."
"When you look into the great beyond, you'll find that it stares back, that you gaze on naught but yourself." -me
"People who love sausage and respect the law should never watch either one being made." - Mark Twain
"It is no happiness to live long, nor unhappiness to die soon; happy is he that hath lived long enough to die well." - Francis Quarles
"Do you think God stays in heaven because he too, lives in fear of what he's created?" - Dr. Romero
"All truth passes through three stages. First, it is ridiculed. Second, it is violently opposed. Third, it is accepted as being self-evident." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"And now that you don't have to be perfect, you can be good." - John Steinbeck
"Just because love don't look the way you think it should, don't mean you don't have it." - Leslye Walton
"You dont tug on Superman's cape, you dont spit into the wind, you dont pull the mask off the ol' Lone Ranger and You Dont Mess Around with Jim." -Jim Croce
"Men are afraid that women will laugh at them. Women are afraid that men will kill them."
"You need to learn how to heal yourself, or you will spend your life bleeding on people who didn"t cut you."  Unknown
"All you had to do was follow the god damn train CJ!"  Smoke
"All you had to do was follow the god damn train CJ".  Smoke
"Never make someone a priority when all you are to them is an option." - Maya Angelou
"If you would be a real seeker after truth, it is necessary that at least once in your life you doubt, as far as possible, all things." - Rene Descartes
"What a life without a wife, but what a life with one" - My Grandpa
"In the Country of the Blind, the One-Eyed Man is King"
"You aren"t wealthy until you have something money can"t buy"- Garth Brooks
"People who think they are unique are usually plain or ordinary, while people who try to be plain or ordinary are usually psychotic."
"I just can't live a day without taking my revenge, hate me for that, leave me forever i don't care" - Khulaid Jamal
"What need is there to weep over parts of life? The whole of it calls for tears." -Seneca the Younger
"What need is there to weep over parts of life? The whole of it calls for tears." - Seneca the Younger
"The test of a first-rate intelligence is the ability to hold two opposed ideas in mind at the same time and still retain the ability to function." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"The test of a first-rate intelligence is the ability to hold two opposed ideas in mind at the same time and still retain the ability to function." -F. Scott Fitzgerald
"The test of a first-rate intelligence is the ability to hold two opposed ideas in mind at the same time and still retain the ability to function." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Can y'all people who have loads of downvotes on your comment just enjoy a loop of a girl smacking another girls ass without you going all anti-social justice warrior on EVERY post you find??? Just enjoy dat ass." Reddit User
"Nothing is evil which is according to nature." - Marcus Aurelius
"No man can make a woman happy without first knowing what sadness her" (William Ventura)
"No such thing as spare time, no such thing as free time, no such thing as down time. All you got is life time. Go." - Henry Rollins
"For man to be delivered from thoughts of his revenge is for me the highest hope, and rainbow after long storms." - Fredrich Nietzsche
"It makes a difference if you walk in the door saying, 'I'm going to love it here,' or you walk in the door saying, 'This place is going to suck.""  Anthony Bourdain
"God didn't create humans. Humans created god." - Doctor Londes, Cowboy Bebop
"If you love someone ask god to give them to you, if you still don't get them, know that someone else asked god for you. "-Imam Ali(a.s)
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read. It was books that taught me that the things that tormented me most were the very things that connected me with all the people who were alive, or who had ever been alive."
"I like to play chess with old men in the park. But it's so hard to find 32 of them."  Emo Phillips
"It is impossible to experience one's death objectively and still carry a tune."  Woody Allen
"One reason I don't drink is that I want to know when I am having a good time."  Nancy Astor
"Let us make our future now, and let us make our dreams tomorrow"s reality."
"Never let the fear of striking out keep you from playing the game."
"I"m grateful for every stupid mistake or dumb joke I tried to make." - Bo Burnham
"No one has a greater asset for his business than a man's pride in his work."  Hosea Ballou
"Call a jack a jack. Call a spade a spade. But always call a whore a lady. Their lives are hard enough, and it never hurts to be polite."
"The sad truth is that most evil is done by people who never make up their minds to be good or evil." -Hannah Arendt
"The sad truth is that most evil is done by people who never make up their minds to be good or evil." - Hannah Arendt
"Fear is pain arising from the anticipation of evil." - Aristotle
"If you really look closely, most overnight successes took a long time" - Steve Jobs
"And sometimes in life, I imagine, good things do happen. Most of the time, it's the opposite, obviously. But I don't think you should rule out the possibility that just occasionally chance might deal you a good card" -Sebastian Faulks
"We are each our own devil, and we make this world our hell." - Oscar Wilde
"Who is more stupid; the ones who think they can live without being hurt, or the ones that think it's so natural they can't complain about it? It requires both temperance and courage to live any less than alone." - Myself
"No holiday should manipulate you to the point where you're going in to debt just to show someone you love them." Jim Carrey
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that" - Martin Luther King Jr
"Stars, hide your fires; Let not light see my black and deep desires." - William Shakespeare
"Maybe it"s not meant to be easy for you. Maybe you"re one of the rare few who can handle tough times and still choose to be a loving person. Maybe it"s going how it is because you"re built for it.. don"t stress a thing. It"s going to work out because you"re not going to stop putting the work in."
"It is out of the deepest depth that the highest must come to its height." - Nietzsche (Thus Spoke Zarathustra)
"To most of us nothing is so invisible as an unpleasant truth. Though it is held before our eyes, pushed under our noses, rammed down our throats  we know it not." Eric Hoffer (1902-1983)
"I think the devil doesn't exist, but man has created him, he has created him in his own image and likeness." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"I think the devil doesn't exist, but man has created him, he has created him in his own image and likeness." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Once again, we come to the Holiday Season, a deeply religious time that each of us observes, in his own way, by going to the mall of his choice."-- Dave Barry
"If you want to stay faithful- stay home." - Unknown
"When one tugs at a single thing in nature, he finds it attached to the rest of the world." - John Muir
"The important thing is not how long you live. It's what you accomplish with your life." - Grovyle, Pokmon Mystery Dungeon - Explorers Of Sky
"It is a man's own mind, not his enemy or foe, that lures him to evil ways." -Gautama Buddha
"It is a man's own mind, not his enemy or foe, that lures him to evil ways." - Gautama Buddha
"A dream is what it is, it forces me to believe, like star dusts do, the fog machine and the rain." Poet Barnaby
"Perfection is not a goal - it is fear, disguised as an ideal. It is the unattainable wrapped in gold. Perfection wojld have us believe we are a failure, before we even start. It tells us that our best, falls short. It tells us we are not good enough. But oh how wrong it is." - B.Oakman.
"If you spend too much time thinking about a thing, you'll never get it done." - Bruce Lee
"The greatest weapon against stress is our ability to choose one thought over another." - William James
"Consistency is the playground of dull minds". - Yuval Noah Harari
"No one is useless in this world who lightens the burden of it for anyone else." Charles Dickens
100 Knowledge Quotes. Motivational Knowledge Quotes
"The aim of torture is to destroy a person as a human being, to destroy their identity and soul. It is more evil than murder." - Inge Genefke
"In the silence of night, I have often wished for just a few words of love from one man, rather than the applause of thousands of people" -Judy Garland
"I like to think of the world as one big book filled with stories, and those who don't travel only read one page"
30 Sadhguru Quotes .Sadhguru Inner Engineering Motivational Quotes .
"Any word you have to hunt for in a thesaurus is the wrong word. There are no exceptions to this rule."  Stephen King
"Literature is news that stays news."  Ezra Pound
"Humor can be dissected as a frog can, but the thing dies in the process and the innards are discouraging to any but the pure scientific mind."  E. B. White
"Let us make our future now, and let us make our dreams tomorrow"s reality." Malala Yousafzai
"If one considers the amount of fuel used only for driving around in search of a sexual partner... one would have to demand the liberation of sexuality solely for reasons concerning the politics of energy." - Dieter Duhm
"No matter how many people you have around you all day. At the end of the day, if you love yourself you'll be happy alone. Then you'll be united with the two best companions of solitude,moon and stars. Not a word would be needed then, for the heart would be responding to the music of stars."-farzaq
"I asked her if she believed in love, and she smiled and said it was her most elaborate method of self harm." - Benedict Smith.
"You yourself, as much as anybody in the entire universe, deserve your love and affection." - Sharon Salzberg
"The world is full of magical things patiently waiting for our wits to grow sharper."
"Men never do evil so completely and cheerfully as when they do it from religious conviction." - Blaise Pascal
"Have Some Goddamn Faith" - Dutch Van Der Linde
"We grow small trying to be great."  E. Stanley Jones
"Don"t quote me on anything" -Mr. Elson, my biology teacher
"The world only goes forward because of those who oppose it." Goethe
"The best way to find out if you can trust somebody is to trust them." - Ernest Hemingway
"Everything we do in life is based on fear, especially love." - Mel Brooks
"If you're quiet, you're not living. You've got to be noisy and colorful and lively." - Mel Brooks
"Capitalism was a system that allowed humans to purchase their identities, which was more convenient than building one from scratch." - Earthling Cinema
"We ought to do good to others as simply as a horse runs, or a bee makes honey, or a vine bears grapes season after season without thinking of the grapes it has borne." - Marcus Aurelius
"Failure will never overtake me if my determination to succeed is strong enough." - Og Mandino
"Happiness comes from within, don"t forget that."
"Life is easy, if you'd choose to give up on everything." --Poet Barnaby
"I stopped believing in Santa Claus when I was six. Mother took me to see him in a department store and he asked for my autograph."  Shirley Temple
"Those that deem politics beneath their dignity are doomed to be governed by those of lesser talents." - Aristotle
"Nothing in life is so exhilarating as to be shot at without result." -Winston Churchill
"Nothing in life is so exhilarating as to be shot at without result." - Winston Churchill
"One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight. Schlemiel! Schlimazel! Hasenpfeffer Incorporated!"
"I know that I am intelligent, because I know that I know nothing." - Socrates
"It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets." - Voltaire
"In a time of deceit, telling the truth is a revolutionary act." - George Orwell
"I clutch the wire fence until my fingers bleed. A wound that will not heal, a heart that cannot feel. Hoping that the horror will recede. Hoping that tomorrow, we'll all be freed" -Neil Peart, (Rush - Red Sector A)
"If there are no stupid questions, then what kind of questions do stupid people ask? Do they get smart just in time to ask questions?" - Scott Adams
"False tears bring pain to those around you. A false smile brings pain to one"s self."
"Break a heart, but never break it enough that flex tape cant fix it" - Bill Swift
"If a man has his eyes bound, you can encourage him as much as you like to stare through the bandage, but he'll never see anything." - Franz Kafka
"Maybe Christmas, he thought, doesn't come from a store. Maybe Christmas...perhaps...means a little bit more!"  Theodor Seuss Geisel, How the Grinch Stole Christmas
"I believe that every human has a finite amount of heartbeats. I don't intend to waste any of mine running around doing exercises." - Neil Armstrong
"We can experience nothing but the present moment, live in no other second of time, and to understand this is as close as we can get to eternal life." - P.D. James
"AI is currently very, very stupid" 2018 in Review: 10 Artificial Intelligence Quotes
"Only those who will risk going too far can possibly find out how far one can go." - T.S. Eliot
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger and more complex... It takes a touch of genius - and a lot of courage to move in the opposite direction." - E. F. Schumacher
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger and more complex... It takes a touch of genius - and a lot of courage to move in the opposite direction." -E. F. Schumacher
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger and more complex... It takes a touch of genius - and a lot of courage to move in the opposite direction." - E. F. Schumacher
"Glory is for cowards, too afraid to let their name die" - Angron
"To be amused by what you read--that is the great spring of happy quotations."  C. E. Montague
"Democracy means that anyone can grow up to be president, and anyone who doesn't grow up can be vice president."  Johnny Carson
"[Abstract art is] a product of the untalented, sold by the unprincipled to the utterly bewildered."  Al Capp
"America is a mistake, a giant mistake."  Sigmund Freud
"All men are NOT created equal! Some are born smarter, or more beautiful, or with parents of greater status. Some, by contrast, are born of weak body or mind, or with few, if any, talents. All men are different! Yes, the very existence of man is discriminatory. Inequality is not evil. Equality is!"
"Today my forest is dark. The trees are sad and all the butterflies have broken wings." - Raine Cooper.
"Life is a big cake of SHIT, each day you have to eat a slice of it" - Some sailor on youtube
"A great deal of intelligence can be invested in ignorance when the need for illusion is deep." - Saul Bellow
"Stop acting so small. You are the universe in ecstatic motion." - Rumi
"The wound is the place where the Light enters you." - Rumi
"Most men pursue pleasure with such breathless haste that they hurry past it." - Kierkegaard
"In your actions, don"t procrastinate. In your conversations, don"t confuse. In your thoughts, don"t wander. In your soul, don"t be passive or aggressive. In your life, don"t be all about business."  Marcus Aurelius
"Few men have virtue to withstand the highest bidder."  George Washington
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Prosperity tries the fortunate, adversity the great." - Rose Kennedy
"Not blind opposition to progress, but opposition to blind progress." John Muir
"Eighty percent of success is showing up." - Woody Allen
"If there are no stupid questions, then what kind of questions do stupid people ask? Do they get smart just in time to ask questions?" - Scott Adams
"They claim their labours are to build a heaven yet their heaven is populated with horrors. Perhaps the world is not made. Perhaps nothing is made. A clock without a craftsman. It's too late. Always has been, always will be too late." - Alan Moore
"You cannot swim for new horizons until you have courage to lose sight of the shore." - William Faulkner
"We must secure the existence of our people and a future for Black children" -Dr. Martin Luther King Jr
"Leadership is the capacity to translate vision into reality." - Warren Bennis
"Why should I fear death? If I am, death is not. If death is, I am not. Why should I fear that which can only exist when I do not?" - Epicurus
"He who despairs of the human condition is a coward, but he who has hope for it is a fool." --- Albert Camus
"Every child is an artist, the problem is staying an artist when you grow up"-Pablo Picasso
"Memories warm you up from the inside. But they also tear you apart." - Haruki Murakami
"Maybe the angel kept on dying for too long in the dark. And that is how the devil was born." - SP
"You could leave life right now. Let that determine what you do and say and think."  Marcus Aurelius
"Light matters should be dealt with seriously. Serious matters should be dealt with lightly." - Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"Despite rumor, Death isn't cruel--merely terribly, terribly good at his job." - Terry Pratchett, 'Sourcery'
"Doing nothing and refusing to be a passenger in the story of your own life is a great way to add suspense to the plot" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Unless we make Christmas an occasion to share our blessings, all the snow in Alaska won't make it 'white."-- Bing Crosby
"I"m scared I"m going to spend the rest of my life in a state of yearning, regardless of where I am."
'If you have pride in your beliefs , courage in your conviction and faith in God ..You will not fail " - Donald J Trump
"The more you understand, the less you forgive" - Coach Red Pill
"Reality is just a crutch for people who can't handle drugs." -Robin Williams
"Couples want to have a baby and become parents, Then children have to be gratitude of parent's obligation, even they are not the one who ask to be born?"  Me
"I thought love was a kind of emptiness"- Florence + The Machine
"Don't let them hurt you just because you love them"  Me
"When angry, count to 4. When very angry, swear." - Mark Twain
"the way my critics carry on, they would have you believe my publications were source material in the development of root canals, red headed step children, and flatulence." - mark twain
"Cats choose us; we don"t own them." Kristin Cast (author, House of Night series)
"Democracy destroys itself because it abuses its right to freedom and equality. Because it teaches its citizens to consider audacity as a right, lawlessness as a freedom, abrasive speech as equality, and anarchy as progress." -- -- Isocrates
"Reality is the leading cause of stress among those in touch with it." - Lily Tomlin
"He who has a Why to live for can bear almost any How." Nietzsche
"It"s entirely possible" -Joe Rogan
"Thinking before doing something and beung dumb are different parts of the same snake. No matter which part you grab, you'll grab the snake. But one part could bite your hand"
"Sometimes anxiety doesn"t have a cause. You know? Like it does. But when you try to explain it to someone else, it doesn"t. You know? Like sometimes it feels like reasons are only valid if they make sense to the receiver of the information. You know? And you may ask me to try and explain it but..
"Sometimes anxiety doesn"t have a cause. You know? Like it does. But when you try to explain it to someone else, it doesn"t. You know? Like sometimes it feels like reasons are only valid if they make sense to the receiver of the information. You know? And you may ask me to try and explain it but..
"Perhaps the most valuable result of all education is the ability to make yourself do the thing you have to do, when it ought to be done, whether you like it or not."  Thomas Henry Huxley
"Virtue is its own punishment."  Aneurin Bevan
"It has been said that democracy is the worst form of government except all the others that have been tried."  Sir Winston Churchill
"Competence, like truth, beauty and contact lenses, is in the eye of the beholder."  Laurence J. Peter
"Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent. Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent. Is he both able and willing? Then whence cometh evil? Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God?" - Epicurus.
"It takes time to learn how to be attracted to what's good for us."
"...in a marriage, you're promising to care about everything. The good things, the bad things... You're saying 'Your life will not go unnoticed because I will notice it. Your life will not go un-witnessed because I will be your witness'." - Beverly Clark (Susan Sarandon), Shall We Dance, 2004
"You know you"re in love when you can"t fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams".-Dr. Seuss
"One day, whether you are 17, 28 or 65, you will stumble upon someone who will start a fire in you that cannot die. However, the saddest, most awful truth you will ever come to find is they are not always with whom we spend our lives..." -Someone
"Show me the most damaged parts of your soul, and I will show you how it still shines like gold." - Nikita Gill.
"One day, wether you are 14, 28 or 65, you will stumble upon someone who will start a fire in you that cannot die. However, the saddest most awful truth you will ever come to find is they are not always with whom we spend our lives..." -Someone
"let"s get dangerous" d.w.
"Our greatest weakness lies in giving up. The most certain way to succeed is always to try just one more time." - Thomas Edison
"Forgive many things in others; nothing in yourself."  Ausonius
"Someone has somewhere commented on the fact that millions long for immortality who don't know what to do with themselves on a rainy Sunday afternoon." - Susan Ertz
"I have no agenda except to be funny. Neither I or the writers profess to offer any worldly wisdom." - Julia Louis-Dreyfus
"If a man knows not which port he sails, no wind is favorable."  Seneca
"It is my earnest hope, and the hope of all mankind, that from this solemn occasion a better world shall emerge out of the blood and carnage of the past. A world dedicated to the dignity of man and the fulfillment of his most cherished wish for freedom, tolerance, and justice." -Douglas MacArthur
"The future tense of fear is either comedy or tragedy" what does this mean?
"All I can guarantee you is that as long as you are searching for happiness, you will remain unhappy." - U.G. Krishnamurti
"Trust your heart if the seas catch fire, live by love though the stars walk backward." -E.E. Cummings
"But there was no need to be ashamed of tears, for tears bore witness that a man had the greatest of courage, the courage to suffer." Viktor E. Frankl
"The season of failure is the best time for sowing the seeds of success." -Paramahansa Yogananda
"The season of failure is the best time for sowing the seeds of success." - Paramahansa Yogananda
"This is the substance of the Way of the Samurai: if by setting one's heart right every morning and evening, one is able to live as though his body were already dead, he gains freedom in the Way. his whole life will be without blame, and he will succeed in his calling." -Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"This is the substance of the Way of the Samurai: if by setting one's heart right every morning and evening, one is able to live as though his body were already dead, he gains freedom in the Way. his whole life will be without blame, and he will succeed in his calling." - Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"Fighting for peace is like screwing for virginity.." - George Carlin.
"Y am Poptart are so good?" -Socrates
"Success is getting what you want. Happiness is wanting what you get." Dale Carnegie
"By cultivating attitudes of friendliness toward the happy, compassion for the unhappy, delight in the virtuous, and disregard toward the wicked, the mind-stuff retains its undisturbed calmness." - Patanjali
"I lied and said I was busy, I was busy; but not in a way most people understand. I was busy taking deeper breaths, I was busy silencing irrational thoughts. I was busy calming a raving heart. I was busy telling myself I am okay. Sometimes this is my busy and I will not apologise for it." - B.Oakman
"When a working stiff demands a pay raise, it causes inflation and threatens the nation's prosperity; when a C.E.O. gets a raise ten thousand times as large..." -John Cassidy
"The first step in cooking rabbit stew is catching the rabbit." - Isaac Asimov, I, Robot - Chapter 4
"Don't try to hit me with a floppy spatula!" - My brother
"Everyone lets the present moment slip by, then looks for it as though he thought it were somewhere else." -Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"Everyone lets the present moment slip by, then looks for it as though he thought it were somewhere else." - Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"Forget the past, for it is gone from your domain! forget the future, for it is beyond your reach! control the present! Live supremely well now! This is the way of the wise." - Paramahansa Yogananda
"Just as seeds need darkness and privacy in the earth, all relationships that are deep and intimate remain inner. They need privacy, they need a place where only two exist." - Osho
"The truth will set you free. But not until it is finished with you." -David Foster Wallace
"Few things are more wounding than the confounding moment of discovering an asymmetry of affections where mutuality had been presumed. " -Maria Popova
"I can accept failure, everyone fails at something. But I can't accept not trying." - Michael Jordan
"There is a magnet in your heart that will attract true friends. That magnet is unselfishness, thinking of others first; when you learn to live for others, they will live for you." - Paramahansa Yogananda
"We don't smell things as they are, we smell them as we are. " - S.Brown
"Far better is it to dare mighty things, to win glorious triumphs, even though checkered by failure... than to rank with those poor spirits who neither enjoy nor suffer much, because they live in a gray twilight that knows not victory nor defeat." - Theodore Roosevelt
"The most complacent universe is that which allow us to create our own world,and to choose those who live in it" (William Ventura)
"pretend it"s all pretend." -sy parrish-
"When you come to a fork in the road, take it."  Yogi Berra
"Nice guys finish last, but we get to sleep in."  Evan Davis
"Dying is a very dull, dreary affair. And my advice to you is to have nothing whatever to do with it."  W. Somerset Maugham
"MTV is the lava lamp of the 1980's."  Doug Ferrari
"The desire for a more positive experience is itself a negative experience. And, paradoxically, the acceptance of one"s negative experience is itself a positive experience."
"If the left wing and the right wing got along, maybe we could make the government fly." - RaccoonEggs
"If you want to know who controls you, think of who you are not allowed to criticize." - Voltaire
"Be as simple as you can be; you will be astonished to see how uncomplicated and happy your life can become." -Paramahansa Yogananda
"Be as simple as you can be; you will be astonished to see how uncomplicated and happy your life can become." - Paramahansa Yogananda
"Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage."  Lao Tzu.
"It is the set of the sails, not the direction of the wind that determines which way we will go."  Jim Rohn
"It is better for those that we love to die earlier rather than later, because then we will not make any new memories to miss of them." - Unknown Chinese Philosopher
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." -Herman Melville
"Not just in commerce but in the world of ideas too our age is putting on a veritable clearance sale. Everything can be had for so dirt cheap that one begins to wonder whether in the end anyone will want to make a bid." -Sren Kirkegaard, Fear and Trembling
"The great rule of conduct for us, in regard to foreign nations, is in extending our commercial relations, to have with them as little political connection as possible." -George Washington
"That old saying, how you always kill the one you love, well, look, it works both ways." -Fight Club by Chuck Palahniuk
"Let me tell you this: if you meet a loner, no matter what they tell you, it's not because they enjoy solitude. It's because they have tried to blend into the world before, and people continue to disappoint them." - Jodi Picoult, My Sister's Keeper
"I thought love was in the drugs but the more I took the more it took away and I could never get it back." from Hunger by Florence + The Machines
"The difference between genius and stupidity is that genius has its limits."
"I saw a lot of analogies between what the Nazis did to us and what we're doing to farm animals" - Alex Hershaft, Holocaust survivor.
"It is a good viewpoint to see the world as a dream. When you have something like a nightmare, you will wake up and tell yourself that it was only a dream. It is said that the world we live in is not a bit different from this." - Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"That question is both above and below my pay grade" or something to that effect. Who said it and about what?
"A goal without a plan is just a wish" - Antonie de Saint Exupry
"There is surely nothing other than the single purpose of the present moment. A man's whole life is a succession of moment after moment. There will be nothing else to do, and nothing else to pursue. Live being true to the single purpose of the moment." - Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"Even as today"s economy becomes ever-more digitally connected, the highly skilled workers fueling its growth will continue to be in demand." - David Hunt
"Time is no measure of trust"
"To be covered in blood. That is a hero"s job."
"A healthy functioning society, where citizens enjoy the right to the "pursuit happiness," is one that bases its laws on principles, not authority. It is a society whose motto should be "In Reason We Trust."" - Dan Barker
"Think of the life you have lived until now as over and, as a dead man, see what"s left as a bonus and live it according to Nature. Love the hand that fate deals you and play it as your own, for what could be more fitting?"  Marcus Aurelius
"Danger is the enemy you don"t know you have." -Unknown
"No matter how brilliant your mind or strategy, if you"re playing a solo game, you"ll always lose out to a team."  Reid Hoffman
"There are two kinds of forecasters: Those who don't know, and those who don't know they don't know" - John Kenneth Galbraith
"The concept of portraying evil and then destroying it - I know this is considered mainstream, but I think it is rotten. This idea that whenever something evil happens someone particular can be blamed and punished for it, in life and in politics is hopeless." - Hayao Miyazaki
"Taking control of your own growth means taking control of your own feedback." -Cameron Elliot
'In its majestic equality, the law forbids rich and poor alike to sleep under bridges, beg in the streets and steal loaves of bread.' --Anatole France
"In your actions, don"t procrastinate. In your conversations, don"t confuse. In your thoughts, don"t wander. In your soul, don"t be passive or aggressive. In your life, don"t be all about business."  Marcus Aurelius
"You are unstoppable, not because you do not have failures and doubts, but because you continue on despite them." Beau Taplin
"The mental struggle in the act to articulate an idea in a way that feels perfect, is the way humans can best upgrade their brain. That realm where the impulses to communicate come from, is the ultimate source of puzzles" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Character cannot be developed in ease and quiet. Only through experience of trial and suffering can the soul be strengthened, ambition inspired, and success achieved." - Helen Keller
"There are the bad guys who lear ned to be good;the good guys who decided to be bad;and the ones who decided neither to be good or be bad" (William Ventura)
"Rock bottom will teach you lessons that mountain tops never will" - Unknown
"The admission of not knowing is too often misinterpreted as a disclosure of not learning. "
"The important work of moving the world forward does not wait to be done by perfect men."  George Eliot
"It may be true that the law cannot make a man love me, but it can stop him from lynching me, and I think that's pretty important."  Martin Luther King Jr.
"Nothing is more conducive to peace of mind than not having any opinions at all."  Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
"But the fact that some geniuses were laughed at does not imply that all who are laughed at are geniuses. They laughed at Columbus, they laughed at Fulton, they laughed at the Wright brothers. But they also laughed at Bozo the Clown."  Carl Sagan
"I am sorry, so sorry...that power does not make us heroes."-Warren Worthington III
"LSD is like having sex with the Universe" - The Fucking Universe
"It"s time you realized that you have something in you more powerful and miraculous than the things that affect you and make you dance like a puppet."  Marcus Aurelius
"When the rain comes and floods this rock, will you sink or swim, drown or fight your way to shore"
"True joy and greatness comes from courage" Walt Disney
"The whole point of getting things done is knowing what to leave undone."  Oswald Chambers
"No person has the power to have everything they want, but it is in their power not to want what they don"t have, and to cheerfully put to good use what they do have." - Seneca
"I can"t stop the rain from falling, but I can hold your umbrella."-Anonymous
"The strong bond of friendship is not always a balanced equation; friendship is not always about giving and taking in equal shares. Instead, friendship is grounded in a feeling that you know exactly who will be there for you when you need something, no matter what or when." - Simon Sinek
"I grew up in suburbs like this one, in Kansas, in Georgia, Kentucky, places so ordinary that ghosts don"t even live there. Streets so normal so full of TJ Max"s and starbucks, that they play this trick on you. Nothing of any real importance could have happened there" - Jon Bois
"It gets easier, every day it gets a little bit easier. But you have to do it every day, that's the hard part! But it does get easier."
"Don"t seek for everything to happen as you wish it would, but rather wish that everything happens as it actually willthen your life will flow well."  Epictetus
"He who fears death will never do anything worthy of a man who is alive." - Seneca
"...throw roses into the abyss and say: "here is my thanks to the monster who didn't succeed in swallowing me alive."" - Nietzsche
"...throw roses into the abyss and say: 'here is my thanks to the monster who didn't succeed in swallowing me alive." - Nietzsche
"I"m either narcissistic or a genius. Either way, I am a genius." - Theodore Lorraine Copeland III
"If the richest companies weren't involved,everybody around the world would act as neighbor's."- me
"Can you imagine how much scarier it would be if climate change was actually being caused by something beyond our control?" - climate scientist Kate Marvel
"People are frugal in guarding their personal property; but as soon as it comes to squandering time they are most wasteful of the one thing in which it is right to be stingy."  Seneca
"What sets you apart can sometimes feel like a burden and it's not. And a lot of the time, it's what makes you great."  Emma Stone
'Go get inspired, meet people, enjoy your time, invest, learn, and teach. And see how life will smile everyday to you'
"It's wrong what they say about the past, I've learned, about how you can bury it. Because the past claws its way out." -Khaled Hosseini, The Kite Runner
"What man actually needs is not a tensionless state but rather the striving and struggling for some goal worthy of him."  Viktor Frankl
"Only the phoenix rises and does not descend. And everything changes. And nothing is truly lost." - Neil Gaiman
"Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from mediocre minds." - Albert Einstein
"If you"re happy, you don"t search for Compensation."
"Wandering in a vast forest at night, I have only a faint light to guide me. A stranger appears and says to me: 'My friend, you should blow out your candle in order to find your way more clearly.' This stranger is a theologian." --Diderot
"Beauty is no end in itself, but if it makes our lives less miserable so that we may be more kind - well, then, let's have beauty, painted on our porcelain, hanging on our walls, ringing through our stories. We are a sorry tribe of beasts. We need all the help we can get." -Gregory Maguire
"LOUD NOISES!" -Brick Tamland
"A champion needs a motivation above and beyond winning."Pat Riley
"When we are no longer able to change a situation, we are challenged to change ourselves."  Viktor Frankl
"So if tomorrow starts without me, don't think we're far apart, for every time you think of me, I'm right here, in your heart" - David Romano
"It is impossible to imagine the universe run by a wise, just and omnipotent God, but it is quite easy to imagine it run by a board of gods. If such a board actually exists it operates precisely like the board of a corporation that is losing money." -- H. L. Mencken
"Instead of wondering when your next vacation is, maybe you should set up a life you don"t need to escape from."  Seth Godin
"Look at the Tiddies on that Dog" Coach Koffi
"Now, every time I witness a strong person, I want to know: What dark did you conquer in your story? Mountains do not rise without earthquakes." - Katherine MacKenett
"Deeply regret [to] advise you Titanic sank this morning, fifteenth, after collision [with] iceberg resulting serious loss [of] life. Further particulars later." Telegram sent by J. Bruce Ismay to the White Star Line Headquarters in New York City.
"A man can stand anything except a succession of ordinary days."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"He is one of those people who would be enormously improved by death."  Saki
"Your true value depends entirely on what you are compared with."  Bob Wells
"My husband gave me a necklace. It's fake. I requested fake. Maybe I'm paranoid, but in this day and age, I don't want something around my neck that's worth more than my head."  Rita Rudner
"do not be daunted by the enormity of the world"s grief. do justly now. love mercy now. walk humbly now. you are not obligated to complete the work but neither are you free to abandon it." from the talmud
"If you want your life to be a magnificent story, then begin by realising that you are the author." Mark Houlahan
"A man should be mourned at his birth, not at his death." --Montesquieu
"When you make a mistake, there are only three things you should ever do about it: admit it, learn from it, and don't repeat it." - Paul "Bear" Bryant
"One of the things that I learned in the war is that we're not the top species on the planet because we're nice. People talk a lot about how well the military turns kids into killing machines, and I'll always argue that it's just the finishing school." -Karl Marlantes, Vietnam war veteran
"Don"t explain your philosophy. Embody it." - Epictetus
""Our songs will all be silenced, but what of it? Go on singing."" - Orson Welles
"If you want to make God laugh, tell him about your plans." - Woody Allen
"There's a world of difference between truth and facts. Facts can obscure the truth."  Maya Angelou
"As long as there are slaughterhouses, there will be battlefields." - Leo Tolstoy
"Life is very short and anxious for those who forget the past, neglect the present, and fear the future."  Seneca
"One mistake on a guitar is just a mistake, but two mistakes are a new song." Who said it? And what is the right quote?
"Action is the Antidote to Despair." - Joan Baez
"One mistake on a guitar is just a mistake, but two mistakes are a new song." Who said it? And what is the right quote?
"Sometimes legends make reality, and become more useful than the facts." -Salman Rushdie
"My destination is no longer a place, rather a new way of seeing." - Marcel Proust
"So what if I have a short fuse! Some prick needs to light it... you wanna be the one?" - myself
"It belongs to human nature to hate those you have injured." --Tacitus
"Is what you are doing today getting you closer to where you want to be tomorrow?" - Unknown
"Is it better to out-monster the monster or to be quietly devoured?" - Nietzsche
"If you boys...you men, can do what has to be done when you'd rather be doing anything else, why do you think I will do less?" - Robert Jordan, the Eye of the World, the Wheel of Time, Book 1.
"He who knows others is wise; he who knows himself is enlightened." - Lao Tzu
"That's one small step for a man, one giant leap for mankind" - Neil Armstrong
"A woman is the full circle. Within her is the power to create, nurture and transform.
"If on this side of life I'm able to watch over and help you out, know that I will. If I can't, I'm sure I can at least be waiting for you when you come over."
"The greatest battles being fought are not upon deserts, forests, or any soil of the earth, but within the human mind."
"No one is useless in this world who lightens the burdens of another."
"The one who does not work for change cannot complain if change never comes."
"Monsters are real, and ghosts are real too. They live inside us, and sometimes, they win." -Stephen King
"It is an absolute human certainty that no one can know his own beauty or perceive a sense of his own worth until it has been reflected back to him in the mirror of another loving, caring human being." - John Joseph Powell
"When you rise in the morning, give thanks for the light, for your life, for your strength. Give thanks for your food and for the joy of living. If you see no reason to give thanks, the fault lies in yourself."-Tecumseh
"Something that can make us perfect,is to recognize that we have imperfection" (William Ventura)
"I judge you unfortunate because you have never lived through misfortune. You have passed through life without an opponentno one can ever know what you are capable of, not even you."  Seneca
"There is nothing as overrated as a bad fuck and as underrated as a good...shit"-Elif Shafak, The Bastard of Istanbul
"There is nothing as overrated as a bad fuck and as overrated as a good...shit"-Elif Shafak, The Bastard of Istanbul
"We may encounter many defeats but we must not be defeated." - Maya Angelou
"Victory is in having done your best. If you"ve done your best, you"ve won." - Billy Bowerman
"We must come to our "journey"s end with a good grace, just as an olive falls when it is fully ripe, praising the earth that bore it and grateful to the tree that gave it growth." Marcus Aurelius
"If you can find something everyone agrees on, it's wrong."  Mo Udall
"You are not superior just because you see the world in an odious light."  Vicomte de Chateaubriand
"Too much of a good thing is wonderful."  Mae West
"As I was walking up the stair / I met a man who wasn't there. / He wasn't there again today. / I wish, I wish he'd stay away."  Hughes Mearns
"As we look ahead into the next century, leaders will be those who empower others." - Bill Gates
"Between stimulus and response lies a space. In that space lie our freedom and power to choose a response. In our response lies our growth and our happiness." - Viktor Frankl
"I'm not in this world to live up to your expectations. And you are not in this world to live up to mine" - Bruce Lee
"Home is the nicest word there is."  Laura Ingalls Wilder
"Yep. I said that one, too." -Marcus Aurelius, probably
"When you cease to make a contribution you begin to die." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Adhere to the sufficiency of the light within us, resting on truth for authority, not on authority for truth." -Lucretia Mott
"The impediment to action advances action. What stands in the way becomes the way." - Marcus Aurelius
"If you dig a pit for others to fall into, you will fall into it yourself." - Rumi
"Pain travels through families until someone is ready to feel it." -Stephi Wagner
"There are two ways to slide easily through life: to believe everything or to doubt everything. Both ways save us from thinking." -Alfred Korzybski
"Nothing, to my way of thinking, is a better proof of a well-ordered mind than a man's ability to stop just where he is and pass some time in his own company." - Seneca the Younger
"A film is never really good unless the camera is an eye in the head of a poet." - Orson Welles
"Once you start making the effort to 'wake yourself up'  that is, be more mindful in your activities  you suddenly start appreciating life a lot more."  Robert Biswas-Diener
"Nothing is ever new, but in an eternal state of unfolding" - Rudolf P Belmar
"If evil be spoken of you and it be true, correct yourself, if it be a lie, laugh at it."..... Epictetus
" A hopeless person sees difficulties in every chance, but a hopeful person sees chances in every difficulty. " - Imam Ali (AS)
"The truth is that stress doesn"t come from your boss, your kids, your spouse, traffic jams, health challenges, or other circumstances. It comes from your thoughts about these circumstances." - Andrew J. Bernstein
"Don"t confuse your stupidity with bravery"- Me
"She's mad but she's magic, there's no lie in her fire" - Charles Bukowski
"There may be honest differences of opinion as to many government policies; but surely there can be no such differences as to the need of unflinching perseverance in the war against successful dishonesty." -- Theodore Roosevelt
"One person with passion is better than forty people merely interested." - E. M. Forster
"If it's endurable then endure it. Stop complaining." - Marcus Aurelius
"When people get hurt, they learn to hate... when people hurt others, they become hated and racked with guilt. But knowing that pain allows people to be kind. Pain allows people to grow... and how you grow is up to you." - Jiraiya
"If you ever feel like dying to help the universe, just let me know." - Kyubey, Puella Magi Madoka Magica
'For some, a word may represent an idea or believe, while for other a letter can represent the world for them.'
"If you work hard and creatively you can have just about anything you want but you can't have everything you want. Maturity is the ability to reject good alternatives in order to pursue even better ones." - Ray Dalio, Principles
"Don't be ashamed to need help. Like a soldier storming a wall, you have a mission to accomplish. And if you've been wounded and you need a comrade to pull you up? So what?"  Marcus Aurelius
"The soul becomes dyed with the color of its thoughts." - Marcus Aurelius
"It"s not what"s under the Christmas tree that matters, it"s who is around it"
"Eat food. Not too much. Mostly plants." - Michael Pollan
"Man is the cruelest animal. At tragedies, bullfights, and crucifixions he has so far felt best on Earth; and when he invented hell for himself, behold, that was his very heaven." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Christian fundamentalism is the doctrine that there is an absolutely powerful, infinitely knowledgeable, universe-spanning entity that is deeply and personally concerned about my sex life." -- Andrew Lias
"Play me a sad song / 'Cause that's what I want to hear / I want you to make me cry / I want to remember the places that we left / Lost to the mists of time." - Au Revoir Simone, "Sad Song"
''A policy is a temporary creed liable to be changed, but while it holds good it has got to be pursued with apostolic zeal.'' -Mahatma Gandhi
"If what I'm doing makes you want to embrace me... don't. Because I don't like strangers touching me. Reach out and embrace humanity instead. Pass on to others how I've made you feel" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The four most beautiful words in our common language: I told you so." - Gore Vidal
"After two years in Washington, I often long for the realism and sincerity of Hollywood."  Fred Thompson
"Never interrupt your enemy when he is making a mistake."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"There are painters who transform the sun to a yellow spot, but there are others who with the help of their art and their intelligence, transform a yellow spot into the sun."  Pablo Picasso
"The advantage of a bad memory is that one enjoys several times the same good things for the first time."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Civilized men are more discourteous than savages because they know they can be impolite without having their skulls split, as a general thing."
"Where I fall, ten more shall take my place! And one hundred each of them! So strike me down! I am the harbinger!"- "Oll" Perrson, Resistance Fighter
"The test of our progress is not whether we add more to the abundance of those who have much; it is whether we provide enough for those who have too little." -Franklin D. Roosevelt
"When the debate is over, slander becomes the tool of the loser." - Socrates
"There is no such thing as innocence, only degrees of guilt"- Adrastia
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time."  Mark Twain
"People are not disturbed by things, but by the view they take of them." - Epictetus
"I wasn't much of a petty thief. I wanted the whole world or nothing." - Charles Bukowski, Post Office
"You've got your passion, you've got your pride, but don't you know that only fools are satisfied?" - Billy Joel, Vienna
"Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present." -Marcus Aurelius
"Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present." - Marcus Aurelius
"Insult shames the mocker, not the one who receives it." - attributed to Diogenes of Sinope
"You can close your eyes to what you don't wanna see, but you can"t close your heart to things you don't want to feel" - Johnny Depp
"How come, no matter how long since you've seen the family or how much distance you put between you, they can always push your buttons? Answer: Because they installed them." -Ken Bruen, The Guards
"Make the best use of what is in your power, and take the rest as it happens." - Epictetus
"Yeah I have a short fuse, so what? It still takes some other prick to light it. Are you gonna be the one?" - myself
"The fool doth think he is wise, but the wise man knows himself to be a fool." -Shakespeare
"A man can cry too"
"The world is not dying, it is being killed. And those that are killing it have names and addresses." -Sam Hyde
"As soon as you enter the system to denounce it, you are automatically made a part of it.
"If we don"t have border security, we"ll shut down the government." -President of The United States of Amerca, Donald Trump
"When I despair, I remember that all through history the way of truth and love have never won. There have been tyrants and murderers, and they are invincible, and in the end, they never fall. Think of it--always." - The Actual Way of the World
"Suspicion often creates what it suspects." - C.S. Lewis, The Screwtape Letters
"If it is true that one is poor on account of all the things one wants, the ambitious and the avaricious languish in extreme poverty." -- Jean de La Bruyre
"We generate fears while we sit, We overcome them by action"
"Our values call upon us to care about the lives of people we will never meet." - Barack Obama
"A demagogue must be neither an educated nor an honest man; he has to be an ignoramus and a rogue." --Aristophanes
"I came hoping to see those eyes, but instead, I return with my heart, leaving behind only flowers." ---- Kim Dong Hwa
"I am an unspeakable of the Oscar Wilde sort." - E.M. Forster
"Everyone knows that debugging is twice as hard as writing a program in the first place. So if you're as clever as you can be when you write it, how will you ever debug it?" --Brian Kernighan
"Everyone knows that debugging is twice as hard as writing a program in the first place. So if you're as clever as you can be when you write it, how will you ever debug it?" --Brian Kernighan
"When I think of all the books still left for me to read, I am certain of further happiness." - Jules Renard
"Believe me, if I started murdering people... there'd be none of you left." - Charles Manson
"All truths are easy to understand once they are discovered; the point is to discover them." -- Galileo Galilei
"An injury is much sooner forgotten than an insult." - Philip Stanhope
"You will know when you have reached your destiny because everything that happened will feel as though it had to happen" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth." -Marcus Aurelius
"One machine can do the work of fifty ordinary men. No machine can do the work of one extraordinary man." -Elbert Hubbard
"Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth." - Marcus Aurelius
"An imbalance between rich and poor is the oldest and most fatal ailment of all republics." - Plutarch
"Events in the past may be roughly divided into those which probably never happened and those which do not matter."  William Ralph Inge
"I would rather be a coward than brave because people hurt you when you are brave."  E. M. Forster
"Millions long for immortality who don't know what to do with themselves on a rainy Sunday afternoon."  Susan Ertz
"I can think of nothing more boring for the American people than to have to sit in their living rooms for a whole half hour looking at my face on their television screens."  Dwight D. Eisenhower
"Imagine others complexly."-John Green
"There will come a time where you will abandon yourself. You will not recognize the person you are becoming. These are symptoms of ascension. You are growing into something you have not seen before. Give yourself the freedom to let go of everything you've become familiar with." - Reyna Biddy
"It took us three years to build the NeXT computer. If we'd given customers what they said they wanted, we'd have built a computer they'd have been happy with a year after we spoke to them - not something they'd want now." - Steve Jobs
"We stopped looking for monsters under our bed when we realised that they were inside us" Charles Darwin
"There's a lot of reasons to do something, but you have to keep those close to yourself and remember them when you start feeling lost." -Anonymous
"The dumbest decisions of all time are made when people are trying to be smart about the simple things" - Kobe Bryant
"If you want a happy ending, that depends, of course, on where you stop your story." - Orson Welles
"Success is relative: It is what we can make of the mess we have made of things." -- T.S. Eliot
"There is something in the way that we are now, with our cell phones, and people are not looking at each other and not being in the moment with each other, that kids feel isolated." -Lady Gaga
"So I should say that civilizations begin with religion and stoicism: they end with scepticism and unbelief, and the undisciplined pursuit of individual pleasure. A civilization is born stoic and dies epicurean." - Will Durant
"Without tenderness, a man is uninteresting." - Marlene Dietrich
"When you get sad, you run straight ahead and you keep running forward, no matter what. There are people in your life who are gonna try to hold you back, slow you down, but you don't let them. Behind you there"s nothing for you." -Calenraps
"It takes many good deeds to build a good reputation, and only one bad one to lose it." -Benjamin Franklin
"Humor is just another defense against the universe." - Mel Brooks
"Our bodies are prisons for our souls. Our skin and blood the iron bars of confinement. But fear not, all flesh decays. Death turns all to ash. And thus death frees every soul"
"The foolishness of people who are surprised by anything that happens. Like travelers amazed at foreign customs." -Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"The foolishness of people who are surprised by anything that happens. Like travelers amazed at foreign customs." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"Most of what we learn in this crazy life is what to avoid." - Charles Bukowski, Slouching Towards Nirvana
"Was she very beautiful, Samuel?" "To you she was because you built her. I don't think you ever saw her - only your own creation." - John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"Tomorrow" is the deepest cunning of your mind."  Sadhguru
"Evil: the same old thing. No matter what happens, keep this in mind: It"s the same old thing, from one end of the world to the other. It fills the history books, ancient and modern, and the cities, and the houses too. Nothing new at all." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"Success is loving life and daring to live it."  Maya Angelou
"It is the power of the mind to be unconquerable." - Seneca the Younger
"When we honestly ask ourselves which person in our lives mean the most to us, we often find that it is those who, instead of giving advice, solutions, or cures, have chosen rather to share our pain and touch our wounds with a warm and tender hand. The friend who can be silent with us in a moment of
"Because the only difference between a suicide and a martyrdom really is the amount of press coverage." - Palanhuik, Survivor
"He's so stupid, he doesn't realize how miserable he should be. I envy that." - BoJack H.
"Memories are nice, but that's all they are" - Rikku, from the Final Fantasy X
"Cruelty is echoic. And so is Kindness." - Unknown
"Men can only be happy when they do not assume that the object of life is happiness." -- George Orwell
"He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not, but rejoices for those which he has." - Epictetus
"The test of a first-rate intelligence is the ability to hold two opposed ideas in mind at the same time and still retain the ability to function." F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths. When you go through hardships and decide not to surrender, that is strength."  Arnold Schwarzenegger
"He's so stupid, he doesn't realize how miserable he should. I envy that." - BoJack H.
"Maybe humans can calculate the risk of a bad crop or low hunting but the idea of lacking money to pay the bills is so abstract that constant anxiety is the answer." - Komeme Los Huevos
"If you want to have good ideas you must have many ideas." -Linus Pauling
"My marriage had its ups and downs like anyone's, but when it came down to it, I knew it was solid. I miss that sort of security, and that sort of connection with someone."  John Scalzi
"Don't worry about people stealing an idea. If it's original, you will have to ram it down their throats."  Howard Aiken
"Most men are within a finger's breadth of being mad."  Diogenes the Cynic
"Economics is extremely useful as a form of employment for economists."  John Kenneth Galbraith
"The art of being wise is knowing what to overlook." - William James
"When you win, say nothing. When you lose, say less."Paul Brown
"In every audience, there are those few that are tragically hip..." - Harry Chapin
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best."
"Part of the journey is the end" - Tony Stark
"Some things are so unexpected that no one is prepared for them."  Leo Rosten
"Beautiful People Are Not Always Good, But Good People Are Always Beautiful." - Imam Ali (a.s)
"Anything that sounds too good to be true usually is." - Reynolds Balmer
"To put [AT&amp;T"s] financial needs into more manageable perspective, between 1945 and 1965 it raised enough money in the capital markets to buy up the total gold reserves of the United States, Great Britain, and several other European countries."John Brooks, from "Telephone: The First Hundred Years"
"Your actions reveal how badly you want something. If you keep saying something is a priority but you never act on it, then you don"t really want it. It"s time to have an honest conversation with yourself. Your actions reveal your true motivations." - James Clear
"Just as nature takes every obstacle, every impediment, and works around it  turns it to its purposes, incorporates it into itself  so, too, a rational being can turn each setback into raw material and use it to achieve its goal." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"Every saint got a past, every sinner got a future" - J-Cole
"Deserves death?! I daresay he does. Many that live deserve death. And some die that deserve life. Can you give that to them? Then be not too eager to deal out death in the name of justice, fearing for your own safety. Even the wise can not see all ends." -Gandalf, The Lord of the Rings (Two Towers)
"The only difference between me and you is that I don"t need money to matter."- Chris Morgan
"If you are distressed by anything external, the pain is not due to the thing itself, but to your estimate of it; and this you have the power to revoke at any moment." - Marcus Aurelius
"He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not, but rejoices for those which he has." - Epictetus
"We make our world significant by the courage of our questions and by the depth of our answers." - Carl Sagan
"First say to yourself what you would be; and then do what you have to do." - Epictetus
"The distance is nothing when one has a motive." - Jane Austen
"The best portion of a good man's life: his little, nameless unremembered acts of kindness and love." - William Wordsworth
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." -Aristotle
"Sadly, sadly, the sun rose; it rose upon no sadder sight than the man of good abilities and good emotions, incapable of their directed exercise, incapable of his own help and his own happiness, sensible of the blight on him, and resigning himself to let it eat him away."
"Let a man accept his destiny, No pity and no tears." - Euripides
"Look deep into nature, and then you will understand everything better." -Albert Einstein
"If you have no reason or ability to accomplish anything, then practice the art of becoming. If you have no reason or ability to practice the art of becoming, then just be. If you don't have any reason or ability to just be, then endure."-Elif Shafak, The Bastard of Istanbul
"The best way to show your friendship in your life,is by showing others that you have no enemies" (William Ventura)
"Don't watch the clock. Do what it does. Keep moving"

"People who are spiritually minded tend to suffer from anxiety and depression more. You know why? Because their eyes are open to a world that is in need of repair. They literally have an increased ability to feel emotions of people around them." - Osho
"Advice is what we ask for when we already know the answer but wish we didn't."  Erica Jong
"It is even harder for the average ape to believe that he has descended from man."  H. L. Mencken
"Reason has always existed, but not always in a reasonable form."  Karl Marx
"The best car safety device is a rear-view mirror with a cop in it."  Dudley Moore
"Be more dedicated to making solid achievements than in running after swift but synthetic happiness."-Apj Abdul Kalam
"Be more dedicated to making solid achievements than in running after swift but synthetic happiness."- APJ Abdul Kalam
"The most painful thing is losing yourself in the process of loving someone too much, and forgetting that you are special too." - Ernest Hemingway, Men Without Women
"Indifference and neglect often do much more damage than outright dislike." - J.K. Rowling
"The pain of problems is a call to find solutions rather than a reason for unhappiness and inaction, so it's silly, pointless, and harmful to be upset at the problems and choices that come at you."  Ray Dalio
"I cried because I had no shoes until I met a man who had no feet" - Helen Keller
"The very walls we build to protect ourselves also block out the sun."
"Stoicism is about the *domestication* of emotions, not their elimination." -Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"Stoicism is about the *domestication* of emotions, not their elimination." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"I know if hurts sometimes but you"ll get over it. You"ll find another life to live." -Lil Uzi Vert
"Sometimes you will never know the value of a moment until it becomes a memory" Dr Seuss
"I need to floss more" - Me "Then get up and do it" -My Friend
"Watch Out Ladies Here Comes Hades" Hades
"A Stoic is someone who transforms fear into prudence, pain into transformation, mistakes into initiation, and desire into undertaking." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"But our beginnings never know our ends!" - T.S. Eliot
"If you can't say something nice, say something surrealistic" - Zippy the Pinhead
"Many people die at twenty five and aren't buried until they are seventy five." - Benjamin Franklin
"Speak only if it improves upon the silence." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to steal bread." - Anatole France
"He lapsed into sleep, dreaming of enormous thighs.......legs of lamb and chicken legs danced across his mind's eye........." -The Grappler
"The impediment to action advances action. What stands in the way becomes the way." -Marcus Aurelius
"Cleanup on aisle 5" -Michael Scarn
"Since that time ten years have passed; then fifteen. The grass has grown thick over the grave of my youth." Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn on his time in gulags and exile.
"Do not give your attention to what others do or fail to do; give it to what you do or fail to do." - Gautama Buddha
"That is just divinity, that there are Gods, but no God!" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Sometimes a little heartbreak is a lesson, and the best thing to do is just learn the lesson" - Jon Voight
"Moral systems must first now before the gradations of rank; their presumption must be driven home to their conscience - until they understand it is immoral to say 'what is right for one is proper for another'" - Fredrich Nietzsche
"The practice of judging and condemning morality, the favorite revenge of the intellectually shallow on those lesser so; a kind of indemnity for being badly natured, an opportunity for acquiring spirit and becoming subtle - malice spiritualizes." - Fredrich Nietzsche
"Can even an action for love's sake be unegotistic? Fools! - and the praise of the self sacrifice? - Whoever has offered sacrifice knows what was the goal and obtained something for it. Perhaps from himself for something from himself, in order to have more there, to be more, to feel more - Nietzsche
"All I understood was that she was the girl I sat up every night thinking about, and when I"m with her I"m happy to be alive. Like I can do anything, even talk to you like this. That"s what love is mom, when I am a better person because she is here." - Cory Matthews (Boy Meets World)
"From the wrath of my power they will know who I am....with the power of my AR you will all know who i am" - Nikolas Cruz
'Coincidentia Oppositorum'
-Ghandi 9000
"We know the horned animal that attracts thee, from which danger again threatens you! This old fable may once more become 'history' - Immense stupidity may once more overpower thee! With no God hiding beneath it - no! Only an 'idea,' your 'modern idea.'" - Nietzsche
"Since the French Revolution influence of woman has declined in proportion to her rights and claims; these have proven a symptom of weakening and deadening of the most womanly of instincts. There is stupidity in this, almost masculine stupidity, of which a sensible woman is ashamed of." - Nietzsche
"Silence is the most perfect expression of scorn." George Bernard Shaw
"Where the industrial spirit overcomes military and aristocratic spirit, woman strives for economic and legal independence. She aspires to be "master" and inscribes "progress" on flags and banners. The very opposite reveals a terrible obviousness: woman retrograde." - Nietzsche
"Choose not to be harmed and you won't feel harmed. Don't feel harmed and you haven't been." -Marcus Aurelius
"Choose not to be harmed and you won't feel harmed. Don't feel harmed and you haven't been." - Marcus Aurelius
"There is always some madness in love. But there is also always some reason in madness." -Nietzsche
"Travel makes one modest. You see what a tiny place you occupy in the world." - Gustave Flaubert
"Nobody deserves to be treat as a slave of love,neither to receive the anguish of their lashes" (William Ventura)
"Stoicism is the wisdom of madness and cynicism the madness of wisdom." - Bergen Evans
"If you're prepared to kill, then that means, in turn, you're always prepared for the danger and the possibility of being killed yourself."
"I can hire one half of the working class to kill the other half" -Jay Gould
"There is danger from all men. The only maxim of a free government ought to be to trust no man living with power to endanger the public liberty."  John Adams
"I find it rather easy to portray a businessman. Being bland, rather cruel and incompetent comes naturally to me."  John Cleese
"I'm a mirror. If you're cool with me, I'm cool with you, and the exchange starts. What you see is what you reflect. If you don't like what you see, then you've done something. If I'm standoffish, that's because you are." -Jay-Z
"...I'm not what I've done, I'm what I've overcome...." - What I've Overcome by Fireflight
"The only language is feelings."  Christmas isn't real, Bill Wurtz
"In the end, it's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years."  Abraham Lincoln
"I want to live my life, not record it."  Jackie Kennedy
"Because your own strength is unequal to the task, do not assume that it is beyond the powers of man; but if anything is within the powers and province of man, believe that it is within your own compass also." - Marcus Aurelius
"Some people say I'm a little different, I just say I'm upside down in a right-side up world"  Sam K
"If you hate a person, you hate something in him that is part of yourself. What isn't part of ourselves doesn't disturb us." - Hermann Hesse, Demian
"The average man is a conformist, accepting miseries and disasters with the stoicism of a cow standing in the rain." - Colin Wilson
"The impediment to action advances action. What stands in the way becomes the way." - Marcus Aurelius
"Blessed are the gullible and the stupid, for they shall inherit the bills for my luxurious lifestyle." -Osteen 3:16
"Courage is what it takes to stand up and speak; courage is also what it takes to sit down and listen." -Winston Churchill
"Courage is what it takes to stand up and speak; courage is also what it takes to sit down and listen." - Winston Churchill
"A good listener is very nearly as attractive as a good talker. You cannot have a beautiful mind if you do not know how to listen." - Edward De Bono
" No man alive can turn a whore to a housewife " - Anis Zertal
"You realize that our mistrust of the future makes it hard to give up the past." - Chuck Palahniuk
"One day, in retrospect, the years of struggle will strike you as the most beautiful." -Sigmund Freud
"The trouble with most of us is that we would rather be ruined by praise than saved by criticism." - Norman Vincent Peale
"But better to get hurt by the truth than comforted with a lie." - Khaled Hosseini
"To handle yourself, use your head; to handle others, use your heart." Eleanor Roosevelt
"The simple things are also the most extraordinary things, and only the wise can see them." - Paulo Coelho
"I opened my mouth, almost said something. Almost. The rest of my life might have turned out differently if I had. But I didn"t." -Khaled Hosseini, The Kite Runner
"No candy too sweet, no nigga too spooky." - Motto, U.S. 1,001st Spaceborne
"No candy too sweet, no nigga too spooky." - Motto, U.S. 1,001st Spaceborne
"Overthinking will destroy you. Just breathe and let go."
"Some people will alienate you, because your light is brighter than they bear. So this is the world, so let your radiation continue. " - Martin Luther King
"People fall so in love with their pain, they can"t leave it behind. The same as the stories they tell. We trap ourselves."  Chuck Palahniuk
"What you do every day matters more than what you do once in a while."  Gretchen Rubin
"Truth cares not for your proclamation of being truthful."
"Goodbyes are only for those who love with their eyes. Because for those who love with heart and soul there is no such thing as separation." - Rumi
"They say life is short. right. but this year I realized life is not short, You just got to do more" - Logan Paul
"Death smiles at us all, but all a man can do is smile back" - Marcus Aurelius
"It's never too late to start over. If you weren't happy with yesterday, try something different today. Don't stay stuck." - Alex Elie
"Look for something positive each day, even if some days you have to look a little harder." - Unknown
"There are sadistic scientists who hurry to hunt down errors instead of establishing the truth."  Marie Curie
"Don't stay in bed, unless you can make money in bed."  George Burns
"I've known what it is to be hungry, but I always went right to a restaurant."  Ring Lardner
"A two-year-old is kind of like having a blender, but you don't have a top for it." - Jerry Seinfeld
"Anger as sharp as the broken glass, burning cars and tear gas, every race riot is the last one, a dying culture's final gasp..." -Agnostic Front (Liberty and Justice...)
"Perhaps all the dragons in our lives are princesses who are only waiting to see us act, just once, with beauty and courage. Perhaps everything that frightens us is, in its deepest essence, something helpless that wants our love." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"The most worth-while thing is to try to put happiness into the lives of others."  Robert Baden-Powell
"Nobody wants to be here and nobody wants to leave." - Cormac McCarthy
""You never know what worse luck your bad luck has saved you from." - Cormac McCarthy
"I'm not a woman. I'm a force of nature." - Courtney Love
"Knowledge can be communicated, but not wisdom. One can find it, live it, be fortified by it, do wonders through it, but one cannot communicate and teach it." - Hermann Hesse
"When the wisdom speaks, be silent. Do not waste your candle when the sun is there." - Mehmet Murat Ildan
"Desperation is giving a weapon that costs more than it's user."
"Patience is the companion of wisdom." - Saint Augustine
"Gossip is the devil's telephone. Best to just hang up." - Moira Rose, Schitt's Creek
"I allow the darkness to swallow my soul as much as the light, yet not drown it in evil, as it is not evil, for darkness is merely the misunderstood brother of the light." - Anonymous
"If you could make God bleed, people would cease to believe in Him. There will be blood in the water, the sharks will come. All I have to do is sit back and watch as the world consumes you." - Ivan Vanko
"A good friend will always stab you in the front." - Oscar Wilde
"Many highly intelligent people are poor thinkers. Many people of average intelligence are skilled thinkers. The power of a car is separate from the way the car is driven" - Edward de Bono
"Truth is not what you want it to be; it is what it is, and you must bend to its power or live a lie."  Miyamoto Musashi
"Make me the star in every dream you have."
"Things may come to those who wait, but only the things left by those who hustle." - Unknown (often misattributed to Abraham Lincoln)
"Sometimes I worry this is hell. Then I worry how bad hell will be if it isn't." -Unknown
""If you love someone, set them free. If they come back they"re yours; If they don"t they never were." -Richard Bach
"If you're smart, that's a gift. If you're a great athlete, that's a gift. Kindness is a choice." - Ron Johnson
"Tears are the clouds that hide the sun from a smile" (William Ventura)
"Men think if they're getting laid, everything is fine. Women think if they feel good, everything is fine. Neither turns out to be a very good indicator." -- Mark Lawrence
"In a closed society where everybody's guilty, the only crime is getting caught. In a world of thieves, the only final sin is stupidity." -Hunter S. Thompson
"When you want wisdom and insight as badly as you want to breathe, it is then you shall have it." - Socrates
"I used to think rape was the most difficult crime to prove, it's a he said verse she said. Now I know it's police brutality, it's an trusted authority said verses a suspected criminal said"
"It's always easier to believe in something then to understand it" - Chris Hadfield
"Innovation only survives when people try to falsify their ideas and fail! - Adrian Bowyer
"You have to surrender to the fact that you are of too many in a highly competitive field where it is difficult to stand out. Over time, through your work, you will demonstrate who you are and what you bring to the field. Just stay with it and keep working."  Lisa Kudrow
"I have seen the future and it doesn't work."  Robert Fulford
"I improve on misquotation."  Cary Grant
"Democracy substitutes election by the incompetent many for appointment by the corrupt few."  George Bernard Shaw
"There's only one way to avoid criticism: do nothing, say nothing, and be nothing." - Aristotle
"I can"t understand why people are frightened by new ideas. I"m frightened by old ones."  John Cage
"I got over her in 90 days and 600 nights" - /u/-Skinwalker-
"Life has no meaning the moment you lose the illusion of being eternal." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"My mission in life is not merely to survive, but to thrive; and to do so with some passion, some compassion, some humor, and some style" - Maya Angelou
"A journey is like marriage. The certain way to be wrong is to think you control it." - John Steinbeck
"We did everything adults would do, what went wrong?" Page number for paperback LOTF

"Nothing in the world can bother you as much as your own mind, I tell you. In fact, others seem to be bothering you, but it is not other, it is your own mind." -Sri Ravi Shankar
"Confidence is a slow but insidious killer."
"Once a woman has forgiven her man, she must not reheat his sins for breakfast." - Marlene Dietrich
"Write everything that happens to you down, otherwise you might miss your novel."
"Behold, the field in which I grow my Fucks. Lay thine eyes upon it and see that it is barren." - Leo from Rise of the TMNT
"True wisdom comes to each of us when we realize how little we understand about life, ourselves, and the world around us." - Socrates
"Everyone has a plan, until they get punched in the mouth" - Mike Tyson
"My girl, you make every moment worth recall so that the moments remain a tasty memory forever"
"The wise man doesn't give the right answers, he poses the right questions." - Claude Levi-Strauss
"An optimist is a person who sees a green light everywhere, while a pessimist sees only the red stoplight... the truly wise person is colorblind." -Albert Schweitzer
"An optimist is a person who sees a green light everywhere, while a pessimist sees only the red stoplight... the truly wise person is colorblind." - Albert Schweitzer
"I'm still as lonesome as the World's first ghost." - Jason Molina
"When I was poor and complained about inequality they said I was bitter, now I'm rich and complain about inequality they say I'm a hypocrite. I'm starting to think they just don't want to talk about inequality." -Russell Brand
"Experience is not what happens to you; it's what you do with what happens to you." - Aldous Huxley
"Ow now brown cow" - Ron Burgundy
"If Heaven had looked upon riches to be a valuable thing, it would not have given them to such a scoundrel." -- Jonathan Swift"
"In spite of our differences, no matter what divides us, still we all can at least agree that 'Wonderful Christmastime' is the worst Christmas song ever produced. As a species, we can bond over this fact. And perhaps another world war may be averted." Matt Walsh
"Laziness is nothing more than the habit of resting before you get tired." Jules Renard
"Go for the moon. If you don't get it, you'll still be heading for a star. Happiness lies not in the mere possession of money; it lies in the joy of achievement, in the thrill of the creative effort." --Franklin Delano Roosevelt
"When I leave I dont know what im hoping to find, and when I leave I dont know what im leaving behind." -Neil Peart, (Rush - The Analog Kid)
"Live as if it is for the second time, and you're about to make the same mistake you did last time" - Victor Frankl
"Eventually I confess to a friend some details about my weeping - its intensity, its frequency. She says (kindly) that she thinks we sometimes weep in front of a mirror not to inflame self-pity, but because we want to feel witnessed in our despair."  Maggie Nelson, "Bluets"
"Every time you spend money, you're casting a vote for the kind of world you want." - Anne Lappe
"I have heard people say that they felt closer to their parents after they have died. Maybe if I treat people as if they were dead, I could get along with them better"
"When someone leaves your life, those exits are not made equal. Some are beautiful and poetic and satisfying. Others are abrupt and unfair. But most are just unremarkable, unintentional, and clumsy." - Griffin McElroy
"The meaning of life is just to be alive. It is so plain and so obvious and so simple. And yet, everybody rushes around in a great panic as if it were necessary to achieve something beyond themselves."
"Wisdom is the right use of knowledge. To know is not to be wise. Many men know a great deal, and are all the greater fools for it. There is no fool so great a fool as a knowing fool. But to know how to use knowledge is to have wisdom." - Charles Spurgeon
"Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful, committed, citizens can change the world. Indeed, it is the only thing that ever has." - Margaret Mead
"Freedom and the power to choose should not be the privilege of wealth. They are the birthright of every American." - George H.W. Bush
"A lot of important lessons in life can sound very cheesy. Actually, that's often what makes them so important."
"No one means all he says, and yet very few say all they mean, for words are slippery and thought is viscous."  Henry Adams
"Reading is to the mind what exercise is to the body."  Sir Richard Steele
"Opportunity is missed by most people because it is dressed in overalls and looks like work."  Thomas A. Edison
"If it weren't for my lawyer, I'd still be in prison. It went a lot faster with two people digging."  Joe Martin
"Insecurity is the root of all evil. Understanding it is the foundation of true happiness."
"A fool can always find a fool who admires him." - Nicolas Boileau-Despraux
"Consistently wise decisions can only be made by those whose wisdom is constantly challenged." - Theodore C. Sorensen
"The first wealth is health."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The meaning of life is that it stops." - Franz Kafka
"The past is nothing but a shackle we need to get rid of. Such an excruciating burden. If only I could have no past - you know, if only I could be a nobody, start from point zero and just remain there forever. As light as a feather..."-Elif Shafak, The Bastard of Istanbul
"The hardest thing to do is to be true to yourself, especially when everybody is watching." - Dave Chappelle
"Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored." - Aldous Huxley
"If we could go back in time, there'd be no future - just people endlessly rewriting the past." - Maggie (Daredevil Season 3)
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself." - Rumi
"Women are expected to be conformist automatons in L.A. but in Britain you can be more yourself and people will take you on face value." -- Megan Fox
"My mission in life is not merely to survive, but to thrive; and to do so with some passion, some compassion, some humor, and some style" -Maya Angelou
"To grant forgiveness to someone who has truly changed is not a way of condoning or forgetting his or her past crimes, but of acknowledging whom he or she has become." - Matthieu Ricard
"The ultimate aim of VR is to capture reality in such a way as to never need to capture it again" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The most common sort of lie is that by which a man deceives himself: the deception of others is a relatively rare offense.". - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The heart was made to be broken." - Oscar Wilde
"None of you understand. I'm not locked up in here with YOU. You're locked up in here with ME." - Alan Moore
"Don't ask yourself what the world needs. Ask yourself what makes you come alive and then go do that. Because what the world needs is people who have come alive." - Howard Thurman
"Authentic happiness is not linked to an activity; it is a state of being, a profound emotional balance struck by a subtle understanding of how the mind functions." - Matthieu Ricard
"I asked God for a bike, but I know God doesn't work that way. So I stole a bike and asked for forgiveness." - Emo Philips
"If you want to know the future, look at what is in your mind." - Matthieu Ricard
"Marriage is our last, best chance to grow up." -- Joseph Barth
"It is easy to seize power, but difficult to maintain it." - Unknown*(?)
"It"s like an evolution, you can"t just get into it" Kyle Bolus
"Attention without feeling - is only a report." - Mary Oliver
"Attention without feeling - is only a report" - Mary Oliver
"History is a gallery of pictures in which there are few originals and many copies." - Alexis de Tocqueville
"Be thankful for what you have. Your life, no matter how bad you think it is, is someone else's fairytale." - Wale Ayeni
"In the arena of human life, the honors and rewards fall to those who show their good qualities in action." Aristotle
"A successful marriage requires falling in love many times always with the same person." Mignon McLaughlin, Journalist
"If we do it now we will never run of time."
"The first time I ever read the dictionary I thought it was a poem about everything."  Steven Wright
"Writing well means never having to say, 'I guess you had to be there.'"  Jef Mallett
"Mustard's no good without roast beef."  Chico Marx
"This is the devilish thing about foreign affairs: they are foreign and will not always conform to our whim."  James Reston
"Perfection is achieved not when there is nothing more to add, but when there is nothing left to take away." -Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Where you used to be, there is a hole in the world, which I find myself constantly walking around in the daytime, and falling in at night. I miss you like hell." - Edna St.Vincent Millay
"If a clod be washed away by the sea, Europe is the less... any man's death diminishes me, because I am involved in mankind." -John Donne
"Helicopters don't fly as much as they beat the air into submission."
"If you apply Scientific Method to your everyday life and its principles of skepticism, empirical analysis and experimental drive; you'll be almost immune to fraud and emotional/other bias..." - God
"In times of universal deceit, telling the truth is a revolutionary act" - George Orwell
"The mind is malleable. Our life can be greatly transformed by even a minimal change in how we manage our thoughts and perceive and interpret the world. Happiness is a skill. It requires effort and time." - Matthieu Ricard
"Looking at life from a different perspective makes you realize that it's not the deer that is crossing the road, rather it's the road that is crossing the forest." - Muhammad Ali
"Meditation is not just blissing out under a mango tree. It completely changes your brain and therefore changes what you are." - Matthieu Ricard
"We shall never know all the good that a simple smile can do."  Mother Teresa
'Don't bother just to be better than your contemporaries or predecessors. Try to be better than yourself." - William Faulkner
"When You"re Accustomed to Privilege, Equality Feels Like Oppression"
"Talking about music is like dancing about architecture." - Steve Martin
"Enlightenment is eliminating mental confusion, eliminating hatred, jealousy, mental toxins, cravings. That's very simple and straightforward. Whether you can do it or not is another matter." - Matthieu Ricard
"The most incomprehensible thing about the world is that it is comprehensible." - Albert Einstein
"You are who you choose to be."
"clout upon clout" -Henry David Thoreau
"You only live once". No, you don't. You live everyday, you just die once.
"Great souls endure in silence." -Friedrich Schiller
"Great souls endure in silence." - Friedrich Schiller
"You tell me exactly what you want, and I will very carefully explain to you why it cannot be." - Simeon Yetarian
"If truth is what you seek, then the examined life will only take you on a long ride to the limits of solitude and leave you by the side of the road with your truth and nothing else." - Thomas Ligotti
"When you were born, you cried and everybody else was happy. The only question that matters is this - when you die, will you be happy when everybody else is crying?" - Tony Campolo
"God is a philosophical black hole-the point where reason breaks down." - Kedar Joshi
"It's all about food, beauty, and sex." -Kao Tsze, 4th century BC
"A great leap forward often requires two steps back." - Obi-Wan Kenobi
"I see now that the circumstances of one's birth are irrelevant. It is what you do with the gift of life that determines who you are." -Mewtwo
"I'm an atheist and I thank God for it." -George Bernard Shaw
"I'm an atheist and I thank God for it." - George Bernard Shaw
"Everyone has a story. That isn't to say they all have uniquely subjective experiences -- I mean each of us has some specific combination of ideas that could compel counter-intuitive behavior. Far too often those stories are stupid as shit." - Deckard Dawkins
"In the past 10K years, humans have devised roughly 100K religions based on roughly 2.5K gods. So the only difference between myself and the believers is that I am skeptical of 2,500 gods whereas they are skeptical of 2,499 gods. We're only one God away from total agreement." - Michael Schermer
"Fiction"s about what it is to be a fucking human being" - David Foster Wallace
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"When you're going through hell, keep going." - Winston Churchill
"Never say never" -Justin Bieber
"It's nice to be important but it's more important to be nice."
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read." - James Baldwin
"Anyone who enjoys inner peace is no more broken by failure than he is inflated by success. He is able to fully live his experiences in the context of a vast and profound serenity, since he understands that experiences are ephemeral and that it is useless to cling to them." - Matthieu Ricard
"Even if you do learn to speak correct English, whom are you going to speak it to?" -- Clarence Darrow
"How did it get so late so soon?" - Dr. Seuss
"You seem to be under the impression that I work for you and you can give me orders. Let me fix that." I hung up." - Ilona Andrews
'If you can't beat em, arrange to have them beaten' (g.carlin)
"The only sin which we never forgive in each other is difference of opinion" -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"You don't understand anything until you learn it more than one way."  Marvin Minsky
"If absolute power corrupts absolutely, does absolute powerlessness make you pure?"  Harry Shearer
"The average, healthy, well-adjusted adult gets up at seven-thirty in the morning feeling just plain terrible."  Jean Kerr
"I am just going outside and may be some time."  Captain Lawrence Oates
"Don't raise your voice, improve your argument." - Desmond Tutu
"You can"t control something that scares you. Fears always gonna get in the way." - Clancy Gray [The Darkest Minds]
"You can"t control something that scares you. Fears always gonna get in the way." - Clancy Gray [The Darkest Mind]
"Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you. " - Friedrich Nietzsche
"When one teaches, two learn."  Robert Half
"Why is it that when we talk to God we're said to be praying but when God talks to us we're schizophrenic?" - Lily Tomlin
"With or without religion, you would have good people doing good things and evil people doing evil things. But for good people to do evil things, that takes religion." - Steven Weinberg
"Normally I wouldn't busy myself driving around a bunch of drunken, Scottish bisexuals. But in YOUR case, I'll make an exception." - Tommy Vercetti
"Kisses are a better fate than wisdom." - E.E. Cummings
"I fear one day I'll meet God, he'll sneeze and I won't know what to say." - Ronnie Shakes
"Be kind whenever possible. It is always possible." - Dalai Lama
"One of the greatest tragedies in mankind's entire history may be that morality was hijacked by religion." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Veni, Vidi, Vici" - Julius Caesar on his victory at the battle of Zela.
"You talk to God, you're religious. God talks to you, you're psychotic." - Doris Egan
"We are already ONE. We just think we are separate." - Thomas Merton
"I was always an unusual girl. My mother told me I had a chameleon soul, no moral compass pointing due north, no fixed personality; just an inner indecisiveness that was as wide and as wavering as the ocean." - Lana Del Rey
"And therein lies the whole of man's plight. Human time does not turn in a circle; it runs ahead in a straight line. That is why man cannot be happy: happiness is the longing for repetition." - Milan Kundera
"When a man learns to love, he must bear the risk of hatred."
"I haven't spoken to my wife in years. I didn't want to interrupt her." - Rodney Dangerfield
"The problem with beauty is that it's like being born rich and getting poorer." - Joan Collins
"A wise man sees as much as he ought, not as much as he can." - Michel de Montaigne
"Nobody made a greater mistake than he who did nothing because he could do only a little." - Edmud Burke
!!! !!!
"A cult is a religion with no political power." -- Tom Wolfe
"When life gives you lemons, throw them back and demand chocolate." Anon
"The meaning of earthly existence lies not, as we have grown used to thinking, in prospering but in the development of the soul."
"They don't think it be like it is but it do" - Oscar Gamble
"Our idea of God tells us more about ourselves than about Him." -Thomas Merton
"Our idea of God tells us more about ourselves than about Him." - Thomas Merton
"If you see me as your friend - I'll be your friend. If you see me as your father - I'll be your father. If you see me as your God - I'll be your God" [Jim Jones - People's Temple founder]
"Power is when we have every justification to kill, and we don't" - Oskar Schindler
"Live right now, just be yourself, it doesn"t matter if you"re good enough for someone else" - Jimmy Eat World
"The seeds of our future are sown in our past"
"The hardest thing in the world to explain is Friendship. It"s not something you learn in school. But if you haven"t learned the meaning of friendship, you really haven"t learned anything."
"The seeds of our future are sowed in our past" - Halo
"There are two different types of people in the world, those who want to know, and those who want to believe." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"We stumble and fall constantly, even when we are most enlightened." -Thomas Merton
"We stumble and fall constantly, even when we are most enlightened." - Thomas Merton
[LINK] Learning Patience
"People don't buy what you do; they buy why you do it." - Simon Sinek
"Are you happy being monsters? Because that seems to be the role that you have chosen to be, and if that's the case then I must play mine. The man who stops the monsters." The Doctor, Doctor Who
"Equal rights for others doesn't mean less rights for you."
"Many would be cowards if they had courage enough."  Thomas Fuller
"A conference is a gathering of important people who singly can do nothing, but together can decide that nothing can be done."  Fred Allen
"It pays to be obvious, especially if you have a reputation for subtlety."  Isaac Asimov
"A single death is a tragedy; a million deaths is a statistic."  Joseph Stalin
"It is not the critic who counts; not the man who points out how the strong man stumbles, or where the doer of deeds could have done them better. The credit belongs to the man who is actually in the arena, whose face is marred by dust and sweat and blood." - Teddy Roosevelt (full in body)
"Every one of us is shadowed by an illusory person: a false Self. We are not very good at recognizing illusions, least of all the ones we cherish about ourselves." - Thomas Merton
"We're born alone, we live alone, we die alone. Only through our love and friendship can we create the illusion for the moment that we're not alone." - Orson Welles
"Men learn to love the woman they are attracted to. Women learn to become attracted to the man they fall in love with." - Woody Allen
"So be happy you're here. Think of life as a thrill! And if worse comes to worse, and we all know it will, thank your lucky star You've gotten this far. And tell yourself how lucky you are." - The Cat in the Hat, Seussical
"Believe in yourself and the world will be at your feet". -Vivekananda
"Vision without execution is just hallucination." - Henry Ford
"If you want to conquer fear, don't sit home and think about it. Go out and get busy." - Dale Carnegie
"The purpose of our lives is to find the purpose of our lives." - Thomas Merton
"But maybe asking the question is its own kinda answer" - John Green
"A man who fails well is greater than one who succeeds badly." -Thomas Merton
"A man who fails well is greater than one who succeeds badly." - Thomas Merton
"Life is to be lived, not controlled; and humanity is won by continuing to play in face of certain defeat"-Ralph Ellison (Invisible Man)
"To live is to suffer, to survive is to find some meaning in the suffering." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Others can give you a name or a number, but they can never tell you who you really are. That is something you yourself can only discover from within." - Thomas Merton
"Curious how much of today's philosophy resembles a base attempt to prove God is a jerk. If that's your thesis, wouldn't you also suppose he could tell us himself?" - Tatrus
"We don't even know what our cage looks like because we haven't seen it from the outside." - Gore Vidal
"The hardest thing to fake is happiness." -Anonymous
"heaven is just hell with really good publicity" - Me
1st personal quote
#karma
"The hierarchy of history rarely documents its greatest heroes--they are too busy doing to waste time on legacy."- Walter Mosley
"Complaining about a problem without posing a solution is called whining." Teddy Roosevelt
"If you leave the track,the train will fall" -by myself
"...with a dildo" (movie quote game)
"We are not human beings having a spiritual experience; we are spiritual beings having a human experience." -Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
"We are not human beings having a spiritual experience; we are spiritual beings having a human experience." - Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
"A woman not only has the strength to touch the heart of a man,she also has the strength to lift it" (William Ventura)
"Certains moments of happiness can escape,but not those that were already chained to the heart" (William Ventura)
"Get up, Shahrzad al-Khayzuran. You kneel before no one. Least of all me." - Renee Ahdieh
"De mortuis nihil nisi bonum" - Ancient Latin Phrase
"Rules are just helpful guidelines for stupid people who can't make up their own minds."  Seth Hoffman
"The word 'politics' is derived from the word 'poly', meaning 'many', and the word 'ticks', meaning 'blood sucking parasites'."  Larry Hardiman
"You might as well fall flat on your face as lean over too far backward."  James Thurber
"All the world's a stage and most of us are desperately unrehearsed."  Sean O'Casey
"Man becomes, as it were, the sex organs of the machine world..." Marshall McLuhan
"Courage is found in unlikely places."  J. R. R. Tolkien
"Still, I must say, track and field doesn't really seem like a full sport. It's more like leftover scraps from other sports." - Dale Gribble
(The title isn't long enough)
"I'm sick of following my dreams. I'm just gonna ask them where they're going and catch up with them later." - Mitch Hedberg
"Compassion is the keen awareness of the interdependence of all things." - Thomas Merton
"Give yourself permission to slow down. You can speed up by slowing down." - Gabby Bernstein
"A man can never have too much red wine, too many books, or too much ammunition."  Rudyard Kipling
"We are so obsessed with doing that we have no time and no imagination left for being. As a result, men are valued not for what they are but for what they do or what they have - for their usefulness." - Thomas Merton
"Love is not a matter of getting what you want. Quite the contrary. The insistence on always having what you want, on always being satisfied, on always being fulfilled, makes love impossible." - Thomas Merton
"It is easier to act yourself into a new way of thinking, than it is to think yourself into a new way of acting."  Millard Fuller
"Love is the blackest of plagues"-Ingmar Bergman
"All progress takes place outside the comfort zone." Michael John Bobak
"You can criticize an oldman because you know what he is but you can't criticize an young man because you don't know what he will be." - Don't know who said this.
"You can live to be a hundred if you give up all the things that make you want to live to be a hundred." -Woody Allen
"People may spend their whole lives climbing the ladder of success only to find, once they reach the top, that the ladder is leaning against the wrong wall." - Thomas Merton
"I"ve learned that the worst thing a parent can do is ignore their children." - Sherman Alexie
"Accept loss forever." - Jack Kerouac
"The bad news is time flies.The good news is you're the pilot." - Micheal L. Altshuler.
"When you take a woman away from her man, what you get is a woman who can be taken away from her man." -- Mark Lawrence
"Violence is the weapon of the weak" - /u/emmanuelbassil talking about himself
"For both parties in a controversy, the most disagreeable way of retaliating is to be vexed and silent; for the aggressor usually regards the silence as a sign of contempt." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I believe that there is a subtle magnetism in Nature, which, if we unconsciously yield to it, will direct us aright." Henry David Thoreau
"I never teach my pupils. I only attempt to provide the conditions in which they can learn."  Albert Einstein
"Much of the social history of the Western world over the past three decades has involved replacing what worked with what sounded good."  Thomas Sowell
"Education is a progressive discovery of our own ignorance."  Will Durant
"Boys will be boys, and so will a lot of middle-aged men."  Kin Hubbard
"Those who do not remember the past are condemned to repeat it."  George Santayana
"It is better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to open one's mouth and remove all doubt." - Abraham Lincoln
"Maybe in another life, when we are both cats."Some Movie
"I wanted to tell her that she was the first beautiful thing I had seen in three years. That the sight of her yawning to the back of her hand was enough to drive the breath from me.
"Your mind is a powerful thing. When you fill it with positive thoughts, your life will start to change." - Unknown
"There are times when silence is the best way to yell at the top of your voice." - Orlando Aloysius Battista
"Better to be slapped with the truth than kissed with a lie."  Unknown
"They say that true love hurts, well this could almost kill me. Young love, murder, that is what this must be. I would give it all to not be sleeping alone."
"I can taste her lipstick and see her laying across your chest, I can feel the distance every time you remember her fingertips."
"We need never be ashamed of our tears." - Charles Dickens (Great Expectations)
"The attempt to silence a man is the greatest honor you can bestow on him. It means that you recognize his superiority to yourself." -Joseph Sobran
"The attempt to silence a man is the greatest honor you can bestow on him. It means that you recognize his superiority to yourself." - Joseph Sobran
"Do unto others before they do unto you" -anon
"I'm single, I love being single! I haven't had this much sex since I was a Boy Scout leader!" --Frank Drebin
"You have not finished the best part of your life." --David Niven
"Will is incomplete without love" - Philip H. Anselmo
"This is the tarantula"s den! Here hangeth its web: touch this, so that it may tremble. There cometh the tarantula willingly: Welcome, tarantula! Black on thy back is thy triangle and symbol; and I know also what is in thy soul. Revenge is in thy soul." - Fredrick Nietzsche
"What is silent in the father speaks in the son." - Fredrick Nietzsche
"You either progress or decay." - Clint Eastwood,"I always had this feeling,something my father would say."
"Some people talk in their sleep. Lecturers talk while other people sleep" - Albert Camus
"What is it, then, that makes your life so sad?" asked the man. "Well, it"s me. It"s the way I feel about it. Wouldn"t that make your life sad, if that"s how you felt about it?" answered the boy.Anonymous
"It takes no compromising to give people their rights. It takes no money to respect the individual. It takes no survey to remove repressions." -- Harvey Milk
"Two reasonable people who disagree is better than two unreasonable people who agree."
"If she come, I be happy. If she don't, I be content." - Alice Walker The Color Purple,
"Life is nothing but a competition to be the criminal rather than the victim." - Bertrand Russell
"The public does not sufficiently understand that pure science is the indispensable condition of applied science and that the fate of nations which neglect science and scientist is marked for decadence" 1927 Albert I, king of the Belgians
"One of the keys to mental health is to never ask questions you don't truly want the answers to". - me
"Being defeated is only a temporary condition; giving up is what makes it permanent."  Marilyn vos Savant
"Man is not measured by his wealth,or by the size of his penis;it's measure by the size of his heart and because despite beign humble,he knows how to love without measures" (William Ventura)
"My solitude doesn"t depend on the presence or absence of people; on the contrary, I hate who steals my solitude without, in exchange, offering me true company." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace" -Jimi Hendrix
"...he'd had the foresight to know that a lot of the savages wear store-bought clothes." - Louis L'Amour, Ride the Dark Trail
"I could have built the Pyramids with the effort it takes me to cling on to life and reason." - Franz Kafka
"Strange as it seems, no amount of learning can cure stupidity, and higher education positively fortifies it."  Stephen Vizinczey
"The end of the human race will be that it will eventually die of civilization."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Women who seek to be equal with men lack ambition."  Timothy Leary
"The most remarkable thing about my mother is that for thirty years she served the family nothing but leftovers. The original meal has never been found."  Calvin Trillin
"All faith is False, all Faith is true. Truth is the shattered mirror strown in myriad bits ; while each believes his little bit the whole to own." - Richard Francis Burton
"They Laugh At me Because I'm Different. I laugh At Then Because The're all the same "- The Joker Quotes.
"If you don"t love it, you"re going to fail." - Steve Jobs
"The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances: if there is any reaction, both are transformed." - Carl Jung
"People say nothing is impossible, but I do nothing everyday." A.A. Milne
"Your pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your own understanding" - Khalil Gibran
"Yor pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your own understanding" Khalil Gibran
"A good beginning makes a good end."  Louis L'Amour
"dont follow other quotes, create your own legacy" being unique
"No one gossips about other people's secret virtues." - Bertrand Russell
"I was a man who thrived on solitude; without it I was like another man without food or water. Each day without solitude weakened me. I took no pride in my solitude; but I was dependent on it. The darkness of the room was like sunlight to me." - Charles Bukowski
"If you teach XXIth century people with XIXth century methods, what could go wrong?" - Spirits of The Fractal Forest
"Next time you are tempted to tell a lie, just pause for a moment, reflect on it and choose your words carefully. It"ll go a long way in ensuring that your speech, thoughts and actions are in harmony." -Om Swami
"The difference between patriotism and nationalism is that the patriot is proud of his country for what it does, and the nationalist is proud of his country no matter what it does" - Sydney J. Harris
"Each has his past shut in him like the leaves of a book known to him by his heart, and his friends can only read the title." - Virginia Woolf
"When I was 5 years old my mother always told me that happiness was the key to life. When I went to school, they asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up. I wrote down "happy". They told me I didn"t understand the question. I told them they didn"t understand life." - John Lennon
"I am not a sheep waiting to be prodded by my shepherd. I am a lion and I refuse to talk, to walk, to sleep with the sheep. I will hear not those who weep and complain, for their disease is contagious. Let them join the sheep. The slaughterhouse of failure is not my destiny." OG Mandino
"People die faster than people think." - Jordan Peterson
"The basic tool for the manipulation of reality is the manipulation of words. If you can control the meaning of words, you can control the people who must use the words." - Philip K. Dick
"Who is John Galt?" - Ayn Rand
"Angels can fly because they take themselves lightly."
"There are three rules for writing a novel. Unfortunately, no one knows what they are." -- William Somerset Maugham
"Under all speech that is good for anything there lies a silence that is better, Silence is deep as Eternity; speech is shallow as Time." - Thomas Carlyle
"Our true mentor in life is science." - Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
"There are only two types of people in this world. The righteous who think they are sinners, and the sinners who think they are righteous." -Blaise Pascal
"One day I will pass over that wall And be able to fly As high as the sky This heavy thing called life can"t tie me down At the end of my life, on the other day that I can smile, let"s be together." -Insooni "A Goose's Dream"
"In politics, as in religion, it is equally absurd to aim at making proselytes by fire and sword. Heresies in either can rarely be cured by persecution." Alexander Hamilton
"The trouble with the Republican Party is that it has not had a new idea for thirty years the Republican Party is still a covert and a refuge for those who are afraid, for those who want to consult their grandfathers about everything."-Woodrow Wilson
"I am not what happened to me, I am what I choose to become." - Carl Jung
"If you think in terms of a year, plant a seed; if in terms of ten years, plant trees; if in terms of 100 years, teach the people." - Confucius
"The privilege of a lifetime is being who you are" - Joseph Campbell
"Yesterday is gone. Tomorrow has not yet come. We have only today. Let us begin." - Mother Teresa
"A leader is best when people barely know that he exists, [] of a good leader, who talks little, when his work is done, his aims fulfilled, they will all say, 'We did this ourselves.' " Lao Tzu.
"Where love rules, there is no will to power, and where power predominates, love is lacking. The one is the shadow of the other." - Carl Jung
"When we cannot bear to be alone, it means we do not properly value the only companion we will have from birth to death-ourselves." - Eda LeShan
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was Gotcha!" - Attila the Stockbroker ( a.k.a. John Baine)
"Don't bury your failures. Let them inspire you." - Unknown
"Recovery is Salvation." - Ravi Silari
"A marriage is always made up of two people who are prepared to swear that only the other one snores."  Terry Pratchett
"Most people have seen worse things in private than they pretend to be shocked at in public."  Edgar Watson Howe
"It is the wretchedness of being rich that you have to live with rich people."  Logan Pearsall Smith
"A superior man is modest in his speech, but exceeds in his actions." - Confucius
"Climate change is made outta people!"
"One must live the way one thinks or end up thinking the way one has lived." - Paul Bourget
"We do not need to go out and find love; rather, we need to be still and let love discover us." - John O'Donohue, Anam Cara: A Book of Celtic Wisdom
"The thermometer of success is merely the jealousy of the malcontents."  Salvador Dali
"Men fear silence as they fear solitude, because both give them a glimpse of the terror of life's nothingness." -Andre Maurois
"Men fear silence as they fear solitude, because both give them a glimpse of the terror of life's nothingness." - Andre Maurois
"If you were a talking potato, and I were a burnt-skinned hand, why I"d hold you all day long I would, and well why shouldn"t I, what with your light brown skin, so young and lovely." Norm MacDonald
"I know what men want. Men want to be really, really close to someone who will leave them alone." - Elayne Boosier
"I know we can't all stay here forever. So I want to write my words on the face of today and they'll paint it."
"I hold this to be the highest task for a bond between two people: that each protects the solitude of the other." -Rainer Maria Rilke
"I hold this to be the highest task for a bond between two people: that each protects the solitude of the other." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"Nothing better then serving up smiles "-Stephen Hillenburg
" A strong man only bows his head to God and the barber." - Ravi Silari
"Men fear silence as they fear solitude, because both give them a glimpse of the terror of life's nothingness." -Andre Maurois
"Men fear silence as they fear solitude, because both give them a glimpse of the terror of life's nothingness." - Andre Maurois
"A life defined by should'ves is a life without purpose or ambition." -- Unknown
"People don"t have ideas; ideas have people." - Carl Jung
"The good thing about science is that it's true whether or not you believe in it." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"Every nation has the right to demand proper treatment and no country should violate the territory of any other country." - Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
"Teachers are the one and only people who save nations." - Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
"There are times when you seek your solitude, and your solitude just wants to be left alone." - Robert Breault
"The biggest battle is the war against ignorance." - Mustafa Kemal Ataturk
"Well, we don"t rely on American banks. We have all the funding we need out of Russia." -- Eric Trump
"I finally experienced what i used to overthink every night, but didn't felt the same way as i thought i would" - Khulaid Jamal
"A man can be himself only so long as he is alone; and if he does not love solitude, he will not love freedom; for it is only when he is alone that he is really free." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Sometimes i don't even know who i'm waiting for, but it feels like i am". - Khulaid Jamal
"I get so many new creative ideas when i start thinking out of the box" - Khulaid Jamal.
"If you run into an asshole in the morning, you ran into an asshole. If you run into assholes all day, you"re the asshole." - Raylan Givens
"After all that fuss if you don't give some quality time to yourself, you will simply get depressed". - Khulaid Jamal
"There are all kinds of love in this world but never the same love twice." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Loneliness is inner emptiness. Solitude is inner fulfillment." -Richard J. Foster
"Loneliness is inner emptiness. Solitude is inner fulfillment." - Richard J. Foster
"We're all going to die, all of us, what a circus! That alone should make us love each other but it doesn't. We are terrorized and flattened by trivialities, we are eaten up by nothing." - Charles Bukowski
"To acquire the habit of reading is to construct for yourself a refuge from almost all the miseries of life."
"You know, if I were to die right now in some sort of fiery explosion due to the carelessness of a friend, well, that would just be okay." - Spongebob Squarepants
"In this moment I am euphoric. Not because of any phony God's blessing. But because I have been enlightened by my own intelligence" - aalewis
"My people are going to learn the principles of democracy the dictates of truth and the teachings of science. Superstition must go. Let them worship as they will, every man can follow his own conscience provided it does not interfere with sane reason or bid him act against the liberty of his fellow
"A diverse community is a resilient community, capable of adapting to changing situations." - Fritjof Capra, physicist and ecologist
"You probably shouldn't try to charge a fork."- me
"Blessed are those who do not fear solitude, who are not afraid of their own company, who are not always desperately looking for something to do, something to amuse themselves with, something to judge." - Paulo Coelho
"The truth is silent. The truth doesn't come with words. It's something that I just know; it's something that I can feel without words, and it's called silent knowledge." - Miguel Angel Ruiz

"A loving silence often has more power to heal and to connect than the most well-intentioned words." - Rachel Naomi Remen
"Never do tomorrow what you can do today. Procrastination is the thief of time." -Charles Dickens
"I"ll eat that ass like silly putty" Ancient Chinese proverb.
"We are so busy chasing gold that we forget to pick that one diamond that was right in front of us this whole time and that diamond could've changed our life". - Khulaid Jamal
"The world is round; it has no point."  Adrienne E. Gusoff
"I wonder if other dogs think poodles are members of a weird religious cult."  Rita Rudner
"God is a comedian playing to an audience too afraid to laugh."  Voltaire
"Never explain--your friends do not need it and your enemies will not believe you anyway."  Elbert Hubbard
"Never engage in a pissing match with a skunk: he possesses important natural advantages." Bryan Cartledge ex UK Ambassador in Moscow
"Sometimes, one person can save you from another and you don't even know that you're being saved."
"If you can't intelligently argue for both sides of an issue, you don't understand the issue well enough to argue for either."
"Mooses' with Nooses'" - Unknown 1932
"I don't care about being dead, because I won't know about it. The best thing about being dead is you don't know about it. It's like being stupid; it's only painful for others." - Ricky Gervais
"In a few years, men will be able to communicate more effectively through a machine than face to face. That is a rather startling thing to say, but it is our conclusion" - J.C.R. Licklider ("Lick") and Robert W. Taylor (in their research paper "The Computer as a Communication Device" in 1968)
"The great advantage about telling the truth is that nobody ever believes it."  Dorothy L. Sayers
"People do not seem to realise that their opinion of the world is also a confession of their character" - Henry David Thoreau
"Sex. In America an obsession. In other parts of the world a fact." - Marlene Dietrich
"I love quotations because it is a joy to find thoughts one might have, beautifully expressed with much authority by someone recognized wiser than oneself." - Marlene Dietrich
"Better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to speak out and remove all doubt." - Abraham Lincoln
"Pour yourself a drink, put on some lipstick and pull your shit together"-- Elizabeth Taylor
"He despised a need which now held no shred of joy or meaning, which had become the mere need of a woman's body, an anonymous body that belonged to a woman whom he had to forget while he held it" - Ayn Rand (Atlas Shrugged)
"People say I am ruthless. I am not ruthless. And if I find the man who is calling me ruthless, I shall destroy him."-Bobby Kennedy
"Silence is one of the great arts of conversation." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"The language of silence is the language of God, the language of silence is the language of the heart." - Sivananda
"As we have seen, for human reality, to be is to choose oneself. Without any help whatsoever, it is entirely abandoned to the intolerable necessity of making itself be." - Jean-Paul Sartre (Being and Nothingness, 1943)
"Fake realities will create fake humans. Or, fake humans will generate fake realities, then sell them to other humans, turning them, eventually, into forgeries of themselves." - Philip K. Dick
"If it looks like a duck, and quacks like a duck, chances it"s not a cow" - Ron Weasley
"I have often regretted my speech, never my silence." - Xenocrates
"The things you do for yourself are gone when you are gone, but the things you do for others remain as your legacy." - Kalu Ndukwe Kalu
"When you were born, you cried and the world rejoiced. Live your life so that when you die, the world cries and you rejoice." Cherokee Proverb
"The more you know the less you need to say." - Jim Rohn
"A man worried about his time is a endless cycle of selfshame"
"Most people spend time trying to be someone important, instead of doing something important." - Darren Hardy
"Where there is no law, there is no liberty; and nothing deserves the name of law but that which is certain and universal in its operation upon all the members of the community." Benjamin Rush (1788)
"Silence is the sleep that nourishes wisdom." - Francis Bacon
'It is better, I think, to grab at the stars than to sit flustered because you know you cannot reach them... At least he who reaches will get a good stretch, a good view, and perhaps even a low-hanging apple for his efforts.' -Drizzt Do'Urden
"I"m restless. Things are calling me away. My hair is being pulled by the stars again."
"Power is like a drink. The more you have, the more you want. And there's few men who can handle it." - Drew MacFarlane
"But what seems like a reasonable distance to one person might feel too far to somebody else."
"The reason that technology so often disappoints and betrays us is that it promises to make easy things that, by their intrinsic nature, have to be hard." -- Brett Stephens
"You may not control all the events that happen to you, but you can decide not to be reduced by them." -- Maya Angelou
"True strength is tempered with compassion" - cant remember where i heard it and cant find it online
"It is not easy to see how the more extreme forms of nationalism can long survive when men have seen the Earth in its true perspective as a single small globe against the stars." - Arthur C. Clarke
"There are two types of fools: Those who suspect nothing and those who suspect everything" - Charles-Joseph de Ligne
"Spiteful words can hurt your feelings but silence breaks your heart." C. S. Lewis
"Not far from the invention of fire... we must rank the invention of doubt." - Thomas Huxley
"If you don"t want to talk about capitalism, then you should keep silent about Fascism." - Max Horkheimer
"I don't mind what Congress does, as long as they don't do it in the streets and frighten the horses."  Victor Hugo
"When a distinguished but elderly scientist states that something is possible, he is almost certainly right. When he states that something is impossible, he is very probably wrong."  Arthur C. Clarke
"Freedom is not something that anybody can be given. Freedom is something people take, and people are as free as they want to be" - James Baldwin
"Perhaps home is not a place but simply an irrevocable condition." - James Baldwin
"Name 6 ways we're better than chickens.. [short pause] See? Nobody can do it. You know why? Because chickens are decent people" - George Carlin.
"Who covets more is evermore a slave."  Robert Herrick
"The average man is more interested in a woman who is interested in him than he is in a woman with beautiful legs." - Marlene Dietrich
"I'll teach your grandmother to suck eggs" - Stinky Wizzleteeth(?)
"Silence is one of the hardest arguments to refute." - Josh Billings
"The world is wide and has many streets, but death is a fate that everyone meets. If life were a thing that money could buy, the rich would live and the poor would die, but God in his mercy would not have it so. The rich and the poor together must go."
"Silence is a true friend who never betrays." - Confucius
"They say that these are not the best of times. But they're the only times I've ever known" - Billy Joel
"Life is a series of building, testing, changing and iterating." - Lauren Mosenthal
"You"re trying to pretend you"re dead, I see you sitting here cheating Max!" - Adam
"They say that these are not the best of times But they're the only times I've ever known" - Billy Joel
"Nothing strengthens authority so much as silence." - Leonardo da Vinci
"Time waits for no man, the man who spends his time waiting. Wastes his time."- unknown
"He who does not understand your silence will probably not understand your words." - Elbert Hubbard
"We feel free because we lack the very language to articulate our unfreedom." - Slavoj iek
"If you have built castles in the air, your work need not be lost; that is where they should be. Now put the foundations under them." - Henry David Thoreau, *Walden*
"The most important thing is this: To be able at any moment - to sacrifice what you are, for what you will become." - Eric Thomas
"The music is not in the notes, but in the silence between." - Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart
"What if you took one week every day to draw the human body" - Mattias P., 2018
"When there is evil in this world that justice cannot defeat, would you traint your hands with evil to defeat evil. Or would you remain steadfast and righteous even if it means surrendering to evil?" - Lelouch Lamperouge
"Not how the world is, but that it is, is the mystery." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"If I were a physician, and if I were allowed to prescribe just one remedy for all the ills of the modern world, I would prescribe silence. For even if the Word of God were proclaimed in the modern world, how could one hear it with so much noise? Therefore, create silence." - Soren Kierkegaard
"How did I get into the world? Why was I not asked about it and why was I not informed of the rules and regulations but just thrust into the ranks as if I had been bought by a peddling shanghaier of human beings? How did I get involved in this big enterprise called actuality?" - Soren Kierkegaard
"I'm so misunderstood that people misunderstand me even when I tell them I'm misunderstood." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Only a fool refuses to greet the stranger they pass in the street and then lament how lonely life has left them feeling" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The world is the great gymnasium where we come to make ourselves strong" - Swami Vivekananda
"Only a fool refuses to greet the stranger they pass in the street and then lament how lonely life has made them feel" - Rudolf P Belmar
"I imagine one of the reasons people cling to their hates so stubbornly is because they sense, once hate is gone, they will be forced to deal with pain." - James Baldwin
"Time flies like an arrow. Fruit flies like a banana." -- Groucho Marx
"Only a fool refuses to greet the stranger they pass in the street and then lament how lonely life had made them feel" - Rudolf P Belmar
"One's answer can be quite philosophical until it is their own problem." - Anonymous
"Philosophy is a battle against the bewitchment of our intelligence by means of language." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Hell isn't other people. Hell is yourself." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"It is the duty of the human understanding to understand that there are things which it cannot understand." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Why should we take advice on sex from the pope? If he knows anything about it, he shouldn't!" - George Bernard Shaw
"Two people in love, alone, isolated from the world, that's beautiful."
"A cup of coffee a day keeps the antidepressant away"
"If one is to ever find happiness, one must first stop searching." -Avery Regelman
"Oh, what a tangled web we weave when first we practice to believe."  Laurence J. Peter
"Just because your voice reaches halfway around the world doesn't mean you are wiser than when it reached only to the end of the bar."  Edward R. Murrow
. "Self-praise is for losers. Be a winner. Stand for something. Always have class, and be humble." John Madden, Head Coach, Oakland Raiders (1969-78)
"It is amazing how much can be accomplished if no one cares who gets the credit."--John Wooden
"Animals are my friends...and I don't eat my friends." - George Bernard Shaw
"3 o'clock in the the afternoon is always too early or too late to do anything." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"Young people need models, not critics."-John Wooden
"I have noticed even people who claim everything is predestined and that we can do nothing to change it look before they cross the road." --Steven Hawking
50 Beautiful Quotes images about love for 2019
"your hand touching mine. this is how galaxies collide."
"Laughter is the sensation of feeling good all over and showing it principally in one place."  Josh Billings
"A man prayed, and at first he thought that prayer was talking. But he became more and more quiet until in the end he realized prayer is listening." -Soren Kierkegaard
"A man prayed, and at first he thought that prayer was talking. But he became more and more quiet until in the end he realized prayer is listening." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Always make a total effort, even when the odds are against you." - Arnold Palmer
"As the phones get bigger, we get dumber. I haven't read a book in years yet I consume itty - bitty d'oeuvres of information all day everyday." -- Dave Chappelle
"As soon as one promises not to do something, it becomes the one thing above all others that one most wishes to do." - Georgette Heyer
"I took a deep breath and listened to the old brag of my heart. I am. I am. I am." - Sylvia Plath
"The question is not "To be or not to be," it is what we should be until we are not." - Soren Kierkegaard
"The future will view all history as a crime." -Serj Tankian
"Not how the world is, but that it is, is the mystery." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Dont say another Goddamn word" - Tycho Brahe
"I am in love with what we are, not what we should be." Kesha, Animal
"No man ever believes that the Bible means what it says, he is always convinced it says what he means." -G.B. Shaw
" It is the fault of our science that it wants to explain all; and if it explains not, then it says there is nothing to explain. " - Bram Stoker, Dracula
"God created man in his own image says the Bible; philosophers reverse the process: they create God in theirs." - G. C. Lichtenberg
"A hermit is one who renounces the world of fragments that he may enjoy the world wholly and without interruption." - Khalil Gibran, Sand and Foam
"I do recommend and assign Thursday ... next to be devoted by the People of these States to the service of that great and glorious Being, who is the beneficent Author of all the good that was, that is, or that will be." George Washington (1789)
"Solitude is sometimes the best society." - John Milton, Paradise Lost
"It's the friends you can call up at 4 a.m. that matter." - Marlene Dietrich
"Pain is temporary. It may last a minute or an hour or a day or even a year but eventually it will subside and something else will take its place. If I quit however, it will last forever." - Eric Thomas
"If you want to find the secrets of the universe, think in terms of energy, frequency and vibration." - Nikola Tesla
"I balk. I lazy the bed. I wallow when I write. I truth when I lie. I throw a book when a poem undoes me." - Tiana Clark
"To see a world in a grain of sand and a heaven in a wild flower, hold infinity in the palm of your hand and eternity in an hour." - William Blake
"Good artists create, great artists steal" - W. H. Davenport Adams
"Everything you"ve ever wanted is on the other side of fear. " George Addair
"All our dreams can come true, if we have the courage to pursue them"  Walt Disney
"There's a thin line between arrogance and confidence" - Eliot Coldwater
"We are not figuratively, but literally stardust." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"Woman is a flower that blooms when it is sown with love" (William Ventura)
"And at times you appear in the tower of my thoughts,giving me caresses that elevate me to the top floor of my desires" (William Ventura)
"What's the point in dying if we never actually experience death itself. It's almost a waste of time" - Bridget C Bethel
"Don't let people tell you that you are too young to accomplish something. A baby tiger is still a tiger."
"If you are silent about your pain, they"ll kill you and say you enjoyed it." - Zora Neale Hurston
"If one is to be called a liar, one may as well make an effort to deserve the name."  A. A. Milne
"I won't take my religion from any man who never works except with his mouth."  Carl Sandburg
"We live in an age when pizza gets to your home before the police."  Jeff Marder
"Money can't buy happiness but it can give it away to other people"-Bohemian Rhapsody(Freddie)
"War is politics by other means" - Carl von Clausewitz
"In heaven, all the interesting people are missing." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Genuine tranquility of the heart and perfect peace of mind, the highest blessings on earth after health, are to be found only in solitude and, as a permanent disposition, only in the deepest seclusion." - Arthur Schopenhauer, World As Will and Representation
"You Can Develop Any Habit Or Thought Or Behavior That You Consider Desirable Or Necessary."
"Feeling gratitude and not expressing it is like wrapping a present and not giving it."  William Arthur Ward
"If there really is a god, then it doesn"t matter if you believe." -George Harrison
"I turn a God damn into a Gods plan" -lil Wayne
"They always say time changes things, but you actually have to change them yourself." - Andy Warhol
"He who lives in the present lives in eternity." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"I don't know why we are here, but I'm pretty sure that it is not in order to enjoy ourselves." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"One of the great mistakes is to judge policies and programs by their intentions rather than their results." - Milton Freedman
" If you don't like where you are, move. You are not a tree. " - Jim Rohn
"Human attention is a gift, and no one can demand it from you."  Daniel Post Senning
"Happiness is only real when it"s shared."
"But I don't feel that way anymore...
"Every man who delights in uttering a multitude of words, even though he says admirable things, is empty within. If you love truth, be a lover of silence. In the beginning we have to force ourselves to be quiet. But then there is born something that draws us to it." - Isaac of Ninevah
"When we cling, often forever, to our old patterns of thinking and behaving, we fail to negotiate any crisis, to truly grow up, and to experience the joyful sense of rebirth that accompanies the successful transition into greater maturity." The Road Less Travelled
"Caresses are nothing but anxious bliss, Vain attempts of love to unite souls through a kiss."  Guy de Maupassant
"A busy solitude is, I think, the happiest life of all." - Voltaire, Letter to Frederick II, King of Prussia, 1751
"Science strives ahead; politics stumbles around like a drunk" - Andrew Marr
"The liar's punishment ... is that he cannot believe anyone else." -- George Bernard Shaw
"Do not spoil what you have by desiring what you have not; remember that what you now have was once among the things you only hoped for." - Epicurus
"I got to thinking that poems were like people. Some people you got right off the bat. Some people you just didn't get--and never would get." - Benjamin Senz
"The only thing that lasts longer than a friend's love is the stupidity that keeps us from knowing any better."  Randy K. Milholland
"Seek simplicity, and distrust it."  Alfred North Whitehead
"I hate music, especially when it's played."  Jimmy Durante
"In these matters the only certainty is that nothing is certain."  Pliny the Elder
"All the darkness in the world cannot extinguish the light of a single candle." - St. Francis Of Assisi
"The best way to predict the future is to create it"
"All you need is the plan, the road map, and the courage to press on to your destination." Earl Nightingale
"Good friends, good books and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life."  Mark Twain
"The function of prayer is not to influence God, but rather to change the nature of the one who prays." -Soren Kierkegaard
"The function of prayer is not to influence God, but rather to change the nature of the one who prays." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Sometimes people are beautiful. Not in looks. Not in what they say. Just in what they are." -Markus Zusak
"You can always count on Americans to do the right thing - after they've tried everything else." -Winston Churchill
"A man's gotta make at least one bet a day, else he could be walking around lucky and never know it." -Jim Jones
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge." - Daniel J. Boorstin
"I found I had less and less to say, until finally, I became silent, and began to listen. I discovered in the silence, the voice of God." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Sometimes there aren"t right decisions. Sometimes there"s just decisions." - Justin McElroy, The Adventure Zone
"When You Want To Succeed As Bad As You Want To Breathe, Then You Will Be Successful" - Eric Thomas
"Give me a smart idiot over a stupid genius anyday"- samuel goldwyn
"It is amusing to see some bigger enterprises acting like poor people looking for Gold." - Murat Durmus (CEO AISOMA)
"It is amusing to see some bigger enterprises acting like poor people lokking for Gold." - Murat Durmus (CEO AISOMA)
"You do not need to leave your room. Remain sitting at your table and listen. Do not even listen, simply wait, be quiet, still and solitary. The world will freely offer itself to you to be unmasked, it has no choice, it will roll in ecstasy at your feet." - Franz Kafka, Senses
"Be hard on yourself, easy on others."  Imam Shafi"i
"intelligence is a choice not a gift" - Eliot Coldwater
"If a free society cannot help the many who are poor, it cannot save the few who are rich."- John F. Kennedy
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work" -Thomas Edison
"Politicians are the same all over. They promise to build a bridge even when there is no river." - Nikita Khrushchev
"Wherever wood can swim, there I am sure to find this flag of England." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Solitude is a defense mechanism in a world that does not deserve to be saved." - Robert Ferguson, Alone in America, p. 85
"Some cause happiness wherever they go; others whenever they go." -- Oscar Wilde
"Maybe you don't go to hell for the things you do. Maybe you go to hell for the things you don't do. The things you don't finish." - Chuck Palahniuk
"The world is full of magic things, patiently waiting for our senses to grow sharper" -W.B. Yeats
"We can"t help everyone, but everyone can help someone" -Ronald Reagan
"Showing gratitude to the One who created you is a very powerful thing. It gives you a sense of balance and draws good into your life" -ISMAIL MENK
"Women should be great artists because painting is nothing but applying makeup" - Bridget C Bethel
"Cocaine is God's way of saying that you're making too much money."  Robin Williams
"Television is the first truly democratic culture - the first culture available to everybody and entirely governed by what the people want. The most terrifying thing is what people do want."  Clive Barnes
"An economist is a man who states the obvious in terms of the incomprehensible."  Alfred A. Knopf
"It seemed the world was divided into good and bad people. The good ones slept better... while the bad ones seemed to enjoy the waking hours much more."  Woody Allen
"Many a man who falls in love with a dimple makes the mistake of marrying the whole girl."  Evan Esar (1899-1995)
"When truth is buried, it grows. It chokes. It gathers such an explosive force that on the day it bursts out, it blows up everything with it." Emile Zola
"The real question of life after death isn't whether or not it exists, but even if it does what problem this really solves." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Do not forget to laugh my friend. The world is not as serious as you make it out to be." - d.c.
"Sometimes good things fall apart so better things can fall together." - Marilyn Monroe
"The Christian resolution to find the world ugly and bad has made the world ugly and bad." - Friedrich Nietzeche
"There is one day that is ours. Thanksgiving Day is the one day that is purely American."  O. Henry
"A neurotic is a man who builds a castle in the air. A psychotic is the man who lives in it. A psychiatrist is the man who collects the rent." - Jerome Lawrence
"To die will be an awfully big adventure." Az Khan
"When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable." Az Khan
"Dumbledore watched her fly away, and as her silvery glow faded he turned back to Snape, and his eyes were full of tears. "After all this time?" "Always," said Snape." Az Khan
"If I had a flower for every time I thought of you...I could walk through my garden forever." Az Khan
"Once you experience the inner silence you never feel empty, because in the inner silence you can hear the stars speak, you can hear the voice of the water, you can hear the voice of the great Self." -Gurumayi Chidvilasananda, Resonate with Stillness
"Once you experience the inner silence you never feel empty, because in the inner silence you can hear the stars speak, you can hear the voice of the water, you can hear the voice of the great Self." - Gurumayi Chidvilasananda, Resonate with Stillness
"I was never insane except upon occasions when my heart was touched" Edgar Allan Poe
"The reason that I don"t believe in astrology is because I"m a Gemini." - Raymond M. Smullyan
"There are two ways to be fooled. One is to believe what isn't true; the other is to refuse to believe what is true." -Soren Kierkegaard
"There are two ways to be fooled. One is to believe what isn't true; the other is to refuse to believe what is true." - Soren Kierkegaard
"All that is good in me, began with you, Father." - Darim Ibn-La'Ahad
"The only thing worse than being alone is wishing you were alone." -- George Gamble
"Love is a debt of sentimental commitment that is not pay with interest,and can only be paid when we love in a long term" (William Ventura)
"Its sad....The world is sad....And very complicated. I wish it wasn't" -Dr. Sean Murphy, The Good Doctor (US)
"People settle for a level of despair they can tolerate and call it happiness." - Soren Kierkegaard
"I've always believed in numbers...
"I cannot believe in a God who wants to be praised all the time." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"If only it were so simple! If only there were evil people somewhere committing evil deeds, and we could separate them from the rest of us and destroy them. But the line dividing good &amp; evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart?"
"Once you best a man, never gloat. Be generous and find something in his actions to praise. He won't enjoy being bested but he'll make a good face about it. Show him you appreciate it. Praise can win you a friend. Gloating will only ever make enemies." - Halt - John Flanagan
"In politics, never retreat, never retract and never admit a mistake." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Honor to the brave, freedom to the slave." Josiah Henson
27 Quotes That Will Give You Chills.
"There can be a thing with many benefits and good for you yet you reject it, or something with no benefit and no good for you yet you embrace it. Still the choice is yours to make."
"The more people who believe something, the more apt it is to be wrong. The person who's right often has to stand alone." - Soren Kierkegaard
"You"ll soon find out some wizarding families are much better than others, Potter. You don"t want to go making friends with the wrong sort. I can help you there." He [Draco] held out his hand to shake Harry"s, but Harry didn"t take it. "I think I can tell who the wrong sort are for myself, thanks"
"Don't let yourself die without knowing the wonder of fucking with love." - Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"Consciousness ! The realization of Consciousness demands the awareness of one's self . The distinction of one's self from others interprets higher level of consciousness ... Or hubris !" -A fictional villan in my story
"Love is the delightful interval between meeting a beautiful girl and discovering that she looks like a haddock."  John Barrymore
"Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight."  Phyllis Diller
"One of the keys to happiness is a bad memory."  Rita Mae Brown
"I had a monumental idea this morning, but I didn't like it."  Samuel Goldwyn
"We shall escape the absurdity of growing a whole chicken in order to eat the breast or wing, by growing these parts separately under a suitable medium." - Winston Churchill 1931
"I know the perks of bullshit isn't meant for me." - Kendrick Lamar
"Convictions are more dangerous enemies of truth than lies" - Nietzsche
"If things start happening, don't worry, don't stew, just go right along and you'll start happening too." - Dr. Seuss
"Think left and think right and think low and think high. Oh, the thinks you can think up if only you try!" - Dr. Seuss
"Take away the paradox from a thinker and you have a professor." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Man is in love and love's what vanishes, what more is there to say?" - W.B. Yeats
"A thing is not necessarily true because a man dies for it." __Oscar Wilde
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you."
"Begin to be now what you will be hereafter."  William James
"This life"s hard, but it"s harder if you"re stupid." - George V. Higgins, The Friends of Eddie Coyle
"If you don't know where you're going, any road'll take you there" - George Harrison
"Things change. And friends leave. Life doesn't stop for anybody." - Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
"Some infinities are bigger than other infinities." - John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
"Sometimes the questions are complicated and the answers are simple." - Dr. Seuss
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"The most common form of despair is not being who you are." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Give me the liberty to know, to utter, and to argue freely according to conscience, above all liberties." - John Milton
"Do not overestimate the competition and underestimate yourself. You are better than you think." - Tim Ferriss
"If you think you understand, it isn't God." - Soren Kierkegaard
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use." -Sren Kierkegaard
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use." - Sren Kierkegaard
"Life can only be understood backwards; but it must be lived forwards." - Soren Kierkegaard
"I am no longer afraid of becoming lost, because the journey back always reveals something new, and that is ultimately good for the artist." - Billy Joel
"To my embarrassment I was born in bed with a lady." -- Wilson Mizner
"And I declared that the dead, who had already died, are happier than the living, who are still alive. But better than both is the one who has never been born, who has not seen the evil that is done under the sun." - Ecclesiastes 4:2-3
"God has given you one face, and you make yourself another." - W. Shakespeare
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"A stiff apology is a second insult... The injured party does not want to be compensated because he has been wronged; he wants to be healed because he has been hurt." -Gilbert K. Chesterton
"Step out of the history that is holding you back. Step into the new story you are willing to create." - Oprah Winfrey
"It's a lie to think you're not good enough. It's a lie to think you're not worth anything." - Nick Vujicic
"If I fail, I try again, and again, and again. If YOU fail, are you going to try again? The human spirit can handle much worse than we realize. It matters HOW you are going to FINISH. Are you going to finish strong?" - Nick Vujicic
" Blessed is the one whose heart is so broken but still has the courage to be gentle and kind to others. Cherish such people. Learn from them " Ismail Menk
"I've found that all weak people share a basic obsession - they fixate on the idea of satisfaction. Anywhere you go men and women are like crows drawn by shiny objects. For some folks, the shiny objects are other people, and you'd be better off developing a drug habit." - Nic Pizzolatto
"We learn by rearranging what we know." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
'It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society.' -Krishnamurti
"My aim is: to teach you to pass from a piece of disguised nonsense to something that is patent nonsense." -Ludwig Wittgenstein
"There are plenty of good reasons for fighting, but no good reason ever to hate without reservation, to imagine that God Almighty Himself hates with you, too." - Kurt Vonnegut
"A serious and good philosophical work could be written consisting entirely of jokes." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"My aim is: to teach you to pass from a piece of disguised nonsense to something that is patent nonsense." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"We age alongside the novels we've read, and only one of us actively deteriorating. Which is to say that a novel is perishable only by virtue of being stored in such a leaky cask: our heads." - Tom Bissel
"It"s one thing to find views repugnant. It"s another to claim thatto hear them constitutes a kind of injury that no reasonable person should be expected to stand up to. That"s theatrical because it"s not true." -John McWhorter, Professor of English at Columbia University
"Rebelliousness often backfires and is as susceptible to conformity as any other form of social behavior" - Michael Scott
"Lady, I'm just a nigga that loves titties." - Dave Chappelle
"If people did not sometimes do silly things, nothing intelligent would ever get done." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance; it is the illusion of knowledge." - Stephen Hawking
"When you are in pain, make noise, give your grief a voice. Do not grant it strength through silence, let it sing, let it roar." - Beau Taplin
"A positive attitude may not solve all your problems, but it will annoy enough people to make it worth the effort."  Herm Albright
"Perfection is achieved, not when there is nothing more to add, but when there is nothing left to take away."  Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Give me the luxuries of life and I will willingly do without the necessities."  Frank Lloyd Wright
"I"m a greater believer in luck, and I find the harder I work the more I have of it"  Thomas Jefferson
"As societies grow decadent, the language grows decadent, too. Words are used to disguise, not to illuminate, action: you liberate a city by destroying it. Words are to confuse, so that at election time people will solemnly vote against their own interests". - Gore Vidal
"Music doesn"t get old, we do. Paul McCartney will always be 27 when he sang Blackbird" Giles Martin (Sir George Martin"s son)
"A man will be imprisoned in a room with a door that's unlocked and opens inwards; as long as it does not occur to him to pull rather than push it." -Ludwig Wittgenstein
"A man will be imprisoned in a room with a door that's unlocked and opens inwards; as long as it does not occur to him to pull rather than push it." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"When we can't think for ourselves, we can always quote." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Solitude is not the absence of company, but the moment when our soul is free to speak to us and help us decide what to do with our life." - Paulo Coelho, Manuscript Found in Accra, from Paulo Coelho Blog
"Change is the end result of all true learning."  Leo Buscaglia
"When you allow something into your life, it should either make you happy, or make you money."
"To the world, you may be one person. But to one person, you may be the world." - Dr. Seuss
"Never half ass two things. Full ass one thing." - Ron Swanson
"You, too, may have met your hermit, or perhaps something else equally marvelous. Maybe it was a rock, a tree, a star, or a beautiful sunset. The hermit is the Buddha inside of you." - Thich Nhat Hanh, The Hermit and the Well
"In the end do what makes you happy, because when it comes right down to it, nobody gives a fuck." -Unknown
"Passed over one of those mountains, where a winged male stood beside a heavily pregnant female, gazing at those very stars. Fae." - Sarah J. Maas
"She could not read a book for fear of the feelings she might find in it." - Diane Setterfield
"Days to come will prove the surest witness." --Pindar
"What one has to do usually can be done." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Turn up the volume,close your eyes and let the music take over your soul" Unknown
"No matter how old you are, if a little kid hands you a toy phone, you answer it." Dave Chappelle
"There are, indeed, things that cannot be put into words. They make themselves manifest. They are what is mystical. What we cannot speak about we must consign to silence." - Ludwig Wittgenstein, Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus
"There are, indeed, things that cannot be put into words. They make themselves manifest. They are what is mystical What we cannot speak about we must consign to silence." - Ludwig Wittgenstein, Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus
"Always to distrust is an error, as well as always to trust." --Goethe
"I believed in Santa Claus until he asked for my autograph"  Shirley Temple
"There are, indeed, things that cannot be put into words. They make themselves manifest. They are what is mystical. What we cannot speak about we must consign to silence." - Lugwig Wittgenstein, Tractatus logico-philosophicus
"There are, indeed, things that cannot be put into words. They make themselves manifest. They are what is mystical What we cannot speak about we must consign to silence." - Lugwig Wittgenstein, Tractatus logico-philosophicus
"There are, indeed, things that cannot be put into words. They make themselves manifest. They are what is mystical What we cannot speak about we must consign to silence." - Lugwig Wittgenstain, Tractatus logico-philosophicus
"There are, indeed, things that cannot be put into words. They make themselves manifest. Thay are what is mystical What we cannot speak about we must consign to silence." - Lugwig Wittgenstain, Tractatus logico-philosophicus
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"Even an entire society, a nation, or all simultaneously existing societies taken together, are not owners of the earth. They are simply its possessors, its beneficiaries, and have to bequeath it in an improved state to succeeding generations."  Karl Marx
"Real Power is the degree to which a person has control over their own circumstances. Real Power is the degree to which we control the directions of our lives."
"People are strange: They are constantly angered by trivial things, but on a major matter like totally wasting their lives, they hardly seem to notice." - Charles Bukowski
"Trust the magic of beginnings." -Eckhart von Hochheim
"In 1976, Mao single-handedly and dramatically changed the direction of global poverty with one simple act: he died." -Stephen Radelet
"Virtue has never been as respectable as money." -- Mark Twain
"When one teaches, two learn." - Robert Heinlein
"Any state, any entity, any ideology which fails to recognize the worth, the dignity, the rights of man...that state is obsolete." - Rod Serling (1961)
"Spiritual joys come only from solitude, So the wise choose the bottom of the well, For the darkness down there beats The darkness up here. He who follows at the heels of the world Never saves his head." - Rumi, Solitude
"What labels me, negates me." - Soren Kierkegaard
"We can only go into the future." - Anonymous
"Science tells us how the heavens go and religion tells us how to go to heaven." - Galileo Galilei
"Those are my principles, and if you don't like them... well, I have others."  Groucho Marx
"All of us learn to write in the second grade. Most of us go on to greater things."  Bobby Knight
"A man with a watch knows what time it is. A man with two watches is never sure."  Segal's Law
"How can you govern a country which has 246 varieties of cheese?"  Charles De Gaulle
"He who rationalizes in love is the master of the other"-Mihail Drumes
"Laughter is the sun that drives winter from the human face."  Victor Hugo
"Whosoever is delighted in solitude is either a wild beast or a god." -Francis Bacon
"Whosoever is delighted in solitude is either a wild beast or a god." - Francis Bacon
"Friendship ... is born at the moment when one man says to another "What! You too? I thought that no one but myself . . ."
"You are growing into consciousness, and my wish for you is that you feel no need to constrict yourself to make other people comfortable." - Ta-Nehisi Coates
"This world is but a canvas to our imagination." - Henry David Thoreau
"You can't keep blaming yourself. Just blame yourself once and move on." -Homer Simpson
"Morality is temporary, wisdom is permanent." - Hunter S Thompson
"Solitude is as much an intrinsic desire in man as his gregariousness. Hermits, solitary thinkers, independent spirits, recluses, although often stigmatized in the modern world, are healthy expressions of man's dialogue with himself." - Clark E. Moustakas, Loneliness and Love
"Whoever loves God wishes to be alone. Like newlyweds who do not want to have their intimacy interrupted by outsiders, those who have felt the love of God retire into silence and solitude." - Ernesto Cardenal, Abide in Love
"We will never have a perfect world, but it's not romantic or nave to work toward a better one." -Steven Pinker
"God is the mirror of silence in which all creation is reflected." - Paramahansa Yogananda
"Give a man a mask and he will show his true face" - Oscar Wilde.
"Soon silence will have passed into legend. Man has turned his back on silence." - Jean Arp, Sacred Silence
"For every question there is a simple, intuitive, apparent, wrong answer." - my math teacher
"Certain experiences you can't survive, and afterward you don't fully exist, even if you failed to die." - Nic Pizzolatto
"If the desert is holy, it is because it is a forgotten place that allows us to remember the sacred. Perhaps that is why every pilgrimage to the desert is a pilgrimage to the self. There is no place to hide and so we are found." - Terry T. Williams, Refuge: An Unnatural History of Family and Place
"What has he found who has lost God? And what has he lost who has found God?" - Ibn 'Ata'illah al-Iskandari
"Dumbledore watched her fly away, and as her silvery glow faded he turned back to Snape, and his eyes were full of tears. "After all this time?" Az Khan
"If I had a flower for every time I thought of you...I could walk through my garden forever." Az Khan
"The real lover is the man who can thrill you by kissing your forehead or smiling into your eyes or just staring into space." Az Khan
"There is nothing I would not do for those who are really my friends. I have no notion of loving people by halves, it is not my nature." Az Khan
"These are the days it never rains, it pours" - Queen and David Bowie
"Cheerful hearts rarely carry sadness in their blood" (William Ventura)
"The sterile feeling of a person without love,doesn't have the condition of pregnant a heart" (William Ventura)
"We are far too screwed up for a goddamned love triangle." - Michelle Hodkin,
"A winner is a dreamer who never gives up."  Nelson Mandela
"Methinks that in looking at things spiritual, we are too much like oysters observing the sun through the water, and thinking that thick water the thinnest of air. Methinks my body is but the lees of my better being." Melville
"Think of what would happen to us in America if there were no humorists; life would be one long Congressional Record."  Tom Masson
"The only thing I was fit for was to be a writer, and this notion rested solely on my suspicion that I would never be fit for real work, and that writing didn't require any."  Russell Baker
"Anyone who works is a fool. I don't work - I merely inflict myself upon the public."  Robert Morley
"The reasonable man adapts himself to the world; the unreasonable one persists in trying to adapt the world to himself. Therefore all progress depends on the unreasonable man."  George Bernard Shaw
"Failure Will Never Overtake Me If My Determination To Succeed Is Strong Enough."  Og Mandino
"It always seems impossible until it"s done."- Nelson Mandela
"Television is a great leveler. You always end up sounding like the people who ask the questions." - Gore Vidal
"Get your head together - A brain for business, a tongue for sweet-talking, ears for understanding, a nose for instinct, eyes for intentions.....you'll run circles round this world and reap the rewards.....for just using your head." - OP
"Liberty means responsibility. That is why most men dread it." - George Bernard Shaw
"Start with what is right rather than what is acceptable."  Franz Kafka
"Embrace the process, instead of what may seem to be the results. Too many people,lack the vision to recognize opportunity when there"s not a paycheck attached to it."- Charlamagne Tha God
"Death is the wish of some, the relief of many, and the end of all." - Seneca
[T]he free, exploring mind of the individual human is the most valuable thing in the world. And this I would fight for: the freedom of the mind to take any direction it wishes, undirected." - John Steinbeck
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use." - Sren Kierkegaard
"He who wakes his slumbering wife shall prepare for the wrath of her fury" - Me
"Waste no more time arguing about what a good man should be. Be one." - Marcus Aurelius
"Sometimes, you just have to realise, that you can't always be the smartest shovel on the dinnertable, even though you try your best."
"Death never takes a wise man by surprise; he is always ready to go." -Jean de la Fontaine (1621-1695)
"Death never takes a wise man by surprise; he is always ready to go." - Jean de la Fontaine (1621-1695)
"All the wit in the world is lost upon him who has none." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use." - Soren Kierkegaard
"it's no surprise to me that anyone hardly tells the truth about how they feel. The smart ones keep to themselves for good reason. Why would you want to tell anyone anything that's dear to you?"
"It is not the eyes that are blind, but hearts."  [Quran, 22:46]
"Even sacred things are only things. People, the heart, matter more" - Rains Fall
"I've been a good man. I understand that... you can't be a bad man and expect good things to happen to you" - Arthur Morgan
"Every man must do two things alone; he must do his own believing and his own dying." - Martin Luther
"Vocatus atque non vocatus, Deus aderit" "Bidden or not bidden, God is present." - Carl Jung (attributed to Erasmus)
"Arguing never resolves a thing when one or more of the partaking individuals thinks they know they are right"
"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"A woman is a mine of love exploited sometimes in a incorrect way,and the gold that her heart produces is not value" (William Ventura)
"Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings." Az Khan
"We"re all a little weird. And life is a little weird. And when we find someone whose weirdness is compatible with ours, we join up with them and fall into mutually satisfying weirdnessand call it lovetrue love." Az Khan
"If you can make a woman laugh, you can make her do anything." Az khan
"Almost everyone on reddit is wrong, each in their own special way." -CaptainDisillusion
"Trust Life and It Will Teach You, in Joy and Sorrow, All That You Need To Know." - James A. Baldwin
"A satirist is a man who discovers unpleasant things about himself and then says them about other people."  Peter McArthur
"The movies are the only business where you can go out front and applaud yourself."  Will Rogers
"There are three social classes in America: upper middle class, middle class, and lower middle class."  Judith Martin
"There's so much pollution in the air now that if it weren't for our lungs there'd be no place to put it all."  Robert Orben
"Democracy is two wolves and sheep voting on what to have for dinner." - Benjamin Franklin
"Ladies and gentlemen, I don't know whether you fully understand that I have just been shot, but it takes more than that to kill a Bull Moose." Theodore Roosevelt, at the start of a speech in 1912.
"If you do not conquer self, you will be conquered by self."  Napoleon Hill
"At the center of your being you have the answer; you know who you are and you know what you want." - incorrectly attributed to Lao Tzu (actually from A Grateful Heart: Daily Blessings for the Evening Meal from Buddha to the Beatles, by M.J. Ryan 1994.)
"Disrespect me, call me something to slander me as evil, and I may dare to prove you're right" -- Ninjhetto
"If the silence takes you, then I hope it takes me too" Death Cab for Cutie
"I'm not an asshole for having a controversial opinion, you're an asshole for disrespecting me for having a controversial opinion." -- hopefully-common-sense
"Longing is the agony of the nearness of the distant." - Martin Heidegger
"I cry too much to have a concept of time" - Sydney Sparks
"There is more stupidity than hydrogen in the universe, and it has a longer shelf life." Frank Zappa
"The best revenge is to be unlike him who performed the injury." -Marcus Aurelius
"The best revenge is to be unlike him who performed the injury." - Marcus Aurelius
"Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false, and by rulers as useful." - Seneca
"I stopped believing there was a power of good and a power of evil that were outside us. And I came to believe that good and evil are names for what people do not for what they are" - Phillip Pullman (His dark materials book series)
"What the caterpillar calls the end of the world the master calls the butterfly." - Anonymous
"Living by your wits is always knowing where the wasps are." - Stephen King
"As dusk turns to night, stars pop out like acne."
"The man who says he can and the man who says he can"t are both usually right." - Confucius
"surely most of us have, at some point, wondered, "What will the end be like for me? Will it be painful? Exactly what is going to happen? And does something come after it or not?" These are extremely critical questions which we should ask, not in order to be morbid but so that we can prepare...
"The only wealth which you will keep forever is the wealth you have given away." - Marcus Aurelius
"When times are the most difficult, you"re closer to either a breakthrough or becoming a better version of yourself than any other time."
"Embrace the process, instead of what may seem to be the results. Too many people, especially millennials, lack the vision to recognize opportunity when there"s not a paycheck attached to it." - Charlamagne Tha God
"If the stakes are everything, you"ll tell yourself anything you need to hear to survive." - Dave Chapelle
"I, on my side, require of every writer...a simple and sincere account of his own life, and not merely what he has heard of other men's lives; some such account as he would send to his kindred from a distant land; for if he has lived sincerely, it must have been in a distant land to me." - Thoreau
"When we can't think for ourselves, we can always quote" Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Damn you! Let the rabbits wear glasses! Save our brothers! Can I get an amen?" -Reverend Maynard
"When we can't think for ourselves, we can always quote" Ludwig Wittgenstein
"People don't want war. Why would some poor slob on a farm want to risk his life in a war when the best that he can get out of it is to come back to his farm in one piece? The common people don't want war; neither in Russia, nor in America, nor for that matter in Germany." - Hermann Gring
"Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Security is when everything is settled, when nothing can happen to you; security is the denial of life." -- Germaine Greer
"One of the greatest trials in life is resisting the temptations of today for the sake of a better tomorrow."
"To think is easy. To act is hard. But the hardest thing in the world is to act in accordance with your thinking." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"The internal combustion engine, one of the greatest technological advancements in history, has an unfortunate downside, namely air pollution so thick that, very soon, sixty-four packs of crayons will include the color Sky Brown" - Cuthbert Soup
"By maintaining your independence, you become the master of others  playing people against one another, making them pursue you."
"Dream lofty dreams, and as you dream, so shall you become. Your vision is the promise of what you shall one day be; your ideal is the prophecy of what you shall at last unveil."  James Allen
"Our health is something we often take for granted. But, there are some things in life that should never be taken for granted. Take care of yourself." -Catherine Pulsifer
"They say You only live once, and the way I live, once is enough." - Frank Sinatra
"No man dies for what he knows to be true. Men die for what they want to be true, for what some terror in their hearts tells them is not true." - Oscar Wilde
"There are things you do for your kids that they will never remember. But if you don"t do them they will never forget." - Clint Morgan
"Don't believe in the man that doesn't bleed. He will lead you to the edge of a cliff but, you'll be the first to leap." - Farryl Purkiss (Kissing devils on the cheek)
"The object of life is not to be on the side of the majority, but to escape finding oneself in the ranks of the insane." - Marcus Aurelius
"Don't be afraid to fart while you urinate... There is no rain without thunder." -Matthew Wineman
"Happiness is like a butterfly, the more you chase it, the more it will evade you, but if you notice the other things around you, it will gently come and sit on your shoulder." - Henry David Thoreau
"I say that good painters imitated nature; but that bad ones vomited it."  Miguel de Cervantes
"I once said cynically of a politician, 'He'll doublecross that bridge when he comes to it.'"  Oscar Levant
"Imitation is the sincerest form of television."  Fred Allen
"The thing that impresses me the most about America is the way parents obey their children."  King Edward VIII
"If fate doesn' t make you laugh, you just don't get the joke." - Gregory David Roberts.
"Live life as though nobody is watching, and express yourself as though everyone is listening."- Nelson Mandela
"The World As I See It" Albert Einstein's Worldview in his own words
"Dwell on the beauty of life. Watch the stars, and see yourself running with them." - Marcus Aurelius
"Our lives are not our own. From womb to tomb, we are bound to others. Past and present. And by each crime and every kindness, we birth our future." - David Mitchell
"Don"t cause harm, nor respond harm with harm."  Prophet Muhammad, (Sallallahu Alaihi wa Sallam)
"The undertaking of a new action brings new strength."  Richard L. Evans
"In the real world you compete with the greatest. That's the mindset you've got to have!" - Simon Cowell
"You have power over your mind  not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength." - Marcus Aurelius
"Let the past die. Kill it if you have to. That's the only way to become what you were meant to be." - Kylo Ren
"Appear weak when you are strong, and strong when you are weak." - Sun Tzu
"People who cannot find time for recreation are sooner or later to find time for illness." - John Wanamaker
"Seeking what is true is not seeking what is desirable." Albert Camus
"'But a man is not made for defeat,' he said. 'A man can be destroyed but not defeated.'" - Ernest Hemingway, The Old Man and the Sea
"The total number of minds in the universe is one" - Erwin Schrdinger
"We seek retreats for ourselves, houses in the country, seashores, mountains. But ... we have in our power to retire into ourselves. For there is no retreat that is quieter and freer from trouble than our soul ... perfect tranquility, the right ordering of mind." -Marcus Aurelius, Meditations, 4.3
"We seek retreats for ourselves, houses in the country, seashores, mountains. But ... we have in our power to retire into ourselves. For there is no retreat that is quieter and freer from trouble than our soul ... perfect tranquility, the right ordering of mind." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations, 4.3
"Her heart was a secret garden and the walls were very high." William Goldman
"There are precious few at ease, with moral ambiguities, so we act as though they don't exist!" - The Wonderful Wizard of Oz, Wicked
"It is a fact we human beings generally seek out what we enjoy and try to avoid what we don't-that is, unless we have a strong motivation to do otherwise." -Suzanne Haneef
"I grieve and they blame me without knowing my reasons, like it was my choice to feel this deep sorrow."
"You cannot live when you are untouchable. Life is vulnerability." - douard Boubat
"I never make up my mind. I am just very curious, and I start exploring."  Werner Herzog
"You cannot live when you are untouchable. Life is vulnerability." - douard Boubat
"At the temple there is a poem called "Loss" carved into the stone. It has three words, but the poet has scratched them out. You cannot read loss, only feel it." - Arthur Golden
"Some trees flourish, others die. Some cattle grow strong, others are taken by wolves. Some men are born rich enough and dumb enough to enjoy their lives. Ain't nothing fair. You know that." - John Marston
"They broke the wrong parts of me. They broke my wings and forgot I had claws.
"You can only win the game when you understand that it is a game." -- Mark Lawrence, Prince of Thorns
"Do not act as if you were going to live ten thousand years. Death hangs over you. While you live, while it is in your power, be good." - Marcus Aurelius
"If you can change your mind, you can change your life." William James
"You"re not ready to commit to something, if you"re not ready to sacrifice for it." - Jordan B. Peterson
"3ls = Learn Life Love or Laugh Live Love." A Happy Rule by Sophat Chann
"Depending on how you manage the path of your life,will depend how you end your life thru the right path" (William Ventura)
"For beauty is nothing but the beginning of terror which we are barely able to endure, and it amazes us so, because it serenely disdains to destroy us. Every angel is terrible." - Rainer Maria Rilke, Duino Elegies
"Choose your next words wisely for they may be what she said" -Me
"When the bird of the heart begins to sing, too often will reason stop up her ears." - Hans Christian Andersen
"I don"t need an alarm clock. My ideas wake me." Ray Bradbury
"I am alone in the midst of these happy, reasonable voices. All these creatures spend their time explaining, realizing happily that they agree with each other. In Heaven's name, why is it so important to think the same things all together." - Sartre
"Talent hits a target no one else can hit. Genius hits a target no one else can see." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"No man is exempt from saying silly things; the mischief is to say them deliberately."  Michel de Montaigne
"University politics are vicious precisely because the stakes are so small."  Henry Kissinger
"Thank you for sending me a copy of your book. I'll waste no time reading it."  Moses Hadas
"If you look at what you have in life, you'll always have more."
"Knowledge comes, but wisdom lingers." - Alfred Lord Tennyson
"Talent is a pursued interest In other words Anything that you"re willing to practice you can do" - bob ross
"Theologians may quarrel, but the mystics of the world speak the same language." - Meister Eckhart
"Hindsight is always twenty-twenty."  Billy Wilder
"Jake:Why do you drink Uncle Charlie? Charlie: Because there is something inside me i need to kill."
"cause the beat plus the melody makes me speak L.O.V.E. eloquently,so evidently" Nujabes
"To play a wrong note is insignificant. To play without passion is inexcusable." -Ludwig van Beethoven
"Most successful... people don't look inside and then plan a life. They look outside and find a problem, which summons their life." - David Brooks
"Sometimes you don't even know what you want until you find out you can't have it." - Meghan O'Rourke,
"Set your life on fire. Seek those who fan your flames." - Rumi
"How can I begin to share my perspective; a perspective that's taken me a lifetime to achieve?" - Me
"The hardest part of talking is not getting others to listen, but understanding your own words." -anonymous
"Lord, ye gave me a rare woman, and God! I loved her well." - Diana Gabaldon
"The hottest places in hell are reserved for those who, in times of great moral crisis, maintain their neutrality." - Dante Alighieri
"Rather than asking children who do they want to be, we should ask them what problem do they want to solve." - A Fractal Reverberation of the Universe
"Stop acting so small. You are the universe in ecstatic motion." - Rumi
'The world can be seen as a diseased curiosity... and the universe (can be seen) as the host.' - Quoted by me
"No one ever told me that grief felt so like fear." - C.S. Lewis
"The world breaks every one, and afterward, many are strong at the broken places." -Ernest Hemingway
"Start a huge, foolish project, like Noahit makes absolutely no difference what people think of you." - Rumi
"A man is never too weak or too wounded to fight. If his cause is greater than his own life." - Oenomaus
" The future belongs to those who prepare for it today." -Malcolm X
"When ignorant men are overwhelmed by forces totally beyond their control and understanding...
"You don"t do evil to those who do evil to you, but deal with them with forgiveness and kindness."  Prophet Muhammad (Sallallahu Alaihi wa Sallam)
"You don't love someone because they're perfect, you love them in spite of the fact that they're not." Az Khan
"Love looks not with the eyes, but with the mind, And therefore is winged Cupid painted blind." Az Khan
"Why do you stay in prison when the door is so wide open?" - Rumi
"Love looks not with the eyes, but with the mind, And therefore is winged Cupid painted blind."
"What you seek is seeking you." - Rumi
"Clogged highways and blocked arteries. Oil sheen on the gulf, methane gas in the sink. Boys from Detroit killing boys from Baghdad. Culture of ignorance, culture of pride. Landfills full of Chinese labor. Driving down the jogging lane to pick up healthy options packed by skinny children."
"We are slaves to the people born richer than us"
"Posterity is as likely to be wrong as anyone else."  Heywood Broun
"At 18 our convictions are hills from which we look; At 45 they are caves in which we hide."  F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Last night somebody broke into my apartment and replaced everything with exact duplicates... When I pointed it out to my roommate, he said, 'Do I know you?'"  Steven Wright
"When the rich take money from the poor it's called business,when poor people resist it's called violence." -Mark Twain
"Money can buy happiness. But don't let it your only source of happiness." -Anonymous
[Searching for a quote]
"If ive told you once, ive told you a thousand times, TWO THUMBS!!" -Hunter S. Thompson (to Ralph Steadman)
"I'm an unconditional atheist. So much so that I fear that God will punish me." - Zdenk Svrk
"The best way to make your dreams come true is to wake up."  Paul Valery
"When the student is ready the teacher appears."
"Feed the hungry, and visit the sick person, and free the captive, if he/she be unjustly confirmed. Assist any person oppressed, whether Muslim or non-Muslim."- Prophet Muhammad, (Sallallahu Alaihi wa Sallam)
"One finds that love is not a state, a feeling, a disposition, but an exchange, uneven, fraught with history, with ghosts, with longings that are more or less legible to those who try to see one another with their own faulty vision." -Judith Butler
"One finds that love is not a state, a feeling, a disposition, but an exchange, uneven, fraught with history, with ghosts, with longings that are more or less legible to those who try to see one another with their own faulty vision." -Judith Butler
"As you go through life make this your goal, keep your eye upon the doughnut and not upon the hole." - Doughnut Cafe, Melbourne, Australia
"What I give form to in daylight is only one percent of what I've seen in darkness." - M.C. Escher
"Money doesn't change folks, it makes you more of what you already are." - Aaron Hernandez
"It is difficult to live among men because silence is so difficult." -Friedrich Nietzsche, Thus Spoke Zarathrustra; 25 and 42
"It is difficult to live among men because silence is so difficult." - Friedrich Nietzsche, Thus Spoke Zarathrustra; 25 and 42
"Nothing is so strong as gentleness and nothing is so gentle as real strength." Ralph Washington Sockman
"It"s dark because you are trying too hard...
"My life used to be like that game of freeze tag...whenever something happened, I'd freeze like a statue, too afraid of moving the wrong way, too afraid of making the wrong decision. The problem is, if you stand still too long, that's your decision." - Regina Brett
"The aim of life is self-development. To realize one's nature perfectly - that is what each of us is here for." - Oscar Wilde
"There are three kinds of lies: lies, damned lies, and statistics" - Mark Twain
#1 expert advice for problem solving: "If you wait long enough, the problem will either resolve itself or no longer be relevant." -- Haxthausen.
#1 expert advice for problem solving
"Run from what"s comfortable. Forget safety. Live where you fear to live. Destroy your reputation. Be notorious." - Rumi
"My heart to joy at the same tone, and all I loved, I loved alone"Edgar Allan Poe
"I learned to love Jesus more than my own parents."-Simon Alfredo Caraballo
"The trouble with having an open mind, of course, is that people will insist on coming along and trying to put things in it. -- Terry Pratchett
"Those who read the press of their own group and listen to the radio of their group are constantly reinforced in their allegiance. They learn more and more that their group is right, that its actions are justified; thus their beliefs are strengthened." -- Jacques Ellul
"After a year of therapy, my psychiatrist said to me, "Maybe life isn't for everyone." - Larry Brown
"It feels so good to be so right, especially when it calls for zero consequences, zero sacrifice, and zero effort for us to feel that way." - Ambrose Little
"You are free, and that is why you are lost." - Franz Kafka
"My first act of free will shall be to believe in free will." William James, 1870
"When you're faced with two choices, simply toss a coin. It works. Not because it settles the question for you, but because in that brief moment when the coin is in the air, you suddently know what you are hoping for." - Unknown
"Sometimes the most scenic roads in life are the detours you didn't mean to take." - Angela N. Blount
"I am nothing special, of this I am sure. I am a common man with common thoughts and I've led a common life. There are no monuments dedicated to me and my name will soon be forgotten, but I've loved another with all my heart and soul, and to me, this has always been enough.." Az Khan
"Love is that condition in which the happiness of another person is essential to your own." Az Khan
"There is never a time or place for true love. It happens accidentally, in a heartbeat, in a single flashing, throbbing moment." Az Khan
"I've been the luckiest man in the world because I"ve had friends, and to have the right friends is everything: people you can depend on, people who tell you the truth if you ask something."  Stan Lee
"Since wars begin in the minds of men, it is in the minds of men that the defenses of peace must be constructed." - The Preamble to the Constitution of UNESCO.
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society" - Jiddu Krishnamurti
"I should have liked to have deployed my men in red coats on the plain down there and ordered them to charge. But now my armies are too vast." - Winston Churchill on observing the British Army attacking German positions in 1945
"Whosoever holds this hammer, if he be worthy, shall possess the power of Thor." - Stan Lee
"Men, it has been well said, think in herds; it will be seen that they go mad in herds, while they only recover their senses slowly, and one by one."  Charles Mackay
"You can go a long way with a smile. You can go a lot farther with a smile and a gun."  Al Capone
"Early to rise and early to bed makes a male healthy and wealthy and dead."  James Thurber
"Was it a bad day? Or was it a bad five minutes that you milked all day?" - Unknown
"I used to be embarrassed because I was just a comic book writer while others were building bridges or going on to medical careers. Then I realized that entertainment is one of the most important things in people's lives. I feel that if you're able to entertain, you're doing a good thing" - Stan Lee
"The greatest thing you"ll ever learn is just to love and be loved in return" - Eden Ahbez
"We don't see things as they are, we see them as we are." Anas Nin
"Don't be ridiculous." - Balki Bartokomous
"If you"re not careful, the newspapers will have you hating the people who are oppressed, and loving the people doing the oppressing."  Malcolm X
[Paraphrased from memory since I cant find it anywhere] "There is an iron mountain and every 10,000 years a raven flies by to sharpen it's beak on the tip of it..." -Stephen King (more inside)
"It is better to be a human being dissatisfied than a pig satisfied; better to be Socrates dissatisfied than a fool satisfied. And if the fool, or the pig, are a different opinion, it is because they only know their own side of the question." John Stuart Mill
"Stop killing time, before time kills you".
" No matter what happens in life, keep a good heart. A heart of patience and trust. Don't let the darkness of this world harden your heart " -Ismail Menk
"Fairy tales are more than true: not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten." - Neil Gaiman
"If they can get you asking the wrong questions, they don't have to worry about the answers." --Thomas Pynchon
"Faith is the strength by which a shattered world shall emerge into the light."  Helen Keller
170 Love Quotes and Saying You Should Say To Your Love
"Poetry heals the wounds inflicted by reason." --Novalis
"All the mistakes of the women are the fault of the man"
"Please write stories that you think are great. Write to please yourself. That"s how I"ve always done it 
"Life is never completely without its challenges." - Stan Lee
"Stones make no splash on a frozen lake." - Steven Erikson
"The opposite of love is not hate, it's indifference. The opposite of art is not ugliness, it's indifference. The opposite of faith is not heresy, it's indifference. And the opposite of life is not death, it's indifference." - Elie Weisel
"Work with the devil himself if he has talent." - Stan Lee
"I want the thank them[The fans] for having spent all these years coming in to see my cameos... And of course watching the movies with it" - Stan Lee
"There is always some madness in love. But there is also always some reason in madness." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I've heard that hard work never killed anyone, but I say why take the chance?" - Ronald Reagan
"A man has to be alert all the time if he expects to keep on breathing. If not, some German son-of-a-bitch will sneak up behind him and beat him to death with a sock full of shit." -General George S. Patton
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the universe or we are not. Both are equally terryfing"-Arthur C.Clarke
"I got a wife and kids in Baltimore" - Jack
"Excelsior!" - the late Stan Lee
"C'mon Stan. People hate spiders. They are creepy. And everybody knows that teenagers are sidekicks, not superheroes. This Spider-Man idea just won't sell." -- Martin Goodman, Stan Lee's publisher
"An Arab has no superiority over a non-Arab and white man has no superiority over black man, nor a black man over white  except by piety and good actions."  Prophet Muhammad (Sallallahu Alaihi wa Sallam)
"I have kisses for the back of your neck." Anne Sexton, Briar Rose.
"When you are sorrowful look again in your heart and you shall see that in truth you are weeping for that which has been your delight." - Kahlil Gibran
"I"m a guy who knows nothing... I wouldn"t know a gamma ray if it walked in here and hit me. I don"t know what a cosmic ray is. But they sound good! And that"s the important thing." - Stan Lee
"the world was too big, too full of splintered dreams." - Sarah J. Maas
"Enough" is a feast. Buddhist proverb
"don't let past experiences ruin future possibilities"-me
"Your pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your understanding. It is the bitter potion by which the physician within you heals your sick self. Therefore, trust the physician and drink his remedy in silence and tranquility." - Khalil Gibran
"Our great democracies still tend to think that a stupid man is more likely to be honest than a clever man, and our politicians take advantage of this prejudice by pretending to be even more stupid than nature made them." - Bertrand Russell
"When a man opens a car door for his wife, it's either a new car or a new wife." - Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh
"If you want your children to be intelligent, read them fairy tales. If you want them to be more intelligent, read them more fairy tales." - Albert Einstein
"A wise man is known by the fewness of his words." - Sextus, Enchidirion, 134 or 145
"Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage." Az Khan
"Have you ever been in love? Horrible isn't it? It makes you so vulnerable. It opens your chest and it opens up your heart and it means that someone can get inside you and mess you up." Az Khan
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." Az Khan
"Every pain is a blessing... Doesn't mean that you become a masochist"
"A generation that cannot endure boredom will be a generation of little men of men in whom every vital impulse slowly withers, as though they were cut flowers in a vase." - Bertrand Russell
"There is no end to the illusions of patriotism. In the first century of our era, Plutarch mocked those who declared that the Athenian moon is better than the Corinthian moon; Milton, in the seventeenth, observed that God is in the habit of revealing Himself first to His Englishmen..." Borges, 1946
"If a person gave away your body to some passerby, you"d be furious. Yet, you hand over your mind to anyone who comes along, so they may abuse you, leaving it disturbed and troubled  have you no shame in that?" - Epictetus
"Most modern calendars mar the sweet simplicity of our lives by reminding us that each day that passes is the anniversary of some perfectly uninteresting event."  Oscar Wilde
"We are so vain that we even care for the opinion of those we don't care for."  Marie Ebner von Eschenbach
"I think that I shall never see / a billboard lovely as a tree. / Perhaps, unless the billboards fall, / I'll never see a tree at all."  Ogden Nash
"Life sucks" "Yeah, then you die..." - Beavis and Butthead
"We come into the world all naked and bare, and where we end up, nobody cares, but there"s a good fellow here and a good fellow there." - Ernest Kearney
"Monsters were unwanted things. All life was overpowered by a fear of monster." - Narrator, Battlefield Earth
[11-11-1918] "the news was made known that the Armistice with Germany had been signed, &amp; would take effect at 11 that morning. The news was received very quietly. There was no demonstration. Deep down in everyone's mind, there was no doubt a feeling of profound relief and of profound thank fulness."
"Take the fact that you were created to love. Your heart can find real joy only through love - through loving and being loved." - Thomas Goodwin,
"Education is the passport to the future, for tomorrow belongs to those who prepare for it today" - Malcolm X
"I wonder how many people I've looked at all my life and never seen." - John Steinbeck
"There are chords in the hearts of the most reckless which cannot be touched without emotion" Edgar Allan Poe
"It is better to rust out than wear out."  Edwin Markham
"Everything comes to him who hustles while he waits." Thomas Edison
"Live by your own words" - Me
"There is no reason why good cannot triumph as often as evil. The triumph of anything is a matter of organization. If there are such things as angels, I hope that they are organized along the lines of the Maffia." - Kurt Vonnegut
"When you want a group of women to be silent, ask the oldest lady to speak up." - Unknown
"When you want a group of women to be silent, ask the oldest lady to speak up." -Unknown
" When I lose the reasons to live, I shall die " - Alija-Izetbegovi, Notes-From-Prison-1983-1988, page 6.
"War Does Not Determine Who Is Right- Only Who Is Left". -Bertrand Russel
"This is your life. Do what you love, and do it often." - Holstee Manifesto
"I think one of the coolest things you can do is disappear for a while, because it gives you the chance to re-emerge. To sort of pounce out of the jungle." - Josh Homme
"History is filled with the sound of silken slippers going downstairs and wooden shoes coming up." -Voltaire
"Uber, the world"s largest taxi company, owns no vehicles. Facebook, the world"s most popular media owner, creates no content. And Airbnb, the world"s largest accommodation provider, owns no real estate. Something interesting is happening." - Tom Goodwin
"I throw a spear into the darkness. That is intuition. Then I must send an army into the darkness to find the spear. That is intellect." -Ingmar Bergman
"I throw a spear into the darkness. That is intuition. Then I must send an army into the darkness to find the spear. That is intellect." - Ingmar Bergman
"Life is lived in only one direction." - Hardy Fox (The Residents)
[Help Identifying Song Sample]: "How do you explain to the world that this is a generation as the generation before them, hated violence and hated war. And peace, and to live in peace with our neighbours were not empty phrases. This was our real desire, our real passion." -United Future Organisation
"The true man wants two things: danger and play. For that reason he wants woman, as the most dangerous plaything." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Do not seek to follow in the footsteps of the wise. Seek what they sought." - Matsuo Basho
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." -- Winston Churchill
"You may be going to hell, but it doesn't mean that you're welcome there."-Anton LaVey
''You can't ever be really free if you admire somebody too much'' - Snufkin (Tove Jansson)
"We shouldn't be afraid to embrace whimsy, that nagging idea that life could be magical; it could be special if we were only willing to take a few risks."  Donald Miller
"I delight in what I fear." - Shirley Jackson
"Solitude, though it may be silent as light, is like light the mightiest of agencies; for solitude is essential to man. All men come into this world alone; all leave it alone." - Thomas De Quincey
"A friend is a wonderful invention; but, then again so is a whole lie." - a quote by AI
"The instinct of a man is to pursue everything that flies from him, and to fly from all that pursues him." --Voltaire
"Rape me once shame on you, rape me twice shame on me." - Unknown
"If you want to accept life, you have to accept the whole bloody universe." - Book of Philosophy by James Christian
"Our relationship with God must be a marriage where divorce is not contemplated" (William Ventura)
"We can't fight nature, John. We can't fight change. I can't fight my own nature. That's the paradox, John. You see? My whole life, all I ever did was fight. When I'm gone, they'll just find another monster. They have to, because they have to justify their wages." - Dutch van der Linde
"Now and again it is necessary to seclude yourself among deep mountains and hidden valleys to restore your link to the source of life." - Morihei Ueshiba, founder of Aikido
"Since you make evil or good by your own thoughts, it is your ruling of your thoughts which proves to be your principal concern." William James
"It is not a lack of love, but a lack of friendship that makes unhappy marriages." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The opposite of love is not hate, it's indifference. The opposite of art is not ugliness, it's indifference. The opposite of faith is not heresy, it's indifference. And the opposite of life is not death, it's indifference."
"As he read, I fell in love the way you fall asleep: slowly, and then all at once." - John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
"Before you marry a person, you should first make them use a computer with slow Internet service to see who they really are."  Will Ferrell
"In the privacy of a poetry,only the poet knows how to make love with his thoughts" (William Ventura)
"No matter how old you are, you will always be your mother's baby!."
"Anybody who has doubts about the ingenuity or the resourcefulness of a plumber never got a bill from one."  George Meany
"Failure is not the only punishment for laziness; there is also the success of others."  Jules Renard
"Where humor is concerned there are no standards - no one can say what is good or bad, although you can be sure that everyone will."  John Kenneth Galbraith
"Another unsettling element in modern art is that common symptom of immaturity, the dread of doing what has been done before."  Edith Wharton
"Education imparted by heart can bring revolution in the society". - Abul Kalam Azad
"The most painful thing is losing yourself in the process of loving someone too much, and forgetting that you are special too." - Ernest Hemingway
"Slavery is worst even if it bears beautiful names." - Abdul Kalam Azad
"The thing is, unfortunately, I write the best songs when I'm miserable" - Scott Weiland
"We relish news of our heroes, forgetting that we are extraordinary to somebody too."  Helen Hayes
"Society is the cave. The way out is solitude." -Simone Weil, The Great Beast
"The most manifest sign of wisdom is a continual cheerfulness." - Michel de Montaigne
"We live, as we dream, -- alone." -Joseph Conrad, Heart of Darkness
"We live, as we dream, -- alone." - Joseph Conrad, Heart of Darkness
"There's a certain type of person who, having read this far, is anxiously wondering: Does something bad happen to the dog?" - Sigrid Nunez
"You spend your whole life stuck in the labyrinth, thinking about how you'll escape one day, and how awesome it will be, and imagining that future keeps you going, but you never do it. You just use the future to escape the present." - John Green
"What I mean by an educated taste is someone who has the same tastes that I have." -Edward Albee
"Hard times create strong men. Strong men create good times. Good times create weak men. And, weak men create hard times."- G. Michael Hopf
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow man; true nobility is being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"Its all shits and giggles until someone giggles and shits" - unknown
"The problem with resolutions is they're only as solid as the person making them." - Ellen Hopkins
"Feelings like regret and guilt serve no purpose. Open your eyes to the other things going on in your life with the view that mistakes are golden; a motherlode of information you want to tap in to. Don't regret them. Instead analyze and dissect them." - Rick Sanchez
"In the attitude of silence the soul finds the path in a clearer light, and what is elusive and deceptive resolves itself into crystal clearness." -Mohandas Gandhi
"In the attitude of silence the soul finds the path in a clearer light, and what is elusive and deceptive resolves itself into crystal clearness." - Mohandas Gandhi
...when the victors rewrite history, it's just another kind of war, waged after the battlefield killing is done to murder the memory of the defeated. Takeshi Kovacs, Altered Carbon
"DTA son, don't trust anybody!" - Stone Cold Steve Austin
"There are horrible people who, instead of solving a problem, tangle it up and make it harder to solve for anyone who wants to deal with it. Whoever does not know how to hit the nail on the head should be asked not to hit it at all." - Fredrick Nietzsche
" Blessed is he who is too busy looking at his own faults and correcting them, rather than wasting time searching for other people"s faults " -Dr. Bilal Philips
"Her eyes were pearls, which gave her great beauty, but meant she was blind. Her world was the colour of pearls: pale white and pink, and softly glowing." Neil Gaiman, Cinnamon.
"Pity the nation divided into fragments, each fragment deeming itself a nation." -- Kahlil Gibran) (from the poem "Pity the Nation")
"It would appear those in mankind which like dogs are more like dogs themselves, narcissism equated to the same who like cats or those who only like other people." - Unknown
"Don"t count the days make the days count."- Muhammad Ali
"Don"t count the days make the days count."- Muhammad Ali 1
"The most potent weapon of the oppressor is the mind of the oppressed." - Steve Biko
"I just want to be the one beautiful thing you hold onto, even at the end" *I am looking for the origin of this quote(video game)*
"Two rules to remember in life. Number one don't sweat the small things and number two, everything is considered small things." - My Father
"You will have bad times, but they will always wake you up to the stuff you weren't paying attention to." - Robin Williams
"Do not despair. To be friendless is indeed to be unfortunate, but the hearts of men, when unprejudiced by any obvious self-interest, are full of brotherly love and charity." -Mary Shelley, Frankenstein
"Never let the fear of succeeding stop you from being successful!!!" - Avid Roberts
"Never let the fear of succeeding stop you from being successfull!!!" - Avid Roberts
"Never let the fear of succeeding stop you from being successfull!!!"
"Do not fear men with the power to build walls, fear men with the power to destroy them" - Me
"Ordinary men hate solitude. But the Master makes use of it, embracing his aloneness, realizing he is one with the whole universe." - Tao Te Ching, 42 (Stephen Mitchell translation)
"You cannot blame your past for who you are. You are responsible for you. You make your own choices." -Trevor Noah
"You do not own the thing that you love." -Trevor Noah
"There situations in life that go through a motive and place us at the moment of deciding if we stay in that motive,or if motive ourselves to leave it to make our existence better" (William Ventura)
"Who is happy unjustly destroying the live of others,will be unhappy when his/her destruction arrives" (William Ventura)
"You will continue to suffer if you have an emotional reaction to everything that is said to you. True power is observing things with logic. True power is restraint. If words control you that means everyone else can control you. Breathe and allow things to pass."  Warren Buffett
"Be like the single blade of grass. For she too, has been trampled on, mowed down, and hit with such bitterly cold stretches that she had to shut down to survive. Yet still she stands upright with dignity, knowing that she endures, and still she dances with the wind." - Sandra Kring
"Like so many Americans, she was trying to construct a life that made sense from things she found in gift shops."  Kurt Vonnegut
"I am returning this otherwise good typing paper to you because someone has printed gibberish all over it and put your name at the top."  An English Professor
"You can observe a lot just by watching."  Yogi Berra
"Anyone who isn"t embarrassed of who they were last year probably isn"t learning enough" -Alain de Botton.
"God cannot alter the past, though historians can."  Samuel Butler
"Nothing, perhaps, has been quite so enduringly American as the conviction that the country is on the verge of decline and fall." - Tom Holland, The Spectator
"Only when you drink from the river of silence shall you indeed sing. And when you have reached the mountain top, then you shall begin to climb. And when the earth shall claim your limbs, then shall you truly dance." - Khalil Gibran
"He who has a why to live for can deal with almost any how." -Nietzsche
"If you want to lose your faith, make friends with a priest." - G.I. Gurdjieff
"Without music, life would be a mistake." - Friedrich Nietzsche
" anyone who studies the complexities of life and the universe cannot help but witness the signature of the Creator " - Dr. Laurence B. Brown, The Big Questions
"Our unhappiness arises from one thing only, that we cannot be comfortably alone in our room. ... That is why the pleasure of solitude is seen as so incomprehensible." - Blaise Pascal, Pensees, 9. Diversions
"Each betrayal begins with trust." - Phish
"Let me never fall into the vulgar mistake of dreaming that I am persecuted whenever I am contradicted." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
1 Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome. -Isaac Asimov
"Duty, honor, country: Those three hallowed words reverently dictate what you ought to be, what you can be, what you will be..." -- Gen. Douglas MacArthur
"Duty, honor, country: Those three hallowed words reverently dictate what you ought to be, what you can be, what you will be."Duty, honor, country: Those three hallowed words reverently dictate what you ought to be, what you can be, what you will be". -- General Douglas MacArthur
"When we know what God is, we shall be Gods ourselves." - Bernard Shaw
"A child that is not embraced by the village will burn it down to feel its warmth" - African proverb
"Stuff your eyes with wonder, live as if you"d drop dead in ten seconds. See the world. It"s more fantastic than any dream made or paid for in factories." - Ray Bradbury
"Memories don"t wither and die just because the relationship that grew them has ended. I choose to keep a beautiful garden dedicated to the absence of those who helped me to create it." - u/SuperCub
#BelieveInLove Would you wear a shirt with this?
"If one advances confidently in the direction of his dreams, and endeavors to live the life he has imagined, he will meet with a success unexpected in common hours."  Henry David Thoreau
"Do your little bit of good where you are; it's those little bits of good put together that overwhelm the world." - Desmond Tutu
"Oderint Dum Metuant" "let them hate (me) so long as they fear (me)"- Caligula
"When we attempt to exercise power or control over someone else, we cannot avoid giving that person the very same power or control over us." - Alan Watts
"To forget the dead would be akin to killing them a second time." - Elie Wiesel
" Troubles don't come alone, they like to arrive in groups " - Alija Izetbegovi, Inescapable Questions
"Happiness does not lead to gratitude. Gratitude leads to happiness."  Benedictine monk David Steindl-Rast
"Man suffers only because he takes seriously what the gods made for fun." - Alan Wilson Watts
"There's no one so wise as the man who says nothing at the right time." - Unknown
"The ability to observe without evaluating is the highest form of intelligence." - Jiddu Krishnamurti
"You're not to be so blind with patriotism that you can't face reality. Wrong is wrong, no matter who does it or says it." - Malcolm X
"Trying to define yourself is like trying to bite your own teeth." - Alan Watts
"Give me 6 hours to chop down a tree and I will spend the first four sharpening the axe." - Abraham Lincoln
"You can't force love, I realized. It's there or it isn't. If it's not there, you've got to be able to admit it. If it is there, you've got to do whatever it takes to protect the ones you love."
"When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable."
"There is no pretending," Jace said with absolute clarity. "I love you, and I will love you until I die, and if there is life after that, I'll love you then."
"if you take a seal and hit it very hard in the face everyday for six weeks you may turn it into a rather fetching hat" Captain Clyde Jackson
"History is the study of the world's crime" - Voltaire
"It's all fun and games til some kid dies. Then it's hilarious." Filthy Frank
"Sometimes the appropriate response to reality is to go insane."  Philip K. Dick
"My religion consists of a humble admiration of the illimitable superior spirit who reveals himself in the slight details we are able to perceive with our frail and feeble mind."  Albert Einstein
"In the fight between you and the world, back the world."  Frank Zappa
"Editor: a person employed by a newspaper, whose business it is to separate the wheat from the chaff, and to see that the chaff is printed."  Elbert Hubbard
"Go ahead, let them judge you." - Unknown
"The best way to not feel hopeless is to get up and do something." - Barack Obama
"Beat the kids to the punch; You've got heart; I'll have it for lunch."
"Tired is the person who makes their bed. Reckless are the ones who don't." - Fortune cookie from Panda Express that tore me apart on the inside.
"When you want to mention your companion"s faults, remember your own faults."  Ibn Abbas
"True originality consists not in a new manner but in a new vision."  Edith Wharton
"I think where I am not, therefore I am where I do not think. I am not whenever I am the plaything of my thought; I think of what I am where I do not think to think." - Jacques Lacan
"Without music, life would be a mistake." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Those who say they can and those who say they can"t, are both usually right" -Will Smith
"Fake realities will create fake humans. Or, fake humans will generate fake realities and sell them to other humans, turning them, eventually into forgeries of themselves." - Philip K. Dick, from his essay 'How to Build a Universe pt. 2', 1978
" During my time in prison, I never noticed a drop in my will to live, but I often realized that I was finding relief in the fact that I was old enough to know that death was not too far away. This thought brought me comfort. I treasured it like a big secret " -Alija Izetbegovi, Notes From Prison.
"Even the darkest space can be brightened by a single light, and even the most terrible despair can be illuminated by a single ray of hope." - Donald J. Trump
"In learning you will teach, and in teaching you will learn." -Phil Collins, Tarzan
" In comparison to earlier times, everything around us today seems upside-down and backwards. A great deal of what was previously considered right is now looked upon as outmoded, irrelevant or just plain dumb " -Suzanne Haneef
"If you can't stand solitude, maybe you bore others too." - Unknown
" To demand the price of blood in order to forgive people's sins demonstrates complete lack of mercy, and to punish a guiltless person is undoubtedly the height of injustice " -Simon Alfredo Caraballo, "My Great Love for Jesus " under "The Original Sin", page 59.
"Men judge generally more by the eye than by the hand, for everyone can see and few can feel. Every one sees what you appear to be, few really know what you are." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"I think scars are like battle wounds - beautiful, in a way. They show what you've been through and how strong you are for coming out of it" Demi Lovato See this article for other quotes from celebrities living with bipolar disorder or depression
"It is often not easy to differentiate incompetence from deception." -Unknown
"Silence is not an absence but a presence. Not an emptiness but repletion. A filling up." - Anne D. LeClaire
"All sorts of things in this world behave like mirrors." Jacques Lacan
"Time is an investment. Talk to your people. Ask how they're doing. A fifteen minute conversation -- fifteen minutes of your time -- could change the next fifteen years of their lives." - my first sergeant
"When one with honeyed words but evil mind Persuades the mob, great woes befall the state." - Euripides
" The media's the most powerful entity on earth. They have the power to make the innocent guilty and to make the guilty innocent, and that's power. Because they control the minds of the masses." - Malcolm X
"If you love something set it free, if it comes back it"s yours. If not, it was never meant to be." -Ein
" The media"s the most powerful entity on earth. They have the power to make the innocent guilty and to make the guilty innocent... " - Malcolm X
"Everything you"ve ever wanted is on the other side of fear."- George Addair
"Most of us are much more acquainted with losing than winning." -Charles Schulz
"You have never really lived until you have done something for someone who can never repay you" - John Bunyan
"If it takes 60, 70 or even 80 years, it is better to finally achieve the satisfaction of assembling your self correctly, than to have spent the entire time battling to prevent your default self from falling apart" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Regardless if it takes 60, 70 or even 80 years, it is better to achieved the satisfaction of assembling your self correctly, than to have spent that entire time battling to prevent your default self from falling apart" - Rudolf P Belmar
"It is good to have an end to journey toward; but it is the journey that matters, in the end." - Ursula K. Le Guin
"Fear is just a word" - Tell me what you think! Would you wear a shirt that says this?
"No one is bound to love without feeling it,or to feel he/she has loved because have been force" (William Ventura)
"If you want to find God, hang out in the space between your thoughts." -Alan Cohen
"Can you remember who you were, before the world told you who you should be?" - Charles Bukowski
"The Superior Man is aware of righteousness, the inferior man is aware of advantage." - Confucius
"Our country is in danger, but not to be despaired of... On you depend the fortunes of America. You are to decide the important question, on which rest the happiness and liberty of millions yet unborn. Act worthy of yourselves." - Joseph Warren 1775
"You can discover what your enemy fears most by observing the means he uses to frighten you."  Eric Hoffer
"Sometimes I worry about being a success in a mediocre world."  Lily Tomlin
"I am a Marxist--of the Groucho tendency."  Anonymous
"The opposite of anger isn't calmness, it's empathy." - Mehmet Oz
"The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure while the intelligent are full of doubt." - Bertrand Russell
" you don't give up on someone you love"
"Mere opinions, in fact, were as likely to govern people's actions as hard evidence, and were subject to sudden reversals as hard evidence could never be." - Kurt Vonnegut
"You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching, Love like you'll never be hurt, Sing like there's nobody listening, And live like it's heaven on earth."
"We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them." -Einstein
"One of the tests of leadership is the ability to recognize a problem before it becomes an emergency." - Aristotle Onassis
"One of the tests of leadership is the ability to recognize a problem before it becomes an emergency." - Aristotle Onassis
"Beware of the man whose God is in the skies." -Bernard Shaw
"Why buy one when you can buy two for twice the price." - S.R. Hadden
"We are like the spider. We weave our life and then move along in it. We are like the dreamer who dreams, and then lives in the dream. This is true for the entire universe." - The Upanishads
"The fundamental difference between right and left is that the right blindly believes in everything that was taught to her, and the left blindly believes in everything that is teaching" - Millr Fernandes, brazilian writer
"It's a Pepe it's become kind of a symbol.. *gets punched*" - Richard Spencer interview when he's asked about his frog lapel pin
"The problem with our liberal friends is not that they are ignorant, but that they know so much that isn"t so." - Ronald Reagan
"A black cat crossing your path signifies that the animal is going somewhere." - Groucho Marx
"The emotion that can break your heart is sometimes the very one that heals it..." - Nicholas Sparks, At First Sight
"A man who views the world the same at fifty as he did when he was twenty, has wasted thirty years of his life." -Muhammed Ali
"I may not be totally perfect, but parts of me are excellent." - Ashleigh Brilliant
"Silence isn't empty. It's full of answers." -Unknown
"There is no "impossible" . Everything you use now was once impossible, then someone stepped up and made it possible."
"A professional writer is an amateur who didn"t quit."  Richard Bach
"Anyone can love a thing because. That's as easy as putting a penny in your pocket. But to love something despite. To know the flaws and love them too. That is rare and pure and perfect." - Patrick Rothfuss
"difficulties mastered are opportunities won." -Winston Churchill
"We must be willing to get rid of the life we've planned, so as to have the life that is waiting for us."- Joseph Campbell
"If voting made any difference they wouldn't let us do it." - Mark Twain
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"But goodness alone is never enough. A hard, cold wisdom is required for goodness to accomplish good. Goodness without wisdom always accomplishes evil." Robert A. Heinlein, Stranger in a Strange Land.
"YMCA, oh wait this is a gay song" - IRL quote by /u/emmanuelbassil
"I feel grounded in a reality that isn't my own."
"I will cut off this right arm of mine before I will ever work"Susan B. Anthony
"Aren't you afraid of dying? Not really. I've watched lots of good-for-nothing, worthless people die, and if people like that can do it, then I should be able to handle it."
"America is not the world" - Morrissey
"You know that children are growing up when they start asking questions that have answers."  John J. Plomp
"The older I grow, the less important the comma becomes. Let the reader catch his own breath."  Elizabeth Clarkson Zwart
"Every nation ridicules other nations, and all are right."  Arthur Schopenhauer
"Anybody can win unless there happens to be a second entry."  George Ade
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself."  Rumi
"Intelligence plus character that is the goal of education"
"What is most important for democracy is not that great fortunes should not exist, but that great fortunes should not remain in the same hands. In that way there are rich men, but they do not form a class." - Alexis de Tocqueville
"Love is physics and chemistry" -- Severo Ochoa
"Whenever two people meet, there are really six people present. There is each man as he sees himself, each man as the other person sees him, and each man as he really is." - William James
"Voters don't decide issues, they decide who will decide issues."  George Will
"You're in a room and nobody wants you and nothing is happening. You're afraid of getting put out on the streets, because you can already hear the taunts. Oh, there's a former star, look at him now, folks. He was strange to begin with. But he finally got what he deserved." - Tiny Tim, 1995
"When you judge another, you do not define them, you define yourself." - Wayne Dyer
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days before you've actually left them." - Andy Bernard
"I am not afraid of death, I just don't want to be there when it happens." -Woody Allen
"I think that the most important thing a woman can have - next to talent, of course - is her hairdresser" - Joan Crawford
"An arrogant person considers himself perfect. This is the chief harm of arrogance. It interferes with a person"s main task in life  becoming a better person." - Leo Tolstoy
"There is no order in the world around us, we must adapt ourselves to the requirements of chaos instead." Breakfast of Champions by Kurt Vonnegut
"A diamond is a chunk of coal that did well under pressure." - Henry Kissinger
"Everybody is a little narcissistic. That"s how you make it in the world" -me. I might"ve heard it somewhere and can"t remember, but for now I said it
"The good die young because only the young die good." -Unknown
"Let China Sleep, for when she wakes, she will shake the world," (Napoleon Bonaparte).
"I just kept on showing up at work every day, and they just kept on promoting me until I became CEO." -- I don't know who, do you?
"I use bits and pieces of others personalities to form my own." - Kurt Cobain
"In reality, there is no such thing as not voting: you either vote by voting, or you vote by staying home and tacitly doubling the value of some Diehard's vote." -David Foster Wallace
"How can mirrors be real if our eyes aren't real" - Jaden Smith
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself."  Rumi
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself."  Rumi
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself."  Rumi https://bit.ly/2OvLVro
"It's not the people who vote that count. It's the people who count the votes." -Joseph Stalin
"Sometimes the Bible in the hand of one man is worse than a whisky bottle in the hand of (another)... There are just some kind of men who - who're so busy worrying about the next world they've never learned to live in this one, and you can look down the street and see the results." - Harper Lee,
"You cannot force art" IRL quote by u/emmanuelbassil
"The world as we have created it is a process of our thinking. It cannot be changed without changing our thinking." - Albert Einstein
"Sometimes Life is going to hit you in the head with a brick. Don"t lose faith."- Steve Job
"I am ready to meet my maker, but whether my maker is prepared for the great ordeal of meeting me is another matter." -Winston Churchill
"If a news headline tell's you how to feel, it's not news, it's propaganda." Anon.
"These violent delights have violent ends And in their triump die, like fire and powder Which, as they kiss, consume" - William Shakespeare
"All men dream: but not equally. Those who dream by night in the dusty recesses of their minds wake in the day to find that it was vanity: but the dreamers of the day are dangerous men, for they may act their dreams with open eyes, to make it possible" -T.E. Lawrence
"All the hardest, coldest people you meet were once as soft as water. And that"s the tragedy of living." - Iain Thomas
"There is no such thing as not voting: you either vote by voting, or you vote by staying home and tacitly doubling the value of some Diehard's vote." - David Foster Wallace
"One of the penalties for refusing to participate in politics is that you end up being governed by your inferiors." -- Plato
"All difficulties faced by the human mind are difficulties because of the limitations of the human mind." - Ravi Silari
"When a man is prey to his emotions, he is not his own master." - Benedict de Spinoza
"How far that little candle throws his beams! So shines a good deed in a weary world." - William Shakespeare
"We are not to simply bandage the wounds of victims beneath the wheels of injustice, we are to drive a spoke into the wheel itself." - Dietrich Bonhoeffer
"Most people get ahead during the time that others waste." Henry Ford
"Shoutout to those who are getting shit done instead of reading this" - no idea who said this
"There is nothing more demoralizing than a small but adequate income."  Edmund Wilson
"A thought is often original, though you have uttered it a hundred times."  Oliver Wendell Holmes
"Honesty pays, but it doesn't seem to pay enough to suit some people."  Kin Hubbard
"Where facts are few, experts are many."  Donald R. Gannon
"If your enemy has a conscience then follow Ghandi and nonviolence. If your enemy has no conscience like Hitler, then follow Bonhoeffer." -Martin Luther King Jr.
"To collaborative team members, completing one another is more important than competing with one another." -John C. Maxwell
"The lower my eye bags are determine how many fucks I am willing to distribute today.......so take a good long look and tell me if I look like I want to babysit your fucking kids tonight, Samantha" - Unknown.
"After hardships comes ease."
"Comparison is the thief of joy" -Theodore Roosevelt
"Freedom is nothing but a chance to be better."  Albert Camus
"The tyrant will always find a pretext for his tyranny, and it is useless for the innocent to try by reasoning to get justice, when the oppressor intends to be unjust."  Aesop
"Not only is the Universe stranger than we think, it is stranger than we can think." - Werner Heisenberg
"It is good to love many things, for therein lies the true strength, and whosoever loves much performs much, and can accomplish much, and what is done in love is well done." - Vincent Van Gogh
"The greatest prayer is patience." -The Buddha
"You have not yet found your purpose. But it has found you" - Emissary of the Nine
"Hello, you c*nt!" - Harvey Price
"Nachos are a fancy way to eat sour cream."
"Stuck in a generation where loyalty is just a tattoo, love is just a quote and lying is the new truth" - Genereux Philip
"It would be a pity if these Chinese supplant all other races. For the likes of us the mere thought is unspeakably dreary." -Albert Einstein
"I"m too drunk to taste this chicken" - The Late Great Colonel Sanders
"You can fool too many of the people too much of the time." -- James Thurber
"Success is the sole earthly judge of right and wrong" - IDK
"So I lived alone. The first thing I did was take off my pants. Naturally." - Edward Abbey
"Sometimes your friends don't want to hear how sunny it is outside. They just want you to sit beside them and complain about the rain." - Unknown Author
"Death smiles at us all, but all a man can do is smile back." -Marcus Aurelius
"Some people are so poor, all they have is money".
"Imagination is the highest kite one can fly." - Lauren bacall
"When you wake up in the morning, tell yourself: the people I deal with today will be meddling, ungrateful, arrogant, dishonest, jealous and surly. They are like this because they can't tell good from evil. But I have seen the beauty of good, and the ugliness of evil...- Marcus Aurelius
"Sometimes, contrary to Marx, history repeats itself, first as tragedy, then not as farce but as tragedy again." -- George Will (2018)
"There is no such thing as not voting: you either vote by voting, or you vote by staying home and tacitly doubling the value of some diehard"s vote." - David Foster Wallace
"I've always believed that a lot of the trouble in the world would disappear if we were talking to each other instead of about each other."-- Ronald Reagan
"I was mortified by the prospect of becoming hopelessly trapped in someone else's story." - Lionel Shriver,
"Laws are made for men of ordinary understanding and should, therefore, be construed by the ordinary rules of common sense. Their meaning is not to be sought for in metaphysical subtleties which may make anything mean everything or nothing at pleasure."Thomas Jefferson (1823)
"Pleasure is never as pleasant as we expected it to be and pain is always more painful. The pain in the world always outweighs the pleasure. If you don't believe it, compare the respective feelings of two animals, one of which is eating the other." - Schopenhauer
"A great fire burns within me, but no one stops to warm themselves at it, and passers-by only see a wisp of smoke" - Vincent Van Gogh
"Don"t use sharpness of your speech on the mother who taught you how to speak."  Hazrat Ali(RA)
"A true captain must give orders very quickly"
"We need leaders not in love with money but in love with justice. Not in love with publicity but in love with humanity." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Though my problems are meaningless, that don"t make them go away" - Neil Young
"A cynic is a man who knows the price of everything, but the value of nothing" - Oscar Wilde
"There is trash in the world and we must be there to call it out"
"He who lives in harmony with himself lives in harmony with the universe." -Marcus Aurelius
"Some words are deeds." Elie Wiesel.
"The bitterness of poor quality remains long after the sweetness of low price is forgotten"  Benjamin Franklin
"You are not entitled to your opinion. You are entitled to your informed opinion. No one is entitled to be ignorant." - Harlan Ellison
"Delivery has nothing to do with the delivery business"-80s guy futurama
"You always admire what you don't understand".
"Your words speak greatness, but your action says average." - a personal Friend.
"If you want to know what a man"s like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals" - Sirius Black
"America is a country that doesn't know where it is going but is determined to set a speed record getting there."  Laurence J. Peter
"The chief obstacle to the progress of the human race is the human race."  Don Marquis
"The longer I live the more I see that I am never wrong about anything, and that all the pains I have so humbly taken to verify my notions have only wasted my time."  George Bernard Shaw
"Any fool can make a rule, and any fool will mind it."  Henry David Thoreau
"We must make the best of those things that are in our power, and take the rest as nature gives it."  Epictetus
"Who decided that my art is worth 99 cents? I didn"t decide that. I don"t think any artist did. And who decided that it was a good idea to give music away for free? Which fucking genius came up with that idea? Even prostitutes get paid!"-Ian Astbury, The Cult
"The eye through which I see God is the same eye through which God sees me; my eye and God's eye are one eye, one seeing, one knowing, one love." -Meister Eckhart
"Only the hand that erases can write the true thing." -Meister Eckhart
"Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life." - Steve Jobs
"Do every act of your life as though it were the very last act of your life." - Marcus Aurelius
"You always admire what you really don't understand."  Blaise Pascal
"If you're gonna be two-faced at least make one of them pretty." - Marilyn Monroe
"It would be a pity if these Chinese supplant all other races. For the likes of us the mere thought is unspeakably dreary." -Albert Einstein
"In heaven, all the interesting people are missing." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Even if you fall on your face, you're still moving forward." - Victor Kiam
"Silence is a source of great strength." -Lao Tzu
"The hardest thing to keep in this world is to keep still." -Unknown
"You see that there are two different realms, there's a realm of values, and a realm of facts. In the realm of facts science reigns supreme, but in the realm of values you have to look elsewhere." Jordan Peterson
"The man who just drove into the parking space I was waiting for &amp; told me to F off, has arrived for his interview - WITH ME!" - Sean Sparling
"Only when the last tree died and the last river has been poisoned and the last fish been couth will we realize we can not eat money - Native American -
"Don"t develop friendship with the enemy of your friend; otherwise your friend will turn into an enemy."  Hazrat Ali (RA)
"Your job is not to figure how it's going to happen for you, but to open the door in your head, and when the door opens in real lifejust walk through it." - Jim Carrey
"That which does not kill us makes us stronger." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"He who has a why to live can bear almost any how." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"The most beautiful thing we can experience is the mysterious. It is the source of all true art and science." -Albert Einstein
"If you want to see the future imagine a boot stomping on a face, forever" - O'Brien, 1984
"For beautiful eyes, look for the good in others; for beautiful lips, speak only words of kindness; and for poise, walk with the knowledge that you are never alone." - Meryl Streep
"Only the madman is absolutely sure."  Robert Anton Wilson
"The philosopher has never killed any priests, whereas the priest has killed a great many philosophers." -Denis Diderot
"Sometimes I dream how it will be to kiss your lips,how it will be to touch your skin with my caresses,how it will be to wake up from a wet dream and the feeling of the fatigue that comes out of you,leaving your moisture spilled on me" (William Ventura)
"Forge meaning, build identity, and still be mad as hell. It doesn't make the wrong right, it makes it precious." -Andrew Solomon
"Empty your cup so that it may be filled; become devoid to gain totality." - Bruce Lee
"Don't worry about getting older; when you stop getting older, you're dead." -Unknown
"I'll trade you my Lebron Crosby EX Mega card for that magic the gathering trap card"
"How we live is so different from how we ought to live that he who studies what ought to be done rather than what is done will learn the way to his downfall rather than to his preservation." - Niccolo Machiavelli, The Prince
"The most beautiful thing in life is to be able to live without the need of feeling dead" (William Ventura)
"How we live is so different from how we ought to live that he who studies what ought to be done rather than what is done will learn the way to his downfall rather than to his preservation." - Niccolo Machiavelli, The Prince
"The Best Way to Predict The Future, is to Create it." Abraham Lincoln
"Some of the worst mistakes of my life have been haircuts."  Jim Morrison
"As I grow older , I regret to say that a detestable habit of thinking seems to be getting a hold of me."  H. Rider Haggard
"About the time we think we can make ends meet, somebody moves the ends."  Herbert Hoover
"Always be wary of any helpful item that weighs less than its operating manual."  Terry Pratchett
"And everyone wants to read the poem we're afraid to write." - Kelli Russel Agodon, from "Daringly Balanced: View vs. Risk: Two Portraits," Hourglass Museum
"The medieval ideal brought together two things which have no natural tendency to gravitate towards one another. It brought them together for that very reason. It taught humility and forbearance to the great warrior because everyone knew by experience how much he usually needed that lesson." [cont.]
"The difference between a hero and an anti-hero is where you stop the story" - Frank Herbert
"I am a democrat because I believe in the Fall of Man. Most are democrats for the opposite reason. A great deal of enthusiasm descends from the ideas of people like Rousseau, who believed in democracy because they thought mankind so wise and good that every one deserved a share in the government..."
"Everybody tries to follow the rule of law but monkey see monkey do."
"The only courage that matters is the kind that gets you from one moment to the next."  Mignon McLaughlin
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
[QUOTE]
"The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure and the intelligent are full of doubt." -Bertrand Russell
"My vagina smells like a small barnyard animal" - Carlos Mencia
"Are there more trees than ground"-my 10 year old little sister overtired while playing red dead redemption 2
"Everything Has its Beauty, but not Everyone sees it." Andy Warhol
"It wouldn"t be the first time I had to do this but I really hoped the last time would be the last time." - My cousin
"The problem with gawds is they love to meddle; claim credit or glory, but have little to say of value when blame is in vogue." - Maestro Brenf Broign
"I cannot believe in a God who wants to be praised all the time." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Just as love is the divine condition, so solitude is the human condition" - Paulo Coelho
"The real lover is the man who can thrill you by kissing your forehead or smiling into your eyes or just staring into space." - Marilyn Monroe
"There's no impartiality. Everyone is oriented by an ideological base. The question is: is your ideological base inclusive or exclusionary?" - Paulo Freire
" Sometimes you will never know the value of a moment until it becomes a memory. " - Dr Seuss.
"Many people would rather die than think; in fact, most do." -Bertrand Russell
"Every child deserves a champion; an adult who will never give up on them, who understands the power of connection and insists that they become the best they can possibly be." -Rita Pierson
"Do you guys not have phones?"
"Beauty is eternity gazing at itself in a mirror. But you are eternity and you are the mirror." - Kahlil Gibran
"Your word is your wand. The words you speak create your own destiny."  Florence Scovel Shinn
"You always had the power my dear, you just had to learn it for yourself." -The Wizard of Oz
"It is our choices, Harry, that show what we truly are, far more than our abilities." - Albus Dumbledore
"It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live." -Marcus Aurelius
"It is okay to take time to process the weight of changing things, and it is okay to not be sure of what the coming months will bring, but may you know that even here, you are much more than those things and there is still room to come alive and thrive within the waiting." - Morgan Harper Nichols
"Decisions are made by those who show up." - Aaron Sorkin
"Decisions are made by those who show up" - Aaron Sorkin
"Happiness is an attitude. We either make ourselves miserable, or happy and strong. The amount of work is the same."-- Carlos Castaneda
"Until you make peace with who you are, you'll never be content with what you have." Doris Mortman
"Every person is architect of his life;build his dreams in his own way,and destroys himself if he wishes" (William Ventura)
"If a man stands with his left foot on a hot stove and his right foot in a refrigerator, the statistician would say that, on the average, he"s comfortable." - Walter Heller
"What you don't see with your eyes, don't invent with your mouth" - Jewish Proverb
"You don't want to hear the story of my life, and anyway I don't want to tell it, I want to listen to enormous waterfalls of the sun. And anyway it's the same old story-a few people just trying, one way or another, to survive. Mostly, I want to be kind." - Mary Oliver
"It is only the great men who are truly obscene. If they had not dared to be obscene, they could never have dared to be great."  Havelock Ellis
"People need to be reminded more often than they need to be instructed."  Samuel Johnson
"Sometimes I get the feeling the whole world is against me, but deep down I know that's not true. Some smaller countries are neutral."  Robert Orben
"We don't know a millionth of one percent about anything."  Thomas A. Edison
"When you are a good person then you don't lose people, people lose you." - Unknown
"If you'll believe in me, I'll believe in you ."
"A life spent making mistakes is not only more honorable, but more useful than a life spent doing nothing."  George Bernard Shaw
"You have to keep breaking your heart until it opens." -Rumi
"When the legend becomes fact, print the legend." - Maxwell Scott
"God's first language is Silence. Everything else is a translation." -Thomas Keating
"What is done out of love always occurs beyond good and evil." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Not all who wander are lost." -J. R. R. Tolkien, Lord of the Rings: 1. Fellowship of the Ring
"To live is to suffer, to survive is to find some meaning in the suffering." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be." -Lao Tzu
"You have to keep breaking your heart until it opens." -Rumi
"Technology is just nature we taught to do cool tricks." - exurb1a
"The most convincing argument in the world is intelligent silence." -Unknown
"Sorcery is the systematic cultivation of enhanced consciousness and its effective deployment in the world of deeds and ideas." - Merlin after smoking a fat blunt...
"A minor form of despair, disguised as a virtue." - Ambrose Bierce
"Progress is impossible without change, and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything." - George Bernard Shaw
"If you want to know what a man"s like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals" -Sirius Black-Goblet of fire-
"From time to time, it's good to remember there's a multibillion dollar industry based on keeping you in a perpetual state of stupidity, rage, resentment, and paranoia." David Burge
Roses are red, violets are blue, I'm schizophrenic, and so am I." - Oscar Levant
"Overusing the word 'fascism' does not create a hostile reaction against it, in contrary, it makes it fascinating for many bastards in search of a simple asnwer. Whoever appropriates this word only risks amplifying neofascism, instead of fighting against it" - Emilio Gentile
"I found out what's wrong with me guys, I'm simply... Chinese!" - CallMeKevin
"Do what is right, not what is easy nor what is popular." - Roy T. Bennett
"When you are a good person then you don't lose people, people lose you."
"If you"re falling off a cliff, you may as well try to fly. You have nothing to lose." - Captain John Sheridan
"The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom." - Isaac Asimov
"Being surrounded by the wrong people is the loneliest thing in the world." Kim Culbertson
"Interesting how those most enamored with free speech are often precisely those who give us cause to doubt it." - Curt Vonnegurt
"He who fights with monsters might take care lest he thereby become a monster. And if you gaze for long into an abyss, the abyss gazes also into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
450 Attitude Quotes and Attitude Saying Make you Unstoppable
"Faced with the choice between changing one"s mind and proving that there is no need to do so, almost everybody gets busy on the proof." - JK Galbraith
"Practice is the hardest part of learning, and training is the essence of transformation."  Ann Voskamp
"STAY OFF THE WEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEED" -Stephen A Smith
"No Girl Will Choose Six Pack Over Six Cars.. So Stop Going to The Gym and go to Work." Robert Mugabe
"Those who deny Auschwitz would be ready to remake it." Primo Levi.
"Screw it, let"s do it." Richard Branson
"Everything is funny as long as it is happening to somebody else." Will Rogers
"Instead of engaging with such arguments when discussing the issue of hastened death, anti-choice advocates spend their time scare-mongering." - Philip Nitschke
"Optimism is a way of thinking and Positive vibes: a way of living." - Piyush Choudhary.
"The belief in a supernatural source of evil is not necessary; men alone are quite capable of every wickedness."  Joseph Conrad
"The greatest challenge to any thinker is stating the problem in a way that will allow a solution."  Bertrand Russell
"That's the secret to life... replace one worry with another...."  Charles M. Schulz
"For four-fifths of our history, our planet was populated by pond scum."  J. W. Schopf
"Fall down seven times, stand up eight." Japanese Proverb
"Fall down seven times. Stand up eight." Japanese Proverb
"The first step toward success is taken when you refuse to be a captive of the environment in which you first find yourself" - Mark Caine
"There is no charm equal to tenderness of heart." - Jane Austen
"The most wasted of all days is one without laughter."  e. e. cummings
"We take these risks not to escape life, but to prevent life from escaping us."
"do not give advice unless asked for it"
"You've got to spend your money on the things that money can buy, not worry about profit or loss. Save your energy for the things that money can't buy." -Haruki Murakami
"Those who hate you don't win unless you hate them, then you destroy yourself." -Richard M. Nixon
"The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be" - Emerson
"Here comes the orator! With his flood of words, and his drop of reason." Benjamin Franklin (1735)
-xxxtentacion
"There never was a good war or a bad peace." - Benjamin Franklin
"I don't want to be at the mercy of my emotions. I want to use them, to enjoy them, and to dominate them." - Oscar Wilde
"Just because something isn't a lie does not mean that it isn't deceptive. A liar knows that he is a liar, but one who speaks mere portions of truth in order to deceive is a craftsman of destruction." ? Criss Jam
"Love is an exquisite flesh that is savored even in the bones" (William Ventura)
"War does not determine who is right, only who is left" - Unknown
"There's nothing in the rule book that says a giraffe can't play football." - Abraham Lincoln
"Sometimes it's the smallest decisions that can change your life forever."- Keri Russell
"Sometimes, people should try to give luck a chance." - Albert Casals
80 percent of results will come from just 20 percent of the action. - Pareto
"We do not have any intention right now to shoot at people, but they will be apprehended." - Homeland Security Secretary Kirstjen Nielsen
"We live by our fictions, and there is no supreme fiction." - John Gray
"Any war that requires the suspension of reason as a necessity for support is a bad war."  Norman Mailer
"You can never underestimate the stupidity of the general public."  Scott Adams
"Well, if crime fighters fight crime and fire fighters fight fire, what do freedom fighters fight? They never mention that part to us, do they?"  George Carlin
"Is sloppiness in speech caused by ignorance or apathy? I don't know and I don't care."  William Safire
"If you think It's wrong to hurt Animals, Live in line with your belief." GO VEGAN!
"It doesn't matter where you start. Only that you begin." - Robin Sharma
"A moment of self-compassion can change your entire day. A string of such moments can change the course of your life." - Christopher Germer
" It had long since come to my attention that people of accomplishment rarely sat back and let things happen to them. They went out and happened to things " - Leonardo da Vinci
"When I discover who I am, I"ll be free." - Ralph Ellison
"Silent gratitude isn't very much to anyone."  Gertrude Stein
"Make your life a masterpiece, imagine no limitations on what you can be, have or do."
"the pervert"s insistence on bringing his penis to the dinner party fundamentally warps his relationship with the social order even in the best of cases" - Adam Kotsko, psychoanalyst
"Dig me up from under what is covering the better part of me, sing this song, remind me that we'll always have each other when everything else is gone" - Brandon Boyd(Incubus)
"Nothing is more sad than the death of an illusion." - Arthur Koestler
"In any battle of gods, the one who's spazzing out hardest is most desperate. I call this 'The Vegeta Paradox'." - Tatrus
"Man: A random confluence of flesh and foibles." - Homer Simpson
"We are not enemies, but friends. We must not be enemies. Though passion may have strained, it must not break our bonds of affection. The mystic chords of memory will swell when again touched, as surely they will be, by the better angels of our nature." - Lincoln
"Believe in yourself. But you can't have belief without hard work. You can say you want this or want that but if you're not getting up and going to work for it everyday, you're just talking." -Kevin Durant
"Voting is a chess move, not a valentine."
"I don"t believe in guilty pleasures. If you fucking like something, like it." - Dave Grohl
"Real life doesn"t have many happy endings. Why shouldn"t books make up the difference?" Scott Westerfeld
"Even though death feels like a distant notion, it's always near us. When we become aware of its existance, it's already standing next to us... And we can't escape it."
"Live your life, live it right. Be different, do different things."  Kendrick Lamar
"to be have no you haven"t to be gone so like that? not me, or you to do so." - Martin Jack
"I feel 5lbs lighter!! Jealous?" -Mr. Jones (Friday)
"The true key for the construction of everything doubtful in a law is the intention of the law-makers." Thomas Jefferson (1808)
"Madness is like gravity, all you need is a little push. " Joker
"I look at life like I don't know how long I've got, I don't know if it's the only one I get, but I know it's the only one I know of." - Entrepreneur Jonathan Harvey
"Work like others won`t so you can live like others can`t." - Evan Adcock, CEO Verda Innovations
"Rewards and punishment is the lowest form of education." - Zhuangzi
"Beliefs are dangerous. Beliefs allow the mind to stop functioning. A non-functioning mind is clinically dead. Believe in nothing." - Maynard James Keenan
"If you live for the weekend you're already dead" - original?
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society" -Jiddu Krishnamurti
"People think I'm disciplined. It is not discipline. It is devotion. There is a great difference." - Pavarotti
"A calculated risk is no risk at all" - Jericho Swain
"Freedom has many difficulties and democracy is not perfect, but we have never had to put a wall up to keep our people in" - JFK
"Only the dead have seen the end of war."
"The trouble is if you don"t spend your life yourself, other people spend it for you."
"Keep your face always toward the sunshineand shadows will fall behind you."
"Only two things are infinite, the universe and human stupidity, and I'm not sure about the former." - Albert Einstein
"The world will ask you who you are, and if you do not know, the world will tell you." - Carl Jung
"Better to have spent a lifetime assembling oneself than battling to ensure one never fell apart" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Highly organized research is guaranteed to produce nothing new." - Frank Herbert,
"There's no point in hating anybody, because to the extent that you tear down another, you tear down yourself." - Unknown
"The only thing we have to fear is fear itself, but raptors are pretty dang scary. "  Devin J. Monroe
"It is a profitable thing, if one is wise, to seem foolish."  Aeschylus
"There's always somebody who is paid too much, and taxed too little - and it's always somebody else."  Cullen Hightower
"I always keep a supply of stimulant handy in case I see a snake--which I also keep handy."  W. C. Fields
"Reader beware, you"re in for a scare" - R.L. Stine
"A sickness known as hate. Not a virus, not a microbe, not a germbut a sickness nonetheless, highly contagious, deadly in its effects. Don't look for it in the Twilight Zonelook for it in a mirror. Look for it before the light goes out altogether." S05E26(E146)
"Maybe every generation thinks the next one is the end of it all..." - Roger Sterling (Mad Men)
"Another belief of mine; that everyone else my age is an adult, whereas I am merely in disguise."  Margaret Atwood
"To do a common thing uncommonly well brings success" -Henry J Heinz
"Be soft. Do not let the world make you hard. Do not let the pain make you hate. Do not let the bitterness steal your sweetness. Take pride that even though the rest of the world may disagree, you still believe it to be a beautiful place." -Ian S. Thomas
"I believe that there is nothing more destructive of human lives than fanatical conviction about the perfect life, allied to political or military power. Our century affords terrible evidence of this truth. I believe in working for a minimally decent society." -Isaiah Berlin, 1988
"Power is in tearing human minds to pieces and putting them together again in new shapes of your own choosing." - George Orwell, 1984
"Somebody may beat me, but they are going to have to bleed to do it."  Steve Prefontaine
"In this moment, I am euphoric. Not because of any phony god"s blessing, but because I am enlightened by my own intelligence." -- Anonymous
"we live in a society where gaming as a hobby is a mental disorder but wanting to change your gender is encouraged" - Robert (me)
"Because democracy is inherently flawed. When the citizens of a democracy grow too wealthy, they begin to view politics as entertainment, and when voters do that, they elect those who will entertain them."
"When money shows, money goes." - yeuxwbbw
"Quotation is a serviceable substitute for wit." -Oscar Wilde
"Underestimating a people's stupidity can be embarrassing, but underestimating a people's intelligence can be deadly." - Michelob Donatelloween
"Live as brave (wo)men; and if fortune is adverse, front it's blows with brave hearts." Cicero
"Only one more indispensable massacre of Capitalists or Communists or Fascists or Christians or Heretics, and there we are - there we are in the Golden Future." - Aldous Huxley
"Life's most persistent and urgent question is, 'What are you doing for others?'"-MLK
"But everything great is just as difficult to realize as it is rare to find" -Spinoza
"It is foolish to scold, I have enough trouble overcoming my own limitations without fretting over the fact that God has not seen fit to distribute evenly the gift of intelligence." - John Wanamaker
"I don't care if you're black, white, straight, bisexual, gay, lesbian, short, tall, fat, skinny, rich or poor. If you're nice to me, i'll be nice to you. Simple as that!"- Eminem
"Sometimes the enemy of your enemy is just a jackass." -- Senator Ben Sasser, (Republican, Nebraska)
"Peace means far more than the opposite of war." -- Fred Rogers
"Human beings are hardwired for tribalism. We compulsively (and unconsciously) divide the social landscape into in-groups and out-groups..." -- Eric Levitz
"Death is like a surprise party. Unless, of course, you're already dead on the inside."
"SomeTimes What You Are Looking For Comes When You Are Not LOOKING"
"Happiness is the belated fulfilment of a prehistoric wish. For this reason wealth brings so little happiness. Money was not a childhood wish." - Sigmund Freud
"I know kung-fu!" - Neo (Keanu Reeves)
"You cannot teach people how to feel. All you can do is surround them with the conditions calculated to stimulate any natural feeling they may possess." - Harold Speed
"Whenever you find whole world against you just turn around and lead the world."  Anonymous
"Things to know about life: 'No' is a complete sentence. It does not require justification or explanation." -unknown
" Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal. " - Albert Camus.
"You can chain me, you can torture me, you can even destroy this body, but you will never imprison my mind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Some part of the human self or soul is not subject to the laws of space or time." - Carl Jung
"There is nobody so irritating as somebody with less intelligence and more sense than we have."  Don Herold
"If your parents never had children, chances are you won't, either."  Dick Cavett
"Just the omission of Jane Austen's books alone would make a fairly good library out of a library that hadn't a book in it."  Mark Twain
"A multitude of small delights constitutes happiness." - Charles Baudelaire
'I would rather die of passion than boredom.' - Van Gogh
"Power and violence are opposites; where the one rules absolutely, the other is absent. Violence appears where power is in jeopardy, but left to its own course it ends in power's disappearance." - Hannah Arendt (1906-1975)
"Under no pretext should arms and ammunition be surrendered; any attempt to disarm the workers must be frustrated, by force if necessary." Karl Marx &amp; Friedrich Engels, address to the Communist League
"A smile is a curve that sets everything straight."  Phyllis Diller
"If you looked at ALL my past experiments, they were always rhetorical devices. I gathered data to show how my point would be made. I used data as a point of persuasion, and I never really worried about, "Will this replicate or will this not?" - Daryl Bem
"There are roads which must not be followed, armies which must not be attacked, towns which must not be besieged, positions which must not be contested, commands of the sovereign which must not be obeyed."  Sun Tzu
"Make yourself so happy so that when others look at you they become happy too." ----- Yogi Bhajan
"Our life is only what our thoughts make it."
"But if thought corrupts language, language can also corrupt thought." - George Orwell, 1984
"Folks don't even own themselves, payin' mental rent to corporate presidents" - Public Enemy
"All our final decisions are made in a state of mind that is not going to last." - Marcel Proust
"Neither the wisest constitution nor the wisest laws will secure the liberty and happiness of a people whose manners are universally corrupt." Samuel Adams (1749)
"A true Russian does not farm potatoes. He us a potato." -TotallyNot Me
"Now that we know who you are, I know who I am. I'm not a mistake!" - Elijah Price (Samuel L Jackson)
"If there's a single lesson that life teaches us, it's that wishing doesn't make it so."
"Though nobody can go back and make a new beginning... Anyone can start over and make a new ending."
"One of the most important signs of the existence of a democracy is that when there is a knock at the door at 5 in the morning, one is completely certain that it is the milkman." --Winston Churchill
"If your opponent has a conscience, then follow Gandhi. But if your enemy has no conscience, like Hitler, then follow Bonhoeffer." - Martin Luther King
"Our sires' age was worse than our grandsires'. We, their sons, are more worthless than they; so in our turn we shall give the world a progeny yet more corrupt." - Horace
"The goal of education is not to increase the amount of knowledge but to create the possibilities for a child to invent and discover, to create men who are capable of doing new things." Jean Piag
"This country has socialism for the rich, rugged individualism for the poor." - REV. MARTIN LUTHER KING, JR.
"With silent tears, comes silent drowning." - Rory Jamieson
"Forget it, Jake, it's Chinatown." - Chinatown
"My lean cost more than your rent, ooh your mama still live in a tent. " - Gazzy Garcia
"There are times when the mind is dealt such a blow it hides itself in insanity. While this may not seem beneficial, it is. There are times when reality is nothing but pain, and to escape that pain the mind must leave reality behind." - Patrick Rothfuss
"The mystery of human existence lies not in just staying alive, but in finding something to live for." -Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"My doctor gave me two weeks to live. I hope they're in August."  Ronnie Shakes
"The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to steal bread."  Anatole France
"Politics is applesauce."  Will Rogers
"If I were two-faced, would I be wearing this one?"  Abraham Lincoln
"Life is not just about the perfect results. I'm sorry, that's boring. Life is all about entertainment. Life is about living it to the fullest." Ari Vatanen. "
"The results of hard work and dedication always look like luck to saps. But you know you've carved every ounce of your success." Morrowind, 24th level-up screen
"If you make friends with yourself you will never be alone." - Maxwell Maltz
"But if you don't watch me, I will try and sneak in some humor. I see humor everywhere in life around me." - Marion Ross
"Die to the past every moment. You don"t need it. Only refer to it when it is absolutely relevant to the present. Feel the power of this moment and the fullness of Being. Feel your presence." - Eckhart Tolle
"In short, physics has discovered that there are no solids, no continuous surfaces, no straight lines; only waves; no things, only energy-event complexes, only behaviors, only verbs, only relationships." Buckminster Fuller
"Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great." - Mark Twain
"Life is short, but also like terribly and insufferably long at the same time. Be a toothbrush."  Jenna Marbles
"I think; therefore I am."  Rene Descartes
"And that's when I know it's over. As soon as you start thinking about the beginning, it's the end." - Junot Daz, This Is How You Lose Her
"I have no special talents. I am only passionately curious." -Albert Einstein
"I'm as mad as hell, and I'm not going to take this anymore!" - Network
"Real maturity begins when you realize these ideologies are cultural furniture." - Terence McKenna
"It is true that those we meet can change us, sometimes so profoundly that we are not the same afterwards, even unto our name." - Yann Martel
"You're only human. You dont have to have it together every minute of every day." - Anne Hathaway
"If you cannot do great things, do small things in a great way." -Napoleon Hill
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky
"I was in three academic clubs, a huge book worm and the teacher's pet. I was kind of an easy target for bullies." - Nicole Anderson
"Men reject their prophets and slay them, but they love their martyrs and honor those they have slain." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"Home isn't where you're from, it's where you find light when all grows dark." - Pierce Brown,
"Marriage, if one will face the truth, is an evil, but a necessary evil." --- Menander
"A common man will declare war and then seek victory. A wise man achieves victory and then declares war." - Sun Tzu, Art of War
"Be yourself today. You look beautiful like that." -unknown
"Men in general judge by their eyes rather than by their hands; because everyone is in a position to watch, few are in a position to come in close touch with you. Everyone sees what you appear to be, few experience what you really are." Niccol Machiavelli
"Men in general judge by their eyes rather than by their hands; because everyone is in a position to watch, few are in a position to come in close touch with you. Everyone sees what you appear to be, few experience what you really are." -Niccol Machiavelli
"There are two things that come very easily to me: rooting for New York sports teams and making mistakes." --- Harvey Weinstein
"It doesn't matter how many times the sun goes down,but how many times it can shines and then get up" (William Ventura)
"The hardest choices require the strongest wills" -Thanos
"Toddlers have tantrums. Adults should solve problems." - Seth Godin
"In order for the light to shine so brightly, the darkness must be present." - Francis Bacon
"Sometimes, I feel the past and the future pressing so hard on either side that there's no room for the present at all." - Evelyn Waugh
"There will always be a place for us somewhere, somehow, as long as we see to it that working people fight for everything they have, everything they hope to get, for dignity, equality, democracy, to oppose war and to bring to the world a better life." --- Harry Bridges
"Remember, hope is a good thing, maybe the best of things, and no good thing ever dies."  Stephen King
"We typically think: 'What's the harm? I mean, one extra slice of cake isn't going to kill me.' And there is truth to that...However, the pattern of giving into one harmless urge after another has a serious effect on your life." - Barry Michels
"Few things are more satisfying than seeing your own children have teenagers of their own."  Doug Larson
"Love is an irresistible desire to be irresistibly desired."  Robert Frost
"I respect faith, but doubt is what gets you an education."  Wilson Mizner
"Her own mother lived the latter years of her life in the horrible suspicion that electricity was dripping invisibly all over the house."  James Thurber
"I know who I was this morning when I woke up, but I think I've changed several times since then." "Alice in Wonderland"
"Everyone seems to have a clear idea of how other people should lead their lives, but none about his or her own." - Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist.
"Setting goals is the first step in turning the invisible into the visible." Tony Robbins
"I don't know why we are here, but I'm pretty sure that it is not in order to enjoy ourselves." --- Ludwig Wittgenstein
"People will choose unhappiness over uncertainty." - Timothy Ferriss
"If you begin to regret, you'll dull your future decisions and let others make your choices for you. Nobody can foretell the outcome. Each decision you make holds meaning only by affecting your next decision." -Erwin Smith, Shingeki no Kyoujin
"What, art thou mad? A man may see how this world goes with no eyes. Look with thine ears: see how yond Judge rails upon yond simple thief. Hark, in thine ear: change places; and, handy-dandy, which is the justice, which is the thief?" -Shakespeare, King Lear
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams." - Dr. Seuss
"Keep awake. The longer possible. Struggle against sleep. The calculation is easy. In one hour, I make 30 false papers. If I sleep one hour, 30 people will die." - Adolfo Kaminsky, who created forged documents that saved the lives of 14,000 Jews during WWII
"My grandfather Frank Lloyd Wright wore a red sash on his wedding night. That is glamour!" --- Anne Baxter
"Every word is like an unnecessary stain on silence and nothingness."  Samuel Beckett
"In gravitational pull it is not the geometrical position that counts. Center, in the geometrical sense of the word, does not apply. It is the mass that attracts...and not a mere geometrical point." - Marshall B. Gardner
"You can always turn your back on a person, but never turn your back on a drug. it should always be infront of you like something you might have to kill." Hunter S. Thompson
"In gravitational pull it is not the geometrical position that counts. Center, in the geometrical sense of the word, does not apply." - Marshall B. Gardner
"Fate is being kind to me. Fate doesn't want me to be too famous too young." --- Duke Ellington
"Do you want a rectal exam with my cock?" - my friend talking to my other friend's dog
"Before you heal someone, ask him if he's willing to give up the things that made him sick." Hippocrates
"Nothing except the mint can make money without advertising." - Thomas Babington Macaulay
"Your pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your understanding. It is the bitter potion by which the physician within you heals your sick self. Therefore, trust the physician and drink his remedy in silence and tranquility." - Khalil Gibran
"The cavalry aren't coming, because it's you, and you're already here"
#Quote of the day
"A person"s success in life can usually be measured by the number of uncomfortable conversations he or she is willing to have.." - Tim Ferriss
"CHILDREN, children are the purest expression of what it means to be human, unburdened by fear , or regret. They a re e a fire raging most bright, but they quickly grow out of control. They must be tempered, the difference between a controlled burn and a wildfire."
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." - Aristotle
"To live at all is miracle enough." -Mervyn Peake
"An inconvenience is only an adventure wrongly considered
'There is no fundamental difference between man and animals in their ability to feel pleasure and pain, happiness and misery' - Charles Darwin
[HELP] I once read a quote, it stuck with me and changed my life. I can't find the owner!
"*A real republic is a life lived together*" - Irish President Michael D Higgins today during his re-election speech.
"When adversity strikes, that's when you have to be the most calm. Take a step back, stay strong, stay grounded and press on." --- LL Cool J
"Head up, stay strong. Fake a smile, move on." - anonymous
"To remain calm while staying in a place where you think you will die, that is the definition of insane. You have to become insane to survive in combat." - Cpt Mcgraw "Captain America", Generation Kill
"I'm not gonna fight you. I'm just gonna kick your ass." - Duke Nukem
"Can Mario possess a man and compel him to die?"
"He who has a why to live for can bear almost any how." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The lion cannot protect himself from traps, and the fox cannot defend himself from wolves. One must therefore be a fox to recognize traps, and a lion to frighten wolves." - Niccol Machiavelli
"Love is a magical illusion that can disappear at any time" (William Ventura)
"As the age of television progresses the Reagans will be the rule, not the exception. To be perfect for television is all a President has to be these days." Gore Vidal, 1981
"President Nixon"s motto was, "if two wrongs don"t make a right, try three." Norman Cousins, 1979
"The end of a bad relatioship relates to the begining of something that will be good again" (William Ventura)
"I see dead people." --- The Sixth Sense
"Start where you are, use what you have, do what you can." - Arthur Ashe
"Don't let pain define you, let it refine you." -Tim Fargo
"A good relationship is like fireworks: loud, explosive, and liable to maim you if you hold on too long."  Jeph Jacques
"My favorite thing about the Internet is that you get to go into the private world of real creeps without having to smell them."  Penn Jillette
"Isn't it interesting that the same people who laugh at science fiction listen to weather forecasts and economists?"  Kelvin Throop III
"Music with dinner is an insult both to the cook and the violinist."  G. K. Chesterton
"I choose my friends for their good looks, my acquaintances for their good characters, and my enemies for their good intellects." - Oscar Wilde
"Only one thing is impossible for God: To find any sense in any copyright law on the planet." --- Mark Twain
"I used to say, 'things cost too much.' Then my teacher straightened me out on that by saying, 'The problem isn't that things cost too much. The problems is that you can't afford it.' That's when I finally understood that the problem wasn't it. The problem was me!" -Jim Rohn
"No matter how much suffering you went through, you never wanted to let go of those memories."
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently.
"Everything in the world may be endured except continual prosperity."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"I wish there was a way to know you"re in the good old days before you"ve actually left them"- Andy Bernard from The Office
"You're gonna need a bigger boat." --- Jaws
"Christianity, if false, is of no importance, and if true, of infinite importance. The only thing it cannot be is moderately important." -C. S. Lewis
"When we lose the capacity of getting outraged over the atrocities suffered by others, we also lose the right of considering ourselves civilized human beings". - Vladimir Herzog's tomb
"When we lose the capacity of getting outraged over the atrocities suffered by others, we also lose the right of considering ourselves civilized human". - Vladimir Herzog's tomb
"Laws are like sausages, it is better not to see them being made." --- Otto von Bismarck
"Mother Nature is angry, and she will not be stifled" -MapleTreeWithAGun
"What is above all needed is to let the meaning choose the word and not the other way around" -George Orwell
"Nobody deserves your tears, but whoever deserves them will not make you cry." - Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"In life there are some people who think that their shit doesn't stink" - me
"You have to be odd, to be number one." Dr. Seuss
"We are only as strong as we are united, as weak as we are divided." - J.K. Rowling
"A rude nature is worse than a brute nature by so much more as man is better than a beast: and those that are of civil natures and genteel dispositions are as much nearer to celestial creatures as those that are rude and cruel are to devils." --- Margaret Cavendish
"We are Legion, for we are many."
"Let me tell you something kid; Everybody gets one chance to do something great. Most people never take the chance, either because they're too scared, or they don't recognize it when it spits on their shoes." - Sandlot
"Everybody's going to end up dying someday, and I think it's better to die with some people that you like than to know that there's somebody out there that you love that you're not with."  Micheal Scott
"The difference between 'involvement' and 'commitment' is like an eggs-and-ham breakfast: the chicken was 'involved' the pig was 'committed'." --- unknown
"Leaders can let you fail and yet not let you be a failure."  Stanley McChrystal
"The deeds and decisions of our lives are determined by proclivities, sympathies, fundamental attitudes, and critical experiences of the soul ..." -- Thomas Mann
"There is a certain part of all of us that lives outside of time. Perhaps we become aware of our age only at exceptional moments and most of the time we are ageless." - Milan Kundera
"Human progress is neither automatic nor inevitable... Every step toward the goal of justice requires sacrifice, suffering, and struggle; the tireless exertions and passionate concern of dedicated individuals."- Martin Luther King, Jr.
"They say a person needs just three things to be truly happy in this world: someone to love, something to do, and something to hope for." - Tom Bodett
"They say a person needs just three things to be truly happy in this world; someone to love, something to do and something to hope for." - Tom Bodett
"And once the storm is over, you won"t remember how you made it through, how you managed to survive. You won"t even be sure, whether the storm is really over. But one thing is certain. When you come out of the storm, you won"t be the same person who walked in. That"s what this storm"s all about."
"When you meet a swordsman, draw your sword: Do not recite poetry to one who is not a poet." - Robert Greene
"Dictatorships foster oppression, dictatorships foster servitude, dictatorships foster cruelty; more abominable is the fact that they foster idiocy." Jorge Luis Borges.
"Learning how to improvise really awakened my interest in music." --- Carter Burwell
"An opinion should be the result of thought, not a substitute for it."  Jef Mallett
"A good friend can tell you what is the matter with you in a minute. He may not seem such a good friend after telling."  Arthur Brisbane
"The more original a discovery, the more obvious it seems afterwards."  Arthur Koestler
"The reason there are two senators for each state is so that one can be the designated driver."  Jay Leno
"I've never fooled anyone. I've let people fool themselves. They didn't bother to find out who and what I was. Instead they would invent a character for me. I wouldn't argue with them. They were obviously loving somebody I wasn't."
"I'm not afraid of death; I just don't want to be there when it happens."
"What has changed in forty years? It"s very simple: forty years ago there was a market economy. Today there is a market society. Today everything, including ethics, has a price." Robert Fripp
"Training is everything. The peach was once a bitter almond; cauliflower is nothing but cabbage with a college education." - Mark Twain
"Your value does not decrease based on someones inability to see your worth"
"Never give up on something you really want. It"s difficult to wait, but worse to regret." (via:love-diaries/tumblr)
"I have always been initiating change rather than responding to change." - Michael D Higgins
"There's a difference between a philosophy and a bumper sticker."  Charles M. Schulz
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." -Martin Luther King Jr
"It"s better to be unhappy alone than unhappy with someone."  Marilyn Monroe
"Im so 2008, you're soo 2000 &amp; late" - Fergie
"But the truth is there"s not enough miracles to go around kid, and there"s too many people petitioning god for the winning lotto ticket." - Shane Koyczan, The Crickets Have Arthritis.
"If life is about suffering and hard work then you can go fuck yourselves" - Me
"Dwell on the beauty of life. Watch the stars, and see yourself running with them." - Marcus Aurelius
"To be born from evil, does not make you evil, nor does being born from good, make you good."
"You can lead a horse to water, but a pencil is always lead." - my Dad
"Do not let anything negative entering your mind, and if something negative enters, Make sure that you turn it into something positive before you decay your spirit." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Have you ever noticed how parents can go from the most wonderful people in the world to totally embarrassing in three seconds?" - Rick Riordan
"This Moment is the only thing that is Physical, everything else is Mind."
"We need leaders not in love with money but in love with justice. Not in love with publicity but in love with humanity" - Martin Luther King
"Adam smiled cheerily. Ronan would start wars and burn cities for that true smile, elastic and amiable." - Maggie Stiefvater,
"Yes, you are nosy. You're a dreadfully nosy, horribly bossy, appallingly clean old woman. Control yourself. You're victimizing us all." - Diana Wynne Jones
"Everybody's going to end up dying someday, and I think it's better to die with some people that you like than to know that there's somebody out there that you love that you're not with." -Micheal Scott
"Science is the Belief in the Ignorance of Experts"  Richard Feynman
"Think about this. There are billions of habitable earth like world's out there in the galaxy, and yet we are alone. Think about this. There are billions of habitable earth like world's in the galaxy, we are not alone. There are others. One these of statements is true." Professor Brian Cox.
"The only way out is through"(JK Rowling)
"The reason you want to be better is the reason why you aren't" -Alan Watts
"Anger at suffering defeat replaces the chance to know yourself deeper with the need for revenge" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The difference between school and life? In school, you're taught a lesson and then given a test. In life, you're given a test that teaches you a lesson." - Tom Bodett
"The difference between an optimist and a pessimist? An optimist laughs to forget but a pessimist forgets to laugh." - Tom Bodett
"When you lie down with a short prayer, commit yourself into the hands of your Creator and when you have done so, trust Him with yourself, as you must do when you are dying." - Jeremy Taylor
"The things you do not have to say make you rich. Saying things you do not have to say weakens your talk. Hearing things you do not need to hear dulls your hearing. And things you know before you hear them--those are you, Those are why you are in the world." - William Stafford,
"The world went on, as it does, without my full participation..." - John Green, The Fault in Our Stars
"The smallest minority on earth is the individual. Those who deny individual rights cannot claim to be defenders of minorities." - Ayn Rand
"The best education in the world is that got by struggling to get a living."-Wendell Phillips
"Illegal aliens have always been a problem in the United States. Ask any Indian." - Robert Orben
"Great political questions stir the deepest nature of one-half the nation, but they pass far above and over the heads of the other half."-Wendell Phillips
"I can resist anything except temptation." - Oscar Wilde, Lady Windermere's Fan
"In the beginning was the Word. Then came the fucking word processor. Then came the thought processor. Then came the death of literature. And so it goes." - Dan Simmons, Hyperion
"If thou wilt make a man happy, add not unto his riches but take away from his desires." -Epicurus
"We struggle to find the right age range for "millennials" because it"s an umbrella term under "whoever the last generation screwed over most" and there"s a lot of us." -My Indian-American friend
"Let us sacrifice our today so that our children can have a better tomorrow" -A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees Opportunity In Every Difficulty."  Winston Churchill
"No matter how small a bread could be,if it makes the hunger less bigger" (William Ventura)
"The serpent, the king, the tiger, the stinging wasp, the small child, the dog owned by other people, and the fool: these seven ought not to be awakened from sleep.". Chanakya
"He who makes a beast of himself gets rid of the pain of being a man." - Samuel Johnson
"Opportunity is always knocking. The problem is that most people have the self-doubt station in their heads turned up way too loud to hear it."  Brian Vaszily
"Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight."
"Well, don't expect us to be too impressed. We just saw Finnick Odair in his underwear."
"I think it is good that books still exist, but they do make me sleepy."  Frank Zappa
"My loathings are simple: stupidity, oppression, crime, cruelty, soft music."  Vladimir Nabokov
"I used to work in a fire hydrant factory. You couldn't park anywhere near the place."  Steven Wright
"I believe that people would be alive today if there were a death penalty."  Nancy Reagan
"Be assured of this, O Sultan, that justice springs from perfection of the intellect and that perfection of the intellect means that you see things as they really are, and perceive the facts of their inner reality without being deceived by their outward appearance." - Al Ghazali
"Attitude is a choice. Happiness is a choice. Optimism is a choice. Kindness is a choice. Giving is a choice. Respect is a choice. Whatever choice you make makes you. Choose wisely." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"Then I am reminded that life will continue on, regardless of whether I choose to board the train or stay on the platform." - Courtney Peppernell, Pillow Thoughts
"What the caterpillar calls the end, the rest of the world calls a butterfly." Lao Tzu
"Opinions are like arseholes, everybody has them and they all smell like shit." - me.
"If you don't like what you're watching, change the program" - Captain Planet
"The less we deserve good fortune, the more we hope for it."  Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"No matter how far you run, distance might not solve anything."  Haruki Murakami, Kafka on the Shore
"I think that when you are famous every weakness is exaggerated." - Marilyn Monroe
"Revolutions are frightening, but election campaigns are disgusting." - Nicols Gmez Dvila
"No weather"s ill, if the wind be still" - unknown
"If someone is an asshole, they're an asshole, if everyone is an asshole, you're the asshole" - no clue who
"The problem with the coward is that if the brave man succeeds, his cowardice is proven false, and thus foolish. Let's not add a third trait, cowardly fools, shall we?" - Robert Hiphoppenheimer
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect." - Mark Twain
"Beware that, when fighting monsters, you yourself do not become a monster... for when you gaze long into the abyss. The abyss gazes also into you." - Friedrich W. Nietzsche
"Choice of sources can shield extreme bias behind a faade of objectivity." - Noam Chomsky
"Respect is the universal currency that is accepted everywhere and by everyone."
"No one has ever become poor by giving." -Anne Frank
"The weird thing is now I'm exactly where I want to be. I've got my dream job at Cornell, and I'm still just thinking about my old pals. Only now they're the ones I made here. I wish there was a way to know you're in "the good old days", before you've actually left them." - Andy Bernard, The Office.
"I think about my parents all the time, especially on Sunday when I'm at Mass. My mother always said, 'We do not pray to win elections. We pray for people's health, we pray that God's will be done, we pray that we do our best. But we do not pray to win elections.'" - Nancy Pelosi
"Believe you can and you"re halfway there." -Theodore Roosevelt
"I"m not irrational. You"re rationality is just small. "
" Nothing you can do, folks, although the Second Amendment people  maybe there is, I don"t know." Donald John Trump, POTUS 45. August 9th 2016.
"Poverty makes a crime of every indulgence." - George Gissing, The Nether World
"Patriotism is when love of your own people comes first; nationalism, when hate for people other than your own comes first." -Charle de Gaulle
"The opressor wouldn't be so strong if they didn't had accomplices within the opressed themselves" - Simone de Beauvoir
"I think in art, but especially in films, people are trying to confirm their own existences." - Jim Morrison
"And my dad wanted me to play the trumpet because that's what he liked. His idol was Louis Armstrong. My dad thought my teeth came together in a way that was perfect for playing the trumpet." - Jackson Browne
"The Islam of the 18th, 19th and first half of the 20th century was a poor thing. Nobody bothered about it. Islam was that funny sort of pure system of beliefs that depressed people in the Middle East held as their religion." - John Keegan
"A lie gets halfway around the world before the truth has a chance to get its pants on."  Winston S Churchill
"Apple trees apple, the earth peoples, low clouds rain and I complain." -Anonymous
"There is no secrets to success. It is the result of preparation, hard work, and learning from failure." - Colin Powell
"The more you find out about the world, the more opportunities there are to laugh at it."  Bill Nye
"There is always some madness in love. But there is also always some reason in madness."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"No one has ever had an idea in a dress suit."  Sir Frederick G. Banting
"America is a large, friendly dog in a very small room. Every time it wags its tail, it knocks over a chair."  Arnold Toynbee
"I've never met anybody whose intelligence seemed so intimidating that they deserved to be followed" - Terence Mckenna
"We've learned how to make a living, but not a life. We've added years to life not life to years. We've been all the way to the moon and back, but have trouble crossing the street to meet a new neighbor. ... We've done larger things, but not better things." - Bob Moorehead
"As long as you are pure of heart, you speak the truth."  Hazrat Umar ibn al-Khattab (radiallahu" anhu)
"While we make the march to the edge of oblivion the simple distractions of life make it seem like a pleasant stroll."
"Lean back under a tree, put your arms behind your head, wonder at the pass we"ve come to, smile and remember that the beginnings and ends of man"s every great enterprise are untidy."-Sebastian de Grazia
"He that lives upon hope will die fasting."  Benjamin Franklin
"There was always a discipline within my partying structure."  Jack Nicholson
"That desire to identify yourself with something greater is the desire for power." - J. Krishnamurti
"Everything declines after reaching perfection, therefore let no man be beguiled by the sweetness of a pleasant life." Abu al-Baqa Al-Rundi
"What need is there to weep over parts of life? The whole of it calls for tears," - Seneca
"This is how the world ends. This is how the world ends. This is how the world ends. Not with a bang but a whimper." - T.S Eliot
"If I look back I am lost," - Daenerys Targaryen (GRRM)
"It would be too easy to say that I feel invisible. Instead, I feel painfully visible, and entirely ignored." -David Levithan
"I love the Saudis. [] They make a billion dollars a day." POTUS 45.
"The way you tell your story to yourself matters." -Amy Cuddy
"Dream is not what you see in sleep. Dream is that dont allow you to sleep"-Unknown
"You might never fail on the scale I did, but some failure in life is inevitable. It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might as well not have lived at all, in which case, you fail by default." -J.K. Rowling
"You might never fail on the scale I did, but some failure in life is inevitable. It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might as well not have lived at all, in which case, you fail be default." -J.K. Rowling
"All happy families are alike; each unhappy family is unhappy in its own way"
"There"s a huge difference between attacking those who are wrong, and defending those who are right." -Me
"And a step backward after making a wrong turn, is a step in the right direction" - Kurt Vonnegut, Player Piano
"The reward for conformity is that everyone likes you but yourself." (-Rita Mae Brown)
"I would rather a romantic relationship turn into contempt than turn into apathy. The passion in the extremities make it appear as though it once meant something. We grow from hot or cold, but lukewarm is the biggest insult." - Criss Jami, Killosophy
"You're not your job. You're not how much money you have in the bank. You're not the car you drive. You're not the contents of your wallet. You're not your f***ing khakis. You're the all-singing, all-dancing crap of the world." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Life is the only game that doesn't have players."  Unlimiter
"Life is the only game that doesn't have players."  Hesham Labidi
[Poetry] The day I first saw you ...! Top 10 Romantic Quotes
"You may find the worst enemy or best friend in yourself." - English Proverb
"Amateurs sit and wait for inspiration, the rest of us just get up and go to work." - Stephen King
"Telling yourself to stop thinking obsessively is like pushing a beach ball under the water. The harder you press, the higher it pops, when you can no longer hold onto it!"
"It is not the eyes that are blind, but hearts."  [Quran, 22:46]
"You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching, Love like you'll never be hurt, Sing like there's nobody listening, And live like it's heaven on earth." - William W. Purkey
"They say such nice things about people at their funerals that it makes me sad to realize that I'm going to miss mine by just a few days."  Garrison Keillor
"The only reason some people get lost in thought is because it's unfamiliar territory."  Paul Fix
"I think that God in creating Man somewhat overestimated his ability."  Oscar Wilde
"I love Mickey Mouse more than any woman I've ever known."  Walt Disney
"So we beat on, boats against the current, borne back ceaselessly into the past." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Luck is what happens when preparation meets opportunity." Seneca
"The difference between stupidity and genius is that genius has its limits." - Albert Einstein
" I was compelled to love you Not because you're the fairest,but because you're the deepest For a lover of beauty is usually a Fool"- Mahmoud Darwish
"All wish to possess knowledge, but few, comparatively speaking, are willing to pay the price."  Juvenal
"Follow your instincts. That's where true wisdom manifests itself." - Oprah Winfrey
"The rule is that you have to dance a little bit in the morning before you leave the house because it changes the way you walk out in the world" -Sandra Bullock
"You can close your eyes to the things you don"t want to see, but you can"t close your heart to the things you don"t want to feel" - Johnny Depp
"Never give in, never, never, never. In nothing, great or small, large or petty, never give in except to convictions of honour and good sense. Never yield to force, never yield to the apparently overwhelming might of the enemy." -Winston Churchill
"Never give in, never, never, never. In nothing, great or small, large or petty. Never give in, except to convictions of honour and good sense. Never yield to force. Never yield to apparently overwhelming might of the enemy." -Winston Churchill
'We must accept finite disappointment but we must never lose infinite hope' - MLK Jr.
"Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing it incorrectly and applying the wrong remedies." -- Groucho Marx
"Some hearts understand each other, even in silence." - Yasmin Mogahed
[Request] Looking for inexact quote: "Show me a powerless bureaucrat, and I'll show you a petty tyrant."
"I wonder why progress looks so much like destruction."- John Steinbeck
"I may be inexperienced, but my government perches on a mountain of popular votes, while yours is perched on a mountain of corpses." - President Jaime Rolds of Ecuador, to Salvadoran dictator Napolen Duarte
"Fairy tales are more than true; not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten" - G.K. Chesterton
" 'Tis better to have loved and lost than never to have loved at all " Alfred Lord Tennyson
"A single lie discovered is enough to create doubt in every truth expressed."
"Breathe. Take care. Stand still for a minute. What you are looking for might just be looking for you too." Cleo Wade
"Your Life can be considered as an Experiment: there is no Right or Wrong, only Empirical Data Gathering." - A Man Trying To Reduce Anxiety
"In the end the Party would announce that two and two made five, and you would have to believe it. It was inevitable that they should make that claim sooner or later: the logic of their position demanded it." George Orwell, 1984
"It's not who you are that holds you back, it's who you think you're not." Jean-Michel Basquiat
"Put aside Logic and do what feels right" - Lenord Nimoy
"It's not a matter of I cant, its only a matter of how much in willing to sacrifice before I can" - Something I made up. Does it make sense?
"It's not a matter of I cant, its only a matter of how much in willing to sacrifice before I can" - Something I made up does it make sense?
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time." -Mark Twain
"People become really quite remarkable when they start thinking that they can do things. When they believe in themselves they have the first secret of success."  Norman Vincent Peale
"How vain it is to sit down to write when you have not stood up to live." - Henry David Thoreau
"Bruises are only symbolic.Heart is where actual pain bursts out"
"It is a hopeless misjudgement to think that one could force a dictatorial regime upon the German nation. The diversity of the German people calls for democracy." - Theodor Wolff, Prominent German journalist, January 1933
"The proverb warns that, 'You should not bite the hand that feeds you.' But maybe you should, if it prevents you from feeding yourself." - Thomas Szasz
"Since I"ve learned (the reality of) people, I don"t care who praises or criticizes me; as they will be excessive in both."  Malik ibn Dinar
"Going to church doesn"t make you a Christian any more than going to a garage makes you an automobile." Billy Sunday
"Too many of us look upon Americans as dollar chasers. This is a cruel libel, even if it is reiterated thoughtlessly by the Americans themselves."  Albert Einstein
"Making duplicate copies and computer printouts of things no one wanted even one of in the first place is giving America a new sense of purpose."  Andy Rooney
"CNN is one of the participants in the war. I have a fantasy where Ted Turner is elected president but refuses because he doesn't want to give up power."  Arthur C. Clarke
"Democracy is the theory that the common people know what they want and deserve to get it good and hard."  H. L. Mencken
"Isn't it funny how day by day nothing changes but when you look back everything is different". - C.S. LEWIS.
"An army of sheep led by a lion can defeat an army of lions led by a sheep" - African Proverb
"It is a hopeless misjudgement to think that one could force a dictatorial regime upon the German nation. The diversity of the German people calls for democracy." - Theodor Wolff, Prominent German journalist, January 1933
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Out beyond ideas of wrongdoing and rightdoing, there is a field. I'll meet you there." - Rumi
"Nothing in the world is harder than convincing someone of an unfamiliar truth." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
"Your grandparents and parents worked hard so you could smoke weed and be a communist faggot!" - Sacco Vandal
"Of all human activities, man's listening to God is the supreme act of his reasoning and will."  Pope Paul VI
"See things not as you would like, but see them as they are". #Uknown
"Never, ever trick your students into learning. Do that and the bad teachers have an excuse to exploit their students and say it's a 'lesson' when they're caught." - PlayStation 5 Chalmers
@kiekiat
"You cannot find peace by avoiding life." - Virginia Woolf
"No matter how educated, rich, or cool you believe you are, how you treat people ultimately tells all. Integrity is everything ." -unknown
"Think it over, think it under." Winnie-the-Pooh
"Life can indeed be absurd sometimes, but we mustn't joke too much -- we may be lucky enough to figure out who to blame at some point." - Oscar Wildebeast
"It's true that everything we wish for will not come to be... But, things that we must do must always begin with a wish." - Guy Sensei
"It is important on this journey to remember, that just because someone has inflicted hurt upon us it does not give us the right to do the same" -zendaya
"No matter how you feel, get up, dress up, show up, and never give up." - unknown
"Bravery is not the absence of fear, but the courage to act despite it." - Nelson Mandala
"One lie puts a thousand truths into doubt."  Khalid Yasin
"The biggest crime a man can commit with a woman,is to kill her feelings,and allow her heart to bleed of grief" (William Ventura)
"When a love has no remedy,no cure,its because it has very little time left to live" (William Ventura)
"What gets measured gets managed." Peter Drucker
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect." Mark Twain
"Guns don't kill people. People who say "Guns don't kill people" kill people. With guns."  Rob Delaney
"People with courage and character always seem sinister to the rest."  Hermann Hesse
"Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so."  Douglas Adams
"To be stupid, selfish, and have good health are three requirements for happiness, though if stupidity is lacking, all is lost."  Gustave Flaubert
"If the world seems cold to you, kindle fires to warm it."  Lucy Larcom
"We went to the moon to have fun, but the moon turned out to completely suck." -M. T. Anderson
"If you have one wish to destroy your enemy, wish him to become lazy, and watch him from afar destroy himself." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"We think too much and feel too little" - Charlie Chaplin
"People ask if you have graduated, if you have married, if you have kids, as if life is like a checklist. No one asks you if you're happy" - Criolo
"Live a balanced life - learn some and think some and draw and paint and sing and dance and play and work every day some. " -- Robert Fulghum
"When I get sad, I'm stop being sad and be awesome instead. True Story." -Barney Stinson
"One does not accumulate but eliminate. It is not daily increase but daily decrease. The height of cultivation always runs to simplicity."  Bruce Lee
"Defeat is always momentary." - Jack Black in King Kong
"Life is to be lived, not controlled. Humanity is won by continuing to play in the face of certain defeat."
...sometimes when she talks she uses so many words that I get a little lost. Sam Gardner, Atypical
"A withered flower can lose its beauty and its charm,but never its perfume" (William Ventura)
"A telephone suddenly rang. One of the Russian soldiers answered it. The caller was evidently a senior German officer asking what was happening, 'Ivan is here'. The officer replied in Russian, and told him to go to hell."
"Any fool can learn from his mistakes. The wise man learns from the mistakes of others". -Otto von Bismarck
"Love yourself. It is important to stay positive because beauty comes from the inside out." - Jenn Proske
"It really do be like that sometimes." - @sethical_
"Do not manifest celebrating the triumph of others,when in fact you applaud their failures inside yourself" (William Ventura)
"The scariest moment is always just before you start." - Stephen King
"Limits like fears, are often just an illusion."
"A taste for irony has kept more hearts from breaking than a sense of humor, for it takes irony to appreciate the joke which is on oneself."  Jessamyn West
"One of the few good things about modern times: If you die horribly on television, you will not have died in vain. You will have entertained us."  Kurt Vonnegut
"People might not get all they work for in this world, but they must certainly work for all they get."  Frederick Douglass
"Rage is the only quality which has kept me, or anybody I have ever studied, writing columns for newspapers."  Jimmy Breslin
"You can't go back and change the beginning, but you can start where you are and change the ending." - C.S. Lewis
"It"s good to be loved, it"s profound to be understood" - a quote I heard Ellen DeGeneres say on an episode of Comedians in Cars Getting Coffee
"Faith is the sword forged against fate" - Europa_Teles_BTR
"It is worse than a crime, it is a blunder", Police chief Joseph Fouch after Napoleon's politically motivated execution of the Duke of Enghein
"Most people are other people. Their thoughts are someone else's opinions, their lives a mimicry, their passions a quotation." - Oscar Wilde
"He was always saying he wished a war would start in Australia. Well, he started his own war. The thing is, he fought a coward"s war, didn"t he?" - Steven Greene on mass shooter Julian Knight, whom he trained alongside at the military college Duntroon
"Big brother is watching you", 1984
"It is nothing to die; it is horrible not to live." from "Les Misrables"
"I"m on 1st and 1st. How can the same street intersect with itself? I must be at the nexus of the universe." -Kramer
"Every generation needs to know that freedom consists not in doing what we like, but in having the right to do what we ought." -- Pope Saint John Paul II
"I will never change what i have become for others. If I forget who I am, then who will remember who i'm supposed to be" - unknown
"You are free to choose, but you are not free from the consequence of your choice." - ANNPortal.com
"Human capacity for self-deception is astounding." -- Thomas Mann ("Joseph In Egypt") (1936)
"One fool can ask more questions in a minute than twelve wise men can answer in an hour." -- Vladimir Lenin
"Fight your enemy instead of his argument and you may find yourself screaming at a pigeon that it's actually a parakeet." - Smugless Adams
"Calories don't count if they're connected to a celebration. Everyone knows this." - Janet Evanovich
"There"s not a word yet for old friends who"ve just met."  Jim Henson
"The truth knocks on the door and you say, "Go away, I'm looking for the truth," and so it goes away. Puzzling."  Robert M. Pirsig
"Life is short and we"ve only got one shot. So let"s go, balls out, give it everything we"ve got." -Kesha
"Look unto the stars to teach us How the master"s thoughts can reach us, Each one follows Newton"s math Silently along its path" - A. Einstein
"There are many ways of going forward, but only one way of standing still."  Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Scientists say humans are made of atoms, but a little bird told me we are made of stories" - Eduardo Galeano
"You have power over your mind  not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"The Way Get Started Is To Quit Talking And Begin Doing."  Walt Disney
"Music is essentially useless, as life is."  George Santayana
"If you can't say anything good about someone, sit right here by me."  Alice Roosevelt Longworth
"The covers of this book are too far apart."  Ambrose Bierce
"Everything is in a state of flux, including the status quo."  Robert Byrne
"I love deadlines. I love the whooshing noise they make as they go by." - Douglas Adams
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim. Accept no one"s definition of your life; define yourself."  Harvey Fierstein
"Talent is given, greatness is earned." - unknown
"We travel, some of us forever, to seek other states, other lives, other souls." - anas nin
"When all else is lost, the future still remains."  Christian Nestell Bovee
"If we have no peace, it is because we have forgotten that we belong to each other." - Mother Teresa
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Writing about music is like dancing about architecture." - Martin Mull
"Life is short live it how you want...do what you want and don"t let anything stop you.." - anonymous
"Don't it always seem to go...that you don't know what you've got...'till it's gone" -Joni Mitchell
"Reality...wow what a concept" -- Robin Williams
"Never make someone a priority when all you are to them is an option." - Maya Angelou.
"Let us go with our 'devils' to the help of our 'God'! People will mistake us on that account: what does it matter!? They will say: "Their honesty is their devilry!" What does it matter? Have not all Gods been sanctified, rebaptized devils? What do we know of ourselves? (Continued)
"I have never killed nyone, but I have read some obituaries with great satisfaction". Clarence Darrow
'' Instead of looking at one or two nerd pictures, I had THREE FUCKING HUNDRED nerd pictures all over my wall! My eyes were darting all over the place as I was stroking my cock. The nerd pictures ended up causing sensory overload and I shit all over my bed. '' - PIECE_OF_FUCKINGSHIT / nerdthighlvr
"Life is ironic, It takes sadness to know what happiness is. Noise to appreciate silence. And absence to value presence"-Anonymous
"The pure and simple truth is rarely pure and never simple." -Oscar Wilde
"One of the qualities of the greatest things in life is that they are giant and tiny simultaneously - The ocean, creativity, fire, and human love to name a few." - Jonathan Carroll
"If an egg is broken by an outside force, life ends. If broken by an inside force, life begins. Great things always begin from the inside."Jim Kwik
"Don"t make friends who are comfortable to be with. Make friends who will force you to lever yourself up."  Thomas J. Watson
"Only I can change my life. No one can do it for me."
"Don"t make friends who are comfortable to be with. Make friends who will force you to lever yourself up."  Thomas J. Watson
"If an egg is broken by an outside force, life ends. If broken by an inside force, life begins. Great things always begin from the inside."Jim Kwik
"It's not about being the best, It's about being better than you were yesterday"
"The only thing that's gonna stop evil is good men that are skilled at violence." - Tim Kennedy
"Character is what you have left when you've lost everything you can lose."  Evan Esar
"This is like deja vu all over again."  Yogi Berra
"Of those who say nothing, few are silent."  Thomas Neill
"Before I met my husband, I'd never fallen in love, though I'd stepped in it a few times."  Rita Rudner
"If an egg is broken by an outside force, life ends. If broken by an inside force, life begins. Great things always begin from the inside." Jim Kwik
"Help others and the Almighty will help you. Remember, He"s the Owner of everything. Whatever you have, comes from Him. As much as He gives, He can also take away in the blink of an eye. So be wary how you treat people. He"s aware and knows if you"re mean and stingy to others." - Mufti Menk
"Courage is like a muscle. We strengthen it by use." Ruth Gordon
"Only trust someone who can see these three things in you: the sorrow behind your smile, the love behind your anger, and the reason behind your silence."-Anonymous
"Not everyone can be trusted. I think we all have to be very selective about the people we trust."  Shelley Long
"When you lose heart, you lose everything." - Meryl Streep
"I cannot remember the books I've read any more than the meals I have eaten; even so, they have made me." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"To be free is to have achieved your life."  Tennessee Williams
"Sometimes you don"t know who you can and cannot trust. I still learn that over and over again."  Demi Lovato
"Whoever is careless with the truth in small matters cannot be trusted with important matters."  Albert Einstein
"No matter your circumstances, you will end up losing everything you love, you will end up aging, you will end up ill and the problem is that we need to figure out how to make that all be alright." Jane Hirshfield
"Maybe love stays, maybe love can't, maybe love shouldn't. Love arrives exactly when love is supposed to and love leaves exactly when love must. When love arrives say, 'welcome, make yourself comfortable.' If love leaves, whisper 'thank you for stopping by'"-sarah kay and phil kaye
"If I have seen further than any, it is by standing upon the shoulders of others." - Isaac Newton
"If there are no Snowdens, if there are no Mannings, if there are no Assanges, there will be no free press." Chris Hedges --- Sad Reality in The New Corporate States of America
"If I have seen farther than any before, it is by standing upon the shoulder of giants" - Isaac Newton
"Life is about challenges and how we face up to them and the attitude we take into everyday life so hopefully we'll be able to motivate people to do more with their life." - Martina Navaratilova
"The righteous may find it prudent to curtail their chess moves, but evil must relegate itself to god's hiccups." - Bertrand Tussle
"The idea of comedy, really, is not everybody should be laughing. It should be about 50 people laughing, and 50 people horrified." - Patrice O'Neal
"You don't have a soul. You are a soul. You have a body." C.S. Lewis
"Always predict the worst and you'll be hailed as a Prophet" - Tom Lehrer
"We knew the world would not be the same. A few people laughed, a few people cried. Most people were silent. I remembered the line from the Hindu scripture, Bhagavad Gita... 'Now I am become Death, the destroyer of worlds.' I suppose we all thought that, one way or another." - J. Robert Oppenheimer
"We knew the world would not be the same. A few people laughed, a few people cried. Most people were silent. I remembered the line from the Hindu scripture, Bhagavad Gita,,, 'Now I am become Death, the destroyer of worlds.' I suppose we all thought that, one way or another." - J. Robert Oppenheimer
"If the (vietnam) War had any glory for an infantryman it was this: even the lowest white trash and black boys, young men who had nothing, were higher than the Vietnamese. For the first time in their lives these boys had America on their side..." - Oliver Stone, Director of Platoon
"The universe is under no obligation to make sense to you." - NDT
"The first thing is to be humble with your creativity and graceful with your success." ----- (Quincy Jones - Netflix Documentary "Quincy" at the 4:32 minute mark)
"The cave you fear to enter holds the treasure you seek." (-Joseph Campbell)
"We're all going to die, all of us, what a circus! That alone should make us love each other but it doesn't. We are terrorized and flattened by trivialities, we are eaten up by nothing." -Charles Bukowski
"The heaviest burden that one has to bear in this life is the burden of sin." - Harold B. Lee
"There is no excellent beauty that hath not some strangeness in the proportion."  Sir Francis Bacon
"Both the cockroach and the bird would get along very well without us, although the cockroach would miss us most."  Joseph Wood Krutch
"An author is a fool who, not content with boring those he lives with, insists on boring future generations."  Charles de Montesquieu
"I loathe people who keep dogs. They are cowards who haven't got the guts to bite people themselves."  August Strindberg
"The art of life lies in a constant readjustment to our surroundings." - Kakuz Okakura
"Life is short, time is fast, no replay, no rewind, so enjoy every moment as it comes."
"The sun never sets. It is only an appearance due to the observer's limited perspective. And yet, what a sublime illusion it is." Eckhart Tolle
"Never run from or be afraid of your past, its purpose was to make you who you are. Now it is time for you to rise and use the new lessons you have learned to transform yourself, and by extension, the world." Alan Watts
"They're only truly great who are truly good."  George Chapman
"So I forced my hands in my pockets and felt with me thumbs, and gallantly handed her my very last piece of gum." Bob Dylan
"I will mouthfuck your potato chip bag" - Chase East
"Humanity's cynicism has been around much longer than the Government's ability to covertly record it and use it against you."
"Evil, I think, is the absence of empathy" - Captain G. M. Gilbert, the Army psychologist assigned to watching the defendants at the Nuremberg trials
"Democracy throughout most of the history of the West was an anomaly." Chris Hedges, 2018, from America: The Farewell Tour (quote continues)
"You attract the right things when you have a sense of who you are." - Amy Poehler
"Evil people always support each other; that is their chief strength." Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"Whenever enyone has offended me, I try to raise my soul so high that the offense cannot reach it." - Ren Descartes
"If a victory is told in detail, one can no longer distinguish it from a defeat" - Jean-Paul Sartre
"We have learned from the media that having a Native American great-great-great-great-great-grandparent makes you Native American, but that having two X chromosomes does not make you a woman" - Ben Shapiro
"Motivation is a fire from within. If someone else tries to light that fire under you, chances are it will burn very briefly."  Stephen R. Covey
"Yesterday was history, tomorrow is a mystery, and today is a gift, thats why its called the present. " - the turtle master (dont remember his name)
"One small positive thought in the morning can change your whole day."
"All we know is that we don"t know"  Noel Gallagher
"Fantasy abandoned by reason produces impossible monsters." - Francisco Goya
"Nothing inspires forgiveness quite like revenge."  Scott Adams
"Humor is by far the most significant activity of the human brain."  Edward De Bono
"Procrastination is the art of keeping up with yesterday."  Don Marquis
"Don't go around saying the world owes you a living. The world owes you nothing. It was here first."  Mark Twain
"Trapped in a world with no walls I became a prisoner to unknown laws. My weakness became my strength when the challenge was long gone. While pondering on how to equal time and opportunities, I realized that the enemy of progress is not time but man himself" A-Snortch
"God asks no man whether he will accept life. That is not the choice. You must take it. The only question is how." -HW Beecher
"I don"t like to lie because then I don"t remember the truth."
"The grand essentials to happiness in this life are something to do, something to love, and something to hope for." -George W Burnap
"Deception is one of the quickest ways to gain little things and lose big things." - Thomas Sowell
"Marriage has no guarantees. If that's what you're looking for, go live with a car battery."  Erma Bombeck
"Don't make excuses, make improvements." - Tyra Banks
"With renunciation life begins."  Amelia Barr
"Every theory about existence or evolution that has humans as the central point is doomed to fail, because there is only nature and humans are merely a part of it" - Unknown
"Sleep doesn"t help if it"s your that"s tired. Unknown
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment" -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Time you enjoyed wasting, was not wasted" -John Lennon
"Marry a man your own age; as your beauty fades, so will his eyesight."  Phyllis Diller
"My brother is gay and my parents don"t care, as long as he marries a doctor."  Elayne Boosler
"Marriage is really tough because you have to deal with feelings and lawyers."  Richard Pryor
"Nothing will bring you peace, you must bring yourself to it." - Gant Laborde
"Keep moving forward. One step at a time." - Unknown
"A lie can travel half way around the world while the truth is putting on its shoes."  Mark Twain
"Those are my principles. If you don't like them I have others." --Groucho Marx
"From the deepest desires often come the deadliest hate." - Socrates
"Out of every one hundred men, ten shouldn't even be there, eighty are just targets, nine are the real fighters, and we are lucky to have them, for they make the battle. Ah, but the one, one is a warrior, and he will bring the others back." - Heraclitus
"Some people never go crazy, what truly horrible lives they must live." - Charles Bukowski
"Whatever you can do, or dream you can, begin it. Boldness has genius, magic, and power in it. Begin it now." -Steven Pressfield
"All we know is that we don"t know"
"Chronic remorse, as all the moralists are agreed, is a most undesirable sentiment." -Aldous Huxley, Brave New World
"And amidst all that darkness, a very ugly and visible darkness, oddly enough, a few sparse voices could be heard coalescing and amplifying. They said 'oh hell naw nigga I can't fuck with that shit'." - Scary Pratchett
"Every great cause begins as a movement, becomes a business, and eventually degenerates into a racket." -- Eric Hoffer (1902-1983)
"Don't get married. Just find a woman you can't get along with and buy her a house. It's cheaper".
"Panic is a form of hubris. It comes from the feeling that one knows exactly where the world is heading. Bewilderment is more humble and therefore clear-sighted." [Yuval Noah Harari, 21 Lessons for the 21st Century.]
"The stars will never align &amp; the traffic lights of life will never all be green at the same time. The universe doesn"t conspire against you, but it doesn"t go out of its way to line up the pins either. "Someday" is a disease that will take your dreams to the grave with you."  Tim Ferriss
"Shackles of egoism is a distinct and voluntary state of confinement that changes place of eyes with mind and dictates to your soul by breaking wings of your goodness!" - Meo
"Love is the answer, but while you're waiting for the answer, sex raises some pretty good questions."  Woody Allen
"I don"t think of all the misery but of the beauty that still remains" Anne Frank
"Close some doors. Not because of pride, incapacity or arrogance, but simply because they no longer lead somewhere." - Paulo Coelho
" I like to be alone but i hate being lonely"
"To get what you want, you have to deserve what you want. The world is not yet a crazy enough place to reward a whole bunch of undeserving people. - Charles T. Munger
"Computers will understand sarcasm before Americans do." - Geoffrey Hinton
"The main things which seem to me important on their own account, and not merely as means to other things, are knowledge, art, instinctive happiness, and relations of friendship or affection."  Bertrand Russell
"What a blessing it would be if we could open and shut our ears as easily as we open and shut our eyes!"  Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
"Two paradoxes are better than one; they may even suggest a solution."  Edward Teller
"Those who welcome death have only tried it from the ears up."  Wilson Mizner
"Before you marry a person, you should first make them use a computer with slow Internet service to see who they really are."  Will Ferrell
"Not how long, but how well you have lived is the main thing." Seneca
"I love those who can smile in trouble." Leonardo da Vinci
"If you organize your life around your passion, you can turn your passion into your story and then turn your story into something bigger-something that matters." -Blake Mycoskie
"The absence of alternatives clears the mind marvelously."  Henry Kissinger
"He who has a why to live for can bear almost any how." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"No matter where you go, there"s a five-hundred-pound load of shit waiting for you. And that"s perfectly fine. The point isn"t to get away from the shit. The point is to find the shit you enjoy dealing with."  Mark Mason
"Love is a trap. When it appears, we see only its light, not its shadows." -Paulo Coelho
"Rights aren"t "Rights" when someone can take them away  they"re privileges. That"s all we"ve ever had in this country: a Bill of temporary privileges. And if you read the news, even badly, you know that the list gets shorter and shorter." George Carlin
"Beware the irrational, however seductive. Shun the 'transcendent' and all who invite you to subordinate or annihilate yourself. Distrust compassion; prefer dignity for yourself and others. Don't be afraid to be thought arrogant or selfish. Picture all experts as if they were mammals...
"Perhaps the best conversationalist in the world is the man who helps others to talk."  John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"If you don"t know yourself, if you don"t control yourself, if you don"t have mastery over yourself, it"s very hard to like yourself." - Stephen Covey
"Talking nonsense is the sole privilege mankind possesses over the other organisms. It's by talking nonsense that one gets to the truth! I talk nonsense, therefore I'm human" -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Acquire worldly wisdom and adjust your behavior accordingly. If your new behavior gives you a little temporary unpopularity with your peer group..then to hell with them"-Charlie Munger
"It was only after I crossed an ocean for her that I realized she wouldn't touch a puddle for me" - Saul Mathers
"Happiness is not the absence of problems, it's the ability to deal with them." - Steve Maraboli, Life, the Truth, and Being Free
"Human beings of all societies in all periods of history believe that their ideas on the nature of the real world are the most secure, and that their ideas on religion, ethics and justice are the most enlightened. Like us, they think that final knowledge is at last within reach. (cont.)
"Society is like a stew. If you don't stir it up every once in a while then a layer of scum floats to the top." -Edward Abbey
"Dreams of earthquakes. Dreams of hurricanes. Dreams of pouring rain. Dreams of tidal waves... to wash us all away. Dreams of guns blaze. Dreams of fire rage. Dreams of swollen graves. Dreams of hollow pain. All gone..."
"May you live in interesting times" - An old Chinese curse
"Have I not destroyed my enemy when I have made him into my friend?"  Abraham Lincoln
"Every card deck has a wild card. Using it well, by making good choices, is the key to success."
"In a closed society where everybody"s guilty, the only crime is getting caught. In a world of thieves, the only final sin is stupidity".  Hunter S. Thompson
"I'm the hand up Mona Lisa's skirt. I'm a surprise" - Al Pacino, 'Devils Advocate'.
"Don"t let schooling interfere with your education".  Mark Twain
"Give a man a gun and he can rob a bank, give a man a bank and he can rob the world"
"I fear not the man who has practiced 10,000 kicks, but i do fear the man who has practiced one kick 10,000 times".  Bruce Lee
"If you gaze long into the Abyss, the Abyss with gaze long into you."- Friedrich Nietzsche
"The fact of us appearing on the map of life,doesn't take away the right to create our own world and to do it differently" (William Ventura)
"I believe in God, but people are liars. It's those who say they are appointed by God who I don't believe in."-Isaac Bashevis Singer
"The thought of suicide is a great consolation: by means of it one gets through many a dark night." - Nietzsche
"Half of the modern drugs could well be thrown out of the window, except that the birds might eat them."  Dr. Martin Henry Fischer
"If you believe everything you read, better not read."  Japanese Proverb
"My fellow Americans, I am pleased to tell you I just signed legislation which outlaws Russia forever. The bombing begins in five minutes."  Ronald Reagan
"Don"t live your life through what ifs, live it with I knows."  Marco Zuniga
"You are entitled to your own opinion, but you are not entitled to your own facts."  Daniel Patrick Moynihan
"Eventually things get tragic enough to circle back to comedy." - Wish I Was Here[2014 film]
"The only time anything makes sense is when you're happy. Otherwise everything is a jumbled mess."
"The actions of men are the best interpreters of their thoughts."  James Joyce
"I don't believe people are looking for the meaning of life as much as they are looking for the experience of being alive." Joseph Campbell
"Life lived for tomorrow will always be just a day away from being realized." - Leo Buscaglia
"Throughout his life a man must guard himself against himself. He must guard himself against his lust while young, against his pride during his peak years, and against his obstinence in old age." - Chinese proverb, attributed to Confucius
"Fatty bacon is the best bacon." -my wife just now
"AUTUMN AND OTHER SEASONS" - Meo (quote in comment)
"The more corrupt the state, the more numerous the laws." - Tacitus
"Even the most vicious criminal in the world has loved somebody or some thing." - John Paul Larkin AKA Scatman John
"A life without purpose is like a soccer match in the absence of goal posts" A-Snortch
"Why machines are inferior to humans is simple. It is infinitely more blissful to witness a creature so prone to making mistakes, achieving perfection" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Space we can recover, lost time never." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Europe is threatened by a new Buddhism; at one in belief of 'morality' in mutual sympathy, as though it were morality itself, the one hope of the future, consolation at present, a discharge of past obligations; in the belief of the community as the saviour, in the herd, in 'themselves'" - Nietzsche
"Technological progress is like an axe in the hands of a pathological criminal."- Albert Einstein
"Silence, I discover, is something you can actually hear."  Haruki Murakami, Kafka on the Shore
"The most powerful tool of a leader is deception. Appear weak when you are strong, and strong when you are weak. Convince the enemy your armies are near when they are far, and far when they are near. In this way the enemy is deceived into maneuvering for their own defeat." - Sun Tzu, Art of War
"Forget all the bullshit and drama and live your life with sexy smile ;) " - Someone in the Earth
"I never cared about the material things someone could give me. I care about their time, attention, honesty, loyalty, and effort. Those gifts mean more to me than anything money can buy."  Unknown
"It has been calculated that a temperature rise corresponding to a 10 per cent increase in carbon dioxide will be sufficient to melt the icecap and submerge New York." Edward teller in 1959 - please see full quote below
"Knowing a person physically doesn't give you the knowledge to know what is under his/her skin" (William Ventura)
"Art washes away from the soul the dust of everyday life." - Pablo Picasso
"Knowing a person physically,doesn't give you the knowledge to know what is behind her/his skin" (William Ventura)
"He who opens a school, closes a prison" - Victor Hugo
"Let me respectfully remind you: Life and Death are of supreme importance. Time swiftly passes by and opportunity is lost. On this night, the days of our life are decreased by one. Each of us should strive to awaken. Awaken! Take heed! Do not squander your life." Evening Gatha
"In a real dark night of the soul it is always three o'clock in the morning, day after day."  F. Scott Fitzgerald
"She was a woman who, between courses, could be graceful with her elbows on the table."  Henry James
"When I was born I was so surprised I didn't talk for a year and a half."  Gracie Allen
"I'm an idealist. I don't know where I'm going, but I'm on my way."  Carl Sandburg
"Continuous improvement is better than delayed perfection."
"Change before you have to."  Jack Welch
"When your candle burns low, you've got to believe it shows you something besides the progress of darkness." (---: Tennessee Williams)
"Dead people receive more flowers than the living ones because regret is stronger than gratitude." - Anne Frank.
"I like the night. Without the dark, we'd never see the stars."- Stephenie Meyer
"Youth is happy because it has the ability to see beauty. Anyone who keeps the ability to see beauty never grows old." Franz Kafka
"There's so much bullshit in the world today. People just talking, talking, talking, talking, and it doesn't mean anything. Strategy is getting results. I call it the bridge between an idea and a result. And if you're not strategic, you never get the result you want."  Robert Greene
"I promise I shall never give up, and that I"ll die yelling and laughing" - Jack Kerouac
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift of God, which is why we call it the present." - Bill Keane
"A problem is an unique and unfamiliar way of representing a solution to it"
"It is often said that men are ruled by their imaginations; but it would be truer to say they are governed by the weakness of their imaginations." - Walter Bagehot
"He who has many friends has no friends" - Aristotle
"What I once thought was oppressing me I now find to be wiggling." - Bluntston Churchkill
"I predict future happiness for Americans if they can prevent the government from wasting the labors of the people under the pretense of taking care of them."-- Thomas Jefferson
"To live in this world, you must be able to do three things: to love what is mortal; to hold it against your bones knowing your own life depends on it; and, when the time comes to let it go, to let it go." - Mary Oliver
"Take responsibility of your own happiness, never put it in other people"s hands." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"If by eternity is understood not endless temporal duration but timelessness, then he lives eternally who lives in the present." -Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Wear a smile and have friends; wear a scowl and have wrinkles. " - George Eliot
"Ask for no guarantees, ask for no security, there never was such an animal. And if there were, it would be related to the great sloth which hangs upside down in a tree all day every day, sleeping it's life away." - Ray Bradbury
"If only it was as simple as evil people committing evil deeds, and only having to separate them from the rest of us and destroy them. But the line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart?"  Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"Nowadays people know the price of everything and the value of nothing." - Oscar Wilde
"If you take things personally in life, you become a fool. Because what you've done is you've taken all the hurts and you've made them the justified reason why you have to be an asshole to somebody."  Nick Yarris, spent twenty-two years on death row after being wrongfully convicted of murder
"The state calls its own violence law, but that of the individual, crime." - Max Stirner
"Every man gives his life for what he believes. Every woman gives her life for what she believes. Sometimes people believe in little or nothing, and so they give their lives to little or nothing."
"Death is our friend precisely because it brings us into absolute and passionate presence with all that is here, that is natural, that is love." Rainer Maria Rilke
"Goodness, contrary to what is supposed, is not a default doctrine in human mind. While there are greed, life objectives and selfishness, goodness can only be result of a written education." - Meo
"You were like the ocean, you came in waves but you never stayed." - Anonymous
"Kids are like buckets of disease that live in your house."  Louis C. K.
"An optimist stays up to see the New Year in. A pessimist waits to make sure the old one leaves."  Bill Vaughan
"A door is what a dog is perpetually on the wrong side of."  Ogden Nash
"If I have seen further it is by standing on the shoulders of giants."  Isaac Newton
"A lie can travel halfway around the world while the truth is still putting on its shoes"
"While some have expressed momentous reservations about this edifice of claptrap known as civilization, this colossally garish spectacle of bad taste, we do not often pass up an opportunity to commend ourselves for erecting it." - Ligotti
"Music,... mythology, faces belabored by time, certain twilights and certain places try to tell us something, or have said something we should not have missed, or are about to say something; this imminence of a revelation which does not occur is, perhaps, the aesthetic phenomenon" - Borges
"Think of yourself as dead. You have lived your life. Now, take what's left and live it properly." Marcus Aurelius
"By giving people the power to share, we're making the world more transparent." - Mark Zuckerberg
"The war is not over, Millions are being killed. Europe is mad. The world is mad." -Ernest Shackleton"s South!, 1916
"The finest steel has to go through the hottest fire."  Richard M. Nixon
"Without Dreams We reach nothing. Without Love We feel nothing. Without God We are nothing."
"Its the heart that cries, tears are there just to show it"-Allan Snortch
"Do not ask God to guide your footsteps if you're not willing to move your feet."
"Good, better, best. Never let it rest. 'Til your good is better and your better is best."
"The only laudable thing anime has contributed to society, is hentai." - GentleJesus6
"The world isn't dying. It's being killed. And the people who are killing it have names and addresses" - Sam Hyde
"Yes...No...Maybe....I don"t know....CAN YOU REPEAT THE QUESTION?" - Malcolm in the Middle.
"I didn't arrive with pants, and I will not leave with pants!"
"How does that medicine taste? Your own flavor?" -Andy Bernard
"One of the saddest lessons of history is this: If we"ve been bamboozled long enough, we tend to reject any evidence of the bamboozle.We"re no longer interested in finding out the truth.. It"s simply too painful to acknowledge.. Once you give a charlatan power over you, you almost never get it back"
"You can always find a joke wherever you are. That's the key to life I think". - Rosanne Barr
"Cosmology can be a mind-bending and perspective-shattering journey. Often one will begin as a human experiencing the infinite cosmos, but will finish their journey with a subtle feeling that they were, instead, the infinite cosmos experiencing a human."
"Though my soul may set in darkness, it will rise in perfect light; I have loved the stars too fondly to be fearful of the night." - Sarah Williams
"The secret of change is to focus all of your energy, not on fighting the old, but on building the new."
"It was like observing a Martian, or a particularly warty toad. Her thoughts were not my thoughts, nor her feelings my feelings, but we were close enough so that her thoughts and feelings seemed a wry, black image of my own." - Sylvia Plath
"Often when you think you"re at the end of something, you"re at the beginning of something else." -- Fred Rogers
"If you marry the spirit of your generation, you will be a widow in the next." -- William Inge
"You can sway a thousand men by appealing to their prejudices quicker than you can convince one man by logic." - Robert A. Heinlein
"Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn"t go away." Philip K. Dick
"When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us." - Helen Keller
"The nitrogen in our DNA, the calcium in our teeth, the iron in our blood, the carbon in our apple pies were made in the interiors of collapsing stars. We are made of star stuff."  Carl Sagan
"As adults, we try to develop the character traits that would have rescued our parents."  Alain de Botton
"Every person I meet is my superior in some way. In that, I learn from them."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
20 Short Love Quotes: "Love, is the most delicate breeze between lie and truth." -Meo (rest of quotes in comments)
"What cannot be changed can be transcended."
"You look confident when you act confident enough to encourage confidence in others."  unknown
"You can"t keep doing shitty things &amp; then feel bad about yourself like that makes it okay -- You need to be better." Todd, Bojack Horseman
"Calling me a thief is an understatement, madame! Call me instead a 'King in training' or, if that offends you, 'the most honest kind of merchant'." Boniface, protagonist of 'The Thief Lord' by Cornelia Funke
"To educate a person in the mind but not in morals is to educate a menace to society." - Theodore Roosevelt
"I cannot be a traitor, for I owe him no allegiance. [...] To the other points whereof I am accussed, I freely confess them all." - William Wallace
"Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much." - Oscar Wilde
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"A man sooner or later discovers that he is the master-gardener of his soul, the director of his own life" - James Allen
"A man who is master of himself can end a sorrow as easily as he can invent a pleasure. I don't want to be at the mercy of my emotions. I want to use them, to enjoy them, and to dominate them" -Oscar Wilde
"Looking at a cleavage is like looking at the sun. You don't stare at it. It's too risky. You get a sense of it and then you look away." - Jerry Seinfeld
"The greatest portion of peace of mind is doing nothing wrong. Those who lack self-control live disoriented and disturbed lives." - Seneca
"Remember, if the Almighty wants good for someone, He will create situations to draw him closer to his Maker. This can be in the form of poverty, heartbreak, repentance, desperate needfulness &amp; whatever else through various means. Understand His Plan &amp; act accordingly! " - Mufti Menk
"Normal is getting dressed in clothes that you buy for work and driving through traffic in a car that you are still paying for - in order to get to the job you need to pay for the clothes and the car, and the house you leave vacant all day so you can afford to live in it."  Ellen Goodman
"In every American there is an air of incorrigible innocence, which seems to conceal a diabolical cunning."  A. E. Housman
"I've wrestled with reality for 35 years, Doctor, and I'm happy to state I finally won out over it."  Mary Chase
"Grown-ups never understand anything for themselves, and it is tiresome for children to be always and forever explaining things to them."  Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty."
"A society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in." -Greek Proverb
"We have art in order not to die from the truth." --- Nietzsche
"We have art lest we perish from the truth." --- Nietzsche.
"To err is human; to forgive, divine."  Alexander Pope
"Permanence, perseverance and persistence in spite of all obstacles, discouragements, and impossibilities: It is this, that in all things distinguishes the strong soul from the weak." - Thomas Carlyle
"The needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few... or the one." -Spock
"If the national government does not make you afraid to exercise your most basic of civil liberties and personal freedoms, then your neighbors will do it for them." -- Anonymous
"Prior to capitalism, the way people amassed great wealth was by looting, plundering and enslaving their fellow man. Capitalism made it possible to become wealthy by serving your fellow man."-Walter E Williams
"Civilization is what old men manage to salvage from the onslaught of young idealists." - Nicols Gmez Dvila
"Death dances silently in everyone's shadow, and she doesn't give a damn. So why give a damn about her?" --Klaus Mikaelson (The Originals)
"Who would ever want to be King?"-Coldplay, viva la vida
" Jeez Kavanaugh you should of just grabbed her by the pussy" - President Donald Trump
"Cancer is a word, not a sentence" -John Diamon
"If you stand for nothing, you will fall for anything" - Rou Reynolds
"There are two types of people: those who are capable of showing empathy but choose not to, those who hide their emotions so others won't empathize with them and psychopaths."
"There are two kinds of peopl: those who are capable of feeling empathy but don't, those who are hiding their emotions so other won't empathize with them and psychopaths."- u/PIGEXPERT
"I know not all that may be coming, but be it what it will, I'll go to it laughing." -Herman Melville from Moby Dick
"All of us could take a lesson from the weather. It pays no attention to criticism."
"If names cannot be correct, then language is not in accordance with the truth of things; and if language is not in accordance with the truth of things, affairs cannot be carried on to success." -- Confucius
"...it's much easier to be compassionate when you have no power. When you have power, no matter what you do, someone gets hurt." L. E. MODESITT, JR.
"Be who you are now. Be disappointing and cold and solitary if that"s who you are. It"s not a moral failure to be less than perfect, less than warm, less than social". -Heather Havrilesky
"Doth some one say that there be gods above? There are not; no, there are not. Let no fool, Led by the old false fable, thus deceive you." -Euripides
"I wish I didn't know now what I didn't know then" -Bob Seger
"If you"ve been blessed with more, give; extend a helping hand. Avoid lending. If you do lend, don't expect it back. That"s the way of the world now. If it comes back, it's a bonus. If it doesn't, you expected it. Remember, your reward"s with the Almighty, the Owner of Sustenance. " - Mufti Menk
"Arguing with an idiot only proves there's two idiots".
"All of this has happened before, and it will all happen again." - J.M. Barrie
"It might be small to you but will make a huge difference in someone's life, just act" A-Snortch
"Men must live and create. Live to the point of tears." - Albert Camus
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"In women, courage is often mistaken for insanity."
"This life is a strange theater stage, in which people indicating that they become better as much as they love tend to become get ugly as much as they are loved. Neither the author nor the player are apparent, we just play our part in a mess." - Meo
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile but is morally treasonable to the American public." - Theodore Roosevelt
"If you get up in the morning and think the future is going to be better, it is a bright day. Otherwise, it's not." - Elon Musk
"The person who writes for fools is always sure of a large audience." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"You just keep pushing. You just keep pushing. I made every mistakes that could be made. But, I just keep pushing." - Rene Descartes
'Be careful when you cast out your demons that you don't throw away the best of yourself.'  Friedrich Nietzsche
"A journey is best measured in friends, not miles" - Tim Cahill
"The fascists in the future will not have the Hitler or the Mussolini stereotypes. They won't act like dictators. They will speak everything the majority wants to hear about family, good customs, religion and ethics. This will be the new evil, and few will notice history repeating itself" - Unknown
"Every day of our lives, we are on the verge of making those slight changes that would make all the difference." - Mignon McLaughlin
"Be like the sun for grace and mercy. Be like the night to cover others' faults. Be like running water for generosity. Be like death for rage and anger. Be like the Earth for modesty. Appear as you are. Be as you appear." -Rumi
"The great god Ra whose shrine once covered acres / Is filler now for crossword-puzzle makers."  Keith Preston
"Usually, terrible things that are done with the excuse that progress requires them are not really progress at all, but just terrible things."  Russell Baker
"The wages of sin are unreported."  Unknown
"The secret of staying young is to live honestly, eat slowly, and lie about your age."  Lucille Ball
"I start. I fail. I start again. I say this time I succeed. I fail again. I start again. I say this try is the one. I fail again. I try again and again until it actually becomes the one time I succeed." - Saif Al-Mukhtar
"Can I truly love the art, when I kinda hate the artist?" - AJR
"And Max, the King of all wild things, was lonely and wanted to be where someone loved him best of all" - Maurice Sendak
"The only ones who tell you you can't do something are the ones that have failed" - Paul Stanley
"I NEVER DREAMED ABOUT SUCCESS I WORKED FOR IT."
"We all make choices, but in the end our choices make... us."
"To give without any reward, or any notice, has a special quality of its own."  Anne Morrow Lindbergh
"All the darkness in the world cannot extinguish the light of a single candle." - St. Francis Of Assisi
"It is said that history becomes legend as its events recede into the mists of time and that memories are faintest in the slumber of peace. Thus, the noble peoples of Urak grew forgetful of the dark time their land once knew; heedless of the ancient enemy who yet labored in silence...."
"What good is money or even life without love?"
"Know your enemy and know yourself and you need not fear the results of any battle." - Sun Tzu, Art of War
"They say your life is always worth living, but at what cost?"
"The mass of men lead lives of quiet desperation." - Henry David Thoreau
"Everyone knows they re going to die,' he said again, 'but nobody believes it. If we did, we would do things differently." - Mitch Albom
"He made me see what Life is, and what Death signifies, and why Love is stronger than both." From Oscar Wilde's The Canterville Ghost What are your favorite LOVE quotes? We've got a few more thoughts in the comments.
"In the seventeenth chapterof St. Luke, it's written "the kingdom of God is within man", not one man nor a group but in all men!" -Charlie Chaplin in A message for all of humanity
"Im doing a scene in this graveyard, where the transition from night to day is happening. The sun is on one side, and the moon is on the other. I'm at the crossroads. This is the path I need to be on." -Eddie George.
"Rome wasn't built in a day, but it sure burned in one"
"The line of Good and Evil passes through the heart of every human and who would ever want to destroy a piece of his own Heart."- Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"The mind of the subject will desperately struggle to create memories where none exist...", Barriers to Trans-Dimensional Travel -R. Lutece, 1889
"There's always money in the banana stand." - George Bluth Sr.
20 Best Quotes For Loved Once
"People who say they sleep like a baby usually don't have one."  Leo J. Burke
"It doesn't make a difference what temperature a room is, it's always room temperature."  Steven Wright
"Democracy is the recurrent suspicion that more than half of the people are right more than half the time."  E. B. White
"The key to wisdom is knowing all the right questions."  John Simone
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks others have thrown at him."
"Charity brings to life again those who are spiritually dead." - Thomas Aquinas
"Don"t always compare yourself against the best you could be doing. Compare yourself against the worst you could be doing." Justin Kan
"I have come to believe that this is a mighty continent which was hitherto unknown."  Christopher Columbus
"You all have a little bit of 'I want to save the world' in you, that's why you're here, in college. I want you to know that it's okay if you only save one person, and it's okay if that person is you." - Anthropology Professor Unknown
"Knowledge is knowing a tomato is a fruit; wisdom is not putting it in a fruit salad." - Miles Kington
"It's not your responsibility to babysit people's insecurities. You are not obligated to slow down your bloom so they can meet you at a level they are comfortable with. Your growth is too important to dim the light within you for someone who's still trying to find their own." - Anonymous
"It is a mark of maturity when someone hurts you, and you try to understand them."
"Hey look! I get to create whatever persona I want to, and it"s all up to me. And the truth is, we are all basically the universepretending to be humans for a brief moment of time." RuPaul
"You can accomplish anything in life that you"re willing to work for"-Drew Brees
"Are we going to use lies to attack an enemy who lies? Aren't facts powerful enough?" -Hou Dejian
"Can't conquer what you can't control" - Andy Herrera
"What better way to get introduced to Democracy than being shot dead from a 20 million dollar helicopter by a prince..." - Frankie Boyle on Prince Harry's military tour in Afghanistan
"It is difficult to distinguish politics from entertainment, and dangerous to try." --Justice Antonin Scalia, 2011
"Birds of a feather flock together... until a cat comes"
"The Trumpsters and the hucksters and the consultants and the hangers-on are like a colony of bees that exist only to sting and die ...
"There's a lot of beauty in ordinary things. Isn't that kind of the point?" - Pam Beasley
"Nothing lasts... but nothing is lost" - Terence McKenna
"Nazis. I hate these guys"-Indiana Jones
"I loved you head over handles like my first bicycle accident  before the mouthful of gravel and blood, I swore we were flying." -Sierra Demulder
"You don"t always need to use the breaks, sometimes you just need to stop stepping on the gas."
"A wise girl knows her limits, a smart girl knows that she has none." -- Marilyn Monroe 1953
"It is better to die on your feet than to live on your knees" - Emiliano Zapata
"Absurdity of life begins with humans' effort to give it meaning." -Meo
"I fall in love with everything I also hate everything. It"s very hard to be a misanthrope and a romantic." -Marilyn Manson
"Democracy is an statistic error, because in democracy who decides is the majority, and the majority is formed by idiots" - Jorge Luis Borges
"Nought but two things are white: Innocence and arsenic" - Carl Love Almqvist
"He made me see what Life is, and what Death signifies, and why Love is stronger than both." Oscar Wilde in The Canterville Ghost @writtorg
"To belittle, you have to be little." - Kahlil Gibran
'Men wear suits to dignify their disgusting bodies. Men wear religion to dignify their disgusting minds." - Valerie Solanas, radical feminist author
"Men are more ready to repay an injury than a benefit, because gratitude is a burden and revenge a pleasure" - Tacitus
"The desire of knowledge, like the thirst of riches, increases ever with the acquisition of it." - Laurence Sterne
"Never respond to an angry person with a fiery comeback, even if he deserves it... Don't allow his anger to become your anger." - Bohdi Sanders
"Objectivity is just a combination of a broader sense of multiple subjectivities." -Meo
"So avoid using the word 'very' because it's lazy. A man is not very tired, he is exhausted. Don't use very sad, use morose. Language was invented for one reason, boys - to woo women - and, in that endeavor, laziness will not do."  Robin Williams, Dead Poet Society
"At the present rate of progress, it is almost impossible to imagine any technical feat that cannot be achieved - if it can be achieved at all - within the next few hundred years."  Arthur C. Clarke
"The higher the buildings, the lower the morals."  Noel Coward
"The mind of a bigot is like the pupil of the eye. The more light you shine on it, the more it will contract."  Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr.
"Though I am not naturally honest, I am so sometimes by chance."  William Shakespeare
"The only wealth which you will keep forever is the wealth you have given away" - Marcus Aurelius
"As in the form of producing and using all weapons and bullets around the world, ideas are weapons, pens are bullets." -Meo
"Once we die, we"ll only be a statistic. It won"t matter what we were called." -Zero Two
"Resolve is measured in results" - unknown
"Resolve is mesured in results" - unknown
"Zeal will do more than knowledge."  William Hazlitt
"It's all just a phase, life moves on. Live in the moment while it exists, and drive your life towards the road that leads to the place YOU want to go to." -My strange brain, 2018
"Two possibilities exist: Either we are alone in the universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying."
"A painter should begin every canvas with a wash of black, because all things in nature are dark except where exposed by the light." - Leonardo da Vinci
"There are things I need of you."
"When education is not liberating, the dream of the oppressed is to become the oppressor" - Paulo Freire
"Is it possible that blondes also prefer gentlemen." - Mamie Van Doren
"The philosopher is one who stomps his feet until there's dust in the air and says, 'Hey! I can't see!'" - My mom's Economics teacher
"Just because I can quack, doesn't mean I'm a duck" - me
"Yes, our life is a misery, an endless misery! Why do we exist? Send me the news. Rimbaud
"Everyone thinks himself consisting of his own idiosyncrasies specified by others' idiosyncratic characteristic of identifying others as they wish. So we all consist of others'." - Meo
"We are never late in life guys, only some people are perfectly egoist in reflecting the remorse of their rush in life like success, that's it." - Meo
"I can't imagine living like Mother, Mrs. van Daan and all the women who go about their work and are then forgotten. I need to have something besides a husband and children to devote myself to!" -Anne Frank
"If it is swordsmen who hold real power then why do they follow kings, priests, and gold? Power is an illusion, a shadow on the wall, it resides where men believe it resides..." Varys, A Song of Ice &amp; Fire
"When you pray for rain, you gotta deal with the mud too" - Denzel Washington
"If I"d have known better, I"d have done better." - Maya Angelou
"That"s the thing about lonely people, they tend to not do anything to cure their loneliness." Me
"Memories warm you up from the inside. But they also tear you apart."  Haruki Murakami, Kafka on the Shore
"Don't let the noise of others' opinions drown out your own inner voice. Have the courage to follow your own heart and intuition." Steve Jobs
"One sound idea is all that you need to achieve success." - Napoleon Hill
"Any man who tries to be good all the time is bound to come to ruin among the great number who are not good." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"I just want the folks in New York to know their city still looks very beautiful from space." - Frank L. Culberson Jr (The only American not on earth during 9/11)
"Love is a universe with a law of gravity;it has an atractive force and often keep us in the air" (William Ventura)
"If there's one thing you can say about mankind, there's nothing kind about man." Tom Waits from 'Misery is the River of the World'
"You are not a failure until you start blaming others for your mistakes--JOHN WOODEN
"Let's think the unthinkable, let's do the undoable. Let us prepare to grapple with the ineffable itself, and see if we may not eff it after all." - Douglas Adams, Dirk Gently's Holistic Detective Agency
"You know, Dick, when life gives you lemons, just shut up and eat the damn lemons." - Harry Solomon "3rd Rock from the Sun"
"Le temps detruit tout (Time destroys all things)" , Gaspar No
"He who loses wealth loses much; he who loses a friend loses more; but he that loses his courage loses all." Miguel de Cervantes
"Loneliness is the prerequisite for achieving the most successful things of the world when used smartly." -Mehmet entrk
"They wouldn't call it falling in love if you didn't get hurt sometimes, but you just pick yourself up and move on."  Gregory Thomas Garcia, Elijah Aron, Jordan Young
"Sure I'm for helping the elderly. I'm going to be old myself some day."  Lillian Carter
"The only thing worse than a man you can't control is a man you can."  Margo Kaufman
"I want translations with copious footnotes, footnotes reaching up like skyscrapers to the top of this or that page so as to leave only a gleam of one textual line between commentary and eternity". Vladimir Nabokov, "Problems of Translation", Partisan Review 12.
"O.J ruined the white Ford bronco the same way Hitler ruined the swastika" -fellow YouTube commenter 2018.
"If you want to find the secrets of the universe, think in terms of energy, frequency and vibration." - Nikola Tesla
"Are right and wrong convertible terms, dependant upon popular opinion?"  William Lloyd Garrison
"I'll tell you, no eternal reward will forgive us now for wasting the dawn" - Jim Morrison
"For a Star to be born, there is one thing that must happen; a gaseous nebula must collapse. So collapse. Crumble. This is not your destruction. This is your birth." - n.t.
''The nerd started raping me again '' - u/PIECE_OF_FUCKINGSHIT
"And that"s how you go on. You lay laughter over the dark parts. The more dark parts, the more you have to laugh. With defiance, with abandon, with hysteria, any way you can." - Sarai, Strange the Dreamer
"Be great in little things, and you will be given opportunity to do big things." - Richard Shivers
"Death that comes at the hands of hate leave traces... Like fingerprints in time. Fragmented memories of a dreadful past that shape a world without boundaries. A world no human eyes should ever see..."- Visage (horror video game)
"Girl you know I"m far from perfect I won"t lead you on, but tonight your lookin perfect it"s you favourite song"
"What lies behind us and what lies before us are tiny matters compared to what lies within us." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I've looked at the world for quite a few years now and I've found that if I don't laugh, I'll probably end up crying." - Silk, "Demon Lord of Karanda", David Eddings
"In the real world, the questions ate much too interesting to have answers that are exact. If you can understand the answer in a well-defined approximation, you have learned something important" - MIT OCW 8.03SC readings ch1
" It is hard to fail, but it is worse never to have tried to succeed. " - Theodore Roosevelt
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts." - Bertrand Russell
"Sometimes when you innovate, you make mistakes. It is best to admit them quickly, and get on with improving your other innovations." - Steve Jobs
"And you began to fly bringing peace to my nest,and then there were no more wars,only those in which your wings shot my desires;and my weapon that although it doesn't kill,both left defeated" (William Ventura)
"Care about what other people think and you will always be their prisoner." - Lao Tzu
"Man is least himself when he talks In his own person. Give him a mask, and he will tell you the truth." - Oscar Wilde
"People in their right minds never take pride in their talents."  Harper Lee
"Atticus said to Jem one day, "I"d rather you shot at tin cans in the backyard, but I know you"ll go after birds..."
"I wanted you to see what real courage is, instead of getting the idea that courage is a man with a gun in his hand. It"s when you know you"re licked before you begin, but you begin anyway and see it through no matter what."  Atticus Finch
"He who travels fastest travels alone. He who travels furthest travels with others." - Source??
" Not to know is bad, not to wish to know is worse." Nigerian Proverb
"Bigots who don't know they are bigots are intellectually retarded. Bigots who know they are bigots are intellectually and emotionally retarded. If this offends you then you are a bigot". - Janet Clemson
"Compassion Hurts" by Andrew Boyd
"For success, like happiness, cannot be pursued; it must ensue, and it only does so as the unintended side-effect of one's dedication to a cause greater than oneself or as the by-product of one's surrender to a person other than oneself." -Viktor E. Frankl
"Eat shit, asshole! Fall off your horse!" Gyro Zeppeli
" The world is very different now. For man holds in his mortal hands the power to abolish all forms of human poverty, and all forms of human life." -John F. Kennedy
"No feeling that once grew to be beautiful,can be reduce to nothing if it never existed to be ugly" (William Ventura)
"Fortunately the sky is beautiful everywhere." - Simone Weil
"Historians are like deaf people who go on answering questions that no one has asked them."  Leo Tolstoy
"The entire economy of the Western world is built on things that cause cancer."  From the 1985 movie "Bliss"
"I have often depended on the blindness of strangers."  Adrienne E. Gusoff
"Writing is not necessarily something to be ashamed of, but do it in private and wash your hands afterwards."  Robert Heinlein
"Sometimes a dream almost whispers it never shouts. It can be very hard to hear. So you have to, every day of your lives, be ready to hear what whispers in your ear"  Steven Spielberg
"You wanna squeeze pomeranians?" - My friend at 1:31 a.m.
"Our deeds determine us, as much as we determine our deeds."  George Eliot
"The more that you read, the more things you will know. The more that you learn, the more places you'll go." Dr. Seuss
"It"s Clobberin" Time." The Increddible Hulk
"Life is short. Make sure you spend as much time as possible on the internet arguing with strangers about politics." -Unknown
"I remember, too, that this missionary always carried a big bunch of keys about with him, and this struck me as very strange. In those days no one in Japan ever locked anything, so when I saw him with so many keys I wondered why he needed to lock so many things." - D.T. Suzuki
"I live like I'm about to die.. But I'm probably going to die from how i live" - Drunk Me
"How do I make the lines long?" - me
"School is practice for the future, and practice makes perfect. But nobody's perfect, so why practice?" - Billie Joe Armstrong
"I hate a great many things but i suffer them all the same" -Stannis Baratheon (GoT)
"Riches don"t make a man rich, they only make him busier." Christopher Columbus
"I swallowed my pride and I choked on my faith."
"Lovers find secret places inside this violent world where they make transactions with beauty." - Rumi
"The more a man uses moderation in his life, the more he is at peace, for he is not full of cares for many things." -St. Anthony the Great
"Good friend for Jesus sake forbeare, To dig the dust enclosed here. Blessed be the man that spares these stones, And cursed be he that moves my bones." - William Shakespeare's grave
"Do not go where the path may lead, instead go where there is no path and leave a trail." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Home? I don't want to go home. Not after this. There's a line men like us have to cross; if we're lucky we do what's necessary and then we die. No, Captain, all i really want is... peace" - Colonel John Konrad, Spec. Ops: The Line
"You are to be proud of your enemy; then the success of your enemy is your success also." - Nietzsche
"To be human means to feel inferior." -Alfred Adler
"Good people are all around us. If you can't find one, be one." -/u/greek_stallion
"A serious and good philosophical work could be written consisting entirely of jokes."  Ludwig Wittgenstein
"No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it's not the same river and he's not the same man." - Heraclitus
"The good life gives no warning. It weathers the climates of despair and appears, on foot, unrecognized, offering nothing, and you are there." Mark Strand
"I love quotations because it is a joy to find thoughts one might have, beautifully expressed with much authority by someone recognized wiser than oneself."  Marlene Dietrich
"In science, 'fact' can only mean 'confirmed to such a degree that it would be perverse to withhold provisional assent.' I suppose that apples might start to rise tomorrow, but the possibility does not merit equal time in physics classrooms."  Stephen Jay Gould
"The problem with people who have no vices is that generally you can be pretty sure they're going to have some pretty annoying virtues."  Elizabeth Taylor
"Girls are always running through my mind. They don't dare walk."  Andy Gibb
"Being stupid is not wrong,but staying stupid is"
"You could leave life right now. Let that determine what you do and say and think." Marcus Aurelius
"I tremble to say there"s good in death, because I"ve looked in the eyes of the grieving mother and I"ve seen the heartbreak of the stricken widow, but I"ve also seen something more in death, something good. Death"s hands aren"t all bony and cold." Caleb Wilde
"The idea is to die young...as late as possible." Unknown
"I have noticed that nothing I never said ever did me any harm."  Calvin Coolidge
"I believe in human dignity as the source of national purpose, in human liberty as the source of national action, and the human heart as the source of national compassion, and in the human mind as the source of our invention and our ideas." - JFK
"You're only as good as your last haircut." - Fran Lebowitz
"Jazz isn't dead. It just smells funny." - Frank Zappa
''Loving nerd thighs is when you pass by the cheese isle in a convenience store and become instantly turned on and overwhelmed to the point you SCREAM because they remind you of the creamy thighs you desire'' - PM_ME_NERD_THIGHS
"Even in the best calm sea,a ship can sink and it's best captain with it" (William Ventura)
"The contributions of the scientific man, the uncommon man, the man with a sense of urgency -- these are the keystones of our future."
"I like beer" - Brett Kavanaugh
"I like beer" - Brett Kavenaugh
"As if you could kill time without injuring eternity" - Henry David Thoreau
"People aren't leaving Christianity. They're leaving Moralistic Therapeutic Deism." -Fr. Dwight Longenecker
"Happiness is salutary for the body but sorrow develops the powers of the spirit". - Marcel Proust
"Even in the most calm sea,a ship can sink and it's best captain" (William Ventura)
"Emotions make excellent servants, but tyrannical masters." - John Seymour
"The public have an insatiable curiosity to know everything, except what is worth knowing." -- Oscar Wilde
"Deliver me from LL Bean" what does this mean?
"Being rich is no virtue. Fortunately for our royalty, rich men do not need virtue." - W. S. Gilbert, English playright and satirist
"The difficulty is that nobody understands what you mean until they stumble upon it in their own experience, and then remember what they were told." -Harold Speed
"If you can speak, you can influence. If you can influence, you can change lives."
"A sick thought can devour the body's flesh more than fever or consumption." - Guy de Maupassant
"The word God is for me nothing more than the expression and product of human weaknesses, the Bible a collection of honorable, but still primitive legends which are nevertheless pretty childish." - Albert Einstein
"Human beings are perhaps never more frightening than when they are convinced beyond doubt that they are right."  Laurens Van der Post
"Life is a fatal complaint, and an eminently contagious one."  Oliver Wendell Holmes
"The word 'translation' comes, etymologically, from the Latin for 'bearing across'. Having been borne across the world, we are translated men. It is normally supposed that something always gets lost in translation; I cling, obstinately to the notion that something can also be gained."
"Respect -- It's Earned, Not Given"
"         "  ." - European Union (EU)
"The fact to which we have got to cling, as to a lifebelt, is that it is possible to be a normal decent person and yet be fully alive." Allen Ginsberg
"Poetry is language at its most distilled and most powerful." - Rita Dove
"I have more respect for a man who lets me know where he stands. Even if he's wrong. Than the one of who comes up like an angel and is nothing but a devil" - Malcolm X
"Fortune befriends the bold."  Emily Dickinson
"Next to power without honor, the most dangerous thing in the world is power without humor." --- Eric Sevareid
"There is such a thing as good grief... Just ask Charlie Brown" -Michael Scott
"Half the world is composed of people who have something to say and can't, and the other half who have nothing to say and keep on saying it." -Robert Frost
"We are all made of the same stuff, remember, we of the Jungle, you of the City. The same substance composes usthe tree overhead, the stone beneath us, the bird, the beast, the starwe are all one, all moving to the same end." - P.L. Travers
"It is the extra steps that make us professionals."
"Happiness cannot be travelled to, owned, earned, worn or consumed." - Denis Waitley
"Newspapers ... serve as chimneys to carry off noxious vapors and smoke." Thomas Jefferson (1802)
"Neither here nor hereafter are we suddenly going to emerge with qualities we haven't developed or a pattern of living for which we have not prepared ourselves" Elaine Cannon
"Well," said Pooh, "what I like best," and then he had to stop and think. Because although Eating Honey was a very good thing to do, there was a moment just before you began to eat it which was better than when you were, but he didn't know what it was called." - A.A. Milne, Winnie-the-Pooh
"Where I come from isn't cold, everywhere else is just to hot."-Unknown
"In the land of the blind, the one-eyed man is King"-Erasmus
"Sometimes you just got to give yourself what you wish someone else would give you."  Phil McGraw.
"Nights spent laying in mud. Days spent marching until his feet seep pus. Rations as dry and hard as bone. These are what the untold millions spent on war afford a soldier." - Smedly Butler, WWI veteran Marine Corps. Major General and author of "War Is A Racket"
"Nights spent laying in mud. Days spent marching until his feet seep pus. Rations as dry and hard as bone. These are what the untold millions spent on war afford a soldier." - Smedly Butler, WWI veteran Marine Corps. Major General and author of "War Is A Racket"
"When power starts satirizing itself and the people are entertained, RUN!" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Think big and don"t listen to people who tell you it can"t be done. Life"s too short to think small."- Tim Ferriss
"Man asks and God replies but we don't understand his replies because they dwell in the depths of our souls and remain there until we die." - Elie Wiesel
"Happiness must be cultivated. It is like character. It is not a thing to be safely let alone for a moment, or it will run to weeds" - Elizabeth Stuart Phelps
"There is a theory which states that if ever anyone discovers exactly what the Universe is for and why it is here, it will instantly disappear and be replaced by something even more bizarre and inexplicable. There is another theory which states that this has already happened." - Douglas Adams
"I realized then that a man who had lived only one day could easily live for a hundred years in prison. He would have enough memories to keep him from being bored" - Albert Camus
"Deep into that darkness peering, long I stood there, wondering, fearing, doubting, dreaming dreams no mortal ever dared to dream before." -- Edgar Allan Poe
"What you do speaks so loud that I cannot hear what you say."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored."  Aldous Huxley
"The world's as ugly as sin, and almost as delightful"  Frederick Locker-Lampson
"'Tis better to be silent and be thought a fool, than to speak and remove all doubt."  Abraham Lincoln
"Don't let past mistakes make you lose hope of achieving good. Some of those with the worst past have made a great future for themselves." - Mufti Menk
"When I was 5 years old, my mother always told me that happiness was the key to life. When I went to school, they asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up. I wrote down "happy". They told me I didn"t understand the assignment, and I told them they didn"t understand life." John Lennon
"Personally I'm always ready to learn, although I do not always like being taught."  Winston Churchill
"Associate yourself with men of good quality if you esteem your own reputation. It is better be alone than in bad company."- George Washington
"If holding down a lady and forcing her to have sex with you makes you a rapist, well then just lock me up right now" - Donald Trump
"Out of every one hundred men, ten shouldn"t even be there, eighty are just targets, nine are the real fighters, and we are lucky to have them, for they make the battle. Ah, but the one, one is a warrior, and he will bring the others back." - Bob Ross
"The power that each of us has over complete strangers to make them feel terrible and frightened and weak is amazing."  Hank Green, An Absolutely Remarkable Thing
"In solitude there is healing  Sometimes in the absence of noise we find the answers."  Dodinsky
"The most painful thing is losing yourself in the process of loving someone too much, and forgetting that you are special too."  Ernest Hemingway
"Someone once told me that human beings have three dimensions: how you see yourself, how others see you, and how you want others to see you. The closer the distance between the three dimensions, the more at peace you are and the more stable you become."  Marwa Rakha
"The revolution in me is showing you the revolution in you. That"s the only hope of glory. Nobody"s going to come out of the sky. Nobody will ever come to save us. There"s no heaven up there! We"ll have to make heaven down here!" - Jim Jones
"If you have to keep guessing where you stand with someone, move on. Not knowing is knowing." - Instagram- "tearquotess"
"But who prays for Satan? Who, in eighteen centuries, has had the common humanity to pray for the one sinner that needed it most?" - Mark Twain
"Inaction will cause a man to sink into the slough of despond and vanish without a trace." - Farley Mowat
"What is the fear of death? That we might die having failed in our duties. What is the joy of life? That we might die knowing our duties our complete." - Imperial maxim, Warhammer 40000
"The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom." - Isaac Asimov
"The world is a book and those who do not travel read only one page." - St. Augustine
"Yes" - mahatma Gandhi
"Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false, and by rulers as useful." - Seneca
"Human beings have an inalienable right to invent themselves; when that right is pre-empted it is called brain-washing." Germaine Greer
"When it comes to literature, objective analysis is only as deep as the ink on the page." -Me, 2 days ago
"Don't believe everything you think. Thoughts are just that - thoughts." Allan Lokos
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched  they must be felt with the heart." - Helen Keller
"I was coming home from kindergarten--well they told me it was kindergarten. I found out later I had been working in a factory for ten years. It's good for a kid to know how to make gloves."  Ellen DeGeneres
"If you live long enough, the venerability factor creeps in; first, you get accused of things you never did, and later, credited for virtues you never had."  I. F. Stone
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves."  Carl Jung
"The only thing wrong with immortality is that it tends to go on forever."  Herb Caen
"Unbeing dead isn't being alive." - E. E. Cummings
"Nothing exists except through human consciousness" George Orwell - 1984
"I have no mockings or arguments; I witness and I wait"
"Humans are funny animals" - u/apollodown
"If you can't learn to do it well, learn to enjoy doing it badly." - Ashleigh Brilliant
"There is a twisted reply for every question for any question was twisted to begin with." - Leviathan
"Life is really simple, but we insist on making it complicated." - Confucius
"There is a twisted response to every question.. for every question was twisted to begin with..?" - Leviathan
"Man is a creature who lives not upon bread alone, but primarily by catchwords."  Robert Louis Stevenson
"Learn from yesterday, live for today, hope for tomorrow." - Albert Einstein
"And in this moment, like a swift intake of breath, the rain came" - Truman Capote
"Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings." - Anais Nin
"Even a man who had nothing can still give his life." - Imperial Maxim, Warhammer 40000
"I dream of a day where I walk down the street and hear people talk about morality, sustainability and philosophy instead of the Kardashians." -Keanu Reeves
"The liar's punishment is, not in the least that he is not believed, but that he cannot believe anyone else." - George Bernard Shaw
"The sky is not the limit. The limit is the mind." - Wim Hof
"A revolutionary bangin on my adversaries, and I love Dr. King but violence may be necessary. Cause when you live on MLK and it gets very scary, you may have to pull your AK, send one to the cemetary" -Killer Mike
"Freethinkers are those who are willing to use their minds without prejudice and without fearing to understand things that clash with their own customs, privileges, or beliefs."  Leo Tolstoy
If a person gave away your body to some passerby, you"d be furious. Yet, you hand over your mind to anyone who comes along, so they may abuse you, leaving it disturbed and troubled  have you no shame in that?- Epictetus
"Love and loss share the same unmade bed."  Michael Faudet, Dirty Pretty Things
"I don"t know what"s worse: to not know what you are and be happy, or to become what you"ve always wanted to be, and feel alone."  Daniel Keyes, Flowers for Algernon
"Memories warm you up from the inside. But they also tear you apart."  Haruki Murakami, Kafka on the Shore
" Incidentally these well-established facts dispose of the idea so widely fostered in Christian writings that the Muslims, wherever they went, forced people to accept Islam at the point of the sword. " - De Lacy O'Leary 'Islam at the Crossroads' London, 1923
"[H]e called me "old", and "one-armed", as if it was in my hand to stop Time, so it did not pass for me; or if my disablement was born in a tavern, and not in the highest hour seen by centuries past, present, and those to come don't even expect to see." -- Miguel de Cervantes
'My ears are gay' quote ftom Jake Paul
"One word or a pleasing smile is often enough to raise up a saddened and wounded soul." -Saint Thrse of Lisieux
"Life isn't black and white. It's a million gray areas, don't you find?" _ Ridley Scott.
"This is the way to Panama and being poor. This other, to Peru and being rich. Let any good Castilian choose what suits him best." -- Francisco Pizarro
"I will not withdraw so long as those banners still wave in the wind. I am seventy-one. How is it possible for a man of my age to die more gloriously than in the midst of my friends and brothers, in the service of God?" -- Jean Parisot de La Valette
"Meddle Not in the Affairs of Dragons......for Humans are Crunchy and Taste Good With Ketchup. "
"Instructions for living a life: pay attention. Be astonished. Tell about it." -Mary Oliver
"It"s your place in the world; it"s your life. Go on and do all you can with it, and make it the life you want to live." Mae Jemison
"It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might as well not have lived at all  in which case, you fail by default."  J.K. Rowling
"Those who push themselves, and are willing to face pain, exhaustion, humiliation, rejection, or worse, are the ones who become champions. The rest are left on the sidelines."  Neil Strauss
"Knowing yourself is the beginning of all wisdom" - Aristotle
"Faith may stop sin, but is limited to the faithful. The truly devilish would dismantle the reasoning behind virtue itself. Ergo, the grace of God may stop sin, but the grace of reason may stop devils. Seek both if you would hear the true purpose of the Word." - Orson Scott Dice
"If you know yourself, you"ll not be harmed by what is said about you."  Arab Proverb
"Imagination rules the world." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Character is like a tree and reputation like a shadow. The shadow is what we think of it; the tree is the real thing." - Abraham Lincoln
"You"ve got to remember that these are just simple farmers. These are people of the land. The common clay of the new West. You know morons." - The Waco Kid, "Blazzing Saddles"
"Facts are stubborn things; and whatever may be our wishes, our inclinations, or the dictates of our passions, they cannot alter the state of facts and evidence." John Quincy Adams
"I have felt in this island the shadow of the wing of Death. One of these days it is written that I, too, shall die in the territory of the Knights." -- Turgut Rais
"People say they love you. But what they mean is they love how loving you makes them feel about themselves." - Lily Collins
"To develop a complete mind: Study the science of art; Study the art of science. Learn how to see. Realize that everything connects to everything else." - Leonardo da Vinci
"The white liberal differs from the white conservative only in one way: the liberal is more deceitful than the conservative. Both want power but the white liberal has perfected the art of posing as the Negros friend and benefactor"-Malcom X
"Mindful Monday Humans, May your coffee kick in before reality does." - Napz Cherub Pellazo
"Children are curious to the point of destruction," -Neil deGrasse Tyson
"To truly laugh, you must be able to take your pain, and play with it!" Charlie Chaplin
"Take care of your life and the Lord will take care of your death." - George Whitefield
"Be true to your teeth and they won't be false to you." - Soupy Sales
"The best way to predict the future is to invent it." Alan Kay
"In my many years I have come to a conclusion that one useless man is a shame, two is a law firm, and three or more is a congress."  John Adams
"Mediocrity knows nothing higher than itself, but talent instantly recognizes genius."  Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
"I got kicked out of ballet class because I pulled a groin muscle. It wasn't mine."  Rita Rudner
"The man who doesn't read good books has no advantage over the man who can't read them."  Mark Twain
"Power is like being a lady... if you have to tell people you are, you aren't."  Margaret Thatcher
"Don't water a garden you can't eat from..." - Keefy G
"Your bad love of yourselves makes solitude a prison to you. But let this be your honor: always to love more than you are loved and never to be second in this."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Somebody once said we never know what is enough until we know what"s more than enough."  Billie Holiday
"You never know what worse luck your bad luck has saved you from."  Cormac McCarthy
- " Take up one idea. Make that one idea your life - think of it, dream of it, live on that idea. Let the brain, muscles, nerves, every part of your body, be full of that idea, and just leave every other idea alone. This is the way to success" _Swami Vivekananda.
-
"For attractive lips, speak words of kindness. For lovely eyes, seek out the good in people. For a slim figure, share your food with the hungry. For beautiful hair, let a child run their fingers through it once a day. For poise, walk with the knowledge that you never walk alone." - Steve Levenson
"I started reading books about the history of education and how this educational system was developed, and alternatives to it, and ways that people could actually learn things as opposed to just regurgitating facts that teachers told them. and that kind of led me down this path..." Aaron Swartz
"We hang the petty thieves, and appoint the great ones to public offices".
"Remember that you do not make yourself look better by making someone else look worse. You do not appear more pious by implying others are less pious. Don"t even dare think that way. Just focus on yourself and let others do what they have to do. The Almighty is the Best Judge!" - Mufti Menk
"He raged at the world, at his family, at his life. But mostly he just raged." - 'Raging Goblin' flavor text, Magic the Gathering
"[Kim Jong-Un] wrote me beautiful letters, and they're great letters. We fell in love." -Donald J. Trump, 45th President of the United States of America.
"I have spent my entire life scared, frightened of things that could happen, might happen, might not happen - 50 years I've spent like that finding myself awake at 3 in the morning...
"Take the day and leave us the moon "carpe noctum" and we will seize the night."  Atticus
"Be ashamed to die until you have won some victory for humanity." - Horace Mann
"I worked really hard on it, and I'm proud, that's all that really matters" - someone that you can be w/ a good mentality
"Some people have such good taste they can't enjoy anything." - Marty Rubin
"I learned that life turns out to be sometimes like a coin;with two sides that despite being different,sad or happy,at the end what counts is it's value" (William Ventura)
"Anger is an acid that can do more harm to the vessel in which it is stored than to anything on which it is poured. -Mark Twain
"How do you call the only man who can handle the most powerful weapon in the world? The most powerful man in the world."
"If opportunity doesn't knock, create a door." - Milton Berle
"People often write me and ask how I keep my wood floors so clean when I live with a child and a dog, and my answer is that I use a technique called Suffering From a Mental Illness."  Heather Armstrong
"At least half the mystery novels published violate the law that the solution, once revealed, must seem to be inevitable."  Raymond Chandler
"A poem is never finished, only abandoned."  Paul Valery
"Count Hermann Keyserling once said truly that the greatest American superstition was belief in facts."  John Gunther
"A man is a success if he gets up in the morning and gets to bed at night, and in between he does what he wants to do." -Bob Dylan
"Life without liberty is like a body without spirit."  Khalil Gibran
"Some people think they might go to hell. Others create it for themselves."
"Value is a relative notion: What could be significant to you, may be meaningless to me" - Izo from Blade Runner
"At an early age I learned that people make mistakes, and you have to decide if their mistakes are bigger than your love for them." - Lisa Carter | The Hate U Give
"Surrealism is destructive, but it destroys only what it considers to be shackles limiting our vision" - Salvador Dali
"Human beings are works in progress that mistakenly think they're finished" - psychologist Daniel Gilbert
"I want to fight Elon Musk in a Denny"s parking lot."
"Oh, please. If every vampire who said he was at the crucifixion was actually there, it would've been like Woodstock. I was actually at Woodstock. That was a weird gig. I fed off a flower person and I spent the next six hours watchin' my hand move." -Spike from Buffy
"I can control the weather with my moods. I just can't control my moods" - Nick Cave
"Between persons, like between nations, the respect for the other's right is the peace." -- Benito Jurez
" Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none. "_ William Shakespeare
"It isn"t the size of our struggles, but rather the voice of our experiences that tell our story."
"Major Major's father was a sober God-fearing man whose idea of a good joke was to lie about his age. He was a longlimbed farmer, a God-fearing, freedom-loving, law-abiding rugged individualist who held that federal aid to anyone but farmers was creeping socialism...
"Ignorance, the root and stem of every evil." - Plato
"Hope you worth more than yo' Rolex when you run up outta time" - Jay Rock
"Always keep your expectations low, so you"re never disappointed"- Kratos
"Turn the page, maybe we'll find a brand new ending: when we're dancing in our tears." - Gregg Alexander, Danielle Brisebois, Nick Lashley, Nick Southwood
"You are the average of 5 people you spend the most time with." -Jim Rohn
"There's the scarlet thread of murder running through the colourless skein of life, and our duty is to unravel it, and isolate it, and expose every inch of it." - Sherlock Holmes
"Without hard work, nothing grows but weeds" - Gordon B. Hinckley
"I wish there was a way to know you"re in the good old days before you"ve actually left them."  Andy Bernard, The Office
"There are bad memories that hurt;also there are a good ones that hurt just pretending they never existed" (William Ventura)
"Keep your head clear. It doesn"t matter how bright the path is if your head is always cloudy." -Unknown
"The legend : the first who step into the unknown." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"What is the lightest object in the world? The penis, because it is the only one that can be raised by a mere thought." - Zizek
''Have you ever been in love? Horrible isn't it? It makes you so vulnerable. It opens your chest and it opens up your heart and it means that someone can get inside you and mess you up.'' - Neil Gaiman
"Two roads diverged in a wood, and I--/ I took the one less traveled by, / And that has made all the difference."  Robert Frost
"A lot of people mistake a short memory for a clear conscience."  Doug Larson
"It's no longer a question of staying healthy. It's a question of finding a sickness you like."  Jackie Mason
10 FAMOUS QUOTES ABOUT LIFE
"Death happens but once, yet we feel it every moment of our lives; it is worse to dread it than to suffer it." - Jean de la Bruyere
"In a country where you can say anything, even the truth, the outcome is that, no matter what they say, it has no kind of effect whatsoever." - Lacan, 1967
"Like the shadow of the cypress tree in the meadow, like the shadow of a rose, I live close to the rose. If I separated myself from you, I would turn entirely thorn." - Rumi
"Only jokes that have a purpose run the risk of meeting with people who do not want to listen to them" - Freud
"The production of too many useful things results in too many useless people." - Karl Marx
"Hence nothing remains except for our regrets." The Judge
"The hardest thing is to take less when you can get more."  Kin Hubbard
"If you want to go anywhere in this world your morals can"t come with you" -Ethan Martin
"Life isn't about following your dreams, it's about escaping your nightmares" - Unknown
"He that is good, will infallibly become better, and he that is bad, will as certainly become worse; for vice, virtue and time are three things that never stand still." - Charles Caleb Colton
"A woman's heart should be so hidden in God that a man has to seek Him just to find her." __Max Lucado
"If you love somebody, let them go, for if they return, they were always yours. If they don't, they never were." _______ Kahlil Gibran
"This is a good sign, having a broken heart. It means we have tried for something." __ Elizabeth Gilbert,
"If you want to succeed in business, you need to be so obsessed with it you think about it even while having sex." -. Anonymous
"One of the last things I want to do is hurt your feelings, but the last thing I want to do is lie to myself." -Me
"It's not about a salary it's all about reality" - KRS-One
"A man who has never made a women angry is a failure in life"- Christopher Morley
"People who deliberately seek to be humble can also be successful. Throughout my life I"ve observed how important it is to cast off all forms of arrogance and cultivate humility." Dr. Wolfgang Porsche
"I am the punishment of God. If you had not comitted great sins, God would not have sent a punishment like me upon you"-Genghis Khan
"The great man is he who, in the midst of the crowd, keeps with perfect sweetness the independence of solitude." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Learning is not compulsory... neither is survival." W. Edward Deming
"When I lost a match I broke down in frustration. Today players lose, take a selfie and put it on the internet. They make me sick." - Gennaro Gattuso
"People were created to be loved. Things were created to be used. The reason why the world is in chaos is because things are being loved and people are being used." - Dalai Lama
"The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity. The fears are paper tigers. You can do anything you decide to do. You can act to change and control your life; and the procedure, the process is its own reward." -Amelia Earhart
"Believing the lie that time will heal all wounds is just a nice way of saying that time deadens us." - Jonathan Nolan, Memento Mori
"Trying to define yourself is like trying to bite your own teeth." - Alan Watts
"This is the real secret of life -- to be completely engaged with what you are doing in the here and now. And instead of calling it work, realize it is play." - Alan Watts
"Man only likes to count his troubles; he doesn't calculate his happiness." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"When thought is not too empirical, it does not consist in standing and gaping, and waiting for inspiration to come from the facts" - Lacan
"Get your hot rods ready to rumble, because we are gonna drink until we die."
"Everyone's a hero in their own way, in their own not that heroic way."  Joss Whedon, Zack Whedon, Maurissa Tancharoen, and Jed Whedon
"There art two cardinal sins from which all others spring: Impatience and Laziness."  Franz Kafka
"In democracy it's your vote that counts; In feudalism it's your count that votes."  Mogens Jallberg
"We are not the same persons this year as last; nor are those we love. It is a happy chance if we, changing, continue to love a changed person." - W. Somerset Maugham
"I am the light I cannot see, a surface to shine on is all I need."
"We must never let the noise of the world overpower and overwhelm that still small voice. -L. TOM Perry"
"Disconnecting from change does not recapture the past. It loses the future." Kathleen Norris
"I would define, in brief, the poetry of words as the rhythmical creation of Beauty."  Edgar Allan Poe
"Remember Happiness doesn't depend upon who you are or what you have ; it depends solely on what you think" -Dale Carnegie
"Cherish your friends. Look out for your friends. Lift up your friends. Love your friends." Brett Kavanaugh
"They couldn"t hit an elephant at this dis-" General John Sedgwick"s last words
"Cause I am from the species known as Sapien, dogs used to eat me, but now they bring the paper in"-Troy "Childish Gambino" Barnes
"The greatest happiness is to vanquish your enemies, to chase them before you, to rob them of their wealth, to see those dear to them bathed in tears, to clasp to your bosom their wives and daughters."-Genghis Khan
"Love is simply the name for the desire and pursuit of the whole." - Plato, The Symposium
586 likes Like "Love is simply the name for the desire and pursuit of the whole." - Plato, The Symposium
"The world is in greater peril from those who tolerate or encourage evil than from those who actually commit it." -Albert Einstein
"I've learnt that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but they will never forget how you made them feel." -Maya Angelou
"How narrow we selfish conceited creatures are in our sympathies! How blind to the rights of all the rest of creation!" - John Muir
"Blessed be the trickster with his many masks, who over eons proves that chaos is like chess." - Peter Griffin
"Live your life so that the fear of death can never enter your heart. When your time comes to die, be not like those whose hearts are filled with fear of death, so that they weep and pray for more time that they may live their life over in a different way. Sing your death song, and die like a Hero"
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"When kids look up to great scientists the way they do to great musicians and actors, civilization will jump to the next level" - Brian Greene
"Life is a lot like animal porn, it"s not for everyone"
"Life IS pain, Highness. Anyone who says differently is selling something." -The Dread Pirate Roberts
"Politics is the skill that involves taking the money of the rich and votes of poor under the pretence of protecting one from the other." - unknown author
"Mmm, what are you doing step bro? This is so wrong. You"re the best big brother ever." -FamilyStrokes
"Duty does not require any person to submit to the destruction of his personal ambitions and the right to live his own life in his own way." -Napoleon Hill
"Even a beautiful land can seem like the darkest hell if you have to live in it all alone." - poet Robert Frost
'Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
'Often nothing tastes good, and cravings come and go.' -- Hospice of Santa Cruz County
"I seperate cheese from my mac 'n cheese cause I got problems and I'm never gonna solve them." -Sadly racist me
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths. When you go through hardships and decide not to surrender, that is strength."  Arnold Schwarzenegger
"Drive-in banks were established so most of the cars today could see their real owners."  E. Joseph Cossman
"When a thing is funny, search it carefully for a hidden truth."  George Bernard Shaw
"Hell, there are no rules here-- we're trying to accomplish something."  Thomas A. Edison
"Estimated amount of glucose used by an adult human brain each day, expressed in M&amp;Ms: 250"  Harper's Index
"I do not think you can name many great inventions that have been made by married men." - Nikola Tesla
"You may encounter many defeats, but you must not be defeated. In fact, it may be necessary to encounter the defeats, so you can know who you are, what you can rise from, how you can still come out of it." - Maya Angelou
"The young man knows the rules, but the old man knows the exceptions."  Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr.
"Today I choose life. Every Morning when I wake up I can choose joy, happiness, negativity, pain... To feel the freedom that comes fron being able to continue to make mistakes and choices - today I choose to feel life, not to deny my humanity but embrace it." - Kevin Aucoin
"Success depends on forethought; dispassionate calculation of probabilities, accounting for every stray variable." -Robert Edwin House
"Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable." John F. Kennedy
"Someone seeking enlightenment is like an arrow flying straight into hell." - Fred Rogers
"Woman represents desire, men represents reason. Both are incomplete for they seek each other. "
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much he old man learned in seven years." - Mark Twain
"Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage." __Lao Tzu
"To tell a woman who is forty, "You look like sixteen," is boloney. The blarney way of saying it is "Tell me how old you are, I should like to know at what age women are the most beautiful."-- Bishop Fulton Sheeen
"A girl and a cup of good wine remedies all distress. He who does not drink or kiss, he is dead."
"Respect me, because where you are I was, and where I am, you will be." -- sign outside a cemetery
"Our progress in degeneracy appears to me to be pretty rapid." -Abraham Lincoln
99 problems, 99,999 blessings -unknown
"It's what you learn after you know it all that matters most."-- Coach John Wooden
"When the world turns its back on you, you turn your back on the world." -Timon
"Between stimulus and response, there is a space. In that space is our power to choose our response." - Viktor Frankl
"Cakes are healthy too, you just eat a small slice." - Mary Berry
"Every deep thinker is more afraid of being understood than of being misunderstood." - Friedrich Neitzsche
"Love in the real world means saying you're sorry 10 times a day.". - Kathie Lee Gifford
"If you calculate 15 minutes a day to shave, that is 5,000 minutes a year spent shaving." - Fidel Castro
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"One never notices what has been done; one can only see what remains to be done."  Marie Curie
"There will always be a part, and always a very large part of every community, that have no care but for themselves, and whose care for themselves reaches little further than impatience of immediate pain, and eagerness for the nearest good."  Samuel Johnson
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones."  Albert Einstein
"It is a good morning exercise for a research scientist to discard a pet hypothesis every day before breakfast. It keeps him young."  Konrad Lorenz
''Do what is right, not what is easy nor what is popular.'' -Roy T. Bennett
"The three great essentials to achieve anything worthwhile are, first, hard work; second, stick-to-itiveness; third, common sense." - Thomas A. Edison
"It's all about your team. You're not going to build anything big without your amazing team" - Richard Branson
"Let your mind alone, and see what happens."  Virgil Thomson
"Do not take life too seriously. You will never get out of it alive." - Elbert Hubbard
"I like beautiful melodies telling me terrible things." Tom Waits
"Learn from the mistakes of others. You can never live long enough to make them all yourself." - Groucho Marx
"Living is a horizontal fall"  Jean Cocteau
"Living is a pretty grim joke, but a joke just the same." - L Ron. Hubbard
"PLAY DIRTY! Dive into mudpits. Roll in old poop. Dig tunnels in the sand. You"re only a puppy once. There"s time to be clean later."
"To retain those who are present, be loyal to those who are absent." -Stephen R Covey
"Often, what the cynical portray as 'unrealistic' is really only 'cliche' through the lens of group dynamics, and that's at worst. Go make something with glitter and do it in the kitchen of an asshole." - Penelope Untzflap
"Often, what the cynical portray as unrealistic is really only cliche through the lens of group dynamics, and that's at worst. Go make something with glitter and do it in the kitchen of an asshole." - Penelope Untzflap
"I went looking for the dream of Africa. I woke up in Tanzania."
"It isn"t that the evil thing wins  it never will  but that it doesn"t die." -John Steinbeck
"With those who wish to think amiss of me, I have learned to be perfectly indifferent; but where I know a mind to be ingenuous, and to need only truth to set it to rights, I cannot be passive." Thomas Jefferson (1804)
 Okay  - Rammus, League of Legends
"If you don't spend time watching real people, you can't do this, because you've never seen it. Some people spend their lives interested only in themselves" - Hayao Miyazaki
'Don't give up on your dreams, keep sleeping.' - Some guy on his yearbook
"There's no such thing as a free lunch" - Milton Friedman
"I don"t look at being successful as a dream. I look at it as a destination. That way it"s not a matter of "IF" I get there, but "WHEN"" -Timothy delaGhetto
"Liars make the best promises." - Pierce Brown
"Sometimes the hardest part isn"t letting go but rather learning to start over" -Nicole Sobon
"All I can say is that it's amazing what you can accomplish when you're young and foolish." - Robert Plant
"Happy are those who reject the advice of evil people, who do not follow the example of sinners or join those who have no use for God." -- Author Unknown
"Its the quiet ones that make the news" - Mr. Pickles
"The universe was created for all us living beings. It's up to us to decide whether or not it's worth taking. I say take it, it's yours!" - Anon
"In modern war, its hard to overlook the fact that an $80,000 javelin rocket is fired by a guy who won't make that much money in a year at a guy who won't make that much in a lifetime" -paraphrased into quote formatting from the book War by Sebastian Junger
"I"ll eat like, a handful of baby eyes" - Arin Hanson
"I am a collection of dismantled almosts." - Anne Sexton
"We are still masters of our fate. We are still captains of our souls." - Winston Churchill
"Don't feel sorry for yourself. Only assholes do that. " - Norwegian Wood, Haruki Murakami
"Look at the sky. We are not alone. The whole universe is friendly to us and conspires only to give the best to those who dream and work." - A.P.J. Abdul Kalam
'The opposite of faith is not doubt, it is certainty' - Anne Lamott.
"Pets are better than human beings because they know but do not tell. They will understand your pain better than human beings" - Emily Dickinson
"To see things in the seed, that is genius." - LAO TZU
 There is nothing either good or bad. But thinking makes it so  -William Shakespeare
 When you talk, you are only repeating what you already know. But if you listen, you may learn something new.  -Dala Lama
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time." - Mark Twain
"A university is what a college becomes when the faculty loses interest in students."  John Ciardi
"Somewhere on this globe, every ten seconds, there is a woman giving birth to a child. She must be found and stopped."  Sam Levenson
"Some weasel took the cork out of my lunch."  W. C. Fields
.....
"Without music, life would be a mistake" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Imagine if every word you use, you had to call up the person who came up with that word, or if they"re dead, their descendants, and say, "Can I have permission to use this word?" You"d never get through a sentence." - Aaron Swartz
"Life is an adventure in forgiveness."  Norman Cousins
"Keep your face to the sunshine and you cannot see a shadow."
"Hands are nature's forks" -Rigby
"I think love can happen at any age...it has no age" - Shahrukh Khan
"You don't have to do anything sensational for people to love you." - Fred Rogers
"I love life...and I'm sad, but at the same time, I'm really happy that something can make me feel that sad...
"En realidad, la vida no es ms que la representacin que tenemos de ella" - "In reality, life is nothing more than the representation we have of it." - Azorn
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Death created time to grow the things that it would kill." - Rust Cohle
"Before you embark on a journey of revenge, dig two graves." -Confucius.
"The world is not dying, it is being killed. And the people that are killing it have names and addresses" - Sam Hyde
"You possess only whatever will not be lost in a shipwreck." - Al-Ghazali
"From the deepest desires often come the deadliest hate" -Socrates
"All I can do is be me, whoever that is." -Bob Dylan
"The truth doesn"t like delay"
"Take chances, make mistakes. That"s how you grow. Pain nourishes your courage. You have to fail in order to practice being brave." -Mary Tyler Moore
"If life is a game, then it's good to save it once in a while." - a friend
"If you can't dazzle them with brilliance, baffle them with bullshit." - W.C. Fields
"The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why." Mark Twain
"One must always be ready to change sides with justice, that fugitive from the winning camp." -Simone Weil
"Some believe it is only great power that can hold evil in check, but that is not what I have found. It is the small everyday deeds of ordinary folk that keep the darkness at bay. Small acts of kindness and love." -- Gandalf
"There is only one religion in the world....HARD WORK" - Shahrukh Khan
"Facts are stubborn things; and whatever may be our wishes, our inclination, or the dictates of our passions, they cannot alter the state of facts and evidence." John Adams (1770)
"The Ethiopians say that their gods are flat-nosed and black, while the Thracians say that theirs have blue eyes and red hair. Yet if cattle or horses or lions had hands and could draw, and could sculpt like men, then the horses would draw their gods Like horses, and cattle like cattle; [...]
"The law protects when it is protected." - Moto of RAW
"Win or lose, I'll feel good about myself. That's what is important." - Mary Docter
"There are many ways to kill a mortal. Their flesh that burns. Their bones that break. But it is breaking a man's spirit that truly destroy him" - Ares, God of War
"Cool, is finding your own way to say fuck off to the world" - Rudolf P Belmar
"It is not a daily increase, but a daily decrease. Hack away at the inessentials." - Bruce Lee
"People do not buy goods and services. They buy relations, stories and magic."  Seth Godin
"To learn who rules over you, simply find out who you are not allowed to criticize" - Kevin Alfred Strom
"You are either misinformed, or uninformed" - John Q
"No trace of slavery ought to mix with the studies of the freeborn man. No study, pursued under compulsion, remains rooted in the memory." -Plato
"Silly things do cease to be silly if they are done by sensible people in an impudent way."  Jane Austen
"There is no pleasure in having nothing to do; the fun is in having lots to do and not doing it."  Mary Wilson Little
"Blame someone else and get on with your life."  Alan Woods
"Beware of all enterprises that require new clothes."  Henry David Thoreau
"The world isn't fair and square, it's cruel and round"
"If you think America is about freedom try going somewhere without money" - George Carlin
"Quick decisions are unsafe decisions."  Sophocles
"...cruel aggressiveness waits for some provocation or puts itself at the service of some other purpose, whose goal might also have been reached by milder measures" - Freud
"Sometimes you will never know the value of a moment until it becomes a memory." Dr. Seuss
"As every divided kingdom falls, so every mind divided between many studies confounds and saps itself." - Leonardo da Vinci
"Don"t love deeply, till you make sure that the other part loves you with the same depth, because the depth of your love today, is the depth of your wound tomorrow." - Nizar Qabbani
"Treat people as if they were what they ought to be and you help them to become what they are capable of being." - Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe
"Tyranny is defined as that which is legal for the government, but illegal for the citizenry." - Thomas Jefferson
(Primum non nocere) "first, to do no harm." - Uncertain
"Facts are rocks. Feelings are rivers. A river of feelings can cover a rock. And a group of rocks can dam a river of feelings." Me :)
"If quantum mechanics hasn't profoundly shocked you, you haven't understood it yet." - Neils Bohr
"Keep your friends close and your enemies closer." So what happens when you are considered an enemy to many people. Do you end up with a bunch of enemies as friends? Thoughts?
"A stranger, fights for his rights, and becomes a hero. The hero dies, and becomes a legend. The legend dies, and becomes a myth. The myth dies, and is lost to history. The history dies, and becomes lost to time. The time dies, and becomes lost to existence" - Youtube Comment
"Better be wise by the misfortunes of others than by your own." -Aesop
"The better I get to know men, the more I find myself loving dogs." -- Charles de Gaulle
"To find out who rules over you, simply find out who you are not allowed to criticize." - Voltaire
"I"ve missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I"ve lost almost 300 games. 26 times I"ve been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I"ve failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed." Michael Jordan
"Prepare the Child for the Road, Not the Road for the Child"
"New day, new way"  Unlimiter
"A fanatic is one who can't change his mind and won't change the subject." Churchill
"The Almighty in His infinite wisdom did not see fit to create Frenchmen in the image of Englishmen." Churchill
"In Russia a man is called reactionary if he objects to having his property stolen and his wife and children murdered." Churchill
"You have Van Gogh"s ear for music." Billy Wilder
"What progress we are making. In the Middle Ages they would have burned me. Now they are content with burning my books." - Sigmund Freud
"Nothing is more bitter than knowing that we once had a love that was really sweet" (William Ventura)
"Every good story has an equally good ending, let me rephrase, every GOOD! story, has an equally good ending."
"Permanence, perseverance and persistence in spite of all obstacles, discouragements, and impossibilities: It is this, that in all things distinguishes the strong soul from the weak." - Thomas Carlyle
"THESE are the times that try men's souls." - Thomas Paine (The American Crisis) 1776
"Never compete with someone who has nothing to lose." - Baltasar Gracian
"You know, I"m automatically attracted to beautiful  I just start kissing them. It"s like a magnet. Just kiss. I don"t even wait. And when you"re a star, they let you do it. You can do anything." Donald Trump
"In the depth of winter I finally learned that there was in me an invincible summer." - Albert Camus
"An epigram often flashes light into regions where reason shines but dimly."  Edwin P. Whipple
"Indeed, history is nothing more than a tableau of crimes and misfortunes."  Voltaire
"Do you realize if it weren't for Edison we'd be watching TV by candlelight?"  Al Boliska
"He's the kind of a guy who lights up a room just by flicking a switch."  Unknown
"You cannot now believe that you will ever feel better. But this is not true. You are sure to be happy again. Knowing this, truly believing it will make you less miserable now." -Abraham Lincoln
"Facta, non verba." (Acts, not words.)
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Kindness is a language that the deaf can hear and the blind can see" - MarkTwain
"To every age its art. To every art its freedom." Vienna Secession Art Movement
"The essential conditions of everything you do must be choice, love, passion."  Nadia Boulanger
"My love of fine art increased - the more of it I saw, the more of it I wanted to see."  J. Paul Getty
"Love is a serious mental disease." - Plato
"What we achieve inwardly will change outer reality." -Plutarch
"Our nation is facing a crisis of liberty if we do not control campaign expendatures. We must proove that elective office is not for sale. We must convince the public that elected officials are what James Madison intended us to be, agents of the soverign people, not the hired hands of rich givers."
"When your enemy has a gun, wear a bulletproof bodyvest; when your community have no faith, wear a negativityproof mindset." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"It"s often difficult to grasp the true simplicity of a new concept, so we make it complicated as a way of justifying our misunderstanding." -Lyle Keeny
"Misery generates hate." -Charlotte Bront
"Your conscience is the measure of the honesty of your selfishness. Listen to it carefully." - Richard Bach, Illusions: The Adventures of a Reluctant Messiah
"When you put on private hands something everybody desperately needs no matter the Will and Freedom of the Consumer (because you don't choose to be sick) then Laws of Free Market no longer apply and you create some kind of hiperinflation." - About Healthcare Systems
"Our elected leaders should not only expect our scrutiny, they should invite it." - Me :)
"It takes a village to raise a startup." - Nick NM Yap, founder of Travis &amp; Volareo
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone can see." Confucius
"But still try, for who knows what it is POSSIBLE." - Michael Faraday.
"I'd rather be optimistic and wrong, than pessimistic and right." - Elon Musk
"If I only could touch you and keep your skink in my hands,if I only could kiss you and hold your kisses in my mouth,if I only could fall in love and stay with your love for ever" (William Ventura)
"Everything will be okay in the end. If it's not okay, it's not the end." - John Lennon
"One of the best confidence builder is experience." - Jaymin Shah
"The stones do not speak,but they have a lot to say after being thrown" (William Ventura)
"Our greatest weakness lies in giving up. The most certain way to succeed is always to try just one more time." - Thomas A. Edison
"Some people care too much. I think it's called love." - AA Milne
10 Motivation Quotes that Tim Nemeckay Follows
"The pessimist complains about the wind; the optimist expects it to change; the realist adjusts the sails." -William Arthur Ward
"The upcoming hearing is a sham" - defense lawyer Joey Jackson on CNN.
"It's not what you look at that matters, it's what you see." - Henry David Thoreau
"It takes only one drink to get me drunk. The trouble is, I can't remember if it's the thirteenth or the fourteenth."  George Burns
"Nature is trying very hard to make us succeed, but nature does not depend on us. We are not the only experiment."  R. Buckminster Fuller
"I was not a child prodigy, because a child prodigy is a child who knows as much when it is a child as it does when it grows up."  Will Rogers
"I like life. It's something to do."  Ronnie Shakes
"Don't let your morals influence reality. You might not like what happens in the world but please realize that it does happen. Only then can a difference be made." - u/a-little-sleepy
"The principles of true art is not to portray, but to evoke."  Jerzy Kosinski
"Care and diligence bring luck."  Thomas Fuller
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." - Aristotle
"Care about what other people think and you will always be their prisoner."  Lao Tzu
"villains who twirl their moustaches are easy to spot. Those who clothe themselves in good deeds are well camouflaged." - Jean-Luc Picard, Star Trek TNG - The Drumhead
"Love is that condition in which the happiness of another person is essential to your own." __Robert A. Heinlein
"All ideas spread like viruses. The desire to be free is contagious, but is it a disease?" Elijah Kamski when questioned on the android deviance virus, Detroit: Become Human
"Does who lack discipline and resolve can never move forward"-reddit1ask2question
"Does who lack discipline and Resolve can never move forward"-reddit1ask2question
"You can always turn your back on a person, but never turn you back on a drug. It should always be infront of you like something you might have to kill." -Hunter S. Thompson
"Women are like Iphones: They like to be held, talked to, and touched. But push the wrong button and your ass is disconnected!"
"Facts don't matter"- Donald J. Trump, President of the United States
"By bringing shame to a person, how could one expect to make him a better man?" -Yamamoto Tsunetomo
"How much you can learn when you fail determines how far you will go into achieving your goals." - Roy T. Bennett
"Love is wise; hatred is foolish." - Bertrand Russell
"The fool doth think he is wise, but the wise man knows himself to be a fool." -Shakespeare
"If you focus on success, you"ll have stress. But if you pursue excellence, success will be guaranteed." - Deepak Chopra
"Far, yet near; such is the relationship of a man and a woman." - Sei Shonagon
"The real problem is not whether machines think but whether men do." --B.F. Skinner
"Vision without execution is just hallucination." - Henry Ford
"They promised us homes fit for heroes...instead, we got heroes fit for homes."
"Ohana means family and family means no one gets left behind or forgotten" - Lilo and Stitch
"We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a very average star. But we can understand Universe. That makes us something very special." - Stephen Hawking
"Empathy is about finding echoes of another person in yourself." - Mohsin Hamid
"The funny thing about LONELY people is we keep on finding the chance to escape,to spend more time alone away from everyone else.It's like u were never really alone."
"Let the world in and sooner or later, people will see the oceans pouring out of you. You'll walk down the street and someone will mistake you for the sky. You are beautiful because you let yourself feel, and that is a brave thing indeed." -Shinji Moon
"If a man is called to be a street sweeper. He should sweep streets even as a Michelangelo painted , or Beethoven composed music or Shakespeare wrote poetry. He should sweep streets so well that all hosts of heaven and earth pause to say; "Here lives a great sweeper who did his job well ".
"The world is full of magic things, patiently waiting for our senses to grow sharper." - W.B. Yeats
"In the small matters trust the mind, in the large ones the heart." - Sigmund Freud
"One day, in retrospect, the years of struggle will strike you as the most beautiful." - Sigmund Freud
"The man of knowledge must be able not only to love his enemies but also to hate his friends."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"The most dangerous strategy is to jump a chasm in two leaps."  Benjamin Disraeli
"Hello seeker! Now don't feel alone here in the New Age, because there's a seeker born every minute."  Firesign Theatre
"Everyone rises to their level of incompetence."  Laurence J. Peter
"Success means we go to sleep at night knowing that our talents and abilities were used in a way that served others." - Marianne Williamson
"Most people, in fact, will not take the trouble in finding out the truth, but are much more inclined to accept the first story they hear." - Thucydides
"How would you weak humans kill me? My skin is made of steel, my breath is made of fire and my heart is forged by darkness itself! When my deed here on earth is done, I shall return to hell, and make the devil my slave." - the edgiest dragon in my shortstory
"Leadership is practiced not so much in words as in attitude and in actions." - Harold S. Geneen
"Obviously God was a solution, and obviously none so satisfactory will ever be found again."
"Do what you dream of doing even while you're afraid." - Arianna Huffington
"Applause is a receipt, not a bill."  Dale Carnegie
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"A painting that is well composed is half finished."  Pierre Bonnard
"Accept no one"s definition of your life, but define yourself."  Harvey Fierstein
"Wealth, not culpability, shapes outcomes." - Bryan Stevenson
"Even in our sleep, pain which cannot forget falls drop by drop upon the heart, until, in our own despair, against our will, comes wisdom through the awful grace of God." - Aeschylus
"The smallest act of kindness is worth more than the greatest intention."  Khalil Gibran
"and almost always, it's the people who've hurt you the most who you never seem to get over at all" -r.m. drake
"death does not. Once death exists, I will not. Why should I fear something I will never experience?" - Dale McGowan.
"When you fear nothing, you have nothing to fear" - S.F. Chandler
"If someone suggests to you that you should be either a bee or a wasp, remind them of the simple elegance of a bee with a teensy little knife taped to it's butt." - Shel Frankenstein
"Pride is not the opposite of shame, but its source. True humility is the only antidote to shame." - Uncle Iroh
"Who would want a life without problems?! Just think of all the stories you can tell"-Me
"War Criminal"? That's some liberal bullshit! I'm a hero to these people! - CPT Bogdan after killing the player, Ruiner
"Capitalism works because the people who have everything are always able to convince the people who have nothing that working like slaves will let them have something. The problem now is the have-everythings don't want to give anything anymore" - George Carlin
"No man fears what he has seen grow." - African Proverb
"Love is just like an ocean, just think about it. Some people swims away, and they get through it,but others drowns in it..." - mGz1337
"To be successful you need friends and to be very successful you need enemies." - Sidney Sheldon
"You met me at a very strange time in my life." - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"Failures are the stairs we climb to reach success." - Roy T. Bennett
"Too many people have opinions on things they know nothing about. And the more ignorant they are, the more opinions they have." -Thomas Hildern
"You are not great at speaking, but very bad at keeping quiet." Epicharmus
"The distance between insanity and genius is measured only by success" - Ian Fleming
"Life is much more successfully looked at from a single window." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"The shape of happiness might resemble glass. You don't usually notice it, it's still definitely there, you merely have to change your point of view slightly, and then that glass will sparkle when it reflects the light." - Lelouch Vi Britannia
"Wise men speak because they have something to say; Fools because they have to say something." - Plato
"When I was a kid my parents moved a lot, but I always found them."  Rodney Dangerfield
"I don't like composers who think. It gets in the way of their plagiarism."  Howard Dietz
"He felt that his whole life was some kind of dream and he sometimes wondered whose it was and whether they were enjoying it."  Douglas Adams
"It is possible to be below flattery as well as above it."  Thomas Babington Macaulay
''Bitches ain't shit but hoes and tricks'' - Snoop Doggy Dogg (1992)
"Stand together yet not too near together: For the pillars of the temple stand apart, And the oak tree and the cypress grow not in each other's shadow." - Kahlil Gibran
"One's art goes as far and as deep as one's love goes."  Andrew Wyeth
"To begin, begin."  William Wordsworth
"Every moment you live in the past is a moment you waste in the present." - Tony Robbins
"Fame was like a drug. But what was even more like a drug was the drugs"  Simpson S11E22
"Imagination is more important than knowledge. For knowledge is limited, whereas imagination embraces the entire world, stimulating progress, giving birth to evolution." - Albert Einstein
"Ooh, somebody pooted! Somebody must be having a BAD DAY!" - Ganae "Ms. Mac" McAlpin-Toney
"We have CheezIts, we have CheezIts, we have a pear" - My Dad
"Success is a lousy teacher... It makes people think they can do no wrong." - Bill Gates
"With the truth so dull and depressing, the only working alternative is wild bursts of madness and filigree." -Hunter S. Thompson
"Everything is about sex. Except for sex, that's about power." - Oscar Wilde
"Holding onto anger is like grasping onto a hot coal; burning yourself while hoping you may throw it at the other." - Tsunesabur Makiguchi, founder of Soka Gakkai Buddhist sect
"You know, sometimes all you need is 20 seconds of insane courage. Just, literally, 20 seconds of just embarrassing bravery. And I promise you, something great will come of it." --Benjamin Mee, (We Bought A Zoo)
"Every light can be extinguished. The intellect is a light. Therefore it can be extinguished." --Arthur Schopenhauer
"When we are planning for posterity, we ought to remember that virtue is not hereditary." Thomas Paine (1776)
"Success is most often achieved by those who don't know that failure is inevitable." - Coco Chanel
"Laws: We know what they are, and what they are worth! They are spider webs for the rich and mighty, steel chains for the poor and weak, fishing nets in the hands of government." -Pierre Joseph Proudhon
" Creativity Is Intelligence Having Fun. "  Albert Einstein
"All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence; then success is sure. " - Mark Twain
"I'm not a leader. I just do what I have to do; sometimes people come with me." - Edgar Friendly, Demolition Man
"We learn from failure, not from success!" - Bram Stoker
"Success is stumbling from failure to failure with no loss of enthusiasm." - Winston S. Churchill
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W. P. Kinsella
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." - Herman Melville
"You will not achieve enlightenment unless you lighten up." - Timothy Winters
"But when life is squandered through soft and careless living, and when it's spent on no worthwhile pursuit, death finally presses and we realize that the life which we didn't notice passing has passed away" - Seneca
"A developed country is not a place where the poor have cars. It's where the rich use public transportation." - Gustavo Petro
"The English live with the turmoil of two incompatible passions: a strange appetite for adventure and a strange appetite for legality." Jorge Luis Borges
"I like to listen. I have learned a great deal from listening carefully." - Ernest Hemingway
"Life never demanded that we succeed at anything or even be good at living , it only asked that we stick around for the ride ,"-Samuel Decker Thompson
"Nothing"s worth getting depressed, not even depression. Because once you acknowledge the darkness, it is all you can see."  Unknown
"He felt everything, poor Vincent! He felt too much! It made him want the impossible." -Pere Tanguy
"The value of things is not the time they last, but the intensity with which they occur. That is why there are unforgettable moments and unique people!" - Fernando Pessoa
"Try not to become a man of success. Rather become a man of value." - Albert Einstein
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I want us to ask ourselves every day, how are we using technology to make a real difference in people"s lives." Barack Obama
"Do your own thinking independently. Be the chess player, not the chess piece." - Ralph Charell.
"To the rulers of the state then, if to any, it belongs of right to use falsehood, to deceive either enemies or their own citizens, for the good of the state: and no one else may meddle with this privilege." - Plato
"Hell is having the person you are meet the person you could have become" - anon
"I do not fear death. I had been dead for billions and billions of years before I was born, and had not suffered the slightest inconvenience from it." - Mark Twain
"If time flies when you're having fun, it hits the afterburners when you don't think you're having enough."  Jef Mallett
"In theory, there is no difference between theory and practice; In practice, there is."  Chuck Reid
"A specification that will not fit on one page of 8.5x11 inch paper cannot be understood."  Mark Ardis
"Frisbeetarianism is the belief that when you die, your soul goes up on the roof and gets stuck."  George Carlin
"I can't give you a sure-fire formula for success, but I can give you a formula for failure: try to please everybody all the time." - Herbert Bayard Swope
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston S. Churchill
"You were born with wings, why prefer to crawl through life?" - Rumi
"Instead of worrying about what you cannot control, shift your energy to what you can create." - Roy T. Bennett
"Time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." - Marthe Troly-Curtin
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." - Albert Einstein
"I am a part of everything that I have read."  Theodore Roosevelt
"Light in Nature creates the movement of colors."  Robert Delaunay
"As you make your bed, so you must lay." Romanian Proverb
"The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity. The fears are paper tigers. You can do anything you decide to do. You can act to change and control your life; and the procedure, the process is its own reward." - Amelia Earhart
"We cannot change the cards we are dealt, just how we play the hand." - Randy Pausch
"Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know."-Ernest Hemingway
"Quantity has a Quality all its own" - Napoleon Bonaparte
"As he read, I fell in love the way you fall asleep: slowly, and then all at once." __ John Green
"Now and then it's good to pause in our pursuit of happiness and just be happy." -Guillaume Apollinaire
" An opinion is formed the moment you suspend your quest for the truth." - Mistah 2013
"What? A great man? I always see only the actor of his own ideal." - Friedrich Nietzsche (Beyond Good and Evil)
"What I once thought was oppressing me I now find to be wiggling." - Bluntston Churchkill
"When the axe came into the woods, many of the trees said, 'At least the handle is one of us."  Proverb
"I'm Living Like There's No Tomorrow, Because There Isn't One."
"Every time you show your feelings, you apologize. Have you ever had an emotion in your life that you weren"t ashamed of? "  R.J. Anderson, Ultraviolet
"Not all of us can do great things. But we can do small things with great love." - Mother Teresa
"It is our belief that love of possessions is a weakness that must be overcome. In time it will disrupt one's spiritual balance. Therefore children are taught to give what they prize most, that they may taste the happiness of giving." - Ohiyesa
"Do what you can, with what you have, where you are." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Logic will get you from A to Z; imagination will get you everywhere." - Albert Einstein
"All the gods, All the heavens and all the Hells are within you" - Joseph Campbell
"He prefered to risk his life for something instead of waiting to die for nothing." - A Brave Mortal
"We don't see things as they are, we see them as we are." - Anas Nin
"Sometimes the questions are complicated and the answers are simple." - Dr. Seuss
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"If you can't explain it to a six year old, you don't understand it yourself." - Albert Einstein
"For every minute you are angry you lose sixty seconds of happiness." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"With the way people treat appearance you'd think good-looks were a matter of life-or-death! But we know fashion is much more important than that..." - Effigy radio ad, All Points Bulletin
"The world is more malleable than you think, and it's waiting for you to hammer it into shape." -Bono
"Those who write code do not mean they're smart, coding is just a tool for building in the digital world, what you've created is what decides whether you're smart." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Agitation over happenings which we are powerless to modify, either because they have not yet occurred or are occurring at an inaccessible distance us, achieves nothing beyond the inoculation of here and now with the remote or anticipated evil that is the object of our distress." -Aldous Huxley
"The greatest glory in living lies not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall." -Nelson Mandela
"Show me the man who is both sober and happy, and I will show you the crinkled anus of a lying asshole." -William Burroughs
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas A. Edison
.
"Either to be completely inside or outside, do not make your mind believe that you will survive if you miss it." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Don't try, either to be completely inside or outside, do not make your mind believe that you will survive if you miss it." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Don't try, either to be completely inside or outside, do not make your mind believe that he can survive if you miss it." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"A high degree of intellect tends to make a man unsocial." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift of God, which is why we call it the present." - Bill Keane
"Real knowledge is to know the extent of one"s ignorance" - Confucius
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"In God we trust; all others bring data." - W. Edwards Deming
"Literature is an occupation in which you have to keep proving your talent to people who have none."  Jules Renard
"You cannot make a man by standing a sheep on its hind legs. But by standing a flock of sheep in that position you can make a crowd of men."  Max Beerbohm
"I am prepared to meet my Maker. Whether my Maker is prepared for the great ordeal of meeting me is another matter."  Sir Winston Churchill
"If there is something to gain and nothing to lose by asking, by all means ask" W. Clement Stone.
"Unconditional support from our woman is what will snap us out of our boyish behavior and inject us with a desire to be a stronger man. Only when you accept us as we are, who we are, will we want to become someone better." - John Kim
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace" - Jimi Hendrix
" We begin to live when we have conceived life as a tragedy." - W.B. Yeats
"If moderation is a fault, then indifference is a crime."  Jack Kerouac
"I dream of painting and then I paint my dream."  Vincent Van Gogh
"It is a remarkable dichotomy. In many ways, Clark is the most human of us all. Then... he shoots fire from the skies and it is difficult not to think of him as a god. And how fortunate we all are that it does not occur to him" - Batman
"It is never too late to be what you might have been." George Eliot
"Any jackass can kick down a barn but it takes a good carpenter to build one" -Lyndon B. Johnson
"You should try to write your own songs", to the Beatles and the Rolling Stones: unknown.
"Inspiration comes from within yourself. One has to be positive. When you"re positive, good things happen."_ Deep Roy
"Reputation is everything; guard it with your life" - Robert Greene, 48 Laws of Power
"Have you ever loved someone so much that you realized you were doing the loving for both of you?" - E.G.I
"There is no other way than forward."
"It's easier to ask forgiveness than it is to get permission"- Rear Admiral Grace Murray Hopper
"You must have the right balance of patience and determination in order to succeed" - Unknown
"If You're a good man - you watch what's in the dark. If you're bad - you are the dark".
"If you're explaining, you're losing." -- Ronald Reagan
" 'Normality', buddy, is majority rule. If 51 out of 100 people act one way, that's normal. Now there's only two of us here, so guess which of us is normal? Which one of us is sane? It's whichever one of us survives." - Duvall, Haze
"that is what abuse is: knowing you are going to get salt but still hoping for sugar for nineteen years. -" - Amanda Lovelace
"We are forced to choose among the elements of human nature [that we want to embrace] by reference to value systems which these same elements created in an evolutionary age now long vanished." - Edward Wilson, On Human Nature
"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"Weirdness is a muscle that needs to be flexed." -CJ Casciotta
"Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more, so that we may fear less." - Marie Curie
"I was not born to be forced. I will breathe after my own fashion. Let us see who is the strongest." - Henry David Thoreau,
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"My body knows better than I, but who is I?" -unknown
"Sorrows are our best educator. A man can see further through a tear than a telescope" - Bruce Lee
"I wish there was a way to know you were in the good old days before you've actually left them" - Unknown
"Economic power is exercised by means of a positive, by offering men a reward, an incentive, a payment, a value; political power is exercised by means of a negative, by the threat of punishment, injury, imprisonment, destruction. The businessman"s tool is values; the bureaucrat"s tool is fear"
"If life were predictable it would cease to be life, and be without flavor." Eleanor Roosevelt
"Play what you want and let the world play what he wants, and learn how to control your ears to hear what you want." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"I know it's your first heartbreak. I know it hurts. Nothing hurts like the first one." - Stuck in love
"If the American intellectual class rivets itself to a "liberal" philosophy ...there will then be need for "democrats" whose task will be to divide, confuse, disturb, keep the intellectual waters constantly in motion to prevent any such ice from ever forming."- Randolph Bourne (1914)
"Let us be grateful to people who make us happy, they are the charming gardeners who make our souls blossom." -Marcel Proust
"If you do not want to write, at least spit on a piece of paper, put it in an envelope, and send it to me. You are not taking any notice of me at all. God forgive you  all I wanted was a few words from you." - Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky
"We can only see a short distance ahead, but we can see plenty there that needs to be done." - Alan Turing
"We can only see a short distance ahead, but we can see plenty there that needs to be done." - Alan Turing,
"Let us be grateful to people who make us happy, they are the charming gardeners who make our souls blossom." -Marcel Proust
"If my life is going to mean anything, I have to live it myself." -Rich Riordan
"Don't let yesterday use up too much of today."- Will Rogers
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"If you look for truth, you may find comfort in the end; if you look for comfort you will not get either comfort or truth only soft soap and wishful thinking to begin, and in the end, despair." - C.S. Lewis
"The surest way to corrupt a youth is to instruct him to hold in higher esteem those who think alike than those who think differently." - Friedrich Nietzsche
""  Rita Mae Brown
"I get a lot of cracks about my hair, mostly from men who don't have any."  Ann Richards
"It is a waste of energy to be angry with a man who behaves badly, just as it is to be angry with a car that won't go."  Bertrand Russell
"In general we are least aware of what our minds do best."  Marvin Minsky
"Words often betray their own purpose, obscuring the very thoughts they are designed to express." - Francis Bacon
" There are 3 stages of scientific discovery - First people deny its true; Then they deny it is important; Finally they credit the wrong person. " - || Alexander Humbell ||
"Most economic fallacies derive from the tendency to assume that there is a fixed pie, that one party can gain only at the expense of another." - Milton Friedman
"The other Shaltanac's joopleberry shrub is always a more mauvy shade of pinky-russet." - Shaltanac saying(Douglas Adams)
"What simple action could you take today to produce a new momentum toward success in your life?" Tony Robbins
"Man is disturbed not by things, but by the views he takes of them."-Epictetus
"Do not throw wizards in the urinal, for they get soggy and quick to anger."
"In art, the obvious is a sin."  Edward Dmytryk
"Once, I saw a bee drown in honey, and I understood." - Nikos Kazantzakis
"Sooner or later, those who win are those who think they can."  Paul Tournier
"There comes a day when you realise turning the page is the best feeling in the world, because you realise there"s so much more to the book than the page you were stuck on" - Zayn Malik
" Life is a long lesson in humility. "_ James M. Barrie
"If someone's ungrateful and you tell him he's ungrateful, okay, you've called him a name. You haven't solved anything." Robert Pirsig, Zen and the Art of Motorcycle Maintenance
" Keep your eyes on the stars and your feet on the ground."_ Theodore Roosevelt
"One should aim to be worthy. But worthy of what? Worthy of one's self." - Daniel N. Robinson
"Time is really the only capital that any human being has, and the only thing he can't afford to lose." - Thomas Edison
"The only difference between me and a madman is that I'm not mad." -S. Dali
"The virtuosos look to the students of the world to do their share in the education of the great musical public. Do not waste your time with music that is trite or ignoble. Life is too short to spend it wandering in the barren Saharas of musical trash." - Sergei Rachmaninoff
"It does no harm to the romance of the sunset to know a little bit about it." - Carl Sagan
"If death ever comes your way and won't let you pass, make sure you scream right back in his face." The Thanos Imperative
"I don't hate people that are smarter, more creative and imaginative than I am. I hire them."
"To regret the past, to hope in the future, and never to be satisfied with the present: that is what I spend my whole life doing" - Peter Ilyich Tchaikovsky
"A knot of sadness in the throat is able to hang a feeling and choke a thought" (William Ventura)
"Darwin was worth more than 30 million ordinary people." - Bertrand Russell
"Employ your time in improving yourself by other men's writings so that you shall come easily by what others have labored hard for." - Socrates
"Your skin isn't paper, don't cut it. Your face isn't a mask, don't cover it. Your size isn't a book, don't judge it. Your life isn't a film, don't end it. You are beautiful.
"I wanna hang a map of the world in my house. Then I'm gonna put pins into all the locations that I've traveled to. But first, I'm gonna have to travel to the top two corners of the map so it won't fall down."  Mitch Hedberg
"Listening, not imitation, may be the sincerest form of flattery."  Dr. Joyce Brothers
"Progress might have been all right once, but it has gone on too long."  Ogden Nash
"Assuming either the Left Wing or the Right Wing gained control of the country, it would probably fly around in circles."  Pat Paulsen
"We have never heard the devil's side of the story, God wrote the whole book." Anatole Franc
"But as we laugh we are watched by large and awful faces from beyond, and on these faces there are no smiles." - Hillaire Belloc
"Keep your face always toward the sunshine - and shadows will fall behind you." - Walt Whitman
"If you are lucky enough to find a way of life you love, you have to find the courage to live it."  John Irving
"Recognizing the need is the primary condition for design."  Charles Eames
"Comparison is the thief of joy." - Theadore Roosevelt
"Life tastes like Lucky Charms. It's mostly filled with those mediocre wheat pieces, but every once in a while you will encounter a marshmallow." - Me
"I"ve long said that capitalism without bankruptcy is like Christianity without Hell." USAF Colonel Frank Borman - oldest living astronaut, businessman, one of the first men to orbit the Moon
"Never forget what you are, for surely the world will not. Make it your strength. Then it can never be your weakness. Armour yourself in it, and it will never be used to hurt you." - George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
"Life is whatever we make it. The traveller is the journey. What we see is not what we see but who we are." Fernando Pessoa
"I feel like a part of my soul has loved you since the beginning of everything. Maybe we"re from the same star." - Emery Allen
"Tell me what a man finds sexually attractive and I will tell you his entire philosophy of life. Show me the woman he sleeps with and I will tell you his valuation of himself."-Ayn Rand
"It goes without saying that a civilization which leaves so large a number of its participants unsatisfied and drives them into revolt neither has nor deserves the prospect of a lasting existence." - Sigmund Freud
"Sure, I can help you, but we might have to metaphorically make a deal with the devil, and by "devil", I mean Robot Devil, and by "metaphorically", I mean get your coat." - Bender, Futurama
"The tongue is a sword that usually gives peace with the truth,and on the other side create war with a lie" (William Ventura)
"Those who can imagine anything, can create the impossible." - Alan Turing
"Let us ask ourselves first what we really do want, not what recent legal decisions have told us to want, or recent logical philosophies proved that we must want, or recent social prophecies predicted that we shall someday want..." G. K . Chesterton
"There are two ways to slide easily through life; to believe everything or to doubt everything. Both ways save us from thinking."  Alfred Korzybski
"I know nothing about sex because I was always married."  Zsa Zsa Gabor
"I take the view, and always have, that if you cannot say what you are going to say in twenty minutes you ought to go away and write a book about it."  Lord Brabazon
"To the artist there is never anything ugly in nature."  Auguste Rodin
"More business is lost every year through neglect than through any other cause."  Rose Kennedy
"And I don't want the world to see me 'Cause I don't think that they'd understand When everything's meant to be broken I just want you to know who I am"-The Goo Goo Dolls (Iris)
"Minds that have nothing to confer, find little to perceive." - William Wordsworth
"So avoid using the word "very" because it"s lazy. A man is not very tired, he is exhausted. Don"t use very sad, use morose. Language was invented for one reason, boys  to woo women  and, in that endeavor, laziness will not do. It also won"t do in your essays." Robin Williams in Dead Poets Society
" The good life is a process, not a state of being. It is a direction not a destination." Carl Rogers
" Life has no meaning unless one lives it with a will, at least to the limit of one"s will."_ Paul Gauguin
"In our obsessive wish to arrive, we often forget the most important thing, which is the journey" - Paulo Coelho
"There is a wonderful mythical law of nature that the three things we crave most in life -- happiness, freedom, and peace of mind -- are always attained by giving them to someone else."--U.S. Army General Peyton Conway March (1864-1955):
"The most extraordinary thing in the world is an ordinary man and an ordinary woman and their ordinary children."--G.K. Chesterton
"A fool thinks himself to be wise, but a wise man knows himself to be a fool" - William Shakespeare
"Good judgment comes from experience, and a lot of that comes from bad judgment." - Will Rogers
"All progress takes place outside the comfort zone." -Michael John Bobak
"Go ahead, tickle my bunghole with your nose, I might breathe back." - Krissy
"Sometimes it is the people no one can imagine anything of who do the things no one can imagine." - Alan Turing
"Time ain't money when all you got is time." - Greg Brown
"True terror is to wake up one morning and discover that your high school class is running the country."
"Nothing surely is as potent as a law that may not be disobeyed. It has the force of the water drop that hollows the stone. A small dainty task, if it be really daily, will beat the labours of a spasmodic Hercules."  Anthony Trollope
"When we got into office, the thing that surprised me the most was that things were as bad as we'd been saying they were."  John F. Kennedy
"Only dull people are brilliant at breakfast."  Oscar Wilde
"Nothing fails like success."  Gerald Nachman
"I am not sure that I exist, actually. I am all the writers that I have read, all the people that I have met, all the women that I have loved; all the cities I have visited." - Jorge Luis Borges
"Inspiration is a guest that does not willingly visit the lazy." - Pyotr Ilyich Tchaikovsky
50 Uplifting Quotes  Full Package Of Motivation For Hard Times in Life
"If you only value my advice when I agree with you, you don't value it at all." - John Flanagan, Eraks ransom.
"If we had funerals for all the creativity we kill, we would soon run out of cemeteries."
"If we had funerals for all the creativity we kill, we would soon run out of cemeteries."
"We can make our minds so like still water that beings gather about us that they may see, it may be, their own images, and so live for a moment with a clearer, perhaps even with a fiercer life because of our quiet." - William Butler Yeats
"There"s no need to talk about it, because the truth of what one says lies in what one does." - Bernard Schlink
" Don't be afraid your life will end. Be afraid that it will never begin " - Grace Hansen
"And I have exposed myself to art so that my work has something beyond just the usual potter."  Beatrice Wood
"It is easy to sit up and take notice, What is difficult is getting up and taking action."  Honore de Balzac
"The best of humankind comes out during a tragedy. It"s just sad that it takes a tragedy to bring people together." - Tom Brokaw
"If a man will begin with certainties, he shall end in doubts; but if he will be content to begin with doubts, he shall end in certainties." - Francis Bacon
"People find it far easier to forgive others for being wrong than being right." - J.K. Rowling (Harry Potter and the Half Blood Prince)
"Revenge is a dish best served with another dish." --Jaron Davis
"The last refuge of the damned is to make a hell of earth." -unknown
"sadly, sometimes it's too late. and that's the thing about time, we cannot get it back" - kiana azizian
" It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might as well not have lived at all  in which case, you fail by default"- J.K. Rowling
"Normality, buddy, is purely statistical. If 99 out of 100 people act one way, thats normal. Its majority rule. Now there's only two of us here, so which one of us is normal? Whichever one of us survives." - Duvall, Haze
" Life is like an onion: you peel it off one layer at a time, and sometimes you weep. " Carl Sandburg
"Having power is not nearly as important as what you choose to do with it." - Roald Dahl
"Change your own circumstances instead of expecting your circumstances to be changed by someone else" David A bednar
"One must have the strongest will to do the right thing"-improvised from Thanos' dialogue.
"Let the dog bark, the lion is still the king." - The classy people
"There is no talent here. This is hard work. This is smart work. This is an obsession. You could be anyone if you put in the time. You 'll reach the top and that's that. I am not talented. I am obsessed! Obsessed with success." - Conor Mcgregor
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire" - Charles Bukowski
"Suddenly you arrived at the door of my eyes,and with the key of your smile you manage to enter at the privacy of my heart" (William Ventura)
"Sometimes the rivals are closer to you in life than the friends." -Ray Davies
"Some of the most beautiful things worth having in your life come wrapped in a crown of thorns."  Shannon L. Alder
"Some old wounds never truly heal, and bleed again at the slightest word."  George R.R. Martin
"But when life is squandered through soft and careless living, and when it's spent on no worthwhile pursuit, death finally presses and we realize that the life which we didn't notice passing has passed away" - Seneca
"If you don"t read the newspaper, you"re uninformed. If you do read the newspaper, you"re misinformed." - Unknown
"If you see life as a chess game, you will understand that your life depends on how much you think and not how much you talk, so think and keep silent as long as you have not yet reached the stage to say checkmate." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
50+ Inspirational Quotes By Famous Personalities And Inspiring Figures
"I am all in a sea of wonders. I doubt; I fear; I think strange things which I dare not confess to my own soul." - Bram Stoker, Dracula
"Sooner or later, one way or the other, Apocalypse always comes in life..." - Jordan Peterson
''Tears shed for another person are not a sign of weakness. They are a sign of a pure heart.'' -Jos N. Harris
"Time can bring you down. Time can bend your knees. Time can break your heart. Have you begging please, begging please" - Eric Clapton, Tears in Heaven
"Life gets much easier when you learn to accept all the apologies you never got"
"The very substance of the ambitious is merely the shadow of a dream."  William Shakespeare
"The nice thing about egotists is that they don't talk about other people."  Lucille S. Harper
"Some people will never learn anything because they understand everything too soon."  Alexander Pope
"For a successful technology, reality must take precedence over public relations, for Nature cannot be fooled."  Richard Feynman
"The bigger the dream, the more important the team." Robin Sharma
"Fairy tales are more than true: not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten." - Neil Gaiman
" I didn't have to go easy on you. A different binding agent, a stronger mix... I want you to remember that. I wanted to remind you to stay out of my way. In all the years to come, in your most private moments, I want you to remember the one man who beat you!" -Batman (Dark Knight Returns)
"I refuse to confide and don't like it when people write about art."  Balthus
" Every Morning in Africa, a gazelle wakes up it knows it must run faster than the fastest lion or it will be killed. Every morning a lion wakes up it knows it must outrun the slowest gazelle or it will starve to death. It doesn't matter whether you are a lion or a gazelle, you'd better be running."
"Big words seldom accompany good deeds."  Charlotte Whitton
"We dance round in a ring and suppose, but the secret sits in the middle and knows." - Robert Frost
" The only absolute knowledge attainable by man is that life is meaningless " -Tolstoy
"I speak Spanish to God, Italian to women, French to men, and German to my horse." - Charles V
"The knowledge that makes us cherish innocence makes innocence unattainable." Irving Howe
"When the blood in your veins returns to the sea, and the earth in your bones returns to the ground, perhaps then you will remember that this land does not belong to you, it is you who belong to the land." - unknown Native American
"I could see the white man did not care for each other the way our people did. They would take everything from each other if they could. Some had more of everything than they could use, while crowds of people had nothing at all. This could not be better than the old ways of my people." - Black Elk
"Success is the greatest middle finger of all time". - Vikas Yadav
"One who doesn"t fall , doesn"t stand back up" - Fedor Emelianko.
"What we achieve inwardly will change outer reality." Plutarch
"Dont give up when the pressure mounts. Face your doubts. Master your fears" Jeffery R. Holland
"All progress takes place outside the comfort zone." - Michael John Bobak
" Remember, your work may be only to sweep a railway crossing, but it is your duty to keep it so clean that no other crossing in the world is as clean as yours." - M. Viswesariya
" Life is like playing a violin in public and learning the instrument as one goes on. "_ Samuel Butler
"The iron never lies to you" -Henry Rollins
"You can't shape the world before the world shapes you" - Nemanja Bajkin
"Get busy living or get busy dying. "_ Stephen King
"My master is a great tyrant, he treats me like a common Irishman." -Anonymous slave
"Everybody is a genius. But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will live its whole life believing that it is stupid." - Albert Einstein
" What lies behind you and what lies in front of you, pales in comparison to what lies inside of you. " _Ralph Waldo Emerson
"All lies and jest, still a man hears what he wants to hear and disregards the rest..." -Simon &amp; Garfunkel (The Boxer)
"Any fact that can"t stand up to analysis can"t be considered a fact." - Carolyn Jones
" Let me tell you something. There is no nobility in poverty. I've been a rich man, and I've been poor man. And I choose rich every fucking time. " - Jordan Belfort
"I love the fact that I can make people happy, in any form. Even if it"s just an hour of their lives, if I can make them feel lucky or make them feel good, or bring a smile to a sour face, that to me is worthwhile."  Freddie Mercury
"Each day in the week not worked is a portion of the dependency machines have on us to keep them operating needlessly thrown away" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Mathematicians are like Frenchmen: whatever you say to them they translate into their own language and forthwith it is something entirely different." -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"The key is not to prioritize what's on your schedule, but to schedule your priorities." Stephen Covey
"Familiarity breeds contempt  and children." - Mark Twain
"The first principle is that you must not fool yourself and you are the easiest person to fool."  Richard P. Feynman
"There's always a million reasons not to do something" - [Jan Levenson, The Office, 2005]
"People get all fouled up because they want the world to have meaning as if it were words As if you were a mere word, as if you were something that could be looked up in a dictionary. You are meaning."
"The better I get to know men, the more I find myself loving dogs."  Charles De Gaulle
"Good judgment comes from experience, and a lot of that comes from bad judgment." Will Rogers
"Nothing's so apt to undermine your confidence in a product as knowing that the commercial selling it has been approved by the company that make it."  Franklin P. Jones
"The great thing about democracy is that it gives every voter a chance to do something stupid."  Art Spander
"Reality is the leading cause of stress amongst those in touch with it."  Jane Wagner
"Nobody believes the official spokesman... but everybody trusts an unidentified source."  Ron Nesen
"Man as an individual is a genius. But men in the mass form the headless monster, a great, brutish idiot that goes where prodded."  Charlie Chaplin
"Anything that makes weak - physically, intellectually and spiritually, reject it as poison." -Swami Vivekananda
"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It"s the transition that"s troublesome." -Isaac Asimov
"The shell must break before the bird can fly." - Alfred Tennyson
"He who possesses art and science has religion; he who does not possess them, needs religion." Goethe
"You will never win if you never begin." - Helen Rowland
"Good painting is the kind that looks like sculpture."  Michelangelo
"When I"m right, no one remembers. When I"m wrong, no one forgets.." (source unknown)
"Living in dreams of yesterday, we find ourselves still dreaming of impossible future conquests."  Charles Lindbergh
"True peace is not absence of tension; it is the presence of justice." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"The reason I don"t worry about society is, nineteen people knocked down two buildings and killed thousands. Hundreds of people ran into those buildings to save them. I"ll take those odds every f*cking day." - Jon Stewart
"You can fix lazy, you can't fix stupid."
"Life can only be understood backwards, but it must be lived forwards." - Soren Kierkegaard
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." - Jiddu Krishnamurti
"What makes you different or weirdthat"s your strength." - Meryl Streep
"I miss you when you"re gone... going through your things makes me feel like you"re with me." -Edie Britt
"A forecast is something you expect, and weather is something you get. I dont see the point in idle expectation" -Magda Rakovic (Beholder 2)
"cat food, it stinks a bit, but if you don't put up with the smell, the little kitten will die." - Karl Pilkignton
"For nobody needs a smile so much as those who have none left to give!" - Dale Carnegie
"Ever tried? Ever failed? No matter. Try again. Fail again. Fail better." - Samuel Beckett
"I try to meet people who are smarter than me," - Eddie Jones
"Man is nothing else but what he makes of himself. Such is the first principle of existentialism." - Jean Paul Sartre
"Even a mistake may turn out to be the one thing necessary to a worthwhile achievement." - Henry Ford
"School is a tractor of despair that runs you over every morning"
"Virtue is nothing without the trial of temptation, for there is no conflict without an enemy, no victory without strife." --Pope St. Leo the Great
"All good things come to an end, and unfortunately most bad things don't" - Can't remember the source. Anyone?
"Be the love you never received." - Rune Lazuli
"September 11, 2001, revealed heroism in ordinary people who might have gone through their lives never called upon to demonstrate the extent of their courage." Geraldine Brooks
"You know someone loves you when they"re willing to be alone for you."
"Abundance is a process of letting go; that which is empty can receive." - Bryant H. McGill
" Look deep into nature, and then you will understand everything better. "_ Albert Einstein
" Do not take life too seriously. You will never get out of it alive. "_ Elbert Hubbard
"Run mad as often as you choose, but do not faint"  Jane Austen
"Experience is what you get when you don't get what you want." -unknown
"Find your honor not in your station, nor the words and gifts of those who seek control, but in yourself--in your actions, deeds, and soul. To look anywhere else is a lie." --Destiny 2: Forsaken
"It"s human nature to start taking things for granted again when danger isn"t banging loudly on the door."  David Hackworth
"Of course I"ll hurt you. Of course you"ll hurt me. Of course we will hurt each other. But this is the very condition of existence. To become spring, means accepting the risk of winter. To become presence, means accepting the risk of absence." - Antoine de Saint-Exupry.
"When I meet a man I ask myself, 'Is this the man I want my children to spend their weekends with?'"  Rita Rudner
"Sure there are dishonest men in local government. But there are dishonest men in national government too."  Richard M. Nixon
"I don't really trust a sane person."  Lyle Alzado
"Sometimes you climb out of bed in the morning and you think, I'm not going to make it, but you laugh inside  remembering all the times you've felt that way." - Charles Bukowski
"The more you expect, the more disappointed you will get."
"Ideas are cheap. The difficult part is finding the team to execute them."- Raymond Kwok
"If you go out looking for friends, you're going to find they are very scarce. If you go out to be a friend, you'll find them everywhere..." - Zig Ziglar
"Life imitates art far more than art imitates Life."  Oscar Wilde
"One cannot and must not try to erase the past merely because it does not fit the present."  Golda Meir
"It"s not whether you get knocked down. It"s whether you get up."  Vince Lombardi
"A truth that's told with bad intent beats all the lies you can invent." - William Blake
"Moral certainty is always a sign of cultural inferiority. The more uncivilized the man, the surer he is that he knows precisely what is right and what is wrong. All human progress, even in morals, has been the work of men who have doubted the current moral values, not of men who have... [cont]"
"When everything seems to be going against you, remember that the airplane takes off against the wind, not with it." - Henry Ford
"Whether you think you can, or you think you can"tyou"re right." - Henry Ford
"The delicate illusions that get us through life can only stand so much strain." - Hunter S Thompson
"Don't follow the crowd. Let the crowd follow you." - Margaret Thatcher
"The best things in life happen to you when you"re alone." -Agnes Martin
" Life is what happens when you"re busy making other plans."_ John Lennon
"Life is not a problem to be solved, nor a question to be answered. Life is a mystery to be experienced" Alan Watts
"If you love life, don"t waste time, for time is what life is made up of."_ Bruce Lee
"That is merely logic. People are not moved by logic." -Mithos Yggdrasill
"Strive for excellence, not perfection, because we don't live in a perfect world." - Joyce Meyer
"The society slows down me and I slow down society"
"We're all stories in the end, just make yours a good one" -Devin K.
"I no longer feel any hope for the future of my life. It is as though I had before me nothing more than a long stretch of living death. I cannot imagine any future for me other than a ghastly one. Friendless and joyless." L. Wittgenstein
"Do one thing everyday that scares you." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"When I say it's you I like, I'm talking about that part of you that knows that life is far more than anything you can ever see or hear or touch." -Fred Rogers
"The body is a machine that gets better with use." - Sadhguru
"Don"t get lost in your pain, know that one day your pain will become your cure."  Rumi
"Human beings are works in progress that mistakenly think they"re finished. The person you are right now is as transient, as fleeting and as temporary as all the people you"ve ever seen. The one constant in our lives is change."  Daniel Gilbert
"We are living in an era of woke capitalism in which companies pretend to care about social justice to sell products to people who pretend to hate capitalism." -Clay Routledge
"Life is to be enjoyed, not just endured."Gordon B. Hinckley
"When the politics of lying becomes normal, paranoia and alienation become the "normality" of the day." - Robert Anton Wilson
"If you are depressed you are living in the past. If you are anxious you are living in the future. If you are at peace you are living in the present." - Lao Tzu
"There is only one happiness in this life, to love and be loved."  George Sand
"Words May Not Break Bones, But They Break People" - Ricky Morgan [Anti-Bullying/Suicide Prevention]
"... as men could not make might obey right, they have made right obey might. As they could not fortify justice they have justified force." - Blaise Pascal
"It is this ultimate effort  sometimes ridiculous, often pathetic  of the imprisoned woman to transform her prison into a heaven of glory, her servitude into sovereign liberty, that we shall observe in the narcissist, in the woman in love, in the mystic." - Simone de Beauvoir
"A conservative is a man with two perfectly good legs who, however, has never learned to walk forward."  Franklin D. Roosevelt
"I not only use all the brains that I have, but all that I can borrow."  Woodrow Wilson
"I am not in this world to live up to other people's expectations, nor do I feel that the world must live up to mine."  Fritz Perls
"Life is divided into the horrible and the miserable."  Woody Allen
"we don't know what it is to be alive except for the following fact, that a body is something that enjoys itself " - Lacan
"what hath night to do with sleep" John Milton
"I am trying to feel more well adjusted than I really am, which is, I guess, the human condition." - Douglas Coupland, Microserfs
"To make pictures big is to make them more powerful."  Robert Mapplethorpe
"One fails forward toward success."  Charles Kettering
"The great thing about being human is our ability to face adversity down by refusing to be defined by it refusing to be no more than its agent or its victim" - Chinua Achebe
"Hold fast to dreams, for if dreams die, life is a broken-winged bird that cannot fly." - Langston Hughes
"You're everything you hated. Are you happy?" - Bo Burnham
"Hold fast to dreams, for if dreams die, life is a broken-winged bird that cannot fly." - Langston Hughes
"I'm in a hostile environment. I'm totally unprepared. And I'm surrounded by a bunch of guys who probably want to kick my ass... it's like being back in high school. " - Johnny Cage (Mortal Kombat, 1995)
"I admire your honesty. Hell, I like you. You can come over to my house and fuck my sister. [socks Joker in the gut] You little scumbag! I got your name! I got your ass! You will not laugh!..."
"Believe in nothing. Even if it means understanding everything." -XeroreX
"Social justice is like taking a bath. You have to do it every day or pretty soon you start to stink." - Tommy Douglas
"If you don't design your own life plan, chances are you'll fall into someone else's plan. And guess what they have planned for you? Not much." Jim Rohn
"But I have to say this in defense of humankind: In no matter what era in history, including the Garden of Eden, everybody just got here. [...]
" I have noticed even people who claim everything is predestined, and that we can do nothing to change it, look before they cross the road " - Stephen Hawking
"To fit in with the change of events, words, too, had to change their usual meanings..." - Thucydides
"Don't follow in the footsteps of wiser men; pick up where they left off." - Matsuo Basho (ish)
"Having a great intellect is no path to being happy." - Stephen Fry
"Trust was a double-edged sword. -Tiffany King
"Best friends don"t eat your apricots. They eat your ass."-Unknown
"Endless war and mass surveillance seems a bit more relevant to our lives than who's blowing the President!" - Bill Maher on the Bush and Clinton presidencies
"The happiness and misery of men depend no less on temper than fortune." La Rochefoucauld
"Don't judge yourself and don't let anyone judge you, Because only God can see the whole picture, That's why only God can judge You,Me,Us." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
'There are some people who would never have fallen in love if they had not heard there was such a thing.' Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"I have learned that in the darkest nights of my life situations,there will always be a universe that gives light to the stars" (William Ventura)
"The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting." -Sun Tzu
"If you think along the lines of nature then you think properly." - Carl Gustav Jung
"You can't be friends with someone who wants your life" Oprah Winfrey
"I have nothing to say, and I am saying it, and that is poetry."  John Cage
"Everything of importance has been said before by somebody who did not discover it."  Alfred North Whitehead
"Crime does not pay ... as well as politics."  Alfred E. Newman
"Better to write for yourself and have no public, than to write for the public and have no self."  Cyril Connolly
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power, the world will know peace." -Jimi Hendrix
"Of all lies, art is the least untrue."  Gustave Flaubert
"Everyone at some point in their lives wakes up in the middle of the night..."  Lemony Snicket
"When you have nothing to lose, you can do anything. And that is a terrifying thought."  Unknown
"Obstacles are things a person sees when he takes his eyes off his goal."  E. Joseph Cossman
"Too often the people complain that they have done nothing with their lives and then they wait for somebody to tell them that this isn't so." - Charles Bukowski
"I"m a magician, I make food disappear! -Miss Mina Oh 2018
"Never be a spectator of unfairness or stupidity. The grave will supply plenty of time for silence." - Christopher Hitchens
"Love is being stupid together." - Paul Valery
"All the other stuff, the love, the democracy, the floundering into lust, is a sort of by-play. The essential American soul is hard, isolate, stoic, and a killer. It has never yet melted." - D.H. Lawrence, 1923
"I"ve tried versions of not fixing myself before, but always with the secret hope that not fixing myself would fix me." Geneen Roth
"If you treat an individual as he is, he will remain how he is. But if you treat him as if he were what he ought to be and could be, he will become what he ought to be and could be." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"That is the definition of faith - acceptance of that which we imagine to be true, that which we cannot prove."- Dan Brown
"For what it"s worth: it"s never too late to be whoever you want to be. I hope you live a life you"re proud of, and if you find you"re not, I hope you have the strength to start over again."  F. Scott Fitzgerald
"They say people don't change. Sure, people can. They just usually get worse."
"I perfer dangerous freedom to peaceful slavery" -Thomas Jefferson
" Stick and Stay is bound to Pay!" - Grant Cardone
" The journey of a thousand miles begins with one step." _Lao Tzu
"Concrete, steel, timber...I mean these are all proven construction materials with a track record. Whereas yogurt..." - Kevin McCloud (Grand Designs) [Click for more links, background info about the episode, and full quote]
" The greatest pleasure of life is love. " _ Euripides
"Never forget what you are, for surely the world will not. Make it your strength, then it can never be your weakness. Armour yourself in it, and it will never be used to hurt you." - George R.R. Martin
"You dragged me through hell but I called it to love anyway "
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read." - James Baldwin
"The love of your life in the arms of another - shining brightly, blooming elegantly, leaving knots on our chest everytime you see her beautiful existence... Yes, you can imagine that feeling, right? Better yet, you know how that feels.
"Metal is like crazier and angrier jazz" - Unknown
"Love can't be bought or sold,even if it loses it values" (William Ventura)
"The power of the teenage females of 13,14,15 of them,when they're in a gang,has never left me. They nearly killed me. I was never in more fear for my life than I was from teenage girls. The ones that choked me,tore me to shreds"- Keith Richards
"If you do not work hard and face difficulties along your way in seeking glory, you will never taste honor and relief when you attain victory." - Ibn al Qayyim
"If the penis were the phallus, men would have no need of feathers or ties or medals." - Eugenie Lemoine-Luccioni
"Old age is the most unexpected of all the things that happen to a man."  Leon Trotsky
"We don't know what we want, but we are ready to bite somebody to get it."  Will Rogers
"Half of the American people have never read a newspaper. Half never voted for President. One hopes it is the same half."  Gore Vidal
"Puritanism: The haunting fear that someone, somewhere, may be happy."  H. L. Mencken
"You gain strength, courage and confidence by every experience in which you really stop to look fear in the face. You are able to say to yourself, 'I have lived through this horror. I can take the next thing that comes along.' You must do the thing you think you cannot do."  Eleanor Roosevelt
"My grandfather once told me that there were two kinds of people; those who do the work and those who take the credit. He told me to try to be in the first group; there was much less competition." - Indira Gandhi
"I dont know how much more love this heart can lose.and im dying from these exit wounds" -unknown
"I'd rather prefer to be Optimist and Wrong than Pessimistic and Right" - Elon Musk
"It is not defeat that destroys you,it is being demoralized by defeat that destroy you." - imran khan
"Just because it didn"t last forever,
"Color is my day-long obsession, joy and torment."  Claude Monet
"I've never known any trouble than an hour's reading didn't assuage."  Arthur Schopenhauer
"Money without brains is always dangerous."  Napoleon Hill
"All it takes is one bad day to reduce the sanest man alive to lunacy. That's how far the world is from where I am. Just one bad day."  The Joker
"There's nothing more idiotic and corrupting than political passion. It's the only passion without grandiose, the only one capable of dumbing mankind down" - Nelson Rodrigues
"Expect to have hope rekindled. Expect your prayers to be answered in wondrous ways. The dry seasons in life do not last. The spring rains will come again. "-------Sarah Ban Breathnach
"Don"t raise your voice, improve your argument." - Desmond Tutu
"Happiness is as a butterfly which, when pursued, is always beyond our grasp, but which if you will sit down quietly, may alight upon you." - Nathaniel Hawthorne
"People go to far greater lengths to avoid what they fear than to obtain what they desire." - Dan Brown.
"I have inner beauty! ...And I have the video of my colonoscopy to prove it."---Maxine
"If you listen very quietly, it sounds like the rain is playing music in the grass and the trees." Gillian, Age 6
"No one is perfect... absolutely no one. Like precious stones, we have a few flaws, but why focus on that? Focus on what you like about yourself, and that will bring you happiness and peace." - Richard Simmons
"Never compromise. Not even in the face of Armageddon." -Rorschach
"Thus auspiciously delivered, the animal destined to rule all others lies bound hand and foot, weeping, and his life is initiated by punishment for one fault alone the crime of being born." - The Elder Pliny
" Ignorance is kind, The truth is harsh" - Anonymous
"Man's wickedness is now such that men are more ashamed of chastity than of lechery." - sermon of St. Augustine
"When people see a strong horse and a weak horse, by nature they will like the strong horse." - Osama Bin Laden
"Take the first step in faith. You don"t have to see the whole staircase, just take the first step." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Be content with what you have; rejoice in the way things are. When you realize there is nothing lacking, the whole world belongs to you." - Lao Tzu
"Too many talented people string and unstring their instruments without ever playing their music."  Ken Standley
"Neocortex is atthe service of Limbic System" - Elon Musk
"I should have been more kind. That is something a person will never regret. You will never say to yourself when you are old, "Ah, I wish I was not good to that person." You will never think that. I should have been more kind." -Khaled Hosseini
"The love that was written with a kiss,can never be erased with a goodbye" (William Ventura)
"The day that this becomes work, [...] I need to do something else" - Christina Moreno (Female social entrepreneur &amp; Founder of She Matters)
"We are the biological bootloader for AI" - Elon Musk
"An empty lantern provides no light. Self-care is the fuel that allows your light to shine brightly."
"A face full of Botox is a face with no story; what's wrong with wrinkles? They're a record of every smile." -Russell Howard
"Not the truth in whose possession any person is, or thinks they are, but the honest effort they have made to find out the truth, is what constitutes the worth of a human being." -G. E. Lessing
"That's the great thing about being in the third grade. If you've got one polysyllabic adjective, everyone thinks you're a genius."  John Green
"Humor is always based on a modicum of truth. Have you ever heard a joke about a father-in-law?"  Dick Clark
"If you don't know where you are going, you will probably end up somewhere else."  Laurence J. Peter
"The more communicating through technology allows us to luxury of being apart, the more truthful the things we say to one another have to be in order to connect" - Rudolf P Belmar
''Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving.'' -Albert Einstein
"All that is gold does not glitter, not all those who wander are lost; the old that is strong does not wither, deep roots are not reached by the frost." J.R.R. Tolkien
"Those who cannot forgive others break the bridge over which they themselves must pass." - Confucius
"You are only entitled to the action, never to its fruits."  Bhagavad Gita
"Keep love in your heart. A life without it is like a sunless garden when the flowers are dead." - Oscar Wilde
"My imagination can picture no fairer happiness than to continue living for art."  Clara Schumann
"I just invent, then wait until man comes around to needing what I've invented."  R. Buckminster Fuller
"The optimist proclaims that we live in the best of all possible worlds; and the pessimist fears this is true." - James Branch Cabell
"Today I will do what others won't, so tomorrow I can do what others can't." - Jerry Rice
"These children that come at you with knives, they are your children. You taught them. I didn't teach them. I just tried to help them stand up."- Charles Manson, cult leader &amp; convicted killer
"All of a sudden I realized that I had done something that separated me from the human race... I realized from that point on I could never be like normal people." - David Alan Gore on his first murder
"Force and mind are opposites; morality ends where a gun begins." - Ayn Rand
"Live as if you were living for the second time and had acted as wrongly the first time as you are about to act now." -Victor Frankl
"One may howl with the wolves, if need be, but when doing so, one should be, I would urge, a sheep in wolf"s clothing." -Victor Frankl
"You cannot see the future with tears in your eyes." -Navajo proverb
"Live your life every day with no regrets, it'll be worth it" -Daniel M
"In Politics And Life, Ignorance Is Not A Virtue" - Barack Obama
"This movie doesn't scrape the bottom of the barrel. This movie isn't the bottom of the barrel. This movie isn't below the bottom of the barrel. This movie doesn't deserve to be mentioned in the same sentence with barrels." - Roger Ebert
"There's a patent contradiction between one's own life experience- childhood, youth and old age passed quietly and without major adventures- and the facts of the twentieth century... the terrible events which humanity has lived through" -Julio Caro Baroja
"I would always rather be happy than dignified." - Charlotte Bront
"Every day, I am humbled by the little that I know and the vastness of what I do not know."
"I hate you people for leaving me out of so many things." - Eric Harris
"Our love become history, if you be my mystery cause we both together have a great chemistry...
"When people are fanatically dedicated to political or religious faiths or any other kind of dogmas or goals, it's always because these dogmas or goals are in doubt." -Robert M. Pirsig, author and philosopher (6 Sep 1928-2017)
"The height of ones greatest happiness depends on the depths of their greatest sadness"
"Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful." - Albert Schweitzer
"The first time I see a jogger smiling, I'll consider it."  Joan Rivers
"Science has proof without any certainty. Creationists have certainty without any proof."  Ashley Montague
"Never believe anything until it has been officially denied."  Claud Cockburn
"Ka is a wheel. All it knows how to do is turn" -Stephen King
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde
"Ability may get you to the top, but it takes character to keep you there." - John Wooden
"The aim of life is to live, and to live means to be aware, joyously, drunkenly, serenely, divinely aware."  Henry Miller
"A film is a petrified fountain of thought."  Jean Cocteau
"The difference between what we do and what we are capable of doing would suffice to solve most of the world's problems." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Death is certain for the born, and birth is certain for the dead." - Bhagavad Gita
"And Bubba knew that I knew all there was to know."
"God resides in the heart of all beings." - Bhagavad Gita
"I told you I was hardcore" - Brandon Veda before fatally overdosing in front of his webcam audience
"You find God in between the cracks of a wall when you"re puking your limbs out." - Iryna Klishch
"If you judge people, you have no time to love them. " Mother Teresa
"I'm telling you folks, nerds are one of the most dangerous groups in this country, because they end up running things. But they still hate everybody, because they weren't the jocks in high school. So they play little dirty games on everybody. They use their brains to hurt people." - Alex Jones
"Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful, committed citizens can change the world. Indeed, it is the only thing that ever has."- Margaret Mead
'The only thing more intimate than making love to a woman is killing a man with your bare hands; and it's the only other thing that makes me cum.' - The Purple Man, 'Bomb Queen #4'
"To me, the universe is simply a great machine which never came into being and never will end...
'If you want your passions to shine like the Sun, first they have to burn like it.' - singer-songwriter 'Lorde'
"International financiers are behind all war. They are what is called the international Jew: German-Jews, French-Jews, English-Jews, American-Jews  the Jew is the threat." - Henry Ford
"It is better that scandals arise than the truth be suppressed." -Pope Saint Gregory the Great
" Science is organized knowledge. Wisdom is organized life." -Immanuel Kant
'When military men defend the tyrants desire to rule over the people's desire for liberty, they are no longer soldiers in a nation's army but jailers in the greatest prison ever devised' - Robspierre
"I can't understand why people are frightened of new ideas. I'm frightened of the old ones." -John Cage, composer (5 Sep 1912-1992)
"Why walk on eggshells when you can crush them?" - Kenny Herzog
"Tolerance becomes a crime when applied to evil." -Thomas Mann
"Theists believe that without a God or an afterlife out lives have no greater meaning. I believe it is profoundly liberating; we can make sense of the world and give it meaning ourselves.' - Sean Carrol, Atheist Philosopher
"Almost every time I praised the series on social media I"d get an instant pushback from somebody complaining that it was too slow or pretentious, or that "nothing happens." Of course, plenty happened; it just didn"t happen in the obvious way ..." - Matt Zoller Seitz (click for the full quote)
"While it"s natural to be scared of change, you should never let that fear led you from making changes" -CaseyNeistat
"Judge a man by his questions rather than his answers."
"Whoever loves much, performs much, and can accomplish much, and what is done in love is done well."  Vincent Van Gogh
"You may find the worst enemy or best friend in yourself."  English Proverb
"Luck is a dividend of sweat. The more you sweat, the luckier you get."  Ray Kroc
"When I hear somebody sigh, "Life is hard," I am always tempted to ask, "Compared to what?""  Sydney Harris
"I didn"t fail the test. I just found 100 ways to do it wrong."  Benjamin Franklin
"Luck is the residue of design." John Milton
"You only live once, lets live it up." - Jackie Gleason
"Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities."  Voltaire
"I do not want people to be agreeable, as it saves me the trouble of liking them."  Jane Austen
"Patriotism is your conviction that this country is superior to all other countries because you were born in it."  George Bernard Shaw
"You can be a rank insider as well as a rank outsider."  Robert Frost
''If you can't explain it to a six year old, you don't understand it yourself.'' - Albert Einstein
"A coke is a coke and no amount of money can get you a better coke than the one the bum on the corner is drinking" Andy Warhol
"I have spent my entire life dancing with little obsessions that I haven"t spent enough time obsessing over my life." Myself
"Less is more."  Ludwig Mies van der Rohe
"What happens is not as important as how you react to what happens."  Ellen Glasgow
"Very often a change of self is needed more than a change of scene." Arthur Christopher Benson
"To rank the effort above the prize may be called love." - Confucius
"Jealousy is another name for failure." - Chanakya
"Mental is to physical as 4 is to 1." - Bobby Knight
All you will every truly have is now." - Alan Watts
"All the things that I've done, memories, they never hurt me. But the past is more than memories. It's the devil you sold your soul to, and he's comin' to collect." - The Punisher
"*To me nothing in the world is safe, If everything was safe then people would have to commit suicide to have fun*" - Unknown
"Beauty may be skin deep, but ugly goes clear to the bone." - Redd Foxx
"800-588-2300 empire TODAY" - Unknown
"Education is not the learning of facts, but the training of mind to think" -Albert Einstein
"If you just do what you say you will do, you"ll have 90 percent of the world beat" -Russell Johnson
"Anticipation of death is worse than death itself"
"Our gods gave us legs to run with, noses to smell with, hands to touch and feel. What mad cruel god would give a man eyes and tell him he must forever keep them shut, and never look at all the beauty in the world?" - George R. R. Martin
"I don't think we've ever been so busy while accomplishing so little." -Chris Bailey
"Who in the world am I? Ah, that"s the great puzzle."- Lewis Carol.
"It is no measure of health to be well-adjusted to a profoundly sick society." Jiddu Krishnamurti
"Whatever you do, be gentle. People might have forgiven your harsh words but they may never forget how it stabbed their heart at that time!" - Mufti Ismail Menk
"The creatures of all your dreams and nightmares are right here, right now, solid as they ever were or ever will be" -William S. Burroughs
"The archer gets better with practice; the target does not" - Unknown
"Believe in your self god sucks smoke weed every day" -Neil degrasse tyson.
"Absence, the highest form of presence." James Joyce
"Money doesn't change men. It merely unmasks them. If a man is naturally selfish, or arrogant, or greedy, the money brings it out; that's all." - Henry Ford
"I don"t have to prove anything to anyone, I only have to follow my heart and concentrate on what I want to say to the world. I run my world" - Beyonce
"You can fool all the people some of the time, and some of the people all the time, but you cannot fool all the people all the time."
'See when I let other men decide what I deserve, it seems they always decide I don't deserve much...' - Ramon Rojo, 'A Fistful of Dollars'
"Nothing is so contagious as enthusiasm; it moves stones, it charms brutes." Edward Bulwer-Lytton
"Lies are like children. If you don't nurture them, they'll never be useful later."  Randy K. Milholland
"Until you walk a mile in another man's moccasins you can't imagine the smell."  Robert Byrne
"You can't have a light without a dark to stick it in."  Arlo Guthrie
"When I was a boy I was told that anybody could become President. Now I'm beginning to believe it."  Clarence Darrow
"In hatred as in love, we grow like the thing we brood upon. What we loathe, we graft into our very soul." -Mary Renault, novelist (4 Sep 1905-1983)
"In the following pages my object has been to reduce to their true value the socialistic fallacies with which a number of able, but frequently unscrupulous, men, amuse the idle and attract the multitude." - Yves Guyot
''You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough.'' -Mae West
"Time takes it all whether you want it to or not, time takes it all. Time bares it away, and in the end there is only darkness. Sometimes we find others in that darkness, and sometimes we lose them there again."  Stephen King
"You can't go back and change the beginning, but you can start where you are and change the ending." - C.S. Lewis
"A mind all logic is like a knife all blade. It makes the hand bleed that uses it." - Rabindranath Tagore
"Art is the proper task of life."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Laughter is like a windshield wiper, it doesn't stop the rain but allows us to keep going." - Unknown
"The end of labor is to gain leisure."  Aristotle
"When the missionaries came to Africa they had the Bible and we had the land. They said 'Let us pray.' We closed our eyes. When we opened them we had the Bible and they had the land." - Desmond Tutu
"No one is useless in this world who lightens the burden of it for anyone else." - Charles Dickens
"Every day is a new beginning, take a deep breath and start again." - Unknown
"Black and white is a lazy way to see the world" - Matt Wozniak
"Black and white is a lazy to see the world" - Matt Wozniak
"Hearing someone described as being able to "Fly by the seat of his pants" always suggests to me a leader who hasn"t prepared properly and whose pants may soon fall down."-- Bill Walsh
"Laughter is like a windshield wiper, it doesn't stop the rain but allows us to keep going." - Unknown
"I don't know what's going to happen, but I hope we get our kicks before the whole shit house goes up in flames." -J. Morrison
"But some confessions are just bragging in disguise." -Mary Alice Young
"Ships don't sink because of the water around them; ships sink because of the water that gets in them. Don't let what's happening around you get inside you and weigh you down." -Unknown
"When love is big,it doesn't matter the size of the heart" (William Ventura)
"If I prayed God that all people should approve of my conduct, I should find myself a penitent at the door of each one, but I shall rather pray that my heart may be pure toward all." -Amma Sarah
"Women were created for the pleasure of men."
" I keep what I earn and you keep what you earn. If you disagree, tell me how much of what I earn belongs to youand why. "-- Walter Williams' definition of SOCIAL JUSTICE
"We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light." -Plato
"Nothing says 'We're fighting for Democracy' like a prince shooting people from a 20 million $ helicopter" - Frankie Boyle on Prince Harry's military service
"Those days were you are sad and don"t know why is because something you"ve moved on from hasn"t moved on from you" - A good friend
"Oh, the comfort, the inexpressible comfort of feeling safe with a person..."
.
"Train yourself to remain polite even in the most difficult situation. Stand your ground firmly but politely. Let them curse &amp; swear. Choose to rise above cheap, verbal abuse which is widespread today. Sooner or later they"ll realize their mistake &amp; how offensive they were!." - Mufti Ismail Menk
"Willing obedience always beats forced obedience" -Xenophon
"We're so inconsistent about what we let kill you in this country. "Terrorism? Must be eradicated. Drugs? Zero tolerance." But there's lots of things that kill you in America. You know what I think kills you? Being a workaholic, and never getting laid, and McDonalds, and staying mad at people..."
"And there's a million of us just like me... who walk, talk and act like me, and it just might be the next best thing, But it's not quite me"
""I did that," says my memory. "I could not have done that," says my pride, and remains inexorable. Eventually - the memory yields." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"There are three things all wise men fear: the sea in storm, a night with no moon, and the anger of a gentle man." - Patrick Rothfuss,
.
"My computer beat me at chess... so I beat it at kickboxing."  Demetri Martin
"If you haven't found something strange during the day, it hasn't been much of a day."  John A. Wheeler
"If at first you don't succeed, find out if the loser gets anything."  Bill Lyon
"I don't know anything about music. In my line you don't have to."  Elvis Presley
"Men will never be free until the last king is strangled with the entrails of the last priest." - Denis Diderot
"Leap, and the net will appear."  John Burroughs
"You"re everything you"ve hated, Are you happy?" -Bo Burnham
"It's not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters"- Epictetus
(Possum Lodge oath) Quando omni flunkus, moritati. (Translation: When all else fails, play dead.)
"The life where nothing was ever unexpected. Or inconvenient. Or unusual. The life without colour, pain or past." - Lois Lowry,
"There"s something disturbing about recalling a warm memory and feeling utterly cold." - Gillian Flynn,
"I am almost inclined to set it up as a canon that a children"s story which is enjoyed only by children is a bad children"s story. The good ones last. A waltz which you can like only when you are waltzing is a bad waltz." -CS Lewis
"I, as a U.S. airman, am guilty of crimes against the Vietnamese country and people," the voice says in the recording. "I bombed their cities, towns, and villages and caused many injuries, even deaths, for the people of Vietnam. I'm a war criminal." -- John McCain, confession tape.
"My mom said there"s a sunrise and a sunset every day and you can chose to be there or not. You can put yourself in the way of beauty." - Cheryl Strayed
"Qui bibit dormit; qui dormit, non peccat; qui non peccat, sanctus est; ergo: qui bibit, ecce caelum." (He who drinks sleeps; he who sleeps does not sin; he who does not sin is holy; therefore he who drinks goes to heaven.) Sunday = Latin
"There is no demand in the priesthood for elderly drug addicts." -William S. Burroughs (Drugstore Cowboy)
"Life shrinks or expands in proportion to one"s courage." - Anais Nin
"There is no love sincerer than the love of food." - George Bernard Shaw
"Force, no matter how concealed, begets resistance." -Lakota proverb
"Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight." - Phyllis Diller
"The government consists of a gang of men exactly like you and me. They have, taking one with another, no special talent for the business of government; they have only a talent for getting and holding office." - H. L. Mencken
"Formal education will make you a living; self-education will make you a fortune." - Jim Rohn
"Dealing with backstabbers, there was one thing I learned: They're only powerful when you got your back turned" - Eminem
"Long after you and I are dead, the light reflected off our faces today will still be traveling across space, ever fainter with distance, but always there. For someone with a large enough telescope somewhere, we will be immortal." - Caleb Scharf
"Long after you and I are dead, the light reflected off our faces today will still be traveling across space, ever fainter with distance, but always there. For somebody with a big enough telescope somewhere, we will be immortal." - Caleb Scharf
"If the only tool you have is a hammer, you tend to see every problem as a nail." Abraham Maslow
"The minute you ask somebody to vote for you, you lose your right to be upset because somebody asks about your honesty, the things in orbit that might affect you. That is when you answer to the public." -- Michael Somebody, a.k.a. in the newspapers as "Area Man."
"If you want to succeed, double you're failure rate." - Thomas J. Watson
"Sex only unites one desire,love unites the desire of two who want to make love" (William Ventura)
"True love never dies;it dies when it has been false to believe that it was true" (William Ventura)
"Keep your senses open to changes and learnings occur all around to adopt the changes you need." -Bhawana Vaidya
"So we can proceed with our discussion on the assumption that you are serious?" - Socrates (in Giorgas)
"At the age of eleven or thereabouts women acquire a poise and an ability to handle difficult situations which a man, if he is lucky, manages to achieve somewhere in the later seventies."  P. G. Wodehouse
"To see what is in front of one's nose needs a constant struggle."  George Orwell
"The love of truth lies at the root of much humor."  Robertson Davies
"If you want to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first create the universe."  Carl Sagan
"If you take the life-lie away from the average man you straight away take away his happiness." - Dr. Relling in Ibsen's 'The Wild Duck'
"Willing seems to me "complicated", something that"s a unity only in name - and it is in a name that popular prejudice lurks, which has mastery over the cautions in thinkers in all ages. Let"s for once be unphilosophical: in "willing" there are many sensations, by habit, we will nothing" - Nietzsche
"Trying to understand superstition rationally is like trying to pick up something made of wood by using a magnet" - Philip Pullman
"No matter how pretty your face is, you will still be the food of worms. So set aside your arrogance and remember your grave."- Dr. Bilal Philips
"Death must be so beautiful. To lie in the soft brown earth, with the grasses waving above one's head, and listen to silence. To have no yesterday, and no tomorrow. To forget time, to forgive life, to be at peace."-----Oscar Wilde
"The basis of optimism is sheer terror." - Oscar Wilde
"Between saying and doing, many a pair of shoes is worn out."  Iris Murdoch
"Formal education will make you a living. Self education will make you a fortune."  Jim Rohn 1 of 500 Quotes I Posted!
"If nothing saves us from death, at least love should save us from life" - Pablo Neruda
"Never to suffer would never to have been blessed." - Edgar Allan Poe
"Sometimes you must lose yourself in another world before you find yourself in this one."  Unknown
"Nowadays, we care more about style than content. It doesn"t matter what you present, it only matters how you present it." - unknown
"Take up one idea. Make that one idea your life  think of it, dream of it, live on that idea. Let the brain, muscles, nerves, every part of your body, be full of that idea, and just leave every other idea alone. This is the way to success." Swami Vivekananda
"Sometimes it is the people no one can imagine anything of who do the things no one can imagine."  Alan Turing
"The thing about smart people is that they seem like crazy people to dumb people."  Stephen Hawking i think i'm crazy!
"That"s the difference between you and me. You wanna lose small, I wanna win big."  Harvey Specter
"Your Honor, years ago I recognized my kinship with all living beings, and I made up my mind that I was not one bit better than the meanest on earth. [...]
"No matter who we are, we must accept correction and change for better."  Mufti Ismail Menk
"It takes courage to endure the sharp pains of self discovery, rather than choose to take the dull pain of unconsciousness that would last the rest of our lives." - Marianne Williamson
"Have you ever looked at someone and thought, the wheels are turning but the hamster is dead?" --unknown
"Watching someone lose interest in you is like falling of a cliff in slow motion after a while you wish you"d hit the ground already" - a sad person
"It can't be love unless it hurts." --Tracyanne and Danny
"Even though my hands can't touch you;you'll feel my touch touching the skin of your thoughts" (William Ventura)
"...nothing from the external world can make the internal world inside them surrender or stop believing, this mindset is priceless bro." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"And without thinking I began to fall in love with you;to fall in love with those things that without thinking,made me end up in the wetness that left me thinking about you" (William Ventura)
"We're a debt-laden nation of religious hypocrites. All we do well is shop and drive gas guzzling SUV's" -Andy Botwin
"Where lipstick is concerned, the important thing is not color, but to accept God's final word on where your lips end."  Jerry Seinfeld
"Good taste is the worst vice ever invented."  Edith Sitwell
"We all have strength enough to endure the misfortunes of others."  Francois de La Rochefoucauld
"War is much too serious a matter to be entrusted to the military."  Georges Clemenceau
"This paper will no doubt be found interesting by those who take an interest in it." - John Dalton
"Do you feel blame? Are you mad? Uh, do you feel like woosh kebab roffaddish gaffraddis bubutchaboojujuh pee arammish jagidga gidga gidga googoo bigabigeffa gaveff argharedgishoo ahabaga?" - Charles Manson
"The meaning of life is to find your gift. The purpose of life is to give it away". -Pablo Picasso
"Only the wisest and stupidest of men never change."  Confucius
"Domination itself is servile when beholden to opinion; for you depend upon the prejudices of those you govern by means of their prejudices." - Rousseau
"Watching someone lose interest in you is like falling of a cliff in slow motion after a while you wish you"d hit the ground already" - a sad person
"There was nothing separate about her days. Like drops on the window-pane, they ran together and trickled away." - Dorothy Parker
"HUMAN BEINGS MAKE LIFE SO INTERESTING. DO YOU KNOW, THAT IN A UNIVERSE SO FULL OF WONDERS, THEY HAVE MANAGED TO INVENT BOREDOM. (Death)" - Terry Pratchett, Hogfather
"Amazing! Every word of what you just said was wrong". -- Luke Skywalker
"It ain't what they call you, it's what you answer to."-- W. C. Fields
"Most of the major ills of the world have been caused by well-meaning people who ignored the principle of individual freedom, except as applied to themselves, and who were obsessed with fanatical zeal to improve the lot of mankind." Henry Grady Weaver (1889-1949)
"We love ourselves even after we make so many mistakes, so why do we hate others for one or two mistakes they have made?"  Mufti Ismail Menk.
"All that we are is a result of what we have thought." -Buddha
"There's nothing more life-affirming than getting the shit kicked out of you." -Matt Dillon, Drugstore Cowboy
"There is more wisdom in your body than in your deepest philosophy." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I'd rather have a bottle in front of me than a frontal lobotomy" - Tom Waits
"A man of genius makes no mistakes. His errors are volitional and are the portals of discovery." - James Joyce
''You cannot have a positive life and a negative mind.'' - Joyce Meyer
"You wanna eventually get in the SAS, but are afraid of the parachute jumps you say? Well grow some balls and fuckin" do it, you gonna let a bit of height block you from your dreams my boy?" -My Dad
"There must be something in books, something we can"t imagine, to make a woman stay in a burning house; there must be something there. You don"t stay for nothing." - Ray Bradbury
"If a man whose talk is of oxen should become an Opium-eater, the probability is, that (if he is not too dull to dream at all)he will dream about oxen." - De Quincey
"I'm against picketing, but I don't know how to show it."  Mitch Hedberg
"He may be mad, but there's method in his madness. There nearly always is method in madness. It's what drives men mad, being methodical."  G. K. Chesterton
"The petty economies of the rich are just as amazing as the silly extravagances of the poor."  William Feather
"Honesty is a good thing, but it is not profitable to its possessor unless it is kept under control."  Don Marquis
"It was as if his point of view had, within seconds, gone from that of an ant to that of an eagle. For the sky was hollow, and the world was round." - Christopher Paolini, Inheritance
"A little nonsense now and then, is cherished by the wisest men." - Roald Dahl
"And yes, life is mostly boring, and we each go through it feeling ugly or like a failure, but sometimes the sun cuts through a tree line just right, or you get to hold someone's hand for the first time." - J. Andrew Schrecker
"Experience is one thing you can't get for nothing."  Oscar Wilde
"I got some new underwear the other day. Well, new to me."  Emo Philips
"A man went searching for the world's greatest general... [FULL QUOTE IN COMMENTS]
"I think it feels good, and then it doesn't." - Pete Campbell on infidelity (Mad Men)
"One day, wether you are 14, 28 or 65, you will stumble upon someone who will start a fire in you that cannot die. However, the saddest, most awful truth you will ever come to find is they are not always with whom we spend our lives..." -Someone on the internet
"I came with a great fart and disappeared as a prick in the sky" Petter Solberg
"Wheresoever you go, go with all your heart." - Confucius
"Is there a way to motivate yourself? No, keep drowning in shit." -Artemy Lebedev
"Absolute Wealth Equality would benefit more people than Absolute Wealth Inequality" - Me.
"Happiness cannot be traveled to, owned, earned, worn or consumed. Happiness is the spiritual experience of living every minute with love, grace and gratitude."  Denis Waitley
"Our eyes are the greatest source of emotion, our eyes tell about the person which we are, they tell if the person is being honest, they emit passion to the people we love and they give kindness to the people we appreciate" - Unknown
"We"ve had enough of exhortations to be silent! Cry out with a hundred thousand tongues. I see that the world is rotten because of silence." St. Catherine of Siena
[Meta] Should we require posts to cite sources?
"Life contains but two tragedies. One is not to get your heart"s desire; the other is to get it." - Socrates
"No one knows whether death may not be the greatest of all blessings for a man, yet men fear it as if they knew it was the greatest of evils." - Socrates, Apology
"We are here to drink beer. We are here to kill war." -Bukowski
"I have been asking myself why I"m here most of my life. If there"s a purpose I don"t care anymore. I"m seventy-four. I"m on my way out. Let the young people learn the hard way, like I did. No one ever told me anything." -Frank Donofrio
"Power is priceless. But not equal. Unfortunately. One might say, but not be." - awaredrian
"Your best teacher is your last mistake" -Ralph Nader
"Be fearless in the pursuit of what sets your soul on fire."
"When you love what you have, you have everything you need."
"Without education, we are in a horrible and deadly danger of taking educated people seriously." - G. K. Chesterton
"An Arrow can only be released by first pulling it back. When life pulls you back, it simply means you're launching into something amazing."
"People will love you, people will hate you, and none of it will have anything to do with you." - Abraham Hicks
"If you ever live in a country run by a committee, be in that committee." - William Graham Sumner
"Solitude vivifies; isolation kills." - Joseph Roux
"Men live in a fantasy world. I know this because I am one, and I actually receive my mail there."  Scott Adams
"My wife and I were happy for twenty years. Then we met."  Rodney Dangerfield
"I hate life, I hate death and everything in between just doesn't interest me."  Chris Rapier
"Whenever I hear anyone arguing for slavery, I feel a strong impulse to see it tried on him personally."  Abraham Lincoln
"We each decide whether to make ourselves learned or ignorant..."
"A single death is a tragedy; a million deaths is a statistic" - Joseph Stalin.
@Quote_Soup: Treasure the love you receive above all. It will survive long after your gold and good health have vanished. - Og Mandino
"Music is a tool to hack the mind and feel what you want, so stop crying and just listen." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"What you want, someone else always has. And usually, it means nothing to the person who actually has it. It's pretty much a miracle when you have what you want, and most comedies and tragedies happen due to the absence of that miracle. That's basically how this whole world works."
"When you do things right, people won't be sure you've done anything at all." - Futurama (god thingy)
"When yu do things right, people won't be sure you've done anything at all." - God thingy
"It"s kind of funny how drugs have taught an entire generation of American kids the metric system" - Anonymous
"If passion drives you, let reason hold the reins." - Benjamin Franklin
"See, you not only have to be a good coder to create a system like Linux, you have to be a sneaky bastard too ;-)" - Linus Torvalds
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent."  Eleanor Roosevelt
"In the storm"s of life, you can survive by grace, faith and hope." - Lailah Gifty Akita, Think Great: Be Great!
"The universe reveals its secrets to those who dare to follow their hearts." - Ralph Smart
25 Birthday Wishes to a Friend, The Most Beautiful for Your Good Friends
"Be nicer than necessary to everyone you meet. Everyone is fighting some kind of battle." - Socrates
"The greatest way to live with honor in this world is to be what we pretend to be." - Socrates, Essential Thinkers
"The secret of happiness, you see, is not found in seeking more, but in developing the capacity to enjoy less." - Socrates
"Every word has consequences. Every silence too." Jean-Paul Sartre
"For the light is bright and full of wonders."
"Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful and committed citizens can change the world. You know why?" "It's the only thing that ever has." - President Bartlet &amp; Will Bailey from The West Wing
"And what rough beast, its hour come round at last, slouches towards Bethlehem to be born?" -- WB Yeats
"Playing with the feeling of a beloved person,leave love without results" (William Ventura)
"We cannot control the evil tongues of others; but a good life enables us to disregard them." -Cato the Elder
"I am not positive, I just see things positively so that I can think the best, because the thought becomes reality." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Nothing typed with thumbs is ever important." - Gin Rummy from Boondocks
"No amount of guilt can change the past, and no amount of worrying (anxiety) can change the future. Go easy on yourself, for the outcome of all affairs is determined by Allah"s decree. If something is meant to go elsewhere, it will never come your way, but if it is yours by destiny, from it you cann
"A good movie is three good scenes and no bad ones." Howard Hawks
"Many that live deserve death. And some that die deserve life. Can you give it to them? Then do not be too eager to deal out death in judgement. For even the very wise cannot see all ends." -GtG
"The key to being happy is knowing you have the power to choose what to except and what to let go."- Dodinsky
"Be brave. Take risks. Nothing can substitute experience." Paulo Coelho
"I am enough. Who I am is enough. What I do is enough, and what I have is enough."
"The meaning of life is to find your gift. The purpose of life is to give it away."  William Shakespeare
"Don"t take things personally. When someone treats you badly, it"s not as much about you as it is about them and their issues."  Katriel Montgomery
"Keep Away From People Who Try To Belittle Your Ambitions. Small People Always Do That, But The Really Great Make You Feel That You, Too, Can Become Great."  Mark Twain
"There is no 'innocence', only differing measures of guilt" - Maxim of the Inquisitors, Warhammer 40k
"Work is the price that is paid for reputation" -Gracian
"There is nothing more deceptive than an obvious fact."  Sherlock Holmes
"Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Hard work opens doors and shows the world that you are serious about being one of those rare - and special - human beings who use the fullness of their talents to do their very best." - Robin Sharma
"Writing about music is like dancing about architecture."  Elvis Costello
"Knowledge is power, if you know it about the right person."  Ethel Mumford
"Regret for the things we did can be tempered by time; it is regret for the things we did not do that is inconsolable."  Sidney J. Harris
"Acquaintance, n.: A person whom we know well enough to borrow from, but not well enough to lend to."  Ambrose Bierce
"Shoot for the Moon and If You Miss, You"ll Land Among the Stars." - Les Brown
"We should try to be the parents of our future rather than the offspring of our past." - Miguel de Unamuno
"She was my Trojan horse. I woke up one day, and found her in my heart."
"Feeling shame of your past self is good, it means you have evolved into a better person"
"Why judge yourself as if your life is over, life is a marathon." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"All propaganda has to be popular and has to accommodate itself to the comprehension of the least intelligent of those whom it seeks to reach." - A. Hitler
"Give us a socially isolated and poor man and we will transform him into our soldier" - An Evil Mafia Leader
"No man is his own island. But there"s no need to turn it into a tourist attraction."
"We walk alone in the world. Friends, such as we desire, are dreams and fables." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"You miss 100% of the shots you don't take." - Lee Harvey Oswald
"If you want to change the world, start off by making your bed." -Navy Seal Admiral William McRaven
"Sarah Lazarus: I"m still on the same shampoo bottle as when louis ck"s time out started"
"The heart that truly loves never forgets." - unknown
"You can"t use up creativity. The more you use, the more you have." Maya Angelou
" The question isn"t who is going to let me; it"s who is going to stop me." Ayn Rand
"Change your thoughts and you change your world." Norman Vincent Peale
"The reflection is awfuland in this point of view, how trifling, how ridiculous, do the little paltry cavilings, of a few weak or interested men appear, when weighed against the business of a world." Thomas Paine, Common Sense, 1776
"Don"t take things personally. When someone treats you badly, it"s less about you and more about them."  Katriel Montgomery
"There loves that despite living in the distance,they feel close and don't die,because they also live in our hearts" (William Ventura)
"We are not permitted to choose the frame of our destiny. But what we put into it is ours." - Dag Hammarskjold
"When haters find no fault to pick on then even the way you breathe becomes an issue." - Mufti Ismail Menk
"Kindness is a language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see." (-Mark Twain)
"If you don't believe me or don't get it, I don't have time to try to convince you, sorry. " Satoshi Nakamoto
"The western culture of wiping our asses with paper is unclean! Or would you feel clean after wiping shit from your face without water?" quote: heard in the train.
"We don"t create a fantasy world to escape reality, we create it to be able to stay." Unknown
"Attitude is a choice. Happiness is a choice. Optimism is a choice. Kindness is a choice. Giving is a choice. Respect is a choice. Whatever choice you make makes you. Choose wisely." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"I still talk to God sometimes. I ask him if what I'm doing is right or wrong. I'm still waiting for an answer." Intro to "Answers" by the band Vigilante
"Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear, not absence of fear." -Mark Twain
"I have a dream that my four children will one day live in a nation where they will not be judged by the colour of their skin, but by the content of their character" - Martin Luther King Jr
"To succeed naturally is a gift. To succeed by abusing certain principles, in hopes of being good at something that your are not is a misdeed. To succeed naturally at something your are good at is true satisfaction." -GvN (MildSanity), August 28, 2018
"Work is the best antidote to sorrow, my dear Watson." - Arthur Conan Doyle
"Some would probably call him a villain. Others would say his magic makes him closer to a god." - Stephanie Garber
"The aim of education is the knowledge not of facts but of values." - William Ralph Inge
"History will be kind to me for I intend to write it."  Winston Churchill
"Nothing beautiful without struggle." - Plato, The Republic
"Arguments are to be avoided; they are always vulgar and often convincing."  Oscar Wilde
"Never judge a book by its movie."  J. W. Eagan
"This book fills a much-needed gap."  Moses Hadas
"He who hesitates is not only lost, but miles from the next exit."  Unknown
'By being offended by a word, you're consequently giving it power' -unknown
"Erik Satie never used to open the letters he received, but he always answered them." Enrique Vila-Matas
"Everyone is a genius at least once a year. The real geniuses simply have their bright ideas closer together." - Georg C. Lichtenberg
"If you can dream it, you can do it" - Walt Disney
"If they are old enough to count they are old enough to mount" Jacob 2018
"Your influence is not determined by the number of followers you have. But by the number of people you influence." - Unknown
"Early to bed, early to rise makes a man healthy, wealthy, and wise." - George Carlin
"To be connected to America"s causes - liberty, equal justice, respect for the dignity of all people - brings happiness more sublime than life"s fleeting pleasures. Our identities and sense of worth are not circumscribed but enlarged by serving good causes bigger than ourselves." Sen. John McCain
"In times of universal deceit, telling the truth becomes a revolutionary act." - George Orwell
"God, I have humbled myself before the court. Drop my ego and confidence was my last resort." - Kanye West
"Only a few things in life matter a little. The rest don"t matter at all." - John Cleese
"Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our fears." Les Brown
"Being an adult means you get to dictate what 'being an adult' means." - Bennett "The Sage" White
"Everything not saved will be lost" - Nintendo "quit screen" message
"Do something better today, for yourself tomorrow" - Jordan Petterson
"If someone corrects you, and you feel offended, then you have an ego problem." - Nouman Ali Khan
"If your head tells you one thing, and your heart tells you another, before you do anything decide first whether you have a better head or a better heart." -Einstein
"Never let anybody play you close."
"You get a strange feeling when you"re about to leave a place. Like you"ll not only miss the people you love but you"ll miss the person you are now at this time and this place, because you"ll never be this way ever again." - Azar Nafisi
"If we don"t study the mistakes of the future, we"re doomed to repeat them for the first time" -Ken M
"People hate the truth. Luckily truth doesn't care."
"It is important to remember moments in our history when great sacrifices are made, lest we forget the price of all wars - even that are won." -Anchorite Ayuri(World of Warcraft: The Burning Crusade)
"Don't follow your passion, but always bring it with you." -Mike Rowe
"The cure for pain is in the pain." - Rumi
"Without laughter, life on our planet would be intolerable." - Steve Allen
"Without laughter, life on our planet would be intolerable." - Steve Allen, TV personality and comedian
"The worst thing in life is not to be broke; the worst thing in life is to taste some success and then go back to being nobody. That's hard." - Eric Thomas
"What a strange illusion it is to suppose that beauty is goodness." - Leo Tolstoy
"According to the present trend, we may suppose that even on the morning after the Day of Judgmentif such a thing were possibleevery cabaret, every night club, every newspaper firm eager for advertisements and subscribers ...would resume business to the best of its ability." - Barth
"I"m glad we had the times together just to laugh and sing a song, seems like we just got started and then before you know it, the times we had together were gone."  Dr. Suess
"Remember me and smile, it"s better to forget than to remember me and cry."  Dr. Suess
"Cynically speaking, one could say that it is true to life to be cynical about it."  Paul Tillich
"Man is tormented by no greater anxiety than to find someone quickly to whom he can hand over that great gift of freedom with which the ill-fated creature is born."  Fyodor Dostoevsky
"There is no moral precept that does not have something inconvenient about it."  Denis Diderot
"Value yourself. The only people who appreciate a doormat are people with dirty shoes." - Leo F. Buscaglia
"These [Muslim] youths love death as you love life" - Osama bin Laden (fatwa of 1996)
"Just because someone doesn't love you the way you want them to doesn't mean they don't love you the best way they know how."
"And now, friend-reader, you must prepare your heart and your mind for the most impure tale that has ever been told since our world began, a book the likes of which are met with neither amongst the ancients nor amongst us modern." - Marquis de Sade, 1789
"Everything is image; I myself am a myth about myself, for is it not rather as a myth that I hasten to this meeting?" - Johannes (Kierkegaard's aesthete) writes in his diary prior to his tryst
"While it is always possible to wake a person who's sleeping, no amount of noise will wake a person who is pretending to be asleep." - Jonathan Safran Foer
[Quote Search:] We read Tolstoy by candlelight while our granddaughters watch TV, that's progress I guess.
"...everyone expects the Jews to be the only real Christians in this world" - Eric Hoffer
"A sword is never enough. The mind is also a weapon, but like the sword it must be kept honed and sharp." -Mathurin Kerbouchard, The Walking Drum
" Life is 10% what happens to me and 90% of how I react to it."Charles Swindoll
"If you want your life to be a magnificent story, then begin by realising that you are the author." - Mark Houlahan
"...Maybe the kids aren't the problem." - Daniel Skora
[TOMT} quote about not needing someone
"A weed is a plant that has mastered every survival skill, except learning how to grow in rows. Be a weed." -Doug Lasrson
"A weed is a plant that has masred every survival skill except for learning to gow in rows. Be a weed." -Doug Larson
"We can"t help everyone, but everyone can help someone. Ronald Reagan
"UNLESS someone like you cares a whole awful lot, nothing is going to get better. It"s not." The Lorax
"I am thankful to all who said no to me. It is because of them that I"m doing it myself"..... Albert Einstein
"Where my uncle was an enormous fool, as many talented people are, was that he mistook his gift for intelligence. He was a great big famous film person. He looked better and talked better and had enormous charm. So he thought he was also far more intelligent than Mr Goebbels. [cont]"
"For thought is a bird of space, that in a cage of words may indeed unfold its wings but cannot fly." - Kahlil Gibran
"One joy scatters a hundred griefs."  Chinese Proverb
"Perhaps the best conversationalist in the world is the man who helps others to talk." Steinbeck
"Often those that criticise others reveal what he himself lacks." - Shannon L. Alder
"If you"re lonely when you"re alone, you"re in bad company." Jean-Paul Sarte
"Sometimes you wake up. Sometimes the fall kills you. And sometimes, when you fall, you fly." - Neil Gaiman
"Once he gets the idea that - because he has crammed his head full with mere book knowledge - the world owes him a living, it is hard for him to change." - Booker T. Washington.
"Love your job but don't love your company, because you may not know when your company stops loving you." Dr A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"Education should be one of our top funding priorities; talking about it does not help the teachers and students who desperately need promises fulfilled." - Solomon Ortiz
'Ah how shameless - the way these mortals blame the gods. From us alone they say come all their miseries, yes, but they themselves with their own reckless ways compound their pains beyond their proper share.' -Homer (The Odyssey)
"Road" has Speed Limit. "Exam" has Time Limit. "Building" has Height Limit. "Love" has Age Limit. But "Friendship" has No-Limit.
"Nobody. I'm nobody. I'm a tramp, a bum, a hobo. I'm a boxcar and a jug of wine. And a straight razor, if you get too close to me." -Charles Manson
"If you don't believe you are the best, then you will never achieve all that you are capable of". -Cristiano Ronaldo
"Whatever happens in the world is real, what one thinks should have happened is projection. We suffer more from our fictitious illusion and expectations of reality." - Jacque Fresco
"When we live life very fast,it's when we begin to die slowly" (William Ventura)
"There is no fate that cannot be surmounted by scorn."  Albert Camus
"Autobiography is an unrivaled vehicle for telling the truth about other people."  Philip Guedalla
"If the automobile had followed the same development cycle as the computer, a Rolls-Royce would today cost $100, get a million miles per gallon, and explode once a year, killing everyone inside."  Robert X. Cringely
"It has yet to be proven that intelligence has any survival value."  Arthur C. Clarke
"My tongue will tell the anger of my heart, or else my heart concealing it will break." - William Shakespeare, The Taming of the Shrew
"In politics, nothing happens by accident. If it happens, you can bet it was planned that way" - Franklin D. Roosevelt
[Request] Looking for a Donald Duck quote source
"It's not until they tell you you're going go to die soon that you realize how short life is. Time is the most valuable thing in life because it never comes back. And whether you spend it in the arms of a loved one or alone in a prison- cell, life is what you make of it. Dream big." -Stefan Karl
"All men die, and what matters is not how long you can avoid death, but what you choose to do while you are still alive" -Sword and Glory
"So they brought in the janitor. He was a doctor. And a Buraku. One of Japan's untouchables. He knew that he wasn't accepted by the staff, he didn't even try. The people that ran that place, they didn't think that he had anything they wanted. Except when they needed him. Because he was right" -House
"That I have something to say is not a personal achievement. I have something to say because I am a Christian." - Stanley Hauerwas
"But I don't have a complaint. Not one. It's been quite a ride. I've known great passions, seen amazing wonders, fought in a war, and helped make peace. I've lived very well and I've been deprived of all comforts. I've been as lonely as a person can be and I've enjoyed the company of heroes." JM
"You can"t make a baby in one month by assigning nine women to the job"
"I'll tell you what. If I ever got impeached I think the market would crash. I think everybody would be very poor because without this thinking you would see numbers that you wouldn't believe in reverse." - Donald Trump, August 24, 2018
"'May your lives be as lucky as mine'" - Senator John McCain who spent his whole life in service of our country. RIP.
"Nothing in life is more liberating than to fight for a cause larger than yourself, something that encompasses you but is not defined by your existence alone." John McCain
"And he took her in his arms and kissed her under the sunlit sky, and he cared not that they stood high upon the walls in the sight of many."  J.R.R. Tolkien
"Faithless is he that says farewell when the road darkens."  J.R.R. Tolkien
"The world is not beautiful. Therefore it
"Let us be grateful to the mirror for revealing to us our appearance only." - Samuel Butler
"He who formerly was reckless and became sober, brightens up this world, like the moon when freed from clouds." - Dhammapada, The Teachings of the Buddha
"If you want to kill the devil, draw a map to heaven and keep a close eye on the people who start acting shifty." - Real Guyman
"The greatest failure, is to not have a dream."  Unlimiter
"I fucking hate quotes" - Ben NCM
"In nuclear war all men are cremated equal." -Dexter Gordon
"People seldom do what they believe in. They do what is convenient, then repent." - Bob Dylan
"We cannot teach people anything. We can only help them discover it within themselves." Galileo Galilei
"Teachers are our greatest public servants; they spend their lives educating our young people and shaping our Nation for tomorrow."- Solomon Ortiz
"Death is unable to divide, Their Hearts, whose hands, True love, hath tide" - George Wither
"By Knowledge only, Life we gain, all other things to Death pertain" - George Wither
"Beware of an old man in a profession where men usually die young"-unknown
"Diets are just a good way to remind me why I'm okay with being fat." - TJ Kirk
"Life ultimately means taking the responsibility to find the right answer to its problems and to fulfill the tasks which it constantly sets for each individual." -Victor Frankl
"True happiness is to enjoy the present, without anxious dependence upon the future, not to amuse ourselves with either hopes or fears but to rest satisfied with what we have, which is sufficient, for he that is so wants nothing...
"The man who has not word,is Illiterate of his responsabilities" (William Ventura)
"If love were political,many hearts and feelings would be corrupted" (William Ventura)
"I can certainly recommend the Gestapo to everyone" - Sigmund Freud, 1938
"I gave you my everything, I give till I bleed. So take it all, take everything, just take it from me." - Moth, HELLYEAH
"It is not only for what we do that we are held responsible, but also for what we do not do." MOLIERE
"It is not only for what we do that we are held responsible, but also for what we do not do." MOLIERE, French playwrighter, actor
"It is not only for what we do that we are held responsible, but also for what we do not do." MOLIERE French playwright, actor
"When the soul suffers too much, it develops a taste for misfortune." - Albert Camus
"Life is a disease: sexually transmitted, and invariably fatal." - Neil Gaiman
"People are not bad when they have plenty of room." -Joseph Roth
"Your task is not to seek for love, but merely to seek and find all the barriers within yourself that you have built against it." - Rumi
"I like work: it fascinates me. I can sit and look at it for hours." - Jerome K. Jerome
"The most savage controversies are those about matters as to which there is no good evidence either way."  Bertrand Russell
"For most men life is a search for the proper manila envelope in which to get themselves filed."  Clifton Fadiman
"There is no monument dedicated to the memory of a committee."  Lester J. Pourciau
"Youth would be an ideal state if it came a little later in life."  Herbert Henry Asquith
"Always remember that you often find outstanding people among those you don't particularly like." - Soichiro Honda, Founder of Honda
"When a man's got money in his pocket he begins to appreciate peace." - Joe (A Fistful of Dollars)
- My Brother
-Dostovesky
"Even back then, I exuded self-confidence, and that drives women crazy." - Larry David
"There"s some good in this world, Mr. Frodo...and it"s worth fighting for."  Samwise Gamgee
"Hopefully, eventually, but maybe not immediately"
"We are only as blind as we want to be." -Dr. Maya Angelou
"Be not too hasty to trust or to admire the teachers of morality: they discourse like angels, but they live like men." - Samuel Johnson
"The argument that all Jews have a heartfelt investment in the state of Israel is untrue. Some have a heartfelt investment in corned beef sandwiches." -Judith Butler
"I am not who you think I am; I am not who I think I am; I am who I think you think I am." Thomas Cooley
" Humans are afraid of the dark. And yet At the same time, we"re fascinated and bewitched by it. Maybe that"s why humans drink the darkness that is coffee." - Godot (Ace Attorney)
"Madness is a flexible bullet" -Stephen King
"The point is not to take the world's opinion as a guiding star but to go one's way in life and working unerringly, neither depressed by failure nor seduced by applause." - Gustav Mahler
"There's one major difference between James Bond and me. He is able to sort out problems!" - Sean Connery
"because he had no place he could stay in without getting tired of it and because there was nowhere to go but everywhere, keep rolling under the stars..." - Jack Kerouac
"I will prepare and some day my chance will come" - Abraham Lincoln
"Inside every living person is a dead person waiting to get out." -Terry Pratchett
"I say in speeches that a plausible mission of artists is to make people appreciate being alive at least a little bit. I am then asked if I know of any artists who pulled that off. I reply, 'The Beatles did'." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Speak when angry and you will make the best speech you will ever regret." - Henry Ward Beecher
"If you change the way you look at things, the things you look at change."  Wayne Dyer
"It's hard to forget someone
"All things truly wicked start from innocence." - Ernest Hemingway
"I prefer to give you my life complete,to give you my death in pieces" (William Ventura)
"Books are a uniquely portable magic." - Stephen King
"The man in black fled across the desert, and the gunslinger followed." - Stephen King
"Children begin by loving their parents; as they grow older they judge them; sometimes they forgive them." -Oscar Wilde
" I do not get in trouble with the things I do not know. I get in trouble with the things I know that just ain't so," -Mark Twain
"In most pursuits, one's self is one of the biggest hurdles to get over. You can't pursue something and be committed to it if you're apologizing for it at every party."  Lisa Kudrow
"If God had wanted us to vote, he would have given us candidates."  Jay Leno
"You don't have to suffer to be a poet; adolescence is enough suffering for anyone."  John Ciardi
"The tyranny of opinion - and such opinion! - is every bit as idiotic in the small towns of France as it is in the United States of America." Stendhal
"Always remember that failure is an event, not a person." -Zig Ziglar
"You can't touch music, but it can touch you" - Mordecai
"Lovers are folks who get trapped in traps they set for others."
"Give someone everything and they will give you nothing. Give someone nothing and they will give you everything."  Bart Simpson
"All men dream: but not equally. Those who dream by night in the dusty recesses of their minds wake in the day to find that it was vanity: but the dreamers of the day are dangerous men, for they may act their dream with open eyes, to make it possible." - T. E. Lawrence
"How do you measure success? What did I learn and who did it help." -John Green
"Just think of how stupid the average person is, and realize half of them are stupider than that" -George Carlin
"If men were angels, no government would be necessary. If angels were to govern men, neither external nor internal controls on government would be necessary." James Madison
"He who makes a beast of himself gets rid of the pain of being a man." -Samuel Johnson
"To learn is to face transformation" Parker J. Palmer
"We have it in our power to begin the world over again. A situation, similar to the present, hath not happened since the days of Noah until now...
"Always and never are two words you should always remember never to use." - Wendell Johnson
"I would repeat it, however a hundred times, that "immediate certainty" as well as "absolute knowledge" and the "thing in itself" involve contradictions; we really ought to free ourselves from the misleading significance of words! - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Evil begins when you begin to treat people as things." - Terry Pratchett
"We live for books." - Umberto Eco
"Painting is a metaphor for control. Every choice is mine. The canvas, the color. " - Klaus Mikaelson
"Life is a shipwreck, but we must not forget to sing in the lifeboats." - Voltaire
"The secret of happiness you see, is not found in seeking more, but in developing the capacity to enjoy less." - Socrates
"The greatest mistake is trying to be more agreeable than you can be."  Walter Bagehot
"The real hero is always a hero by mistake; he dreams of being an honest coward like everybody else."  Umberto Eco
"A paranoid is someone who knows a little of what's going on."  William S. Burroughs
"Let's have some new cliches."  Samuel Goldwyn
"It's up to you how far you go. If you don't try, you'll never know!" Merlin, "Sword in the Stone"
"You think because you understand 'one' you must also understand 'two', because one and one make two. But you must also understand 'and'." -Rumi
"We all require and want respect, man or woman, black or white. It's our basic human right." - Aretha Franklin
"It is always by way of pain one arrives at pleasure" - Marquis de Sade
"The Thing you are born to do is the thing you will see better than everyone else"
"You do not know the first note of the music that moves me" - The Name of the Wind
"How quickly man forgets; war originated not on earth, but in heaven." - unknown
"Something about his expressionless, silent concern moves me more than if he were smiling, or making eye contact and grinning with someone. It tells me that what he's doing he expects nothing in return for at all..."
"You know when you see something so funny you choke on your own dick" -Anonymous
"Don't think about what might go wrong, think about what could be right." - Unknown
"Honestly who the fuck actually likes sparkling water? that shit taste like tv static."
"The lizard got into the 'booger sugar' and now he thinks he's a dinosaur." Vic-F is for Family
"Stop sending people to kill me. We have already captured five of them, one of them with a bomb and another with a rifle. If you don't stop sending killers, I'll send one to Moscow, and I won't have to send a second." -Josip Tito in letter to Joseph Stalin.
"A kiss is a meeting of two kisser that were lost" (William Ventura)
"History doesn't repeat itself, but it does rhyme" -Mark Twain
"If you work for a living, why do you kill yourself working?" - Tuco (The Good, the Bad and the Ugly)
"I'm sick of not having the courage to be an absolute nobody." J. D. Salinger
"When I was growing up, we were taught the stories of people whose inventions and scientific discoveries had expanded the lives of millions of other people. Today, students are being taught to admire those who complain, denounce, and demand." --Thomas Sowell
"The body of the American people is substantially republican. But their virtuous feelings have been played on by some fact with more fiction; they have been the dupes of artful manuvres, &amp; made for a moment to be willing instruments in forging chains for themselves."  Thomas Jefferson, 1799
"Wisdom lies neither in fixity nor change, but a dialectic between the two." (-Octavio Paz)
"Give me a lever long enough, and a place to stand, and I will move the earth." - Archimedes
"Reading is faster than listening. Doing is faster than watching." - Naval
"Whether you spend it in the arms of a loved one or alone in a prison-cell, Life is what you make of it. Dream big." - Stefan Karl, 1975-2018
"I started out with nothing and I still got most of it left." Tom Waits
"It"s not until they tell you you"re going to die soon that you realize how short life is. Time is the most valuable thing in life because it never comes back. And whether you spend it in the arms of a loved one or alone in a prison cell, life is what you make of it. Dream big." - Stefan Karl
" Talent Unlocks The Door. Skill Opens It. Hard Work Keeps It From Slamming In Your Face!" - Tim Grover
"Friends show their love in times of trouble, not in happiness." - Euripides
"the atheist is misguided in thinking that unbelief is the only credible response to the problem of God; if you really want to be free of God, then religion is geared specially to that end." - Marcus Pound
"It takes courage to grow up and become who you really are." -E. E. Cummings
"A mother's arms are made of tenderness and children sleep soundly in them." - Victor Hugo
"You don't even have to be convicted of a crime to lose your job in this constitutional republic...because impeachment is not about punishment." - Senator Lindsey Graham (R) during the Clinton impeachment hearing
"The test of courage comes when we are in the minority. The test of tolerance comes when we are in the majority."  Ralph W. Sockman
"Human history becomes more and more a race between education and catastrophe."  H. G. Wells
"A man is rich in proportion to the number of things he can afford to let alone."  Henry David Thoreau
"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome."  Isaac Asimov
"Think for yourselves don"t be sheep" - Rick Sanchez
"Right, as the world goes, is only in question between equals in power, while the strong do what they can and the weak suffer what they must." -Thucydides
"I"m not upset that you lied to me, I"m upset that from now on I can"t believe you." - Nietzsche
"That is not dead which can eternal lie, and with strange aeons even death may die" - H.P Lovecraft
"Without order nothing exists, without chaos nothing evolves" - Jedi Mind Tricks
"We live on a placid island of ignorance in the midst of black seas of infinity, and it was not meant that we should voyage far" - H.P Lovecraft
"Always believe in yourself. Do this and no matter where you are, you will have nothing to fear." - Hayao Miyazaki
"Anybody is a killer, all you gotta do is push "em to the limits" - J. Cole
"I am the one who knocks" - Walter White
"With but few exceptions, it is always the underdog who wins through sheer willpower." - Johnny Weissmuler
"But when a long train of abuses and usurpations, pursuing invariably the same Object evinces a design to reduce them under absolute Despotism, it is their right, it is their duty, to throw off such Government, and provide new Guards for their future security."
"She was the heir of ash and fire, and she would bow to no one." - Sarah J. Maas
"I already told you, the only way to a woman"s heart is along the path of torment. I know none other as sure" - Marquis de Sade
"Many, many people are perfectly willing to address *a* problem. How many people do you know who are trying to address *the* problem? It's quite problematic." - Scary Pratchett
"Out of all the things I have lost, I miss my mind the most" - Mark Twain
"A person is not religious solely when he worships a divinity, but when he puts all the resources of his mind, the complete submission of his will, and the whole-souled ardour of his fanaticism at the service of a cause or an individual who becomes the goal and guide of his thoughts and actions"
"Try to do something you know it's impossible so you don't feel anxious by the idea of achieving it." - Rigged Mind
"If you cannot do great things, do small things in a great way." - Napoleon Hill
"Of all affairs, communication is the most wonderful." - John Dewey
"I know he'd be a poorer man if he never saw an eagle fly." -John Denver (Rocky Mountain High)
"If failing has no consequence what's the point of succeeding?" - Anonymous -
'Who do you think you are?' That's the big one, isn't it? A flourishing life depends on how you answer that. --Robert Fulghum
"She said 'Over my dead body!' so I took her at her word."
"No day is so bad it can"t be fixed with a nap."  Carrie Snow
"Some people are just so busy running away that they never turn to look what"s chasing them." - Verandah Dim
"What Lies Behind Us And What Lies Before Us Are Tiny Matters Compared To What Lies Within Us." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Some say Google is God. Others say Google is Satan. But if they think Google is too powerful, remember that with search engines unlike other companies, all it takes is a single click to go to another search engine" - Sergey Brin, Google Co-Founder
"THESE are the times that try men"s souls. The summer soldier and the sunshine patriot will, in this crisis, shrink from the service of their country; but he that stands it now, deserves the love and thanks of man and woman."  Thomas Paine, 1776
"Be careful how you are talking to yourself because you are listening." Lisa M. Hayes
"Vulnerability is not winning or losing; it"s having the courage to show up and be seen when we have no control over the outcome. Vulnerability is not weakness; it"s our greatest measure of courage." Bren Brown
"Mother's love is peace. It need not be acquired, it need not be deserved." - Erich Fromm
"He was one of those men who think that the world can be saved by writing a pamphlet."  Benjamin Disraeli
"It's never just a game when you're winning."  George Carlin
"Anyone who can handle a needle convincingly can make us see a thread which is not there."  E. H. Gombrich
"There are three rules for writing the novel. Unfortunately, no one knows what they are."  W. Somerset Maugham
"Understand that life has occasions. One time it is poverty and another time it is wealth. Once it is honour and another it is humiliation. Happy is he who remains grounded in each situation." - Ibn Al Jawzi
"Of all the ridiculous things it seems to be the most ridiculous is to be busy man of affairs, prompt to meals to prompt to work. Hence when I see a fly settle down in a crucial moment on the nose of a businessman... then I laugh heartily... What do they accomplish these hustlers?"-Kierkegaard(1843)
"I set out for the land of my dreams. Having arrived there, I found I did not know the place." - Kino's Journey
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant." (-Robert Louis Stevenson)
"The desire of the man is for the woman, but the desire of the woman is for the desire of the man." - Madame de Stal (1766-1817)
"I don't know what's going on... All I know is we're being tested somehow, by somebody or some thing a whole lot smarter than us, and all I can do is be friendly and keep calm and try and have a nice time till it's over." --Kurt Vonnegut, Sirens of Titan
"The dogmas whose birth we are witnessing will soon have the force of old dogmas; that is to say, the tyrannical and sovereign force of being above discussion. The divine right of the masses is about to replace the divine right of kings." - Gustave Le Bon
"The problem with the world is that the intelligent people are full of doubts while the stupid ones are full of confidence." Charles Bukowski
"Pain is neither intolerable or everlasting if you bear in mind that it has its limits, and if you add nothing to it in imagination." - Marcus Aurelius
"Most people do not really want freedom because freedom involves responsibility and most people are frightened of responsibility." - Sigmond Freud
[Alan Watts - Spoken]
"There is something about the aging process that makes you give a crap less." --Clint Eastwood
"Fine! I'll keep sort of an open mind." - Mrs. Matthiessen
"To be alive is a blessing, and to live is to be tested. When the shock of reality hits us hard, let us remember that it's what we do with the test which elevates us or debases us." - Megan Wyatt
"You are the architect of your own life." (Alisina Afzali (me))
"I sing to the people about what matters. I sing to the realists, people who accept it like it is. I express problems. There are tears when it's sad and smiles when it's happy. It seems simple to me, but for some people, I guess feelin' takes courage. - Aretha Franklin
"Kings are monsters in the natural order, and what can we expect from monsters but miseries and crimes?" Thomas Paine, 1792
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to reform (or pause and reflect)." --Mark Twain
"Alta vendetta D'alto silenzio  figlia." Vittorio Alfieri
"Fight for your dreams, and your dreams will fight for you." -Paulo Coelho
"You either die a Hero, or live long enough to see yourself become the Villain" -Harvey Dent
"Price is what you pay. Value is what you get." -Warren Buffet
"I don"t count sit ups that don"t count, I only count the ones that count because that"s when they start counting and that"s when I start counting" - xILe0n
"It's in our biology to trust what we see with our eyes. This makes living in a carefully edited, overproduced, and Photoshopped world very dangerous." -Brene Brown
"We act as if anxiety, anger and sadness are properties of humans themselves, part of their nature, while these are mere errors indicating the shortcomings of our society." - Arnold Cornelis
"The Riskiest thing is to take No Risks" -Mark Zuckerberg
"Successful people aren't born that way. They become successful by establishing the habit of doing things unsuccessful people don't like to do. The successful people don't always like doing these things themselves; they just get on and do them." -Don Marquies
"We both looked into the abyss; the only difference is, you blinked." -Batman, Crisis on Two Earths
"Most people do not reaply want freedom, because freedom involves responsibility and most people are frightened of responsibility." - Sigmond Freud
"Sometimes people are layered like that. There's something totally different underneath than what's on the surface. But sometimes, there's a third, even deeper level, and that one is the same as the top surface one. Like with pie."  Joss Whedon, Zack Whedon, Maurissa Tancharoen, and Jed Whedon
"Never be afraid to laugh at yourself, after all, you could be missing out on the joke of the century."  Dame Edna Everage
"Perpetual devotion to what a man calls his business, is only to be sustained by perpetual neglect of many other things."  Robert Louis Stevenson
"Either I've been missing something or nothing has been going on."  Karen Elizabeth Gordon
"If you don't make time for exercise, you'll have to make time for illness." - Robin Sharma
"I stopped looking for the light. Decided to become it instead." - Francheska of "Hey Fran Hey"
"Everybody you fight is not your Enemy, and Everybody that helps you is not your Friend." - Mike Tyson
"God, it makes me rage how efficient things are when you're a **** to people." - Eve Polastri (Killing Eve, Season 1 Episode 8)
"The wound is the place where the Light enters you." - Rumi
"I don't think..." then you shouldn't talk, said the Hatter.
"Tough times don't last; tough people do." - Gregory Peck
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks others have thrown at him." -- David Brinkley
"If you define yourself by your power to take life, your desire to dominate, to possess, then you have nothing."  Obi-Wan Kenobi
"All the secrets of the world are contained in books. Read at your own risk." - Lemony Snicket
"Sometimes, carrying on, just carrying on, is the superhuman achievement." Albert Camus
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years."--Mark Twain
"Never blame a legislative body for not doing something. When they do nothing, that don't hurt anybody. When they do something is when they become dangerous." --American humorist Will Rogers (1879-1935)
"Rank, Personal History of birth, Race, Sex, the name given to you, it's all meaningless. This is the only thing that's real. To fight on behalf of my own life and nothing else." -Wrath, Full Metal Alchemist
"The real problem of humanity ... we have Palaeolithic emotions; medieval institutions; and godlike technology."  E. O. Wilson
"To hate everything is to be wounded by everything." Marty Rubin
"If 'rights' exist at alland both feeling and usage indubitably prove that they do existthey cannot be consistently awarded to men and denied to animals, since the same sense of justice and compassion apply in both cases." - Henry S. Salt
"Of all things, I liked books best." - Nikola Tesla
"It was written I should be loyal to the nightmare of my choice." - Joseph Conrad, Heart of Darkness
"Sometimes you climb out of bed in the morning and you think, I'm not going to make it, but you laugh inside  remembering all the times you've felt that way." - Charles Bukowski
"You should have some kids! It"ll make you a better person.. just not as happy." Thoughts on this quote?
"There will always be reasons that motivate us to love,there will be others motivated by pain,and ultimately there will always be reasons that motivate us to live better" (William Ventura)
"Makeup is not a mask that covers up your beauty; it's a weapon that helps you express who you are from the inside." -Michelle Phan
23 Quotes About Simple Love. Meaningful Though Without Many Words
7 Inspirational Quotes from Influential Female Entrepreneurs in the World
Unknown
"Man is equally incapable of seeing the nothingness from which he emerges and the infinity in which he is engulfed."  Blaise Pascal
"He who praises you for what you lack wishes to take from you what you have."  Don Juan Manuel
"Few people are capable of expressing with equanimity opinions which differ from the prejudices of their social environment. Most people are even incapable of forming such opinions."  Albert Einstein
"We're all in this alone."  Lily Tomlin
"We believe that there is only one God, by whom we live and by whom we die, and for whom we have an upright heart. But as God gives us the different fingers of the hand, so he gives to men diverse ways to approach Him." - Mngke Khan
"women are way too critical of their own bodies. Men are just grateful that they"re around. Trust Me!"  Brad Bird
"We chase the truth and everytime we say no to it we come a little bit closer." -me
"Let your nuts hang" -6ix9ine
"Of all sad words of tongue or pen, the saddest are these: it might have been." --John Greenleaf Whittier
"Hate is a byproduct of success"- K3vinw
"School is fucking stupid" - Me 2k18
"What makes us human, I think, is an ability to ask questions, a consequence of our sophisticated spoken language." -Jane Goodall
"To each there comes a time in their lifetime a special moment when they are figuratively tapped on the shoulder and offered the chance to do a very special thing. Unique to them and fitted to their talents. What a tragedy if that moment finds them...
"It's a lot easier to be angry at someone than it is to tell them you're hurt." - Tom Gates
"Asking the front wheels of a car to do their normal job of steering while handling more than 170 hp is like asking a man to wire a plug while juggling... penguins while making love to a beautiful woman while on fire, on stage in front of the Queen. It"s all going to go wrong." - Jeremy Clarkson
"Life is rife with questions that baffle. All we can do is carry on." - Frank Gallagher, Shameless
"Ignorance and prejudice are the handmaidens of propaganda. Our mission, therefore, is to confront ignorance with knowledge, bigotry with tolerance, and isolation with the outstretched hand of generosity. Racism can, will, and must be defeated."-Kofi Annan
"Oh, what a tangled web we weave when first we practice to deceive." Sir Walter Scott
"The really important thing is not to live, but to live well. And to live well meant, along with more enjoyable things in life, to live according to your principles." - Socrates
"Those who are hardest to love need it the most." - Socrates
"Understanding a question is half an answer." - Socrates, Essential Thinkers - Socrates
"I really didn't say everything [they say] I said" -- Yogi Berra
" During my time in prison, I never noticed a drop in my will to live, but I often realized that I was finding relief in the fact that I was old enough to know that death was not too far away. This thought brought me comfort. I treasured it like a big secret " - Alija Izetbegovi
"Perseverance is not a long race; it is many short races one after another." Walter Elliott
"Logic will take you from A to B. Imagination will take you everywhere else." Albert Einstein
"You cannot swim for new horizons until you have courage to lose sight of the shore." - William Faulkner
"...'You can't be angry and curious at the same time.' So you got a choice when you're in a traffic jam...when you're dealing with an angry clerk...'Am I curious about how this person got to this moment? Or am I going to be angry at the situation?'." - Seth Godin
"No one goes there nowadays, it's too crowded."  Yogi Berra
"I get up every morning determined to both change the world and have one hell of a good time. Sometimes this makes planning my day difficult."  E. B. White
"If you look good and dress well, you don't need a purpose in life."  Robert Pante
"No degree of dullness can safeguard a work against the determination of critics to find it fascinating."  Harold Rosenberg
"I don't have to kill anybody." *Taps forehead* "I kill them up here. If they don't exist in here it doesn't matter where else they exist."-Charles Manson
"Rules cannot take the place of character" Alan Greenspan (what a cool last name)
"It doesn't matter where you are coming from. All that matters is where you are going."  Brian Tracy
"It's so hard to forget pain, but it's even harder to remember sweetness. We have no scar to show for happiness. We learn so little from peace." -- Chuck Palahniuk
"Nothing is more responsible for the 'Good old days' than a bad memory." -Stephen Pinker
"And it was strange, I thought, that sorrow lasts and can make a man look forward to death, but the mood of victory fills a moment and then is over" - V.S. Naipaul
"The burden of proof is very high. There are certain things we know that we just can"t prove. In police work, what you know and what you can prove are sometimes very far apart." -Police Chief Shane Kron discussing human traffickers
"Some men see things as they are and they ask, why? But I dream things that never were and I ask, why not?"  Bernard Shaw
"I let it go. It's like swimming against the current. It exhausts you. After a while, whoever you are, you just have to let go, and the river brings you home."
"A woman is just a woman but a good cigar is a smoke."-- Rudyard Kipling
"The world is indeed comic, but the joke is on mankind." - H.P. Lovecraft
"The price of anything is the amount of life you exchange for it."  Henry David Thoreau
"Real wealth is never having to spend time with assholes."  Austin Kleon
77 Quotes as Inspiration and Motivation For Life
"You may have a fresh start any moment you choose, for this thing we call "failure" is not the falling down, but the staying down." - Mary Pickford, actress and producer
"If in our daily life we can smile, if we can be peaceful and happy, not only we, but everyone will profit from it." - Thich Nhat Hanh, monk and peace activist
"The most important thing a father can do for his children is to love their mother."- Theodore Hesburgh
"The truly rich are those who enjoy what they have." - Yiddish Proverb
"So this is how liberty dies. With thunderous applause."  George Lucas
"Whenever you hear the consensus of scientists agrees on something or other, reach for your wallet, because you're being had."  Michael Crichton
"Stuffed deer heads on walls are bad enough, but it's worse when they are wearing dark glasses and have streamers in their antlers because then you know they were enjoying themselves at a party when they were shot."  Ellen DeGeneres
"You don't stop laughing because you grow old. You grow old because you stop laughing."  Michael Pritchard
"We always thought we"d look back on our tears and laugh, but never thought we"d look back on our laughter and cry." - unknown
" I wanted you to see what real courage is, instead of getting the idea that courage is a man with a gun in his hand. It's when you know you're licked before you begin but you begin anyway and you see it through no matter what." - Atticus Finch
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." - J. Krishnamurti
"A friend is one of the nicest things you can have and one of the best things you can be." -- Winnie-the-Pooh
"Anger is a gift." - Aristotle, Zach de la Rocha
"You need three ingredients for a cocktail. Vodka and Mountain Dew is an emergency." - Peggy Olson, Mad Men
"There are three deaths. The first is when the body ceases to function. The second is when the body is consigned to the grave. The third is that moment, sometime in the future, when your name is spoken for the last time." -David Eagleman
"The truth was a mirror in the hands of God. It fell and broke into pieces. Everyone took a piece of it, and they looked at it and thought they had the truth."  Rumi
"dying must be heaven, because living is hell"
"We cannot expect people to have respect for law and order until we teach respect to those we have entrusted to enforce those laws." -Hunter Stockton Thompson
"If fear is cultivated it will become stronger, if faith is cultivated it will achieve mastery." - John Paul Jones
"The people must know before they can act, and there is no educator to compare with the press."  Ida B. Wells
"Don"t watch the clock; do what it does. Keep going." Sam Levenson
"A part of her found it dangerously tempting to show him just how filthy she wanted to be with him." - Setta Jay, Mercenary Princess
"Everything that irritates us about others leads us to an understanding of ourselves." Carl jung
"It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
"With writing, we have second chances." - Jonathan Safran Foer
"We are healthy only to the extent that our ideas are humane." - Kurt Vonnegut, Breakfast of Champions
"I don't think human beings learn anything without desperation. Desperation is a necessary ingredient to learning anything or creating anything. Period. If you ain't desperate at some point, you ain't interesting." - Jim Carrey
"A clever person watches others, but he watches with wisdom, not with ignorance. If one watches with wisdom, one can learn much. But if one watches with ignorance, one can only find faults."  Ajahn Chah
"If you can convince the lowest white man he's better than the best colored man, he won't notice you're picking his pocket. Hell, give him somebody to look down on, and he'll empty his pockets for you." - Lyndon B. Johnson
"I think a lot of what we experience is divide and conquer. If all the have-nots got together and stopped arguing over what color the have-nots were. The haves would be shitting a brick." - Paul Provenza
"Half the harm that is done in this world is due to people who want to feel important. They don't mean to do harm; but the harm does not interest them. Or they do not see it, or they justify it because they are absorbed in the endless struggle to think well of themselves." - T.S. Eliot
"When we lose a love,we find a better one,the love of God" (William Ventura)
 Frank Tallis, The Incurable Romantic and Other Tales of Madness and Desire
"People says that poets live their life in the air;It's true,but we know how to land where there's love" (William Ventura)
"If you have the opportunity to play this game called life, you have to appreciate every moment. A lot of people don"t appreciate their moment until it"s passed" - Kanye West
"If you have the opportunity to play this game called life, you have to appreciate every moment. A lot of people don"t appreciate their moment until it"s passed" - Kanye West
"You cannot define a person on just one thing. You can"t just forget all these wonderful and good things that a person has done because one thing didn"t come off the way you thought it should come off." - Aretha Franklin
"Being the Queen is not all about singing, and being a diva is not all about singing. It has much to do with your service to people. And your social contributions to your community and your civic contributions as well" - Aretha Franklin, 'Queen of Soul'
''There is only one happiness in this life, to love and be loved.'' - George Sand
'People who like quotations love meaningless generalizations.' Graham Greene
"If you want to test your memory, try to recall what you were worrying about one year ago today."  E. Joseph Cossman
"The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Simplicity is the ultimate sophistication." Leonardo da Vinci
"I have never killed anyone, but I have looked upon some obituaries with great pleasure." - Clarence Darrow
"The question isn"t who is going to let me; it"s who is going to stop me."  Ayn Rand
"In physics, you don't have to go around making trouble for yourself - nature does it for you."  Frank Wilczek
"Silent gratitude isn't very much use to anyone."  Gertrude Stein
"Books have the same enemies as people: fire, humidity, animals, weather, and their own content."  Paul Valery
"However difficult life may seem, there is always something you can do and succeed at."  Stephen Hawking
"We are each our own devil, and we make this world our hell." -Oscar Wilde
"Never allow someone to be your priority while allowing yourself to be their option." - Mark Twain
"We have the paradox that income per person rises in the United States, but happiness does not." -Jeffrey Sachs
"Why don't you make like Odysseus and get lost?" - Arcade Gannon (Fallout: NV)
"Barnum"s great discovery was not how easy it was to deceive the public, but rather, how much the public enjoyed being deceived."  Daniel Boorstin
" I didn't have to go easy on you. A different binding agent, a stronger mix... I want you to remember that. I wanted to remind you to stay out of my way. In all the years to come, in your most private moments, I want you to remember the one man who beat you!"
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not, and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." -- Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"I used to smoke marijuana...
"I may be blind, but at least I'm not black" -Stevie Wonder
"Directly after copulation, the devil's laughter is heard" - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Ah, Benson. You have been mercifully spared from the ravages of intelligence"-- Evil. from Time Bandits
"Doesn"t matter if he looks like Brad Pitt, shit is still shit" -My uber driver from last year
"From the first day I saw you,I realized that my love for you was not blind" (William Ventura)
"Whoever is careless with the truth in small matters cannot be trusted with important matters." - Albert Einstein
"The outer ring of Christianity is a rigid guard of ethical abnegations and professional priests; but inside that inhuman guard you will find the old human life dancing like children, and drinking wine like men; for Christianity is the only frame for pagan freedom." - Chesterton (1908)
"You have undertaken to cheat me. I won't sue you, for the law is too slow. I'll ruin you." Cornelius Vanderbilt
"Permanent Restriction only leads to Fast and Sudden Heartbreak for those who Watch." -JA
"It's damn galling and impossibly sad that we still have among us the small, bitter people, the witch-hunters and the declaimers against reality." -Bukowski
"As my daddy used to say "The fewer declarative statements a man makes the less likely he is to look foolish in retrospect."" Tarantino's character Chester in Four Rooms.
"Your own words are the bricks and mortar of the dreams you want to realize. Your words are the greatest power you have. The words you choose and their use establish the life you experience." Sonia Choquette
"Fuck off or I"ll punch you in the throat" Mahatma Gandhi
"Save your breath for cooling your porridge" Brad Pitt in the movie snatch
"The ultimate result of shielding men from the effects of folly is to fill the world with fools."  Herbert Spencer
"Confusion is always the most honest response."  Marty Indik
"Yesterday I was a dog. Today I'm a dog. Tomorrow I'll probably still be a dog. Sigh! There's so little hope for advancement."  Charles M. Schulz
"A person is but the product of their thoughts. What they think, they become." Mahatma Gandhi
"You can go out for lunch, relax at home, sit in the park, or anything that will make your wife feel special" - Zaffar Khan
"Enlightenment is when the wave realizes it is the ocean." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"Live intensely, until you feel you"re dying of life. So weird is that feeling, and so strange, that we should live it screaming. I feel I should die of living and wonder if it makes sense to find an explanation for this feeling. " Emil Cioran
"Life is unfair. Living is the process to make it fair" - Anonymous
"The best revenge is living well" - George Herbert
"Though I am often in the depths of misery, there is still calmness, pure harmony and music inside me." - Vincent van Gogh
"There is no greater sorrow than to recall in misery the time when we were happy." - Dante Alighieri
"Tomorrow (Noun) a mystical land where 99% of all human productivity, motivation, and achievement is stored." - Unknown
"Tomorrow, (Noun), a mystical land where 99% of all human productivity, motivation, and achievement is stored." - Unknown
"America is great because she is good. If America ceases to be good, America will cease to be great." - Alexis de Tocqueville
"I had only to wish that there be a large crowd of spectators the day of my execution and that they greet me with cries of hate."
"I've had it with these monkey-fighting snakes on this monday to friday plane!" - Samuel L. Jackson, the TV version
"Here"s the deal. The human soul doesn"t want to be advised or fixed or saved. It simply wants to be witnessed..." - Parker Palmer
"Being alone is something as simple as taking a nap. Being lonely is waking up to the realisation that you have nothing better to do."
"Never steal from someone you can't outrun, kid."-Catwoman
"How the fuck should I know? Nobody motherfuckin" involves me with a motherfuckin" thing around this cocksuckin" motherfuckin" shithole". -Guy Who Sits In the Desk Behind Me
"The greatest remedy for anger is delay." - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"You can write any time people will leave you alone and not interrupt you. Or rather you can if you will be ruthless enough about it. But the best writing is certainly when you are in love." - Ernest Hemingway
"Politicians never accuse you of 'greed' for wanting other people's money  only for wanting to keep your own money." Joseph Sobran
"Little by little, one travels far" - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do." -Mark Twain
"If you think you can fool me into being moved then prepare to be fooled. If you think you can fool yourself into moving me, then prepare to be moved"
"You need a bit of the badness to have the goodness." - Karl Pilkington
"Before we were part-time friends and full time acquaintances. Now, it seems we"ve become part-time acquaintances and full time strangers"
"Life is like being at the dentist. You always think that the worst is still to come, and yet it is over already." -Bismarck
"Don"t aim at successthe more you aim at it and make it a target, the more you are going to miss it. For success, like happiness, cannot be pursued; it must ensue." -Victor Frankl
"The object is to be encouraged tomorrow by today"s frustration, not frustrated tomorrow by today"s encouragement" -elTomador
"Loneliness is the poverty of self; solitude is the richness of self."  May Sarton
"My parents only had one argument in forty-five years. It lasted forty-three years."  Cathy Ladman
"I didn't attend the funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying that I approved of it."  Mark Twain
"I dote on his very absence."  William Shakespeare
"I never forget a face, but in your case I'll be glad to make an exception."  Groucho Marx
"I"m not tired of living, I"m living tiredly." -Me
"Two wrongs don't make a right, but neither does one. Revenge may seem petty by day, but on some nights she becomes Justice." - Ashly Lorenzana
"What you learn easily you forget easily too. If you watch and struggle on your own you will master the technique better" - Takashi Saito
"You can love him, but you can"t keep him" - j.p.
"Even if you are on the right track, you"ll get run over if you just sit there." - Will Rogers
"FEAR RUINS LIFE"
"The ruler who increases his own wealth at the expense of his people"s is like one who builds the roof of his house using materials that he digs out from the foundations."  Shihab al-Din Ahmad ibn Abd al-Wahhab al-Nuwayri (1279-1333)
"There was never a genius without a tincture of madness" - Aristotle
"He who hesitates is lost." - Cato
"You'd be surprised how many people want to hang an electric chair on their living-room wall. Specially if the background color matches the drapes."  Andy Warhol
" The best way to make your dreams come true is to wake up " - Muhammad Ali
"The grave lies ever beside the throne." -Edward Gibbon
"To never suffer would to never be blessed". Edgar Allan Poe
"We have to articulate ourselves. Otherwise we would be cows in the field."  Werner Herzog
"Try to understand each other. You can't hate men if you know them." - Steinbeck
"If the misery of our poor be caused not by the laws of nature, but by our institutions, great is our sin." -Charles Darwin
"Intelligence, in any meaningful sense of the word, can be augmented by good education; it is not a fixed and inborn quantity." -Stephen J. Gould
"I hope to arrive at my death, late, in love and a little drunk. " Instagram: @atticuspoetry
"Because after all man's intellect and power/ All you get is 650,000 hours if you're lucky then you're dead." -The Classic Crime(Album: 'Vagabonds' Song: 'Four Chords')
"But ideas have consequences, whatever motives or intentions of the promoters." -Stephen J. Gould
"Recommend virtue to your children; it alone, not money, can make them happy. I speak from experience; this was what upheld me in time of misery." -Beethoven
"It's no secret you've always been the most scared, but you've never backed down. Never. And to be brave is to go on in spite of fear." -Keith Kogane(Voltron: Legendary Defender S7:E9 'Know Your Enemy')
"The solution to big puzzles often hinges upon tiny curiosities, easy to miss or to pass over." -Stephen J. Gould
"If only corporal punishment cured low self-esteem."  Jeph Jacques
"Thomas Jefferson once said, 'We should never judge a president by his age, only by his works.' And ever since he told me that, I stopped worrying."  Ronald Reagan
"The most likely way for the world to be destroyed, most experts agree, is by accident. That's where we come in; we're computer professionals. We cause accidents."  Nathaniel Borenstein
"It is not enough to succeed. Others must fail."  Gore Vidal
"Jesters do oft prove prophets." --Shakespeare
"Cryptocurrency enthusiasts are effectively celebrating the use of cutting-edge technology to set the monetary system back 300 years. " - nobel prize-winning economist Paul Krugman, 7/31/2018
"I prefer my melee's like I prefer my laser rifles. Lethal up to 300 meters." - Rhino
"The only way to lose weight is to check it as airline baggage."_ Peggy Ryan.
"Texas loves Texas the way Kanye loves Kanye." - some chicks shirt
"The most introspective of souls are often those that have been hurt the most." - Shannon L. Alder
"Do not just bask in your achievements - multiply them, do not just count your losses - negate them" FlowingJade
"The biggest risk is not taking any risk. In a world that is changing really quickly, the only strategy that is guaranteed to fail is not taking risks." - Mark Zuckerberg
"Complex thought for too long is time wasting as nothing gets done, Think of something and do not hesitate to make a decision. As a decision can be made right with enough effort" - FlowingJade
"It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live." - Roman Emperor Marcus Aurelius, Meditations.
"I just love the oldies radio; My favorite Elvis song is like, ghetto something...let me think, oh yeah, Ghetto Booties!" -Nick Jonas
"Settle down now; understand that I just watched you absent mindedly deposit a toothpick in your pocket" -Noam Chomksy
"Out on the edge you see all kinds of things you can't see from the center. [...] Big, undreamed-of things--the people on the edge see them first." - Kurt Vonnegut
"I believe the common denominator of the Universe is not harmony, but chaos, hostility and murder."  Werner Herzog, in Grizzly Man
"Either everyone fucks here, or the whore goes in the river." -- Spanish proverb
"There are two ways of spreading light: to be the candle or the mirror that receives it." - Edith Wharton
"Do not spoil what you have by desiring what you have not; remember that what you now have was once among the things you only hoped for." - Epicurus
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas Edison
"Life sucks....and than you die!" - Vince McMahon
"Decide that you want it more than you are afraid of it." - Unknown
"Once you look up to someone, you can't overtake them."
"My life's about spending time in the repository of uncharted thought." - Matthew Van Heerden
"Success seems to be connected with action. Successful people keep moving. They make mistakes, but they don't quit." -- Conrad Hilton
"The student as boxer, not fencer. The fencer"s weapon is picked up and put down again. The boxer"s is part of him. All he has to do is clench his fist." -Marcus Aurelius
"Language is the source of misunderstandings."  Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Freedom of the press is limited to those who own one."  A. J. Liebling
"The more I study religions the more I am convinced that man never worshipped anything but himself."  Sir Richard Francis Burton
"I know that there are people who do not love their fellow man, and I hate people like that!"  Tom Lehrer
"The power of faith is the only thing that connects the beginning with the end." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Nothing is ever wrong. We learn from every step we take. Whatever you did today was the way it was meant to be. Be proud of you."
"The world is what it is; men who are nothing, who allow themselves to become nothing, have no place in it." - V. S. Naipaul
"Money frees you from doing things you dislike. Since I dislike doing nearly everything, money is handy." - Groucho Marx
"As pure as the driven snow" - (unknown)
"The more I think about it, the more I realize there is nothing more artistic than to love others." - Vincent Van Gogh
"The moment you become satisfied with the world the way it is, is the moment you lose the ability to change it." -Alexander Philip Skarner
"Good decisions come from experience, and experience comes from bad decisions." - Unknown
"I feel like Jesus feels. But i'm not religious. That is a paradox, and we all live in one." Me &amp; My ego: Adrian Pettersen.
"A person can realize a mistake in twenty minutes, or twenty years. It depends how much they value what was lost that determines the time." - Anonymous
"You cannot swim for new horizons until you have courage to lose sight of the shore." - William Faulkner
"Narcissist: psychoanalytic term for the person who loves himself more than his analyst."  Thomas Szasz
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened."
"My standard for verisimilitude is simple and I came to it when I started to write prose narrative: fuck the average reader." -- David Simon
[Text] "Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"One of the principal functions of a friend is to suffer (in a milder and symbolic form) the punishments that we should like, but are unable, to inflict upon our enemies." -Aldous Huxley
"The literal meaning of life is whatever you're doing that prevents you from killing yourself." - Albert Camus
"Tell me what you brag about. I'll tell you what you are missing." -- Spanish proverb
"When one door of happiness closes, another opens, but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one that has been opened for us."--Helen Keller
"If your only goal is to become rich, you will never achieve it." --John D. Rockefeller
"A person who never made a mistake never tried anything new." --Albert Einstein
" Even when disagreeing with someone, choose good words. There"s no need to be rude and hurtful because you don"t share their point of view " Ismail Menk
"Perhaps a lunatic was simply a minority of one.Goerge Orwell
"Everything was beautiful and nothing hurt." - Kurt Vonnegut
"A husband is like a fire, he goes out when unattended."  Evan Esar
"Being in politics is like being a football coach. You have to be smart enough to understand the game, and dumb enough to think it's important."  Eugene McCarthy
"The capacity of human beings to bore one another seems to be vastly greater than that of any other animal."  H. L. Mencken
"Eternity's a terrible thought. I mean, where's it all going to end?"  Tom Stoppard
"Soon is not as good as now." Seth Godin
"He who has a Why to live for can bear almost any How." -Victor Frankl
"im laughing so hard my dick is getting soft" - Me, 2018
"You see a place on Priceline, and then, when you get there, there's a dead body in it." - D L Hughley
"Discipline is freedom." - Renato Russo
"Saying you don't need privacy because you have nothing to hide is like saying you don't need freedom of speech because you have nothing to say." - Edward Snowden
"I heard murder ran / this vast deserted land / since back when Burning Man / was blacks in Birmingham." - Tariq Trotter aka Black Thought
"The problem with our liberal friends is not that they are ignorant, but that they know so much that isn"t so." - Ronald Reagan
"Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing it incorrectly and applying the wrong remedies." - Groucho Marx
"Fathom the hypocrisy of a government that requires every citizen to prove they are insured... but not everyone must prove they are a citizen." --Ben Stein
"Technology is like any other Power, without Reason, without Heart, it destroys us." -D. Prince
"War is the greatest of all crimes; and yet there is no aggressor who does not color his crime with the pretext of justice" - Voltaire, The Ignorant Philosopher
"The only journey is the one within." Rainer Maria Rilke
"Valor does not make one good, yet how many good men have you met in your life's journey who were cowards?"
"War doesn"t negate decency. It demands it, even more than in times of peace." - Khaled Hosseini
"Man is the only creature who refuses to be what he is." - Albert Camus
"The greater a man"s talents, the greater his power to lead astray." -Aldous Huxley
"A crowd is not the sum of the individuals who compose it. Rather it is a species of animal, without language or real consciousness, born when they gather, dying when they depart." -Gene Wolfe
"Good books don't give up all their secrets at once." - Stephen king
"Good books don't give up all their secrets at once." - Stephen
"The principle doesn't make the man, the man makes the principle." - Yours Truly
"Love is an inborn drive, its us who choose to use it or not to" - Tendai Chihoko
"Much of the best work of the world has been done against seeming impossibilities." Dale Carnegie
"I should like to take your head apart, put a fact in it, and watch it go its way through the runnels of your brain until it comes out of your mouth. We were both born here, we went to the same schools, we were taught the same things. I wonder what you saw and heard." - Harper Lee
"If I were not a physicist, I would probably be a musician. I often think in music. I live my daydreams in music. I see my life in terms of music." - Albert Einstein
"Surround yourself with the dreamers and the doers, the believers and thinkers, but most of all, surround yourself with those who see the greatness within you, even when you don"t see it yourself." - Edmund Lee
"Be pleasant until ten o"clock in the morning, and the rest of the day will take care of itself."  Elbert Hubbard
"Smooth seas do not make skillful sailors."  Proverb
"A home-made friend wears longer than one you buy in the market." Austin O'Malley
"It doesn't matter if the glass is half-full or half-empty, drink that shit and stop complaining" - Rudy Francisco
"No one is poor except he who lacks knowledge." Rabbi Hyman Krustofski
"You can resolve to live your life with integrity. Let your credo be this: Let the lie come into the world, let it even triumph. But not through me." - Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"If I had two faces, would I be wearing this one?"- Abraham Lincoln, in response to a debater calling him "two-faced" (meaning dishonest)
"When a person can no longer laugh at himself, it is time for others to laugh at him."  Thomas Szasz
"The least of learning is done in the classrooms."  Thomas Merton
"A man thinks that by mouthing hard words he understands hard things."  Herman Melville
"I don't mind what language an opera is sung in so long as it is a language I don't understand."  Sir Edward Appleton
"Life is not a matter of holding good cards, but sometimes, playing a poor hand well." - Jack London
"Life doesn't have fairy tale endings. If it did, we wouldn't need fairy tales." -Anonymous
"Never dull your shine for somebody else." - Tyra Banks
"If the person you are talking to doesn't appear to be listening, be patient. It may simply be that he has a small piece of fluff in his ear."--Winnie-the Pooh
"I was from Connecticut, whose Constitution declares "that all political power is inherent in the people, and all free governments are founded on their authority and instituted for their benefit; and that they have at all times an undeniable and indefeasible right to alter their form of government
" The media's the most powerful entity on earth. They have the power to make the innocent guilty and to make the guilty innocent, and that's power. Because they control the minds of the masses " - Malcolm X
"It is important to draw wisdom from different places. If you take it from only one place it become rigid and stale." -Uncle Iroh, Avatar The Last Airbender
"And yet the man had meant well enough. Which only made it, in a way, much worse. Those who meant well behaved in the same way as those who meant badly." -Aldous Huxley
"God made man and Sam Colt made men equal, but John Browning keeps men free."
"How monotonously alike all the great tyrants and conquerors have been; how gloriously different are the saints." - C. S. Lewis
"I feel like Jesus feels. But i'm not religious. That is a paradox, and we all live in one." Me &amp; My ego: Adrian Pettersen.
"LIFE, is sexually transmitted."
"When a thousand people believe some made-up story for one month, that"s fake news. When a billion people believe it for a thousand years, that"s a religion, and we are admonished not to call it fake news in order not to hurt the feelings of the faithful (or incur their wrath)." - Yuval Harari
"It"s a simultaneously diabolical and simple strategy: greatly exaggerate and feign outrage over your so-called foe"s behavior while removing, distorting, or ignoring the context surrounding it." - Aja Romano [Click for the Vox piece about Tweets being weaponised]
"Life demands changes;changes demand a better life" (William Ventura)
"If you want to persuade, appeal to interest not to reason." - Benjamin Franklin
"The music of a kiss tends to dance with the rhythm of the lips" (William Ventura)
"We grow fearless when we do the things we fear." Robin Sharma
"For it is within you, that both your destruction and deliverance lie." - Epictetus
"Any word you have to hunt for in a thesaurus is the wrong word. There are no exceptions to this rule."  Stephen King
"There's a whiff of the lynch mob or the lemming migration about any overlarge concentration of like-thinking individuals, no matter how virtuous their cause."  P. J. O'Rourke
"I find it rather easy to portray a businessman. Being bland, rather cruel and incompetent comes naturally to me."  John Cleese
"People can have the Model T in any colour--so long as it's black."  Henry Ford
"One day you will wake up and there won't be any more time to do the things you've always wanted. Do it now." Paulo Coelho
"Timing, perseverance and ten years of trying will eventually make you look like an overnight success." - Biz Stone , Co-Founder of Twitter
"Heed what I say, not what I do. For counsel preached so conveniently is often arduous in practice."
10 Uplifting Quotes To Get You Through Tough Times
"Great works are performed not by strength but by perseverance."  Samuel Jackson
"I'm not suicidal, I'm just tired of living."-Unknown
"So it"s true, when all is said and done, grief is the price we pay for love." - E.A. Bucchianeri, Brushstrokes of a Gadfly,
"The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Adapt what is useful, reject what is useless, and add what is specifically your own." - Bruce Lee
"When you disagree with an -ism enough to organize against it, all you're really doing is creating yet another -ism." -Nananonymous
"Because of your smile, you make life more beautiful." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"What lies behind you and what lies in front of you, pales in comparison to what lies inside of you." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Experience is not the best teacher. The consequence from experience is the best teacher. No consequence no lesson." - Ford Taylor
"Trying is forward, hesitating is backward, giving up is outward."  Hesham Labidi
"Trying is forward, doubting is backward, giving up is outward."  Hesham Labidi
"I can't change the direction of the wind, but I can adjust my sails to always reach my destination." - Jimmy Dean
"What you do every day matters more than what you do every once in a while." Gretchen Rubin
"Whatever is, is right." - Poet Alexander Pope
"My diary is full but my life is empty."
"All wealth is the product of labor." - John Locke
"I think I have learned that the best way to lift one's self up is to help someone else." - Booker T. Washington
"Words can be like X-rays, if you use them properly  they"ll go through anything. You read and you"re pierced." -Aldous Huxley
"The paths to destruction are often indirect, but ideas can be agents as sure as guns and bombs." -Stephen J.Gould
"The unexamined life is not worth living."  Socrates
"One cannot step twice in the same river."  Heraclitus
"Always do your best. What you plant now, you will harvest later." Og Mandino
"An imbalance between rich and poor is the oldest and most fatal ailment of all republics."  Plutarch
"It is better to allow people who wish to steal from you into your empty home so they can see there is nothing to take, than to waste one's time and resources on ways to prevent them from getting in" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Error of opinion may be tolerated where reason is left free to combat it" - Thomas Jefferson
"The smarter you are, the less you speak"
"It's great that we have 'Time' otherwise everything would happen at once." -Unknown
"If you're not making mistakes, then you're not making decisions." - Catherine Cook
"If you can't explain it simply, you don't understand it well enough." --Albert Einstein
"Art is a collaboration between God and the artist, and the less the artist does the better."  Andre Gide
"Sometimes when you look in his eyes you get the feeling that someone else is driving."  David Letterman
"A lot of fellows nowadays have a B.A., M.D., or Ph.D. Unfortunately, they don't have a J.O.B."  Fats Domino
"The quickest way of ending a war is to lose it."  George Orwell
"Yesterday was yesterday, focus on today." Unknown
"It"s not always necessary to be strong, but to feel strong." - Jon Krakauer
"If life gives you lemons, I don't know, be glad that life gives you anything at all"-myself
"There are some four million different kinds of animals and plants in the world. Four million different solutions to the problems of staying alive." - David Attenborough
"There are three things I have learned never to discuss with people: religion, politics and the Great Pumpkin." --- Linus
"Self-confidence is to be comfortable when you do not know the answer and humble when you know it." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Wouldn't it be wonderful if we could all be a little more gentle with each other, and a little more loving, have a little more empathy, and maybe we'd like each other a little bit more." - Judy Garland
"But who prays for Satan? Who, in eighteen centuries, has had the common humanity to pray for the one sinner that needed it most?" - Mark Twain
"When religion and politics travel in the same cart, the riders believe nothing can stand in their way. Their movements become headlong faster and faster and faster. They put aside all thoughts of obstacles and forget the precipice does not show itself to the man in a blind rush until it's too late"
"Hoard food and it rots. Hoard money and you rot. Hoard power and the nation rots." In Adjustment Day by Chuck Palahniuk.
"In case you ever foolishly forget: I am never not thinking of you." - Virginia Woolf
"We are all ordinary. We are all boring. We are all shy. We are all bold. We are all heroes. We are all helpless. It just depends on the day" - Brad Meltzer
"To reach heaven on earth, you must go through the hell inside you"-Mikosis
"When a gift is deserved, it is not a gift but a payment." -Gene Wolfe
"After all, what can we ever gain in forever looking back and blaming ourselves if our lives have not turned out quite as we might have wished?", -Kazuo Ishiguro
"Look not for any greater harm than this: destroying the trustworthy, self-respecting well-behaved man within you." -Epictetus
"The heart is a muscle, so when it"s torn from heart break it will inevitably grow back stronger than it was."
"We serial killers are your sons, we are your husbands, we are everywhere.And there will be more of your children dead tomorrow." -- Ted Bundy
"There is no royal road to science, and only those who do not dread the fatiguing climb of its steep paths have a chance of gaining its luminous summits." Karl Marx
"The Englishman falls on the ideas and customs of other nations like a lump of granite in the water [...] That is why he remains, in the countries where he has lived for centuries, a foreigner." -- Ea de Queiroz
"The casket will be covered by the Mexican flag. For us, it will be a privilege; for the republicans, a hope; and for you, a painful lesson." -- Luis I. Rodrguez, Mexican ambassador to Vichy France
"In order to succeed, your desire for success should be greater than your fear of failure." - Bill Cosby
"The effectiveness of an argument is the product of supporting evidence times the audiences willingness to change their mind." -My Razor to be kept in mind during online arguments, in which the latter variable is almost always 0.
"To doubt everything or to believe everything are two equally convenient solutions; both dispense with the necessity of reflection." - Henri Poincare, mathematician and physicist
"To learn and not to do is really not to learn. To know and not to do is really not to know."  Stephen Covey
"Respect yourself enough to walk away from anything that no longer serves you, grows you, or makes you happy." Robert Tew
"It is sometimes an appropriate response to reality to go insane." - Philip K. Dick
"Stand in the ashes of a trillion souls and ask the ghosts if honor matters. The silence is your answer." - Javik
"Everybody is ignorant, only on different subjects." - Will Rogers
"We hope that, when the insects take over the world, they will remember with gratitude how we took them along on all our picnics."  Bill Vaughan
"What the world needs is more geniuses with humility, there are so few of us left."  Oscar Levant
"The prime purpose of eloquence is to keep other people from talking."  Louis Vermeil
"It was a book to kill time for those who like it better dead."  Dame Rose Macaulay
"Grief is like the ocean; it comes on waves ebbing and flowing. Sometimes the water is calm, and sometimes it is overwhelming. All we can do is learn to swim." Vicki Harrison
"Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful." -Albert Schweitzer
"Be a good listener. Your ears will never get you in trouble. Your lips will"  Frank Tyger
"The only way of discovering the limits of the possible is to venture a little way past them into the impossible." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Success is a democracy. The more people invested in your success, the more successful you'll be."
"Wear a smile and have friends; wear a scowl and have wrinkles." - George Eliot
"You are protected, in short, by your ability to love!" said Dumbledore loudly. "The only protection that can possibly work against the lure of power like Voldemort's!" -Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince
"Wear a smile and have friends; wear a scowl and have wrinkles." - George Eliot
"I don"t think that we can go through another of these terrible times" -Virginia Woolfs suicide note
"When a thousand people believe some made-up story for one month, that"s fake news. When a billion people believe it for a thousand years, that"s a religion"  Yuval Noah Harari
"I should have fucked ol' what's-her-name" `-- George Carlin
"By a continued process of inflation, governments can confiscate, secretly and unobserved, an important part of the wealth of their citizens. By this method, they not only confiscate, but they confiscate *arbitrarily*; and while the process impoverishes many, it actually enriches some." -John Keynes
"The nakedness of woman is the work of god." William Blake
"There is only one happiness in this life, to love and be loved." - George Sand
"That which is eternal within the moment only becomes shallow if spread out in time." - Rabindranath Tagore
"We have consulted our wishes rather than our reason in the indulgence of an idea of accommodation" -Nathanael Greene
"I don't allow myself to depend on anything, for i find there is nothing to be depended on but trouble and disappointments" - Sarah Hodgkins
'The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands in times of challenge and controversy' - Martin Luther King
"Among a million Russian huts you will never find even two that are identical...
"Inaction breeds doubt and fear. Action breeds confidence and courage. If you want to conquer fear, do not sit home and think about it. Go out and get busy."  Dale Carnegie
"The most thirsty, will win." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"You will give your best only when you do not have another choice." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"There are times in your life where you do the best you can, and your best isn't enough. You don't get the happy ending. You don't get the high fives and pats on the back. You go home broken and exhausted and wonder what the hell happened. And you don't get an answer. You just have to try again."
" Nothing is permanent in this wicked world - not even our troubles " - Charlie Chaplin
"We didn"t lose the game, we just ran out of time" - Vince Lombardi
"...So we drove past this little tiny park and my friends said to me: 'Do you wanna go in?' I go, 'You know, it looks kind of crummy. They'll probably be a couple of snakes in jars and I'll be depressed..." - Terri Irwin (The day she met Steve) [Click for full quote]
"Life should not be a journey to the grave with the intention of arriving safely in a pretty and well preserved body, but rather to skid in broadside in a cloud of smoke, thoroughly used up, totally worn out, and loudly proclaiming "Wow! What a Ride!"" - Hunter S. Thompson
"What is wealth and fame when you loose what you love" - Elvis Presley
"The most thirsty, wins." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"The most thirsty wins" - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Shoot and Aim or Aim and Shoot?... Depends on how many bullets you have."
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain
'Life is not about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself.'
"The human being is not a thing, hence not something that can be used merely as a means, but must in all his actions always be considered as an end in itself. Thus I cannot dispose of the human being in my own person, so as to maim, corrupt, or kill him." -Immanuel Kant
"It never ceases to amaze me: we all love ourselves more than other people, but care more about their opinion than our own." -Marcus Aurelius
"I"ve learned that most problems aren"t rocket science, but when they are rocket science, you should ask a rocket scientist. " -Astronaut Scott Kelly
"No foreign policy-no matter how ingenious-has any chance of success if it is born in the minds of few and carried in the hearts of many."  Theodore Roosevelt
"A happy childhood is poor preparation for human contacts."  Colette
"Nothing shocks me. I'm a scientist."  Harrison Ford
"To you I'm an atheist; to God, I'm the Loyal Opposition."  Woody Allen
[request - feel free to remove if not allowed] Does anyone here know of any succinct quotes on how complex reasoning behind war can be?
"To customs and beliefs, the very ones we hold sacred, sociology ruthlessly attaches the adjective "arbitrary"." - Raymond Aron
"Working hard for something we don"t care about is called stress; working hard for something we love is called passion." -Simon Sinek
"Improvement makes straight roads; but the crooked roads without improvement are the roads of genius."  William Blake
"Ah, summer, what power you have to make us suffer and like it."  Russell Baker
"Love is like a drug . You get addicted and it lifts you up just to bring you down"
"In all free governments, contention in elections will take place."
"Nothing can stop the man with the right mental attitude from achieving his goal; nothing on earth can help the man with the wrong mental attitude." - Thomas Jefferson
"It is foolish to entertain your emotions so much that they stop entertaining you."
"Fight for yourself and you've got one person on your side... Fight for others and you've got thousands."
"The individual who says it is not possible should move out of the way of those doing it." - Tricia Cunningham
"There is never a moral or ethics code associated with leadership. If more follow the tyrant than the saint, the tyrant is the better leader, hands down."
"There is no disgrace in being proven wrong. Doomed are those that refuse to give in to reason to protect their pride."
"Life is like Tetris. You build up accomplishments to watch them just dissapear like nothing ever happened, or you just make mistakes, and lose."
"Keep seeing the glass half-full and it will dawn upon you that it's probably your turn to buy." - Bill Murray
"The saddest thing I ever did see Was a woodpecker peckin' at a plastic tree. He looks at me, and "Friend," says he, "Things ain't as sweet as they used to be."" - Peckin' by Shel Silverstein
"If you do what you have always done, you will get what you have always got." -Robert Glover
"The day the body becomes dominated by pleasure is the day it will also be dominated by pain." -Seneca
"Humans are so destructive and failed so many times that, right now, in their environment, they are the only animals which will most likely have to conquer another environment, an extraterrestrial one, in order to survive" Emmanuelle Pouydebat, L"Intelligence animale.
"No one sees you as accurately as you see yourself except those who love you or hate you." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Humans have always lived in the age of post-truth. Homo sapiens is a post-truth species, whose power depends on creating and believing fictions. Ever since the stone age, self-reinforcing myths have served to unite human collectives. Indeed, Homo sapiens conquered this planet."
"Kindness in words creates confidence. Kindness in thinking creates profoundness. Kindness in giving creates love." -Lao Tzu
"History is the autobiography of a madman." - Alexander Herzen
"Heed what I say, not what I do. For counsel preached so conveniently is often ardous in practice." - Me
"because none of you know what you want follow me because I'm not going anywhere I'll just bleed so the stars can have something dark to shine in look at my legs I am the Nijinsky of dreams" -Frank Stanford
"I have never met a man so ignorant that I couldn't learn something from him." - Galileo Galilei
"It"s one of my theories that when people give you advice, they"re really just talking to themselves in the past."  Mark Epstein
"When I do good, I feel good; when I do bad, I feel bad, and that is my religion."  Abraham Lincoln
"Insanity: doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results."  Albert Einstein
"By all means marry; if you get a good wife, you'll be happy. If you get a bad one, you'll become a philosopher."  Socrates
"There is a coherent plan in the universe, though I don't know what it's a plan for."  Fred Hoyle
#FlipyourPhoneMovement "Don't just glance at the quotes you read, embrace them."
"That"s what friends do: they notice things. They"re there for each other. They see what parents don"t." - Nina LaCour, Hold Still
"If you want your prayers answered, get up off your knees and do something about them." - Wally Lamb
"Tact is the art of making a point without making an enemy." Isaac Newton
"I cried because I had no shoes. Then I met a man who had no feet." - Wally Lamb
"You could not prevent a thunderstorm, but you could use the electricity; you could not direct the wind, but you could trim your sail so as to propel your vessel as you pleased, no matter which way the wind blew" - Cora L.V Hatch
"So much of left-wing thought is a kind of playing with fire by people who don"t even know that fire is hot." - George Orwell
"what convinces masses are not facts, and not even invented facts, but rather, open defiance" - Jason Stanley
"When push comes to shove, you gotta do what you love. Even if it's a bad idea." -Hermes
"Try to be a rainbow in someone's cloud." - Maya Angelou
"You are all blind, blind to your own stupidity" - anonymous
"The game of life is hard to play, im gonna lose it anyway"
"The risks that scare people and the risks that kill people are very different" -Peter Sandman
"Failure is simply the opportunity to begin again, this time more intelligently."  Henry Ford
"There is no great genius without some touch of madness."  Aristotle
"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot paint,' then by all means paint, and that voice will be silenced."  Vincent Van Gogh
"Life is the greatest gift that has never been opened; it's the mystery within it which keeps all of us hoping."
[Request] Quote about babies crying because they might experience the worst moment in their life
"In the game of life, when one starts to take things too serious... you've lost."
"A person who does not have a clear goal is used by someone who does"
"If the world was blind, how many people would you impress?" - Unknown
"History is like therapy for the present, it makes it talk about its parents." - Maya Jasanoff
"Happiness is not something you postpone for the future; it is something you design for the present." Jim Rohn
"Chaos is where we are when we don't know where we are, and what we are doing when we don't know what we are doing." JB. Peterson
"A man's ideas are a function of experience and his ideas; it is natural for a thinking person to be an individualist in youth-loving liberty and grasping for ideals - and a moderate in maturity, loving order and reconciled to the possible." - Will Durant
"No true believer will be either intolerant or a persecutor" - Rousseau
"the saddest thing is to be a minute to someone, when you've made them your eternity." - Sanober Khan
"Beware of no man more than yourself; we carry our worst enemies within us."  G. K. Chesterton
"I'm a jerk to everyone. Best way to protect yourself from lawsuits."  David Hoselton
"The two most common elements in the universe are Hydrogen and stupidity."  Harlan Ellison
"In order to preserve your self-respect, it is sometimes necessary to lie and cheat."  Robert Byrne
"I have no doubt that in reality the future will be vastly more surprising than anything I can imagine. Now my own suspicion is that the Universe is not only stranger than we imagine, but stranger than we can imagine." - J.B.S. Haldane
"In my life, I have given a fuck about many people and many things. I have also not given a fuck about many people and many things. And like the road not taken, it was the fucks not given that made all the difference." - Mark Manson
"I'm not great at advice. Can I interest you in a sarcastic comment?" - Chandler Bing
"Questions unanswered are more valuable than answers unquestioned." -Me
"Knowledge is knowing a tomato is a fruit; wisdom is not putting it in a fruit salad." -Miles Kington
"A day without laughter is a day wasted" - Charlie Chaplin
"The road upward and down is one and the same." Heraclitus
"Do or do not. There is no try." -Yoda
"We're all gonna die! That's it for me!" - Currently Unknown
"The greatest good fortune is always the least to be trusted." -Hannibal
" If you don't get what you want, you suffer; if you get what you don't want, you suffer; even when you get exactly what you want, you still suffer because you can't hold on to it forever"
"There are no legacy's in this life are there? No monuments, no history, just the water. It pays us, and then it claims us, shallows us whole" - Hal Gates (Black Sails)
"Keep your face always toward the sunshine  and shadows will fall behind you." - Walt Whitman
"Beware of thinkers whose minds function only when they are fueled by a quotation." - Emil Cioran
'In nature's infinite book of secrecy, a little I can read' Anthony and Cleopatra, Shakespeare.
'With mirth and laughter let old wrinkles come' Merchant of Venice. Shakespeare.
"Show me a man or a woman alone and I'll show you a saint..."
"My father was brutally murdered last week, and it's only now that I can look back and laugh." - Norm Macdonald
" Return the goods entrusted to you to their rightful owners. Hurt no one so that no one may hurt you. Remember that you will indeed meet your Lord, and that He will indeed reckon your deeds " The last sermon of Prophet Muhammad ()
"I was pilotin' Black Ops missions in the jungles of North Vietnam while you were suckin' on your mama's tit at Woodstock, Kelly. Don't lecture me about war. This already is a war." -Stryker
"Talent is insignificant. I know a lot of talented ruins. Beyond talent lie all the usual words: discipline, love, luck, but, most of all, endurance."  James Baldwin
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad" - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Learn to say "Fuck you' to the world once in a while. You have every right to." -Sol Lewitt
"I am not afraid of robots. I am afraid of people, people, people. I want them to remain human. I can help keep them human with the wise and lovely use of books, films, robots, and my own mind, hands, and heart." -Ray Bradbury
"I hate purity, I hate goodness! I don't want any virtue to exist anywhere." - George Orwell, 1984
"Adversity is the diamond dust Heaven polishes its jewels with." Thomas Carlyle
10 Motivational Quotes to Help You Move on
"The only real revolutions are those that change the mind and heart, and the only real revolutionists are the sage and the saint." Voltaire
"Good taste is the enemy of comedy."  Mel Brooks
"I never vote for anyone; I always vote against."  W. C. Fields
"Only exceptionally rational men can afford to be absurd."  Allan Goldfein
"It is well to remember that the entire universe, with one trifling exception, is composed of others."  John Andrew Holmes
"You can't wake a person that is pretending to be asleep." - Navajo proverb
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." Eleanor Roosevelt
"Dogs do speak, but only to those who know how to listen." Orhan Pamuk (author, My Name Is Red)
"If people who have to work together in an enterprise trust one another because they are all operating according to a common set of ethical norms, doing business costs less." - Francis Fukuyama
"Listening without learning is like eating without the nutritional value." - Deborah J. Young
"Never argue with someone who believes their own lies"
"Stupid people will mistake your confidence with arrogance"
"Do not, by any means, destroy yourself, for if you live, you may yet have good fortune, but all the dead are dead and dead alike." - C.S. Lewis, The Horse and His Boy
"Be more concerned with your character than your reputation, because your character is what you really are, while your reputation is merely what others think you are." "The true test of a man's character is what he does when no one is watching." John Wooden
"Don't give your past the power to define your future." - Unknown
"Under every truth you will find another deep truth, sometimes it's far away from the first one. " - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Fame can come easily and overnight, but excellence is almost always accompanied by a crushing workload, pursued with single-minded intensity." - Charles Murray
" Do not waste water even if you were at a running stream "  Prophet Muhammad (peace be upon him)
"You"re playing the game according to somebody else"s rules, and you can"t win until you understand the rules and step out of that particular game, which is not, after all, worth playing." James Baldwin
"Be soft. Do not let the world make you hard. Do not let the pain make you hate. Do not let the bitterness steal your sweetness. Take pride that even though the rest of the world may disagree, you still believe it to be a beautiful place." -Iain S. Thomas
" Many people have a habit of accusing others blindly. A blame without proof remains a mere blame. When there"s no concrete evidence, nothing carries weight. It remains a mere accusation. It doesn"t become fact! Don't be fooled. " - Ismail Menk
"Uber, the world"s largest taxi company, owns no vehicles. Facebook, the world"s most popular media owner, creates no content. And Airbnb, the world"s largest accommodation provider, owns no real estate. Something interesting is happening." - Tom Goodwin
"Everything worthwhile in life is won through surmounting the associated negative experience. Any attempt to escape the negative, to avoid it or quash it or silence it, only backfires." - Mark Manson (click for full quote)
"Muddy water is best cleared by leaving it alone." - Alan Watts
"So much of philosophy is just verbal masturbation."  Abe, Irrational Man
"Facts don't lie, but you can lie with facts" -troyzein
"Most people do not listen with the intent to understand; they listen with the intent to reply" - Stephen Covey
"Be alone, eat alone, take yourself on dates, sleep alone. In the midst of this you will find yourself...And when you finally meet the right person who makes your cells dance, you will be sure of it. Because you are sure of yourself..." [Click for full quote]
"In every man, heredity and environment have combined to produce a creature of certain abilities and desires--including a deeply ingrained need to function in such a way that his life will be meaningful. A man has to be something, he has to matter."
"Hell is empty
"Scars have the strange power to remind us that our past is real." - Cormac McCarthy, All the Pretty Horses
"Speaking personally, you can have my gun, but you'll take my book when you pry my cold, dead fingers off of the binding.- Stephen King
"Speaking personally, you can have my gun, but you'll take my book when you pry my cold, dead fingers off of the binding." - Stephen King
"The most dangerous lies are the ones you tell yourself"
"Each morning we are born again. What we do today is what matters most." Buddha
"You may plan to write a book some day, but you are living a book every day." - Wilferd Peterson
"A man can stand anything except a succession of ordinary days."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"All that is human must retrograde if it does not advance."  Edward Gibbon
"The multitude of books is making us ignorant."  Voltaire
"Reality is nothing but a collective hunch."  Jane Wagner
"If you love it, you'll teach yourself. If you don't love it, others teach you" - Yukitaka Yamaguchi (The Tuna King)
"What if the light at the end of the tunnel is not the headlight of the oncoming train, but a vision of the future. There is no train. We are the light and the rumbling you can feel shaking the very ground is the world shuddering as you change it. The track, only a mere indication..."-Jarred Cole
"Better to be accompanied by none than to be associated with a company that doesn"t suit your vibe."-Aditya
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken."  Oscar Wilde
" We humans want to see God, yet can not stare at the Sun for more then a few seconds "
"The highest level of intelligence is to understand who you are at your deepest level." - Sandeep Maheshwari
"Only the guy who isn"t rowing has time to rock the boat." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"You're going to pay a price for every bloody thing you do and everything you don't do. You don't get to choose to not pay a price. You get to choose which poison you're going to take. That's it." - Jordan B. Peterson
''No amount of security is worth the suffering of a life chained to a routine that has killed your dreams.'' - Kent Nerburn
"Most people use their head so sparsely that they don"t even notice when they lose it" - Cornelis Buddingh
"Why don"t they pass a constitutional amendment prohibiting anybody from learning anything? If it works as well as prohibition did, in five years we will have the smartest people on earth."--Will Rogers
"Her pattern of speech is an archaeological blueprint...The best approximation I can come up with is Alicia Silverstone from Clueless, if the film had been set in a Turkish prison." - Geraldine DeRuiter
"There are two types of people who will tell you that you cannot make a difference in this world: those who are afraid to try and those who are afraid you will succeed."
" Nothing is permanent in this wicked world - not even our troubles " - Charlie Chaplin
"The attempt to develop a sense of humor and to see things in a humorous light is some kind of a trick learned while mastering the art of living." - Viktor E. Frankl
"Power and kindness without intelligence is risky; Power and intelligence without kindness is hopeless; Intelligence and kindness without power is in vain." - Chatur Padagavakar
"Remember that happiness is a way of travel, not a destination."  Roy Goodman
"When I first met you you were nothing more than another face but six months later and you're the only face I could ever find in a crowded place." - Mindless Rants
"Stop caring so much about the people that don't care about you and focus on the people that do care about you" -My Brother
"If everything seems under control, you're not going fast enough"  Mario Andretti
"How vain it is to sit down to write when you have not stood up to live."  Henry David Thoreau
"Don't accept rides from strange men, and remember that all men are strange."  Robin Morgan
"Rock journalism is people who can't write interviewing people who can't talk for people who can't read."  Frank Zappa
"We will fight it? Why?" Atreus asked. "Because you are afraid of it," Kratos replied. - God of War 4.
"If it keeps up, man will atrophy all his limbs but the push-button finger." - Frank Lloyd Wright
"A man is not finished when he is defeated. He is finished when he quits." - Richard Nixon
"When liberty is mentioned, we must always be careful to observe whether it is not really the assertion of private interests which is thereby designated." - Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel
"When we realize how little we mean to the universe, we realize how important we are to each other." Tom Delogne
"Few people understand the psychology of dealing with a highway traffic cop. Your normal speeder will panic and immediately pull over to the side. This is wrong. It arouses contempt in the cop-heart. Make the bastard chase you. He will follow." - Hunter Thompson
"In the land of the blind, the one-eyed man is king" -Tom Waits
"You can curse the darkness, or you can just light a candle." - Varg Vikernes
"There are two primary choices in life: to accept conditions as they exist, or accept the responsibility for changing them." - Denis Waitley
"Those who expect to reap the blessings of freedom, must, like men, undergo the fatigues of supporting it." -Thomas Paine
"Impatience can cause wise people to do foolish things." - Janette Oke
"Build a mindset that no one can crack it, even life." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
" The point is that if we see a painting, we know there is a painter. If we see a sculpture, we know there"s a sculptor; a pot, a potter. So when we view creation, shouldn"t we know there"s a Creator? " The Big Questions Dr. Laurence B. Brown
"You do not examine legislation in the light of the benefits it will convey if properly administered, but in the light of the wrongs it would do and the harms it would cause if improperly administered."---Lyndon B. Johnson
"Beyond the earth, beyond the farthest skies I try to find Heaven and Hell. Then I hear a solemn voice that says: Heaven and Hell are inside."
1 Posted byu/Yellewleaves just now Those who do not move,do not notice their chains-Rosa luxemborg
"Who knows the secret tomorrow will hold?//We don't really need to know" - Perfect Strangers, Jonas Blue ft. JP Cooper
"The more you lose yourself in something bigger than yourself, the more energy you will have." - Norman Vincent Peale
"Don't play the part of a jester play the part of a noble"
"You are capable of more than you know" - Glinda
"The highest form of ignorance is when you reject something you don't know anything about." - Wayne Dyer
"It is better to die in infamy than to live a life of obscurity" - L&amp;O SVU
"When everybody is somebody, nobody is anybody" - W.S. Gilbert
"Let the life of every Turkmen be as beautiful as one of our melons" -Saparmurat Niyazov
"A riot is the language of the unheard" -MLK
"We are, quite literally, gambling with the future of our planetfor the sake of hamburgers." Peter Singer
"If it can be destroyed by the truth, it deserves to be destroyed by the truth." - Carl Sagan
"He who fears being conquered is sure of defeat." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Collusion is not a crime, but that doesn"t matter because there was No Collusion (except by Crooked Hillary and the Democrats)!" -Donald Trump
"The books that the world calls immoral are the books that show the world its own shame." - Oscar Wilde
"let the buffoonery of Postmodernity take its course, let it dilute the definite paradigms... let nothing carry along with it all of the world content...then the secret doors will be opened and ancient, eternal ontological archetypes will come to the surface and terribly finish off the game." Dugin
"I used to shake my head when people talked about soulmates, poor deluded individuals grasping at some supernatural ideal not intended for mortals but sounded pretty in a poetry book. Then, we met, and everything changed, the cynic has become the converted, the sceptic, an ardent zealot." - E.A.
"Don't give up, the beginning is always the hardest." Unknown
[Request] A quote along the lines of 'Don't listen to your thoughts when you're tired or anxious'. Really appropriate for a friend right now, but can't find it anywhere!
"Just a word of advice. Whenever you're furious with your parents or you think they're terrible, just remember, you vomited on them and they kept you."  John Green
"The only way to make a man trustworthy is to trust him."  Henry Stimson
"The dead might as well try to speak to the living as the old to the young."  Willa Cather
"Wagner's music is better than it sounds."  Edgar Wilson Nye
"Do anything, but let it produce joy." - Walt Whitman, Leaves of Grass.
"The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom." - Isaac Asimov
"Nothing diminishes anxiety faster than action." Walter Anderson
" anyone who studies the complexities of life and the universe cannot help but witness the signature of the Creator " The Big Questions Dr. Laurence B. Brown
"By then she was dead. In fact, she may have been dead a while ago. Physically, several seconds ago, mentally, ages ago." - Koushun Takami
"If you want a happy ending, that depends, of course, on where you stop your story." - Orson Welles
"Speed is only useful if you are running in the right direction."  Joel Barker
"Anybody who believes that the way to a man's heart is through his stomach flunked geography." - Robert Byrne
"You realize how much you miss someone when something happens - good or bad - and the only person you want to tell is the one person who isn't there." - Life Hack
"Never guiltless may I speak of him, The Incomprehensible! save when with awe I praise him, and with Faith that inly feels; Who with his saving mercies healed me, A sinful and most miserable man, Wildered and dark, and gave me to possess Peace, and this Cot, and thee" --Coleridge
"Time means a lot to me because, you see, I, too, am also a learner and am often lost in the joy of forever developing and simplifying. If you love life, don"t waste time, for time is what life is made up of."
"We have to continually be jumping off cliffs and developing our wings on the way down." - Kurt Vonnegut. From: If This Isn"t Nice, What Is?
"There was a time in this country, a long time ago, when reading wasn't just for fags and neither was writing. People wrote books and movies, movies that had stories so you cared whose ass it was and why it was farting, and I believe that time can come again!" -President Joe Bowers
"The public likes entertainment better than it likes information." - William Randolph Hearst
"Once a year, go some place you've never been before." - Dalai Lama
"Of all ghosts, the ghosts of old loves are the worst." - Arthur Conan Doyle
"I like people too much or not at all"- Sylvia Plath
"I never forget a face, but in your case I'll be glad to make an exception." - Groucho Marx
"Most people don't know how they're gonna feel from one moment to the next. But a dope fiend has a pretty good idea. All you gotta do is look at the labels on the little bottles." -Matt Dillon (Drugstore Cowboy)
"A bore is someone who deprives you of solitude without providing you with company."-Oscar Wilde
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"I learned from Hussain how to be wronged and be a winner, I learnt from Hussain how to attain victory while being oppressed." - Mahatma Gandhi
"There is no love sincerer than the love of food." - George Bernard Shaw
...pick whichever reason feeds your narcisssim better. Dr. Lisa Cuddy, House
"Either write something worth reading or do something worth writing." - Benjamin Franklin
"I have simply tried to do what seemed best each day, as each day came." - Abraham Lincoln
"One"s concern with the ethics of means and ends varies inversely with one"s personal interest in the issue, and one"s distance from the scene of conflict." - Saul Alinsky
"He can neither read nor right, and in him broods already a taste for mindless violence. All history present in that visage. The child, the father of the man."- Cormac McCarthy
"Shee, you guys are so unhip it"s a wonder your bums don"t fall off." - Douglas Adams, The Hitchhiker"s Guide to the Galaxy
"Surround yourself with the best people you can find, delegate authority, and don't interfere." - Ronald Reagan
"A morning of awkwardness is far better than a night of loneliness" Hank Moody
"I feel I must remind you that it is an undeniable, and may I say a fundamental quality of Man, that when faced with extinction, every alternative is preferable." - Dr. Leonard Church [Red vs Blue]
"My dear spouse would say that the true symbol of the United States is not the bald eagle -- it is the pendulum. And when it goes very far in one direction you can count on its swinging back." - Ruth Bader Ginsberg
"Humanitarianism is the expression of stupidity and cowardice." - Adolf Hitler
"It Doesn't Get Easier. You Just Get Better."
"Man is not what he thinks he is, but what he thinks, he is." - Elbert Hubbard
"Investment in knowledge has the best returns." -Benjamin Franklin
"Maybe we don't have any right to win. But all I know is if I go out and bust my gut until I black out and somebody still beats me, and if I have made that guy reach down and use everything he has and then more, why then it just proves that on that day he's a better man than I."-Steve Prefontaine
""  Ernie Kovacs
"A girl phoned me the other day and said "Come on over, there's nobody home." I went over. Nobody was home."  Rodney Dangerfield
"The trouble with being punctual is that nobody's there to appreciate it."  Franklin P. Jones
"Don't let the mistakes and disappointments of the past control and direct your future." Zig Ziglar
"Stop focusing on how stressed you are and remember how blessed you are." Unknown
"If you only have a hammer, you tend to see every problem as a nail." - Abraham Maslow
"Bud... a man stares into the abyss, there's nothing looking back at him. It is at that moment that he finds his character." -Hal Holbrook (Wallstreet)
"He who learns must suffer. And even in our sleep pain that cannot forget falls drop by drop upon the heart, and in our own despair, against our will, comes wisdom to us by the awful grace of God." -Aeschylus
"It's only after we've lost everything that we're free to do anything."
''You owe yourself the love that you so freely give to other people." - Alexandra Elle
"Italy is the comic version of Spain, and Spain is the tragic version of Italy." -- Indro Montanelli
"Having perfected our disguise, we spend our lives searching for someone we don"t fool." - Robert Brault
"Intelligence is a gentleman's greatest asset" - /u/nervousnsman
"It"s okay if you don"t take me seriously; just don"t take me for granted." - Me
"I wear the chain I forged in life," replied the Ghost. "I made it link by link, and yard by yard; I girded it on of my own free will, and of my own free will I wore it. - A Christmas Carol by Charles Dickens
"It doesn"t matter if you win by an inch or a mile winning is winning" Fast and the furious! #missyoupaulwalker
"Fiction is a lie that tells us true things, over and over." Neil Gaiman
"A smooth sea never made a skilled sailor" Franklin Roosevelt
"Republicans think that all over the world darker-skinned people are having more fun than they are. It's largely true." -Jim Harrison and Ted Kooser, Braided Creek
"Suffering is not holding you. You are holding suffering. When you become good at the art of letting sufferings go, then you'll come to realize how unnecessary it was for you to drag those burdens around with you. You'll see that no one else other than you was responsible. The truth is that existenc
"Let's get ready to rumble!" -Michael Buffer
"Everyone creates the thing they dread. Men of peace create engines of war. People create... smaller people? Er... children! I lost the word there. Children. Designed to supplant them. To help them... end."
"Pathetic Earthlings, hurling your bodies out into the void, without the slightest inkling of who or what is out here. If you had known anything about the true nature of the universe, anything at all, you would've hidden from it in terror!"--Ming the Merciless to F. Gordon.
"Pathetic Earthlings, hurling your bodies out into the void, without the slightest inkling of who or what is out here. If you had known anything about the true nature of the universe, anything at all, you would've hidden from it in terror!"-- Ming the Merciless to F. Gorgon
"Hope is like heroin to a hostage, and it can be just as destructive." Michael Scott Moore
"Get off of Reddit and get back to studying and looking for a job." - my Mom
"Quit looking a quotes by dead folks and get back to studying and looking for a job." - my Mom
"Don't worry about failures, worry about the chances you miss when you don't even try." - Jack Canfield
"This world is a taker. It will take as much as you can give. It will never tire of taking. The more you give, the more it wants. You"ll be left weary &amp; depleted. That"s the nature of this world and what it stands for. Remember, givers must have boundaries because takers do not!" - Mufti I Menk
"Hysteria is impossible without an audience." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Outside of a dog, a book is a man's best friend. Inside of a dog it's too dark to read." - Groucho Marx
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it's like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone to feel like that." - Robin Williams
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy. Because they know what it feels like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone else to feel like that." -Robin Williams
"The most difficult subjects can be explained to the most slow-witted man if he has not formed any idea of them already;
"Young man, there's no need to feel down I said, young man, pick yourself off the ground I said, young man, cause you're in a new town There's no need to be unhappy Young man, there's a place you can go." The Village People
"We lose sight of everything when we have to keep checking our backs" - Ani Difranco
"The strength of the team is each individual member, the strength of each member is the team!" Phil Jackson
"You know, it's funny...when you look at someone through rose-colored glasses, all the red flags just look like flags." - Wanda Pierce (BoJack Horseman)
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and they don"t want anyone else to feel like that." - Robin Williams
"If there is no struggle, there is no progress. Those who profess to favor freedom &amp; yet deprecate agitation are men who want crops without plowing up the ground; they want rain without thunder &amp; lightning. They want the ocean without the awful roar of its many waters." Frederick Douglass
"My opponent is my teacher. My ego is my enemy." - Renzo Gracie
"There's no such a thing as Free Will since we're all interdependent parts of this Universe but it seems the illusion of it correlates with personal success". - Dimitry Kurnayov
"The desire to take medicine is perhaps the greatest feature which distinguishes man from animals."  Sir William Osler
"Television is for appearing on - not for looking at."  Noel Coward
"If you don't find it in the index, look very carefully through the entire catalogue."  Unknown
"Anyone can do any amount of work provided it isn't the work he is supposed to be doing at the moment."  Robert Benchley
"Ever has it been that love knows not its own depth until the hour of separation." - Kahlil Gibran
"To insure good health: eat lightly, breathe deeply, live moderately, cultivate cheerfulness, and maintain an interest in life."  William Londen
"I'll blow your face off your face."
"Some cause happiness wherever they go; others whenever they go." -Oscar Wilde
"We all make rules for ourselves. It's these rules that help define who we are. So when we break those rules, we risk losing ourselves and becoming something unknown." -Dexter Morgan
"Well, I tried, didn't I? Goddamnit, at least I did that." - McMurphy, One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest (1975)
"Compare yourself to who you were yesterday, not to who someone else is today." - Jordan Peterson
"You miss who I used to be? How do you think I feel? I have to live in that guy's fucking corpse." - Self, 7/27/18
" I am alive. I don't have to do special things to prove that I am alive. My concept of heaven and hell is that in the moment of death you realize your life was full and good--that's heaven. And if you think, 'Oh I should have done this or that, I think that's hell.' "
"Winners are not people who never fail, but people who never quit." - Edwin Louis Cole
"Wow, you know a lot of smart people. You should try meeting some dumb people; you could really learn something."
"We Are All Mad Here"--The Cheshire Cat. (Also posted above my office door)
"You can"t stop change any more than you can stop the suns from setting."  Shmi Skywalker
 The most beloved people to Allah are those who are most beneficial to the people 
"Sometimes life is like this dark tunnel, you can"t always see the light at the end of the tunnel, but if you just keep moving, you will come to a better place." - Iroh
"When you are happy, you enjoy the music and when you are sad you understand the lyrics". Frank Ocean
"Some of us can"t carry around all of this..... madness, sometimes the truth crawls out." -Michael Loman, Shades of Blue
"Stand in faith even when you're having the hardest time of your life."
"And let thy feet millenniums hence, be set in midst of knowledge." - Lord Tennyson
"The man matures with the years,in other cases with the disappointment" (William Ventura)
"It never ceases to amaze me: we all love ourselves more than other people, but care more about their opinion than our own." - Marcus Aurelius.
"The problem is not losing the head for love,the problem is finding it after losing it" (William Ventura)
"It never ceases to amaze me: we all love ourselves more than other people, but care more about their opinion than our own." - Marcus Aurelius.
"I hate mankind, for I think myself one of the best of them, and I know how bad I am." - Samuel Johnson
" You give as much, as you'd like to get, or expect to get more than you're worth "
"Be a bush if you can"t be a tree. If you can"t be a highway, just be a trail. If you can"t be a sun, be a star. For it isn"t by size that you win or you fail. Be the best of whatever you are." - Martin Luther King, Jr
"There are two kinds of light--the glow that illuminates, and the glare that obscures."  James Thurber
"The most radical revolutionary will become a conservative the day after the revolution."  Hannah Arendt
"If one morning I walked on top of the water across the Potomac River, the headline that afternoon would read "President Can't Swim"."  Lyndon B. Johnson
"Some are born great, some achieve greatness, and some hire public relations officers."  Daniel J. Boorstin
"If you are still looking for that one person who will change your life, take a look in the mirror." Roman Price
"All you need is the plan, the road map, and the courage to press on to your destination."  Earl Nightingale
"It is said a foolish man devotes himself to lusts not love," -Unknown
"A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer." - Bruce Lee
"Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars" - Kahlil Gibran
"Our incomes are like our shoes; if too small, they gall and pinch us; but if too large, they cause us to stumble and to trip." - John Locke
"They say that patriotism is the last refuge to which a scoundrel clings" - Bob Dylan
"Everything you need you already have. You are complete right now, you are a whole, total person, not an apprentice person on the way to someplace else. Your completeness must be understood by you and experienced in your thoughts as your own personal reality." - Beverly Sills
" The Sun and the Moon are two of the Signs of Allah, they do not eclipse because of the death or life of anyone. Therefore, whenever you see an eclipse, remember Allah and say Allah is Most Great, pray and give charity "  Prophet Muhammad ()
"Life has two rules: #1 Never quit. #2 Always remember rule #1."
"Do I contradict myself? Very well, then I contradict myself, I am large, I contain multitudes." - Walt Whitman
"The source of the government"s authority is "the consent of the governed." This means that the government is not the ruler, but the servant or agent of the citizens; it means that the government as such has no rights except the rights delegated to it by the citizens for a specific purpose."
"Now I am quietly waiting for the catastrophe of my personality to seem beautiful again, and interesting, and modern." -Frank O"Hara
"The dead know only one thing... that it is better to be alive." -Private Joker (Full Metal Jacket)
"Be optimist and consider each failure as a delayed success." - Ray Kurzweil
"You are a slow learner, Winston." "How can I help it? How can I help but see what is in front of my eyes? Two and two are four." "Sometimes, Winston. Sometimes they are five. Sometimes they are three. Sometimes they are all of them at once. You must try harder. It is not easy to become sane." G.O.
"Happiness is not an absolute value. It is a state of comparison." - Zadie Smith
"The key is not to prioritize what"s on your schedule, but to schedule your priorities."  Stephen Covey
"Happiness can be found even in the darkest times if one only remembers to turn on the light'."
"You often feel tired, not because you've done too much, but because you've done too little of what sparks a light in you." Unknown
" anyone who studies the complexities of life and the universe cannot help but witness the signature of the Creator " The Big Questions Dr. Laurence B. Brown
"Laziness may appear attractive, but work gives satisfaction." - Anne Frank
"Living free is evading definitions of your character others will try to frame you with" - Rudolf P Belmar
"A champion is defined not by their wins but by how they can recover when they fall." - Serena Williams
"Man is ready to die for an idea, provided that idea is not quite clear to him."  Paul Eldridge
"Nothing is impossible for the man who doesn't have to do it himself."  A. H. Weiler
"Irrigation of the land with seawater desalinated by fusion power is ancient. It's called 'rain'."  Michael McClary
"Do not use semicolons. They are transvestite hermaphrodites representing absolutely nothing. All they do is show you've been to college." Kurt Vonnegut
"And even if "the professor" happened to read this, it would not stop him, it would not prick his conscienceno, he would lecture on this, too. And even if the professor happened to read this remark, it would not stop him eitherno, he would lecture on this, too." Kierkegaard
"People go on marrying because they can't resist natural forces, although many of them may know perfectly well that they are possibly buying a month's pleasure with a life's discomfort." - Thomas Hardy, Jude the Obscure
"By definition, life is a tragedy. For each man is his own main character, in which his final arc is his own inevitable death." - Unknown
"The longest-lived and those who will die soonest lose the same thing. The present is all that they can give up, since that is all you have, and what you do not have you cannot lose." - Marcus Aurelius
"Move on. It is just a chapter in the past but don't close the book just turn the page."
"Do what you love, not what you think you're supposed to do." - Unknown
"If you are depressed you are living in the past. If you are anxious you are living in the future. If you are at peace you are living in the present."  Lao Tzu
"I have found that if you love life, life will love you back." - Arthur Rubinstein
"If you cannot be a poet, be the poem." - David Carradine
"What is your pleasure, sir?" -Lament Configuration peddler (Hellraiser)
"Heartbreak begins the moment we are asked to let go but cannot." -David Whyte
"Love is the quality of attention we pay to things" - J.D. McClatchy
"I never think of the future - it comes soon enough." - Albert Einstein
"It Is Difficult to Get a Man to Understand Something When His Salary Depends Upon His Not Understanding It" - Upton Sinclair
"And now, in honour of the 150th anniversary of Beethoven's death, I would like to play 'Clear the Saloon', er, 'Clair de Lune', by Debussy. I don't play Beethoven so well, but I play Debussy very badly, and Beethoven would have liked that." - Victor Borge
"It is the privilege of the gods to want nothing, and of godlike men to want little." - Diogenes
"The only side of the Bible a lot of Christians had heard was the love side. "You"ve got to be loving and forgiving and patient", and all this kind of stuff. But the having boundaries in your love was not really being communicated."  Dr. Henry Cloud from his recent Jesus Calling podcast interview
"Some day I'm going to have to stand before God, and if He asks me why I didn't let that [Jackie] Robinson fellow play ball, I don't think saying 'because of the color of his skin' would be a good enough answer." - Branch Rickey
"Judge a man by his questions rather than his answers."  Voltaire
"We will be more successful in all our endeavors if we can let go of the habit of running all the time, and take little pauses to relax and re-center ourselves. And we"ll also have a lot more joy in living."  Thich Nhat Hanh
"I forgive people but that doesn't mean I accept their behavior or trust them. I forgive them for me, so I can let go and move on with my life."
"I would rather die of passion than of boredom." - mile Zola, The Ladies' Paradise
"Marry, and you will regret it; don"t marry, you will also regret it; marry or don"t marry, you will regret it either way. Laugh at the world"s foolishness, you will regret it; weep over it, you will regret that too;
"We're born unequal, we die equal" -Seneca
"Don't just see the good, also experience the bad. Else you won't differentiate between the good and bad. Stay away from the people who just want to be in their comfort zones. Life is too short, go out there, do what the hell you want to do. No pain, no gain"
"Eighty percent of married men cheat in America. The rest cheat in Europe."  Jackie Mason
"Punctuality is the virtue of the bored."  Evelyn Waugh
"Perhaps, after all, America never has been discovered. I myself would say that it had merely been detected."  Oscar Wilde
"The most remarkable thing about my mother is that for thirty years she served the family nothing but leftovers. The original meal has never been found."  Calvin Trillin
"You were not born a winner, and you were not born a loser. You are what you make yourself to be." - Lou Holtz
"Toxoplasma, found in cat droppings, makes mice unafraid of cats, and it could give people the courage to start their own businesses." - Maggie Fox
"dont judge a man by his ignorance but by his willingness to learn"
am I evil? worse, you're smart - rick and morty
"The price of self-knowledge and calm is hardship and suffering. This produces the kind of freedom that money cannot buy, power cannot touch and fame has nothing to do with." -Thomas Reynolds (my grandfather)
"Out of difficulties grow miracles." -Jean de la Bruyere
"Man needs his difficulties because they are necessary to enjoy success." (APJ Abdul Kalam)
[My own quote] "Some humans are as evil as a monster with a mask of a man's face, while others are so human you can't tell them apart from the rest of us."
"You may live to see man-made horrors beyond your comprehension." - Nicola Tesla
"Even the knowledge of my own fallibility cannot keep me from making mistakes. Only when I fall do I get up again." Vincent Van Gough
"The Future Will View All History As A Crime" -S.T.
"Those who flow as life flows know they need no other force." - Lao Tzu
"If an egg is broken by an outside force, life ends. If broken by an inside force, life begins. Great things always begin from the inside." Jim Kwik
"I finished my first book seventy-six years ago. I offered it to every publisher on the English-speaking earth I had ever heard of. Their refusals were unanimous: and it did not get into print until, fifty years later; publishers would publish anything that had my name on it." - George Bernard Shaw
"When you're good at something, you'll tell everyone. When you're great at something, they'll tell you" - Walter Payton
"Back in the thirties we were told we must collectivize the nation because the people were so poor. Now we are told we must collectivize the nation because the people are so rich." --William F. Buckley
"...the ache in your heart and the confusion in your soul means that you are still alive, still human and still open to the beauty of the world, though you have done nothing to deserve it. And when you resent the ache in your heart, remember: You will be dead and buried soon enough" - Paul Harding
"...true to the best of our knowledge, which is the only truth we can have." Steven Pinker
"There is little to distinguish a king from his subjects but the rabble's shout -- if he loses that and is reduced to the forlorn hope of gaining the suffrages of the wise and good, he is of all men the most miserable." - William Hazlitt, "On Vulgarity and Affectation"
"There is little to distinguish a king from his subjects but the rabble's shout -- if he loses that and is reduced to the forlorn hope of gaining the suffrages of the wise and good, he is of all men the most miserable." -- William Hazlitt, "On Vulgarity and Affectation"
"You need to fail, fail, and fail... Until you learn how to win when you are close to failure again." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Open your eyes to the beauty of knowledge, knowledge in oneself and knowledge of the world, then you will blossom" - Sebastian M.
"Life won"t stop for your pauses and procrastinations. It won"t stop for your confusion or fear. It will continue right along without you. Whether you play an active part or not, the show will go on."  Gary John Bishop
"The United States and Great Britain are two countries separated by a common language." - George Bernard Shaw
"The horse that sweats in the morning, cream that spoils overnight, a flame that burns pure blue... you know the signs, we all know" -Old Amish Man (Warlock)
"A book read by a thousand different people is a thousand different books." - Andrei Tarkovsky
"The only way of finding the limits of the possible is by going beyond them into the impossible." Arthur C. Clarke
"We are always more anxious to be distinguished for a talent which we do not possess, than to be praised for the fifteen which we do possess."  Mark Twain
"Rogues are preferable to imbeciles because they sometimes take a rest."  Alexandre Dumas
"The place where optimism most flourishes is the lunatic asylum."  Havelock Ellis
"Howard Hughes was able to afford the luxury of madness, like a man who not only thinks he is Napoleon but hires an army to prove it."  Ted Morgan
"You can buy food, but not appetite; medicine but not health; knowledge but not wisdom; glitter, but not beauty; fun, but not joy; acquaintances, but not friends; servants, but not faithfulness; leisure, but not peace. You can have the husk of everything for money, but not the kernel." -Arne Garborg
"I am the one who thinks 'therefore I am'." - Lacan
"All the world's a stage, And all the men and women merely players." -William Shakespeare
"How we devour one another's culture, do so without shame--ideas like water, free flowing and able to take on other forms. Able to flood highways, level entire cities if summoned with enough force." - J. Andrew Schrecker
"You think, `What could I have done to save this guy?' But as you go through life, people die away from you, and you have no choice but to rise to the highest level and look at it from that point of view, because everything else is really painful." - Jerry Garcia
"We enter upon a stage which we did not design.. .[and] we find ourselves part of an action that was not of our making" - Alasdair MacIntyre
"The Party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command." From George Orwell's 1984.
"The most ferocious fighting machine in the world is a pissed-off 19-year-old Marine." -John Ligato
"Brute force is not the smartest way to use force" (William Ventura)
"They say it isn't true," he smiled. "They can go to hell. It is true." Cakes and Ale, W. Somerset Maugham
"Failure is a detour, not a dead-end street." - Kermit the Frog
"When we talk to God, we're praying. When God talks to us, we're schizophrenic."
"Chains of habit are too light to be felt, until they are too heavy to be broken." Warren Buffett
"Let us not seek the Republican answer or the Democratic answer, but the right answer. Let us not seek to fix the blame for the past. Let us accept our own responsibility for the future" - John F. Kennedy
"Our greatest glory is not in never failing, but in rising up every time we fail." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Courage doesn't always roar. Sometimes courage is the quiet voice at the end of the day whispering, 'I will try again tomorrow.'" Mary Anne Radmacher
"Woman's dearest delight is to wound Man's self-conceit, though Man's dearest delight is to gratify hers." -George Bernard Shaw
"Far better is it to dare mighty things, to win glorious triumphs, even though checkered by failure... than to rank with those poor spirits who neither enjoy nor suffer much, because they live in a gray twilight that knows not victory nor defeat." - Theodore Roosevelt
"You"ve changed me forever. And I"ll never forget you." - Kiera Cass
"No matter how you get there or where you end up, human beings have a miraculous gift to make that place home." -Creed Bratton
"If you"re going to be able to look back on something and laugh about it, you might as well laugh about it now."  Marie Osmond
"I put on an act sometimes, and people think I"m insensitive. Really, it"s like a kind of armor because I"m too sensitive. If there are two hundred people in a room and one of them doesn"t like me, I"ve got to get out." - Marlon Brando
"Happiness is like a butterfly, the more you chase it, the more it will evade you, but if you notice the other things around you, it will gently come and sit on your shoulder." - Henry David Thoreau
"Try to be a rainbow in someone"s cloud." Maya Angelou
"You can"t wake a person who is pretending to be asleep." -Navajo expression
"Please don't confuse my point of view with cynicism; the real cynics are the ones who tell you everything's gonna be all right." - George Carlin
"You can"t wake a person who is pretending to be asleep." -Navajo expression
"Never answer a critic, unless he's right."  Bernard M. Baruch
"It's not the voting that's democracy, it's the counting."  Tom Stoppard
"I have found the best way to give advice to your children is to find out what they want and then advise them to do it."  Harry S Truman
"Life is something that happens when you can't get to sleep."  Fran Lebowitz
"It's better to dance than to march through life." - Yoko Ono
"If I quit now, I will soon be back to where I started. And when I started I was desperately wishing to be where I am now." - Unknown
"To be immortal is commonplace; except for man, all creatures are immortal, for they are ignorant of death; what is divine, terrible, incomprehensible, is to know that one is immortal." Jorge Luis Borges
"Create the highest, grandest vision possible for your life, because you become what you believe"
"No man or woman can resist the temptations of lust: if one wants to stay faithful, stay home." -Unknown
"We cannot change anything unless we accept it. Condemnation does not liberate, it oppresses" -Carl Jung
"Attempting to be happy without gratitude is like going to a well without a bucket."
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." -Mahatma Gandhi
"Our time here is limited, but the breadsticks are not." - Disco Lady From An Insurance Commercial
"But where is what I started for so long ago? And why is it yet unfound?" Walt Whitman
"People seem not to see that their opinion of the world is also a confession of character." --Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Its hard to wait around for something you know might never happen; but its harder to give up when you know its everything you want."  Unknown
"Because sometimes you have something you need to say, but you can't because the words won't come out," - Rory Gilmore
"In my many years I have come to a conclusion that one useless man is a shame, two is a law firm, and three or more is a congress." -John Adams
"Talent is God given. Be humble. Fame is man-given. Be grateful. Conceit is self-given. Be careful." - John Wooden
"It's true, it's all true. God's an astronaut, Oz is over the rainbow, and *Midian's* where the monsters live." -Peloquin (Nightbreed)
"If so many men, so many minds, certainly so many hearts, so many kinds of love." - Leo Tolstoy
"I have found that when I intentionally control my thoughts, walk humbly, love and forgive unconditionally, generally, I have a pretty good day." - Ford Taylor
"Curiosity will conquer fear even more than bravery will; indeed, it has led many people into dangers which mere physical courage would shudder away from, for hunger and love and curiosity are the great impelling forces of life." - Brian Grazer
"Very few beings really seek knowledge in this world. Mortal or immortal, few really ask. On the contrary, they try to wring from the unknown the answers they have already shaped in their own minds... - Anne Rice
"We will resort to Capitalism when pigs fly. Don"t be quick to applaud... modern genetics have made considerable progress" -Nicolae Ceausescu, Romanian dictator
"How wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world." - Anne Frank
"I hope you're proud of yourself for the times you've said 'yes', when all it meant was extra work for you and was seemingly helpful only to somebody else." Fred Rogers
"It will take one second to be foolish, and years to be wise, your choice depends on what you believe you will find at the end of the tunnel." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Don't chase people. Be yourself, do your own thing and work hard. The right people, the ones who really belong in your life, will come to you and stay." - Will Smith
"The to way get started is to quit talking and begin doing."  Walt Disney
"We deny ourselves so that we can enjoy. You have heard of rich men in the north who eat salted foods, so that they can be thirsty..." from Graham Greene"s novel The Power and the Glory
"The events of this week annihilated the immature plans of last week, and the events of the week following made all new again." Charles Dickens
What"s all the love in the world if you find it at the wrong time?" - Ivan Paniagua
"Being alive is great, you can eat at Denny's, you can wear a hat whenever you want to, it's wonderful." Norm Macdonald
"True love cannot be found where it does not exist, nor can it be denied where it does" - Torquato Tasso
"I didn't know that that's a girl's life for the rest of her days," she says, smiling, "somewhere between a lollipop and shots." -excerpt from an interview with Christy Turlington
"It is better to lock up your heart with a merciless padlock, than to fall in love with someone who doesn't know what they mean to you." - Michael Bassey Johnson
"Waste no more time arguing about what a good man should be. Be one." Marcus Aurelius
"The cure for the pain is the pain." Rumi
"In the long run, people of every age and in every walk of life seem to regret not having done things much more than they regret things they did."-Daniel Gilbert
"The sky was filled with a star spangled display of lethal force" - CNN Commentator on the Gulf War bombing (1991)
"It"s not greed that drives the world, but envy."  Charlie Munger
"We find it hard to believe that other people's thoughts as our own, but they probably are."  James Harvey Robinson
"You need only reflect that one of the best ways to get yourself a reputation as a dangerous citizen these days is to go about repeating the very phrases which our founding fathers used in the struggle for independence."  Charles Austin Beard
"He can compress the most words into the smallest ideas of any man I ever met."  Abraham Lincoln
"Life is a moderately good play with a badly written third act."  Truman Capote
"The past is a foreign country; they do things differently there." - L.P. Hartley
"A brand for a company is like a reputation for a person. You earn reputation by trying to do hard things well."
"Accept what you can't change. Change what you can't accept." - A coworker of mine
"Men are motivated when they feel needed while women are motivated when they feel cherished." - John Gray
"Because she is afraid of not being supported, she unknowingly pushes away the support she needs." - John Gray
"All hearts are broken. All lives end. Caring is not an advantage, Sherlock." - Mycroft Holmes
"We know no spectacle so ridiculous as the British public in one of its periodical fits of morality" - Lord Macaulay (1830)
"Let the knife do the work"Gordon Ramsey.
"Only when the last tree has died and the last river been poisoned and the last fish been caught will we realise we cannot eat money." - Cree Indian Proverb
"When you chase a dream, especially one with plastic chests, you sometimes do not see what is right in front of you." - Borat
"When I awake, I awake in the grip of everydayness. Everydayness is the enemy. No search is possible. Perhaps there was a time when everydayness was not too strong and one could break its grip by brute strength. Now nothing breaks itbut disaster."--Walker Percy, 1960
'The way a woman walks doesn't define her glamour,it's define by the glamour with which she leaves her foot prints" (Ventura William)
"They don't want you to know about the power of self-hypnosis, because it's free." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Can you be an art critic who hates art? Or artists, more particularly. Genuine artists, most particularly?" Jordan Peterson
"Can you be an artic critic who hates art? Or artists, more particularly. Genuine artists, most particularly?" Jordan Peterson
"We dream of a good life but we're stuck with the insatiable desire to want a better one, just like a gambling addict." -- Anon
"We can allowe all our thoughts to fly,but we can't avoid that in their flight some may lose their wings" (William Ventura)
"The only way to get rid of temptation is to yield to it." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"Real generosity towards the future lies in giving all to the present." - Albert Camus
"Good teaching is one-fourth preparation and three-fourths theater."  Gail Godwin
"Censorship, like charity, should begin at home; but, unlike charity, it should end there."  Clare Booth Luce
"Never knock on Death's door: ring the bell and run away! Death really hates that!"  Matt Frewer
"A clever person solves a problem. A wise person avoids it." - Albert Einstein
"Admiration is happy self-surrender; envy is unhappy self-assertion" - Kierkegaard
"Nurture your mind with great thoughts, for you will never go any higher than you think." - Benjamin Disraeli
"I was a victim of a series of accidents, as are we all." - Kurt Vonnegut,
"Words build bridges into unexplored reigons." - Unknown
"When a man cheats, it is said it is because he is a dog. When a woman cheats, it is said it is because her man is a dog." - Mokokoma Mokhonoana
"Be not afraid of greatness. Some are born great, some achieve greatness, and others have greatness thrust upon them." - William Shakespeare, Twelfth Night
"So it's not gonna be easy. It's going to be really hard; we're gonna have to work at this everyday, but I want to do that because I want you. I want all of you, forever, everyday. You and me... everyday." - Nicholas Sparks, The Notebook
"As you grow older, you will discover that you have two hands, one for helping yourself, the other for helping others." - Audrey Hepburn
"Lice consume grass, rust consumes iron, and lying the soul!" - Anton Chekhov
"Used to look to women to fill a part of me that was vacant, truth, the only thing that i ever used in moderation"-Ben Haggerty(Macklemore)
"A man who correctly guesses a woman's age may be smart, but he's not very bright." - Lucille Ball
"Man is an endangered species." - L. Ron Hubbard
"Don't ask for guarantees. And don't look to be saved in any one thing, person, machine, or library. Do your own bit of saving, and if you drown, at least die knowing you were heading for shore." - Ray Bradbury
"Don't be afraid, Jim. The unknown is there for us to conquer, not to fear" - Wendy (Please Stand By)
"Life Is Not Measured By the Number of Breaths We Take, But By the Moments That Take Our Breath Away." - Anonymous
"you know, I don't ordinarily get offended the first time somebody treats me like an idiot"
"We are an impossibility in an impossible universe." - Ray Bradbury
"Giving voice to silence is the antidote to totalitarianism." - Mary Jo Hatch
"...man is a subject caught in and tortured by language." - Lacan
"Count your age by friends, not years. Count your life by smiles, not tears." - John Lennon
"When you show deep empathy toward others, their defensive energy goes down, and positive energy replaces it." Stephen Covey
"Never expect the worst from someone who always arrives with the best" (William Ventura)
"Man cannot remake himself without suffering, for he is both the marble and sculptor." -Alexis Carrell
"He wrapped himself in quotations- as a beggar would enfold himself in the purple of Emperors."  Rudyard Kipling
"When you go into court you are putting your fate into the hands of twelve people who weren't smart enough to get out of jury duty."  Norm Crosby
"I have discovered that all human evil comes from this, man's being unable to sit still in a room."  Blaise Pascal
"Last week, I went to Philadelphia, but it was closed."  W. C. Fields
"Believe you can and you"re halfway there." - Theodore Roosevelt
"If you think you are big, you become small. If you know you are nothing, you become unlimited. That"s the beauty of being a human being." - Sadhguru
"Life is the sum of all your choices."-Albert Camus
"I don't see any reason why it would be Russia." - Donald Trump
"The very essence of romance is uncertainty." -Oscar Wilde
"You can't heal a broken heart with a juvenile mindset" - myself
"Much is said on 'the mission' of the people of these United States, and most of it is said by persons who appear to limit themselves to the consideration of the powers of the nation, and rarely to think of its duties."--Henry Charles Carey, 1851
"Only about 10% of women who call themselves feminist want to be treated equal. The other 90% want to be treated special." - unknown
"Nurture your mind with great thoughts, for you will never go any higher than you think." - Benjamin Disraeli
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside of you." Maya Angelou
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The fates lead him who will; him who won"t they drag."  Joseph Campbell
"Before you marry a person you should first make them use a computer with slow Internet to see who they really are." - Will Ferrell
"Before you marry a person you should first make them use a computer with slow Internet to see who they really are." - Will Ferrell
"Whatever possession we gain by our sword cannot be sure or lasting, but the love gained by kindness and moderation is certain and durable." - Alexander the Great
"Wilderness is not a luxury but necessity of the human spirit." - Edward Abbey
"Tiger got to hunt, bird got to fly; Man got to sit and wonder 'why, why, why?' Tiger got to sleep, bird got to land; Man got to tell himself he understand." - Kurt Vonnegut, Cat's Cradle
"Our greatest pretenses are built up not to hide the evil and the ugly in us, but our emptiness. The hardest thing to hide is something that is not there." - Eric Hoffer
"Whenever I hear any one arguing for slavery I feel a strong impulse to see it tried on him personally." - Abraham Lincoln
"You can"t stay in your corner of the Forest waiting for others to come to you. You have to go to them sometimes." - A.A. Milne
"I learned that courage was not the absence of fear, but the triumph over it. The brave man is not he who does not feel afraid, but he who conquers that fear." - Nelson Mandela
"Everyone takes the limits of their vision for the limits of the world." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Do you realize that all great literature is all about what a bummer it is to be a human being? Isn't it such a relief to have somebody say that?" - Kurt Vonnegut
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself."  Rumi
"The most important things are the hardest to say" - Stephen King
"It has long been an axiom of mine that the little things are infinitely the most important."  Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
"Perfection is achieved, not when there is nothing more to add, but when there is nothing left to take away."  Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"We learn something every day, and lots of times it's that what we learned the day before was wrong."  Bill Vaughan
"I like pigs. Dogs look up to us. Cats look down on us. Pigs treat us as equals."  Sir Winston Churchill
"In restless despair, the hopeless masses of the periphery will witness the spectacle of another hemisphere's wealth... millions of people will be tempted and enraged by the constant stimulation of wants that can't be satisfied." - Attali (1992)
"People overestimate what they can do in a single day. And underestimate what they can do in their whole lives." Unknown
"We are all faced with a series of great opportunities brilliantly disguised as impossible situations." Charles Swindoll
"What does the money machine eat? It eats youth, spontaneity, life, beauty and, above all, it eats creativity. It eats quality and shits quantity." William S.Burroughs
"If you want to really hurt your parents and you don't have the nerve to be gay, go into the arts. I'm not kidding. The arts are not a way to make a living. They are a very human way of making life more bearable." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Better to die fighting for freedom then be a prisoner all the days of your life." - Bob Marley
"Cauliflower is nothing but cabbage with a college education" -Mark Twain
"The best way to cheer yourself up is to try to cheer somebody else up" -Mark Twain
"Madness is a flexible bullet" - Stephen King
"It's like a jungle sometimes it makes me wonder how I keep from goin' under." - Grandmaster Flash
"It really is a nice theory. The only defect I think it has is probably common to all philosophical theories. It's wrong."  philosopher Saul Kripke, Naming &amp; Necessity
"It"s not the men in your life that matters, it"s the life in your men."  Mae West
"In Washington, what matters is not what you do but what people can be made to think you've done." - Clarence Thomas
"Be alone, that is the secret of invention; be alone, that is when ideas are born." - Nikola Tesla
"He who opens a school, closes a prison" - Victor Hugo
"He who opens a school, closes a prison" - Victor Hugo
"Politicians are the same all over. They promise to build bridges even where there are no rivers." -- Nikita Khrushchev
"Before you marry a person, you should first make them use a computer with slow Internet service to see who they really are."  Will Ferrell
"Today a young man on acid realized that all matter is merely energy condensed to a slow vibration. That we are all one consciousness experiencing itself subjectively, there"s no such thing as death, life is only a dream &amp; we"re the imagination of ourselves. Here"s Tom with the weather" - Bill Hicks
"Happiness is like a butterfly, the more you chase it, the more it will evade you, but if you notice the other things around you, it will gently come and sit on your shoulder." - Henry David Thoreau
"A common mistake that people make when trying to design something completely foolproof is to underestimate the ingenuity of complete fools." Douglas Adams
"People were created to be loved. Things were created to be used. The reason why the world is in chaos, is because things are being loved and people are being used." -John Green
"But to me death is not... death is not a fearful thing, it's living that's treacherous" -Jim Jones
"This is the worst trait of minds rendered arrogant by prosperity, they hate those whom they have injured." Seneca The Younger.
"Children hallow small things. A child is a priest of the ordinary, fulfilling a sacred office that absolutely no one else can fill. The simplest gesture, the ephemeral movement, the commonest object all become precious beyond words when touched, noticed, lived by one's own dear child." Mike Mason.
"It has been said, "time heals all wounds." I do not agree. The wounds remain. In time, the mind, protecting its sanity, covers them with scar tissue and the pain lessens. But it is never gone." - Rose Kennedy
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much he old man learned in seven years." - Mark Twain
"You simply have to put one foot in front of the other and keep going. Put blinders on and plow right ahead." -George Lucas
"Motivation is the art of getting people to do what you want them to do because they want to do it." -Dwight D. Eisenhower
"Have enough courage to trust love one more time and always one more time." Maya Angelou
"You don't need a good look to be happy or confident, you need to go inside yourself and find the light." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Never let the outside be the main reason of your inside, be the source." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"People will hate you anyway, at least do what you love, and be what you want." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Don't compare yourself to someone else... you are special." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"For every minute you remain angry, you give up sixty seconds of peace of mind." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"On the surface, I was calm: in secret, without really admitting it, I was waiting for something. Her return? How could I have been waiting for that?- Stanisaw Lem
"We are an impossibility in an impossible universe."  Ray Bradbury
"Humanity has advanced, when it has advanced, not because it has been sober, responsible, and cautious, but because it has been playful, rebellious, and immature."  Tom Robbins
"Reason has always existed, but not always in a reasonable form."  Karl Marx
"A motion to adjourn is always in order."  Robert Heinlein
"We dream to give ourselves hope. To stop dreaming - well, that"s like saying you can never change your fate." - Amy Tan, The Hundred Secret Senses
"Insanity is relative. It depends on who has who locked in what cage." - Ray Bradbury
"How odd I can have all this inside me and to you it"s just words"
"Sometimes the smallest step in the right direction ends up being the biggest step of your life." - Naeem Callaway
"We love a rose because we know it will soon be gone. Who ever loved a stone?" - Charles Beaumont
"Self-consciousness found the thing to be like itself, and itself to be like a thing; i.e. it is aware that it is in itself the objectively real world" - Hegel
"There was clearly felt the presence of a force not bound to be kind to man. It was a place of heathenism and superstitious rites, to be inhabited by men nearer of kin to the rocks and to the wild animals than we." - Henry David Thoreau
"Do not pray for an easy life. Instead, pray for the strength to endure a difficult one." Bruce Lee
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow man; true nobility is being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"You can't go around building a better world for people. Only people can build a better world for people. Otherwise it's just a cage." - Terry Pratchett
"The idea that unhappiness is selfless and happiness selfish is misguided. It's more selfless to act happy. It takes energy, generosity and discipline." Gretchen Rubin
"A life of almost is a life of never" -Blinkous "Blinky" Galadrigal (Trollhunters)
"Time is a game played beautifully by children."  Heraclitus
"The minute I slip into depression I just have a quick look in the mirror." - Liam Gallagher
"People only see what they are prepared to see." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"In regards to the opposite sex, if you look hungry you"ll starve"
"Four score and seven years ago our fathers brought forth on this continent, a new nation, conceived in Liberty, and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal..." -actual Abraham Lincoln
"You see, God helps only people who work hard. That principle is very clear." - A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"I eat politics and I sleep politics but I never *drink* politics"
"When I was 17 I went to get a Limp Bizkit tattoo and they wouldn't let me because I didn't have a guardian's approval, I cried and punched a lamp post. 3 months later I was allowed to take on $119,000 in loans to go to art school." -Billl Dixon
"When I was 17 i went to get a Limp Bizkit tattoo and the wouldn't let me because I didn't have a guardian's approval, I cried and punched a lamp post. 3 months later I was allowed to take on $119,000 in loans to go to art school." -Billl Dixon
"In my country we go to prison first and then become President" - Nelson Mandela
"They say time heals all wounds, but that presumes the source of grief is finite." Cassandra Clare
"Politics, in a literary work, is like a pistol shot in the middle of a concert: something loud and out of place to which we are none the less compelled to pay attention." -- Stendhal (Marie-Henri Beyle) (*The Charterhouse of Parma*) (1839)
"Metaphors have a way of holding the most truth in the least space." - Orson Scott Card
"Bitches suck my dick cause I"m Hannah Montana" -Lil B
"I fell in love the way you fall asleep; slowly, and then all at once." John Green, The Fault in our Stars
"In life, unlike chess, the game continues after checkmate." - Isaac Asimov
"Oh, how wonderful it is, that one need wait a single moment, before starting to improve the world." -Anne Frank
"I speak to everyone in the same way, whether he is the garbage man or the president of the university." - Albert Einstein
"I was not a good pupil, but I was a good learner, and in my neighborhood library, I roamed the shelves and stacks, had the freedom to select whatever I wanted, to follow paths which fascinated me, to become myself. At the library I felt free." -Oliver Sacks
"Life is what happens when you"re busy making other plans." - John Lennon
"You are either the victim, or you are producing them. There is no neutral ground." -SRG
"A happy person is not a person in a certain set of circumstances, but rather a person with a certain set of attitudes." -Hugh Downs
"A good book gets better at the second reading. A great book at the third. Any book not worth rereading isn"t worth reading." -Nassim Taleb
"Great ideas come when you don"t think about profit, but making lives better." -Anikk
[Inspirational]
"Don"t criticize them; they are just what we would be under similar circumstances." - Abraham Lincoln
"I wonder if other dogs think poodles are members of a weird religious cult."  Rita Rudner
"It is no good to try to stop knowledge from going forward. Ignorance is never better than knowledge."  Enrico Fermi
"A sympathetic Scot summed it all up very neatly in the remark, "You should make a point of trying every experience once, excepting incest and folk dancing.""  Sir Arnold Bax
"To knock a thing down, especially if it is cocked at an arrogant angle, is a deep delight of the blood."  George Santayana
"Friendship isn't about who you've known the longest, it's about who walked in to your life, said 'I'm here for you' and proved it."
"the worst hell I can think of is that when you die,the person you became meets the person you could have become"
"Would you want a man who doesn"t look? Who doesn"t feel inspired by the beauty or the curves of a woman"s body? Or the way she is? I mean, come on. We"re human beings. There is, I guess, an elasticity to the relationship. Otherwise it"s going to break, just like a rubber band." - Goldie Hawn
'An educated and cultured person being condescending towards an ignorant is more ignorant than an ignorant person trying to learn and better himself.' -anonymous
"If you could reason with Trump supporters, there wouldn't be Trump supporters." -Unknown
"Death may be the greatest of all human blessings". - Socrates
"The difference between insanity and belief lies only in the number of believers." - Baron Reiter
"At some point, you just pull off the bandaid, and it hurts. But then it"s over, and you"re relieved." John Green, Looking for Alaska
"Positive culture comes from being mindful, and respecting your coworkers, and being empathetic" --- Biz Stone
"If people were rain, I was drizzle, and she was a hurricane." John Green, Looking for Alaska
"Success is walking from failure to failure with no loss of enthusiasm."
"When you're in love with someone, you want to talk about every single thing in existence with them- while simultaneously saying nothing and just enjoying their presence."
"I believe in second chances, I just don"t think everyone deserves them" - unknown
"Earth provides enough to satisfy every person"s need, but not every person"s greed."-Mahatma Gandhi
"Life is what happens when you're busy making other plans" - John Lennon
"If we don"t study the mistakes of the future, we"re doomed to repeat them for the first time." -Ken M
"Avoiding danger is no safer in the long run than out right exposure" - Helen Keller
"It is better to live your own destiny imperfectly than to live an imitation of somebody else's life with perfection." - The Bhagavad Gita
'If ignorance is bliss then that expains my misery' -Akala
"conformity is taught; uniqueness is..." -Twain
"To mistreat a woman and hurt her with grief,it's like mistreat a flower and hurt a poem" (William Ventura)
"The book to read is not the one that thinks for you, but the one which makes you think." Harper Lee
"Life is very short and anxious for those who forget the past, neglect the present, and fear the future."  Seneca
"No man chooses evil because it is evil; he only mistakes it for happiness, the good he seeks." - Mary Wollstonecraft Shelley
"You are the books you read, the films you watch, the music you listen to, the people you meet, the dreams you have, the conversations you engage in. You are what you take from these. You are the sound of the ocean, the breath of fresh air, the brightest light and the darkest corner. - Jac Vanek
"Awake, dear heart, awake. Thou hast slept well. Awake." - William Shakespeare
"For precocity some great price is always demanded sooner or later in life." -Margaret Fuller
"All the effort in the world won't matter if you're not inspired." - Chuck Palahniuk
"University's like this little world, a bubble of time separate from everything before and everything after."
"Work harder on yourself than you do on your job."  Jim Rohn
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." -Confucius
"The only magic formula for living is loving" - Bridget C Bethel
"What i like about photographs is that they capture a moment that"s gone forever, impossible to reproduce." - Karl Lagerfeld
"Life isn't measured by the number of breaths we take, but by the moments that take our breath away."
"People don't buy what you do, they buy why you do it" -Simon Sinek
"Hire character. Train skill." --Peter Schutz
"People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does bathing -- that's why we recommend it daily." -- Zig Ziglar
" Saints are sinners who kept on going."- Robert Louis
"You don't have to burn books to destroy a culture. Just get people to stop reading them." - Ray Bradbury
"It's my opinion, with some people, just knowing they are alone, living inside of their own miserable, self hating, dysfunctional mind, with their own immature, insecure, self pitying self is its own revenge. Their existence is their karma." - Colleen Truscott Fry
"To me a lush carpet of pine needles or spongy grass is more welcome than the most luxurious Persian rug."  Helen Keller
"The world only goes round by misunderstanding."  Charles Baudelaire
"I believe that all government is evil, and that trying to improve it is largely a waste of time."  H. L. Mencken
"Nothing you can't spell will ever work."  Will Rogers
"My mission in life is not merely to survive, but to thrive; and to do so with some passion, some compassion, some humor, and some style." Maya Angelou
"All things truly wicked start from innocence." - Ernest Hemingwa
"When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on." -Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Do not pray for an easy life. Pray for the strength to endure a difficult one." -- Bruce Lee
"It's so hard to forget pain, but it's even harder to remember sweetness. We have no scar to show for happiness. We learn so little from peace." Chuck Palahniuk
"Death the last voyage, the longest, and the best." - Thomas Wolfe
"Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know." - Ernest Hemingway
"The dead bird under the nest is the one that never learned how to fly" - Kevin O'Leary
"Thus is the beauty of the RTS game; rock beats paper, when you have enough rock." - Sean "Day9" Plott
"In the midst of winter, I found there was, within me, an invincible summer. And that makes me happy. For it says that no matter how hard the world pushes against me, within me, there"s something stronger  something better, pushing right back." - Albert Camus
"I would rather take a political risk in the persuit of peace, then to risk peace in persuit of politics"
"Have you ever been smoking weed on your period, and coughed so hard, you got scared your tampon might fall out" -Anonymous
"Slander has slain more than the sword." -A.B. (VP3)
"I would like to see every single soldier on every single side, just take off your helmet, unbuckle your kit, lay down your rifle, and sit down at the side of some shady lane and say, 'Nope, I ain't gonna kill nobody.' Plenty of rich folks want to fight, give them the guns." -Woody Guthrie
"Slice it any way you want, everyone"s in the same condition. Mystery, amazement, beauty. Strangeness." - Anthony Bourdain
"There is no place like 127.0.0.1"
"I am a cage, in search of a bird." - Franz Kafka
"Death is caused by swallowing small amounts of saliva over a long period of time."  George Carlin
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says 'I'm possible'!" - Audrey Hepburn
"People say what we are seeking is the meaning of life. I say what we"re really seeking is an experience of being alive" -Joseph Campbell
"If opportunity doesn't knock, build a door" - Milton Berle
"Depression is the inability to construct a future." Rollo May.
"All you"ve got is your knives and fancy karate gimmicks, we"ve got guns"
"When you really desire something from the heart and soul, all the universe conspires you to achieve it"
"If you don"t sacrifice for what you want, what you want becomes the sacrifice."-Anonymous
"The worst, most dangerous person to America is clearly Paula Deen. She revels in unholy connections with evil corporations and she's proud of the fact that her food is f---ing bad for you," Anthony Bourdain
"What matters in a joke is the delivery, what matters in a quote is the takeaway"
"I always want the audience to out-guess me, and then I double-cross them." Buster Keaton
"He who is not contented with what he has, would not be contented with what he would like to have." - Socrates
"Earth provides enough to satisfy every man's needs, but not every man's greed." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Fiction is the truth inside the lie." - Stephen King
"We cannot teach people anything. We can only help them discover it within themselves." - Galileo Galilei
"You"re always one decision away from a totally different life"
"Before you embark on a journey of revenge, dig two graves"
"The test for whether or not you can hold a job should not be the arrangement of your chromosomes."  Bella Abzug
"The skill of writing is to create a context in which other people can think."  Edwin Schlossberg
"All science is either physics or stamp collecting."  Ernest Rutherford
"If living conditions don't stop improving in this country, we're going to run out of humble beginnings for our great men."  Russell P. Askue
"All that can accurately be said about a man who thinks he is a poached egg is that he is in the minority."
"A weapon is a device for making your enemy change his mind." - Count Aral Vorkosigan, Vorkosigan Saga
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"My piss was so dense i put out a fire" - u/diasterous
"Curious that we spend more time congratulating people who have succeeded than encouraging people who have not." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"Caminante no hay camino, se hace camino al andar." - Antonio Machado
"I like the dog. If he can't eat it, or fuck it, he pisses on it. I can get behind that." George Carlin
"If you get give, if you learn teach." Maya angelou
"Conservatism is the blind and fear-filled worship of dead radicals."  Mark Twain
"Sometimes life leaves a hundred dollar bill on your dresser, and you don't realize until later that it's because it fucked you." Sam Halpern
"In the end, we will not remember the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"It doesn't matter what happens in your life, all that matters is how you overcome it."
"A genuine leader is not a seeker of consensus, but a molder of consensus" - Frank Reagan
"Can you imagine what I would do if I could do all I can?" - Sun Tzu
"People are trapped in history and history is trapped in them." - James A. Baldwin
"Statistics are like a bikini, what they reveal is suggestive, but what they conceal is vital" - Luca Mascitelli, MD
"We were born to sin. We don't think we're special sir, we know everybody is." -The Thermals "A Pillar of Salt"
"Any person capable of angering you becomes your master; he can anger you only when you permit yourself to be disturbed by him." -Epictetus
"It is not so much our friends' help that helps us, as the confidence of their help." - Epicurus
"The sun shines not on us but in us. The rivers flow not past, but through us..."  John Muir
"The world is big and I want to have a good look at it before it gets dark." -John Muir
"Faith, the least exclusive club on Earth, has the craftiest doorman. Every time I've stepped through it's wide-open doorway, I find myself stepping out of n the street again." - David Mitchell
"It sometimes happens that what you feel is not returned for one reason or another  but that does not make your feeling less valuable and good." -John Steinbeck
"I am both a night owl and an early bird. I am wise and I have worms" - Michael Scott
"Worry pretends to be necessary but serves no useful purpose." -Eckhart Tolle
"There were car gods there: a powerful, serious-faced contingent, with blood on their black gloves and on their chrome teeth: recipients of human sacrifice on a scale undreamed-of since the Aztecs." Neil Gaiman, American Gods
"Don't waste your time chasing butterflies. Mend your garden, and the butterflies will come." - Mario Quintana
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"Traditions lead us forward because we can do something unique and inspire others only if we're aware of what it was like before." - Dsprn
"Do not pursue 'the truth'; simply let go of your cherished opinions." - Hsin Hsin Ming (Chan Buddhist)
"Your inner strength is your outer foundation" - Allan Rufus
"To predict the behavior of ordinary people in advance, you only have to assume that they will always try to escape a disagreeable situation with the smallest possible expenditure of intelligence."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"The surprising thing about young fools is how many survive to become old fools."  Doug Larson
"Every crowd has a silver lining."  Phineas Taylor Barnum
"You can no more win a war than you can win an earthquake."  Jeannette Rankin
"I'm not afraid of dying. I'm afraid not to have lived." - Wim Hof
"If you find yourself constantly trying to prove your worth to someone, then you have already forgotten your value"
"Appear as you are, Be as you appear." - Rumi
"I do maintain that if your hair is wrong, your entire life is wrong" - Morrissey
"You gotta have the bad days so you can love the good days even more."  Alexander Cooper; Alexander and the Terrible, Horrible, No Good, Very Bad Day (2014)
"Make a goal to stay confident today. The world believes in you when you fully believe in yourself." - John Gray
"It has been said that for evil to accomplish their purpose it is only necessary good men do nothing." - Charles F Aked.
"The best definition of poverty lies somewhere between what we have forgotten and what we don't know." - Dsprn
"Never interfere with your enemy when he is making a mistake." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Life is so ironic it takes sadness to know what happiness is, noise to appreciate silence and absence to value presence." - Curiano
"Never interfere with your enemy when he is making a mistake." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"They who dream by day are cognizant of many things which escape those who dream only by night." -Edgar Allan Poe.
"Talking lies doesn't requiere much effort,it only requieres never telling the truth" (William Ventura)
"I make car parts for the American working man because that's what I am. And that's who I care about." - Ray Zalinsky
"Those who have a 'why' to live, can bear with almost any 'how'." - Viktor E. Frankl
"The only function of economic forecasting is to make astrology look respectable."  John Kenneth Galbraith
"History is more or less bunk."  Henry Ford
"I don't want any yes-men around me. I want everybody to tell me the truth even if it costs them their jobs."  Samuel Goldwyn
"The past does not exist. But you do, here and now." Stanisaw Lem
"All we are is stars" - 2D (from Some Kind of Nature)
"Love is needing someone. Love is putting up with someone's bad qualities because they somehow complete you." ....Sarah Dessen, This Lullaby
"I drink your milkshake!" -Daniel Plainview
"Be gentle with yourself, learn to love yourself, to forgive yourself, for only as we have the right attitude toward ourselves can we have the right attitude toward others." - Wilferd Arlan Peterson
"I did it for love"-the man who loved none.
"Implausible truth can serve one better than plausible fiction." -David Mitchell, Cloud Atlas
"If a man does not have the sauce, then he is lost. However, this same man can get lost in the sauce" -Paul Feghali
"If you don't know, the thing to do is not to get scared, but to learn." - Ayn Rand, Atlas Shrugged
"Always deliver more then expected" for more click the link below
[request] HELP! I have a quote on the tip of my tongue that i am trying to remember
"Remember that you were art long before he came to admire you, and you'll continue to be art even when he's gone." - a masterpiece is still a masterpiece even when all the lights are off and the room is empty- charlotte geier
"If you want to dig up the truth, the middle ground is a good place to start." Anonymous
"That which you most need to find will be found where you least want to look." -Carl Jung
"Enemies can't break your spirit, only friends can." - Arundhati Roy, The Ministry of Utmost Happiness
" A hopeless person sees difficulties in every chance, but a hopeful person sees chances in every difficulty. " - Imam Ali (AS)
"The unnatural, that too is natural."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"It is one of the blessings of old friends that you can afford to be stupid with them."
"Well yeah, I mean, you wouldn"t have happiness without sadness" - Vincent "Vinesauce" Pizzapasta
"Home is where the heart is, so your real home's in your chest."  Joss Whedon, Zack Whedon, Maurissa Tancharoen, and Jed Whedon
"I have a rock garden. Last week three of them died."  Richard Diran
"I have such poor vision I can date anybody."  Garry Shandling
"Between two evils, I always pick the one I never tried before."  Mae West
"the table... as it emerges as a commodity, it changes into a thing which transcends sensuousness. It not only stands with its feet on the ground... it stands on its head, and evolves out of its wooden brain grotesque ideas, far more wonderful than if it were to begin dancing of its own will" - Marx
"A word of encouragement during a failure is worth more than an hour of praise after success." 
"There is no success without hardship" - Sophocles
"Find ecstasy in life; the mere sense of living is joy enough." Emily Dickinson
"God has more important things to worry about than who I sleep with." - Cyndi Lauper
"I learned not to steal people's things, not to kill people, not to punch people. And to not take other peoples' shirts. And to not put fire on in the house."
"Either write something worth reading, or do something worth writing." Benjamin Franklin
"May your coffee be strong and your Monday be short." - Anonymous
"There is a reason why they call it a pea brain when we get angry." - Ford Taylor
"To steal ideas from one person is plagiarism; to steal from many is research."
"Sometimes you can do everything right and things will still go wrong. The key is to never stop doing right." - Angie Thomas
"An education is not how much you have committed to memory, or even how much you know. It's being able to differentiate between what you do know and what you don't." -- Anatole France
"When you're rich, you don't have friends; you just have endless acquaintances." Robert A. Heinlein.
"The Gods too are fond of a joke."  Aristotle
"Sharing is a magic medicine underestimated by almost everyone." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Today"s Accomplishments Were Yesterday"s Impossibilities."  Robert H. Schuller
"The Optimist believes this is the best of all possible worlds, the Pessimist fears it is true." -Robert Oppenheimer
" Every excuse is a choice to fail"
"All of life is peaks and valleys. Don"t let the peaks get too high and the valleys too low." John Wooden
"An inventor is simply a fellow who doesn't take his education too seriously."  Charles F. Kettering
"A cynic is not merely one who reads bitter lessons from the past, he is one who is prematurely disappointed in the future."  Sidney J. Harris
"Human spirit is the ability to face the uncertainty of the future with curiosity and optimism." - Anaximander, Genesis
"if you are free, you need to free somebody else. If you have some power, then your job is to empower somebody else." - Toni Morrison
"Interacting with people is just like taking different vacations. There's only very few who feel like home."
"It may be true that he travels farthest who travels alone, but the goal thus reached is not worth reaching" - Theadore Roosevelt
"everyone has a plan.. Right until they get punched in the face" - Mike Tieson
"A mirror doesn't decide the beauty of a person,it's decided by the suit of self-steem that you wear" (William Ventura)
"The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear, and the oldest and strongest kind of fear is fear of the unknown"-H.P. Lovecraft
"A coat of gold, a coat of red A lion still has claws And mine are long and sharp, my Lord As long and sharp as yours" -George R. R. Martin.
"In olden days, a glimpse of stocking Was looked on as something shocking. But now, God knows," -cole porter.
"Truth does not become more true by virtue of the fact that the entire world agrees with it, nor less so even if the whole world disagrees with it." Maimonides (1135-1204)
"Being legendary isn"t just a title, it"s a weight only a few can carry" -Bhavesh k
"Whatever you"re meant to do, do it now. The conditions are always impossible." - Doris Lessing
"if you don't accept your reality you will always fear what other people think about you, you need to stop fighting and caring about what other people think, just relax, focus on yourself and develop yourself it's the only way to change your reality." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Future U.S. political leaders - those for whom the Cold War was not the formative experience that it was for me - may not consider the return on America"s investment in NATO worth the cost," Robert Gates (2011)
"It is after all so easy to shatter a story. To break a chain of thought. To ruin a fragment of a dream being carried around carefully like a piece of porcelain. To let it be, to travel with it, is much the harder thing to do" - Arundhati Roy
"Future U.S. political leaders - those for whom the Cold War was not the formative experience that it was for me - may not consider the return on America"s investment in NATO worth the cost," - U.S. Defense Secretary Robert Gates - 2011
"With five feeble senses we pretend to comprehend the boundlessly complex cosmos," H.P. Lovecraft
"Aim above morality. Be not simply good, be good for something." Henry David Thoreau
"I guess I'm just not interesting, I have no personality. I met a guy with cancer once, and he felt sorry for me." -Jose Suicidio
"We film events on our phones rather than experience them. Our desire to show others our lives is greater than our desire to live them." @G_S_Bhogal from Twitter
"Forgive yourself for your faults and your mistakes and move on." - Les Brown
"Train ever single day!" - Grant Cardone 
"When angry, count to 10 before you speak; if very angry, count to 100." Thomas Jefferson.
"Best not to mix the past with the present. The present paints the past with gold. The past paints the present with lead."
"True literature can exist only where it is created, not by diligent and trustworthy functionaries, but by madmen, hermits, heretics, dreamers, rebels, and skeptics." - Yevgeny Zamyatin
"The trouble with not having a goal is that you can spend your life running up and down the field and never score." - Bill Copeland.
"You have to surrender to the fact that you are of too many in a highly competitive field where it is difficult to stand out. Over time, through your work, you will demonstrate who you are and what you bring to the field. Just stay with it and keep working."  Lisa Kudrow
"I hold ambition of so light a quality that is is but a shadow's shadow."  William Shakespeare
"What is written without effort is in general read without pleasure."  Samuel Johnson
"The trouble with normal is it always gets worse."  Bruce Cockburn
"All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"If you concentrate always on the present, you"ll be a happy man. You"ll see there"s life in the desert. That there"s stars in the heavens. Life will be a party for you, a grand festival, because life is the moment we"re living right now." - Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
"Let's do it." - Gary Gilmore
"The function of prayer is not to influence God, but rather to change the nature of the one who prays." - Sren Kierkegaard
"A government for protecting business and bread only is but a carcase, and soon falls by its own corruption to decay." A. B. Alcott.
"If Monica Lewinsky says that you masturbated into a trashcan in your secretary"s office would she [be] lying?" -Brett Kavanaugh
"A fool always accuses other people; a partially wise man, himself; a wholly wise man, neither himself nor others." -- Herder
"And, in the end The love you take is equal to the love you make." __ Paul McCartney
"I throw a spear into the darkness. That is intuition. Then I must send an army into the darkness to find the spear. That is intellect." - Ingmar Bergman
"I'm very, very lazy. I love to sit in a chair and look out the window and do nothing." - Ingmar Bergman
"When we use a broad brush to paint others, we splatter ourselves with ignorance."
"Be the person your dog thinks you are." -J.W. Stephens
[Meta] can we get a rule against reposting? It completely ruins browsing from top all time
"The most fun I ever had was the life I gave up" - Sonia Sotomayor
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education." - Mark Twain
"What is Hell? I maintain that it is the suffering of being unable to love." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"No problem will be difficult to solve,if we search for a result with love" (William Ventura)
"He who fights with monsters should be careful lest he thereby become a monster. And if thou gaze long into an abyss, the abyss will also gaze into thee." ... Nietzsche
"I miss your face. That big bright smile. You always had it, in any weather. It's hard for me to find one these days. These cold November days. Except when I think of you." - Kellie Elmore
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." Friedrich Nietzsche
"It's hard to sleep when you can't sleep"
"Never kick a fresh turd on a hot day." Harry S Truman
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." Friedrich Nietzsche
"Do stuff. Be clenched, curious. Not waiting for inspiration"s shove or society"s kiss on your forehead. Pay attention. It"s all about paying attention. Attention is vitality. It connects you with others. It makes you eager. Stay eager." Susan Sontag
"If poor people knew how rich rich people are, there would be riots in the streets" - Chris Rock
"With eyes gently closed, you lean closer and closer towards her until you could almost taste her lips and, with a moments pause just to Savour the reunion, her lips consummated the union of lost star-crossed lovers. And at that moment, at that very moment, you felt infinite and infinity in itself"
"Being rich doesn't feel as good as you thought it would feel before you got rich." Mark Dublanica.
"A fair day's wages for a fair day's work," is as just a demand as governed men ever made of governing; yet in what corner of this planet was that ever realised? --Carlyle
"The tree of man was never quiet: Then 'twas the Roman, now 'tis I." AE Housman
"The best moments in reading are when you come across something  a thought, a feeling, a way of looking at things  which you had thought special and particular to you. Now here it is, set down by someone else, a person you have never met, someone even who is long dead.
"Once more into the fray, into the last good fight I"ll ever know. Live and die on this day, live and die on this day"
"England, you have been here tooo long, And the songs you sing are the songs you sung On a braver day. Now they are wrong." Stevie Smith
"Art is our chief means of breaking bread with the dead." WH Auden
"The untold want, by life and land ne"er granted, Now, Voyager, sail thou forth, to seek and find." Walt Whitman
"The miracle of Jesus is himself, not what he said or did about the future. Forget the future. I'd worship someone who could do that." Rumi, Islamic scholar, Sufi poet
"Study without desire spoils the memory, and it retains nothing that it takes in."  Leonardo da Vinci
"All Human Knowledge is precious whether or not it serves the slightest human use." A.E Housman
"Do not let the negativity sneak into you, or you will lose the sharp vision." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Keep your smile even if the game is not over for you..." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"No one's perfect." - No1s perfect, Runescape
"Better to be miserable with her than happy without her. Let our hearts break provided they break together."- C.S. Lewis
"The democrats believe in the trombones before whose blast the walls of Jericho fall together; as often as they stand before the walls of despotism, they seek to imitate the miracle." - Karl Marx
"Not everything that can be counted counts, and not everything that counts can be counted." -Albert Einstein
"If you are always trying to be normal you will never know how amazing you can be." Maya Angelou
"It is our responsibilities, not ourselves, that we should take seriously."  Peter Ustinov
"To err is human; to forgive, infrequent."  Franklin P. Adams
"Believe those who are seeking the truth. Doubt those who find it."  Andre Gide
"The Americans have need of the telephone, but we do not. We have plenty of messenger boys."  Sir William Preece
"Life is about accepting the challenges along the way, choosing to keep moving forward, and savoring the journey."
"Health is the greatest gift, contentment the greatest wealth, faithfulness the best relationship."_ Buddha
"It is during our darkest moments that we must focus to see the light."_ Aristotle
"If life were predictable it would cease to be life, and be without flavor." Eleanor Roosevelt
"People were created to be loved. Things were created to be used. The reason why the world is in chaos, is because things are being loved and people are being used." -John Green
"The harder we try with the conscious will to do something, the less we shall succeed. Proficiency and the results of proficiency come only to those who have learned the paradoxical art of doing and not doing, or combining relaxation with activity...
'We are like snake who eat his own tail. Very yummy but bad for tummy!' - Chinese proverb that I just made up.
"The past cannot be changed. The future is yet in your power."
"There's a critical point, when you've stayed single too long, that your brain switches from 'No, don't say that' to 'Eh, f*ck it. Say it, see what happens.'"  Bill Burr
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams."
"Angels lie to keep control."
"You rely too much on brain. The brain is the most overrated organ."
"People will choose convenience over quality every time." -Evelyn Deavor
"Begin at once to live, and count each separate day as a separate life." Seneca.
"Whoever gives reverence receives reverence." Rumi.
"Networking is more about farming then it is about hunting"
"Success isn't owned. It is leased, and rent is due everyday" - Boss
"I'm not Walt Disney. I do a lot of things Walt Disney would not do. Walt Disney does not smoke. I smoke. Walt Disney does not drink. I drink." - Walt Disney
"We crave for new sensations but soon become indifferent to them. The wonders of yesterday are today common occurrences." - Nikola Tesla
"I've got bruised ribs and a badly barked shin!"-James May
"False friendship, like the ivy, decays and ruins the walls it embraces; but true friendship gives new life and animation to the object it supports." (-Richard Burton)
"Human relationships can survive fights. Human relationships cannot survive the loss of safety and security" -Stan Tatkin
"The only limits you have are the limits you believe" - Wayne Dyer
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." Charles Darwin
"As democracy is perfected, the office of President represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people..."
"None are so busy as the fool and knave."  John Dryden
"Remember that as a teenager you are at the last stage of your life when you will be happy to hear that the phone is for you."  Fran Lebowitz
"Try to learn something about everything and everything about something."  Thomas H. Huxley
"No wind serves him who addresses his voyage to no certain port."  Michel de Montaigne
"It's easy to believe in something when you win all the time...The losses are what define a man's faith." - Brandon Sanderson, The Well of Ascension
"The sort of unqualified and utterly unsuitable people who may one day come to invoke my authority is a thought that fills me with dread."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Kindness is as important as knowledge." - Megan Smith
"Where are the barbarians of the twentieth century?" - Nietzsche
"You don"t have to do anything sensational for people to love you." - Fred Rogers
'Need' is a strong word. Like we 'need' doorstops, but a brick will work. -R.S.
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The truth is rarely pure and never simple."
"The rest of those who have gone before us can not steady the unrest of those to follow"- unknown
"It was love at first sight, at last sight, at ever and ever sight." - Vladimir Nabokov, Lolita
"You give your children enough money to do something but not enough to do nothing." - Matt King *The Descendants*
"In your life, you have to pay for every thing you get and you do. No matter when, no matter how. Soon or late you're going to pay" - Unknown
"Keep in mind all of the different ways you can create value in the world: economic, social, psychological, spiritual, creative, etc. It"s not just making money or building stuff. The key idea is that you are giving back to the world in some way and making people"s lives better." - Steven Handel
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days before you've actually left them. Someone should write a song about that."- Andy Bernard The Office, What song is that to you?
"Back in the thirties we were told we must collectivize the nation because the people were so poor. Now we are told we must collectivize the nation because the people are so rich."-- William F. Buckley
"If you have a table with a Nazi sitting at it, but ten other people are willing to sit with that Nazi, then you have a table with eleven Nazis" -Anonymous
"Mankind exists in order to create works of art." - Andrei Tarkovsky
Hardwork is not measured by the amount of energy expended but by the amount of hours dedicated.- "Okoya Funmbi"
"Society has discovered discrimination as the great social weapon by which one may kill men without any bloodshed," -Hannah Arendt
10 best Life QUOTES from a CHINESE PHILOSOPHER: https://youtu.be/_pdPREwmKTo
'All who are not on the rock are in the sea!' - William Booth
"Freedom is happiness" -- Susan B Anthony
"Of lessons of life,from some we learn,from others,we ignore to learn" (William Ventura)
"It is a matter of wanting to change and being prepared to learn the steps to successfully make it happen...."
"I criticize America because I love her. I want her to stand as a moral example to the world." Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Time is the fire in which we burn" - Delmore Schwartz
"Life's not a bitch; life is a beautiful woman, you only call her a bitch 'cause she won't let you get that pussy, maybe she didn't feel y'all shared any similar interests, or maybe you're just an asshole who couldn't sweet talk the princess." - Aesop Rock
"And when I"m lying in my bed, I think about life and I think about death, and neither one particularly appeals to me" - Steven Morrissey
"You could not step twice into the same rivers; for other waters are ever flowing on to you."  Heraclitus
" Desperation breeds innovation!" - Taylor Romero, TEDx Mile High
"When one burns one's bridges, what a very nice fire it makes." - Dylan Thomas
"The return we reap from generous actions is not always evident." - Francesco Guicciardini
"A commodity appears, at first sight, a very trivial thing, and easily understood. Its analysis shows that it is, in reality, a very queer thing, abounding in metaphysical subtleties and theological niceties." - Karl Marx
"I'm not a vegetarian because I love animals. I'm a vegetarian because I hate plants."  A. Whitney Brown
"I believe that banking institutions are more dangerous to our liberties than standing armies. "  Thomas Jefferson
"If you aren't fired with enthusiasm, you will be fired with enthusiasm."  Vince Lombardi
"Life is a sexually transmitted disease."  R. D. Laing
"Mum, Dad, Nick loves both of you and brother. If I can get out, bring me pork bbq please."
"Love is like infinity: You can't have more or less infinity, and you can't compare two things to see if they're "equally infinite." Infinity just is, and that's the way I think love is, too." - Fred "Mister" Rogers
"The graveyard is the richest place on earth, because that's where you'll find the books that were never written, the songs that were never sung, the inventions that were never shared, all because someone was too afraid to take that first step." - Les Brown
'What ever happened to Please and Thank You?', 'I think they killed each other, you know, one of those murder-suicide pacts'- Marge and Homer, The Simpsons Season 17 Episode 2.
"Imagination and fiction make up more than three quarters of our real life." - Simone Weil
" Better to be a Shameless Plug than a DEAD SOCKET!" - Musketeer Inc
"A man is but the product of his thoughts; what he thinks, he becomes." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances; if there is any reaction, both are transformed." - Carl Jung
"You're born free but walk life with chains." -Anonymous
"Nationalism is an infantile disease. It is the measles of mankind." - Albert Einstein
"I have often wondered how it is that every man loves himself more than all the rest of men, but yet sets less value on his own opinions of himself than on the opinions of others."  Marcus Aurelius
"A good treatment on a woman makes her to fall in love,a bad one to fall in hate" (William Ventura)
"Paul Rudd is neither an aunt nor a WASP but he's fantastic in 'Ant-Man and the Wasp.'" - /u/Baramos_
'One of the hardest things you will ever have to do, my dear, is to grieve the loss of a person who is still alive.'
"Notice that the stiffest tree is most easily cracked, while the bamboo or willow survives by bending with the wind" - Bruce Lee
"Nothing is more characteristic of a man than the mann in which he behaves toward fools."  Henri-Frdric Amiel
"Art is either plagiarism or revolution."  Paul Gauguin
"Cockroaches and socialites are the only things that can stay up all night and eat anything."  Herb Caen
"If we don't change direction soon, we'll end up where we're going."  Professor Irwin Corey
"If you think education is expensive, try ignorance." - Derek Bok
"When one burns one's bridges, what a very nice fire it makes." - Dylan Thomas
"You"re only here for a short visit. Don"t hurry, don"t worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way." Walter Hagen
"Kindness in words creates confidence. Kindness in thinking creates profoundness. Kindness in giving creates love." - Lao Tzu
" The best way to end poverty is to make sure you ain't in the LINE! " - Grant Cardone
"Baths, wine, and sex ruin our bodies. But what makes life worth living except baths, wine, and sex?" - Corpus Inscriptionis VI, 15258
"If you don"t set goals for yourself, you are doomed to work to achieve the goals of someone else." - Brian Tracy
" Be so good they can't ignore you." - Steve Martin
"When you talk, you are only repeating what you already know. But if you listen, you may learn something new." -Dalai Lama
"Love your enemies; not because they deserve it, but because love spreads truth. Nothing is more tragic than truth being lost in translation because it was delivered with hate" - John Q. Daniels
"The greatest leaders have the ability to have one eye on the prize and the other in the moment. When either one is lost they both will fail." - Ford Taylor
"I didn't do it. Nobody saw me do it. You can't prove anything."--Bart Simpson
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough."  Mae West
"You may be disappointed if you fail, but you are doomed if you don"t try."  Beverly Sills
"To read too many books is harmful." - Mao Zedong (Founder of communist China)
"I'd like to give you everything you never had, but not even then would you know how beautiful it is to love you." - Happy Birthday Frida Kahlo
"There is hardly a creature in the world more liable to universal ridicule than a learned woman." - Lady Mary Wortley Montagu
"Any man who must say 'I am King' is no true King at all" - George R. R. Martin, A Storm of Swords
"Things don't happen for a reason, they are completely random. But life makes opportunities, and its what we do with them that defines us." -Wise Man
"It never ceases to amaze me: we all love ourselves more than other people, but care more about their opinion than our own." - Marcus Aurelius.
"We are what we believe we are." - C. S. Lewis
"Nothing is really work unless you would rather be doing something else."  James M. Barrie
"Someone's boring me. I think it's me."  Dylan Thomas
"Good judgement comes from experience. Experience comes from bad judgement."  Unknown
"The only thing that's been a worse flop than the organization of non-violence has been the organization of violence."  Joan Baez
"I think being in love with life is a key to eternal youth." Doug Hutchison
"We can know only that we know nothing. And that is the highest degree of human wisdom." - Leo Tolstoy
"You can change your world by changing your words... Remember, death and life are in the power of the tongue." - Joel Osteen
"If you can imagine it, you can achieve it. If you can dream it, you can become it." - William Arthur Ward
"Our government should be strong enough to endure the Devil himself for president" William T. Sherman
"Our government should be strong enough to ensure the Devil himself as president" -- William T. Sherman
"The worst fate in the world, for a man who yearns for fame, is to be ignored." - Robert Greene, The 48 Laws Of Power
"There is nothing noble about being superior to your fellow man, True nobility comes from being superior to ones former self."-Ernest Hemingway
"Pool is closed due to AIDS" - Some Internet fuckface
"Even though we may stumble, we still find the strength to rise again and thrive." - Triple H
"Pool is closed due to aids" -Some Internet fuckface
"Suicide doesn't end the chances of life getting worse. Suicide ends the possibility of it ever getting better." - Kellin Quinn
"Were it left to me to decide whether we should have a government without newspapers, or newspapers without a government, I should not hesitate a moment to prefer the latter." - Thomas Jefferson
"The United States Congress, like a lot of rich people, lives in two houses."  John Green
"If nobody spoke unless he had something to say, the human race would very soon lose the use of speech."  W. Somerset Maugham
"When everyone is somebody, then no one's anybody."  W. S. Gilbert
"Acting is merely the art of keeping a large group of people from coughing."  Sir Ralph Richardson
"Psychologically, present-day cynics can be understood as borderline melancholics, who can keep their symptoms of depression under control and can remain more or less able to work" - Sloterdijk
"I hated every minute of training ,but I said suffer now and live rest of your life as a champion. " -Muhammad Ali [Source-Quotes Butterfly app]
"My dreams are going through their death flurries...I mean no particular dream, you understand, but the whole radiant flock of them togetherwith their rainbow wings, iridescent, bright, soaring, glorious, sublime. They are dying before the steel javelins and arrows of a world of Time and Money."
"You come to love not by finding the perfect person but by seeing an imperfect person, perfectly".
"The right people are timeless. The right people make you want to throw away the plans you originally had for one and follow them into the hazy, unknown future without a glance backwards."
"Those who do not remember the past are condemned to repeat it." George Santayana
"May the flowers remind us why the rain was so necessary" - Xan Oku
"The biggest risk is not taking any risk "-Mark Zuckerberg [Source -Quotes Butterfly app ]
"For the past 33 years, I have looked in the mirror every morning and asked myself: "If today were the last day of my life, would I want to do what I am about to do today?" And whenever the answer has been "No" for too many days in a row, I know I need to change something." - Steve Jobs
"You can convince anybody of anything if you just push it at them all of the time. They may not believe it 100 percent, but they will still draw opinions from it, especially if they have no other information to draw their opinions from." - Charles Manson
"And I"ve come to one conclusion. In 3x years, I found out that everybody in the world, everybody in the world is a little bit fucked up..."
12 MOTIVATIONAL QUOTES ON LIFE  KEY TO SUCCESS
26 INSPIRATIONAL QUOTES FOR STUDENTS
"An imbecile habit has risen in modern controversy of saying that such and such a creed can be held in one age but cannot be held in another...
"The weird thing about being good,is that sometimes we're good with the bad ones" (William Ventura)
"Happiness can only exist in acceptance." - George Orwell
"Consider how hard it is to change yourself and you'll understand what little chance you have in trying to change others".  Jacob M. Braude
"If you want to make American great again, make America love again." - Ford Taylor
"If you always give You will always have" - Chinese proverb
"The real clown is the one with the crown"- guy from internet
"If you"re good at something never do it for free" - The Joker
"Some books are so familiar that reading them is like being home again."Louisa May Alcott
"The value of history is not necessarily scientific, but moral." - Mike Tyson
"In times of conflict we sometimes concentrate too much on what divides us. Today, fly the Stars and Stripes with pride and confidence that what unites is far stronger." - Senator Charles Dent
"The past is us in funny clothes." - Mike Tyson
"If internet explorer is brave enough to ask you to be your default browser, you're brave enough to ask that girl out"
"If you can make money off some rich people, you might make a few dollars. If you can make money off the stupid, you will become a billionaire." -Anonymous
"There greatest glory is not in never falling, but rising everytime we fall. -Confucius [Source -Quotes Butterfly app Google Play ]
"Loyalty to country always. Loyalty to the government when they deserve it." - Mark Twain
"Wicked thoughts and worthless efforts gradually set their mark on the face, especially the eyes." -Sir Arthur Charles Clarke
"We"re so busy watching out for what"s just ahead of us that we don"t take time to enjoy where we are." -Bill Watterson
"I am not what I think I am, and I am not what you think I am. I am what I think you think I am." -- Charles Horton Cooley
"War is a cowardly escape from the problems of peace."  Thomas Mann
"Do not fear to be eccentric in opinion, for every opinion now accepted was once eccentric."  Bertrand Russell
"The most wasted of all days is one without laughter."  e e cummings
"Life is what happens to you while you're busy making other plans."  John Lennon
"Accept what is, let go of what was, and have faith in what will be" - Sonia Ricotti
"You are a lot better than you probably think you are." William Walter
"Do more of what makes you happy." - Carmel McConnell
"The greatest leader is not necessarily the one who does the greatest things. He is the one that gets the people to do the greatest things." - Ronald Reagan
"All problems are boring until they're your own" - Red ( Orange Is the New Black )
"Things usually end the way they began. Fast or slow, passionately or boring, too much or too little."
"Our highest-quality work is a result of our passion for the things we do, not our passion for the rewards that may result from them."
"If there's one thing kids like more than one sword, it's two swords" - CK
" Who's Got My Money?!" - Grant Cardone
"The worse your logic, the more interesting the consequences to which it gives rise." - Bertrand Russell
"Learn to use your emotions to think, not think with your emotions." - Robert T. Kiyosaki, Rich Dad, Poor Dad
"You're under no obligation to be the same person you were 5 minutes ago" - Alan Watts
100 Dichos y Refranes sobre el VINO y el buen beber
"If you get play the craft, you won"t get the shaft" -Reddit
"One of the greatest gifts you can give anybody is the gift of your honest self." (-Fred Rogers)
"Usually it is because someone does too much, too soon, followed very quickly by too little, too late." ..NTSB Investigator Steve Wilson, when asked what causes most aviation accidents.
"I can say with great certainty and absolute honesty that I did not know what love was until I knew what love was not." - P.T. Berkey
"To learn that we have said or done a stupid thing is nothing; we must learn a more ample and important lesson; that we are but blockheads. On the hightest throne in the world, we are seated, still, upon our arses". - Michel de Montaigne.
"Hopes are for a better future. Forgivness is for a better past"
"When someone shows you who they are, believe them the first time." -- Maya Angelou
"Prejudice is a mist, which in our journey through the world often dims the brightest and obscures the best of all the good and glorious objects that meet us on our way." - Lord Shaftesbury
"It is not easy to see how the more extreme forms of nationalism can long survive when men have seen the Earth in its true perspective as a single small globe against the stars." - Arthur C. Clarke
"My life is my message" --Mahatma Gandhi
"The average man can dream dreams of a path he's never walked. But when that path's your day to day, your dreams become warped." - Scroobius Pip
"You're never fully dressed without a smile" - Annie
10 Mother Teresa Quotes That Push You To Do Good For The World
"Be proud of who you are and not ashamed of how someone else sees you." -Unknown
"Would you like me to give you a formula for success? It"s quite simple, really: Double your rate of failure. You are thinking of failure as the enemy of success. But it isn"t at all." -Thomas J. Watson
" Is first love last, or is last love first? "
"We have not truly got rid of God if we still believe in grammar" - Nietzsche
"You cannot change the circumstances but you can change yourself. That is something you have charge of." Jim Rohn
"Luck is a dividend of sweat. The more you sweat, the luckier you get." --Ray Kroc
"Whenever two people meet, there are really six people present. There is each man as he sees himself, each man as the other person sees him, and each man as he really is."  William James
"I became a feminist as an alternative to becoming a masochist."  Sally Kempton
"Behind every great fortune there is a crime."  Honore de Balzac
"In mathematics you don't understand things. You just get used to them."  Johann von Neumann
"With your head full of brains and your shoes full of feet, you"re too smart to go down any not-so-good street."  Dr. Seuss
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"America, I'm putting my queer shoulder to the wheel" - Allen Ginsberg
"You will learn a lot about yourself if you stretch in the direction of goodness, of bigness, of kindness, of forgiveness, of emotional bravery." - Cheryl Strayed
"Speak only if it improves upon the silence." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Every person who knows the truth of his soul,will never have a lie in his/her heart" (William Ventura)
100 Frases de Medioambiente y Ecologa para reflexionar
"But I, being poor, have only my dreams; I have spread my dreams under your feet; Tread softly because you tread on my dreams." -- W. B. Yeats
"We have a leadership crisis in our world today. It is based on the reality that we have developed leaders who care more about what people think about them, or how they are seen than they care about those that follow them." - Ford Taylor
"I believe that imagination is stronger than knowledge  myth is more potent than history  dreams are more powerful than facts  hope always triumphs over experience  laughter is the cure for grief  love is stronger than death." - Robert Fulghum
"Everybody"s got a voice, you just gotta follow it." -Childish Gambino
"We mature with the damage, not with the years." - Mateus William
"Whats the fucking point of prison if your debt to society remains unpaid after you get out." - u/Reformedjerk
"Some people will find you 'too much' in some ways and 'not enough' in others." (-Laurie Helgoe)
"What we do now echoes in eternity." - Marcus Aurelius
"Drunkenness is temporary suicide."  Bertrand Russell
"if you do not Hypnotize yourself, Life will hypnotize you, You will be under the control of life, Until you die or, Until you hypnotize yourself then, Life will be under your control AGAIN." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Experience is what you get when you don"t get what you want." -Dan Stanford
"if you do not Hypnotize yourself, Life will...
"It takes hundreds of nuts to hold a car together, but it takes only one of them to scatter it all over the highway."  Evan Esar
"We should be taught not to wait for inspiration to start a thing. Action always generates inspiration. Inspiration seldom generates action."  Frank Tibolt
"To get back my youth I would do anything in the world, except take exercise, get up early, or be respectable."  Oscar Wilde
"On account of being a democracy and run by the people, we are the only nation in the world that has to keep a government four years, no matter what it does."  Will Rogers
"Life is 10% what happens to us and 90% how we react to it" - Charles R. Swindoll
"I am capable of affection for those who reflect my own world. How much of my solicitude for other human beings is real and honest, how much is a feigned lacquer painted on by society, I do not know." - Sylvia Plath
"Honesty is the first chapter in the book of wisdom." - Thomas Jefferson
"This and no other is the root from which a tyrant springs; when he first appears, he is a protector." - Plato
"There is in every one of us, even those who seem to be most moderate, a type of desire that is terrible, wild and lawless." - Plato, The Republic
"We come to love not by finding a perfect person, but by learning to see an imperfect person perfectly." - Sam Keen
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Don"t be a martyr for a better world. Create a world that doesn"t need martyrs." - K.G.P
" Turn your tears of sorrow into growls of revenge!" - Musketeer Inc
"It's very likely that the universe is really a kind of a question, rather than the answer to anything."  Kevin Kelly
"Get off your high horse and descend from bullshit mountain." Me - circa 2018.
"A reader lives a thousand lives before he dies, said Jojen. The man who never reads lives only one." - George R.R. Martin
"You can"t tell people to go and then blame them for leaving." - Yoga Jones
" If you don't give up, you still have a chance. Giving up is the greatest failure" - Jack Ma
"I cried when I was born and I shall die laughing." - Sri Nisargadatta Maharaj
"May your choices reflect your hopes, not your fears." -Nelson Mandela
"When something is important enough, you do it even if the odds are not in your favor." - Elon Musk
"Don't ask for explanations about a past that has died,if you can't explain how you live your present" (William Ventura)
"When we grow up, do we have to grow cold?" - Hollywood Undead
"Why do you have to be a nonconformist like everybody else?"  James Thurber
"I like nonsense, it wakes up the brain cells. Fantasy is a necessary ingredient in living, It's a way of looking at life through the wrong end of a telescope. Which is what I do, And that enables you to laugh at life's realities."  Dr. Seuss
"The United States is a nation of laws: badly written and randomly enforced."  Frank Zappa
"The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to steal bread."  Anatole France
"I had to put on a brave face as long as there were still people counting on me. That the only reason I kept going." -Preston Garvey (Fallout 4)
"It's not being a hero it's just doing the right thing." - The Flash
"Evil inhabits the soul of a criminal without being felt there. It is felt in the heart of the man who is afflicted and innocent." - Simone Weil
"Freedom is something that dies unless it's used" -Hunter S. Thompson-
"A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer."_____Bruce Lee
"Never lend money to a friend. It"s dangerous. It could damage his memory." - Sam Levenson
"Your life is not only yours, unless you live for yourself."  Unlimiter
"Inspiration, appears from time to time, like a crescent moon."  Unlimiter
"We, humans, try to find the truth by what is true. That's why we can never reach the absolute reality."  Unlimiter
"If a person doesn't lie to people, it doesn't mean that he doesn't lie to himself."  Unlimiter
"If you examine a butterfly according to the laws of aerodynamics, it shouldn"t be able to fly. But the butterfly doesn"t know that, so it flies." - Howard Schultz
"I have no notion of loving people by halves; it is not my nature. My attachments are always excessively strong." - Jane Austen
"There is a certain bleakness in finding hope where one expected certainty." Ursula K. Le Guin
"Be proud of your choices, not your gifts, because they were given to you. You might be tall, or really good at math, or extremely beautiful, or handsome, but you can only really be proud of your choices because those are the things you are acting on." - Jeff Bezos
"The loneliest people are the kindest. The saddest people smile the brightest. The most damaged people are the wisest. All because they do not wish to see anyone else suffer the way they do.''-Anonymous
"The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear, and the oldest and strongest kind of fear is the fear of the Unknown" -- H.P. Lovecraft
"It's better to die alone,than to live with with someone who seems to be already dead" (William Ventura)
"The unexamined life is not worth living." - Socrates
"Diaper spelled backwards is repaid , think about it." - Marshall McLuhan
"The more you know who you are, and what you want, the less you let things upset you" - Bob from Lost in Translation
"Always watch where you are going. Otherwise, you may step on a piece of the forest that was left out by mistake." - Winnie the Pooh (A.A. Milne)
"Everything has a crack in it; that's how the light gets in." - Leonard Cohen
"Love is our true destiny. We do not find the meaning of life by ourselves alone - we find it with another." - Thomas Merton, Love and Living
"For centuries, theologians have been explaining the unknowable in terms of the-not-worth-knowing."  H. L. Mencken
"Most men are within a finger's breadth of being mad."  Diogenes the Cynic
"Life is an unbroken succession of false situations."  Thornton Wilder
"Nobody in the game of football should be called a genius. A genius is somebody like Norman Einstein."  Joe Theismann
"Love is not cruel, we are cruel. Love is not a game, we have made a game out of love" -Rupi Kaur
"I'm optimistic, because cynicism is a weapon. Cynicism is a weapon against normal people to count themselves out..." -Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez
"...what Donald Trump wants is for us to stop calling his cruelty and fear and divisiveness wrong, but to join him in calling it right  and this we cannot do. And I say, by not yielding, we will prevail." - Jon Stewart
"Think of yourself as dead. You have lived your life. Now, take what's left and live it properly. What doesn't transmit light creates its own darkness." - Marcus Aurelius
"If people really knew what others said about them, there would not be four friends left in the world" -Blaise Pascal quoted in The Atlantic
"You only pass through this life once, you don"t come back for an encore." - Elvis Presley
"Humans are meant to be broken as much as they are meant to be loved because the more cracked they become the more love that can seep in."-The Wanderer
"Honesty doesn"t always pay, but dishonesty always costs." - Michael Josephson
"Monsters are real, and ghosts are real too. They live inside us, and sometimes, they win." - Stephen King
"It's only after we've lost everything that we're free to do anything." - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"Civilisation is built on words, civilisation is words." The Truth, Terry Pratchett
"I think and think and think, I"ve thought myself out of happiness one million times, but never once into it." - Jonathan Safran Foer
"The man with insight enough to admit his limitations comes nearest to perfection."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"All endings are also beginnings. We just don't know it at the time." - Mitch Albom
"Only Dead Fish go with the Flow" -Andy Hunt
"Life is what happens to you while you"re busy making other plans."  John Lennon
"The mind of an enlightened human being is flexible and adaptable. The mind of the ignorant person is conditioned and fixed." (-Ajahn Sumedho)
"Doubt is the father of invention." - Ambrose Bierce
"One of the greatest gifts you can give anybody is the gift of your honest self. I also believe that kids can spot a phony a mile away." - Fred Rogers
""We never stop investigating. We are never satisfied that we know enough to get by. Every question we answer leads on to another question. This has become the greatest survival trick of our species.""  Desmond Morris
""You can't find any true closeness in Hollywood, because everybody does the fake closeness so well.""  Carrie Fisher
""McCabe's Law: Nobody _has_ to do _anything_.""  Charles McCabe
""All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence; then success is sure.""  Mark Twain
"Fear, uncertainty, and discomfort are your compasses toward growth." - Celestine Chua
"Oblivion awaits everyone, it's just a matter of time. Greatness is the courage to not surrender to it easily, character is the willingness of not giving up without a fight to not to be lost!"
"We Are All In The Gutter But Some Of Us Are Looking At The Stars"  Oscar Wilde
"Life is a hideous thing, and from the background behind what we know of it peer daemoniacal hints of truth which make it sometimes a thousandfold more hideous." - H.P. Lovecraft
"...they do not trust their eyes and ears, but only their imaginations. What convinces masses are not facts, not even invented facts, but only the consistency of the illusion" - Hannah Arendt
"The best revenge is massive success." - Frank Sinatra
"Every passing moment is another chance to turn it all around." - Vanilla Sky
"Nothing is cooler and more attractive than a big comeback, and that'll be me." - Steven Adler
"If the moon smiled, she would resemble you. You leave the same impression Of something beautiful, but annihilating." - Sylvia Plath
"The Stuckist is not a career artist but rather an amateur (amare, Latin, to love)... who takes risks on the canvas rather than hiding behind ready-made objects (e.g. a dead sheep). ...
"I left her asking permission to visit her in the course of the day. She consented, and I went, and, since that time, sun, moon, and stars may pursue their course: I know not whether it is day or night; the whole world is nothing to me." -Goethe
"If you want to live in a free society, you have to be allowed to take a certain amount of risk" - Hamilton Morris on legalization of psychedelics
"How much more grievous are the consequences of anger than the causes of it." - Marcus Aurelius
"....Patience is not simply enduring; it is enduring well!"
"Different people remember things differently, and you'll not get any two people to remember anything the same, whether they were there or not." - Neil Gaiman, The Ocean at the End of the Lane
"The most regretful people on earth are those who felt the call to creative work, who felt their own creative power restive and uprising, and gave to it neither power nor time." -Mary Oliver
"Communism forgets that life is individual. Capitalism forgets that life is social. And the kingdom of brotherhood is found...in a higher synthesis that combines the truths of both."Martin Luther King
"Generals fight with their minds, Soldiers fight with their hearts." - Unknown
"I would rather be a hot mess of bold action, a make-it-happen, learn-on-the-fly kind of person, than a perfectly organized coward."  Brendon Burchard
"You"ll miss the best things if you keep your eyes shut."  Dr. Seuss
"The more that you read, the more things you will know. The more that you learn, the more places you"ll go."  Dr. Seuss
"The Democrats may be gaining an advantage with the young and minorities, but the Republicans are more ruthless."
"If you never did you should. These things are fun, and fun is good."  Dr. Seuss
"That which does not make a man worse than he was, also does not make his life worse"--Aurelius
"You have brains in your head. You have feet in your shoes. You can steer yourself any direction you choose."  Dr. Seuss
"Why fit in when you were born to stand out?"  Dr. Seuss
"Comparing yourself to others does nothing for you. Society has conditioned us to value people who fit a secular mold of perfection." - Michele Woolley
"During the first period of a man"s life the greatest danger is not to take the risk." -Soren Kierkegaard
"I don't want to be alone, I want to be left alone." - Audrey Hepburn
"I imagine one of the reasons people cling to their hates so stubbornly is because they sense, once hate is gone, they will be forced to deal with pain."James Baldwin
"Darkness does not always equate to evil, just as light does not always bring good."-P.C Cast, House of Night
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." Dr. Seuss
"I never forget a face, but in your case I'll be glad to make an exception."
"When some things go wrong, take a moment to be thankful for the many things that are going right." - Annie Gottlier
"Choose life ...."
"Never was anything great achieved without danger." - Machiavelli
"Never was anything great achieved without danger."
"It is better to be feared than loved, if you cannot be both." - Machiavelli
"If I were to wish for something, I would wish not for wealth or power but for the passion of possibility, for the eye, eternally young, eternally ardent, that sees possibility everywhere. Pleasure disappoints; possibility does not." - Kierkegaard
"Life is only talking, and the proliferation of talking, for the sake of talking about talking in times of talking."  Kurtis Matthew Russell
"Do not pray for an easy life, pray for the strength to endure a difficult one."-Bruce Lee
"Love is not only made for lovers, it is also for friends who love each other better than lovers. A real friend is very hard to find, difficult to leave, and impossible to forget." - Anonymous
"You miss 100% of the shots you don't take." - Wayne Gretzky
"Love is not only made for lovers, it is also for friends who love each other better than lovers. A real friend is very hard to find, difficult to leave and impossible to forget." - Anonymous
"The role of science is to investigate the unexplained, not explain the uninvestigated." Dr. Stephen Rorke
"The man with confidence in himself gains the confidence of others" - Anonymous
"Those who lose their hold do so from their own want of strength; but desiring to conceal their weakness, they attribute the absence of success to the first critic that mentions them." H.P. Lovecraft
"Life ought to be a struggle of desire toward adventures whose nobility will fertilize the soul." - Rebecca West
"You're braver than you believe, and stronger than you seem, and smarter than you think." - Carter Crocker
"Such as it is, the press has become the greatest power within the Western World, more powerful than the legislature, the executive and judiciary. One would like to ask; by whom has it been elected and to whom is it responsible?" Solzhenitsyn
"In the midst of movement and chaos, keep stillness insode of you" -Deepak Chopra
"Another head aches. Another heart breaks. I'm so much older than I can take." -The Killers, *All These Things that I've Done*
"Today I choose life. Every morning when I wake up I can choose joy, happiness, negativity, pain... To feel the freedom that comes from being able to continue to make mistakes and choices - today I choose to feel life, not to deny my humanity but embrace it." Kevyn Aucoin.
'The belief in a supernatural source of evil is not necessary; men alone are quite capable of every wickedness.'  Joseph Conrad
"It is not a lack of love, but a lack of friendship that makes unhappy marriages." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Whether you think you can or think you can"tyou"re right." (-Henry Ford)
"It's the fucking Matrix. I didn't see the movie, and I didn't understand the script, but here's what it is." Johnny Depp
"I know a lot about a little, a little about a lot, and nothing about most."
"Any person capable of angering you becomes your master. He can anger you only when you permit yourself to be disturbed by him." - Epictetus
"Nature's language is silence, other languages are just poor translation"
"When Someones Else's Happiness is Your Happiness - That's Love." Lana Del Rey
"The more challenges that exist in an environment, the more amazing the person who is able to turn those challenges into assets will have to be" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Life is not about how fast you run or how high you climb, but how well you bounce."  Vivian Komori
"Be bold and courageous, see yourself strong and expect your thoughts to follow..." - Zafar Iqubal Khan
"Put the power of your words to work for you instead of against you..." - Zafar Iqbal Khan
"This too, shall pass." Anonymous
"God is silent. Now if only man would shut up." - Woody Allen
"Those who have been writing literature have not been writing life." - Charles Bukowski
"I don"t like the clean-shaven boy with the necktie and the good job. I like desperate men, men with broken teeth and broken minds and broken ways. They interest me. They are full of surprises and explosions." - Charles Bukowski
"When life is sweet, say thank you and celebrate. And when life is bitter, say thank you and grow." - Shauna Niequist
"Stop 'feeling' facts and google them." - /u/IrregardlessOfFeels
" In the end, your success will speak for itself" - Patrick Bet David
"Looking back, I think it was more difficult to see what the problems were than to solve them." - Charles Darwin
" I'm the end, your success will speak for itself" - Patrick Bet David
"We make up horrors to help us cope with the real ones."-Stephen King
"A child who was not embraced by his village will burn it down to feel it's warmth"-Unknown from Africa
"A single person is missing for you, and the whole world is empty." - Joan Didion
"Reality is a unified whole, but thought cuts it up into fragments. . . . Every thought implies a perspective, and every perspective, by its very nature, implies limitation, which ultimately means that it is not true, at least, not absolutely."
"I have certainly known more men destroyed by the desire to have wife and child and to keep them in comfort than I have seen destroyed by drink and harlots." - William Butler Yeats
"Hell is a hollow Heaven." - Unknown
"Civility and respect always prevails over harassment and disrespect." Rep. Steve Scalise,
"There is no pleasure in having nothing to do; the fun is having lots to do and not doing it." -Andrew Jackson
"Don't fear failure so much that you refuse to try new things. The saddest summary of a life contains three descriptions: could have, might have, and should have." - Louis E. Boone
"Don"t try to plan your future so you won"t be ticked off when your plan goes up in flames"
"In a certain way, it's the sound of the words, the inflection and the way the song is sung and the way it fits the melody and the way the syllables are on the tongue that has as much of the meaning as the actual, literal words" -David Byrne
"You have to be burning with an idea, or a problem, or a wrong that you want to right. If you're not passionate enough from the start, you'll never stick it out." -Steve Jobs
"We live in a generation where love is lying, and lying is truth for too many people." - myself
"Politics had eaten away at people"s heads until they in turn had begun to devour one another." - Basma Abdel Aziz, The Queue
"Cut your own firewood, it will heat you twice." -Henry Ford
"Move in silence and only speak when it is time to say checkmate"
"Things may come to those who wait, but only the things left by those who hustle." - Abraham Lincoln
"Keep your eyes on the stars and your feet on the ground." Theodore Roosevelt
"Don"t think. You already know what you have to do, and you know how to do it. What"s stopping you?" -- Tim Grover
"Perhaps when you have faced as many disappointments and suffered as many betrayals as I, you will see it - there is no principle beyond the selfish, and men are animals. Conscience is a burden we choose to bear. Morality is the lie we tell ourselves to make its bearing easier." -- Joe Abercrombie
"It is not enough to succeed, others must also fail." - Gore Vidal.
"However rare true love may be, true friendship is even rarer." - Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"Winning feels better when you take a little damage" -Oddisee
"I was always hungry for love. Just once, I wanted to know what it was like to get my fill of itto be fed so much love I couldn"t take any more. Just once." - Haruki Murakami
"The only person you should try to be better than is the person you were yesterday." Anonymous
"Look again at that dot. That's here. That's home. That's us. On it everyone you love, everyone you know, everyone you ever heard of, every human being who ever was, lived out their lives. The aggregate of our joy and suffering, thousands of confident religions, ideologies..." -Carl Sagan
"Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tossed, to me: I lift my lamp beside the golden door."
"You have to accept whatever comes, and the only important thing is that you meet it with courage and with the best that you have to give." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Because this is America, where one person can screw it up for everyone." -Tim Allen as Tim Taylor from Home Improvement.
"Goodness can be found sometimes in the middle of hell." - Charles Bukowski
"Do what you can, with what you have, where you are." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Sometimes you climb out of bed in the morning and you think, I"m not going to make it, but you laugh inside  remembering all the times you"ve felt that way." - Charles Bukowski
"If you love life, don't waste time, for time is what life is made up of"._____Bruce Lee
"Human rights' are a fine thing, but how can we make ourselves sure that our rights do not expand at the expense of the rights of others. A society with unlimited rights is incapable of standing to adversity." Solzhenitsyn
"These Central Americans are refugees from what is tantamount to a war zone..." -mls, NYT commenter
"These Central Americans are refugeea from what is tantamount to a war zone..." -mls, NYT commenter
"I"d woken up early, and I took a long time getting ready to exist." Fernando Pessoa
"Being wisely selfish and being selfless can amount to very much the same thing." Sam Harris, Waking Up
'Who are you to judge the life I live? I know I'm not perfect, and I don't live to be. But before you start pointing fingers, make sure your hands are clean!' -Bob Marley
"I think I have this thing where I need everybody to think I'm the greatest, the quote-unquote Fantastic Mr. Fox. And if people aren't knocked out and dazzled and slightly intimidated by me, I don't feel good about myself."
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance you must keep moving." - Albert Einstein
"It is more fun to talk with someone who doesn't use long, difficult words but rather short, easy words like "What about lunch?"- Winnie-the-Pooh
"And when you think it's over, that's when the climb begins. What a fantastic story life is" - Antonello Venditti
"If you're not happy looking a knob in the face, there's something wrong" - Karl Pilkigton
"He alone, who owns the youth, gains the future."-Adolf Hitler
"Each of us is a puzzle piece, and together we make the puzzle complete." - Anonymous
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Symbolism in the current context can be used for two things; obfuscation and charisma." (More in comments) - Olestra Crowley
"We're terrible animals. I think that the Earth's immune system is trying to get rid of us, as well it should." - Kurt Vonnegut
"An eye for an eye leaves the whole world blind." - Mahatma Gandi
"No homo we smokin penises" -young thug
"Children learn more from what you are than what you teach."
"Although the world is full of suffering, it is also full of the overcoming of it" -Helen Keller
"As a final factor I must, in all modesty, list my own person: irreplaceable. Neither a military nor a civilian personality could take my place. Attempts on my life may be repeated ... the fate of the Reich depends on me alone. I shall act accordingly." - Hitler
"The very essence of instinct is that it's followed independently of reason." -Charles Darwin
"Prejudices are what fools use for reason." -Voltaire
"There is no such thing as an appropriate joke, that's why it's a joke." -Michael Scott, The Office
"A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer."_____Bruce Lee
"Home is not where you are born; home is where all your attempts to escape cease." Naguib Mahfouz
"Knowing is not enough, we must apply. Willing is not enough, we must do."_____Bruce Lee
" If I'm riding my bike at the speed of light and I put on my bike lamp, will it come on?" - 12 year old Albert Einstein
"I"m not in this world to live up to your expectations and you"re not in this world to live up to mine."_____Bruce Lee
'Of all evil I deem you capable: Therefore I want good from you. Verily, I have often laughed at the weaklings who thought themselves good because they had no claws.' -Friedrich Nietzsche
"People say nothing is impossible, but I do nothing everyday." - Winnie the Pooh
"Many who tried to enlighten were hanged from the lamppost." - Stanislaw Jerzy Lec
"Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new." - Albert Einstein
"Our world is dangerously riven by religious doctrines that all educated people should condemn, and yet there is more to understanding the human condition than science and secular culture generally admit." - Sam Harris, Waking Up
"and us defenseless citizens are all just little tuna fish flapping from one useless webpage to the next" - Thoughty2, What Facebook Really Does With Your Data
"Courage isn't having the strength to carry on. Courage is carrying on when you don't have the strength."-Napoleon Bonaparte
"Tomorrow is the most important thing in life. Comes into us at midnight very clean. It"s perfect when it arrives and it puts itself in our hands. It hopes we"ve learnt something from yesterday."-- Inscribed on John Wayne"s Tombstone
''The hardest part is waking up in the morning remembering what you were trying to forget last night.''- Unknown
"If we look far into the future, one can see a time in the 21st century when both Europe and the USA will be in dire need of Russia as an ally." - Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"I spent my life trying not to be careless. Women and children can be careless, but not men." Vito Corleone, The Godfather.
"Your future self is talking shit about you" - u/bloodofgore
"Man is certainly stark mad; he cannot make a worm, and yet he will be making gods by dozens." - Michel de Montaigne, The Complete Essays
"Inspiration comes from within yourself. One has to be positive. When you"re positive, good things happen." - Deep Roy
"It's not who votes that counts. It's who counts the votes."-Joseph Stalin
"Blogging is not writing. It's graffiti with punctuation." - Contagion (Steven Soderbergh, 2011)
"Many of life's failures are people who did not realize how close they were to success when they gave up." - Thomas A. Edison
"Always question yourself, but never hesitate."
"Nothin' beats the hobo life! Stabbin' folks with my hobo kniiiife"
"The only absolute knowledge attainable by man is that life is meaningless." - Tolstoy
"Train yourself to let go of everything you fear to lose." - Yoda
"Always be yourself, express yourself, have faith in yourself, do not go out and look for a successful personality and duplicate it."____Bruce Lee
"The true worth of a man is to be measured by the objects he pursues" -Marcus Aurelius Thoughts on its meaning?
"Knowledge will give you power, but character respect."______Bruce Lee
"Always listen to your heart, because even though it's on your left side, it's always right." - Nicholas Sparks
'Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups.'
" All of humanity's problems stem from man's inability to sit quietly in a room alone" - Blaise Pascal
"Progress, far from consisting in change, depends on retentiveness. When experience is not retained, as among savages, infancy is perpetual. Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it."--George Santayana
"See with the soul and not your eyes because to dance with beasts you must penetrate their disguise". P.C. Kast and Kristin Cast, House of Night
"The attentive pupil who wishes to be attentive, his eyes riveted on the teacher, his ears open wide, so exhausts himself in playing the attentive role that he ends up by no longer hearing anythjng." -Jean-Paul Sartre
"The afterlife is how you"re remembered by the living. Hitler was evil. He will always be remembered as evil. He"s in hell. Mother Teresa is holy and good. She will always be remembered for that. That"s heaven." [Netflix series "Grace &amp; Frankie: S3-E7]
"It's called the American Dream, because you have to be asleep to believe it." -George Carlin
"You can't open up the story of my life, fucking, go to page 738 and think you know me."
"Being frustrated is disagreeable, but the real disasters in life begin when you get what you want." - Irving Kristol
"A man can live and be healthy without killing animals for food; therefore, if he eats meat, he participates in taking animal life merely for the sake of his appetite." - Tolstoy
"We can not be rich of love,if exists poverty in our heart" (William Ventura)
"Men learn to love the woman they are attracted to. Women learn to become attracted to the man they fall in love with."
"The Soul is not composed of any materials. It is unity indivisible. Therefore it must be indestructible." - Swami Vivekananda
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow men. True nobility lies in being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"Success is getting what you want. Happiness is wanting what you get." - Dale Carnegie
"An able, disinterested, public-spirited press with trained intelligence to know the right and courage to do it can preserve that public virtue without which government is a sham and a mockery. A cynical, mercenary, demagogic press will produce in time a people as base as itself." - Joseph Pulitzer
"A lie is just a great story ruined by the truth" - Barney Stinson
"The enquiry in England is not whether a man has talents or genius, but whether he is passive and polite, a virtuous ass, and obedient to noblemen"s opinions in art and science. If he is, he is a good man; if not, he must be starved." --William Blake
"In the end, we"ll all become stories."
"In most cases, the only person judging you is yourself" - Anonymous
"If you expect your friends to be perfect, you won"t have any friends." - Bob Parsons
"Reader, suppose you were an idiot. And suppose you were a member of Congress. But I repeat myself." - Mark Twain
"The greatest gift of life is friendship, and I have received it." Hubert H. Humphrey
"The greatest healing therapy is friendship and love."________Hubert H. Humphrey
"Pop culture does nothing for me, The American dream mainstream just bores me, And we all act like we see right through it, When we all know we're addicted to it" - Icon for Hire
"Thankfully, persistence is a great substitute for talent." - Steve Martin
"Wisdom comes from experience. Experience is often a result of lack of wisdom." - Terry Pratchett
" Luminous beings we are. Made of this crude matter, we are not" - Yoda
"You can only win the game when you understand that it is a game". -- Mark Lawrence, Broken Empire
"I wish it need not have happened in my time," said Frodo. "So do I," said Gandalf, "and so do all who live to see such times. But that is not for them to decide. All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given us."
"Suffering is when pain speaks" - A part of the Universe
"I have a huge and savage conscience that won't let me get away with things." - Octavia E. Butler
"The most important skill in journalism is the ability to accurately quote the people on the other side." --Terry Mattingly
"Believe you can and you"re halfway there." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Leadership is not about control. Leadership is about influence." - Ford Taylor
"The world is made of rings. The hooks are all yours. Make straight your hooks and nothing can hold you." - Nisargadatta Maharaj
"Only he is an artist who can make a riddle out of a solution." --Karl Kraus
"Where there is a will, there is a way. If there is a chance in a million that you can do something, anything, to keep what you want from ending, do it. Pry the door open or, if need be, wedge your foot in that door and keep it open." Pauline Kael
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim. Accept no one's definition of your life; define yourself." Harvey Fierstein
"Dear Humanity: We regret being alien bastards. We regret coming to Earth. And we most definitely regret the corps. just blew up our raggedy-ass fleet!" - Sergeant Avery Johnson (Halo 2)
"Do you ever wait for the longest day of the year and then miss it? I always wait for the longest day of the year and then miss it!" - "The Great Gatsby", F. Scott Fitzgerald
"The golden rule of conduct is mutual toleration, seeing that we will never all think alike and we shall always see Truth in fragments and from different points of vision" -Mahatma Gandhi
"I have lost many battles, but I have never lost a fight. A fight only ends when a person capitulates for the last time. Succumbing now will make each battle more difficult for everyone who will endure the same battles that I have faced and will continue to face. I will not be that kind of selfish."
"If you can convince the lowest white man he's better than the best colored man, he won't notice you're picking his pocket. Hell, give him somebody to look down on, and he'll empty his pockets for you." -Lyndon B. Johnson
"I am less afraid of a man that tries to kill me than a woman that tries to love me"
"Successful people have fear, successful people have doubts, and successful people have worries. They just don"t let these feelings stop them." - T. Harv Eker
"You cannot hang out with negative people and expect to live a positive life."  Joel Osteen
"I'm damned if I'm going to die before I know how the universe works." -Stephen Hawking
"In a society that profits from your self-doubt, liking yourself is a rebellious act."
"Every human life involves an unfathomable mystery, for man is the riddle of the universe, and the riddle of man in his endowment with personal capacities. The stars are not so strange as the mind that studies them, analyzes their light, and measures their distance."Harry Emerson Fosdick
"Give me a place to stand and with a lever I will move the whole world." -Archimedes
"You know we're not put on this Earth to live perfect lives, where we never get hurt or we never make mistakes. We're put here to hurl ourselves head first into this crazy world and the bruises and scraps you get along the way, they just mean your living life." - Lois Foutley
"When I write, I feel like an armless legless man with a crayon in his mouth" - Kurt Vonnegut
"The purpose of practicing Yoga is never a humour for anyone but a learning of your ultimate growth." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The art of Yoga which one adopts, stays throughout his life." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Take a chance, you may lose. Take not a chance &amp; you have lost already" -Soren Kierkegaard
"Do you know what my favorite part of the game is? The opportunity to play." - Mike Singletary
"Incredible change happens in your life when you decide to take control of what you do have power over instead of craving control over what you don't."
"Much of what are called 'social problems' consists of the fact that intellectuals have theories that do not fit the real world. From this they conclude that it is the real world which is wrong and needs changing."
"Self-esteem is the ability to see yourself as a flawed individual and still hold yourself in high regard." (-Esther Perel)
"One good thing about MUSIC, when it hits you, you feel no PAIN" - Bob Marley
"Faith is the art of holding on to things your reason has once accepted, in spite of your changing moods." C.S. Lewis
"Don"t think you aren"t beautiful just because you don"t have a mirror in front of you all the time to see it" -unknown
"These woods are lovely, dark and deep, but I have promises to keep, and miles to go before I sleep, and miles to go before I sleep." - Robert Frost
" Thirty minutes of exercise will never equal a one minute fight " Every Police Academy Instructor
"If you're lonely when you're alone, you're in bad company" -Jean Paul Sartre
"You don"t get what you wish for, you get what you work for." - Unknown
"If anyone thinks they"d rather be in a different part of history, they"re probably not a very good student of history. Life sucked in the old days. People knew very little, and you were likely to die at a young age of some horrible disease."  Elon Musk
"Love is a piece of art that is painted with a kiss and the color of the heart" (William Ventura)
"Hollywood and by the same token capitalism, keeps inventing new ways to watch people die, but strangely not how to live." - Matthew Reilly
"What the human being is best at doing is interpreting all new information so that their prior conclusions remain intact." - Warren Buffett
"A world made up from 'may be's', is only merely maybe true" - Unknown
"Superior Leaders Are Willing To Admit A Mistake And Cut Their Losses. Be Willing To Admit That You"ve Changed Your Mind. Don"t Persist When The Original Decision Turns Out To Be A Poor One."Brian Tracy
"One of the huge mistakes people make is that they try to force an interest on themselves. You don't choose your passions; your passions choose you." - Jeff Bezos
"To die will be an awfully big adventure." - J.M. Barrie
"Mystery creates wonder and wonder is the basis of our desire to understand." -Neil Armstrong
"Greed is a bottomless pit which exhausts the person in an endless effort to satisfy the need without ever reaching satisfaction." Erich Fromm
"If you have influence with at least one person, that makes you a leader. An organization is any time two or more people are in a relationship. So, everyone is a leader in some organization or sphere in which they live, work, and play." - Ford Taylor
"There are many humorous things in the world, among them the white men's notion that he is less savage than other savages." -- Mark Twain
''The man who moves a mountain begins by carrying away small stones.'' - Confucius
"It"s your outlook on life that counts. If you take yourself lightly and don"t take yourself too seriously, pretty soon you can find the humor in our everyday lives. And sometimes it can be a lifesaver." - Betty White
"It's the little details that are vital. Little things make big things happen." John Wooden
"Carry out a random act of kindness, with no expectation of reward, safe in the knowledge that one day someone might do the same for you." Princess Diana
"A man who flies from his fear may find that he has only taken a shortcut to meet it." Sador, Children of Hrin
"Nothing is work unless you'd rather be doing something else." - George Halas
"Books. Cats. Life is good." -Edward Gorey
"Those born in unfavorable circumstances and lacking any remarkable gifts will always need one particular thing: someone to blame." - Friedrich Nietzche
"Clocks slay time ... time is dead as long as it is being clicked off by little wheels; only when the clock stops does time come to life." -- William Faulkner
"You see, they say that people shrivel up because they have an imagination. So, don't imagine anything, you'll become brave as hell." -Mr.Park (Oldboy)
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened" - Dr. Seuss
'For he that fights and runs away, may turn and fight another day; but he who is in battle slain, can never rise and fight again.' -Samuel Butler
"The future ain't what it used to be." - Yogi Berra
"Tact is the art of making a point without making an enemy." - Isaac Newton
"The way to know life is to love many things."  Vincent Van Gogh
"To the world, you may be one person. But to one person, you may be the world." - Dr. Seuss
"If you're afraid of something but you still want to do it, approach it as a scientist doing an experiment: it seems to reduce anxiety in some people." - An INTP
"Research your own experience. Absorb what is useful, reject what is useless, add what is essentially your own." - Bruce Lee
"Life is a long lesson in humility." - James M. Barrie
"I don't trust people who don't love themselves and tell me, 'I love you.' ... There is an African saying which is: Be careful when a naked person offers you a shirt." Maya Angelou
"What do i have to write here?" -i still don"t understand it
"You can, you should, and if you"re brave enough to start, you will." - Stephen King
"There's a thin line between subtle and boring." -Robert Duvall
"Everyone has a plan 'til they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson
"Prayer is arrogance. The hope of a man to change the will of God. But God's plan is set and His words already spoken." -- Joe Abercrombie, Red Country
"After all, tomorrow is another day!" - Margaret Mitchell, Gone with the Wind
"After all, tomorrow is another day!" - Margaret Mitchell, Gone with the Winf
"What good's humility if you dont make a show of it? I mean, who's gonna notice?" -Stacy Keach (from Blue Bloods)
"My favorite things in life don"t cost any money." -Steve Jobs
"Always be a first-rate version of yourself and not a second-rate version of someone else."  Judy Garland
"There are no terrible people. There are just believers. If I believed what they believed, I would have to do that too" - Byron Katie
"No one wants you to be yourself. They want you to be the version of yourself that they like"  Marie Lu
"Don't let the success of others discourage you. Let it inspire you." -unknown
"You cannot continue to victimize someone else just because you yourself were a victim oncethere has to be a limit" - Edward W. Said
"Life's too mysterious to take too serious." Mary Engelbreit
"There are no evil people, just evil brains"-Me
"Private capital tends to..." - Albert Einstein
"The best way to treat obstacles is to use them as stepping-stones. Laugh at them, tread on them, and let them lead you to something better." - Enid Blyton
"Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear - not absence of fear."  Mark Twain
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it." Charles R. Swindoll
"What we believe we lack ends up defining what we love" a documentary
"Don't follow your dreams because if you get what you dream about then you'll have no more dreams." Murdoc Niccals
"IGHT, WE GON MAKE HELLA BREAD" -YungCashRegister aka LilBroomstick
"I play the baritone horn- which is like a mini tube, and is the least sexy instrument you can choose. And I generally say I don't play one so I don't have to acknowledge it. I also play fife." -Steve Carell
"Life is not an object, but a process that is you." - Unknown
"Only those who dare to fail greatly can ever achieve greatly." - Robert F. Kennedy
"If every time we choose a turd, society, at a great expense, simply allows us to redeem it for a pepperoni, then not only will we never learn to make smart choices, we will also surrender the freedom to choose, because a choice without consequences is no choice at all." -- Tom Robbins
"Even if I knew that tomorrow the world would go to pieces, I would still plant my apple tree." -Martin Luther
"A ship in harbor is safe, but that is not what ships are built for."  John A. Shedd
"A ship is always safe at shore but that is not what it"s built for."  John A. Shedd
"Sweet Childish days, that were as long As twenty days are now.
"There is no way things are supposed to be"
"There is just one life for each of us: our own." - Euripides
"Words are probably the worst way to understand concepts and ideas"
"I have a million things to talk to you about. All I want in this world is you. I want to see you and talk. I want the two of us to begin everything from the beginning" - Haruki Murakami
"Life is a cycle you can obstruct, when someting bad happens to you, try to compensate with other thing" - David Guapo
"Create your own method. Don't depend slavishly on mine. Make up something that will work for you! But keep breaking traditions, I beg you." - Konstantin Stanislavski
"If you don't read the newspaper, you're uninformed. If you do read it, you're misinformed." -Denzel Washington
"Pick you damn thing, and stick to it" - Jordan Peterson
"Dude, suckin" at something is the first step to being sorta good at something" -Jake, the dog
"An artist is a desperate lover with a vision" - Bridget C Bethel
"Isn't it funny how day by day nothing changes, but when we look back everything is different." - C. S. Lewis
"Hurt people hurt people. That"s how pain patterns gets passed on, generation after generation after generation. Break the chain today." - Yehuda Berg
"One father is more than a hundred schoolmasters." - George Herbert
"Life is short. Drive fast. Leave a sexy corpse." -Stanley Hudson (The Office)
"Actually, when you think about it, Father's Day is Motherfucker's Day." - George Carlin
"We are looking to make peace, we aren't looking to play games." -Donald J Trump
"Freedom is not worth having if it does not include the freedom to make mistakes." - Mahatma Gandhi
"I always did something I was a little not ready to do. I think that"s how you grow. When there"s that moment of, "Wow, I"m not really sure I can do this," and you push through those moments, that"s when you have a breakthrough."  Marissa Mayer
"Sometimes people hold a core belief that is very strongAnd because it is so important to protect the core belief, they will rationalize, ignore, and even deny anything that doesn"t fit in with the core belief." - Frantz Fanon
"You"re trying to fit in, But you were born to stand out"
"Pain is inevitable. Suffering is optional." - Haruki Murakami
"People divorced from community, occupation, and association are first and foremost among the supporters of extremism" - Robert Putnam
"To know what people really think, pay regard to what they do, rather than what they say." - Ren Descartes
"Look closely. The beautiful may be small." Immanuel Kant
"Who lies for you will lie against you." - John Locke
"If you don't have a passion that's because Fear is your main drive in life"
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees Opportunity In Every Difficulty."  Winston Churchill
"I love those who can smile in trouble"- Leonardo da Vinci
"When fascism comes to America, it will not be in brown and black shirts. It will not be with jack-boots. It will be Nike sneakers and Smiley Face shirts waving the flag with a trademark printed in the corner." - George Carlin
"He speaks and his people sit up in attention. I want my people to do the same."
"The measure of a man is what he does with power." - Plato
"Know thyself." - Plato
"We are twice armed if we fight with faith." - Plato
"States will never be happy until rulers become philosophers or philosophers become rulers." - Plato
"Excess of liberty, whether it lies in state or individuals, seems only to pass into excess of slavery." - Plato, The Republic.
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift, which is why we call it the present." - Bil Keane
"Tell people there is an invisible man in the sky who created the universe, and the vast majority will believe you. Tell them the paint is wet, and they have to touch it to be sure." -Carlin
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"One must draw the distinction between competitive free enterprise, the most moral and productive system ever devised, and Cartel Capitalism dominated by industrial monopolists and international bankers." -Gary Allen
"To be brave among friends was nothing. To have the world against you and pick your path regardless - there is courage." -- Joe Abercrombie, Red Country
"Is this heaven?" "It's Iowa." -The Kinsellas in Field of Dreams
"The hardest walk is walking alone, but it"s also the walk that makes you the strongest."  Unknown
"It's nobler to never get paid, than to bank on shit and dismay" - Matt Morris
"Knowledge is not power, but the basis on which power is built off of." -Benito Mussolini
"Stop being afraid to say I don't know." -Anonymous
"I'll blow my dad before I eat a burrito with a fork." - Bo Burnham
"Sometimes you have to make the hardest climb to see the most beautiful sunrise." - Leslie Knope quoting an old lady's decorative pillow
"You get what everyone gets. You get a lifetime."  Neil Gaiman
"When fascism comes to America, it will be wrapped in the flag and carrying a cross." - Sinclair Lewis / Abraham Lincoln / Einstein
"Every day I admire more animals,because they behave better than human animals" (William Ventura)
"When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on." Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Get your facts first, then you can distort them as you please." - Mark Twain
"Your life is either defined by the system or by the way you defy the system" -Nomi, Sense8 (TV show)
"Forgiveness liberates the soul, it removes fear. That"s why it is such a powerful weapon."  Nelson Mandela
"The Edge ... there is no honest way to explain it because the only people who really know where it is are the ones who have gone over." - Hell's Angels, Hunter S. Thompson
"Everyone is trying to find the right person, nobody is trying to be the right person"
" Christopher Robin. "It means somebody's making honey." And the top of this: Isn't is funny how a bee that I know of is because you're a bee that I know of is making honey." And then he was out walking, he climbed and lived under why he door in gold letters, and, from " -Pooh
"Fuck work, fuck family, fuck girlfriends, fuck everything." -Rich Piana
"Logic will get you from A to B. Imagination will take you everywhere."  Albert Einstein
"The greatest gift you can give someone is your time, because when you give your time you are giving a portion of your life that you will never get back." - Rick Warren
"To be fully alive, fully human, and completely awake is to be continually thrown out of the nest." -Pema Chodron
"Never confuse a single defeat with a final defeat." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Forward. Best foot first just in case."
"If you love it, you'll teach yourself; if you don't love it, others teach you" - Yukitaka Yamaguchi
"Have you ever been in love? Horrible isn't it? It makes you so vulnerable. It opens your chest and it opens up your heart and it means that someone can get inside you and mess you up." - Neil Gaiman
"Life grows relative to one"s investment in it." - Marc Benioff
"You are free, and that is why you are lost." - Franz Kafka
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do. So throw off the bowlines. Sail away from the safe harbor. Catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore. Dream. Discover."
"Ten thousand women marched through the streets shouting, 'We will not be dictated to,' and went off and became stenographers." -G.K. Chesterton
"Absence is a house so vast that inside you will pass through its walls and hang pictures on the air." - Pablo Neruda, One Hundred Love Sonnets
"Some men just want to watch the world burn? Nah, nine times out of ten when someone tries to pull a joker it's because they've overreached already and their best hope is to make it seem like business as usual." - Tatrus
"Not all chemicals are bad. Without chemicals such as hydrogen and oxygen, for example, there would be no way to make water, a vital ingredient in beer." -- Dave Barry
"Nothing changes instantaneously: in a gradually heating bathtub you'd be boiled to death before you knew it." -Margaret Atwood: The Handmaid"s Tale
"... Man's foolishness has not changed, nor has his deafness improved. He hears, but he draws his own individual conclusion which he then follows accordingly, never putting into practice what he actually hears." - Osho; The True Name.
"One of the hardest thing any person has to do, is to grieve the loss of a person who is still alive" - Anonymous
"Change the focus from the richest to the brokest, I wrote this opus to reverse the hypnosis" -Lauryn Hill
"Before you react, think. Before you spend, earn. Before you criticize, wait. Before you quit, try." - Ernest Hemingway
"Life is 10% what happens to us and 90% how we react to it."-- Dennis P. Kimbro
"A happy person is not a person in a certain set of circumstances, but rather a person with a certain set of attitudes."  Hugh Downs
"It"s not what happens to people that is significant, but what they think happens to them." -- Anthony Powell ("Books Do Furnish A Room") (1971)
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones" - Albert Einstein, 1949
[on writing] "Even if you only do one page a day, in 365 days you get a bloody long novel." - Alan Sillitoe
"Judging people for the things they cannot control is the surest sign of a fool."
"He"s the head of a country. And I mean, he is the strong head, "Don"t let anyone think anything different. He speaks and his people sit up at attention. I want my people to do the same." " Trump said of Kim on "Fox &amp; Friends."
"You have to grow from the inside out. None can teach you, none can make you spiritual. There is no other teacher but your own soul."--Swami Vivekananda
"When health is absent, wisdom cannot reveal itself, art cannot manifest, strength cannot fight, wealth becomes useless, and intelligence cannot be applied."
"The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts."
"I figured something out. The future is unpredictable."
"I was betrayed by my brother, Michael! Who's your favorite family member and why?" - Gob Bluth
"Most people fall in love at some point in their lives, and find themselves settling to get married quite some time after." -Unknown
"Either you decide to stay in the shallow end of the pool or you go out in the ocean."  Christopher Reeve
"Why do people have to be this lonely? What's the point of it all? Millions of people in this world, all of them yearning, looking to others to satisfy them, yet isolating themselves. Why? Was the earth put here just to nourish human loneliness?" - Haruki Murakami.
"Whatever is possible is by definition natural" - Yuval Noah Harari, Sapiens.
"The first step towards getting somewhere is to decide you"re not going to stay where you are.  John Pierpont "J.P." Morgan
"Never be a spectator of unfairness or stupidity. Seek out argument and disputation for their own sake; the grave will supply plenty of time for silence."
"Don"t fear the unknown, seek it, for it may contain something more fantastic than you can possibly imagine." -me
"You can saturate your brain by imagining the infinite amount of things that can go wrong or you can just focus on the single thing you want to do." - An OCD Veteran
"I've been romanticicing heroin lately..." - Matty Healy, The 1975.
"I have this strange feeling that I'm not myself anymore. It's hard to put into words, but I guess it's like I was fast asleep, and someone came, disassembled me, and hurriedly put me back together again. That sort of feeling." - Haruki Murakami.
"The reason people find it so hard to be happy is that they always see the past better than it was, the present worse than it is, and the future less resolved than it will be."  Lao Tzu
She hadn"t chosen him over all the others. The truth was that she hadn"t even thought about anyone else." The solitude of prime numbers. Paolo Giordano
"Some people can't face the world. It doesn't mean they're weak. Just scared."
"There are only two races on this planet - the intelligent and the stupid."  John Fowles
"Leadership is an action, not a position" - Donald McGannon
"Leadership is an action, not a position" - Donald McGannon
"You are human, and human is good enough". - Bill Williams
"Redheads are like other women-- only more so." -Playboy Magazine
"If god doesn't like the way I live, Let him tell me, not you." - Unknown
"A man can no more diminish God"s glory by refusing to worship Him than a lunatic can put out the sun by scribbling "darkness" on the walls of his cell."  C. S. Lewis
"Strong hope is a much greater stimulant of life than any single realized joy could be."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Prayer is not asking. It is a longing of the soul. It is daily admission of one's weakness. It is better in prayer to have a heart without words than words without a heart."
"The world is violent and mercurial, it will have its way with you. We are saved only by love, love for each other and the love that we pour into the art we feel compelled to share. We live in a perpetually burning building, and what we must save from it, all the time, is love." -Tennessee Williams
"Sometimes when I look at you, I feel I"m gazing at a distant star. It"s dazzling, but the light is from tens of thousands of years ago. Maybe the star doesn"t even exist any more. Yet sometimes that light seems more real to me than anything." - Haruki Murakami.
"Strength is the capacity to break a Hershey bar into four pieces with your bare hands - and then eat just one of the pieces."
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant." Robert Louis Stevenson
"I am never bored; to be bored is an insult to one"s self." - Jules Renard
"There are those who wish to have, and those who have. That is all."
" I want personality not trivial" what"s the meaning to this?
"Man only truly values what he pays for" - Unknown
"Say not, 'I have found the truth', but rather, 'I have found a truth.'" - Kahlil Gibran
"Thousands of candles can be lit from a single candle, and the life of the candle will not be shortened. Happiness never decreases by being shared." -Buddha
"You can't wake a person who is pretending to be asleep" - Navajo Proverb
"You were never created to live depressed, defeated, guilty, condemned, ashamed or unworthy. We were created to be victorious." - Joel Osteen
"Blessed is the influence of one true, loving human soul on another." - George Eliot
"That is not dead which can eternal lie. And with strange aeons even death may die" - H. P. Lovecraft
"I don't trust people who don't love themselves and tell me, 'I love you.' ... There is an African saying which is: Be careful when a naked person offers you a shirt." Maya Angelou.
"Having a soft heart in a cruel world is courage, not weakness." - Katherine Henson
"Don't chase people. Be yourself, do your own thing and work hard. The right people - the ones who really belong in your life - will come to your. And stay." - Will Smith
"Grown-ups don't look like grown-ups on the inside either. Outside, they're big and thoughtless and they always know what they're doing. Inside, they look just like they always have." Neil Gaiman
"I have your disease in me now . . . he put his disease in me!" -- Dorothy in David Lynch's, Blue Velvet.
"The thing about quotes on the Internet is you can't confirm their validity" - Abraham Lincoln
"Some are born great, some achieve greatness, and some have greatness thrust upon them."  Shakespeare
"Without labor nothing prospers."  Sophocles
"Lord, we know what we are, but know not what we may be." - William Shakespeare
"There are four boxes to be used in the defense of liberty: soap, ballot, jury and ammo. Please use in that order." - Larry McDonald
"The hardest arithmetic to master is that which enables us to count our blessings." - Eric Hoffer
"Books are not only the arbitrary sum of our dreams, and our memory. They also give us the model of self-transcendence; a way of being fully human." - Susan Sontag
"You have learnt something. That always feels at first as if you had lost something." - George Bernard Shaw
"Thou call'dst me dog before thou hadst a cause; But, since I am a dog, beware my fangs." -- Shylock, The Merchant of Venice
"Mercy and cowardice are the same." -- Joe Abercombie, Best Served Cold
"If everybody minded their own business, the world would go around a great deal faster than it does."
"Romance is the glamour which turns the dust of everyday life into a golden haze. "
"We never love a person, but only qualities." Blaise Pascal
"Keep On Going And The Chances Are You Will Stumble On Something, Perhaps When You Are Least Expecting It. I Have Never Heard Of Anyone Stumbling On Something Sitting Down."  Charles F. Kettering
"People may hear your words, but they feel your attitude" Joh c Maxwell
"Maybe this world is another planet's hell" - Aldous Huxley
"The most precious jewels are not made of stone, but of flesh." - Robert Ludlum
"You can put your boots in the oven but that doesn"t make them biscuits"
"There is a cult of ignorance in the United States, and there has always been. The strain of anti-intellectualism has been a constant thread...nurtured by the false notion that democracy means that 'my ignorance is just as good as your knowledge."" - Isaac Asimov
"When I worked at a record store, we had to put security cases on all the Rap CDs, and exclusively the Rap CDs." - from a YouTube comment.
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." Eleanor Roosevelt
"I learn so much about myself and realize that I simply need to "focus the camera" a little more to catch a better glimpse of what I"m ACTUALLY aiming for."
"The single mother is immunized against all dangers:..."
"I would challenge you to a battle of wits, but I see that you are unarmed" - William Shakespeare
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow men. True nobility lies in being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"Do you know what they call alternative medicine that's been proved to work? Medicine." - Tim Minchin, Storm
"The subordination of reason to technical problems, will ultimately mean man making himself over in the image of the machine."
"One of the greatest human failings is to prefer to be right rather than effective." - Stephen Fry
"One of the greatest human failings is to prefer to be right rather than effective." - Stephen Fry
"Normality is a paved road: It"s comfortable to walk, but no flowers grow on it." - Vincent van Gogh
"Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars." - Kahlil Gibran
"Dean's California  wild, sweaty, important, the land of lonely and exiled and eccentric lovers come to forgather like birds, and the land where everybody somehow looked like broken-down, handsome, decadent movie actors." - Jack Kerouac (On the Road, 1957)
"Your task is not to seek for love, but merely to seek and find all the barriers within yourself that you have built against it."Rumi
"We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light." Plato
"We fall in love not just with a person wholly external to us but with a fantasy of how that person can fill what is missing from our interior lives." -Maria Popova
"The chains of habit are too weak to be felt until they are too strong to be broken."  Samuel Johnson
"By failing to prepare, you are preparing to fail."
"Cowards die many times before their deaths; the valiant never taste of death but once." - Shakespeare's "Julius Caesar"
"If There Is No Enemy Within, The Enemy Outside Can Do You No Harm. African Proverb.
"Start copying what you love. Copy copy copy copy. At the end of the copy you will find yourself." - Yohji Yamamoto
"Start copying what you love. Copy copy copy copy. At the end of the copy you will find yourself." - Yohji Yamamoto
"The good get nothing extra. When they die they turn to shit like the rest of us. You have to keep your eyes ahead, always ahead, fight one battle at a time. You can't hesitate, no matter the cost..." -- Joe Abercombie, Best Served Cold
"One"s destination is never a place, but rather a new way of looking at things." - Henry Miller
"The woman who follows the crowd will usually go no further than the crowd. The woman who walks alone is likely to find herself in places no one has been before." Albert Einstein
"There are only two places in the world where we can live happy: at home and in Paris" - Ernest Hemingway
7 quotes about technology and why we must control it
"The world gives to the givers and takes from the takers."  Joe Polish
"Everyone thinks of changing the world, but no one thinks of changing himself." - Leo Tolstoy
'"Keep, ancient lands, your storied pomp!" cries she With silent lips. "Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free...'-The New Colossus, Statue of Liberty
"Sometimes I write drunk and revise sober," he had said, "and sometimes I write sober and revise drunk. But you have to have both elements in creation  the Apollonian and the Dionysian, or spontaneity and restraint, emotion and discipline." -Peter De Vries
"Value the people even if they lost their value,because you'll learn to value more yourself,and those people around you" (William Ventura)
"I wish there was a way to know you were in the good old days before you actually left them." -Ed Helms/Andy Bernard
"I wish there was a way to know you were in the good old days before you actually left them."
"Eat shit, millions of flies can't be wrong." Waldemar Lysiak
21 thought-provoking quotes about friendship
"We have inherited a messy world.. a very messy world. We didn't create the mess we found ourselves in but we've been born into it." -Dr. Melanie Joy
"If you want to make good use of your time, you've got to know what's most important and then give it all you've got." Lee Iacocca
"Only he who accepts clashes and conflicts in life, loves life."  Pandurang Shastri Athavale
"Only he who accepts clashes and conflicts in life, loves life."  Pandurang Shastri Athavale
"Age appears to be best in four things; old wood best to burn, old wine to drink, old friends to trust, and old authors to read." - Francis Bacon
"Women are Equal and Better." - Dennis Wilmeth
"If you want something different, you have to stop accepting what you"re used to" - Samantha King
"A problem cannot be solved with the same kind of thinking that created it" - Albert Einstein
"I've never seen any life transformation that didn't begin with the person in question finally getting sick of their own bullshit." - Elizabeth Gilbert
"In the midst of chaos, there is also opportunity." - Sun Tzu
"In the land of the blind, the one eye man is king" - Desiderius Erasmus
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time." - Mark Twain
"I speak to everyone in the same way, whether he is the garbage man or the president of the university." -Albert Einstein.
"It is always your next move." -Napoleon Hill
"The great pleasure and feeling in my right brain is more than my left brain can find the words to tell you" -Roger Sperry
"You can't go around building a better world for people. Only people can build a better world for people. Otherwise it's just a cage." Terry Pratchett, Witches Abroad
"I've learned two life lessons today. I can't remember the first one, but the second one is that I need to write everything down."- Unknown
"If I could say it in words, there would be no reason to paint." -Edward Hopper
"'be mindful in due time of my pain'. Then dived he back into that fire which refines them." - Dante Alighieri
"Why can't you get what you want or why don't you want what you can get?" -anonymous
"You May have mass and take up space, but you definitely don"t matter" -Nic Studer
"Don't think. Thinking is the enemy of creativity. It's self-conscious, and anything self-conscious is lousy. You can't try to do things. You simply must do things."  Ray Bradbury
"The secret of life is honesty and fair dealing. If you can fake that, you've got it made."  Groucho Marx
"My way of joking is to tell the truth. It's the funniest joke in the world." -George Bernard Shaw
"Equality is about giving everyone an equal chance, not an equal result" -Unknown
"The backbone of surprise is fusing speed with secrecy." - Carl von Clausewitz
"Looney Tunes is the best tool I know for positively identifying sociopaths." - Martindau Egglebert
"Nate, Higgers". - Bill Cosby 1976
"You're under no obligation to be the same person you were 5 minutes ago" - Alan Watts
"If you don't have the time to read, you don't have the time (or the tools) to write. Simple as that." -- Stephen King
"When the rich wage war, it's the poor who die"- Jean-Paul Sartre
"There is only one success - to be able to spend your life in your own way." - Christopher Morley
"Teamwork is the ability to work together toward a common vision. The ability to direct individual accomplishments toward organizational objectives. It is the fuel that allows common people to attain uncommon results." -Andrew Carnegie
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"He Lost Me at Hello" - 2D
"if it"s inaccessible to the poor it"s neither radical nor revolutionary" - Jonathan Herrera
"You can avoid reality, but you cannot avoid the consequences of avoiding reality."  Ayn Rand
"In order to understand the essential truth of things, I think you can find it in The Onion and occasionally on Reddit." - Elon Musk
15 Quotes by Lao Tzu
" Courage is what it takes to stand up and speak; Courage is also what it takes to sit down &amp; listen" - Winston Churchill
"Change everything just a little so as to keep everything exactly the same." -- the Prince (from Giuseppe Tomasi di Lampedusa's"The Leopard.")
"Hurry up and bring on your electric chair I want to leave here and take a nose-dive into the next world just to see if that one is as lousy as is this ball of mud and meanness. I am sorry for only two things..." [cont.]
"If you aren"t in over your head, how do you know how tall you are?"  T.S. Eliot
"Living at risk is jumping off the cliff and building your wings on the way down."  Ray Bradbury
"I"ve had a perfectly wonderful evening. But this wasn"t it."  Groucho Marx
"Depression is like Turning on the lights but the fuse has gone" -Me
"Whilst you were looking on the bright side you left me in the dark." -Me
"Digital design is like painting, except the paint never dries." - Neville Brody
"..To every man upon this Earth death cometh soon or late, and how can man die better than facing fearful odds.." - Thomas Babington Macaulay; Lays of Ancient Rome.
"It"s like watching your four year old in a preschool play. You give him a bath. You dress them up in their costume....
"the life's greatest sorrow isn't death,in the convenient, it's our destiny, the life's greatest sorrow is that your heart dies while you are still alive"-al sharawy
"I hated every minute of training, but I said, 'Don't quit. Suffer now and live the rest of your life as a champion" Muhammed Ali
- "I'm a dog chasing cars. I wouldn't know what to do with one if I caught it!" - Joker in the Dark Knight(2008)
"The truth is like poetry. And most people fucking hate poetry."
"Everyone has a past but not everyone can get past it." -- Max Sorgan
"The first step towards success is to believe in yourself that you can." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"[Quakers] talk about that light in every human. And I think we always need to remember, no matter how strange people are, that there is something in us that makes us strikingly unique..." -Dave Matthews
"In the end, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"You're one of those treasure that can be found in the sea of life,and not just only to fall in love with it,but also with the nature that hid the treasure" (William Ventura)
"Nothing is so firmly believed as that which we least know." - Michel De Montaigne
"Life is not lost when we die,it's lost when we don't find the way to make other people life fully loved" (William Ventura)
"A man who claims to know what is good for others is dangerous."  Nisargadatta Maharaj
"There's people who think they can change the world, but all that really happens is the world ends up changing them."
"Directly after copulation, the devil's laughter is heard." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Romance is the glamour which turns the dust of everyday life into a golden haze. "
"In new situations, all the trickiest rules are the ones nobody bothers to explain to you. (And the ones you can't Google.)"
"If you're more fortunate than others, Build a longer table. Not a taller fence" - Anonymous
"Never do yesterday what should be done tomorrow, if at last you do succeed never try again." - From movie Predestination
"If you can"t afford health insurance that"s just natural selection" - Tall Frenchie 5/16/18
"Better to be in familiar contempt of your enemy than the one you love." - Voltairine de Cleyre
"Treason against the United States, shall consist..." -Arricle 3, US Constitution
"It's always good to act crazy first. Because later you can appear normal." -- Bill Murray quoting Hunter S. Thompson.
"Education is the passport to the future, for tomorrow belongs to those who prepare for it today." - Malcolm X
"Everyone you meet is fighting a battle you know nothing about. Be kind. Always."
"If the freedom of speech is taken away then dumb and silent we may be led, like sheep to the slaughter." George Washington
"I understand there"s a guy inside me who wants to lay in bed, smoke weed all day and watch cartoons and old movies. My whole life is a series of stratagems to avoid, and outwit that guy." -Anthony Bourdain
"Toilet paper is a lot like life in general, the closer you get to the end the faster it seems to go"
"Too often we underestimate the power of a touch, a smile, a kind word, a listening ear, an honest compliment, or the smallest act of caring, all of which have the potential to turn a life around." - Leo Buscaglia
"Even the most primitive of societies have an innate respect for the insane."  The Motorcycle Boy in Francis Coppola"s Rumble Fish.
"If I'm an advocate for anything, it's to move. As far as you can, as much as you can. Across the ocean, or simple across the river. Walk in someone else's shoes or at least eat their food." Anthony Bourdain
"I wish I had worked harder in my life and spent less time with my family" said on their deathbed NO-ONE EVER
"If I'm an advocate for anything, it's to move. As far as you can, as much as you can. Across the ocean, or simple across the river. Walk in someone else's shoes or at least eat their food." Anthony Bourdain
"...if the opposition wants to make itself felt politically, it ought to be acting so as to provoke intolerance" - Mary McCarthy
"People ask me to predict the Future, when all I want to do is prevent it." - Ray Bradbury
"I understand there's a guy inside me who wants to lay in bed, smoke weed all day, and watch cartoons and old movies. My whole life is a series of stratagems to avoid, and outwit, that guy." - Anthony Bourdain
"Politics is a science. You can demonstrate that you are right and that others are wrong." Jean Paul Sartre
"If you sit down with people and just say, 'Hey what makes you happy? What do you like to eat?' They'll tell you extraordinary things, many of which have nothing to do with food" - Anthony Bourdain
"Whether or not we've reached it, there's a limit to the number of potentialities -- existence plateaus whether or not we bind ourselves with standards. Ergo, success is a construct and ambition is a race to be first to a greasy layer stagnating at surface level." - Jarls Bookowski
"Whether or not we've reached it, there's a limit to the number of potentialities -- existence plateaus whether or not we bind ourselves with standards, ergo success is a construct and ambition is race to be first to a greasy layer stagnating at surface level." - Jarls Bookowski
"If I'm an advocate for anything, it's to move. As far as you can, as much as you can. Across the ocean, or simply across the river. The extent to which you can walk in someone else's shoes or at least eat their food, it's a plus for everybody." - Anthony Bourdain
"Now, I"m not so sure. Maybe the world"s not like that at all. Maybe in the real world--the one without cameras and happy food and travel shows--everybody, the good and the bad together, are all crushed under some terrible wheel." - Anthony Bourdain (full quote below)
"Maybe that"s enlightenment enough: to know that there is no final resting place of the mind; no moment of smug clarity. Perhaps wisdom...is realizing how small I am, and unwise, and how far I have yet to go." - Anthony Bourdain
"Whatever you are, be a good one." - Abraham Lincoln
"Never underestimate the ability of a successful state to make the mass believe in just about anything." - 280394433708491
"We can learn about our future from our past because, regardless of technology or the speed of innovation, people are still people." (-Simon Sinek)
"Death is just another path" - Gandalf
"Friday afternoon in the universe...." Jack Kerouac
"The power of imagination makes us infinite." - John Muir
"You get a little moody sometimes but I think that's because you like to read. People that like to read are always a little fucked up."
"There is some good in this world, and it's worth fighting for."
"Everything begins with a thought and action transforms your thoughts into reality." - Zaffar Iqubal Khan
"To keep the body in good health is a duty, otherwise we shall not be able to keep our mind strong and clear."  Buddha
"Be kind, for everyone you meet is fighting a hard battle." - Ian Maclaren
"Tell us a gross story," She says, "Rip yourself open. Sew yourself shut," - Chuck Palahniuk
"We call Luck and Randomness to the causality we don't understand/control/know, but remember there must be one"
"There isn't a way things should be. There's just what happens, and what we do." Terry Pratchett, A Hat Full of Sky
"Death Sucks" - Tim O'Brien
"'Guns don't kill people. People kill people.' 'But guns make it so much easier. . . ''". Jonathan L. Howard
"The Best Way Is to Stay Happy that Where You don't find place for You Take yourself out there quietly"
"I hate white babies." -some woman at Walmart to her friend as they walked in front of me, carrying my granddaughter.
"My mission in life is not merely to survive, but to thrive; and to do so with some passion, some compassion, some humor, and some style." -Maya Angelou
"You are well within your rights to stand up, interrupt everyone around you and say "This is not who I am. This is not what I want. I"m sorry but you"ve mistaken me for somebody else."" - Iain Thomas, I Wrote This For You
"In the moment when I truly understand my enemy, understand him well enough to defeat him, then in that very moment I also love him." - Ender Wiggin
"Whenever you"re in conflict with someone, there is one factor that can make the difference between damaging your relationship and deepening it. That factor is attitude."  William James
"The best way to find yourself is to lose yourself in the service of others." - Mahatma Gandhi
"It only takes one person to change your life - You." - Ruth Casey
"It only takes one person to change your life. You." - Ruth Casey
"If you view life as mere survival, it will be empty. If you view life as mere pleasure, it will be empty. If you view life as merely achieving goals, you will have the illusion of success. What will give you the inner peace you"re looking for?..." - Dan Pedersen (American Author)
"Oh, I got dirt on my name, I got white on my beard I had debt on my books, it's been a shaky-ass year Let me make this clear, so all y'all see I don't take advice from people less successful than me" - Kanye West
"Memento mori" (remember that you have to die) - Latin Christian theory and practice of reflection on mortality
"Some people feel the rain, others just get wet." - Bob Marley
"To do something that you feel in your heart that's great, you need to make a lot of mistakes. Anything that's successful is a series of mistakes." - Billie Joe Armstrong
51 Best quotes that will motivate you to be the better version of yourself
"Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry, and narrow-mindedness, and many of our people need it sorely on these accounts. Broad, wholesome, charitable views of men and things cannot be acquired by vegetating in one little corner of the earth all one's lifetime."  Mark Twain
"As soon as I saw you, I knew an adventure was about to happen." - Winnie the Pooh
"A good morning f*ck never hurt anyone."
"True friendship can exist only between equals." - Plato
"The first and best victory is to conquer self." - Plato
"Those who are able to see beyond the shadows and lies of their culture will never be understood, let alone believed, by the masses." - Plato
"Smile, because it confuses people. Smile, because it's easier than explaining what is killing you inside." - The Joker - Heath Ledger
#ElderWisdom Quote
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"If you do not change direction, you may end up where you are heading."  Lao Tzu
"Forgive me if I tend to romanticize the past. It wasn"t always as stormy and rainswept as this. But I remember it that way because that was it at its most beautiful." - Woody Allen
"Arguments. It can either make the relationshio grows fonder or colder." - Relationsheep Tinker
"Imagination is the beginning of creation. You imagine what you desire, you will what you imagine, and at last, you create what you will"  George Bernard Shaw
"Peace begins with a smile.."
"The idea that I would have a wife or a child -- even a mother -- seems a surprise." -- Hunter S. Thompson
"Train people well enough so they can leave, treat them well enough so they don't want to." - Richard Branson
"A touch of love, everyone becomes a poet."  Plato
'Can you remember who you were, before the world told you who you should be?'-K.W.
"What does it matter who is speaking" - Beckett
"It's not about how hard you can hit; it's about how hard you can get hit and keep moving forward." Rocky Balboa, Rocky
"I wonder if we are made from the same fallen star" - Myself
"In the end, just three things matter: How well we have lived How well we have loved How well we have learned to let go." ? Jack Kornfield
"Continuous effort - not strength or intelligence - is the key to unlocking our potential." - Sir Winston Churchill
"Love suffers long and is kind" (Bible)
"We all have weakness that can dangerously make others strong" (William Ventura)
"Stress is an ignorant state. It believes that everything is an emergency. Nothing is that important." - Natalie Goldberg
"The time has come. . . the time is now for Grace to shine through the depths of their despair." -Grace Eloise
"What we observe is not nature itself, but nature exposed to our method of questioning." - Werner Heisenberg
"Those who cannot learn from their past are condemned to accept their future without the possibility of imagining it," Eduardo Galeano
"My life has not been the best,but among the worst,is the best I've ever known" (William Ventura)
"Once a philosopher, twice a pervert" - Nobody?
"Time waits for no man, and death waits with cold hands. I'm the youngest old man that you know, if your soul's intact, let me know." Earl Sweatshirt
"Patriotism is the last refuge of a scoundrel." - Samuel Johnson
"You are the books you read, the films you watch, the music you listen to, the people you meet, the dreams you have, and the conversations you engage in. You are what you take from these. You are the sound of the ocean, breath of the fresh air..." -Jac Vanek
"Life"s a blur. Loves the cure." -Grace Eloise
"If you can't intelligently argue for both sides of an issue, you don't understand the issue well enough to argue for either." --/u/GBlink's Dad
"Leadership is solving problems. The day soldiers stop bringing you their problems is the day you have stopped leading them. They have either lost confidence that you can help or concluded you do not care. Either case is a failure of leadership." Colin Powell
"When you're happy you enjoy the music. When you're sad you understand the lyrics." - Frank Ocean.
"Tupac was one of the biggest thugs I know and he always wore his seat belt" Ice Cube
"You know, it's funny; when you look at someone through rose-coloured glasses, all the red flags just look like flags." - Wanda the Owl, BoJack Horseman
"You know, it's funny; when you look at someone through rose-coloured glasses, all the red flags just look like flags." - Wanda the Owl, BoJack Horseman
"Sometimes it's like someone took a knife, baby, edgy and dull, and cut a six-inch valley through the middle of my skull. At night I wake up with the sheets soaking wet and a freight train running through the middle of my head, and only you can cool my desire. I'm on fire." - Bruce Springsteen
"One of my biggest mistakes in life is thinking people will show me the same love I've shown them" --- Heath Ledger
"An eye for an eye will only make the whole world blind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The selfies you delete are the real you" - Anonymous
"Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new."
"If you can"t intelligently argue for both sides of an issue, you don"t understand the issue well enough to argue for either."  Reddit user
"If you live for people's acceptance, you will die from their rejection" - Lecrae
"If you want to go fast, go alone. If you want to go far, go together." African proverb
[help] "her legs reach all the way to the ground/floor" - What's this from?
"You will have to do without pocket handkerchiefs, and a great many other things, before we reach our journey's end, Bilbo Baggins. You were born to the rolling hills and little rivers of the Shire, but home is now behind you. The world is ahead"
"Pick up a bee from kindness, and learn the limitations of kindness." Sufi Proverb
"Unless it's mad, passionate, extraordinary love, it's a waste of your time. There are too many mediocre things in life--love shouldn't be one of them."
"He stepped down, trying not to look long at her, as if she were the sun, yet he saw her, like the sun, even without looking." Leo Tolsky
"The only source of knowledge is experience." Albert Einstein
"When you are around happy, inspirational people that are successful, it makes you feel better. And if you act on that inspiration, your life will be more fulfilled. It's not just inspirational in terms of financial success, but in terms of doing difficult things." - Joe Rogan
"when everything goes wrong your life gonna be more interesting and fun if accept the challenge that you face." - Anis Zertal
"So many pills and so little time to take them". 1960's meme, not sure who said it.
"Speak the way you want to be spoken to" -unknown
"Every word is like an unnecessary stain on silence and nothingness" - Samuel Beckett
"You know what his delicacy is?" Guy asks me, mischievously. "Hot, steamy, fresh dog shit. It is the foie gras of the turtle."
" Free your spirit Free your mind God is always right on time"
"The mirror is my best friend because when I cry it never laughs."  Charlie Chaplin
"When God means to punish a man, he sends him stupid friends, and clever enemies." -- Joe Abercombie, Best Served Cold
"Anti-intellectualism has been a constant thread winding its way through our political and cultural life, nurtured by the false notion that democracy means that 'my ignorance is just as good as your knowledge.'" - Isaac Asimov
'The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion.' Albert Camus
"If you are someone who still carries hope in your heart, kindness in your eyes and generosity in your fingertips despite terrible people happening to you, thank you. You are one of the few truly pure things left in this world, and you deserve to be protected" Nikita gill
"If we all worked on the assumption that what is accepted as true is really true, there would be little hope of advance." -Wright Brothers
"Following through leads to conviction. Conviction leads to strength and strength leads to grace" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Science is difficult. Business is complicated. Accountability is not. You've either done the right thing or you've done the wrong thing. It's that simple." -Hank McKinnell
"There are nights when the wolves are silent and only the moon howls. " - George Carlin
"It is the perversion of the very law you preach that started this mess!" - Varis Goltorah
"Don't let anyone treat you like free salsa. You are guac. GUAC." -Unknown
"Our knowledge is a little island in a great ocean of nonknowledge." - Isaac Bashevis Singer
"There ain't no devil, only God when he's drunk." -- Tom Waits
"This is about all the bad days in the world . . .
"When one is in love, one always begins by deceiving one's self, and one always ends by deceiving others. That is what the world calls a romance." - Oscar Wilde
"I"m not teaching you anything; I"m trying to persuade you to do something. What we do is much akin to psychoanalysis than you might be aware of" - Wittgenstein, 1938
"It is not enough to have a good mind; the main thing is to use it well." - Ren Descartes
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything."
"Every forger calls their victim twice. Because every forger will tell you: a victim will tell me everything I need to know." - Frank Abagnale ("Catch Me if You Can")
"Any technology pushed to it's limit produces the opposite of its intended function" - Rudolf P Belmar
"I think the best evenings are when we have messages, things that make us think, but we can also laugh and enjoy each other's company."- Jane Goodall
"You can have anything you want  you just can"t have everything you want" Anonymous
"It's OK to not be OK, as long as you don't stay that way." Anonymous
"There are far more variables in the Universe than your Inner Voice" - Gods of Chaos
"One who chases after two hares won"t catch even one."  Japanese Proverb
"There is nothing more beautiful than a person who is fully themselves." - Unknown
"Be careful seeking justice in a land where the criminals make all the rules"
"Stop chasing the wrong one. The right one won't run." - Hemingway
"As
"I think I would rather be a man than a God. We don't need anyone to believe in us. We just keep going anyhow. It's what we do." -Neil Gaiman, American Gods
science fiction's always been the kind of first level alert to think about things to come. It's easier for an audience to take warnings from sci-fi without feeling that we're preaching to them. Every science fiction movie I"ve ever seen warns us about things that ultimately come true --Spielberg
"I have a lot of respect for human instincts when it comes to managing our affairs in small groups. I don't have a lot of respect for our instincts in terms of scaling up to manage large scale social policy decisions in nation states." - Geoffrey Miller, Evolutionary Psychologist
"There is nothing that dictates behavior more than what we want others to think of us. When that happens, we become a reflection in our own mind of what we believe is reflected in the mind of another, neither of which has the slightest chance of being correct." - Dee Hock, Founder of Visa
"Contrariwise, if it was so, it might be; and if it were so, it would be; but as it isn"t, it ain't. That's logic." - Lewis Carroll
"The journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step" - Lao Tzu
"We cannot tell the precise moment when friendship is formed. As filling a vessel drop by drop, there is at last a drop which makes it run over; so in a series of kindness there is at last one which makes the heart run over."
"the true and only meaning of life and our futile existence as human is to inspire or be inspired" (anonymous 1700s)
"Sometimes you wake up. Sometimes the fall kills you. And sometimes, when you fall, you fly." - Neil Gaiman
"While we are postponing, life speeds by." - Seneca
"Don't limit your challenges - challenge your limits." -unknown
"If one is to be called a liar, one may as well make an effort to deserve the name."  A. A. Milne
"Wrong is wrong even if everyone is doing it, Right is right even if no-one is doing it" - Anonymous
"Formal education will make you a living; self education will make you a fortune."  Jim Rohn
"Life doesn't require that we be the best, only that we try our best"- H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"Snowflakes are one of nature's most fragile things, but just look at what they can do when they stick together."  Vesta Kelly
"You can't expect to hit the jackpot if you don't put a few nickels in the machine." - Flip Wilson
"I did not attend his funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying I approved of it." -Mark Twain
"The belief in a supernatural source of evil is not necessary; men alone are quite capable of every wickedness." -- Joseph Conrad
"I did not attend his funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying I approved of it." - Mark Twain
"The reason dies before the rite."
"Wit is educated insolence."  Aristotle, The Art of Rhetoric
"Don"t ever let them pull you down so low as to hate them." - Booker T. Washington
''I'm straighter than you mom's dancing pole'', -Random Indian dude
"The first and greatest victory is to conquer oneself; to be conquered by self is of all things most shameful and vile." - Plato
"I can be changed by what happens to me but I refuse to be reduced by it." Maya Angelou
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education." Mark Twain
"It takes courage to grow up and become who you really are."
"When I was a boy, my uncle accidentally shot an arrow into the corner of my eye. But I still can't see my way to forgiving him." - T.E. Mansfield
"This feeling has possessed me, I think, from that day... that day when the stars came falling. It was almost as if... as if it was a scene from a dream. Nothing more, nothing less... than a beautiful view." - Kimi no na wa
"The people who cast the votes decide nothing. The people who count the votes decide everything." - Internet Joseph Stalin
"Our Gross National Product, now, is over $800 billion dollars a year, but that Gross National Product - if we judge the United States of America by that..." -Robert F. Kennedy
"Life is short, art is long." - Hippocrates
"It is more important to know what sort of person has a disease than to know what sort of disease a person has." - Hippocrates
"Your body is not a temple, it's an amusement park. Enjoy the ride."  Anthony Bourdain
"How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives." -Annie Dillard
"My mother used to tell me man gives the award, God gives the reward. I don't need another plaque." - Denzel Washington
"Whatever I was, whatever I wasn"t  it"s all in what I am. Whatever I wanted, whatever I didn"t want  all of this has shaped me. Whatever I loved, or stopped loving  in me it"s the same nostalgia." Fernando Pessoa
"There comes a time when silence is betrayal" - Martin Luther King Jr.
"it is not the consciousness of men that determines their existence, but their social existence that determines their consciousness." -Karl Marx
"The nine most terrifying words in the English language are: I"m from the government and I"m here to help." - Ronald Reagan
"If you can laugh in the face of adversity, you're bullet proof" - Ricky Gervais
"True love, Miss Swanthe only magic strong enough to transcend realms and break any curse." - Mr. Gold/Rumpelstiltskin - from the television series "Once Upon A Time."
"True love, Miss Swanthe only magic strong enough to transcend realms and break any curse." - Mr. Gold/Rumpelstiltskin, *from the television series Once Upon A Time*.
"True love, Miss Swanthe only magic strong enough to transcend realms and break any curse." - Mr. Gold/Rumpelstiltskin (from the television series "Once Upon A Time).
"To have a good enemy, choose a friend: he knows where to strike." -- Diane de Poitiers
"That which does not kill us makes us stronger." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Do you hate people?" - "I don't hate them. I just seem to feel better when they're not around." -- Charles (Hank) Bukowski.
"A long time ago I learned not to explain things to people. It misleads them into thinking they"re entitled to know everything I do."
 The Best Motto in Life  Top 5 I picked! 
"We should never negotiate out of fear, but we should never fear to negotiate."  John F. Kennedy
"Intellectuals solve problems, geniuses prevent them." - Albert Einstein
[DEV] Looking for positive quotes. Download this FREE App "Thought of the day" and share your feedback
"When a father gives to his son, both laugh; when a son gives to his father, both cry." - Yiddish Proverb
"She generally gave herself very good advice, (though she very seldom followed it)." -Alice in Wonderland.
"Courage isn"t having the strength to go on  it is going on when you don"t have strength." - Napoleon
"Do what you love and don't ever wonder what it could" -Sir Robert Bryson Hall II
"Keep smiling. If asked what you are smiling at, keep moving." -- J. P. Donleavey, "Upon Being of a Colour in an Area Where Such Colour is Not Highly Esteemed."
"You never really find the pieces you leave behind with the people you loved. They call to you from afar, in both your dreams and while your awake."
"Just because you"re different, it doesn"t mean you"re unique." - Levithan, David. "Every Day."
"It is not the consciousness of men that determines their existence, but their social existence that determines their consciousness." -Karl Mark
"Never leave that till tomorrow which you can do today." -Benjamin Franklin
"Each of us has been put on earth with the ability to do something well. We cheat ourselves and the world if we don"t use that ability as best we can." - George Allen
"The Way Get Started Is To Quit Talking And Begin Doing."  Walt Disney
"It isn't all about me?! Why, of course it's about me! If it wasn't about me, then how would I know what isn't about me is about??" - Lewis Carrott
"It isn't all about me?! Why, of course it's about me. If it wasn't about me, then how would I know what isn't about me is about??" - Lewis Carrott
"I know God. God is a can of gas and a book of matches. With those two things you can create and destroy. Save or take life. People have always had to suffer before they received God's mercy. You can pray for them, but sometimes the best way to help is to get all of their suffering out of the way."
"To act, this is true intelligence. I'll be whatever I want. But I have to want whatever. Success is to be successful and not on having conditions to be successful. Palace conditions any broad land has, but where is the palace if they don"t build it there?" - Fernando Pessoa
"Be better tomorrow" - LeBron James
"Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, loving someone deeply gives you courage." - Lao Tzu
"Deep sleep is the closest you are to your true nature devoid of all the nonsense that is not you."
"Character may almost be called the most effective means of persuasion."  Aristotle
"Why should you continue going after your dreams? Because seeing the look on the faces of the people who said you couldn"t will be priceless."  Kevin Ngo
"We should beware of the demagogues who are willing to declare a trade war against our friends, weakening our economy, our national security, and the entire free world, all while cynically waving the American flag." -Ronald Reagan
"You don't love someone because they're perfect, you love them in spite of the fact that they're not."
"The media"s the most powerful entity on earth. They have the power to make the innocent guilty and to make the guilty innocent, and that"s power. They control the minds of the masses." Malcolm X
"The day you give up on your dreams is the day you die."
"We should forgive our enemies, but not before they are hanged." -- Heinrich Heine
"Life is like a garden, small moments can be had, but not preserved, except in memory."
[Text] Maintain your inner core
"He who refuses to rule is liable to be ruled by one who is worse than himself." - Plato
"I am trying to think, don't confuse me with facts." - Plato
"The victim who is able to articulate the situation of the victim has ceased to be a victim: he or she has become a threat." - JAMES BALDWIN
"Now is better than Never" - Tim Peters
"I was sitting outside on my deck and I thought I heard a helicopter, I looked over and there was a hummingbird" -My Grandma
"To me, it doesn"t matter who you are, if you"ve got it, you"ve got it!" -Simon Cowell, America"s Got Talent
"Everything in excess is opposed by nature." - Hippocrates
"The greatest medicine of all is teaching people how not to need it." - Hippocrates
"Don"t leave this world without giving it your all." - Tupac Shakur
"Content precedes design. Design in the absence of content is not design, it"s decoration." - Jeffrey Zeldman
"I don't understand why when we destroy something created by man we call it vandalism, but when we destroy something created by nature, we call it progress." -Ed Begley Jr.
"Ummmm, like, people who like, do illegal things, should definitely like, uhmm go to jail" -Kim Kardashian (2018)
"we knew that Iraq had nothing because the man in charge with the international agenda for chemical weapons was a Brazilian ambassador called Bustani" - Luiz Incio Lula da Silva - Brazil - 2018
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift of God, which is why we call it the present." - Bil Keane
"Ive decided to dress as obi wan for haloween so when i rockclimb i can tell everyone i have the high ground" -Me
"The defeated are not totally dominated if they kept the tragic memory of their struggle." - Juan Goytisolo. El Pais, (14.04.2002)
"Human behavior stems from three main sources: desire, emotion, and knowledge." - Plato
"If you don't use your eggs they scramble" - Candace Owens
"It is the mark of an educated mind to entertain an idea without accepting it." - Aristotle
"I plan to eat with the people I starved with." -Logic
"From the deepest desires often come the deadliest hate."  Socrates
"My parents taught me honesty, truth, compassion, kindness and how to care for people. Also, they encouraged me to take risks, to boldly go. They taught me that the greatest danger in life is not taking the adventure" . Brian Blessed
"This above all: to thine own self be true." - William Shakespeare, via Hamlet
"Believe you can and you're halfway there." T. Roosevelt
"Legality doesn't determine morality" - John Harrison
"When the healthy pursuit of self-interest and self-realization turns into self-absorption, other people can lose their intrinsic value in our eyes and become mere means to the fulfillment of our needs and desires." - P.M. Forni
"Words are but pictures of our thoughts." - John Dryden
"Gold medals are made out of sweat, blood and tears and effort in the gym every day." Gabby douglas
"To be wronged is nothing, unless you continue to remember it." - Confucius
*"Every dream fulfilled is tainted by the reality that accompanies it."*
"The best way to discover your life's vocation is to do lots of different things... Learning what you don't like doing, guides you towards what you like doing." - Me
"Once a cucumber becomes a pickle, it will never be a cucumber again" - Unknown Recovering Addict
"You can't titty fuck a book, but they can definitely touch you in other ways" -Jeremy Tenstin
"There are two things a person should never be angry at, what they can help, and what they cannot." - Plato
"A hero is born among a hundred, a wise man is found among a thousand, but an accomplished one might not be found even among a hundred thousand men." - Plato
"Learn compliance but do not accepT it as truth for it is the murderer of individualitY. Adapt, learn, and be watchful in order to learn to blend when necessary but act upon others actions to your own interpretation, although that itself is flawed" -Unknown
"I felt like we misplaced the value of music We put everything in front of its value. We put our cellphone and headphones in front of the value. Kids are paying $600 for headphones, but they won"t pay a dollar for the music. Headphones are useless without the music." (RZA- Wu-Tang)
"Do the thing you think you cannot do." Eleanor Roosevelt
"What is important here is cash." Mobutu Ss Seko (full quote in comments)
"Two wrongs don't make a right, but they make a good excuse." - Thomas Szasz
"We're all idiots. Afraid. Scared idiots. Afraid of the answers. So scared we don't know that we have to ask the questions to get the answers in the first place." - Thomas Carter (Myself)
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky,
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says 'I'm possible'!" - Audrey Hepburn
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"A hero is born among a hundred, a wise man is found among a thousand, but an accomplished one might not be found even among a hundred thousand men." - Plato
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and they don"t want anyone else to feel like that." - Robin Williams
"Get back to the action, Trooper!" - Star Wars Battlefront 2
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"To the well-organized mind, death is but the next great adventure." - J.K. Rowling
"I love to dream, but I never try to dream and think at the same time." - H. P. Lovecraft
"There is in every one of us, even those who seem to be most moderate, a type of desire that is terrible, wild and lawless." - Plato, The Republic
"Any man may easily do harm, but not every man can do good to another." - Plato
"Ah, good conversation - there's nothing like it , is there? The air of ideas is the only air worth breathing."- Edith Wharton, The Age Of Innocence
"Resentment is like drinking poison and then hoping it will kill your enemies." Nelson Mandela
'The flame that burns twice as bright burns half as long.' -Lao Tzu
"The ultimate test of your greatness is the way you treat every human being." Pope JP2
"I listen with attention to the judgment of all men; but so far as I can remember, I have followed none but my own." - Michel de Montaigne
"Men travel faster now. But I do not know if they go to better things." -Willa Sibert Cather, Death Comes for the Archbishop
"The wound is the place where the Light enters you." Rumi
"There is no such thing as great suffering, great regret, great memory... Everything is forgotten, even great love." --- Albert Camus
"Ladies like a man to rescue. A job that offers a challenge. They can annex the property at a cheap rate, and ruthlessly develop it." -- Anthony Powell (Temporary Kings)
"You are what you click."
"A king's duty is to his people. Without them he is no king at all!" Ling Yao
"There Is No Key To Happiness, The Door Is Always Open" - Mother Teresa
"The mind creates the abyss, the heart crosses it." - Nisargadatta Maharaj
"I constantly see people rise in life who are not the smartest, sometimes not even the most diligent, but they are learning machines. They go to bed every night a little wiser than they were when they got up and boy does that help, particularly when you have a long run ahead of you"- Charlie Munger
"It is mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it" -Aristotle
"An insecure mind, worrying about its own self-interest, cannot love. Love is for those who have stopped worrying about themselves." -- Acharya Prashant
"Birth, n.: The first and direst of all disasters." - Ambrose Bierce
"You alone are responsible for what you do, don"t do, or how you respond to what"s done to you." - Darren Hardy
"May I never be complete. May I never be content. May I never be perfect." Chuck Palahniuk
"When emerging from humble beginnings, those around you tend to underestimate your authenticity because they knew you before you were 'somebody'"
"Nobody has ever laughed except in tears." --Acharya Prashant
"It is an undeniable, and may I say a fundamental quality of Man, that when faced with extinction, every alternative is preferable." Dr. Leonard Church
"The minute you think of giving up, think of the reason why you held on for so long" - Natsu Draganeel, Fairy Tail
"When we are no longer able to change a situation, we are challenged to change ourselves."- Viktor Frankl
"There is no king who has not had a slave among his ancestors, and no slave who has not had a king among his." --Helen Keller
"The most satisfying thing in life is to have been able to give a large part of one's self to others." - Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
"Hope is independent of the apparatus of logic." - Norman Cousins
"We generate fears while we sit. We overcome them by action."  Dr. Henry Link
"Little will change until you do." - by Rick Beneteau
"Life is full of misery, loneliness, and sufferingand it's all over much too quickly." - Woody Allen
"But man is not made for defeat. A man can be destroyed but not defeated." - Ernest Hemingway
"Today you are you! That is truer than true! There is no one alive who is you-er than you!" - Dr. Seuss
"Where the willingness is great, the difficulties cannot be great." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"God, life changes faster than you think." - Amy Tan
"We dream to give ourselves hope. To stop dreaming - well, that"s like saying you can never change your fate." - Amy Tan
"If you can't change your fate, change your attitude." - Amy Tan
"And that's the thing about people who mean everything they say. They think everyone else does too." - Khaled Hosseini
"I do not want an uneventful and safe life, I prefer an adventurous one." - Isabel Allende
"The wise man does at once what the fool does finally." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"Liberal males treated progressive politics like carbon credits for rape." - Ann Coulter
"We began as wanderers, and we are wanderers still. We have lingered long enough on the shores of the cosmic ocean. We are ready at last to set sail for the stars." -Carl Sagan
"If you want to forget something or someone, never hate it, or never hate him/her. Everything and everyone that you hate is engraved upon your heart; if you want to let go of something, if you want to forget, you cannot hate." - C. JoyBell C.
"Dissatisfaction is a symptom of ambition. It"s the coal the fuels the fire within you." -Trudy Campbell
"Six years later, he was dead in a bunker. So much for the Third Reich" -- Anthony Hopkin's dad.
"I don"t get into arguments, I don"t offer opinions, and I think if you do that, then the anger finally begins to transform into drive" -- Anthony Hopkins
"Scientists say a huge asteroid will hit us some day, causing massive destruction. Note to self: Start building escape rocket ship." - T.E. Mansfield
"The richest man is not he who has the most, but he who needs the least." - Unknown source
"Sometimes I forget that people are not like cats. You can"t just throw them and expect them to land properly." -u/F1r3_F0x
"I don"t want to set the world on fire, I just want to start a flame in my ass" - Tabasco Dude
"I don"t want to watch the world burn, I just want to start a fire in my ass" - Tabasco dude
"Our job was not to enjoy it. Our job was to make sure they enjoyed it" - Jerry Seinfeld
"When you're attacking FBI agents because you're under criminal investigation, you're losing." -Sarah Huckabee Sanders
"The important thing is to not stop questioning. Curiosity has its own reason for existing." Albert Einstein
"Hootie Tootie Disco Cutie"
"I can do what I want."
"And, when you want something, all the universe conspires in helping you to achieve it." - Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
"If you do good work for good clients, it will lead to other good work for other good clients. If you do bad work for bad clients, it will lead to other bad work for other bad clients." - Michael Bierut
"Though we travel the world over to find the beautiful, we must carry it with us, or we find it not." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Don"t let the person who burnt your bridge cross it without helping you build another." - SLM
"When Love calls, do not resist. Go; That is where you will find peace. Do not fight that unreasonable urge. Surrender to your glorious defeat." -- Acharya Prashant
'No matter how bad things are, you can always make them worse!' - Randy Pausch3
"I didn't leave because I stopped loving you, I left because the longer I stayed, the less I loved myself" -Rupi Kuar
"Have a mind that"s open to anything and attached to nothing."
"It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not."
"Absence is to love what wind is to fire; it extinguishes the small, it enkindles the great." - Roger de Rabutin
"Money doesn't change you, it changes the people around you" - Unknown
"Remember not only to say the right thing in the right place, but far more difficult still, to leave unsaid the wrong thing at the tempting moment." Benjamin franklin
"Nothing in life is to be feared; it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more so that we may fear less." Marie Curie
"Diamonds are a girls best friend."  Marilyn Monroe
"Man can do what he wills, but he cannot will what he wills." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"I prayed for twenty years but received no answer until I prayed with my legs." Frederick Douglass
"You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is like an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty." - Mahatma Gandhi
"A good story lasts longer than a good time" - TheGodlyJorts
"I have no special talents. I am only passionately curious." -Albert Einstein
"Called an old friend recently to reconnect after a long time had passed. He answered, 'Who's this? Where'd you get this number?!'" - T.E. Mansfield
"If you love life, don't waste time, for time is what life is made up of." - Bruce Lee
"Das Leben vergibt keine Schwche"/"Life doesn't forgive weakness" A. Hitler
"Travel not just to see, but to reveal."
"What I lack in resources, I make up in motivation and drive."
"I"ve never had a problem with a dumb client. There is no such thing as a bad client. Part of our job is to do good work and get the client to accept it." - Bob Gill
'It's an odd feeling, farewell. There is such envy in it. Men go off to be tested, for courage. And if we're tested at all, it's for patience, for doing without, for how well we can endure loneliness.' -Karen Blixen
"I am the master of my fate, I am the captain of my soul"- William Ernest Henley
"Your ideas are terrifying and your hearts are faint. Your acts of pity and cruelty are absurd, committed with no calm, as if they were irresistable. Finally, you fear blood more and more. Blood and time"- Paul Valry
"When someone asks me 'What's on your mind?', I'm sometimes tempted to go all literal on them and say 'The inside of my skull'." - T.E. Mansfield
"Therefore do not worry about tomorrow, for tomorrow will worry about itself. Each day has enough trouble of its own." - Matthew 6:34
"How people treat you is their karma; how you react is yours." - Wayne W. Dyer
"I"m a lover not a fighter but I"ll fight for what I love." -Russ
"We accept the love we think we deserve."
"I can be a sadist I can be a slut I enjoy a bit of pain I'm often filled with lust"
"Dreams are the currency for the desperate and lonely." Said a man called Nothing.
"A Winner Is A Dreamer Who Never Gives Up." - Nelson Mandela
'When I am dead, I hope it may be said: "His sins were scarlet, but his books were read."' -Hilaire Belloc
"Making a big life change is pretty scary. But know what"s even scarier? Regret." - Zig Ziglar
"Nothing can dim the light which shines from within." Maya Angelou
"I rarely end up where I was intending to go, but often I end up somewhere I needed to be." - From the novel 'The Long Dark Tea-Time of the Soul' by Douglas Adams
"Those who don't believe in magic will never find it." Roald Dahl
"Some charities include coins in their envelope when asking for a donation. But did those coins come from money I donated before?" - T.E. Mansfield
"consul me and rub my skin and forget that I used to be your only sin" - Denali
"A woman is like a tea bag; you never know how strong it is until it's in hot water." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you."
"fear...is THE underlying emotion behind anger, anxiety, sadness, jealousy, judgement, and other such negative emotions, all of which are energetic blocks to our awareness and ongoing awakening" peter santos
"Judgmentis one of the ego"s tools to foster separation through comparison " Peter Santos
"If anyone tells you that a certain person speaks ill of you, do not make excuses about what is said of you but answer, "He was ignorant of my other faults, else he would not have mentioned these alone." - Epictetus
"I wanted the whole world or nothing." - Charles Bukowski
"Weeds are flowers too, once you get to know them." - A.A. Milne
"The human understanding still has this peculiar and perpetual fault of being more moved and excited by affirmatives than by negatives, whereas rightly and properly it ought to give equal weight to both." -Sir Francis Bacon
"I"d rather live with a good question than a bad answer." - Aryeh Frimer (American-Israeli Scientist)
"You"ll never take my pride from me, it"ll have to be pried from me" -Eminem
"The plan, a memory of the future, tries on reality to see if it fits." - Laurence Gonzalez
"There are times to stay put, and what you want will come to you, and there are times to go out into the world and did such a thing for yourself" -Lemony Snicket (written in his book "The Carnivores Carnival")
"A man who fears suffering is already suffering from what he fears."  Michel de Montaigne
"Don"t wait. The time will never be just right."
"More evidence my 14yr old daughter is a Geek: after prompting me to ask if she knew any jokes about sodium, she replied, "Na"  Neil deGrasse Tyson
"A hero is someone who has given his or her life to something bigger than oneself." -Joseph Campbell
10 inspiration quotes from musical theatre
"There is a validation in not being validated."  Katriel Montgomery
"I regard golf as an expensive way of playing marbles." -- G. K. Chesterton
"Ho-Kahey! It is a good day to fight! It is a good day to die! Strong hearts, brave hearts, to the front! Weak hearts and cowards to the rear." -Crazy Horse (attributed to), June 25, 1876 at Little Big Horn
"There is no elevator to success  you have to take the stairs." Anonymous
"If you don't sacrifice for what you want, what you want will be the sacrifice" - Unknown
"Tired, tired with nothing, tired with everything, tired with the world"s weight he had never chosen to bear." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"People should marry after spending 20 years together, not before" - Emanuella Von Carstein
"Nice work, boyo" - Atlas, 1960
"The key is not to prioritize what's on your schedule, but to schedule your priorities" -Stephen Covey
"Once you let go of a piece you cannot change your action. I will hold you to your actions, and you must hold me to mine. That is the only way we will actually get good." -My brother, while playing a game of Chess
"It"s easier to stay at the exact same point in your life, no matter how bad, than to see yourself as how you truly are and see that what you"re doing is wrong and try to change it" - Me at 14 years old about alcoholism. As found in a diary.
"One day someone"s gonna come along that makes Nixon look like a liberal" - H. Thompson
"A truly strong person does not need the approval of others any more than a lion needs the approval of sheep." Vernon Howard
"A disciple is an asshole looking for a human being to attach itself to." - Robert Anton Wilson
"We learn from history that we do not learn from history." Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel
"You're allowed to scream, you're allowed to cry, but do not give up."
"Death doesn't discriminate between the sinners and the saints" -Lin-Manuel Miranda
"When I am working on a problem, I never think about beauty but when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong." - R. Buckminster Fuller
"When I am working on a problem, I never think about beauty but when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong." R. Buckminster Fuller
"When I am working on a problem, I never think about beauty but when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong." R. Buckminster Fuller
"When I am working on a problem, I never think about beauty but when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong." R. Buckminster Fuller
"The weak are washed away by the tides of fate. The strong drink it up." - Godot
"It is easy to be brave at a safe distance." - Aesop
"There is validation in being invalidated."  Katriel Montgomery
"Good design is all about making other designers feel like idiots because that idea wasn"t theirs." - Frank Chimero
"Don't Take Anything Personally. Nothing others do is because of you. What others say and do is a projection of their own reality, their own dream. When you are immune to the opinions and actions of others, you won't be the victim of needless suffering." - Don Miguel Ruiz
"Society attacks early when the individual is helpless." -- B. F. Skinner
"Don"t think money does everything or you are going to end up doing everything for money." - Voltaire
"Courage is fear holding on a minute longer." - George S. Patton
"Life is what happens to us while we are making other plans." - Allen Saunders
"There are two types of drug dealers in this world... those who need forklifts and those who don't" -hippie mafia
"You never know how strong you are, until being strong is your only choice." Bob Marley
"A dragon never yields." - Dhurke Sahdmadhi
"Men who are trapped by the chains of "maybe" can never reach their dreams." - Godot
"Nobody looks to Hollywood for social commentary. They only recently discovered Black people." - Sir Ian McKellen
"You are always a valuable, worthwhile human being... not because anybody says so, not because you"re successful, not because you make a lot of money... but because you decide to believe it and for no other reason." - Wayne Dyer
"Life is what happens to us while we are making other plans." - Allen Saunders
"No matter the man, we all wear masks. Whether it be over our faces or over our hearts." - Godot
"This too, shall pass."
"People everywhere confuse what they read in newspapers with news." - A. J. Liebling
"If you run into an asshole in the morning, you ran into an asshole. If you run into assholes all day, you're the asshole." - Raylan Givens
"People say nothing is impossible, but I do nothing everyday." -Pooh
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Attitude is everything, so pick a good one." - Wayne Dyer
"Women are Equal and Better." - Dennis Wilmeth
"Focus on what you want and you will get more of it, focus on what you fear and you will get more of that." - Tony Robbins
[Presley"s] hair was a Vaseline cathedral. Like a berserk blender the lusty young pelvis whirred and the notorious git-tar slammed forward with a jolt that symbolically deflowered a generation of teenagers and knocked chips off 90 million older shoulders. - Brad Darrach describing a young Elvis
"Laugh as much as you breathe and love as long as you live." Johnny Depp
"I'm sick of following my dreams. I'm just going to ask them where they're goin', and hook up with them later." - Mitch Hedberg
"There are three responses to a piece of design  yes, no, and WOW! Wow is the one to aim for." - Milton Glaser
"One of the worst things about life is not how nasty the nasty people are. You know that already. It is how nasty the nice people can be." -- Anthony Powell ("The Kindly Ones") (1962)
"One of the basic human rights is to make fun of other people whoever they are. That now seems threatened on all sides." -- Anthony Powell ("To Keep the Ball Rolling [The Strangers Are All Gone]")
"One of the basic human rights is to make fun of other people whoever they are. That now seems threatened on all sides." -- Anthony Powell (*To Keep the Ball Rolling [The Strangers Are All Gone]*)
"In overlooking, denying, evading his complexity we are diminished and we perish; only within the web of ambiguity, paradox, this hunger, danger, darkness, can we find at once ourselves and the power that will free us from ourselves"- James Baldwin, Notes Of a Native Son
"The church is not a museum for saints but a hospital for sinners." -Morton Kelsey
"Beware of missing chances; otherwise it may be altogether too late some day." - Franz Liszt
"If we take eternity to mean not endless temporal duration but timelessness, then eternal life belongs to those who live in the present." Ludwig von Wittgenstein
"One of the principal functions of a friend is to suffer (in a milder and symbolic form) the punishments that we would like, but are unable, to inflict upon our enemies." -Aldous Huxley
...
"Popularity is Manufactured" - /u/itty53
"If you have a bad thought about yourself, tell it to go to hell because that is exactly where it came from." - Brigham Young
"In the beginning the Universe was created. This has made a lot of people very angry and been widely regarded as a bad move." -Douglas Adams
"You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty." - Mahatma Gandhi
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." - Albert Einstein
"There is more to life than increasing its speed." Mahatma Gandhi
"Virtue has never been as respectable as money." -- Mark Twain
"Failure is the condiment that gives success its flavor." - Truman Capote
"I"m not the monster you think I am. I"m worse!"
"Anytime anyone criticizes the media, the media shrieks "You"re just like Trump!" Why do you think he got elected in the first place? Because no ones believes you any more. You lost your credibility a long time ago."  Elon Musk
"If it comes easy, it will go fast."  Andrena Sawyer
"That"s because, like everyone else on the planet, you believed that time would teach you to grow... But time doesn"t teach: it merely brings us a sense of weariness and of growing older." Aleph, Paulo Coelho
"Life is what happens to us while we are making other plans." - Allen Saunders
"See? I told you it was a good idea to drink the whole bottle!" -me
"Love is a special word, and I use it only when I mean it. You say the word too much and it becomes cheap." - Ray Charles
"Are we supposed to believe that Viktor Vekselberg, one of the world's wealthiest men and one of Russia's top 3 most powerful oligarchs, came all the way to Trump Tower to see Michael Cohen...but did not actually meet with Trump? That is an implausible narrative." -Maria Ashot, NYT Commenter
"There are two kinds of tailing people. The kind where they notice everything *but* you, and the kind where they notice *only* you." - Leeroy Jethro Gibbs
"It is easier to fool people than to convince them they have been fooled."-Internet Mark Twain
"The American Constitution was not written to protect criminals; it was written to protect the government from becoming criminals." -- Lenny Bruce
"Liberals can understand everything but people who don't understand them." -- Lenny Bruce
"Rebuke he who would ascribe infallibility to a gawd, for he is neither equipped to assist his masters nor to help the victims of their mistakes." - Voltorbe
"Rebuke he who would ascribe infallibility to a gawd, for he is neither equipped to assist his masters nor help the victims of their mistakes." - Voltorbe
"The 'what should be' never did exist, but people keep trying to live up to it. There is no 'what should be,' there is only what is." - Lenny Bruce
"Words, without power, is mere philosophy."- Allama Muhammad Iqbal
"It's not hard work that burns people out, but rather the feeling that their work doesn't matter" -April Wensel
"Luxury is Artificial Poverty" -Socrates
"Once the writer in every individual comes to life (and that time is not far off), we are in for an age of universal deafness and lack of understanding" - Milan Kundera, Book of Laughter and Forgetting
"Dealing with drug use by building more prisons is like fighting cancer by building more cemeteries." - Dr. Diana Sylvestre
"Dealing with drug use by building more prisons is like fighting cancer by building more cemeteries," - Dr. Diana Sylvestre
"One of the greatest human failings is to prefer to be right rather than effective." - Stephen Fry
"My ambition is handicapped by laziness" - Charles Bukowski
"In London alone there are 80,000 prostitutes. What are they but the women, who, under the institution of monogamy, have come off worst? Theirs is a dreadful fate: they are human sacrifices on the altar of monogamy." - Schopenhauer
"You are a child of the universe, no less than the trees and the stars; you have a right to be here. And whether or not it is clear to you, no doubt the universe is unfolding as it should." (-Max Ehrmann)
"The moments that change your life are the ones that happen suddenly, like the one where you die." -Terry Pratchett
" Suburbia is where the developer bulldozes out the trees, then names the streets after them." -- Bill Vaughn
"be who you are, say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind" Dr Seuss
"Your attitude, not your aptitude, will determine your altitude" zig ziglar
"Men marry because they are tired; women, because they are curious: both are disappointed." - Oscar Wilde
'Sanity is a madness put to good uses.' - George Santayana
"A righteous man never feels ashamed to face his shadow even when standing alone or his soul when sleeping alone." - Chan Mou
"What are monsters but pure, beautiful creatures we project our fears onto." - Phil Dunphy
"Las Vegas is the only place I know where money really talksit says, "Goodbye."  Frank Sinatra
"Plant your garden and decorate your own soul, instead of waiting for someone to bring you flowers." Jose Luis Borges
"If you want the truth, I"ll tell you the truth: Listen to the secret sound, the real sound, which is inside you." Kabir
"You can work within the framework of democracy to bring about a better distribution of wealth. You can use your powerful economic resources to wipe poverty from the face of the earth..." -Martin Luther King, J
"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel."
"Only a food says God exists. Likewise, only a fool says God doesn't exist" - Unknown
"You can't discuss the ocean with a well frog - he's limited by the space he lives in. You can't discuss ice with a summer insect - he's bound to a single season." - Zhuangzi
"The mark of a moderate man is freedom from his own ideas." - Laozi (Ancient Chinese Philosopher &amp; Writer)
"I"ve had a perfectly wonderful evening, but this wasn"t it." - Groucho Marx
"Question everything; above all, always question your motivations." - Christopher Hitchens
"It"s trying to make sense of our intuitions in the light of the enormous pressure to accept prepackaged ideologies that makes neurotics of us all." - Terence McKenna
"We are living in space age time with people who are living with Stone Age minds" - Daryl Davis
" Freedom begins where it ends ignorance " - Victor Hugo
"Three may keep a secret, if two of them are dead"- Ben Franklin, Poor Richard's Almanack
"It is better to suffer evil than to do it." -Socrates-
"The way you look at thing is the most powerful force in shaping your life." click link below for more like this...
"Be yourself. Everyone else is already taken." Oscar Wilde
"Don't look for genius in shit. Look for shit in the genius, and then better it" - Rudolf P Belmar
"There is freedom and magic in being honest about about who you are and where you"ve been" -Addict Chick
"Everything can happen, everything is possible and probable. Time and place do not exist; on a significant basis of reality, the imagination spins, weaving new patterns; a mixture of memories, experiences, free fancies, incongruities and improvisations." - August Strindberg, A Dream Play
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous
"Single words really do control the debate. Pro-life, for example, makes the other side automatically pro-death. 'If we're pro-life, I guess the people we're up against are, you know, you fill in the blank.'"
"But our lives will only ever always continue to be a balancing act that has less to do with pain and more to do with beauty." _Shane Koyczan
'You don't reason with intellectuals. You shoot them.' - Napoleon Bonaparte
"Shame often goes in drag as common sense." -Augusten Burroughs
"Much of the stress that people feel doesn't come from having too much to do. It comes from not finishing what they've started." - David Allen
"To succeed in the world it is not enough to be stupid, you must also be well-mannered." -- Voltaire
"The only real elegance is in the mind; if you've got that, the rest really comes from it." - Diana Vreeland
"A vision without a task is a dream. A task without a dream is drudgery, but a vision with a task can change the world." - Black Elk
"Where there's a will, there's a family fighting over it." - Matthew 'Matt' Wohlfarth (American Comedian &amp; Salesperson)
"The best time to plant a tree was twenty years ago. The second best time is now." - Chinese Proverb
"It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live." Albus Dumbledore,
"Your greatest dreams are all on the other side of the wall of fear and caution." -unknown
"Asking a Human about SuperAI it's like asking a Mineral about DNA" - Real Skynet
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education."  Mark Twain
"All that glitters is not gold."  William Shakespeare
"If trouble comes when you least expect it then maybe the thing to do is to always expect it." - Cormac McCarthy
"Nobody wants to be here and nobody wants to leave." - Cormac McCarthy
"Self-discipline begins with the mastery of your thoughts. If you don"t control what you think, you can"t control what you do. Simply, self-discipline enables you to think first and act afterward." Napoleon Hill
"Don"t Let Yesterday Take Up Too Much Of Today."  Will Rogers
"Live your life from your heart. Share from your heart. And your story will touch and heal people"s souls." - by Melody Beattie
"Stop worrying about growing old and think about growing up." Philip Roth
"The man who never looks into a newspaper is better informed than he who reads them; inasmuch as he who knows nothing is nearer to truth than he whose mind is filled with falsehoods &amp; errors."  Thomas Jefferson, 14 June 1807
"Everyday nothing seems to change, but pretty soon everything is different."
"There may be times when we are powerless to prevent injustice, but there must never be a time when we fail to protest." - Elie Wiesel
"Everything you do right now ripples outward and affects everyone. Your posture can shine your heart or transmit anxiety. Your breath can radiate love or muddy the room in depression. Your glance can awaken joy. Your words can inspire freedom. Your every act can open hearts and minds." David Deida
"If the earth was a living organism, humans would be the cancer."
"If you repair a mask every time it scratches, you're gonna' spend a lot of money on a mask" - (Unknown)
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"Follow your destiny, Water your plants, Love your roses. The rest is the shadow, Of random trees." - Fernando Pessoa
"A man of destiny knows that beyond this hill lies another and another. The journey is never complete." - F.W. de Klerk
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." - John F. Kennedy
"Life was meant to be lived, and curiosity must be kept alive. One must never, for whatever reason, turn his back on life." - Eleanor Roosevelt, The Autobiography of Eleanor Roosevelt.
"Action may not always bring happiness; but there is no happiness without action."  Benjamin Disraeli
"We have a tendency to want the other person to be a finished product while we give ourselves the grace to evolve." - T. D. Jakes
"It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
"Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much." - Oscar Wilde
"Murderers are not monsters, they're men. And that's the most frightening thing about them." -Alice Sebold
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing." -Edmund Burke
"The world is a dangerous place to live, not because of the people who are evil, but because of the people who don't do anything about it." -Albert Einstein
"People who claim that they're evil are usually no worse than the rest of us... It's people who claim that they're good, or any way better than the rest of us, that you have to be wary of." -Gregory Maguire
"Isn't it a bit unnerving that doctors call what they do a practice?" -George Carlin
"The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of the strong." -Mahatma Gandhi
"I can't go back to yesterday because I was a different person then." -Lewis Carroll
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right for you'll be criticized anyway." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"The elephant it is said would have outstripped man in supremacy of the earth had he possessed two trunks, but having only one did not develop the same flexibility of mind as are acquired for the use of two arms." - George S. Patton
 "The elephant it is said would have outstripped man in supremacy of the earth had he possessed two trunks, but having only one did not develop the same flexibility of mind as are acquired for the use of two arms." - George S. Patton
"[Kids] don't remember what you try to teach them. They remember what you are." - Jim Henson
"Tough times never last, but tough people do." - Robert Schueller
"What is youth except a man or a woman before it is ready or fit to be seen." Evelyn Waugh
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent."
"Friendship ... is born at the moment when one man says to another "What! You too? I thought that no one but myself . . ."
"The only obsession everyone wants: 'love.' People think that in falling in love they make themselves whole? The Platonic union of souls? I think otherwise. I think you're whole before you begin. And the love fractures you. You're whole, and then you're cracked open." -Philip Roth
"Everything gets easier when you stop expecting it to be easy."  Tim Grover
"If you can't explain it simply, you don't understand it well enough." --Albert Einstein
'Knowledge is power but enthusiasm pulls the switch' - Logan P Smith
"The object of life is not to be on the side of the majority, but to escape finding oneself in the ranks of the insane." - Marcus Aurelius
"Don't sweat the petty things and don't pet the sweaty things." George Carlin
"Trust because you are willing to accept the risk, not because it's safe or certain." --
"A person who never made a mistake never tried anything new." -Albert Einstein
"Whoever controls the media, controls the mind" - Jim Morrison
"You will never change your life until you change something you do daily." - Mike Murdock
"There are only 10 types of people in the world: Those who understand binary and those who don"t." - anonymous
"Blessed are the hearts that can bend; they shall never be broken." Albert Camus
"Do not take life too seriously. You will never get out of it alive"- Elbert Hubbard
"Dr. Ornish and his colleagues' studies were published in some of the most prestigious medical journals in the world. Yet medical practice hardly changed. Why?..." -Michael Greger, M.D.
"To have a right to do a thing, is not at all the same as to be right in doing it." G. K. Chesterton
"Boards of directors are allowed to work together, so are banks and investors and corporations in alliances with one another and with powerful states. That"s just fine. It"s just the poor who aren"t supposed to cooperate." - Noam Chomsky
"Mold"s gross, who would want to fit it?" -Zach Sherwin
"If you wish to make an apple pie truly from scratch, you must first invent the universe." - Carl Sagan
"Today I Die..Tomorrow I live.." -Anonymous
"I may be blind, but at least I'm not black" -Stevie wonder.
"The saddest thing is naked laughter turned formal smile" - Dustin Pearson
"In time, all storms settle into a pleasant breeze." - The Thunderhead In Neal Shusterman"s *Thunderhead*
"Why tomorrow? When there is today?"
"In reality, there is no such thing as not voting: you either vote by voting, or you vote by staying home and tacitly doubling the value of some Diehard's vote." - David Foster Wallace
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." Eleanor Roosevelt
"The truth is what I make it. I could set this world on fire and call it rain." - Victoria Aveyard, Red Queen
"A feminist is any woman who tells the truth about her life." - Virginia Woolf
"The only person you should try to be better than is the person you were yesterday." Anonymous
"The curse of America  sheer, helpless, well-ordered boredom. And that is going some day to be the curse of the world."  Rudyard Kipling
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind."
"You are a lot better than you probably think you are." William Walter
"To love someone. What does it mean?" "To be at the same level of sensitivity." - Vatsal Surti
"Hate the game, not the player" - Rick Sanchez
""Always" and "never" are two words you should always remember never to use." - M. Kendig
"I fear not the man who has practiced 10,000 kicks once, but I fear the man who has practiced one kick 10,000 times." - Bruce Lee
"Don't be so quick to believe what you hear because lies spread faster than the truth." - Anonymous
"Real knowledge is to know the extent of one's ignorance." - Confucius
"Desire Is The Starting Point Of All Achievement, Not A Hope, Not A Wish, But A Keen Pulsating Desire Which Transcends Everything." Napoleon Hill
"The journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step." -Lao Tzu
"Tonight, many people will decide to get high one last time and get clean tomorrow. Tonight, many people will die." -Addict Chick
"If you"re not growing and changing, you"re not happy"
"Moral indignation is jealosy with a halo." H.G. Wells
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right, for you'll be criticized anyway." Eleanor Roosevelt.
"We are all gifted. That is our inheritance." - Ethel Waters
"Apathy is the enemy of confidence" -Anonymous
"You have friends for a reason, friends for a season, and friends for a lifetime." -Anonymous
""Always" and "never" are two words you should always remember never to use." - M. Kendig
"As I grow older, I pay less attention to what men say. I just watch what they do." Andrew Carnegie
"One of the few times in a man's life when he is not full of shit!! The morning of a colonoscopy. Enough said!" - Jim Lawrence
Nothing happens to anybody which he is not by nature fitted to bear. Marcus Aurelius
"Shit is the tofu of cursing and can be molded to whichever condition the speaker desires. Hot as shit. Windy as shit. I myself was confounded as shit..." - David Sedaris
"I've been accused of vulgarity. I say that's bullshit." - Mel Brooks
"Pain is temporary. It might last a day, a week, or a year, but eventually, it will subside and something else will take it's place. If I quit, however, it lasts forever."- Lance Armstrong.
"Kindness cost us nothing but it can win the heart's of others"
"Rather it is in one interpretation, the Christian moral one, that Nihilism is rooted. The emphasis on truth put forward in Christianity is nauseated by the falseness of all of its historical claims. The rebounding from 'God is truth' to 'All is false', an act of Buddhism. - Nietzsche
"No one stops to ask whether it is inhumane to force adolescents to spend the bulk of their time studying subjects most of them hate."
"History is Philosophy teaching by examples." - Thucydides
"The surest way to make a monkey of a man is to quote him." -- Robert Benchley
"Never say 'I Can't' when it comes to something you want to accomplish."
"Before you give an opinion against something - study it. For only until you fully understand the concept, should you have earned the right of dismissal"
"The secret is to write just anything, to dare to write just anything, because when you write just anything, you begin to say what is important."  Julien Green
"Learn to show the right attitude at the right time to the right person." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Learn to show right attitude at the right time." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Learn to show right attitude at the right time."
"There Is Nothing More Deceptive Then The Obvious Fact." - Sherlock Holmes.
"Without music, life would be a mistake."
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment."
"To think that, when we grow up, we may be as stupid as they are."
"It hurts to let go. Sometimes it seems the harder you try to hold on to something or someone the more it wants to get away. You feel like some kind of criminal for having felt, for having wanted. For having wanted to be wanted." (Cont.)
"You are beautiful like demolition."
"Avoid words that might force someone to reach for the dictionary... because most Americans won't." -Frank Luntz
"Violence is a clumsy weapon, which creates more problems than it solves." - Gandhi
"Do not set yourself on fire in order to keep others warm." Anonymous
"Posterity is as likely to be wrong as anybody else." -- Haywood Broun
"The best political weapon is the weapon of terror. Cruelty commands respect. Men may hate us. But, we don't ask for their love; only for their fear."- Henrich Himmler
"You Can't Change The Direction Of The Wind But You Can Adjust The Sails To Reach Your Destination"
"Knowledge is learning something new everyday. Wisdom is letting go of something everyday" - Zen Proverb
"I've had a lot of worries in my life, most of which never happened." - Mark Twain
"and love is a word used too much and much too soon" -Charles Bukowski
"Your joy can fill you only as deeply as your sorrow has craved you." - Khalil Gibran
"Whatever you do, do your best at it." - Unknown
"Everyone wants to live on top of the mountain, but all the happiness and growth occurs while you are climbing it" Andy Rooney
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and they don"t want anyone else to feel like that." Robin Williams
"I only invited you so it would be cheaper and I wouldn"t have to try for sex"
"do unto others as you wish to be done unto you" - jesus
"How far is it from London to Estonia?"
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"When people get used to preferential treatment, equal treatment seems like discrimination." - Thomas Sowell
"You control only you, and only you control yourself."
"There are many here among us who think that life is but a joke". Bob Dylan
"The only way to comprehend the mathematical concept of infinity is to contemplate the extent of human stupidity." - Voltaire
"There is no instance of a nation benefitting from prolonged warfare." - Sun Tzu
"You can be passionate about anything. Pay attention, don't let life go by you. Fall in love with the back of your cereal box." - Sun Tzu
"You can be passionate about anything. Pay attention, don't let life go by you. Fall in love with the back of your cereal box." - Jerry Seinfeld
"That was some weird shit." -George W Bush, after listening to President Trump's inauguration speech
"Politeness; n. The most acceptable hypocrisy." -- Ambrose Bierce
"Magic is alive and well in hyperspace..you don"t have to believe me or follow me, just try to form a relationship with these traditional psychedelics and see for yourself if it's true." - Terence McKenna
"The more fully we give our energy, the more it returns to us." - Buddha
"Listen. I wish I could tell you it gets better. But, it doesn't get better. You get better." Joan Rivers
"The first gulp from the cup of sciences will turn you atheist, at the bottom of the cup god is waiting for you" Werner Heisenberg
"We were hunters and foragers. The frontier was everywhere..." (Looking for exact source))
"I hear, I know. I see, I remember. I do, I understand." - Confucius
"Question with boldness even the existence of a God; because, if there be one, he must more approve of the homage of reason, than that of blind-folded fear." - Thomas Jefferson
"The opposite of a correct statement is a false statement. But the opposite of a profound truth may well be another profound truth. " ---Niels Bohr
"Life is what happens to you while you're busy making other plans." - John Lennon
"Everything you've ever wanted is on the other side of fear"
"Is this not the true romantic feeling; not to desire to escape life, but to prevent life from escaping you?" - Thomas Wolfe
"Loneliness is and always has been the central and inevitable experience of every man."
"You should not be carried away by the dictation of the mind, but the mind should be carried by your dictation." - A.C Bhaktivedanta Swami
"There is, after all, a kind of happiness in unhappiness, if it's the right unhappiness."-Jonathan Franzen, Freedom
"Dreaming permits each and every one of us to be quietly and safely insane every night of our lives."William Dement
"Death is a cosmic joke. If you get the joke, falling on the other side will be wonderful." -Sadhguru
"They say that I have a bad mouth. It"s true. They say that I"m not a statesman, not fit for a president, and that"s true. But the problem here is that I won." -Rodrigo Duterte
"It appears to me as if he had said: 'Concern yourself with your own business, Oh Fate, for there is nothing in Diogenes that belongs to you anymore.'" - Seneca
"What can you know about a person? They shift in the light. You can"t light up all sides at once. Add a second light and you get a second darkness, it"s only fair." - Richard Siken
"Mastering others is strength. Mastering yourself is true power." - Lao Tzu
"He who knows, does not speak. He who speaks, does not know." - Lao Tzu
"If you wish to control others you must first control yourself" - Miyamoto Musashi
"You must understand that there is more than one path to the top of the mountain" - Miyamoto Musashi
"Nothing furthers technology like a good war."
"She is a friend of my mind. She gather me, man. The pieces I am, she gather them and give them back to me in all the right order." Toni Morrison, Beloved
"What men call the shadow of the body is not the shadow of the body, but is the body of the soul." Oscar Wilde
"What men call social virtues, good fellowship, is commonly but the virtue of pigs in a litter, which lie close together to keep each other warm." Henry David Thoreau
'Life consists not in holding good cards but in playing those you hold well' - Mark Twain
"If you can"t meditate in a boiler room, you can"t meditate." - Alan Watts
"When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us." -Helen Keller
"I'd outlived my older brother"
"It's gonna be great: when a B-list actress marries a man who will never be king in a country that doesn't even matter." - Bill Maher on Meghan and Hary's wedding
"...under the thin veneer of Christianity they have remained what their ancestors were, barbarically polytheistic. They have not yet overcome their grudge against the new religion which was forced on them, and they have projected it on to the source from which Christianity came to them." - Freud
"Pain is excess energy crying out for release." (-Gerald Heard)
"Life is a checker board, and the player opposite you is time. If you hesitate before moving, or neglect to move promptly, your men will be wiped off the board by time. You are playing against a partner who will not tolerate indecision!"
"Shrouds have no pockets" -- English saying
"We see things not as they are, but as we are." - Louise Hay
"We are not teenagers, we are humans!" My 3.5 year old granddaughter!
"Life is not about keeping your head above water but finding a way to fly over the seas" - Kurkhenar Brandon
"The smart way to keep people passive and obedient..." -Noam Chomsky
"Everyone is worth something, even if it's just to serve as a bad example." -Unknown author
"Graphic design will save the world right after rock and roll does." - David Carson
"America has the honour of being the only country that went from barbarism to decadence without the usual interval of civilisation in between " Georges Clemenceau
"Don't postpone joy until you have learned all of your lessons. Joy is your lesson."  Alan Cohen
"I want adventure in the great wide somewhere" -Belle
"I want adventure in the great wide somewhere" -Belle, *Beauty and the Beast*
"If we don't see John McCain as a hero, then how can you ever expect any young people to join the armed forces, when for everything they do and the bullets that they take, They'll be laughed at by presidents like Trump" - Steven Tyler
"Waste no more time arguing about what a good man should be. Be one." - Marcus Aurelius
"We don't make mistakes; just happy accidents." (-Bob Ross)
"I don"t lose. I redefine success" - Unknown
"We negotiate with chaos for some sense of satisfaction." (-Ani DiFranco)
"I don"t lose. I redefine success."
"If you wish to travel far and fast, travel light. Take off all your envies, jealousies, unforgiveness, selfishness, and fears." -Glenn Clark
"Genius is one percent inspiration and ninety-nine percent perspiration."- Thomas Alva Edison
"I was drafted during the Korean War. None of us wanted to go... It was only a couple of years after World War II had ended. We said, 'Wait a second? Didn't we just get through with that?'" -- Clint Eastwood
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees Opportunity In Every Difficulty."
"The way I see it, every life is a pile of good things and bad things. The good things don't always soften the bad things, but vice versa, the bad things don't always spoil the good things and make them unimportant." Doctor Who
"A fanatic is one who can"t change his mind and won"t change the subject." - Winston Churchill
"How have we managed to empty the sea? Who gave us the sponge to erase the whole horizon?" - Nietzsche
"In God we trust, all others are suspect."
"We tend to focus on where we"ve been and where we"re going, but we don"t put enough thought into the present"
"You can succeed if you admit and learn from your failures." - Krishnendu Pramanick
[Question] 'Tranquillity is always the best state of mind'
"Do not look back and grieve over the past, for it is gone; and do not be troubled about the future, for it has not yet come. Live in the present, and make it so beautiful that it will be worth remembering." -- Ida Scott Taylor
"The good life is one inspired by love and guided by knowledge" - Bertrand Russell
"Keep your face always toward the sunshineand shadows will fall behind you." Walt Whitman
"The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting." -Sun Tzu
"Time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." -Marthe Troly-Curtin
"The truth is, everyone is going to hurt you. You just got to find the ones worth suffering for." -Bob Marley
"The difference between genius and stupidity is; genius has its limits." -Albert Einstein
"The solution to racism is usually cyborgs." - Tatrus
"Aristotle was famous for knowing everything. He taught that the brain exists merely to cool the blood and is not involved in the process of thinking. This is true only of certain persons." -Will Cuppy
"There are, always and only, the bad people, but some of them are on opposite sides." Terry Pratchett
[identify Source] This quote is attributed to Alan Watts, but from what text?
"Choice is the essence of two-ness." -Peeja
"These days, the American dream is more apt to be realized in South America, in places such as Ecuador, Venezuela and Argentina, where incomes are actually more equal today than they are in the land of Horatio Alger. Who's the banana republic now?" -Sen. Sanders (VT), 2011
"Isn't this enough? Just this world? Just this beautiful, complex, wonderfully unfathomable, natural world? How does it so fail to hold our attention that we have to diminish it with the invention of cheap, man-made myths and monsters?"-Tim Minchin
"I've always had a sneaking fondness for Martin Van Buren. He wrote his autobiography, you know, and never once mentioned his wife. Now that's what I call a man's man." -- Cleveland Amory
"If you don't build your dream, someone else will hire you to help them build theirs."
"You know what I'm saying" Black People
"Freedom means not being made a criminal for what you know, whom you love, or what you think or not think." - Volfred Sandalwood
"What we wish, we readily believe, and what we ourselves think, we imagine others think also." -Julius Caesar
"The noblest pleasure is the joy of understanding." -Leonardo Da Vinci
"The bloody stump is a natural Fleshlight anyways, he can shut his f***ing trap!" -My friend Miles
"You've heard of animals chewing off a leg to escape a trap? There's an animal kind of trick. A human would remain in the trap, endure the pain, feigning death that he might kill the trapper and remove a threat to his kind." -- Reverend Mother Mohiam, Dune
"The best way out is always through" - Robert Frost
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." - Aristotle
"When I get sad, I stop being sad and be awesome instead!" -- Barney Stinson
"Be yourself. Don't worry about what other people are thinking of you." - Phil Lester
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"I am motivated by the fear of being ordinary." - Addict Chick
"The distance between insanity and genius is measured only by success."- Bruce Feirstein
"Oh what a tangled web we weave, When first we practise to deceive!" Sir Walter Scott
" I can't take a well-tanned person seriously." -- Cleveland Amory
"Always focus on how far you've come, not how far you have to go." -Anonymous
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing." -Socrates
"Children begin by loving their parents; as they grow older they judge them; sometimes they forgive them." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams."
"The American people would not want to know of any misquotes that Dan Quayle may or may not make. " -Dan Quayle
"It's supposed to be hard. If it were easy, everyone would do it." Jimmy Dugan, A League of Their Own
"Forcing your religion on somebody is the ultimate testament to your lack of faith" - Vic and Sori, devout Christians
"Freedom is a right ultimately defended by the sacrifice of America"s servicemen and women." -Arnold Schwarzenegger
"The nuclear arms race is like two sworn enemies standing waist deep in gasoline, one with three matches, the other with five." -Carl Sagan
"For me, the most ironic token of [the first human moon landing] is the plaque signed by President Richard M. Nixon that Apollo 11 took to the moon. It reads, "We came in peace for all Mankind." ... -Carl Sagan
"Try devoting some time to something entirely new to unlock hidden potential" - Shumlosh
"I never dreamed about success, I worked for it." - Este Lauder
"We place our hopes to much on laws and courts and constitutions and that these are false hopes. Liberty lies in the hearts of men and women; when it dies there, no constitution, no law, no court can save it." -Learned Hand
'Aim for the moon. If you miss, you may hit a star.' - W.Clement Stone
"I never expect to see a perfect work from an imperfect man." - Alexander Hamilton
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use." - Soren Kierkegaard
"The best fighter is never angry." - Lao Tzu
"Always remember that the future comes one day at a time." Dean Acheson
"Anxiety is energy you can use not to prevent everything bad you can imagine from happening, but to motivate you to actively improve yourself and positively focus on the object of your worst fears. This pain you feel is pure energy trying to find a place outside yourself." - The Universe
"Remember, today is the tomorrow you worried about yesterday" - Dale Carnegie
"It is not the mountain we conquer but ourselves." - Edmund Hillary
"Always remember that you are absolutely unique. Just like everyone else." -- Margaret Mead
"Watch your thoughts; they become words. Watch your words; they become actions. Watch your actions; they become habit. Watch your habits; they become character. Watch your character; it becomes your destiny."  Lao Tzu
"Your mind is just a process of your body which is a process of the Universe which is a complex system of interacting processes. So, don't think your thoughts are important." - A Man On a Hill Watching The Stars
"The free, exploring mind of the individual human is the most valuable thing in the world..." -John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"There's no such thing as soy milk because there's no soy nipple, is there?" - Lewis Black
"The idea that technology is neutral, just a tool, is plain wrong. That's never been the case. It embodies basic choices and values of any society." -Zerzan
"Old formulas don't give new solutions." (-Israelmore Ayivor)
"Is artificial intelligence less than our intelligence?" Spike Jonze
"It was not a religion that attacked us that September day. It was al-Qaeda. We will not sacrifice the liberties we cherish or hunker down behind walls of suspicion and mistrust." -Barack Obama
"It"s ok to gamble as long as your the house" - Elon Musk
"Every man"s life ends the same way. It is only the details of how he lived and how he died that distinguish one man from another." - Ernest Hemingway
"It isn't necessary to be rich and famous to be happy. It's only necessary to be rich." -- Alan Alda
"Only an idiot has no grief, only a fool would forget it." - William Faulkner
"Those who want to leave footprints will never fly." - Sadhguru
"Ask yourself if what you're doing today will get you closer to where you want to be tomorrow." Anonymous
"I will love you if I never see you again, and I will love you if I see you every Tuesday." - Lemony Snicket, The Beatrice Letters
"We become aware of the void as we fill it." --Antonio Porchia
"Before you speak, let your words pass through three gates: Is is true? Is it necessary? Is it kind?"
"The only thing that matters is how you treat others." - Unknown
"Now we have a new settlement outpost called 'American Embassy'." - Saeb Erekat, Palestinian chief negotiator, 14 May 2018
"Now eh have a new settlement outpost called 'American Embassy'." - Saeb Erekat, Palestinian chief negotiator, 14 May 2018
"It's not what you know, it's what you can prove."
"It's very difficult to say why conspiracies fall apart, but they always do. Somebody always comes forward. What's more important to you, your loyalty to your friend, or your own life?" -Lt. Joe Kenda, Homicide Hunter S6 E19
"There's never enough time to do all the nothing you want."-Calvin and Hobbes
"There's never enough time to do all the nothing you want"- from Calvin and Hobbes
"At his lips' touch she blossomed for him like a flower and the incarnation was complete."  F. Scott Fitzgerald
"We all use each other, we have no right to do so; therefore, we accept the responsibility for the suffering we cause." - Ursula K. Le Guin
"You can become whatever you want to be, but you'll only end up being what you put in the effort to become"
"On the last day of love, my heart cracked inside my body" - Rupi Kaur, The Sun and Her Flowers
"If I quit now, I will soon be back to where I started. And when I started I was desperately wishing to be where I am now." - Unknown
"If people knew how hard I worked to get my mastery, it wouldn't seem so wonderful at all. " - Michelangelo
"There are three responses to a piece of design  yes, no, and WOW! Wow is the one to aim for." - Milton Glaser
"The greatest weapon against stress is our ability to choose one thought over another."  William James
"As more ad spending shifts online, the ability to have expertise and to innovate quickly will become critical." -- Kara Swisher
"BORDERS? I HAVE NEVER SEEN ONE. BUT I HAVE HEARD THEY EXIST IN THE MINDS OF SOME PEOPLE." - THOR HEYERDAHL
"The world has achieved brilliance without wisdom, power without conscience. Ours is a world of nuclear giants and ethical infants"- Omar Bradley
"Don"t pray for easy lives, my friends; pray to be, stronger men"
"Whatever you do will be insignificant, but it is very important that you do it." - Unknown
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard Baruch
"Some of my best leading men have been dogs and horses."  Elizabeth Taylor
"When privacy is criminalised, only criminals will have privacy" - Change Agent, Daniel Suarez
"I have loved a drug addict. I have been a drug addict. And it is far more difficult to love an addict than to be one" -Addict Chick
"Success is all about finding the hidden advantage in a negative situation" -Tony Robbins
"Life may not be the party we hoped for, but while we're here, we should dance." Anonymous
"Life doesn"t require that we be the best, only that we try our best."
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." -Albert Einstein
"If you want to learn to swim, jump into the water. On dry land no frame of mind is ever going to help you" - Bruce Lee
"Never cowardly or cruel. Never give up, never give in." Doctor Who Submitted by Tracy G
"If you are willing to look at another person"s behavior toward you as a reflection of the state of their relationship with themselves rather than a statement about your value as a person, then you will, over a period of time, cease to react at all." - Yogi Bhajan
"If you are willing to look at another person"s behavior toward you as a reflection of the state of their relationship with themselves rather than a statement about your value as a person, then you will, over a period of time cease to react at all." - Yogi Bhajan
"The only way to do great work is to love what you do. If you haven"t found it yet, keep looking. Don"t settle." - Steve Jobs
"I was lucky to be involved and get to contribute to something that was important, which is empowering people with software." -Bill Gates
"Fear tends to come from ignorance. Once I knew what the problem was, it was just a problem, nothing to fear." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Name of the Wind
"Expect the best, prepare for the worst." - Muhammad Ali Jinnah
"Only three things can change our lives dreams, suffering and love." -Paulo Coelho-
"I like children they are tasty." -- Convicted serial killer and cannibal Albert Fish, 1870-1936
"Nothing is more responsible for the good old days than a bad memory." -Franklin Pierce Adams
"If a boy falls for a girl that's out of his league and there's no one around to hear him, does he make a sound? The answer is "hell" and the first 2 letters of nothing" - Rudy Francisco
"To argue with a man who has renounced the use and authority of reason, and whose philosophy consists in holding humanity in contempt, is like administering medicine to the dead, or endeavoring to convert an atheist by scripture." - Thomas Paine, The American Crisis
"Sometimes I wish for falling Wish for the release Wish for falling through the air To give me some relief Because falling is not the problem When I'm falling I'm in peace It's only when I hit the ground It causes all the grief"  Florence + The Machine
"Trying to speed project schedule by reducing testing is like trying to lose weight by donating blood."  Dr. Klaus Leopold
"And the air was full of Thoughts and Things to Say. But at times like these, only the Small Things are ever said. Big Things lurk unsaid inside." - Arundhati Roy, The God of Small Things
"One of life's cruel ironies is that as we age, we seem to become more aware of our bad habits but less inclined to change them."
"Experience is the only teacher we have. we may talk and reason all our lives, but we shall not understand a word of truth."
"Take risks in your life, If you win, you can lead! If you lose, you can guide!
"However beautiful the strategy, you should occasionally look at the results."  Winston Churchill
"I do not write experimental music. My experimenting is done before I write the music. Afterward it is the listener who must experiment."  Edgard Varse
"Imagination is more important than knowledge. Knowledge is limited. Imagination encircles the world." - Albert Einstein
""You don"t have to control your thoughts. You just have to stop letting them control you." (-Dan Millman)
"When an actor comes to me and wants to discuss his character, I say, "It"s in the script." If he says, "But what"s my motivation?, " I say, "Your salary."" -Alfred Hitchcock
"People do not wish to appear foolish; to avoid the appearance of foolishness, they are willing to remain actually fools." -Alice Walker
"A hater is a person whose jealousy of another person success or achievements makes them verbally nit-pick any flaws no matter how small or just make up flaws in order to somehow try and belittle the successful person." -Rai M. Teves
"The will to win, the desire to succeed, the urge to reach your full potential these are the keys that will unlock the door to personal excellence. " -Confucius
"Women are Equal and Better." - Dennis Wilmeth
"Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Whoever drinks beer, he is quick to sleep; whoever sleeps long, does not sin; whoever does not sin, enters Heaven! Thus, let us drink beer!" - Martin Luther
"No block of marble starts out as a work of art" - The same friend that said the other quote on my profile
"Real happiness is cheap enough, yet how dearly we pay for its counterfeit." - Hosea Ballou
"In the end, the best thing you have is not money, but how much experience you've gained in life." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"It"s not the size of the dog in the fight, it"s the size of the fight in the dog." - Mark Twain
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." William Shakespeare
"Everyone has a chapter that they don"t read aloud." -Unknown
'Longing is the agony of the nearness of the distant.' - Martin Heidegger
"Youth is the gift of nature, but age is a work of art."Garson Kanin
"Find what you love and let it kill you." -Bukowski
"Death smiles at us all; all we can do is smile back." - Marcus Aurelius
"We are buried beneath the weight of information, which is being confused with knowledge; quantity is being confused with abundance and wealth with happiness. We are monkeys with money and guns." - Tom Waits
"It's only after we've lost everything that we're free to do anything." - Chuck Palahniuk
"There are two types of drug dealers in this world.
"Dude this is shitty car mods, they will talk about dicks more than a audio porno." Me
"You will find it necessary to let things go, simply for the reason that they are too heavy." C Joybell C
"Women must take Equality by winning political offices. Men will not give you Equality." - Dennis Wilmeth
"If you fall into darkness, don't expect to get out all at once: you'll bounce on the ground before flying again" - This Sad Man
"Suffering is a very good indicator you are doing something wrong" - The Universe
"Needing others is an individual weakness. But it's more than compensated as a collective strength." - This Man with Social Phobia
"I always like to look on the optimistic side of life, but I am realistic enough to know that life is a complex matter."
"There are fates worse than death, much worse" -Unknown
"A hallucination is a species of reality." - Terence McKenna
"This is a tough holiday for Rahm Emanuel because he"s not used to saying the word "day" after "mother."" -- Former President Obama, At a White House Correspondents" Association Dinner on the day before Mother"s Day 2009.
"Everything  including love, hate, and suffering  needs food to continue. If suffering continues, it"s because we keep feeding our suffering." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"You cannot prevent the birds of sorrow from flying over your head, but you can prevent them from building nests in your hair." -- Chinese Proverb
"It is our attitude at the beginning of a difficult task which, more than anything else, will affect its successful outcome." William James
"Perfection belongs to narrated events, not to those we live." - Primo Levi, The Periodic Table
"I would never be so arrogant to think that someone should model their life after me. But the idea of possibility . . . the idea that I get to live my dreams out in public, hopefully, will show to other folks that it"s possible. So I prefer the term "possibility model" to "role model."" -Laverne Cox
"There is nothing more painful to me at this stage in my life than to walk down the street and hear footsteps... then turn around and see somebody white and feel relieved." -- Jesse Jackson
"Hater you can find in a moment, but it takes an eternity to find a true well-wisher." - Shon Mehta, The Timingila
"An armed society is a polite society" - Robert Heinlein
"The more you sweat in peacetime, the less you bleed during war." Chinese Proverb
"You cannot simultaneously prevent and prepare for war." Albert Einstein
"The Present's Just A Pleasant Interruption To The Past." - Konstantine/Something Corporate.
"An attitude of gratitude can not only shape your day, but can completely change your life." - Chris Gardner
"The ink of the scholar is more sacred than the blood of the martyr." - Known
"A prisoner of war is a man who tries to kill you and fails, and then asks you not to kill him." Winston Churchill
"Romantic attraction is the delusion that one is loved by someone else" - Personal Quote
"You don't love me. You only love what you see" - Personal Quote
"There is a Providence that protects idiots, drunkards, children and the United States of America." - Otto von Bismarck
"As democracy is perfected, the office of president represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron." - H. L. Mencken
"This was once a love story, but now it's a thriller. Your heart's a victim, he's the killer, but you let him in, helping him, killing your heart."
"If you need help, be honest." - Peterson
"It will be said, how unreasonable is it that only one attains the goal? Should it not be by the strength of many? Which entails there are no individuals and only specimen. A specimen, and a race endowed with reason. If this becomes the only truth it does away with God, that or it becomes a fable"
"I will not die, it's the world that will end" - Ayn Rand
"Religion is a form of primitive philosophy" - Ayn Rand
"The only man I envy is the man who has not yet been to Africa  for he has so much to look forward to." Richard Mullin
" The Earth has a skin and that skin has diseases, one of those diseases is man." Fredrich Nietzsche
"The world as we have created it is a process of our thinking. It cannot be changed without changing our thinking." Albert Einstein
"The world as we have created it is a process of our thinking. It cannot be changed without changing our thinking."
"Some lies are so well disguised to resemble truth, that we should be poor judges of the truth not to believe them." anonymous
" The Earth has a skin and that skin has diseases, one of those diseases is man." Fredrich Nietzsche
"Everyone's a whore, Grace. We just sell different parts of ourselves." - Tommy Shelby - Peaky Blinders
" The Earth has a skin and that skin has diseases, one of those diseases is man." Fredrich Nietzsche
"It is an insult to a starving people to offer them religion; it is an insult to a starving man to teach him metaphysics." - Swami Vivekananda
"Some lies are so well disguised to resemble truth, that we should be poor judges of the truth not to believe them." anonymous
"To accomplish great things, we must not only act, but also dream, not only plan, but also believe." Anatole France
"Breathe. Let go. And remind yourself that this very moment is the only one you know you have for sure." -Oprah Winfrey
"There is more to being classy than simply being stylish and confident. Being classy means always being kind, respectful and polite, even to those who are unkind to you."
"In this sad world of ours, sorrow comes to all; and to the young, it comes with bitterest agony because it takes them unawares. I have had experience enough to know what I say." -Abraham Lincoln
"Not always live Sometimes in face mask, All the roles open when the story ends". Mohsin !
"You are the artist of your life. Don't give the paint brush to anyone else!" It's your life - your choices. Create the life that suits YOU!
"Who you are speaks so loudly I can't hear what you're saying." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The Universe is more complex and wise than your little brain... I mean, its parts" - The Universe
"Be patient and tough; someday this pain will be useful to you." - Ovid
"I do not fear computers. I fear the lack of them." - Isaac Asimov
"I give the fight up: let there be an end, a privacy, an obscure nook for me. I want to be forgotten even by God." - Robert Browning
"Surely you never will tamely suffer this country to be a den of thieves..." -John Hancock
"No" - Rosa Parks
"I"ll tell you what leadership is: it"s persuasion, and conciliation, and education, and patience. It"s long, slow, tough work." -- Dwight Eisenhower
"I"ll tell you wart leadership is: it"s persuasion, and conciliation, and education, and patience. It"s long, slow, tough work." -- Dwight Eisenhower
"I do not think much of a man who is not wiser today than he was yesterday." -- Abraham Lincoln
"I am not an advocate for frequent changes in laws and Constitutions. But laws and institutions must go hand in hand with the progress of the human mind. As that becomes more developed, more enlightened, as new discoveries are made, new truths discovered and manners and opinions change,
"Laws and institutions must go hand in hand with the progress of the human mind. As that becomes more developed, more enlightened, as new discoveries are made, new truths discovered and manners and opinions change, with the change of circumstances, institutions must advance." - Thomas Jefferson
"No one may threaten or commit violence against another man's person or property. Violence may be employed only against the man who commits such violence; that is, only defensively against the aggressive violence of another. - Murray Rothbard
"Rightful liberty is unobstructed action according to our will within limits drawn around us by the equal rights of others. I do not add 'within the limits of the law', because law is often but the tyrant's will, and always so when it violates the rights of the individual." - Thomas Jefferson
"Nobody succeeds beyond his or her wildest expectations unless he or she begins with some wild expectations." Ralph Charell
"Thinking you have control over your life is a common trait among happy and succesfull people; what doesn't not mean it's not a subordinated effect emerged from a far more complex cosmic causality beyond ego-narrator simple Consciousness." - My nuts
"What"s so hard about pulling a sword out of a stone? The real work"s already been done. You ought to make yourself useful and find the man who put the sword in the stone in the first place, eh?" -Terry pratchett, men at arms
"It is said that all sorrows divided are made lighter." -Heloise to Abelard
"A man's venom poisons himself more than his victim" - Charles Buxton
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow man; true nobility is being superior to your former self."- Ernest Hemingway
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power." - Abraham Lincoln
"We tell lies when we are afraid, . . . afraid of what we don't know, afraid of what others will think, afraid of what will be found out about us. But every time we tell a lie, the thing that we fear grows stronger." Tad Williams
"Don't compare your beginning to someone else's middle." Jon Acuff
"An ear is always closest to the mouth it belongs to."
"Under my administration we're fighting against the lobbyists, the special interests and the corrupt Washington politics." - Donald Trump in Elkhart, Indiana May 10, 2018
"Life is a little bit messy. We all make mistakes. No matter what type of animal you are, change starts with you." - Zootopia
"Clear eyes, full hearts, can't lose." Dillon Panthers, Friday Night Lights
"To gulp down anger is the most courageous act one can perform. One who does it becomes humble." - Meher Baba
17 Quotes About Living a Beautiful Life 8. "My mission in life is not merely to survive, but to thrive; and to do so with some passion, some compassion, some humor, and some style."
"Life is fleeting, and if you"re ever distressed, cast your eyes to the summer sky. When the stars are strung across the velvety night, and when a shooting star streaks through the blackness, turning night into day...... make a wish and think of me. Make your life spectacular. I know I did."
"Looking back on it, I might have given Al Capone a few hints. The best he could do was to operate his racket in three districts. I operated on three continents." --Medal of Honor winner and former General Smedley Butler, "War is a Racket," on how the military is used to protect big business
"If there is a God, he will have to beg my forgiveness." - Jewish prisoner WWII
"The information you have is not the information you want. The information you want is not the information..." - John Gall
"Make a fish climb a tree and it will look stupid, put the fish in water and it will look intelligent" - Unknown
"On second thoughts lets not go to Camelot.It is a silly place." - Monthy Python and the Holy Grail
"I Love Doing What I Love To Do." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Do you know the difference between education and experience? Education is when you read the fine print; experience is what you get when you don't." - Pete Seeger
"Dad always thought laughter was the best medicine, which I guess is why several of us died of tuberculosis." - Jack handy
"Get that corn outta mah face!" - Nacho Libre
"We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit." Aristotle
"The man of conservative temperament believes that a known good is not lightly to be surrendered for an unknown better."  Michael Oakeshott
"If you don't figure out how to earn money while you sleep, you will work until you die." - Warren Buffet
"My mind, my heart, and my ability to keep going even when I want to give up, are the best parts of who I am." - Addict Chick
"It's not about where your starting point is, but your end goal and the journey that will get you there." Unknown
"Always think about positives without neglecting the negatives." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The secret of change is to focus all your energy not on fighting the old but on building the new."-Socrates
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." Dr. Seuss
"wallow in the guilt of your sins"
"The way I see it, every life is a pile of good things and bad things. The good things don"t always soften the bad things, but vice versa, the bad things don"t always spoil the good things and make them unimportant." -Matt Smith, The Doctor, Doctor Who
"Our great danger in this life is not that we aim too high and fail, but that we aim too low and succeed" - The Rational Male by Rollo Tomassi
"The easiest way to be at the top of your field, is to choose a very small field." - Simone Giertz
"Life is like a dick. It's simple, soft, straight, relaxed and hanging freely. And then a woman makes it hard."
"You cannot love that which you cannot lose."
"People use statistics as a drunk man uses a lamp post - For support rather than illumination." - A. E. Housman
"Most people mistake their own perspective, shaped by their subjective and limited perception, for the absolute reality of the external world. Questioning this assumption is what advanced our research on dark matter. It is also the only thing that has ever advanced human empathy." - Dr. Lisa Randall
"Our greatest glory is not in never failing, but in rising up every time we fail."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"You can't run from self, everywhere you go you're right there" - Eddie Griffin
"People irrationally afraid of vaping don't deserve to broke the chains of tobacco" - Me
"If I tell you I'm good, you will probably say I'm boasting, but if I tell you I'm not good, you'll know I'm lying." - Bruce Lee
"If someone tells you not to look to the past it's probably good; we shouldn't dwell, right? If they tell you over and over again and in several ways, you should probably take a gander." - Annie Pinely
"Our dreams can come true if we have the courage to pursue them." Walt Disney
"Nothing can be believed which is seen in a newspaper. The man who never looks into a newspaper is better informed than he who reads them; inasmuch as he who knows nothing is nearer to truth than he whose mind is filled with falsehoods &amp; errors."  Thomas Jefferson
"We become slaves the moment we hand the keys to the definition of reality entirely over to someone else, whether it is a business, an economic theory, a political party, the White House or CNN."  B.W. Powe
"The one who follows the crowd will usually go no further than the crowd. The one who walks alone is likely to find himself in places no one has ever been before" -Albert Einstein
"You Will never be able to escape from your heart. So it's better to listen to what it has to say." -Paulo Coelho
"The open flame beckons the breeze"
"Set me free !!" said Imagination, "No you can't" whispered Priorities....
"An ear is never bigger than the mouth it belongs to."
"Do what you can, with what you have, where you are." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Friendly reminder that 'doing your best' does not mean working yourself to the point of a nervous breakdown." - Anon
"When a great thinker despises men it"s their laziness they despise. For it"s because of this they have the appearance factory products and are unworthy of companionship or instruction. The human who refuses to belong to the masses must cease being comfortable with himself and follow his conscious."
"But, even to fake it, it's no different from having real confidence" - Jerry Seinfeld
"It"s not the size of the sword but the fury in the attack."-Confucius
"Mistakes happen to everyone, but effort is a choice" -Mats Hummels
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"So all that was great in the past was ridiculed, condemned, combatted, suppressed  only to emerge all the more powerfully, all the more triumphantly from the struggle."  Nikola Tesla
"Most people would rather die than think; many do." - Bertrand Russell
"At least Barack Obama gets to keep his legacy  just like everyone got to keep their own doctor." -- Bill Lewis
"Oh, very clever, Worf. Eat any good books lately?" - Q, ST:TNG
"I don't know how you separate fact and opinion."- Rudy Giuliani (6 May 2018)
"If you cannot control your emotions, you cannot control your money." Warren Buffett
"You"re only here for a short visit. Don"t hurry, don"t worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way." Walter Hagen
"Why do you love me? I don't know" - Some local band
"Don't be pushed by your problems. Be led by your dreams." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"There are only two things you HAVE TO do in life. You HAVE TO die. You HAVE TO live until you die. You make up all the rest." -Unknown
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe."
"Be willing to take creative risks without forcing certain outcomes. You will be surprised with what you might discover along the way." Kathy Klotz
"Creating animation means creating a fictional world. That world soothes the spirit of those who are disheartened and exhausted from dealing with the sharp edges of reality." - Hayao Mayazaki
"We must focus on the positive so we can move in the direction we want." - Zaffar Khan
Governments may think and say as they like, but force cannot be eliminated, and it is the only real and unanswerable power. We are told that the pen is mightier than the sword, but I know which of these weapons I would choose" - Adrian Carton de Wiart
"Decision is a sharp knife that cuts clean and straight; indecision, a dull one that hacks and tears and leaves ragged edges behind it." - Gordon Graham
"In politics, absurdity is not a handicap." -- Attributed to Napoleon Bonaparte (French general &amp; politician [1769 - 1821])
"If you can't stand the heat, get out of the kitchen." - Harry S. Truman
"Ask what makes you come alive and go do it. Because what the world needs is people who have come alive." -Howard Thurman
"This we know: The earth does not belong to man; man belongs to the earth. This we know. All things are connected like the blood which unites one family. All things are connected." - Excerpt from "This Earth is Precious" by Chief Seattle
"Conflict is a dial which at its extremes is useless. You won't create progress by starting a war or agreeing without question. And beware, both will lead to the other" - Unknown
"True love will triumph in the end - which may or may not be a lie, but if it is a lie, it's the most beautiful lie we have." -John Green
"Fish die belly upward, and float to the surface. It's their way of falling." - Andr Gide
"Not all those who wander are lost" - Tolkien
"No religion has a monopoly on God or truth. You can access God wherever you are."
"I loved that pigeon as a man loves a woman, and she loved me. As long as I had her, there was a purpose to my life." - Nikola Tesla about his pet pigeon
"If you find yourself alone, riding in green fields with the sun on your face, do not be troubled. For you are in Elysium and you are already dead!" - Maximus Decimus Meridius
"You dont have to believe in your government to be a good american. You just have to believe in your country." - George W. Bush
"when its time for my son to go to uni i'll encourage him to study, philosophy and math. That way he'll have one eminently practical skill... And an understanding of math"
"It is philosophy that has the duty of protecting us... without it no one can lead a life free of fear or worry" - SENECA
"Christ died for our sins. Dare we make his martyrdom meaningless by not committing them?" - Jules Feiffer
"Take purposeful action toward your goals every single day."
"A friend may well be reckoned the masterpiece of nature." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"Much unhappiness has come into the world because of bewilderment and things left unsaid." - Dostoevsky
"You cannot start the next chapter of your life if you keep re-reading the last one." Michael McMillan
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." - Jiddu Krishnamurti
"There are three things all wise men fear: the sea in storm, a night with no moon, and the anger of a gentle man." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
"The higher we soar the smaller we appear to those who cannot fly." Friedrich Nietzsche
"Ask and it will be given to you; seek and you will find; knock and the door will be opened to you." Matheq 7:7  Need help finding quotes mailing list!
"Depression is like falling into a well but refusing to use any rope sent to help you because you fear it could broke or be released while going up and killing you in the falling" - A Depressed Man
"Breathe. Let go. And remind yourself that this very moment is the only one you know you have for sure."-Oprah Winfrey
"One has to remember that every failure can be a stepping stone to something better." -Col. Harland Sanders
"If you can"t stand the heat, get out of the kitchen." - Harry S. Truman
"This is the way the world ends, not with a bang but a whimper." -T.S. Eliot
"listen to what success people say, but never underestimate the power of words said by people who failed in Life" - Me
"Always walk through life as if you have something new to learn and you will." - Vernon Howard
"Don't sweat the petty things and don't pet the sweaty things." - George Carlin
"Nigga" - Johnny Rebel
"Three can keep a secret, if you get rid of two."-Little China
"The most impressive fact in American life is the substantial unity of view in regard to the fundamental questions of government and of conduct." -Nicholas Butler, 1908
"The best thing you can do for the world right now is reacquaint people with the notion that they are in fact obligated to explain what they're doing." - Nom Chompsky
"The love for all living creatures is the most noble attribute of man."  Charles Darwin
"Luck, that's when preparation and opportunity meet" Pierre Elliot Trudeau.
"im going to kill myself" -me
"An ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure." -Benjamin Franklin
"Life is the dance of the flickering flame you make before returning to the ashes" - Rudolf P Belmar
"I moaned because I had no shoes, until I met a man who had no feet." - unknown
"Intelligent individuals learn from every thing and every one; average people, from their experiences. The stupid already have all the answers."  Socrates
"I"m as against restricting access to psychedelic drugs as I am to burning books. It offends me in the same way." - Terence McKenna
"A year from now you will wish you had started today." Karen Lamb
"The truth isn't comfortable, the truth is something that burns; It burns away dead wood." - Jordan Peterson
"Power makes people ignore your sins. There is not much difference between acquiring power and achieving sainthood." - Shon Mehta, The Timingila
"Reading is nothing; comprehension is everything". Sarah Richards
"Jealousy is all the fun you think they had." (-Erica Jong)
"Physical fitness is not only one of the most important keys to a healthy body, it is the basis of dynamic and creative intellectual activity." - John F. Kennedy
"A desk is a dangerous place from which to view the world." - John le Carr
"Which do you like the bestto eat with a knife and fork, or with your fingers?" I inquired....
"Everybody's walking around with something you can't see" - Kevin Love
"Don't try to fix people; instead, try to improve people's context"
"Don't think about it" - Rick Sanchez
"Some people are just like leeches, you have to add salt to get rid of them"- Myself
"The inner machinations of my mind are an enigma." -Patrick Star
"For when all combine in every way to make everything easier and easier, there remains only one possible danger, namely, that the easiness might become so great that it would be all too great; then only one want is left, though not yet a felt want - that people will want difficulty." Kierkegaard
"The Dead can be very useful sometimes" -- Clint Eastwood
"I'm not concerned about all hell breaking loose, but that a PART of hell will break loose... it'll be much harder to detect." -George Carlin
"The problem is not that there is evil in the world, the problem is that there is good. Because otherwise, who would care?" - V. M. Varga (Fargo, TV series)
"How many times have you heard someone say, 'I don"t have a creative bone in my body.' It"s like somebody handed that person that placard to wear when they were nine, &amp; they"ve been wearing it around their neck ever since.
"Life is short, break the rules, forgive quickly, kiss slowly, love truly, laugh uncontrollably, and never regret anything that made you smile Mark Twain
"He who cannot give anything away cannot feel anything either." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I wish it grew on trees, but it takes hard work to make money." - Jim Cramer
"Everything born in this world is some sort of message. I keep sending someone a message of love. In the middle of this vast universe, we met each other. An infinite power lies in the hidden possibilities Of our meeting, endless beginnings." -Kokia "Infinity"
"Fortune favors those who ignore her" -Aya
"The mind is endless. You put me in a dark solitary cell, and to you that's the end, to me it's the beginning, it's the universe in there, there's a world in there, and I'm free."
"The superior man is modest in his speech, but exceeds in his actions." - Confucius
"You can"t always control the thoughts that pop into your head, but you decided what to dwell on."
"The only thing standing between you and your goal is the story you keep telling yourself as to why you can't achieve it." Jordan Belfort
"If someone tries to convince you they're the devil, first make sure they aren't merely some guy who managed to speak louder than god." - Real Guyman
"Do not dwell in the past, do not dream of the future, concentrate the mind on the present moment." - Buddha
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." - Dr. Seuss
"One of the first signs of the beginning of understanding is the wish to die." - Franz Kafka
"You are free, and that is why you are lost." - Franz Kafka
"The meaning of life is that it stops." - Franz Kafka
"The truth is you don"t know what is going to happen tomorrow. Life is a crazy ride, and nothing is guaranteed."
"The Cube is an imitation of life itself - or even an improvement on life" - Erno Rubik
"Press forward. Do not stop, do not linger in your journey, but strive for the mark set before you." George Whitefield
"Dance like no one is watching, sing like no one is listening, love like you've never been hurt, and fuck like a goddamn retard." - Norm Macdonald
"Calculus is fun, and it's so easy. I don't get what all the fuss is about."  Sam Einstein, Albert's great grandson.
"You're never poor, when you're doing something creative." Ice Cube
"I don't think that I'm that lazy. I think everything else is just happening too fast." - Kelley Deal
"Aim above morality. Be not simply good, be good for something." - Henry David Thoreau
"I've got a bad case of the 3:00 am guilts - you know, when you lie in bed awake and replay all those things you didn't do right? Because, as we all know, nothing solves insomnia like a nice warm glass of regret, depression and self-loathing." - D.D. Barant, Dying Bites
"You get someone who stays up all night torturing himself mentally over the question of whether or not there's a dog." - David Foster Wallace, Infinite Jest
"Yes, man is mortal, but that would be only half the trouble. The worst of it is that he's sometimes unexpectedly mortalthere's the trick!" - Mikhail Bulgakov, The Master and Margarita
"what need is there to weep over parts of life? The whole of it calls for tears." -Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"what need is there to weep over parts of life? The whole of it calls for tears." -Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music" Friedrich Nietzsche
"History is a foreign country they do things differently there."
"Not I, not any one else, can travel that road for you. You must travel it for yourself." - Walt Whitman
"Even if nothing lurks beneath the surface of the world but madness, I'm glad to know there is something more. That this isn't everything." Whyborne &amp; Griffin
"We can't stop our judgmental thoughts, but we don't have to encourage or believe in them either." - Kristin Neff
"You don't want to beat yourself up for beating yourself up in the vain hope that it will somehow make you stop beating yourself up." - Kristin Neff, Self-Compassion
"All secrets become deep. All secrets become dark. That's in the nature of secrets."- Cory Doctorow, Someone Comes to Town, Someone Leaves Town.
"All are lunatics, but he who can analyze his delusion is called a philosopher." - Ambrose Bierce
"Time heals everything is not always true, you just learn to accept and hide emotions."
"When faced with 2 choices, simply toss a coin. It works not because it settles the question for you. But because in that brief moment when the coin is in the air you suddenly know what you are hoping for." - Anonymous
"Innocence is good and should be preserved, but shouldn't be a priority in of itself. Romanticize innocence too much and you'll lose sight of the things that subsidize innocence, then snakes try to give you apples and it gets weird." - Wilith
"I'm unnervingly polite, but i'm also capably violent." - Henry Rollins.
"She is passion embodied, a flower of melodrama in eternal bloom."  Dostoyevsky
"I don't want to know what the law is. I want to know who the judge is." - Roy Cohn
"Political language  is designed to make lies sound truthful and murder respectable, and to give an appearance of solidity to pure wind."  George Orwell
"Many of the truths we cling to depend greatly on our point of view."  Obi Wan Kenobi
"There's a lot of beauty in ordinary things. Isn't that kinda the point?"
"Nobody who ever gave his best regretted it." -- George S. Halas, Head Coach Chicago Bears (1933-42, 1946-55, 1958-67)
"If on your own you can fulfill the vision you have for your life and work, then you are aiming too low." -John Maxwell
"If you want to solve the most immediate problem if not the biggest one, stand up to the guy who's worried about graffiti on a bridge that needs maintenance." - A british comedian, probably
"You don't have to see the whole staircase. Just take the first step." Martin Luther King
"Yesterday, you said tomorrow." Nike
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves." - Carl Jung
"We should ban guns"-people who have never been threatened physically
"As our island of knowledge grows, so does the shore of our ignorance." - John Archibald Wheeler
"You don't owe anyone an apology. We do what we can to be happy." -Casual, Tv.
"There"s only two things I can"t stand in this world. People who are intolerant of other people"s cultures and the Dutch." [Nigel Powers]
"There's no problem living a double life. It's the triple, and quadruple lives that get you in the end."
"Drink from the well of your self and begin again." -Charles Bukowski
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside while still alive. Never surrender." - Tupac Shakur
"My heart is a cathedral. Widows, ghosts and lovers sit and sing in the dark, arched marrow of me."  Segovia Amil
'teddy wished that his mother were still alive so she could teach her grandkids you had to get hard, strong. the world didn't give a shit. it didn't bestow. it took.' dennis lehane, 'shutter island'
"I"ve learned that you shouldn"t go through life with a catcher"s mitt on both hands; you need to be able to throw something back." - Maya Angelou
"I"ll change the memories of the love I was lucky to come across into kindness It"ll continue on endlessly to the future I just wanna be with you on this road forever ." -Misia ""
"A vigilante is just a man lost in the scramble for his own gratification. He can be destroyed or locked up. But if you make yourself more than just a man, if you devote yourself to an ideal, and if they can't stop you, then you become something else entirely. .... " - Ducard (Batman Begins)
"After all, a lion can eat only so much meat after the kill."
"All men dream: but not equally. Those who dream by night in the dusty recesses of their minds wake in the day to find that it was vanity: but the dreamers of the day are dangerous men, for they may act their dreams with open eyes, to make it possible."  T.E. Lawrence
"If the Party could thrust its hand into the past and say of this or that event, it never happenedthat, surely, was more terrifying than mere torture and death." - George Orwell, 1984
"I'm fairly convinced at this point that many of the world's problems can be chalked up to people trying a bit too hard to be avant-garde. How shall we address them?" - Tom Dickharry
"I think God, in creating man, somewhat overestimated his ability." - Oscar Wilde
"Irony is wasted on the stupid." - Oscar Wilde
"I think being in love with life is a key to eternal youth." Doug Hutchison
"If you want to overpower the entire world merely by just one action, then put restraint upon your tongue speaking ill of others" - Chanakya
"As long as the world is turning and spinning, we're gonna be dizzy and we're gonna make mistakes." - Mel Brooks
"Don't underestimate the value of doing nothing, of just going along, listening to all the things you can't hear, and not bothering." -Winnie the Pooh
"I"m satisfied with making true choices and finding the woman I love, Angie, and building a family that I love so much." - Brad Pitt
"Life is too deep for words, so don"t try to describe it, just live it." - C. S. Lewis
"Happiness doesn"t depend on any external conditions, it is governed by our mental attitude." - Dale Carnegie
"Tragedy is a tool for the living to gain wisdom, not a guide by which to live." - Robert F. Kennedy, Former Senator and Attorney General of the United States, March 18th, 1968.
"Elon Musk himself gives humanity a 5% chance of surviving AI and he is a Disney-level optimist"
"If everyone is special, then no one is. If everyone gets a trophy, trophies become meaningless."  David McCullough
"How can a woman be expected to be happy with a man who insists on treating her as if she were a perfectly normal human being." Oscar Wilde
"It is only when we forget all our learning that we begin to know." - Henry David Thoreau
"My mind is like a racing engine, tearing itself to pieces because it is not connected up with the work for which it was built." - Arthur Conan Doyle (Sherlock Holmes)
"When intelligent people read, they ask themselves a simple question: What do I plan to do with this information?"  Ryan Holiday
"Proust says memory is of two kinds. There is the daily struggle to recall where we put our reading glasses, and there is a deeper gust of longing that comes from the bottom of the heart, involuntarily, at sudden times, for surprising reasons." Anne Carson
"Nice guys finish first. If you don't know that, then you don't know where the finish line is." - Garry Shandling
"The blessing in life is finding the torture you are comfortable with. Find the torture your comfortable with and you"ll do fine. You master that, you"ve mastered life." - Jerry Seinfeld
"True friendship comes when the silence between two people is comfortable."  David Tyson
"The strength of a man"s virtue should not be measured by his special exertions, but by his habitual acts." - Blaise Pascal
"A Pessimist sees the glass as half empty; A Cub Fan wonders when it's gonna spill." - Mike Royko
"When cameron was in egypt"s land....
"But fear no more! I would not take this thing, if it lay by the highway. Not were Minas Tirith falling in ruin and I alone could save her, so, using the weapon of the Dark Lord for her good and my glory. No, I do not wish for such triumphs, Frodo son of Drogo." - Faramir
"An eye for an eye only ends up making the whole world blind" -Mahatma Gandhi
"Until the lion learns how to write, every story will glorify the hunter" -African Proverb
"Fear is the mother of foresight." - Thomas Hardy
"Ever tried? Ever failed? No matter. Try again. Fail again. Fail better." Samuel Beckett
"You can only become truly accomplished at something you love. Don"t make money your goal. Instead, pursue the things you love doing, and then do them so well that people can"t take their eyes off you."  Maya Angelou
"We all run on two clocks. One is the outside clock, which ticks away our decades and brings us ceaselessly to the dry season. The other is the inside clock, where you are your own timekeeper and determine your own chronology, your own internal weather and your own rate of living..."
"If you can dream it, you can do it." Walt Disney
"If you want others to be happy, practice compassion. If you want to be happy, practice compassion. " Dalai Lama
"Yesterday is not ours to recover. but tomorrow is ours to win or lose." - Lyndon B. Johnson
"I think I like my brain best in a bar fight with my heart. I think I like myself a little broken, with rough edges, a little harder to grasp. I like poetry better than therapy anyway. The poems never judge me for healing wrong." - Clementine von Ridacs
"They broke the mold, then made me" -- festermoronica
"They broke the mold, them made me" -- festermoronica
"Insane people are always sure that they are fine. It is only the sane people who are willing to admit that they are crazy."- Nora Ephron
"Show me the heart unfettered by foolish dreams and I'll show you a happy man" -Tennyson "But only in their dreams can men be truly free. Twas always thus, and always thus will be" -Keating Dead Poet Society
"We are here to laugh at the odds and live our lives so well that Death will tremble to take us."
"Some people never go crazy. What truly horrible lives they must lead." - Charles Bukowski
"The free soul is rare, but you know it when you see it - basically because you feel good, very good, when you are near or with them." - Charles Bukowski
"Happiness is neither virtue nor pleasure, nor this thing or that, but simple growth. We are happy when we are growing." - W. B. Yeats
"Never cut a tree down in the wintertime. Never make a negative decision in the low time. Never make your most important decisions when you are in your worst moods. Wait. Be patient. The storm will pass. The spring will come."
"And now, love has become this thing of 'Oh, I've got to find my soulmate. I've got to find the perfect person that makes me feel this amazing feeling, brings out a light inside of me that's on all the time.' And, you know, that actually seems pretty crazy." - Aziz Ansari (Click for full quote)
"If you're quiet, you're not living. You've got to be colorful and noisy and lively." - Mel Brooks
"A lot of truth is said in jest." - Eminem
"The pain I feel now is the happiness I had before. That's the deal." - CS Lewis
"Closure is a greasy little word which, moreover, describes a nonexistent condition. The truth is that nobody gets over anything." Martin Amis
"Living life in harmony, you can't go on living alone That's what the pains that I have so much of, that I can't tell all of, told me. Be it a road that we walk together, it should also be a road, that we build together."-Misia "Life In Harmony"
"Pressure is a chance to prove yourself"
"Don"t tell your problems to people: eighty percent don"t care; and the other twenty percent are glad you have them." - Lou Holtz
"The melted snow A breath that awaits spring A sudden smile The sun after the rain The moonlight through clouds The night sky will bring us a new dawn Let's sing for tomorrow Let's sing until our voices grow hoarse I'll sing to you Under the same sky, we'll face this together." -Misia ""
"I want to put a 'ding' in the universe" - Steve Jobs
[QUESTION] I'm looking for a quote from a Feudal Japanese Lord or Samurai about. . .
"Every great dream begins with a dreamer." - Harriet Tubman
"Let's get screwed, I don't care! You fucked the world up now, we'll fuck it all back down..."  Janelle Mone &amp; Zo Kravitz
"A meaningful silence is always better than a meaningless words."
"Courage is knowing what not to fear." Plato
"Challenges are what make life interesting. Overcoming them is what makes life meaningful."  Joshua Marine
"We must all either wear out or rust out, every one of us. My choice is to wear out." -Theodore Roosevelt
"Nothing makes the earth seem so spacious as to have friends at a distance; they make the latitudes and longitudes."  Henry David Thoreau
"If you want to awaken all of humanity, awaken all of yourself." Lao Tzu
"Friendship is born at that moment when one person says to another: "What! You too? I thought I was the only one."  C.S. Lewis
"Make sure your worst enemy doesn"t live between your two ears" - Laird Hamilton
"I mean, jeez, no one clicked "like" on the meme you posted four minutes ago and you think that"s a reason to kill yourself?" Katharine Miller
"It"s all just a cosmic joke."  Katriel Montgomery
"Life is short, but not short enough." - Garry Shandling
"Once you realize how beautiful you are, you will find it hard to keep the company of those who do not." Unknown
"As long as I live, I'll hear waterfalls and birds and winds sing. I'll interpret the rocks, learn the language of flood, storm, &amp; the avalanche. I'll acquaint myself with the glaciers and wild gardens, &amp; get as near the heart of the world as I can." -John Muir
"Instead of blaming ourselves, we blame cats."  Katriel Montgomery
"Have fun in your command. Don"t always run at a breakneck pace. Take leave when you"ve earned it, spend time with your families. " Colin Powell
"Frustration is the first step toward improvementIt"s only when I face frustration and use it to fuel my dedication that I feel myself moving forward."John Bingham
"Evil isn't the real threat to the world. Stupid is just as destructive as Evil, maybe more so, and it's a hell of a lot more common. What we really need is a crusade against Stupid. That might actually make a difference." - Jim Butcher
"You can go out for lunch, relax at home, sit in the park, or anything that will make your wife feel special" - Zaffar Khan
"May Day is not an ordinary day because it is a day that cherishes the extraordinary people, The workers!"-Mehmet Murat ildan
"Those who have a "why" to live, can bear with almost any "how"." - Viktor Frankl
"it"s all just a cosmic joke."  Katriel Montgomery
"I am learning every day to allow the space between where I am and where I want to be to inspire me and not terrify me." - Tracee Ellis Ross
"Most people die at 27, we just bury them at 72"
"If you know how to use your mind correctly you can create everything you want in life" - Zaffar Iqubal Khan
"But who in war will not have his laugh amid the skulls" - Winston Churchill
"Turn your obstacles into opportunities and your problems into possibilities." - Roy T. Bennett
"Happiness does not depend on outward things, but on the way we see them." - Leo Tolstoy
"I always tell the truth, even when I lie" - Tony Montana
"You are not a drop in the ocean. You are the entire ocean in a drop." - Rumi
"Maybe the poets are right. Maybe love is the only answer." - Woody Allen
"The only thing between me and greatness is me." - Woody Allen
"Even back then, I exuded self-confidence, and that drives women crazy." - Larry David
"Free back stage passes to a shitshow aren't worth it when you know you'll be handed a mop and a bucket." -u/da_chicken
- "Life's short. Anything could happen, and it usually does, so there is no point in sitting around thinking about all the ifs, ands and buts." - Amy Winehouse
"Death is nothing to us, since when we are, death has not come, and when death has come, we are not." -
"Be strong but not rude. Be kind but not weak. Be bold but don"t bully. Be humble but not timid. Be confident but not arrogant."
"Opinion is the medium between knowledge and ignorance."  Plato
"Don't depend too much on anyone in this world because even your shadow leaves you in the darkness"- ibn taymiyyah
"It takes 20 years to build a reputation and five minutes to ruin it. If you think about that, you'll do things differently." -Warren Buffet
"I want to keep your name as my beloved one Until I close my eyes and fall asleep, I want to call your name Yes, I always call your name, your beautiful name." -Misia ""
"As you always worry, You say that foolish dreams are poisonous." -Insooni
"Man lowers his head and lunges into civilization, forgetting the days of his infancy when he sought truth in a snowflake or a stick. Man forgets the wisdom of the child." - Jack Kerouac
"If scientific analysis were conclusively to demonstrate certain claims in Buddhism to be false, then we must accept the findings of science and abandon those claims." - Dalai Lama XIV
...the party of Conservatism and that of Innovation are very old,.. Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I haven't a particle of confidence in a man who has no redeeming petty vices whatsoever."  Mark Twain
"We"ve got CNN here. CNN loves breaking news and congratulations you did it. You broke it." -Michelle Wolf
"'Give them Bread and Circuses!'... But now they have taken away the bread and all we are left with is the circus." - Anonymous
"The problem with fire is it must destroy to survive."
"Always walk through life as if you have something new to learn and you will." Vernon Howard
"'Give them Bread and Circuses!'...But now they have taken away the bread and all we are left with is the circus."
"It is better to offer no excuse than a bad one." George Washington
"Give suffering a meaning with a selective goal to fight for and you'll be a happy person that struggles with a smile on its face: like the Hero on the Way. Try to avoid every possible discomfort in life and your pain will lead you to suicide." - Life Itself
"Muddy water is best cleared by leaving it alone." Alan Watts
"Youth is a blunder; manhood a struggle; old age a regret." - Benjamin Disraeli
"Inspiration is hard to come by. You have to take it where you find it." - Bob Dylan
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace" Jimi Hendrix.
"There is nothing that can take the pain away. But eventually, you will find a way to live with it. There will be nightmares. And everyday when you wake up, it will be the first thing you think about. Until one day, it will be the second thing." - Raymond 'Red' Reddington
"The world is full of magical things patiently waiting for our wits to grow sharper." - Bertrand Russell
"It is difficult to find happiness within oneself, but it is impossible to find it anywhere else." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"When did it become okay to be more offended by what someone with no power says than by what someone with power does?" -- Neil deGrasse Tyson
"Life is a series of lessons for future tests" - source unknown, please help
"We have in the past argued over the values to be applied to objective reality... but never the existence of... objective reality itself." -Michael Hayden, former C.I.A. and N.S.A. director.
"People seldom refuse help, if one offers it in the right way." - A. C. Benson
"There are no friends, only future enemies." - Adolf Hitler
"Kanye doesn't care about black people" - ?uestlove
"All of our behavior results from the thoughts that precede it." - Wayne Dyer
"If you don't stick to your values when they're being tested, they're not values: they're hobbies." Jon Stewart
"I'll dropkick your goldfish" - Random Drunk Guy
"Avoiding complexity reduces bugs." -Linus Torvalds
"People make mistakes. It"s a part of growing up, and you never really stop growing" -Duke of Nuts, Adventure Time
"A friend is one who knows you and loves you just the same."  Elbert Hubbard
"The key is to keep company only with people who uplift you, whose presence calls forth your best." - Epictetus
"The world breaks everyone, and afterward, some are strong at the broken places." Ernest Hemmingway
"Picture in your mind the able, earnest, useful person you desire to be, and the thought you hold is hourly transforming you into that particular individual you so admire." - Elbert Hubbard
"El tigre y el len pueden ser ms fuertes, pero el lobo no acta en el circo"
"If you are not willing to risk the usual, you will have to settle for the ordinary." - Jim Rohn.
"I'm not mad at anyone. This is just something I wanted to do for myself". - Comedian Garry Shandling on what his suicide note says
"Life should not only be lived, it should he celebrated "
"For in the real world, or so it seems to me, it is almost always women and not men who are waiting under windows, always disappointed"
"The world could be anything, you know, It could be a solid state matrix of some sort. It could be an illusion. It could be a dream. I mean it really could be a dream." - Terence McKenna
"To your wife, her birthday is a day to be celebrated and she should be made to feel special." - Zaffar Iqubal Khan
"In physics most of the big breakthroughs occur with young people, because they haven't been in the system long enough to understand what's impossible" -Tom Campbell
"Why make enemies when you can make friends?"
"Music is a very expensive noise" - Leopold II (King of Belgium)
"Well son, if you're smelling shit everywhere you may want to look under your shoe". -unknown
"When one is in love, one always begins by deceiving one's self, and one always ends by deceiving others. That is what the world calls a romance." - Oscar Wilde
"I'm not the protagonist of a novel or anything. I'm just a college student who likes to read, like you could find anywhere. But... if, for argument's sake, you were to write a story with me in the lead role, it would certainly be... a tragedy."-Ken Kaneki Tokyo Ghoul.
"There is a charm about the forbidden that makes it unspeakably desirable." - Mark Twain
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it". -Confucius
"As I grow older, I pay less attention to what men say. I just watch what they do." - Andrew Carnegie
"Worrying about scarcity is our culture's version of post-traumatic stress. It happens when we've been through too much, and rather than coming together to heal (which requires vulnerability), we're angry and scared and at each other's throats." - Bren Brown, Daring Greatly (2012)
"The greatest gift of life is friendship, and I have received it."  Hubert H. Humphrey
"I said, watch what you say or they'll be calling you a radical. A Liberal, oh fanatical, criminal." - Supertramp (1979)
"Those who want to live, let them fight, and those who do not want to fight in this world of eternal struggle do not deserve to live." - Adolf Hitler (Mein Kampf)
"Life"s a rollercoaster. You"re up one minute; you"re down one minute. But who doesn"t like rollercoasters? " - Conor McGregor
"And suddenly you know: It"s time to start something new and trust the magic of beginnings." Meister Eckhart
"Death is the destination we all share, no one has ever escaped it. And that is as it should be because death is very likely the single best invention of life." - Steve Jobs
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right  for you"ll be criticized anyway." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Families break up when people take hints you don"t intend - Robert Frost
"If we had no faults of our own, we would not take so much pleasure in noticing those of others." - Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"The world is changed by your example, not by your opinion." - Paulo Coelho
'A fool thinks himself to be wise, but a wise man knows himself to be a fool.' - Yan-Bo
"You cannot separate the person from its context" - Ortega y Gasset ("synthesis")
" A memorandum is written not to inform the reader but to protect the writer." Dean Acheson
"People don"t have ideas, ideas have people." -Carl Jung
"My destination is no longer a place, rather a new way of seeing." Marcel Proust
"I realized my character was my fate so I dove into myself." Heraclitus
"The man who starts out going nowhere, generally gets there." - Dale Carnegie
"Get the truth out there and stand by it with strength." - /u/tushmytralala
"Perfection itself is imperfection." - Vladimir Horowitz
"When it comes to protecting your online privacy and security, treat your data as if it were money."
"Do You Ever Wonder Why They Make You Work 40 Hours? Because 41 Might Kill A Bitch" - Dave Chappelle
"Remember that no matter how cool you think you may be, you"re not cool enough to look down on anyone ever." - Paul Walker
........ the most important thing we ever give each other is our attention." - Rachel Naomi Remen
"I want a soul mate who can sit me down, shut me up, tell me ten things I don"t already know, and make me laugh. I don"t care what you look like, just turn me on."
"My story matters because I matter." (-Brene Brown)
"If you feel something don't let peer pressure manipulate you" - Kanye West
"To the generous mind - Benjamin Franklin
"To speak gratitude is courteous - Johannes Gaertner
"A great many people think - William James
"Donald Trump is not the heart attack of democracy, he is the gum disease of democracy" - The Atlantic"s, David Frum
"The happiness of your life depends - Marcus Aurelius
"I want to be an expert in different fighting styles, new training methods, new ways of thinking." - Conor McGregor
"If you look back on your life and the words that leap to mind are "alone," "tired" and "frail," maybe you"ve been cheating yourself of the things really worth living for." -Scheherazade 'Sadie' Keating
'We're all the same, yet so different". - Ambacha Vyke
"Thousands of geniuses live and die undiscovered  either by themselves or by others."  Mark Twain
"Do not indoctrinate your children. Teach them how to think for themselves, how to evaluate evidence, and how to disagree with you." - Richard Dawkins
"Tomorrow we march on the... oh God. Something smells like ASS." - George Washington
"Your relationship with yourself sets the tone for every other relationship you have." -Robert Holden
"An error doesn"t become a mistake until you refuse to correct it." - John F. Kennedy
"Always be nice." - unknown
"A leader gives articulation to the imagination of the population." - Jordan B. Peterson
"If you want to find out who your friends are you can do two things: invite them to a party or go to jail. You will soon find that you don't have any friends." -Charles Bukowski
"The fears that we don't face become our limits"
"Love can sometimes be magic. But magic can sometimes...just be an illusion." - Javan
" "He has achieved success who has worked well, laughed often, and loved much." - Elbert Hubbard
_
(After being asked how realistic it is to have a Mars colony in 50 years) "Very realistic, but to quote my brother "It's more about political science than rocket science."" -Captain Scott Kelly
(On how realistic it is to have a Mars colony in 50 years) "It's more about political science than rocket science.""-Captain Mark Kelly
"Be Yourself. Life is precious as it is. All the elements for your happiness are already here. There is no need to run, strive, search, or struggle. Just be." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"Either you repeat the same conventional doctrines everybody is saying, or else you say something true, and it will sound like it's from Neptune." - Noam Chomsky
"A champion is someone who gets up, when they can"t" - Jack Dempsey
"Girls aren't beautiful, they're pretty. Beautiful is too heavy a word to assign to a girl. Women are beautiful because their faces show that they know they have lost something and picked up something else."
"Happiness comes in small moments when you're pursuing the big stuff. After a while, the small moments become the point. This is especially true in tough times. When the world seems to be falling apart, you still have your little touchstones of joy." -Marcia Menter
" It is easier to fight for one's principles than to live up to them." Alfred Adler
"the more that you read,the more things you will know.the more that you learn,the more places you will go."
"Just because your heart beats, doesn't mean you are alive." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves." Carl Jung
"The way you tell your story to yourself matters." -Amy Cuddy
"A false friend is more dangerous than an open enemy." - Francis Bacon
"So many of our dreams at first seem impossible. Then they seem improbable. And then, when we summon the will, they soon become inevitable." Christopher Reeve
"Perfection is not attainable, but if we chase perfection we can catch excellence." - Vince Lombardi
"Every generation has the obligation to free men's minds for a look at new worlds... to look out from a higher plateau than the last generation." -Ellison Onizuka
"Youth is happy because it has the ability to see beauty. Anyone who keeps the ability to see beauty never grows old."  Franz Kafka
"When we give ourselves compassion, the tight knot of negative self-judgment starts to dissolve, replaced by a feeling of peaceful, connected acceptance--a sparkling diamond that emerges from the coal." - Kristin Neff
"Compassion is not only relevant to those who are blameless victims, but also to those whose suffering stems from failures, personal weakness, or bad decisions." - Kristin Neff
"Asking me to Define myself is like asking me to bite my own teeth" - Allan Watts
"The history of all hitherto existing society is the history of class struggles." --Karl Marx
"I wanna have friends that I can trust, who love me for the Man I am not the man that I was." - The Avett Brothers
"Hop off my mother fucking dick." - Me 30/female/soccer mom
"If black people didn't play (NFL) football; it would be rugby." D.L. Hughley
"Beware of the spiritual man living in a material world." - u/evolutionape
"The truth is, everyone is going to hurt you. You just got to find the ones worth suffering for." - Bob Marley
"I understand that McDonald's recently released its own chicken sandwich. I feel that strategically detonating several of their garish, pathetic little restaurants will prove effective in convincing them of their error." - Colonel Sanders
"Human beings by nature want happiness and do not want suffering. With that feeling everyone tries to achieve happiness and tries to get rid of suffering, and everyone has the basic right to do this. ... Basically, from the viewpoint of real human value we are all the same." - the Dalai Lama
"The messiness cannot go into the program; it piles up around the programmer."  Ellen Ullman
"Everything that needs to be said has already been said. But, since no one was listening, everything must be said again." - Andr Gide
"A head full of fears has no space for dreams." Unknown
"Loneliness is the poverty of self; solitude is the richness of self."  May Sarton
"Knowing is not enough. We must apply. Willing is not enough. We must do." Author Unknown
"let us face it, there is no Planet B" - Emmanuel Macron on climate change
"A to-do list that isn"t properly prioritized is just a disorganized mess of things that either won"t get done or will get done poorly."  Brent Gleeson
"Just as the body can, given time and rest, heal itself from injury, so, too, does the mind have its own defenses. The chief among these is oblivion: the merciful darkness that shields mind and memory from the greatest of horrors." - Jack Walters, Dark Corners of the Earth
"The really important kind of freedom involves attention, and awareness, and discipline, and effort, and being able truly to care about other people and to sacrifice for them, over and over, in myriad petty little unsexy ways, every day." - David Foster Wallace, Infinite Jest
"Surround yourself with people who share your passion for success" - Ricky Morgan
"A surprise, to be sure, but a welcome one." - the senat
"We are what we repeatedly do, excellence therefore is not an act but a habit" -Aristotle
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream." Les Brown
"If one dream should fall and break into a thousand pieces, never be afraid to pick one of those pieces up and begin again." Flavia Weedn
"Learning to let go should be learned before learning to get. Life should be touched, not strangled." - Ray Bradbury
"Before you marry a person, you should first make them use a computer with slow Internet service to see who they really are."  Will Ferrell
"The happiness of this life depends less on what befalls you than the way in which you take it." -Elbert Hubbard
"A pessimist is somebody who complains about the noise when opportunity knocks." - Oscar Wilde
"Never be afraid to tread the path alone. Know which is your path and follow it wherever it may lead you; do not feel you have to follow in someone else's footsteps." - Eileen Caddy
"Human beings never think for themselves; they find it too uncomfortable. For the most part, members of our species simply repeat what they are told - and become upset if they are exposed to any different view." - Michael Crichton
"When there is no justice, what is the state but a robber band enlarged?" -- St. Augustine
"My primary goal is to eradicate other fast food chains. If necessary, I will resort to drastic, or even violent, methods." - Colonel Sanders
"You fasten the triggers For the others to fire/Then you set back and watch/When the death count gets higher You hide in your mansion/As young people"s blood/Flows out of their bodies/And is buried in the mud" -From Bob Dylan"s song "Masters of War"
"It is more fun to be a pirate than to join the Navy." -Steve Jobs
"It is not the mountain we conquer but ourselves." - Edmund Hillary
"I know they hatin on me, 'cause I'm the man ('cause I'm the man) I'm too trill homie (trill homie), I don't give a damn (I don't give a damn) I'm a self made (self made), trillionaire (trillionaire) I'm a self made (I'm a self made), trillionaire (trillionaire)" - Mr. Rogers
"Catch a 'lerminattus?? That's easy -- they love to sing songs about how much they don't care. Can't get enough of it. They are very much concerned, of course, else they wouldn't be singing, but rest assured they'll be in the mix somewhere freestyling to the empty spaces between notes." - Tatrus
"The world is changed by your example, not by your opinion." - Paulo Coelho
"You've got to ask yourself one question: 'Do i feel lucky?' Well, do ya, punk?" - Harry Callahan (Clint Eastwood) in Dirty Harry (1971)
"Your life is a print-out of your thoughts." -- Steve Maraboli, Life, the Truth, and Being Free
"Judging is preventing us from understanding a new truth. Free yourself from the rules of old judgments and create the space for new understanding." -- Steve Maraboli, Life, the Truth, and Being Free
"Soar with wit. Conquer with dignity. Handle with care." --Criss Jami, Killosophy
"Unless you know where you are going then you will not know how to get there." -- Stephen Richards
"Whole life is a search for beauty. But, when the beauty is found inside, the search ends and a beautiful journey begins." - Harshit Walia
"If you want to find happiness, find gratitude." --Steve Maraboli, Unapologetically You: Reflections on Life and the Human Experience
"The secret to success is constancy of purpose." -- Benjamin Disraeli
"When you live your life by poor standards, you inflict damage on everyone who crosses your path, especially those you love." -- Jordan Belfort
"The line between failure and success is so fine. . . that we are often on the line and do not know it." -- Elbert Hubbard
"When you live your life by poor standards, you inflict damage on everyone who crosses your path, especially those you love." - --Jordan Belfort
"If you are not the hero of your own story, then you're missing the whole point of your humanity." - -Steve Maraboli, Unapologetically You: Reflections on Life and the Human Experience
"Siempre encontrars un libro que te apoye. Los libros son leales." --Juan Villoro, El libro salvaje
"Inside every cynical person, there is a disappointed idealist" - George Carlin
"Make the most of the best and the least of the worst." Robert Louis Stevenson
"It is the oldest ironies that are still the most satisfying; man, when preparing for a bloody war, will orate loudly and most eloquently in the name of peace" - Alan Moore, The Watchmen
"Where there is no freedom, there is death and destruction." -Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
"I am not afraid of an army of lions led by a sheep; I am afraid of an army of sheep led by a lion." -Alexander, The Great
"But in life we don"t usually get to choose the time of our defining moments. We just have to stand and face them when they come, no matter what sort of state we"re in"- Darren Shan
"Some people make your laugh a little louder, your smile a little brighter and your life a little better. Try to be one of those people." Unknown
"The Future doesn't belong to the faint hearted, it belongs to the Brave" - Richard Nixon
"Don"t drink the Arizona in the fridge. I"m saving it for later." -Me
"If you hate your parents, the man or the establishment, don't show them up by getting wasted and wrapping your car around a tree. If you really want to rebel against your parents, out-learn them, outlive them, and know more than they do."
"You Must Be The Change You Want To See In The World."  Mahatma Gandhi
"We cannot teach people anything. We can only help them discover it within themselves." Galileo Galilei
"Forget all the reasons why it won't work and believe the one reason why it will." -Unknown
"Forgiveness is a funny thing. It warms the heart and cools the sting." - William Ward
"The wisest mind has something yet to learn." - George Santayana
"If God wanted us to fly, he would've given us tickets." - Mel Brooks
"Beware of the man who knows the answer before he understands the question." - Anonymous
"To the world you may be one person, but to one person you may be the world." -Dr. Seuss
"We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them." -Albert Einstein
"Politics ought to be the part-time profession of every citizen who would protect the rights and privileges of free people and who would preserve what is good and fruitful in our national heritage." -Dwight D. Eisenhower
"A short attention span makes all of your perceptions and relationships shallow and unsatisfying." - Eckhart Tolle
"All the bewilderment starts once you step into that little passage falling between friendship and love." - Swati Joshi
"If a barn could be blown over by a simple breeze, one should not blame the wind."
"There will always be someone who can't see your worth. Don't let it be you" - Mel Robbins
"Primitive life is very common, and intelligent life is very rare. Some say it has yet to occur on Earth." --Stephen Hawking
"Give me six hours to chop down a tree and I will spend the first four sharpening the axe." Abraham Lincoln
"Easy choices hard life Hard choices easy life" -Jerzy gregorek
"Stupidity is the friend of evil" anonymous
"Nobody can break your heart of you love yourself. If your heart was broken in the past, you broke it with the lies you believed about love. Love makes you strong; selfishness makes you weak. Love doesn't hurt." (-Don Miguel Ruiz)
"How much of your dignity will you sacrifice at the alter of social acceptance?" - Ladenstarfish
"Chill is what Cool would look like with a lobotomy and no hobbies"
"A man that never loves holds no hostage to fortune. "
"Positive thinking and negative thinking cannot operate at the same level in your mind, one needs to be the master and the one you feed it more will rule over the other." - Oscar Bimpong
"If you're interested in 'balancing' work and pleasure, stop trying to balance them. Instead make your work more pleasurable." - Donald trump, 45th President of the United States
"The most merciful thing that a large family does to one of its infant members is to kill it." - Margaret Sanger, "Women and the New Race" (Eugenics Publ. Co., 1920, 1923).
"The inhabitants of this great wilderness may live and die without ever having contact with humanity. Long may it be that way." -David Attenborough, Planet Earth Ep10
"Somewhere someone is thinking of you."
"Everybody wants to go to heaven, but nobody wants to die." - Unknown
"If your ship doesn"t come in, swim out to it."  by Jonathan Winters
"Every portrait that is painted with feeling is a portrait of the artist, not of the sitter." Oscar Wilde
"We suffer more in imagination than reality" -Seneca
"These violent delights have violent ends, And in their triumph die, like fire and powder." -Shakespeare
"Start everyday with a new hope, leave bad memories behind and have faith for a better tomorrow."
"A ship in harbor is safe  but that is not what ships are built for." John A. Shedd
"Your relationship with yourself sets the tone for every other relationship you have." Robert Holden
"He's never early. He's always late. First thing you learn is that you always gotta wait." - Lou Reed
"We rule with words. Words that forcefully communicate are the weapons that eliminate ignorance, the persuaders that sell, the tools that build success." Napoleon Bonaparte
"If you seek ends beyond your means, then sooner or later you"ll have to scale back your ends to fit your means." - Anonymous
"I guess I can go anywhere I want. I just don't know where to go." - Layne Staley
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees Opportunity In Every Difficulty."  Winston Churchill
"Training is nothing. Will is everything"- Ra'as Al Ghul
"You"re only here for a short visit. Don"t hurry, don"t worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way." Walter Hagen
"Don"t follow majority follow the truth."  Hazrat Ali (A.s)
"Gold is tested with fire, and the believer is tested with trials."  Hazrat Ali (A.s)
"You are not entitled to your opinion. You are entitled to your informed opinion. No one is entitled to be ignorant." - Harlan Ellison
"Wherever you are, be there totally." - Eckhart Tolle
"I still love the people I"ve loved, even if I cross the street to avoid them." Uma Thurman
"In school, you are taught a lesson and then given a test. In life, you are given a test that teaches you a lesson." - Tom Bodett
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." Cicero
"The only limits to the possibilities in your life tomorrow are the buts you use today." - Les Brown
"Americans will always do the right thing- after exhausting all other alternatives." -Abba Eban
"Everyday presents a new opportunity to grow and press forward to your success. Stay the course believing that where you are right now doesn't matter, as long as you are moving in the right direction." - Germany Kent
"Until they become conscious they will never rebel, and until after they have rebelled they cannot become conscious" - 1984, George Orwell
"A man can achieve his own happiness only by pursuing the happiness of others, because it is only by forgetting about his own happiness that he can become happy." - Laozi
"A jealous husband doesn't doubt his wife, but himself." --Balzac
"Some day you will find out that there is far more happiness in another's happiness than in your own." --Balzac
"An unfulfilled vocation drains the color from a person's entire existence." --Balzac
"If you have a disease of the old society, take a dose of Lenin as medication." - Pol Pot
"[Psychedelic experiences are] beyond the reach of cultural manipulation, and discovering this and exploring it is somehow the frontier of maturity. Culture is a form of enforced infantilism. It"s the last nursery, and most people never leave it." - Terence McKenna
"I'm christian, but I don't believe going to heaven, I believe earth is heaven." -larsson_
"When you want to succeed as bad as you want to breathe, then you"ll be successful." Eric Thomas
"Every great story on the planet happened when someone decided not to give up, but kept going no matter what." Spryte Loriano
"It"s not winning until someone else has lost" -The man in black. Westworld
"How people treat you is their karma; how you react is yours." Wayne Dyer
"Her soul was too deep to explore by those who always swam in the shallow end." -A.J. Lawless
"Still, instead of trusting what their own minds tell them, men have as a rule a weakness for trusting others who pretend to supernatural sources of knowledge." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Atheists have had to do absolutely no real work, because all of the religions will tell you why all of the other religions are wrong, and we're just agreeing with ALL of them!" - Matt Dillahunty
"Atheists have had to do absolutely no real work, because all of the religions will tell you why all of the other ones are wrong and we're just agreeing with ALL of them!" - Matt Dillahunty
"The most important thing you can give your kids is empathy. It is the number one tool in an artist's toolbox. You can't create art if you can't understand what someone else has been through and then to articulates it." Lin-Manuel Miranda
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees Opportunity In Every Difficulty."  Winston Churchill
"People Who Are Crazy Enough To Think They Can Change The World, Are The Ones Who Do."  Rob Siltanen
"We do a lot of things as human beings just because we can, but not because it has any value" -unknown
"Don"t ask the barber whether you need a haircut." - Warren Buffett
"Our attitude toward life determines life's attitude towards us." Earl Nightingale
"You wouldn't worry so much about what others think of you if you realized how seldom they do." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"We won"t attain maturity unless we cultivate the wisdom to discriminate which deeds of our ancestors we need to reject and which achievements we need to take inspiration from. If learning lessons from history is a mark of enlightenment, so is breaking free from it."  S.L. Bhyrappa
"We're all stories in the end. Just make it a good one, eh?" - the 11th Doctor
"Respect other people"s feelings. It might mean nothing to you, but it could mean everything to them." - Roy T. Bennett
"When you are dead, you do not know you are dead. It's only painful &amp; difficult for others. The same applies when you are stupid." -Philippe Geluck
"It isn"t what you have, or who you are, or where you are, or what you are doing that makes you happy or unhappy. It is what you think about." - Dale Carnegie
"A bank is a place that will lend you money, if you can prove that you don't need it." - Bob Hope
"You can"t save people, you can only love them."
"LET YOUR SMILE CHANGE THE WORLD BUT DON'T LET THE WORLD CHANGE YOUR SMILE."
"Better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to speak out and remove all doubt." - Abraham Lincoln
"To get something you've never had, you have to do something you've never done.
"There came a point when if a conspiracy was that powerful and subtle it became pointless to worry about it." Excession by Iain M. Banks
"Just cause you put syrup on something dont make it pancakes." -Shawn Spencer
"It"s not a lack of love, it"s a lack of friendship that makes an unhappy marriage." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Hope is like the sun. If you only believe in it when you can see it, you'll never make it through the night." - Leia Organa
"I don't know what my expectations are until they're not met." - Chuck Lorre
"Heresy is only another word for freedom of thought." - Graham Greene
"I'm such a profound believer that timing is everything; I would tattoo that on my arm." -Drew Barrymore
"Remember, concentrate on the moment. Feel, don't think. Trust your instincts." - Qui-Gon Jinn
"Be congruent, be authentic and be yourself." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Luck is like liquid: the good thing is it flows fast. The bad thing? It flows fast." - Me
"They'll often ignore me if I say 'Looks like something weird is going on.', but may just listen if I say 'God wants me to fight demons.' or 'A secret robot asked me to talk to you...'. I'm pretty sure some intelligent command decisions are called for here." - Scary Pratchett
"I just forgot" is the easiest escape. - Swati Joshi
"Logic clearly dictates that the needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few." - Spock.
"We all wish things were different sometimes. But the reality is, if they were, and if you were in that difference, you would still wish it was different."
"A song is as valuable as the artist's value for the lyrics, otherwise it means nothing" -Me during music debate
"Success is not final; failure is not fatal: It is the courage to continue that counts
"What should I do if I cast a patronus and like fifty different animals farted out and f*cked the dementor to death? I'm serious. Plz help. :(" - jk bowling
"What should I do if I cast a patronus and like fifty different animals farted out and f*cked the dementor to death? I'm serious. Plz help. :(" - jk bowling
"It's hard - some people get inspired by a feeling, but I'm mostly inspired by melodies." - Avicii
"Have a taste of my **ckle knuckle" - Slimecicle
"One day you"ll leave this world behind, so live a life you will remember." - The nights, Avicii
"Happiness dwells the heart where amazement rules over the rationalism!" - Swati Joshi
"When I was a kid, I inhaled frequently, that was the point." Barack Obama
"Take away their creature comforts, deprive them of food, sleep, sonic showers, put their lives in jeopardy over an extended period of time and those same friendly, intelligent, wonderful people... will become as nasty and as violent as the most bloodthirsty Klingon." - Quark, The Siege of AR-558
"I can't chew my water"
"Inspiration can't strike you if your guard is always up." - My Dad, just now
"Liquor and beer make us bicker and leer."
"With realization of one's own potential and self-confidence in one's ability, one can build a better world." Dalai Lama
"Put your heart, mind, and soul into even your smallest acts. This is the secret of success." - Swami Sivananda
"Men do not accept their prophets and slay them, but they love their martyrs and worship those whom they have tortured to death." - Dostoevsky
"A ship is always safe at the shore but that is not what it's built for." Albert Einstein
"People do what they do (love and work included) for two main reasons: Survival and Reproduction." - Science
"Logic will get you from A to B. Imagination will take you everywhere." -Albert Einstein, Physicist
"The pessimist complains about the wind; the optimist expects it to change; the realist adjusts the sails." William Arthur Ward
"If Plan A doesn"t work, the alphabet has 25 more letters." -Claire Cook, Author
"Choose a job that you like, and you will never have to work a day in your life." -Confucius, Philosopher
"The key to finding a happy balance in modem lives is simplicity." - Sogyal Rinpoche
"Acceptance, tolerance and forgiveness, those are life-altering lessons." Jessica Lange
"I know someday you'll have a beautiful life, I know you'll be a star in somebody else's sky, but why...why can't it be mine?" - Pearl Jam
"I know some day you'll be a beautiful star in someone's sky but why... Can't it be mine?" - Pearl Jam
"Life is either a daring adventure or nothing."-Helen Keller
"Think like a man of action, and act like a man of thought." - Henry Bergson.
"Compassion has two beautiful kids, kindness and charity!" - Swati Joshi
"There are lots of ways of being miserable, but there's only one way of being comfortable, and that is to stop running after happiness. If you make up your mind not to be happy there's no reason why you shouldn't have a fairly good time."  Edith Wharton, Ethan Frome
"The self important, always know at some level of their consciousness that their egotism is going to be punctured by humour. That's why they see it as a threat, and so dishonestly, pretend that their deficiency makes their views more substantial, when it only makes them feel bigger" - John Cleese
"Lies directly contaminate the soul" - Swati Joshi
"The essence of Western civilization is the Magna Carta, not the Magna Mac" - what is this supposed to mean?
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow; learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"I'm starting to think the great filter is probably actually just stupid people." - Richie O'Cockatoo
"If you want to learn what someone fears losing, watch what they photograph." - Unknown
"There are some people you"ll never see again. At least, not in the same way." Iain S. Thomas
100 Touching Love Quotes That Bring Inspiration To Love
"present is a tiny box not big enough to fit the ambition of rare individuals"
"When you talk about things  unless you"re a poet  a big thing becomes smaller."  David Lynch
"A problem adequately stated is a problem well on its way to being solved." - Buckminster Fuller
"Experience is simply the name we give our mistakes." - Oscar Wilde
"Love is but the discovery of ourselves in others, and the delight in the recognition." - Alexander Smith
"But the way I see it, a song stuck in your head is your mind reaching for poetry like a drowning mouth reaching for air, and you never know how beautiful air, or light, or life are until you must gasp." -Richard Harrison from On Not Losing My Father's Ashes in the Flood
"RESPECT IS THE FIRST STEP TOWARDS LOVE ".... Ajeet Kumar Prajapati
"Not all storms come to disrupt your life, some come to clear your path."
"The best view comes after the hardest climb" - Unknown
"Try getting lit once in a while." - Joseph Heller, Catch-22
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge" - Daniel J. Boorstin
"Lose an hour in the morning, and you will be all day hunting for it."
"I will stop wearing black when they make a darker color." Wednesday Addams
"Don"t be afraid of getting started, be afraid of never starting." -E.R. Hughes
"You have to go through the falling down in order to learn to walk. It helps to know that you can survive it. That"s an education in itself." - Carol Burnett
"Worrying doesn't take away tomorrow's troubles, it takes away today's peace." Anonymous
"You can buy food, but not appetite; medicine but not health; knowledge but not wisdom; glitter, but not beauty; fun, but not joy; acquaintances, but not friends; servants, but not faithfulness; leisure, but not peace. You can have the husk of everything for money, but not the kernel." -Arne Garborg
"The way to create something great is to create something simple." - Richard Koch
"Dripping water hollows out stone, not through force but through persistence." - Ovid
"My life motto is Do my best, so that I can't blame myself for anything." Magdalena Neuner
"I like Ted Cruz more than most of my other colleagues like Ted Cruz. And I hate Ted Cruz." -Senator Al Franken
"What doesn't kill you, makes you wish it had."
"A man who lies to himself, and believes his own lies, becomes unable to recognize truth, either in himself or in anyone else, and he ends up losing respect for himself and for others." (-Fyodor Dostoevsky)
"Don't let your goals defeat you, carry on."
"Our difficulties are not obstacles to the path; they are the path itself." (-Ezra Bayda)
"My fake plants died because I did not pretend to water them." -Mitch Hedberg
"The more you express yourself fully, the more people think you are boasting. The more people think you are boasting, the less people give you attention. The less people give you attention, the more privacy you have. The more privacy you have, the more you express yourself fully" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Laws: We know what they are, and what they are worth! They are spider webs for the rich and mighty, steel chains for the poor and weak, fishing nets in the hands of the government." - Pierre-Joseph Proudhon
"Associate yourself with men of good quality if you esteem your own reputation; for "tis better to be alone than in bad company." - George Washington
"To argue with a person who has renounced the use of reason is like administering medicine to the dead." - Thomas Paine
"If she ain"t 280, she ain"t a lady"
"Raise hell, praise dale"
"Anything's a dildo if you're brave enough." - Anonymous via joyreactor.com http://joyreactor.com/post/1288990
"No amount of guilt can change the past and no amount of worrying can change the future"
"The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"disappoint them early, they expect nothing later" -dad
"I"m going to make everything around me beautiful  that will be my life." Elsie De Wolfe
"It's ok if people don't like you. Most people don't even like themselves."
"Raphael paints wisdom, Handel sings it, Phidias carves it, Shakespeare writes it, Wren builds it, Columbus sails it, Luther preaches it, Washington arms it, Watt mechanizes it."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Whoever is careless with the truth in small matters cannot be trusted with important matters." Albert Einstein
"Do not follow where the path may lead. Go, instead, where there is no path and leave a trail." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Life is too deep for words, so don"t try to describe it, just live it." - C. S. Lewis
"Love is like a lost fart. If you have to force it, it's probably shit." - Stephen K. Amos
"I have never made but one prayer to God, a very short one: Oh Lord, make my enemies ridiculous. And God granted it." - Voltaire
"The most important thing is to enjoy your lifeto be happyit"s all that matters. Audrey Hepburn
"The more you praise and celebrate your life, the more there is in life to celebrate." Oprah Winfrey
"It's better to have nobody than to have someone who is half there, or doesn't want to be there." Angelina Jolie
"Sometimes you climb out of bed in the morning and you think, I'm not going to make it, but you laugh inside  remembering all the times you've felt that way." -Charles Bukowski
"Don"t wait to be successful at some future point, have a successful relationship with the present moment and be fully present in whatever you are doing. That is success." - Eckhart Tolle
"The more I get to know people, the more I like my dog." Mark Twain
"First, though, we must wake up to what our schools really are: laboratories of experimentation on young minds, drill centers for the habits and attitudes that corporate society demands..." -John Taylor Gatto
"If oxen and horses and lions had hands, and could draw with their hands and do what man can do, horses would draw the gods in the shape of horses, and oxen in the shape of oxen, each giving the gods bodies similar to their own" - - - - Xenophanes
"The past isn't over. It isn't even past." -William Faulkner
"Actual pictures of victims of war are too vulgar for my developed mind, and, they serve no service to the public." -- Barbara Bush
"Never lose sight of the fact that the most important yardstick of your success will be how you treat other people -- your family, friends, and coworkers, and even strangers you meet along the way." -- Barbara Bush
"I remember clearly breaking down and consoling my mother about my girl troubles. Instead of telling me to toughing up and try harder like any other parent would, she chose to spend the next 6 weeks training me how to be with girls"- eb Bush - Reply All: A Governors Story
"At the end of your life you will never regret not having passed one more test, not winning one more verdict, or not closing one more deal. You will regret time not spent with a husband, a friend, a child or a parent." - Barbara Bush
"The way you solve a problem, is to make it bigger" Dwight D. Eisenhower
"The single biggest problem in communication is the illusion that it has taken place." - George Bernard Shaw
"The oppressed are allowed once every few years to decide which particular representatives of the oppressing class are to represent and repress them." - Karl Marx
"We live on an island surrounded by a sea of ignorance. As our island of knowledge grows, so does the shore of our ignorance" -John Archibald Wheeler
"History with its flickering lamp stumbles along the trail of the past, trying to reconstruct its scenes, to revive its echoes, and kindle with pale gleams the passion of former days. " -Winston Churchill
"Joy seems to me a step beyond happiness. Happiness is a sort of atmosphere you can live in sometimes when you're lucky. Joy is a light that fills you with hope and faith and love." - Adela Rogers St. Johns
"Life shrinks or expands in proportion to one"s courage." - Anais Nin
"All questions were once spiritual. Since the beginning of time, spirituality and religion have been called on to fill in the gaps that science did not understand." Dan Brown
"The mystery of government is not how Washington works but how to make it stop." - P. J. O'Rourke
"An awareness of the welfare model turns our collective wealth into well being. We're not paying taxes, we're investing in our society. We're purchasing quality of life." Miek Wiking
"We rise by lifting others." Robert Ingersoll
[Quote/Source Search] "Be more than the soil in which your beliefs grow." Maybe Nietzsche(?)
[Question, not a quote] What's your favorite quotation in favor of libraries?
"Ernest Hemingway once wrote, "the world is a fine place, and worth fighting for." I agree with the second part." - Se7en
"There is only one thing that makes a dream impossible to achieve: the fear of failure." - Paulo Coelho
"The measure of who we are is what we do with what we have." - Vince Lombardi
"For you, a thousand times over." - The Kite Runner
"Unsuccessful people make decisions based on their current situations. Successful people make decisions based on Where they want to be."
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"A man must consider what a rich realm he abdicates when he becomes a conformist." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Tell me with whom you associate, and I will tell you who you are." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"The essential American soul is hard, isolate, stoic, and a killer. It has never yet melted."
"The next president to lead the way? Well it just might be yourself one day. And the press will distort everything you say... so jump in a plane and fly away!" - Animaniacs
"I"ve learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"World history is not the ground of happiness. The periods of happiness are empty pages in her."  Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel
"youth is easily deceived because it is quick to hope." - Aristotle
"Most of the time, the reasoning mind sits at the kitty table at the intuition banquet." -ThankIReddit
"We do not find boundaries, we create them". -Unknown
"Summer is delicious, rain is refreshing, wind braces up, snow is exhilarating; there is no such thing as bad weather, only different kinds of good weather." - John Ruskin
"The individual has always had to struggle to keep from being overwhelmed by the tribe. If you try it, you will be lonely often, and sometimes frightened. But no price is too high to pay for the privilege of owning yourself." - Rudyard Kipling
"The real cowards are those who pick a losing fight for fear of what others would say if they backed out"
"You can"t go back and change the beginning, but you can start where you are and change the ending." -- C.S. Lewis
"If you live long enough anything's possible." - Dr. Henry Morgan - Forever
"There is something magical about the early morning. It"s a time when the world belongs to only those few who are awake. And we walk around like kings while others remain unseen in their beds."  Shawn Blanc
"Bachelors know more about women than married men; if they didn"t they"d be married too." H. L. Mencken
"Do not raise your children the way your parents raised you; they were born for a different time. " - Ali ibn Abi Taleb (601661 A.D.)
"As a result of that [global trade], politicians will find it harder and harder to stop it in the interest of having a war. So what we are reduced to... are experimental wars. Wars under smaller and smaller areas against people who allegedly don"t matter very much." -Alan Watts, 1960s
"Mistakes are not bound by rebelliousness. People of all ages make mistakes, but when a teenager does, They are blamed because they are 'young,' while mature adults make more mistakes than teenagers ever will. "
"The risk of a wrong decision is preferable to the terror of indecision." - Maimonides
"When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Do not be embarrassed by your mistakes. Nothing can teach us better than our understanding of them. This is one of the best ways of self-education." - Thomas Carlyle
"People who idolise you will be the least forgiving should you err, because you destroy their faith in perfection" - Rudolf P Belmar
" Racism oppresses its victims, but also binds the oppressors, who sear their consciences with more and more lies until they become prisoners of those lies. They cannot face the truth of human equality because it reveals the horror of the injustices they commit. " - Alveda King
"Always be yourself, express yourself, have faith in yourself. Do not go out and look for a successful personality and duplicate it." Bruce Lee
"Love comes when you least expect it. That's why people call it falling in love. You cannot learn to fall, nor do you ever plan to. You just happen to fall. It captures you like a pitcher plant, in a split second. There's no room to think, let alone react.
"In order to be open to creativity, one must have the capacity for constructive use of solitude. One must overcome the fear of being alone." Rollo May
"The relationship between commitment and doubt is by no means an antagonistic one. Commitment is healthiest when it is not without doubt but in spite of doubt." Rollo May
"Stronger than a lover's love is a lover's hate. Incurable, in each, the wounds they make." - Euripides
"The noblest art is that of making others happy" P T Barnum
"Don"t get too comfortable with who you are at any given time  you may miss the opportunity to become who you want to be." - Jon Bon Jovi
"As long as you grab breath, you fight." - Hugh Glass (The Revenant)
"He who says he can, and he who says he can"t; are both usually right." Anonymous
"Life is shit, so you have to put happy in it or you're fucked." - My(33) mother(65) just now, ladies and gentlemen. (Paraphrased)
"Nothing is as good as it used to be, and it never was. The 'golden age of sports,' the golden age of anything, is the age of everyone's childhood." - Ken Dryden, The Game
"We live in a country where if you want to go bomb somebody, there"s remarkably little discussion about how much it might cost. But when you have a discussion about whether or not we can assist people who are suffering, then suddenly we become very cost-conscious." - Prof. Andrew Bacevich
"Brain cells last as long as you do. You"re issued 100 billion or so at birth and that is all you"re ever going to get. It is estimated you lose 500 per hour, so if you have any serious thinking to do there"s really no time to waste." -Bill Bryson
"We're all pretty bizzare. Some of us are just better at hiding it, that's all." -Andy Clark, 1985, Shermer, Illinois.
"Faced with the choice between changing one's mind and proving that there is no need to do so, almost everyone gets busy on the proof." - John Kenneth Galbraith
"I had only to wish that there be a large crowd of spectators the day of my execution and that they greet me with cries of hate." - Albert Camus, The Stranger
"The seven deadly sins of the Christian Church are: greed, pride, envy, anger, gluttony, lust, and sloth. Satanism advocates indulging in each of these 'sins' as they all lead to physical, mental, or emotional gratification." - Anton Szandor LaVey
"Life is like a flute.It may have many holes and emptiness but if you work on it carefully, it can play magical melodies."-Unknown
"Life is the art of drawing without an eraser." - John W. Gardner
"We're an empire now, and when we act, we create our own reality. And while you're studying that realityjudiciously, as you willwe'll act again, creating other new realities, which you can study too, and that's how things will sort out."  Karl Rove, 2004
"We can't trust the American people to make important decisions such as choosing a President, me and my smart friends should do that." Robert Muller
"In the beginning there was the null set. After that, things became confused." The Mathematics Bible (Colin Beveridge), Page 14
"The thing that is really hard, and really amazing, is giving up on being perfect and beginning the work of becoming yourself" Anna Quindlen
"Pick a flower on Earth and you move the farthest star." -Paul Dirac
"So live as if you were living already for the second time and as if you had acted the first time as wrongly as you are about to act now!"  Viktor Frankl
"If you're afraid - don't do it, - if you're doing it - don't be afraid!" Genghis Khan
"It's your funeral, and I'm not paying for the fucking coffin." -WB Jacobs
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"What is better ? to be born good or to overcome your evil nature through great effort ?" Paarthurnax from Skyrim
"Sometimes to do what's right we have to be steady, and give up the thing we want the most, even our dreams."- Aunt May, Spider-man 2 (2004)
"Some of the most vicious wars are fought within our own psychology. We are not taught to be kind to ourselves."  Adyashanti
"The very existence of flamethrowers proves that sometime, somewhere, someone said to themselves, 'You know, I want to set those people over there on fire, but I"m just not close enough to get the job done." - George Carlin
"May you drink so much that you lose your fear, but not so much that you lose your mind. May you eat so much that you gain your strength, but not so much that you lose your shape." -Shon Mehta, The Timingila
"Every day, I am getting closer to you." - Napoleon Bonaparte, in a letter (dated Nov 2, 1812) to his wife as his army retreated from Russia.
"I love kids. The only thing I love more than kids is doing anything I want at all times." - Sarah Silverman
"Never explain; your friends don't need it, and your enemies won't believe you anyway." -Elbert Hubbard
"All differences in this world are of degree, and not of kind, because oneness is the secret of everything." -Swami Vivekananda
"If you can never be upset about your problems because someone has it worse than you, then that must also mean you can never be happy about your life because someone else's life is better than yours..." u/NavigatorsGhost
"Everyone has a plan till they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson
"'Juvenile delinquent' is a contradiction in terms." -Lt. Col. Jean V. Dubois (Ret.) [Starship Troopers (1959)] (full quote in comments)
"When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be." - Laozi
"My natural state is an outsider. I"ve always felt outside the group, and I"ve always been analyzing the group." -Michael J. Burry
"ONLY THE DEAD HAVE SEEN THE END OF WAR" - PLATO
"You can easily judge the character of others by how they treat those who can do nothing for them or to them."  Malcolm Forbes
"But when we are troubled with the realities of this world, it can be comforting to consider other possibilities, even if these possibilities disturb us [...]" - Nobusuke Tagomi, The Man In The High Castle
"Don't limit your challenges - challenge your limits." Unknown
"...contradiction...simply disappears. And in its absence, what possible interest could there be in a list of what the President says *now* and what he said *then*? It is merely a rehash of old news, and there is nothing interesting or entertaining in that." [Neil Postman][1986]
"I didn't kill your father! He was trying to kill me, he killed himself!"- Peter Parker
"My imagination will get me a passport to hell one day." - John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"The Game Is Rigged, Burn Them All" - 2016
"The war is not meant to be won. It is meant to be continuous" -George Orwell
"There were thousands and thousands of forms of joy in the world, but that all were essentially one and the same, namely, the joy of being able to love" - Michael Ende
"I teach you to be warriors in the garden so you will never be gardeners in the war." - Tomi Adeyemi, Children of Blood and Bone
"What we call the secret of happiness is no more a secret than our willingness to choose life" - Leo Buscaglia
"Real stupidity beats artificial intelligence every time." - Terry Pratchett, Hogfather
"Everyone"s worried about stopping terrorism. Well, there"s really an easy way. Stop participating in it." - Noam Chomsky
"I used to have horrible cars that would always end up broken down on the highway. When I tried to flag someone down, nobody stopped. But if I pushed my own car, other drivers would get out and push with me. If you want help, help yourself - people like to see that." -Chris Rock
"True love stories never have endings."  Richard Bach
"Time is natures way of preventing everything from happening all at once." -John Archibald Wheeler
"The fact that a believer is happier than a skeptic is no more to the point than the fact that a drunken man is happier than a sober one." - George Bernard Shaw
"...I wouldn't piss in his asshole if his guts were on fire!" - My Grandma
"Be prepared, there is a small chance that our horrendous leadership could unknowingly lead us into World War III." - Donald Trump
"I don't know how old I am, only that I'm too young to wonder if I asked the right questions in the past and too old to hope the future will bring me all the answers." -Daytripper(The Graphic Novel)
"Go at it boldly, and you"ll find unexpected forces closing round you and coming to your aid." - Basil King
"Bacteria may not build cities or have interesting social lives, but they will be here when the Sun explodes. This is their planet, and we are on it only because they allow us to be." -Bill Bryson
"Haters and negative people don"t prevent you from reaching enlightenment. They"re part of the process to getting there." - Randy Gage
"You know, sometimes all you need is twenty seconds of insane courage. Just literally twenty seconds of just embarrassing bravery. And I promise you, something great will come of it." Benjamin Mee
"I cannot and will not recant anything, for to go against conscience is neither right nor safe. Here I stand, I can do no other, so help me God. Amen." - Martin Luther 1521
"Why waste time say lot word when few word do trick?" - Kevin Malone
"All I want for Christmas is that Jake Paul Merch, All I want for Christmas is that Jake Paul Shirt" - Jake Paul
"What is true is already so. ... People can stand what is true, for they are already enduring it." Eugene Gendlin (full quote inside)
"Truth always defends itself. Learn thyself by seeing what defends itself within you." - unknown
"Nothing can disturb your peace of mind unless you allow it to." - Roy T. Bennett
"Waste no more time arguing about what a good person should be. Be one" - Marcus Aurelius
"As democracy is perfected, the office of president represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron." - H.L. Mencken
"The key is to keep company only with people who uplift you, whose presence calls forth your best." Epictetus
"You see, I know who I am professor. It's how to be him that is eluding me" -Riddler (Gotham)
"Successful people are always looking for opportunities to help others. Unsuccessful people are always asking, 'What's in it for me?" -Brian Tracy
"Good, better, best. Never let it rest. 'Til your good is better and your better is best." - St. Jerome
"Success Is Getting What You Want, Happiness Is Wanting What You Get."  W. P. Kinsella.
"Every word is like an unnecessary stain on silence and nothingness." - Samuel Beckett
"Boldness is a useful quality in a warrior. Brashness belongs in your quarters with your dress uniform." - Timothy Zahn
"Science is an inexorable searching for truth. It can't be neither the handmaid of religion, nor the prostitute of politics." - Jen Kiss (Hungarian linguist)
"You may be human, but you still have a lot to learn." - Steve Vai
"Obstacles are what you see when you take your eyes off of the goal." - Vince Lombardi
"Don"t Let Yesterday Take Up Too Much Of Today." -Will Rogers
"The truth will set you free, but first it will piss you off" - Joe Klaas
"What ONE thing, if you were to take action on it, would produce the greatest difference in your life?"
"Some people treat relationship as a video game, they play them and when they get bored they cheat." Anonymous
"Things may come to those who wait, but only the things left by those who hustle." Unknown
"Later equals never" -LeBlanc"s law
"Yell the good. Whisper the bad."
"Time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." John Lennon
"If we cannot end now our differences, at least we can help make the world safe for diversity." - John F kennedy
"Luck is a dividend of sweat. The more you sweat, the luckier you get." - Ray Kroc
"Too many people spend money they haven't earned, to buy things they don't want, to impress people they don't like." Will Smith
"Life is a succession of lessons which must be lived to be understood." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The premier demand upon all education is that Auschwitz not happen again. Its priority before any other requirement is such that I believe I need not and should not justify it." - Theodor W. Adorno
"If there"s one thing bigger than my head... That"s the distance I"ve been mislead."
"If There Were Any Justice in the World; There'd Be An Alligator Out There Carrying You Around in a Handbag!"
"You're nowhere near where you could be" -Jordan Peterson
"His enemies are not demons, but human beings like himself..." -Lao Tzu
"May you live in interesting times."
"Kind words can be short and easy to speak, but their echoes are truly endless." Mother Theresa
"Watch carefully the magic that occurs when you give a person just enough comfort to be themselves" - Atticus Finch
"Seize the means of production" - Karl Marx
"It's not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters." Epictetus
"A kinder person has been hurt more than most would assume" -Anonymous
"If we don't discipline ourselves, the world will do it for us." - William Feather
"There are some ideas so absurd that only an intellectual could believe them." -George Orwell
"A strong leader does not tolerate the failure of government, but a strong government does not tolerate the failure of citizens." - Anonymous
"Life isn"t about waiting for the storm to pass, it's about learning to dance in the rain."  Vivian Greene
"i don't want to wake up in the same bed in the same place for the rest of my life. but i do want to wake up next to the same person."
"I could stand in the middle of Fifth Avenue and shoot somebody and I wouldn"t lose any voters." - D. Trump
"You can"t become who you want to be by staying who you are." - Margie Warrell
"The cat does not offer services. The cat offers itself." William S. Burroughs
"Take shelter, take the pressure, do what you want tonight. It"s alright if you want to get used. Then get used" Years&amp;Years (Take shelter).
"Whatever you're meant to do, do it now. The conditions are always impossible." Doris Lessing
"If I had to live my life again, I"d make the same mistakes, only sooner." - Tallulah Bankhead
" Those who try to do something and fail are infinitely better than those who try nothing and succeed. " - Lloyd Jones
"A dog is not a toy. A dog is part of the family, not just another thing you can throw away." Anonymous
"If you don"t risk anything, you risk even more." - Erica Jong
"When I"m old and dying, I plan to look back on my life and say wow that was an adventure, not, wow I sure felt safe." -Tom Preston-Werner
"You've got a Face for Radio" -My Mom
"devs is 30wls bro i trd 28 it good deal pls i die tmro" -efeghh, leader of the gt kool kid klub
"I"m not an enemy? I"m either extremely inarticulate, that, or you wouldn"t know an enemy if you saw or heard one." - Christopher Hitchens
"Always, always, always question your motivations."
"You do not see your own strength because sometimes it is hidden from you by two people: YOU and the person who benefits from your weakness." (-Dodinsky)
"Why fly a black flag when a black beard will do?" -Edward Thatch
"I slept and dreamt that life was joy. I awoke and saw that life was service. I acted and behold, service was joy." -Rabindranath Tagore
"Life is give and take, just like breathing." -ThankIReddit
"Never waste a minute thinking about people you do not like." -Dwight D. Eisenhower
"The soil of our mind contains many seeds, positive and negative. We are the gardeners who identify, water, and cultivate the best seeds." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"Stay away from people who make you feel like you are hard to love." - Daisy Chain
"A journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step" -Lao Tzu
"Logic will get you from A to B. Imagination will take you everywhere." Albert Einstein
"By all means, keep trying to tell me how it is after you didn't do shit when it counted." - Pepper, PhD
[OC] Greed Is Our Right
"I spent more time drinking for women that drinking with women" - I did that
"He drained the cup of God"s wrath bone dry, leaving not a drop for us to drink." - Richard Allen Bodey
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." Eleanor Roosevelt
"There is water at the bottom of the ocean." - Talking Heads
"To see the world, things dangerous to come to, to see behind walls, draw closer, to find each other, and to feel. That is the purpose of life." -The Secret Life of Walter Mitty
"Don't eat until you're full, let there be a little bit of hunger in you always. When you're full, you slip in to a food coma and all your motivation is lost. A lion shows dominance only when he's hungry."
"Motivation comes from working on things we care about." - Sheryl Sandberg
"The world is changed by your example, not by your opinion." Paulo Coelho
"Rules are made to be broken, like buildings... or people."
"I was made to live and I die without having lived" Jean-Jacques Rousseau
"Christians warned about the Antichrist for years. And when he came, it was them who voted for him." - unknown
"You can avoid reality, but you cannot avoid the consequences of avoiding reality."  Ayn Rand
"A Promise means everything but once it is broken, sorry means nothing" Anonymous
"Behind my smile is everything you'll never understand."
"Why pay a dollar for a bookmark? Why not use the dollar for a bookmark?" -Steven Spielberg
"Opportunities multiply as they are seized." Sun Tzu
"I never dreamed about success. I worked for it." Estee Lauder
"If I fall again, I will rise again" - 
"The ego tends to push; the intuition tends to pull." -ThinkIReddit
"A dog is the only thing on earth that loves you more than he loves himself." Josh Billings
"A goal without a plan is just a wish" - Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"You're only given one little spark of madness. You mustn't lose it." -- Robin Williams
"A lion and rabbit can hang out as little ones, but eventually, the lion will eat the rabbit. Gotta know what I'm these days." -ThankIReddit
"Suppose what your faith has said is essentially correct..." - Professor Edward Birack
"I suspect the truth is that we are waiting, all of us, against insurmountable odds, for something extraordinary to happen to us." Khaled Hosseini
"It is difficult to free fools from the chains they revere." -Voltaire
'Magic's just science that we don't understand yet.'  Arthur C. Clarke
"You are a woman. Skin and bones, veins and nerves, hair and sweat. You are not made of metaphors. Not apologies, not excuses." -Sarah Kay
"Here"s an easy way to figure out if you"re in a cult: If you"re wondering whether you"re in a cult, the answer is yes."  Stephen Colbert
"There are bits and pieces of me dying every day. I am full of suicides, of rotting corpses, of brittle skeletons, infecting the living parts of me. I am dead, though I do not die." -Emilie Autumn
"The central belief of every moron is that he is the victim of a mysterious conspiracy against his common rights and true deserts. ..." -- H.L. Mencken
"Some things are just too coincidental to be a coincidence." -- Yogi Berra
"There is one thing which is even worse than using violence, and this is capitulating to violence." -- Levi Eshkol , Israeli Prime Minister during the 6-Day War (June 1967)
"I Own the Alone" - My Mother
"Fear is default position. Love is the medicine. Happiness is the byproduct." - unknown
"Love only has one quality. It empowers you." - Unknown
"To revolt is a natural tendency of life. Even a worm turns against the foot that crushes it. In general, the vitality and relative dignity of an animal can be measured by the intensity of its instinct to revolt." - Mikhail Bakunin
"I'm not bad, I'm just drawn that way." - Jessica Rabbit (Voice of Kathleen Turner) to Eddie Valiant (Bob Hoskins) - Who Framed Roger Rabbit (1988)
"It doesn"t matter what people call you unless they call you pigeon pie and eat you up." - Evelyn Waugh
"Snakes. Why'd it have to be snakes?" - Indiana Jones (Harrison Ford) - Raiders of the Lost Ark
"When trouble strikes, head to the library. You will either be able to solve the problem, or simply have something to read as the world crashes down around you." - Lemony Snicket
"Cheaters often accuse you of cheating. Liars often accuse you of lying. Insecure people often crumble your security. Behavior speaksHow someone treats you may have nothing to do with you; but can be a reflection of who they are." (-Steve Maraboli)
"I would rather have questions that can't be answered than answers that can't be questioned." - Richard Feynman
"Isn't the worst when you sit next to a football fan at a baseball game?" - Condor
1N73LL1G3NC3 15 7H3 4B1L17Y 70 4D4P7 70 CH4NG3. - 573PH3N H4WK1NG
"Character -- the willingness to accept responsibility for one's own life -- is the source from which self-respect springs." - Joan Didion
"The blues is losing someone you love and not having enough money to immerse yourself in drink."
"If you want to shine like sun first you have to burn like it." Adolf Hitler
"When a bird starts to feel the light even fit the dark dawn, it is called as faith."
"Spectacular achievement is always preceded by unspectacular preparation."- Robert H. Schuller
"Sleep is the best meditation." - Dalai Lama
"If you think darkness is forever, remember how the Universe works" - 
"Take up one idea. Make that one idea your life--think of it, dream of it, live on that idea. Let the brain, muscles, nerves, every part of your body, be full of that idea, and just leave every other idea alone. This is the way to success." -Swami Vivekananda
"However difficult life may seem, there is always something you can do and succeed at." Stephen Hawking
"Do more with less." Unknown
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." -Thomas Edison
"We are not primarily put on this earth to see through one another, but to see one another through"
"We must let go of the life we have planned, so as to accept the one that is waiting for us." - Joseph Campbell
"You can"t be that kid standing at the top of the waterslide, overthinking it. You have to go down the chute." - Tina Fey
"Your world is a living expression of how you are usingand have usedyour mind." Earl Nightingale
"Act as if what you do makes a difference, it does." William James
"The limits of my language mean the limits of my world." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Don"t judge a man by where he is, because you don"t know how far he has come." - C. S. Lewis
"The universe is under no obligation to make sense to you." - Neil DeGrasse Tyson
"Give to a pig when it grunts and a child when it cries, and you will have a fine pig and a bad child." - Danish Proverb.
"Most people are not really free. They are confined by the niche in the world that they carve out for themselves. They limit themselves to fewer possibilities by the narrowness of their vision." - V. S. Naipaul
"To the sober person adventurous conduct often seems insanity." - Aristotle
"You see, in this world there's two kinds of people, my friend: Those with loaded guns and those who dig. You dig." - Blondie (Clint Eastwood) to TUCO (Eli Wallach) - The Good, The bad, and the Ugly (1966, Sp./it.)
"An amateur practices until they can play it correctly, a professional practices until they can't play it incorrectly." Unknown
"I can"t wait to be a lawyer so I can judge all of you." - My future graduation motto
"He who fears he shall suffer, already suffers what he fears." - Michel de Montaigne, The Complete Essays
"Sometimes the people we meet change us forever." - Forces of Nature (movie)
"Let no one discourage your ambitious attitude. You don't need a fan club to achieve your goals. Be your own motivation."
"I will go to war in a red dress, trample your ashes in high heels, look for my lipstick stain on your collar when I lean forwards not to kiss you, but to whisper: "I win." -A.J.
"How many cares one loses when one decides not to be something but to be someone." -Gabrielle "Coco" Chanel
"Enfiem o processo no c" - Luiz Incio Lula da Silva
"Skepticism and worrying about what others think kill more dreams and aspirations than failure ever will. Worry not of others as it is your life to live." -- Bill Lewis
"Failure is the opportunity to begin again more intelligently." Henry Ford
"Skepticism and worrying about what others think kill more dreams and aspirations than failure ever will. Worry not of others as it is your life to live." -- Bill Lewis
"You say you didn't choose for this to you, even if I were to believe you. You still chose your response."
"However difficult life may seem, there is always something you can do, and succeed at. It matters that you don't just give up." Stephen Hawking
"your life doesn't get better by chance,it gets better by change."
"Pessimism is a waste of time." - Norman Cousins
"Life is too short to be little. Man is never so manly as when he feels deeply, acts boldly, and expresses himself with frankness and with fervor." -Benjamin Disraeli
"We delight in the beauty of the butterfly, but rarely admit the changes it has gone through to achieve that beauty." - Maya Angelou.
"The only thing that interferes with my learning is my education." -Albert Einstein
"Rule 1: Never lose money. Rule 2: Never forget Rule 1." Warren Buffet
"Never make a decision when angry and never make a promise when happy"
"Believe you can and you're halfway there" - Theodore Roosevelt
"Go beyond yourself rather than beyond others" - Anonymous
"In three words I can sum up everything I"ve learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"In the beginning the Universe was created. This has made a lot of people very angry and has been widely regarded as a bad move." -Douglas Adams
"I'm not crazy about reality. But it's still the only place to get a decent meal" - Groucho Marx
"I have no special talent. I am only passionately curious." Albert Einstein.
"The only way to be happy is to love. Unless you love, your life will flash by." - The Tree of Life (movie)
"In a government of laws, existence of the government will be imperiled if it fails to observe the law scrupulously...." -- U.S. Supreme Court Justice Louis Brandeis
"Having quote marks around it does not make a quote. It hase to have a source"-Norton Mansfield, from _Putrid Pink_
"Each time a person stands up for an ideal, or acts to improve the lot of others, or strikes out against injustice, it sends out a tiny ripple of hope ..." RFK JR
"Do not be too hard, lest you be broken; do not be too soft, lest you be squeezed" -Ali ibn Abi Talib
"Coming from my own experiences I think the past, present, and future all hold equal importance..a lot of answers and lessons can be found in all three and you shouldn"t make any of the three more or less important"-peacelovehap
"Almost everyone in this room has a higher IQ than Darwin did. Yet Darwin"s body now lies next to Newton"s in Westminster Abbey. What a diligent, objective curiosity will do for you in life is elevate you above your intellectually betters who have minds that work faster."  Charles Munger
"Mexicans are lit when it comes to tunnels"
"If you're going through hell, keep going." - Winston Churchill
"But not for a moment in time, your existence would be irrelevant." - Bill Lewis
"Too many wants predicts emptiness. Too many needs predicts loneliness. Enjoying What you already have predicts happiness."
"Life is tough my darling, but so are you."
"An essential part of creativity is not being afraid to fail." Edwin H. Land
"My parents named me Jake Joseph Paul, and I was a savage from day one" - Jake Paul, 2016.
"Even a fish wouldn't get into trouble if it kept its mouth shut." - Korean Proverb.
"Rushing is like telling a tree to grow faster." -ThankIReddit
"Learn to swim, see you down in Arizona Bay" - Tool, Aenima
"If you want to leave your footprints on the sands of time, do not drag your feet." - Abdul Kalam
"Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail" - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"There is no sacrifice better then someone else"s"- Skipper the Penguin
"Without adventure civilization is in full decay." -Alfred North Whitehead
"Don't let someone else's opinion of you become your reality." -Les Brown
"According to the map, we've only gone about four inches." -Harry Dunne
"If you can't feed a hundred people, then feed just one." - Mother Teresa
"I find it fascinating that most people plan their vacations with better care than they plan their lives. Perhaps that is because escape is easier than change." - Jim Rohn
"A new consciousness is developing which sees the earth as a single organism and recognizes that an organism at war with itself is doomed." - Carl Sagon
"A new consciousness is developing which sees the earth as a single organism and recognizes that an organism at war with itself is doomed" Carl Sagon
"Hullo me old chum! I am g'not a g'nelf. I am g'not a g'noblin. I'm a gnome and you've been gnoooomed!" - Noggin Clontith
"You are the master of your unspoken words, but a slave to the words you have spoken" -Sir Winston Churchill
"There"s no logical connection between being smart and having money." - Christopher Michael Langan
''A man who is used to acting one way never changes; he must come to ruin when the times, in changing, are no longer in harmony with his ways' - Niccolo Machievelie
"Well, a boy's best friend is his mother." - Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins) to Marion Crane (Janet Leigh) - Psycho (1960)
"Well, here's another mess you've gotten me into!" - Ollie (Oliver Hardy) to Stan (Stan Laurel) - Sons of the Desert (1933)
"And we"ve been in the mountain of indifference too long and ultimately..." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
''Buying a Samsung is like voting for labour, people think it's cool but it's a bit trampy'' - Anonymous Friend
"Theo, I have run out of ammunition. I'm going to ram this one. Good bye. We'll see each other in Valhalla." - Heinrich Ehrler to Theodor Weissenberger
"people are not good to each other. perhaps if they were our deaths would not be so sad." -Charles Bukowski
"It"s not whether or not you get knocked down, it"s what you do when you get back up." - The Adjustment Bureau (movie)
"If the Human Brain Were So Simple That We Could Understand It, We Would Be So Simple That We Couldn"t"-Emerson M.pugh
"To a father growing old nothing is dearer than a daughter." -Euripides
"I could never find two people who are perfectly equal: one will always be more valuable than the other. And many people, as a matter of fact, simply have no value." - Pentti Linkola
"Confidence is ignorance. If you're feeling cocky, it's because there's something you don't know." - Eoin Colfer, Artemis Fowl
"It"s not incest porn if the sound is off, then it"s just regular porn." - Anonymous
"In order to carry a positive action we must develop here a positive vision."  Dalai Lama
"Planning, unfortunately, is fictitious." -ThinkIReddit
"Light travels faster than sound. This is why some people appear bright until they speak."  Steven Wright
"There has been so many decades of stewed day-old coffee out of brewing pots that when crap coffee came along, they thought it was drinkable."  Peter Hadfield, British science journalist, on why Americans are so enamored with Starbucks.
"Sometimes the best thing you can do is not think, not wonder, not imagine, not obsess. Just breathe and have faith that everything will work out for the best."  Unknown
"if a window of opportunity appears,don't pull down the shade."
"Blessed is he who expects nothing, for he shall never be disappointed." - Alexander Pope.
"Writers use hedges in the vain hope that it will get them off the hook, or at least allow them to plead guilty to a lesser charge, should a critic ever try to prove them wrong. A classic writer, in contrast, counts on the common sense and ordinary charity of his readers..." - Steven Pinker
"You see, faith doesn't have to make sense. If it did, it wouldn't be faith, it would be logic." - Scott Meyer
"Intuition can give you a better answer than over 7 billion people." - ThankIReddit
"To find peace, sometimes you have to be willing to lose the connection with the people, places, and things that create all the noise in your life."
"Failure is just practice for success." Unknown
"The shit apple doesn't fall far from the shit tree." - Jim Lahey
"Though nobody can go back and make a new beginning...Anyone can start over and make a new ending." - Chico Xavier
"Facts are stubborn things; and whatever may be our wishes, our inclinations, or the dictates of our passion, they cannot alter the state of facts and evidence." - John Adams
"A close, daily intimacy between two people has to be paid for: it requires a great deal of experience of life, logic, and warmth of heart on both sides to enjoy each other"s good qualities without being irritated by each other"s shortcomings and blaming each other for them." -Ivan Goncharov
"A close, daily intimacy between two people has to be paid for: it requires a great deal of experience of life, logic, and warmth of heart on both sides to enjoy each other"s good qualities without being irritated by each other"s shortcomings and blaming each other for them." -Ivan Gonc
"The principle goal of education in schools should be creating men and women who are capable of doing new things, not simply repeating what other generations have done." -Jean Piaget
"Cold silence has / A tendency to / Atrophy any / Sense of compassion" -"Schism" by Tool, 2006
"It is not the strongest of the species that survives, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." Leon C. Megginson
"If you really want to do something you"ll find a way, if you don"t you"ll find an excuse."  Jim Rohn
"Once you replace negative thoughts with positive ones, you'll start having positive results."  Willie Nelson
"If a person is under constant potential threat of loss of their freedoms, then they are not truly free."
"I am not a biologist, but as a lifelong Alaskan I would advise people not to go around kicking moose" - Megan Peters
"Your mind understands what you have been taught; your heart, what is true."
"When you are young you want a million things, but when you grow older, you want only one thing and that is to be young again." -Exurb1a
"Sugar and salt both look the same. Be careful who you trust." -- Bill Lewis
"Our doubts are traitors, and make us lose the good we oft might win, by fearing to attempt." - William Shakespeare
"[deleted]" - Comments section of /r/videos post titled "Woman getting beaten up vs. man getting beaten up". Undeleted comment section inside this post.
"Education is the ability to listen to almost anything without losing your temper or your self-confidence." - Robert Frost
"Every answer generates further questions"
"Human civilization has reduced the plant, a four-hundred-million-year-old life form, into three things: food, medicine, and wood." - Hope Jahren, Lab Girl
"If a system is corrupt, then the people who adhere to the system and are incentivized by that system are not criminals. They are victims, and the system itself must be tried." -Dave Chappelle
"those who wish to sing always find a song" - Swedish proverb
"By believing passionately in something that still does not exist, we create it. The noexistent is whatever we have not sufficiently desired." - Franz Kafka(?) Did he really said/wrote that?
"Language is the foundation of civilization. It is the glue that holds a people together. It is the first weapon drawn in a conflict." - Arrival (movie)
"Happiness is the absence of the striving for happiness." - Chuang-Tzu
"The question isn't who is going to let me; it's who is going to stop me." - Ayn Rand
"If you want something you"ve never had then you you"ve got to do something you"ve never done." - Thomas Jefferson
"People are capable at any time in their lives, of doing what they dream of." - Paulo Coelho
"Some things scratch the surface while others strike at your soul." - Gianna Perada Carini
"It's the repetition of affirmations that leads to belief. And once that belief becomes a deep conviction, things begin to happen." - Muhammad Ali
"A winner is a dreamer who never gives up." Nelson Mandela
"You don't have to be great to start, but you have to start to be great." Zig Ziglar
"All great achievements require time." Maya Angelou
"If you want the best the world has to offer, you have to offer the world your best." - Neale Donald Walsch
"a big head doesn't mean high IQ, sometime a big bag can be full of shit." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"If somebody offers you an amazing opportunity but you are not sure you can do it, say yes  then learn how to do it later!" - Richard Branson
"If somebody offers you an amazing opportunity but you are not sure you can do it, say yes  then learn how to do it later!" - [Richard Branson](https://www.quotenova.net/authors/richard-branson/xge69z)
"If you born poor it's not your mistake, but if you die poor it's your mistake." Bill Gates
"Your world is a living expression of how you are usingand have usedyour mind." - Earl Nightingale
"Nothing is better than eternal happiness. A ham sandwich is better than nothing. Therefore, a ham sandwich is better than eternal happiness." - Raymond Smullyan.
"The most effective way to do it, is to do it." - Amelia Earhart
"Run as far as you can in the direction of your best and happiest dreams across the bridge that was built by your own desire to heal" - Cheryl Strayed
"If you can't tolerate critics, don't do anything new or interesting. " Jeff Bezos
[Nostalgia warning]
"If anyone can refute me - show me I'm making a mistake or looking at things from the wrong perspective - I'll gladly change. It's the truth I'm after, and the truth never harmed anyone. What harms us is to persist in self-deceit and ignorance." - Marcus Aurelius
"suicide is the pursuit of loneliness"
"When people thought the earth was flat, they were wrong. When people thought the earth was spherical, they were wrong. But if you think that thinking the earth is spherical is just as wrong as thinking the earth is flat, then your view is wronger than both of them put together."  Isaac Asimov
"He who opens a school, closes a prison" - Victor Hugo
"Men of metal can't cry even when at last they feel they must" - ?
"Everything has a price. Even if it is not in cash." -- Unknown
"I will gladly work with the president when his ideas aren"t stupid" Representative Ruben Gallego
"I"m not saying you have to read the bible religiously, but if you"re going to use it to tell other people who to vote for, who to kill, who they can marry and where they can crap, you probably do." - Bill Maher
"Sometimes suffering is just suffering. It doesn't make you stronger. It doesn't build character. It only hurts." Kate Jacobs
"It was weird because hip-hop was becoming this force, then grunge music stopped it for one second, ya know? Those "hair bands" were too easy for us to take out; when Kurt Cobain came with that statement it was like, "We got to wait awhile.'"
"There are two kinds of people, those who do the work and those who take the credit. Try to be in the first group; there is less competition there." - Indira Gandhi
"Time marches on and sooner or later you realize it is marching across your face." -Steel Magnolias (movie)
"Never make fun of someones laugh! If you make fun of their laugh, you make fun of their Soul." - Charles Bauer (Grandpa)
"One day you will wake up &amp; there won"t be any more time to do the things you"ve always wanted. Do it now." - Paulo Coelho
"My life has been full of terrible misfortunes most of which never happened." -Michel de Montaigne
"Never make fun of anyone's laugh! If you make fun of their laugh, you make fun of their Soul." - Charles Bauer (grandpa)
"When life hands you a lemon, say, 'Oh yeah, I like lemons! What else ya got?"
"The writer's life is inherently an insecure one. Each project is a new start and may be a failure. The fact that a previous item has been successful is no guard against failure this time." -Asimov
"John Henry said to his Captain, / "A man ain't nothin' but a man, / And before I'll let your steam drill beat me down, / I'll die with the hammer in my hand." - Anonymous
"Great Spirits Have Always Encountered Violent Opposition From Mediocre Minds." Albert Einstein
"The media's the most powerful entity on earth. They have the power to make the innocent guilty and to make the guilty innocent, and that's power. Because they control the minds of the masses." - Malcolm X
"I marched for civil rights with Dr. King in 1963, long before Hollywood found it acceptable I may say, but when I told an audience last year that white pride is just as valid as black pride or red pride, or anyone else's pride, they called me a racist." - Charlton Heston
"Patience is a virtue, and I'm learning patience. It's a tough lesson." Elon Mush
"The only difference between a caprice and a lifelong passion is that the caprice lasts a little longer." Oscar Wilde
"Courage is impulsive; it is narcissism tempered with nihilism." - Ayelet Waldman
"You need the right people with you, not the best people." Jack Ma
"I'm going to become rich and famous after i invent a device that allows you to stab people in the face over the internet." - HatfulOfHollow
"read a thousand books and your words will flow a river" by Lisa See
"When everything seems to be going against you, remember that the airplane takes off against the wind, not with it." Henry Ford
"If I were a tree, I would have no reason to love a human." - Maggie Stiefvater, The Raven Boys
"Like almost every truly horrible thing that has ever happened in the history of our world, the end also began with a kiss." - Dennis Sharpe, Destroyer of Worlds
"Don"t let someone else"s opinion of you become your reality." - Les Brown
"Talent is given, greatness is earned." - Lebron James
"Listen, smile, agree and then do whatever you were going to do anyway." - Dumitru D. Coman
"The person who says it cannot be done should not interrupt the person doing it." Chinese Proverb
"Don't get too deep, it leads to over thinking, and over thinking leads to problems that doesn't even exist in the first place." - Jayson Engay
"Every human walks around with a certain kind of sadness. They may not wear it on their sleeves, but it's there if you look deep." - Taraji P. Henson
"The only way to do great work is to love what you do." Steve Jobs
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." --Eleanor Roosevelt
"Though all his life a fool associates with a wise man, he no more comprehends the Truth than a spoon tastes the flavor of the soup." -Dhammapada
"Your time is limited. Don't waste it living someone else's life." Steve Jobs
"Overcoming poverty is not a task of charity, it is an act of justice. Like Slavery and Apartheid, poverty is not natural. It is man-made and it can be overcome and eradicated by the actions of human beings." -Nelson Mandela
"We receive three educations, one from our parents, one from our schoolmasters, and one from the world. The third contradicts all that the first two teach us." -Montesquieu
"I DON'T WANT A TUTORIAL, I JUST WANT TO KNOW WHAT TO DO!"-Unnamed
"I am in chains, don't touch my chains" -Franz Kafka
"You miss 100% of the shots you dont take -Wayne Gretzky" -Michael Scott
"I thought the world threw me a bone when I met this girl. It turns out it was a boomerang and the world took it back." -Me
"This is like the Mondayest, Wednesday, ever." -My Wife
"Live life like you"re creating original Reddit content."
'Brothers! Brothers, please! This is a house of peace!' - Malcolm X
"Nothing Will Work Unless You Do" Maya Angelou
"Live your life and forget your age." -Norman Vincent Peale
"The way to make money is to buy when blood is running in the streets." - John D. Rockefeller
"I crush the spiders to save the butterflies" - By not a spider
"Sometimes you just have to accept, that some people are shitty humans, and stop trying to see the good that isn't there." - Pintrest
"To those searching for truth  not the truth of dogmas and darkness but the truth brought by reason, search, examination, and inquiry, discipline is required. For faith, as well intentioned it may be, must be built on Facts, not Fiction. Faith in fiction is a damnable false hope."
"Be patient with yourself. Self-growth is tender; it's holy ground. There's no greater investment." Stephen Covey
"Silence Is The Best Way To Answer A Fool" - Anonymous
"Machines never come with any extra parts, you know. They always come with the exact amount they need. So, I figured that if the entire world was one big machine, I couldn"t be an extra part. I had to be here for some reason."  Hugo (movie)
"Be a Columbus to whole new continents and worlds within you, opening new channels, not of trade, but of thought." - Henry David Thoreau
"Only one thing more painful than the truth. And that is a lie." - Bill Lewis
"Communism forgets that life is individual. Capitalism forgets that life is social, and the kingdom of brotherhood is found neither in the thesis of communism nor the antithesis of capitalism but in a higher synthesis. It is found in a higher synthesis that combines the truths of both" -MLK
"Only one thing more painful than the truth. And this is a lie." -- Bill Lewis
"Time is the coin of your life. It is the only coin you have, and only you can determine how it will be spent. Be careful lest you let other people spend it for you." -Carl Sandburg
"Logic will get you from A to Z; imagination will get you everywhere." - Albert Einstein
"Find the good. It's all around you. Find it, showcase it, and you'll start believing in it." (-Jesse Owens)
"If you don't invest very much, then defeat doesn't hurt very much and winning is not very exciting." - Dick Vermeil
"If you do right no one remembers. If you do wrong no one forgets." Anonymous
"I am not an Athenian nor a Greek, but a citizen of the world." -Socrates
"Together we can face any challenges as deep as the ocean and as high as the sky." Sonia Gandhi
"Do not give up, the beginning is always the hardest." - Kemmy Nola
"Music is to the soul what words are to the mind." - Modest Mouse
"Me? I'm dishonest, and a dishonest man you can always trust to be dishonest. Honestly It's the honest one you want to watch out for." - Captain Jack Sparrow
"The only love affair i have ever had was with music." - Maurice Ravel
"In no way do I have to dedicate myself to reviving a black civilization unjustly ignored... I do not want to be the victim of the ruse of a black world." - Franz Fanon
"The hottest place in Hell is reserved for those who remain neutral in times of great moral conflict." - Martin Luther King
"All say, "How hard it is that we have to die"-- a strange complaint to come from the mouths of people who have had to live."-Mark Twain
"A man who has committed a mistake and doesn"t correct it is committing another mistake." - Confucius
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today." - H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"Do not wait to strike till the iron is hot; but make it hot by striking." - William Butler Yeats
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The death of one man is a tragedy. The death of millions is a statistic." - Joseph Stalin
"It is possible to commit no mistakes and still lose. That is not a weakness; that is life." Jean Luc Picard
"You cannot have a positive life and a negative mind." Joyce Meyer
"One day, in retrospect, the years of struggle will strike you as the most beautiful." -Sigmund Freud
"Politicians are the same all over. They promise to build bridges even when there are no rivers." - Nikita Khrushchev
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams" - Anonymous
"Today you are you! That is truer than true! There is no one alive who is you-er than you!" Dr. Seuss
"All the art of living lies in a fine mingling of letting go and holding on." - Havelock Ellis
"It is not the strongest of the species that survive, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." --Charles Darwin
"When someone shows you who they are, believe them the first time." - Maya Angelou
"Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free speech because you have nothing to say." - Edward Snowden
"Never give up on anybody. Miracles happen every day." - H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"When you are happy you enjoy the music; But, it is when you are sad you understand the lyrics." - Frank Ocean
"Music is the strongest form of magic." - Marilyn Manson
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work" Thomas A. Edison
"It's not that we have a short time to live, but that we waste much of it. Life is long enough, and it's been given to us in generous measure for accomplishing the greatest things, if the whole of it is well invested." -Seneca The Younger
"I never allow myself to have an opinion on anything that I don"t know the other side"s argument better than they do."  Charlie Munger
"when you are sharing,it offers the opportunity for someone to help you"
"you can't always get what you want" - Dad
"I never was one of them money hungry fools I'd rather have my fiddle and my farmin' tools Thank God I'm a country boy" John Denver
"Never make fun of someone if they mispronounce a word. It means they learned it by reading" - Anonymous
"Why do people view confidence and happiness as ignorance? Why do *I* view confidence and happiness as ignorance?" -- Unknown
'I don't think there would be many jokes, if there weren't constant frustration and fear...' Kurt Vonnegut
"Being realistic is the most common road to mediocrity" - Will Smith
"No life is complete without a touch of madness." Paulo Coelho
"The Christian Right is neither." - Anonymous
"Some say that we can remember everything, but we just can't remember it all the time. But I remember stuff wrongly all the time. I wonder if this means that I experienced it wrongly too." Brad Neely (or "Baby Cakes")
"A little knowledge that acts is worth infinitely more than much knowledge that is idle." - Khalil Gibran
"Success represents the 1% of your work which results from the 99% that is called failure." - Sichir Honda
"Don"t step on the tail that belongs to the ass you may have to kiss tomorrow." - American proverb
"The road of excess leads to the palace of wisdom...You never know what is enough until you know what is more than enough." - William Blake, Proverbs of Hell
"There is much experience to suggest that the most effective way to convert a market economy into an authoritarian economic society is to start by imposing controls on foreign exchange" - Milton Friedman
"Adventure is worthwhile in itself." Amelia Earhart
"Sometimes the truth isn"t good enough, sometimes people deserve more. Sometimes people deserve to have their faith rewarded" - The Dark Knight (movie)
"When I grow up I'm going to Bovine University!" - Ralph Wiggum
"Getting to the Moon has turned out to be, perhaps, just a little boring and that enterprise was, in any case, a very expensive way of developing non-stick frying pans." -J. E. Gordon (1976)
"There is an unusually high and consistent correlation between the stupidity of a given person and [his] propensity to be impressed by the measurement of IQ." -- Christopher Hitchens
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas A. Edison
"Death is not the worst thing that can happen to men" - Plato
"Making plans for the future is only useful to those who are completely capable of living in the present." Alan Watts
"You are in someone's life to fulfill their purpose; once it's achieved, you ought to learn to let go of that person" - Priti Shah
"Political power grows out of the barrel of a gun." - Mao Zedong
"My compass is unique. True enough, this compass does not point north. It points to the thing you want most in this world." - Captain Jack Sparrow
"...If you don't do it someone else will...." - Neil deGrasse Tyson.
"We can't always choose the music life plays for us, but we can choose how we dance to it." - Unknown
"It takes as much energy to wish as it does to plan." Eleanor Roosevelt
"There are songs that make you sad when you hear them. But it aren't the songs that make you sad, it are the people behind the memories." - Deepak Sharma.
"Breakfast is the most important pizza of the day." - My friend
"We define ourselves far too often by our past failures. That"s not you. You are this person right now. You"re the person who has learned from those failures. Build confidence and momentum with each good decision you make from here on out and choose to be inspired."  Joe Rogan
"You must not fool yourself, and you are the easiest person to fool" -RICHARD P.FEYNMAN
"Threats are the last resort of a man with no vocabulary" - Tamora Pierce
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde
"Try not to become a person of success, but rather try to become a person of value." --Albert Einstein
"To be inspired is great, but to inspire is an honor." - Stacey T. Hunt
"Life can only be understood backwards; but it must be lived forwards." Sren Kierkegaard
"Once the dick enters one of your holes, it can easily re-enter. - Lala Kent on Vanderpump Rules.
"Human beings are the only creatures dumb enough to create their own hell" - Unknown
"If you ever need info about anyone at harvard just ask... people just submitted it, I don't know why, they just 'trust' me, dumb fucks" - Mark Zuckerberg, 2004
"A man will be imprisoned in a room with a door that's unlocked and opens inwards; as long as it does not occur to him to pull rather than push. A man will be imprisoned in a room with a door that's unlocked and opens inwards; as long as it does not occur to him to pull rather than push."
"When our food, clothing &amp; housing are born in the complication of mass production, mass method is bound to get into our thinking and eliminate all other forms of thought" - John Steinbeck, 1952
... but you chose to walk into my bar."
"When our food, clothing &amp; housing are born in the complication of mass production, mass method is bound to get into our thinking and to eliminate all other forms of thought"
"Change can come in either of two important ways: Start behaving positively or stop behaving negatively." - Dr. Phil.
"Fear is the only thing holding you back from doing what you really want to be doing." - Gary Vaynerchuk
"It takes less courage to criticize the decisions of others than to stand by your own." - Attila the Hun
"It takes less courage to criticize the decisions of others than to stand by your own." Attila the Hun
"You can"t play God without being acquainted with the devil." -Spoken by Anthony Hopkins in "Westworld" and written by Jonathan Nolan and Lisa Joy
"I do not negotiate on reasonable terms with people who intend to deprive me of reason." - Unknown
"we always gotta do our best to really pay attention when people are in pain. Help "em thru it, get "em talkin" about the struggle and remind "em that they"re not alone." Dwayne Johnson
"The people who matter will recognise who you are." - Alan Cohen
"I use emotion for the many and reserve reason for the few." - Adolf Hitler
"'What if I fall?' Oh but my darling, What if you fly?" (-Erin Hanson)
'Life fucks everyone, its fate. But some get orgasm, others get raped.' - rjv ernesto
"One of the most important things you can accomplish is just being yourself."-Dwayne Johnson
"Do not forget the miles! Many people remember to include miles to their clients or vendors. However, what about those trips to the office supply store, bank, post office? These miles add up." - Jeffrey Schneider
"I only went out for a walk and finally concluded to stay out till sundown, for going out, I found, was really going in." John Muir
"Sometimes we love people so much that we have to be numb to it. Because if we actually felt how much we love them, it would kill us."  Riding In Cars With Boys (movie)
"The mark of a great man is one who knows when to set aside the important things in order to accomplish the vital ones." --Brandon Sanderson
"Music begins where the possibilities of language end." - Jean Sibelius
"Its impossible," said the pride. "it's risky," said experience. "Its pointless." said reason. "Give it a try." whispered the heart." - Unknown
"Death leaves a heartache no one can heal, love leaves a memory no one can steal." -unknown
"Sometimes you just have to pee in the sink." - Charles Bukowski
"True love doesn't come to you, it has to be inside you." - Julia Roberts
"Tact is the ability to describe others as they see themselves." - Abraham Lincoln
"Anyone who stops leaning is old, whether at twenty or eighty. Anyone who keeps leaning stays young." - Henry Ford
"Close your eyes and pretend it's all a bad dream. that's how i get by." - Captain Jack Sparrow.
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." J. Krishnamurti
" Striving for excellence motivates you, striving for perfection is demoralizing. " - Harriet Braiker
"When you achieve your dreams, it"s not so much what you get, it"s who you become." - Diana Nyad
"Tough times never last, but tough people do." - Robert Schuller
"Difficult roads often lead to beautiful destinations." - Zig Ziglar
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." - Charles Darwin
"If you"re hard on yourself, life will be easy on you." - Robert Herjavec
"Leaders must be close enough to relate to others, but far enough ahead to motivate them." --John C. Maxwell
"It's a job that's never started that takes the longest to finish." J.R.R. Tolkien
"Don"t raise your voice, improve your argument." - Desmond Tutu
"A people will never look forward to posterity who never look backward toward their ancestors." Edmund Burke
"Faith is taking the first step, even when you don"t see the whole staircase." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Damn the Man! Save the Empire!" - 'Empire Records'
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Anyone can lead when the plan is working. The best lead when the plan falls apart." - Robin Sharma
"You are the average of the five people you spend the most time with." - Jim Rohn
"If you need violence to enforce your ideas, your ideas are worthless." -Unknown
"It isn't that you aren't poking me hard enough, the problem is you aren't doing anything that's worth that sort of poking." - Ace of Spades
"In strange and uncertain times such as those we are living in, sometimes a reasonable person might despair. But hope is unreasonable and love is greater even than this. May we trust the inexpressible benevolence of the creative impulse." Robert Fripp
"Success is liking yourself, liking what you do, and liking how you do it." - Maya Angelou
"The giant tree starts out as the tiniest shoot, the tallest tower starts out as a single brick, the longest journey starts with the first step." - Laozi
"The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity." - Amelia Earhart
"I don't dream at night, I dream all day; I dream for a living." - Steven Spielberg
"We love life, not because we are used to living but because we are used to loving." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Don't believe everything you see on the internet." - Abraham Lincoln
"The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants." - Thomas Jefferson
"Love is trash, bitches need cash"-Mahatma Gandhi
"True belonging is the spiritual practice of believing in and belonging to yourself so deeply that you can share your most authentic self with the world and find sacredness ... True belonging doesn't require you to change who are; it requires you to be who you are." Bren Brown (full quote in post)
"If you can see your path laid out in front of you step by step, you know it's not your path. Your own path you make with every step you take. That's why it's your path." - Joseph Campbell
8. I can"t change the direction of the wind, but I can adjust my sails to always reach my destination. Jimmy Dean
"If people don't either love or hate your work, you haven't really done that much." - Tinker Hatfield
"If we are facing in the right direction, all we have to do is keep on walking." Unknown
"To surrender to fear, is to live up to bravery." - Guluere
"Never have I heard them say they are stupid, it makes me doubt their intelligence." - Guluere
"Ideas are more powerful than guns. We would not let our enemies have guns, why should we let them have ideas." - Joseph Stalin
"When we go completely out of our heads were do we find ourselves? In the heart perhaps?" Paul Williams
"The only way to get rid of temptation is to yield to it" - Oscar Wilde
"Idle living turns me into an idiot. I can"t afford to get stupid. I"ve already been irritating. I"ve used up my passes on personality flaws." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal. it is the courage to continue that counts." - Sir Winston Churchill
"The patriarchy in the western world is like God; if it exists, it's doing a bad job." - Chris Ray Maldonado
"Do not compare yourself to others. If you do so, you are insulting yourself." - Adolf Hitler
"And even if there"s nothing on the other side, the thought of oblivion is better than this."
"I saw that" -Karma
"Be polite, be professional, but have a plan to kill everybody you meet." - General James "Mad Dog" Mattis
"Whatever you do will be insignificant, but it is very important that you do it" - Gandhi
"It"s a shot in the dark, but I used a shotgun."
"The meaning of life isn't just a general definition, it's everybody's personal experiences."  Hicham Labidi
"No man has the right to be an amateur in the matter of physical training. It is a shame for a man to grow old without seeing the beauty and strength of which his body is capable." - Socrates
"If heaven is such wonderful place, then how is getting crucified such a big fucking sacrifice?"-Igby
"If heaven is such a wonderful place, than why was crucifixion such a big sacrifice?"-Igby
"If heaven is such a wonderful place, then why was crucifixion such a big sacrifice?"-Igby
"Steal a little and they throw you in jail. Steal a lot and they make you king" -Bob Dylan
"self revelation, is annihilation of self" The Addiction (1995)
"I am the way, the truth, and the life: no man cometh unto the Father, but by me." -- Jesus of Nazareth
"Men judge generally more by the eye than by the hand, for everyone can see and few can feel. Every one sees what you appear to be, few really know what you are." Machiavelli
"Only two things are infinite: the universe, and human stupidity. And I'm not sure about the universe" - Albert Einstein
"There is no passion to be found playing small, in settling for a life that is less than the one you are capable of living." Nelson Mandela
"So many books, so little time." - Frank Zappa
"Never underestimate your own strength. You were born for a purpose and are blessed with the power to achieve it." - Leon Brown
"Every human being has the same value because we all have future unknown potential no matter what: even an evil/depressed/lost person can turn into an angel." - based on Jordan Peterson words
"I found no one ripe for many of my thoughts. One can speak with the utmost clarity, and yet not be heard by anyone." Friedrich Nietzsche
"There is no such thing as white lies; a lie is as black as a coalpit, and twice as foul." - Henry Ward Beecher
"If music wakes you up, makes you think, heals you... Then i guess the music is working" - A.R.Rehman
"If you fail to plan, you may as well plan to fail." - Unknown
"Born too late to explore the earth, Born too early to explore the space, Born just in time to explore the internet"
"I only have two feet, but I always have them more than two doors"
"I don"t go so far as to think that the only good Indians are dead Indians, but I believe nine out of ten are, and I shouldn"t like to inquire too closely into the case of the tenth."-Theodore Roosevelt
"There is an old African saying. "I am we." If you met an African in ancient times and asked him who he was, he would reply "I am we." This is revolutionary suicide: I, we, all of us are the one and the multitude." - Huey P. Newton, political activist, co-founder of the Black Panther Party
"Don't worry if your theory doesn't agree with the observations, because they are probably wrong." - Sir Arthur Eddington
"She's been through more hell than you'll ever know. But that's what gives her beauty an edge... you can't touch a woman who can wear pain like the grandest of diamonds around her neck." - Alfa
"World is full of obvious things which nobody by chance ever discovers." Grimm Quotes
"Children have never been very good at listening to their elders, but they have never failed to imitate them." James Baldwin
"We make up horrors to help us cope with the real ones." - Stephen King
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." - Jiddu Krishnamurti; "Human salvation lies in the hands of the creatively maladjusted." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"The reason they call it the American Dream is because you have to be asleep to believe it." - George Carlin
"If you have a garden and a library, you have everything you need." -Cicero
"The object of life is not to be on the side of the majority, but to escape finding oneself in the ranks of the insane". - Marcus Aurelius
"Real knowledge is to know the extent of one's ignorance." - Confucius
"In the End, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." - Martin Luther King
"Forget the butterflies, i feel the whole zoo when i am with you." - Unknown
"When you play music you discover a part of yourself you never knew existed." - Bill Evans
"Whenever you see a successful person, you only see the public glories, never the private sacrifices to reach them." --Vaibhav Shah
"It is not about what we deserve. It is about what we believe." - Wonder Woman
"There is no IMPOSSIBLE. The word itself says I M POSSIBLE." - Unknown
"Oh yes, the past can hurt. But you can either run from it or learn from it"
"...In the end we only regret the chances we didn't take." - Unknown
"... You are capable of amazing things, you just don't know it yet." - Unknown
"There are different kinds of justice. Retributive justice is largely Western. The African understanding is far more restorative - not so much to punish as to redress or restore a balance that has been knocked askew." - Archbishop Desmond Tutu, civil rights activist
"God puts people in your life for a reason, and removes them from your life for a better reason" -- Life
"Only put off until tomorrow what you are willing to die having left undone." --Pablo Picasso
"Hearts will never be practical until they are made unbreakable." - Wizard of Oz
"No one is good, bad or ugly just cuz they like it. Everyone has a story no one cares about."
"- ... Never leaves any survivors No survivors? Then where do the stories come from. I wonder." - Pirates of the Caribbean The Curse of the Black Pearl
"You miss 100% of the shots you don"t take" - Wayne Gretzky
"A story in a game, is like a story in a porn movie. It"s expected to be there, but it"s not that important." - John Carmack
"The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common. They don"t alter their views to fit the facts. They alter the facts to fit their views." - Dr Who
"The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common. They don"t alter their views to fit the facts. They alter the facts to fit the views." - Dr Who
"No one is actually dead until the ripples they cause in the world die away." - Terry Pratchett
"Our greatest weapon against stress is our ability to choose one thought over another." William James
"If my girl laughs, I laugh with her. If my girl cries, I cry with her. So when my girl gets married, I marry with her." -unknown
"Intelligence is the ability to adapt to change." - Stephen Hawking
"You are confined only by the walls you build yourself." - Andrew Murphy
"The mind is a superb instrument if used rightly. Used wrongly, however, it becomes very destructive. To put it more accurately...you usually don't use it at all. It uses you." - Eckhart Tolle
"Every relationship you've ever been in is just two people figuring out they don't like eachother as much as they'd hoped they would" - James Acaster
"The scientific man does not aim at an immediate result. He does not expect that his advanced ideas will be readily taken up. His work is like that of a planter--for the future." -Nikola Tesla
"A great artist has no instinct of self-preservation" - Unknown
"Intelligence is 95% having common sense"
"The victor will never be asked if he told the truth" - Adolf Hitler
"I see now that the circumstances of one"s birth are irrelevant. It is what you do with the gift of life that determines who you are." - Mewtwo
"When you're backed against the wall, break the goddamn thing down." - Harvey Specter (Suits, TV show).
"Once upon a time I discovered Samuel Butler [of 'The Way of All Flesh'], the second-best novel in the English language. I say the second-best, so that, if you remind me of Tom Jones, or The Mayor of Casterbridge, or any other that you fancy, I can say, of course, that one is the best." A. A. Milne
"A ship is always safe at shore but that is not what it's build for." - Albert Einstien
"Beauty is the most dangerous weapon" -unknown teacher of Alejandro Jodorowsky
"Be who you are not who the world wants you to be." - Unknown
"Everyone thinks of changing the world, but no one thinks of changing himself." - Leo Tolstoy
"It is wise to keep in mind that neither success nor failure is ever final." - Roger Babson
"NOT MAKING A DECISION IS A BIG DECISION." - NEGAN
"NOT MAKING A DECISION IS A BIG DECISION." -NEGAN
"Sometimes people make the wrong choices to get to the right place" - the woman from The Equalizer
"Vision is not only what you see, it is also what you experience within." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"It is better to ask some of the questions than know all the answers." - James Thurber
"Men who can't wipe away the tears from women's eyes aren't real men" - Sanji (One Piece - Anime)
"The state must declare the child to be the most precious treasure of the people"--Adolf Hitler
"Strength lies in differences, not in similarities." - Stephen Covey
"The root of all superstition is that men observe when a thing hits, but not when it misses." - Francis Bacon
" Respect yourself if you would have others respect you." - Baltasar Gracian
"People should not be afraid of their governments, governments should be afraid of their people" - V for Vendetta
"Open your arms to change, but don't let go of your values." - Dalai Lama
"Trying to be happy by accumulating possessions is like trying to satisfy hunger by taping sandwiches all over your body" - George Carlin
"Do more than believe: practice." - William Arthur Ward
"Nothing about me is original. I am the combined effort of everyone I have ever known." - Unknown
"If a book will be too difficult for grown-ups, then you write it for children." - Madeleine L'Engle
"Instead of problems, try to see solutions" - David Marchante
"Your big opportunity may be right where you are standing right now." - Napoleon Hill
"This is it until we fuck it up again" - my wife.
"If we wait for the moment when everything, absolutely everything is ready, we shall never begin." - Ivan Turgenev
"We must embrace pain and burn it as fuel for our journey." - Kenji Miyazawa
"If you don't fight for what you want, don't cry for what you lost"- Will Smith
"Next time you're thinking outward, look inward so you can find the real you, and the truth can be sent to the stratosphere" -Bill Burr
"I shall not commit the fashionable stupidity of regarding everything I cannot explain as a fraud" - C. G. Jung
"Your life does not get better by chance, it gets better by change." (-Jim Rohn)
"Start where you are. Use what you have. Do what you can." Arthur Ashe
"The most common way people give up their power is by thinking they don"t have any." - Alice Walker
"Live! Live the wonderful life that is in you! Let nothing be lost upon you. Be always searching for new sensations. Be afraid of nothing." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"You are a Diamond dear, They can't break you" - Unknown
"People change for two reason: either their mind have been opened or their hearts have been broken" - Unknown
"Courage starts with showing up and letting ourselves be seen." - Bren Brown
"... do or do not, there is no try." - Yoda, Star Wars
"Be slow in choosing a friend, but slower in changing him." - Scottish Proverb.
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift of God, which is why we call it the present." - Bil Keane
"Spoil me with loyalty &amp; respect I can finance myself"
"In life, one has a choice to take one of two paths: to wait for some special day--or to celebrate each special day." --Rasheed Ogunlaru
"Quiet people have the loudest minds." - Stephen Hawking
"Quite people have the loudest minds." Stephen Hawking
"Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend." - Albert Camus
"The Bible is very easy to understand. But we Christians are a bunch of scheming swindlers. We pretend to be unable to understand it because we know very well that the minute we understand, we are obliged to act accordingly." - Soren Kierkegaard
"We become what we think about most of the time, and that's a strangest secret..." Earl Nightingale
"Practice isn't the thing you do once you're good. Practice is the thing you do that makes you good." Malcolm Gladwell
"Being a kid is almost, like, hallucinogenic. It's very sensory. It's very overloading. Sound and visuals are very present." - Bo Burnham
"Immortality will come to such as are fit for it; and he who would be a great soul in the future must be a great soul now." Ralph Waldo Emerson

"It is easy, in the world, to live after the world's opinion. It is easy, in solitude, to live after our own. But the great man is he, who in the midst of the crowd, keeps with perfect sweetness the independence of solitude."
"Feed one addiction with another."
"Artists use lies to tell the truth. Yes, I created a lie. But because you believed it, you found something true about yourself." - Alan Moore, V for Vendetta
"Become addicted to constant and never-ending self-improvement." Anthony J. D"Angelo
"I felt in need of a great pilgrimage, so i sat still for three days" - Hafiz
"I may give out, but I never give up" - Richard Overton, America's oldest Veteran
'life appears to consist in a warm sun and a garden of roses, in the smiles and frowns of a fair enemy, and the fire that consumes your own heart.' mary shelley *frankenstein*
"An online tax program is only as good as the information the person enters into it and the understanding of what is being asked by the program." - Jeffrey Schneider
"The superior man is modest in his speech, but exceeds in his actions." - Confucius
"You spend your whole life being someone else, who's gonna be you?" - Handsome Devil movie
"I do not trust people who don't love themselves and yet tell me, 'I love you.' There is an African saying which is: Be careful when a naked person offers you a shirt." - Maya Angelou, poet, singer, civil rights activist
"There are a lot of things in this life you can"t control but one thing you can always control is the way you treat others"
"How late is it to begin living when life must comes to an end? What foolish obliviousness to our mortality to put off wise plans until our 50th and 60th year, and to want to begin life from a point from which few have reached?" Seneca the Younger - quotebanq.com
"One day the people didn't believe in you will tell everyone how they met you"- Johnny Depp
"Everything around you that you call life was made up by people, and you can change it." Steve Jobs
"the Germans will never forgive the Jews for Auschwitz." - Henryk Broder
"Only by self-respect will you compel others to respect you." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"What you don't heal in your singleness, will spread like a disease, in your togetherness."
"Pride is holding your head up when everyone around you has theirs bowed. Courage is what makes you do it." --Bryce Courtenay
"Remember me for who am I, not for what I did"
"Watch carefully the magic that occurs when you give a person just enough comfort to be themselves." - Atticus Finch
"A great deal of my misgivings could be easily resolved if people would quite simply explain what they're actually trying to accomplish..." - Bertrand Muscle
"Which do you want: the pain of staying where you are, or the pain of growth?"  Judith Hanson Lasater
"Patriotism, like honesty, is a luxury with a very high face value which is quickly pricing itself out of the spiritual market altogether." - Dorothy Dunnett, Game of Kings
"We're all brave until we realize the cochroach has wings." - Unknown.
"Only dead fish go with the flow."
"Life without endeavor is like entering a jewel mine and coming out with empty hands." - Japanese Proverb
"Africa is one continent, one people, and one nation. The notion that in order to have a nation it is necessary for there to be a common language, a common territory and common culture has failed to stand the test of time or the scrutiny of scientific definition of objective reality."
"I am a tax-paying, kid-raising, church-going, hard-working American citizen. If I work hard all day long and I want to go home and in the privacy of my own living room and smoke a joint and just stare at the fireplace for three hours, that is my civil liberty." -Rick Steves
"Our main business is not to see what lies dimly at a distance, but to do what lies clearly at hand." - Thomas Carlyle
"Good artists copy, but great artists steal" - uncreativeGod
"Muddy water is best cleared by leaving it alone." - Alan Watts
"Good artists copy, but great artists steal" - u/uncreativeGod
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." -Albert Einstein
"It's easier to fool people than to convince them that they have been fooled" - Mark Twain
"Not just beautiful, though--the stars are like the trees in the forest, alive and breathing. And they're watching me." - Haruki Murakami, Kafka on the Shore
"To lead the people, walk behind them." - Lao Tzu
"You cannot do a kindness too soon, for you never know how soon it will be too late." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Success is to wake up each morning and consciously decide that today will be the best day of your life." - Ken Poirot
"Most books on witchcraft will tell you that witches work naked. This is because most books on witchcraft are written by men." - Neil Gaiman
"It's a basic truth of the human condition that everybody lies. The only variable is about what." -House, M.D.
"Everything's got to end sometime. Otherwise nothing would ever get started." -Matt Smith: Doctor Who
"Everyone who has happiness traces back to an incredible commitment to self-awareness. Stop bullshitting yourself." -Gary Vaynerchuck
"There is a transcendental dimension beyond language...it"s just hard as hell to talk about!" - Terrance McKenna
"If you want to learn what someone fears losing, watch what they photograph." -unknown
"Bitches be unhappy"
"When we were together in the darkness, close to each other, I wasn't spying on you. I was loving you." - Richard Matheson
"You can catch me in the cherry red 1-50. Got the grizzy locked in the stizzy. Pop the clizzy goin 60 down the one wizzy" - Big Pun
"Want to make a monster? Take the parts of yourself that make you uncomfortableyour weaknesses, bad thoughts, vanities, and hungersand pretend they"re across the room. It"s too ugly to be human." - Richard Siken
"One day hundreds of years ago, some guy settles upon a philosophy that makes sense in the context of his times..." - Nothing is Cliche, chapter 4
"Never build a dungeon you wouldn't be happy to spend the night in yourself. The world would be a happier place if more people remembered that." -Terry Pratchett
"Regrets about the past &amp; concerns about the future are the twin thieves that rob us of the present"-Steve Ketamine
"Never trust any ruler who puts his faith in tunnels and bunkers and escape routes. The chances are that his heart isn't in the job." -Terry Pratchett
"We dance for laughter, we dance for tears, we dance for madness, we dance for fears, we dance for hopes, we dance for screams, we are the dancers, we create the dreams." Albert Einstein
"The speed of the leader is the speed of the gang." - Mary Kay Ash
"He who fights with monsters might take care lest he thereby become a monster. And if you gaze for long into an abyss, the abyss gazes also into you." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"It reminds me of an African proverb  The earth is not ours but something we hold in trust for future generations. I hope my generation will be worthy of that trust." - Kofi Annan, Ghanaian diplomat, Secretary-General of the United Nations
"Maybe she would be a great inventor. She would invent little tiny radios the size of a green pea that people could carry around and stick in their ears." from The Heart Is a Lonely Hunter, by Carson McCullers, 1940
"Not everyone can bat clean up, ok, if your batting fucking 8th, quit your whining and get on base" -Bill Burr
"Everything was better back when everything was worse" - David Sipress - New Yorker Cartoonist
"It truly was a Shawshank Redemption" - Tom Hanks
"I wish there was a way to know you"re in the good old days before you actually left them." - Andrew Bernard
"There is nothing like a dream to create the future." - Victor Hugo
"No space of regret can make amends with one's life opportunity misused." -J. Marley
"Your world is a living expression of how you are usingand have usedyour mind." Earl Nightingale
"It is thus the instinct of fear, rather than that of justice, spurs us on to use the collective strength of the average, to exaggerate the abnormalities of the few" - Stuart Hay, 1911
"Tonight I can write the saddest lines. I loved her, and sometimes she loved me too." - Pablo Neruda
"Mr. Nothing looked ready to bolt out of the place. But it was too crowded to bolt. He would have to shuffle. And shuffling away from an argument was never a cool thing to do. I suspected Mr. Nothing, as most celebrities must, spent a lot of time trying to figure out various ways to look cool."
"Home is where the heart is, and my heart is in my chest"
"Her love is just like the lost City of Atlantis. No Scientist can find it." -Eek-A-Mouse
"Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more, so that we may fear less."
"We all are wounded, we all are healers. Time changes, role changes." - Shon Mehta, The Timingila
"You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching, Love like you'll never be hurt, Sing like there's nobody listening, And live like it's heaven on earth." - William W. Purkey
"You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching, Love like you'll never be hurt, Sing like there's nobody listening, And live like it's heaven on earth." - William W. Purkey
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"This is a practical country. We have ideals. We have philosophies. But the problem with any ideology is that it gives the answer before you look at the evidence..." -Bill Clinton
"I would feel the urge to stab the point of my pen into the neck of the person in front of me." - Jordan B. Peterson
"The Archetypal Son...has a positive aspect. The positive aspect continually reconstructs...as...a consequence of "incestuous"...sexual...union with the Great Mother]. " - Jordan B. Peterson
"The man who is swimming against the stream knows the strength of it." - Woodrow Wilson
"A musician must make music, an artist must paint, a poet must write, if he is to be ultimately at peace with himself. What a man can be, he must be." - Abraham Maslow
"Honestly, I'm not convinced the Russians were the real problem in 2016..." - Bill M'ahar
"Our country is in danger, but not to be despaired of... On you depend the fortunes of America. You are to decide the important question, on which rest the happiness and liberty of millions yet unborn. Act worthy of yourselves." - Joseph Warren 1775
"Reality is for people who can't face drugs." -Tom Waits
"It's better to burn out than to fade away"-Cobain
"Daring to set boundaries is about having the courage to love ourselves even when we risk disappointing others." (-Brene Brown)
"There can be no knowledge without emotion. We may be aware of a truth, yet until we have felt its force, it is not ours. To the cognition of the brain must be added the experience of the soul." - Arnold Bennett (1867-1931)
"Can you remember who you were, before the world told you who you should be?" - Charles Bukowski
"It's not about how hard you can hit; it's about how hard you can get hit and keep moving forward." Rocky Balboa
"People either die in reality or in our memories"
"Sorrow comes in great waves...but rolls over us, and though it may almost smother us, it leaves us. And we know that if it is strong, we are stronger, inasmuch as it passes and we remain." - Henry James
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." - Albert Einstein
"You may not know the future. But you know the past, and the future is a reflection of the past"
"It is impossible to speak in such a way that you cannot be misunderstood." - Karl Popper
"I despise the kind of book which tells you how to make yourself happy. I believe the first duty of philosophy is making you understand what deep shit you are in." - Slavoj iek
"It's a sad day when you find out that it's not accident or fortune but just yourself that kept things from you." - Lillian Hellman.
"If you are lucky enough to find a way of life you love, you have to find the courage to live it." - John Irving
"Today I will multiple my value a hundredfold. To grow and multiplying is necessary to plant the wheat grain in the darkness of the earth and my failures, my despairs, my ignorance, and my inabilities are the darkness in which I have been planted in order to ripen....
"Outnumbered doesn't mean overran, and overran doesn't mean defeated" - me
"I doubt there's a heaven; I think the people from hell have probably bought it for a timeshare." - Victoria Wood
"The way you think, the way you behave, the way you eat, can influence your life by 30 to 50 years." - Deepak Chopra
"Follow effective action with quiet reflection. From the quiet reflection will come even more effective action." - Peter Drucker
"Make happy those who are near and those who are far will come." - Chinese proverb
"A republic, if you can keep it." --- Benjamin Franklin
"Of course, our failures are a consequence of many factors, but possibly one of the most important is the fact that society operates on the theory that specialization is the key to success, not realizing that specialization precludes comprehensive thinking." -Buckminster Fuller
"Understand me. I"m not like an ordinary world. I have my madness, I live in another dimension and I do not have time for things that have no soul." - Charles Bukowski
"Finish each day and be done with it. You have done what you could. Some blunders and absurdities no doubt crept in; forget them as soon as you can. Tomorrow is a new day. You shall begin it serenely and with too high a spirit to be encumbered with your old nonsense."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"At twenty-three I was entirely unconvinced about anything, except that some people were strong and attractive and could do what they wanted, and others were caught and disgraced. I hoped I was of the former." F. Scott Fitzgerald, The Last of the Belles
"Nothing is more powerful than an idea whose time has come." - Victor Hugo
"If the world gives you pen and paper, draw the line" -Yelawolf
"All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the Universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying." - Arthur C. Clarke
"In fair weather prepare for foul." - Thomas Fuller
"I think the reason pawns can"t move backwards is because if they could, they"d kill their own kings in a heartbeat." -Kyle Myhre; 2010 National Poetry Slam; St. Paul, MN
"It was not socialist ideology that posed the problem, then  but ideology, as such. Ideology divided the world up simplistically into those who thought and acted properly, and those who did not." - Jordan Peterson
"In the end, you will not be thinking how much money you earned, but how much experience you gained throughout the life." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Tact is the art of making a point without making an enemy." Isaac Newton
"Repetition without development is decline." - Pauline Kael
"Courage is not simply one of the virtues, but the form of every virtue at the testing point. A chastity or honesty, or mercy, which yields to danger will be chaste or honest or merciful only on conditions. Pilate was merciful till it became risky." C.S Lewis
"If you think you are too small to be effective, you have never been in the dark with a mosquito." - Betty Reese
"The only enemy more dangerous than a man with unlimited resources, is one with nothing to lose."  Chuck Rhoades (Billions)
"Joy is what happens to us when we allow ourselves to recognise how good things really are." -Marianne Williamson
"Chickens are decent people." -Carlin
"If we did all the things we are capable of doing, we would literally astound ourselves." - Thomas Edison
""Research your own experience. Absorb what is useful, reject what is useless, add what is essentially your own." - Bruce Lee
"People say love isnt real, its all too real.'
"You cannot teach a man anything; you can only help him find it within himself." - Galileo
"Faith is taking the first step even when you don't see the whole staircase." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Fall down seven times, stand up eight." - Japanese Proverb
"Move fast and break things. Unless you are breaking stuff, you are not moving fast enough." - Mark Zuckerberg
"Do what you have to do, to do what you want to do." - Denzel Washington
"You make the decisions to fulfill, to whatever extent, the potential life that exists within you." - Hans Decoz
"Busyness serves as a kind of existential reassurance, a hedge against emptiness: Obviously your life cannot possibly be silly or trivial or meaningless if you are so busy, completely booked, in demand every hour of the day." -Tim Kreider
"What are you waiting for? If you cannot answer this without resorting to the BS concept of 'good timing,' the answer is simple. You're afraid, just like the rest of the world." -Tim Ferriss
"Change your thinking, change your life." - Ernest Holmes.
"The gods envy us. They envy us because we're mortal, because any moment may be our last. Everything is more beautiful because we're doomed. You will never be lovelier than you are now. We will never be here again." (Homer (the Iliad))
"In the end, it's just you and your thoughts, alone in the prison of your mind"
"According to Madam Pomfrey, thoughts could leave deeper scars than almost anything else." (J.K. Rowling)
"We are judged by what we finish, not by what we start." - Anonymous
"When you're in the shit up to your neck, there's nothing left to do but sing." - Samuel Beckett
"If you can't avoid a conflict then hit first" - Vladimir Putin
"To retire is to die."  Pablo Casals
"Nothing great was ever achieved without enthusiasm." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The trouble was, I had been inadequate all along, I simply hadn't thought about it." -Sylvia Plath (The Bell Jar)
"Sometimes life gets f*cked up, that"s why we get f*cked up, I can still feel your touch"-Lil Peep (RIP)
"The quickest way to double your money is to fold it over and put it back in your pocket."  Will Rogers
"Perseverance is failing nineteen times and succeeding the twentieth." - Julie Andrews
"Never mistake motion for action." - Ernest Hemingway
"People just submitted it. I don't know why. They 'trust me'. Dumb fucks." -Mark Zuckerberg
"The definition of a man is someone you can count on when the enemy comes." - Joyce Benenson, anthropologist
"We grow fearless when we do the things we fear." - Robin Sharma
"Those who you cannot downvote, unless you're part of their weird cult, lives in a bubble and are likely to be incapable of critical thought." - Anonymous
"He that can have patience can have what he will." - Benjamin Franklin
"Real revelation comes through silence."Fred Rogers, 1997
"The greatest thing that we can do is to help somebody know that they"re loved and capable of loving."Fred Rogers
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read. It was books that taught me that the things that tormented me most were the very things that connected me with all the people who were alive, who had ever been alive." - James Baldwin
"You cannot change your destination overnight, but you can change your direction overnight." - Jim Rohn
"If no one else has ever told you this before, I will tell it to you one more time and hope you believe it and never forget it for the rest of your life: You deserve to be treated well." - Andrew W.K.
"Don"t wander away from yourself to get close to someone else." - unknown
"Love your fucking life. Take picture of everything. Tell people you love them. Talk to random strangers. Do things that you're scared to do. Fuck it, because so many of us die and no one remembers a thing we did. Take your life and make it the best story in the world. Don't waste that shit."
"Failure is the opportunity to begin again, more intelligently." - Henry Ford
"Pay attention to the hand sign, niggas running from the gang signs"
"Bullying and prejudice in our public life sets a national tone, provides permission for cruelty and bigotry, and compromises the moral education of children" --- President George W. Bush
"Tired minds don't plan well. Sleep first, plan later" -Walter Reisch
"All great changes are preceded by chaos." - Deepak Chopra
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
''Why do you put your self-esteem in the hands of complete strangers?'' -Helena Bonham Carter
"Do we need more time? Or do we need to be more disciplined with the time we have?" - Kerry Johnson
"If you"re a hammer, you see everything as a nail"
"How does one know, until one does?"- Paul Olson
"I think, as many of you were aware, he was working at a deli, [had an] accident with a meat slicing machine, he lost part of his middle finger, and as a result of this, this rendered him practically mute." -- then Sen. Obama (2005), speaking of now Chicago Mayor Rahm Emanuel
"When the full extent of your venality, moral turpitude, and political corruption becomes known..." -John O. Brennan, former CIA Director
"Destiny is not a matter of chance; but a matter of choice." - William Jennings
"Plodding wins the race." - Aesop
"I see many more successes and wins from those working to be better over those trying to be the best. Remove the hype, the hate and the ego in your growth to truly grow to your potential and beyond. Stop subscribing to the idea that you have to be the best." - Loren Weisman
"Let me tell you the secret that has led me to my goal. My strength lies solely in my tenacity." - Louis Pasteur
"Intelligence is the ability to adapt to change. "  Stephen Hawking
"All nationalism is wounded, by definition" - war nerd, 3/15/18
"How long we lived is not important, But how we lived is important "-Unknown
"Be careful who you call your friends. I'd rather have four quarters than one hundred pennies." -Al Capone
"Do not run after girl, they are not Oxygen for you. Run after you life." - Undown
"Happiness is a choice that requires effort at times" - Aeschylus
"Date born - Date died. That dash encapsulates a life. A little line represents every breath, every tear, every laugh, every struggle, every triumph..." - u/ilikedeadpeople
"We have so little faith in the ebb and flow of life, of love, of relationships. We leap at the flow of the tide and resist in terror its ebb." (-Anne Morrow Lindbergh)
"There is possibility in everything you believe in." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The liberty of the individual is no gift of civilization. It was greater before there was any civilization." -- More bullshit from Sigmund Freud.
"Efforts and courage are not enough without purpose and direction." - John F. Kennedy
"America is just as much of a Christian nation as it is a Muslim nation, a Hindu nation, a Jewish nation. America is a land of religious diversity that so happens to have a Christian majority."
"The value of achievement lies in the achieving." - Albert Einstein
"I've had a wonderful and successful career. But next to my family, it really hasn't mattered at all." - Lee Iacocca
"The future will belong not only to the educated man, but to the man who is educated to use his leisure wisely." - C. K. Brightbill
"Reform yourself. There will be one less rascal in the world." - Thomas Carlyle
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." Dr. Seuss
"Those have most power to hurt us that we love." - John Fletcher
"He who wrestles with us, strengthens our nerves and sharpens our skill. Our antagonist is our helper." - Edmund Burke
"It isn't what you do, but how you do it." - John Wooden
"You get so good at hiding the cracks, sometimes you forget they're there.
"Men are not afraid of things, but of how they view them" - Epictetus
"If you are pained by external things, it is not they that disturb you, but your own judgment of them. And it is in your power to wipe out that judgment now." - Marcus Aurelius
"Industry is the root of all ugliness"- Oscar Wilde
"I want friends, not admirers. People who respect me for my character and my deeds, not my flattering smile. The circle around me would be much smaller, but what does that matter, as long as they're sincere?" -Anne Frank
"Look deep into nature, and you will understand everything better." - Albert Einstein
"All governments suffer a recurring problem: Power attracts pathological personalities. It is not that power corrupts but that it is magnetic to the corruptible". - Frank Herbert, Author Of Dune.
"Don"t go around saying the world owes you a living. The world owes you nothing, it was here first" -Mark Twain
"One is always a long way from solving a problem until one actually has the answer." - Stephen Hawking
"We are manipulated by unscrupulous men without ever being aware of it." - Dr. John Coleman
"I've got a happy personality but a tired soul"
"Skywalker still looking to the horizon never here, the need in front of your nose" - Yoda to Luke
"... we are always glad to receive even irrelevant advice against doing the reasonable things we do not want to do, just as we are apt to brush aside as insubstantial the most cogent argument when we are determined upon some wrong-headed course of action." -- J.R. Ackerley ("My Dog Tulip", 1956)
"I can accept failure, everyone fails at something. But I can't accept not trying." - Michael Jordan
"Hello There" - General Kenobi
"Savour the time or save her the time"-My own as far as I know
"It is good to have an end to journey towards; but it is the journey that matters in the end." - Ursula Le Guin
"The catastrophe you fear will happen has already happened."
"Poker is a lot like sex..."
"Times are complicated but the life is simple"
"It is not easy to find happiness in ourselves, and it is not possible to find it elsewhere." - Agnes Repplier
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde
"The man who chases two rabbits, catches neither." - Confucius
"I never dreamed about success i worked for it"
"Things which matter most must never be at the mercy of things which matter least." - Goethe
"To any entrepreneur: if you want to do it, do it now. If you don't, you're going to regret it." - Catherine Cook
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Our love is God. Let"s go get a slushie." -J.D (Heathers 1989)
"I had nothing to offer anybody except my own confusion." -Jack Kerouac
"Clouds come floating into my life, no longer to carry rain or usher storm, but to add color to my sunset sky." - Rabindranath Tagore, Stray Birds
"Having perfected our disguise, we spend our lives searching for someone we don"t fool." - Robert Brault
"A journey of a thousand miles must begin with a single step." - Lao-Tsu
"There is possibility in everything you believe." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"I would spread the cloths under your feet: But I, being poor, have only my dreams; I have spread my dreams under your feet; Tread softly because you tread on my dreams." - W.B. Yeats
"Don't compare your life with others. There is no comparison between the sun and the moon. They shine when it's there time."
?We may have bad weather in Ireland, but the sun shines in the hearts of the people and that keeps us all warm." - Marianne Williamson
"We had so little, yet we had so much: Thunder and lightning at the lightest touch." Source: John M Ridland, 2011 (February), "Age looking back at its youth", Poetry magazine.
"Excellence is not a skill. It is an attitude." - Ralph Marston
"The reasonable man adapts himself to the world; the unreasonable one persists in trying to adapt the world to himself. Therefore all progress depends on the unreasonable man." George Bernard Shaw
"Never attribute to conspiracy that which can be explained through stupidity." -- Anon
"To improve is to change, to be perfect is to change often." Winston Churchill
"The only way to end human suffering is to end humanity" - Unknown
"The key to any game is to use your strengths and hide your weaknesses." - Paul Westphal
"Consistency is the true foundation of trust. Either keep your promises or do not make them." - Roy T. Bennett
"Don't send me flowers when I'm dead. If you like me, send them while I'm alive." - Brian Clough
"Wherever you go, go with all your heart." Confucius
"Money does grow on trees, you just have to know how to climb it" - AX
"To live an enchanted life is to be challenged, to be awakened, to be gripped and shaken to the core by the extraordinary which lies at the heart of the ordinary. Above all, to live an enchanted life is to fall in love with the world all over again." (-Sharon Blackie)
"I would dig a whole all the way to China, unless of course I was there, then I'd dig my way home. If by digging I could steal the win from the sails of the greedy men who rule the world". - Dave Matthews, Dream Girl
"Truth is where intelligences find rest"
"They kept telling me how to remove the bear trap, but it was obvious to me that the 'bear trap' was actually an ornery wombat who had affixed itself rather steadfastly to my ankle..." - J.K. Tolkein
"Perhaps when we find ourselves wanting everything, it is because we are dangerously close to wanting nothing." -Sylvia Plath
"Be mindful of the future, but not at the expense of the moment." -Qui-Gon Jinn
"some of you are confused. Luckily you walked in the room confused, so nothing really changed." - Ben Finegold
"I think that you should jump out of an airplane and float down to earth on a parachute at some point in your life. if you're too scared, make sure to surround yourself with people who love you enough to shove you out." -My high school physics teacher
"Personally, I think that you should jump out of an airplane at some point in your life and float down to earth with a parachute. If you don't feel like it or are too scared, make sure to surround yourself with people who love you enough to shove you out." -My high school physics teacher
"Most people would die sooner than think -- in fact, they do so." -- Bertrand Russell
"I never attribute to malevolence what I can attribute to stupidity" - Ben Shapiro
"Divide et impera (divide and conquer) must be the motto of every nation, that either hates, or fears us." - Alexander Hamilton (Federalist Papers No.7)
"If you have attended over 100 weddings in your life and are still single, you are not different from a canopy" (Supposedly) R. Mugabe
"TOO MUCH OF ANYTHING IS BAD, BUT TOO MUCH OF GOOD WHISKEY IS BARELY ENOUGH"- MARK TWAIN
"In relationship, if you cannot teach something right, then learn something appropriate." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"You"re basically a houseplant with more complicated emotions"
"Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending." - Maria Robinson
"If you want to lift yourself up, lift up someone else." - Booker T. Washington
"If you want to lift yourself up, lift up someone else." - Booker T. Washington Source: www.quotedark.com
"You said that I was transparent, and easily forgotten. But why then did you try to use my lifetime, To prove to yourself who you are?" - Living, Loving, and Learning by Leo Buscaglia
"We're all see through just like glass, and we can shatter just as fast." - Thousand Foot Krutch - Be Somebody
"Think where man's glory most begins and ends, and say my glory was I had such friends." - William Butler Yeats
"The woman who follows the crowd will usually go no further than the crowd. The woman who walks alone is likely to find herself in places no one has been before." Albert Einstein
"Never let your desire for love override your sense of self and value." - Izey Victoria Odiase
"Dreams are not those which comes while we are sleeping, but dreams are those when u don"t sleep before fulfilling them."-Kalam
"You know, sometimes all you need is twenty seconds of insane courage. Just literally twenty seconds of just embarrassing bravery. And I promise you, something great will come of it." -Benjamin Mee, We Bought A Zoo
"You can, you should, and if you"re brave enough to start, you will." -Stephen King
"A weak man compensates with strength for his lack of intelligence while a strong man compensates with intelligence for a lack of strength"-me
"The Trouble Is You Think Have Time"-Buddha
"If your friend is made out of honey, don't lick all of him" Syrian proverb
"The best way to predict the future is to create it."
"If you're losing your soul and you know it, then you've still got a soul left to lose" - Charles Bukowski
"Words are the ligature for which meaning may be strangled."
"Three things that cannot stay hidden: the sun, the moon and the truth" - Buddha.
"All Birds find shelter during a rain. But Eagle avoids rain by flying above the Clouds"-A.P.J Abdul Kalam
"Everybody wants to go to heaven but nobody wants to die."
"...that"s the thing about unhappiness. All it takes is for something worse to come along, and you realize it was actually happiness after all." [ Claire Foy as Queen Elizabeth II, "The Crown" S2E8]
"My mission in life is not merely to survive, but to thrive; and to do so with some passion, some compassion, some humor, and some style." -Maya Angelou
"It would not be much of a universe if it wasn't home to the people you love." - Stephen Hawking
"The French aren't much at fighting wars anymore. Despite their reputation for fashion, their women have spindly legs. Their music is sappy. But they do know how to whip up a plate of grub." -- Mike Royko
"Drink loosens the tongue. But it also opens the heart wide, and it is a vehicle instrumental to a moral quality, that is, openheartedness" - Immanuel Kant
"They've promised that dreams can come true but forgot to mention that nightmares are dreams, too." - Oscar Wilde
"As the Americans learned so painfully in Earth's final century, free flow of information is the only safeguard against tyranny...Beware of he who would deny you access to information, for in his heart he dreams himself your master. Commissioner Pravin Lal, 'U.N. Declaration of Rights' "
"Without your involvement, you can't succeed. With your involvement, you can't fail."-A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"You cannot change anyone, but you can be the reason someone changes." - Roy T. Bennett
"When a government is dependent upon bankers for money, they and not the leaders of the government control the situation, since the hand that gives is above the hand that takes. Money has no motherland; financiers are without patriotism and without decency; their sole object is gain." - Napolon
"If we do not succeed, then we run the risk of failure." - Former vice president Dan Quayle
"Nothing is more responsible for the good old days than a bad memory" Franklin Pierce Adams
"We are not calling for the slaughtering of white people, at least for now"- Julius Malema, South African politician
"Could you patent the sun?" -Jonas Salk, on the Polio vaccine
"Anyone who campaigns for public office becomes disqualified for holding any office at all." - Thomas More, Utopia
"If your question is about sports, The answer to your question is money." -Don Ohlmeyer
"To you, I'm an atheist. To God, I'm the loyal opposition." - Woody Allen
"Our main business is not to see what lies dimly at a distance, but to do what lies clearly at hand." - Thomas Carlyle
"Being nerdy is just liking stuff that takes work to like." - Donald Glover aka Childish Gambino
"Trees are poems the earth writes upon the sky, We fell them down and turn them into paper, That we may record our emptiness." - Kahlil Gibran
"It never ceases to amaze me: we all love ourselves more than other people, but care more about their opinion than our own." - Marcus Aurelius.
"If you don"t grow. If you don"t learn. If you don"t change. If you don"t listen. It"s likely you"re wrong." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"All I insist on, and nothing else is that you should show the whole world that you are not afraid. Be silent, if you choose; but when it is necessary, speak- and speak in such a way that people will remember it." -Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart
"With great power comes great mental illness" -Whizzer
"Something is better than nothing"- Unknown
"Everything you've ever wanted is on the other side of fear"
"Advertising is the rattling of a stick in a swill bucket." -- George Orwell
"Your future is created by what you do today, not tomorrow." -- Robert Kiyosaki
"Oh my darling it's true beautiful things have dents and scratches too"
"Time is a good thing. I don't ask myself: when will be the time when it will be ok? Whenever. Other times will come and cover it, like leaves do in the winter...(cont) [Email from a short-term friend]
30 good habits for good life
"Heck, I'm in the government and I don't trust it. You don't have to believe in your government to be a good American. You just have to believe in your country." -George W. Bush
"Once you realize you deserve a bright future, letting go of your dark past is the best choice you will ever make." - Roy T. Bennett
"Shit I'm in the government and I don't trust it. You don't have to trust the government to be a good American. You just have to trust your country." George W. Bush
"When you are courting a nice girl an hour seems like a second. When you sit on a red-hot cinder a second seems like an hour. That"s relativity." - Albert Einstein
"It Is Very Easy To Defeat Someone, But It Is Very Hard To Win Someone" - A.P.J. Abdul Kalam
"Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing it incorrectly and applying the wrong remedies." -- Groucho Marx
"I love the poorly educated" - Donald J. Trump
"Those have most power to hurt us, that we love." - John Fletcher.
"Learn from everyone. Follow no one." Author Unknown
"The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why." - Mark Twain
'The greater men are in the prime the bigger the burden in their old age' - me
"It does not matter how slowly you go, so long as you do not stop." - Confucius.
"It is not enough to know the past. It is necessary to understand it." -Paul Claudel
"The more we see the other side as irredeemably evil, the more we do evil in order to combat them." - Sam Keen
"The universe is a cruel, uncaring void. The key to being happy isn't a search for meaning. It's to keep yourself busy with unimportant nonsense, and eventually you'll be dead." - Mr. Peanutbutter [BoJack Horseman]
"Don"t be afraid of a little opposition. Remember that the kite of success generally rises against the wind of adversity  not with it."
"Every living creature has to taste the Death"
"The guy said 'you have to be ODD to be number one', not 'you have to be UGLY to be number one'. You don't do ugly gandalf, you don't do garbage pail kids, and you don't go full retard." - Jerry Hardon
"At times I think and at times I am." - Paul Valery
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"The secret of happiness is something to do." - John Burroughs
"Spirituality doesn't depend on a specific belief or the accuracy of that belief. It's the indistinguishable feeling, even for a second, that arises when you submit to the idea that something greater than yourself exists." - unknown
"You must let what happens happen. Everything must be equal in your eyes, good and evil, beautiful and ugly, foolish and wise." - Michael Ende
"At some point talking about living has to give way to living." - Sheldon Solomon
"With the new day comes new strength and new thoughts" - Eleanore roosevelt
"What we think, we become."
"Loving someone is giving them the power to break your heart, but trusting them not to" - Julianne Moore
"Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more, so that we may fear less." - Marie Curie
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams." U.Ashish
"Whoever gossips to you will gossip of you" - Spanish proverb
"We"re going to fight racism not with racism, but we"re going to fight with solidarity. We say we"re not going to fight capitalism with black capitalism, but we"re going to fight it with socialism." -Fred Hampton
"The best time to plant a tree was 20 years ago. The second best time is now." - Chinese Proverb
"Be yourself everyone else is already taken" - Oscar wilde
"People who boast about their IQ are losers" - Stephen Hawking
"Don"t stop when you"re tired. STOP when you are DONE." - Unknown.
"Don"t try to explain yourself to idiots. You are not the fuckface whisperer." Unknown
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened" - Dr. Seuss
"Beware the man who works hard to learn something, learns it, and finds himself no wiser than before"-KV
"However difficult life may seem, there is always something you can do and succeed at. It matters that you don't just give up." - Stephen Hawking's
"What is that, by knowing which, everything is known?" - Mundaka Upanishad (paraphrased)
"Forget the past or remember the past both are important" - Sharwar Simon
"To live is to think" - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"It would not be much of a universe if it wasn't home to the people you love." - Stephen William Hawking
"Who blarted"
"Have you ever wondered which hurts the most: saying something and wishing you had not, or saying nothing, and wishing you had?" - Unknown
"But the Persians are great negotiators, the Iranians are great negotiators, so, and they, they just killed, they just killed us." - D. Trump
"I am, somehow, less interested in the weight and convolutions of Einstein"s brain than in the near certainty that people of equal talent have lived and died in cotton fields and sweatshops." - Stephen Jay Gould
"If you think education is too expensive you should see the price of ignorance"
"While there is life, there is hope" - Stephen Hawking
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today" - H. Jackson Brown
"A testament that disability is not inability and that people with disabilities can achieve anything they say their minds to"- Stephen Hawking
"A family is like the forest, when you are outside it is dense, when you are inside you see that each tree has its place." - Ghanaian Proverb
"...[L]et us carry ourselves back to the time when the Constitution was adopted, recollect the spirit manifested in the debates, and instead of trying what meaning may be squeezed out of the text, or invented against it, conform to the probable one in which it was passed." - Thom. Jefferson
"You will never reach your destination if you stop and throw stones at every dog that barks." - Winston S. Churchill
"We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a very average star. But we can understand the Universe. That makes us something very special" - Stephen hawking
"It would not be much of a universe if it wasn't home to the people you love." -Stephen Hawking
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge" - Stephen hawking
"I have noticed even people who claim everything is predestined, and that we can do nothing to change it, look before they cross the road" - Stephen hawking
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge" - Stephen hawkin
"People will not value your words if it has no power to influence them." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Intelligence is the ability to adapt to change" - Stephen hawkin
"Success in life depends upon happiness, and happiness is found in no other way than through SERVICE that is rendered in a spirit of love." Napoleon Hill"
"It would not be much of a universe if it wasn"t home to the people you love." Stephen Hawking
"One, remember to look up at the stars and not down at your feet. Two, never give up work. Work gives you meaning and purpose and life is empty without it. Three, if you are lucky enough to find love, remember it is there and don't throw it away." -Stephen Hawking
"Take Care Of Your Tongue Like The Way You Take Care Of Gold &amp; Silver."  Hazrat Ali Ibn Abu-Talib A.
"Death is so terribly final, while life is full of possibilities." - George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
"Look up at the stars, not down at your feet" - Stephen Hawking
"Look up at the stars not down at your feet" - Stephen Hawking
"I am but a daydreamer, drinking the venom of the past"
"To happy Just follow 3S. These are Simple,Silent and Smile" - Sharwar Simon
"We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a very average star. But we can understand the Universe. That makes us something very special." - Stephen Hawking
" I'm not afraid of death, but I'm in no hurry to die. I have so much I want to do first. " - Stephen Hawking
"I have noticed that even people who claim everything is predetermined and that we can do nothing to change it, look before they cross the road." - Stephen Hawkin.
"Remain unpredictable till the self prediction of the world"- The silent Utterer
'You can't make war in the Middle East without Egypt and you can't make peace in the Middle East without Syria' Henry Kissinger
"I hate everything that merely instructs me without augmenting or directly invigorating my activity." -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"However bad life may seem, there is always something you can do and succeed at. Where there's life, there's hope." -Stephen Hawking
"You shall know the truth and the truth shall make you odd." - Flannery O'Connor
"Not only does God play dice, but... he sometimes throws them where they cannot be seen." - Stephen Hawking
"It would not be much of a universe if it wasn't home to the people you love." - Stephen Hawking
"I regard the brain as a computer which will stop working when its components fail. There is no heaven or afterlife for broken down computers; that is a fairy story for people afraid of the dark." Stephen Hawking
""It is a waste of time to be angry about my disability. One has to get on with life and I haven't done badly. People won't have time for you if you are always angry or complaining." - Stephen Hawking
"It is what it is and you can't get upset." - Bill Lewis
"Once we believe in ourselves, we can risk curiosity, wonder, spontaneous delight, or any experience that reveals the human spirit". E. E. Cummings
"The child who is not embraced by the village will burn it down to feel its warmth" - African proverb
"Great things in business are never done by one person. They're done by a team of people." Steve Jobs
"The oppressor is often preoccupied with the oppressed" - Unknown
"If you spend too much time thinking about a thing, you"ll never get it done." - Bruce Lee
"To compel a man to furnish funds for the propagation of ideas he disbelieves and abhors is sinful and tyrannical." - Thomas Jefferson
"Whatever kind of family you have, reality is relative. Normal is just the middle of the mess." - Monroe (Grimm)
"Where all think alike, no one thinks very much." - Walter Lippmann, journalist
"Be happy, it"s someone"s birthday today"-u/Kieran240
"Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Lovely day in this minefield."
"Faith is when you take the first step even when you don't see the whole staircase."
"If ignorant both of your enemy and of yourself, you are certain in every battle to be in peril." -- Sun Tzu
"It"s difficult to get a man to understand something when his salary depends upon his not understanding it."  Upton Sinclair
"It is only when we wake from dreams that we know we have been dreaming. Similarly, this life may be realized as a dream only when we awake in Cosmic Consciousness..." - Paramahansa Yogananda
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"He who controls the past controls the future. He who controls the present controls the past." - George Orwell
"A brother is like gold and a friend is like diamond. If gold cracks you can melt it and make it just like it was before. If a diamond cracks, it can never be like it was before."  Hazrat Ali Ibn Abu-Talib A.S
"The reason why we struggle with insecurity is because we compare our behind the scenes with everyone else"s highlight reel." - Stephen Furtick
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein 1949
"The stories about the past are so good, that they create an illusion that life is understandable." -Daniel Kahneman
"Running everyday will improve your chances of survival in case of a zombie apocalypse" - @HealtyWealthy
"Every single thing that has ever happened in your life is preparing you for a moment that is yet to come"
/
"Fun isn't something one considers when balancing the universe, but this does put a smile on my face..."
"Specifics Doctor, labels do not make arguments" --Mr. Spock
"This we know; The earth does not belong to man; man belongs to the earth. This we know, all things are connected like the blood which unites one family. All things are connected" - Chief Si"ahl, namesake of Seattle, Washington
"Sometimes it's not about how good you are but how bad you want it."
"You are braver, stronger, and smarter than you could ever imagine." Author Unknown
"The more a thing tends to be permanent, the more it tends to be lifeless." - Alan Watts
"If you understood everything I said, you"d be me"- Miles Davis
"this is the secret that make everyone feel that you are real,...
"the secret to make everyone feel that you are real,...
"Believe you can and you're halfway there." T. Roosevelt
"The reason why we struggle with insecurity is because we compare our behind the scenes with everyone else"s highlight reel." -- Stephen Furtick
"The greatest challenge of programming is to deal with a machine that does exactly what you ask." -u/petervaz
"Anybody can play weird, that's easy. What's hard is to be as simple as Bach. Making the simple complicated is commonplace. Making the complicated simpleawesomely simplethat's creativity."  Charles Mingus
"Why didn't I take it easier? I didn't want to. I dreaded slowing down... I was in a hurry, for despite everything I couldn't rid myself of the feeling that I was mortal." -Asimov
"Your life is an occasion. Rise to it." -Edward Magorium
"Most people are thoughtless most of the time; some people are thoughtless some of the time; and every once in a while you'll meet someone who's only thoughtless every once in a while." - Anonymous
"Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you: For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened." - Matthew 7:7-8
"Aim for the stars, at least you'll be on the coconut tree" - Dad
" It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." -- Krishnamurti
"Woman is a delicate creature with strong emotions who has been created by the Almighty God to shoulder responsibility for educating society and moving toward perfection. God created woman as symbol of His own beauty and to give solace to her partner and her family."  Hazrat Ali Ibn Abu-Talib A.S
"I expect to pass through this life but once. If therefore, there can be any kindness I can show, or any good thing I can do to any fellow being, let me do it now as I shall not pass this way again." William Penn [16441718, English]
"Hard work spotlights the character of people: some turn up their sleeves, some turn up their noses, and some don"t turn up at all." Sam Ewing [1949current, American]
"Faith is taking the first step even when you don't see the whole staircase."
"Despite my ghoulish reputation, I really have the heart of a small boy. I keep it in a jar on my desk." -Robert Bloch, Author of Psycho
"The best horse will win in spite of pedigree." --George Eliot
"I"m like water, if you burn me, I"ll turn into steam and live in the air." - Elias
"Nothing is more common than for great thieves to ride in triumph when small ones are punished." - Seneca
"Let me tell you what I think of bicycling. I think it has done more to emancipate women than anything else in the world. It gives women a feeling of freedom and self-reliance. I rejoice every time I see a woman ride by on a wheel, the picture of free, untrammeled womanhood."  Susan B. Anthony
"What lies behind us and what lies before us are tiny matters compared to what lies within us." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"If voting made any difference they wouldn't let us do it."--Mark Twain
"A straightforward, honest person should be like someone who stinks: when you"re in the same room with him, you know it." Marcus Aurelius
"If you say making money is the most important thing, you will spend your life completely wasting your time...Better to have a short life, which is full of what you like doing, than a long one spent in a miserable way." - Alan Watts
"We cannot selectively numb emotions; when we numb the painful emotions, we also numb the positive emotions." - Bren Brown
"Solutions nearly always come from the direction you least expect, which means there"s no point trying to look in that direction because it won"t be coming from there."  Douglas Adams
"I found God, and through Him I found myself, I am looking for you now, please help me to find you by just being yourself and honest." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Knowing the correct answer solves one problem, knowing why its the correct answer solves an infinite number of problems."
"We rip out so much of ourselves to be cured of things faster that we go bankrupt by the age of thirty and have less to offer each time we start with someone new. But to feel nothing, so as not to feel anything - what a waste." - Andr Aciman,
"If you have a strong purpose in life, you don't have to be pushed. Your passion will drive you there." - Roy T. Bennett
"Birth and chain are synonyms. To see the light of day, to see shackles..."-Emil Cioran
"It's better to have information you don"t need than to need information you don"t have and may never possess." -- Bill Lewis
"The most important thing is to enjoy your lifeto be happyit's all that matters." - Audrey Hepburn.
"The most important thing is to enjoy your lifeto be happyit's all that matters." - Audrey Hepburn.
"The most important thing is to enjoy your lifeto be happyit's all that matters." - Audrey Hepburn.
"Of all sad words of tongue or pen, the saddest are these, 'It might have been." - John Greenleaf Whittier.
"Anyone who lives within their means suffers from a lack of imagination." - Oscar Wilde.
"You cannot find peace by avoiding life." - Michael Cunningham.
"Death ends a life, not a relationship." - Mitch Albom.
"Things change. And friends leave. Life doesn't stop for anybody." - Stephen Chbosky.
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde.
"In time we hate that which we often fear." - William Shakespeare
"When your nose is filled with the smell of crap, you think that the smell has gone... the same with your mind, close your nose in the first moment when you smell the crap... the same with your mind." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Perception is not reality, it is what you feel, not what you see." - Unknown
"Nonsense wakes up the brain cells. And it helps develop a sense of humor, which is awfully important in this day and age. Humor has a tremendous place in this sordid world. It's more than just a matter of laughing. If you can see things out of whack, then you can see how things can be in whack."
"All this money couldn"t take away these scars, but I guess they only there, so we don"t forget who we are". -Phora
"There is no effect more disproportionate to its cause than the happiness bestowed by a small compliment."  Robert Brault
"No rich man goes to jail by the will of the poor. They go to jail for cheating another rich man." --- Unknown
"We tell lies when we are afraid, . . . afraid of what we don't know, afraid of what others will think, afraid of what will be found out about us. But every time we tell a lie, the thing that we fear grows stronger." -- Tad Williams
"If an egg is broken by an outside force, life ends. If broken by an inside force, life begins. Great things always begin from the inside." Jim Kwik
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful about what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut.
"It"s kind of fun to do the impossible." - Walt Disney
"This life"s hard, but it"s harder if you"re stupid." - George V. Higgins.
"If you want to go fast, go alone. If you want to go far, go together." African proverb
"Friendship... is born at the moment when one man says to another "What! You too? I thought that no one but myself..." - C.S. Lewis
"The art of being a warrior is to balance the wonder and terror of being alive." - Carlos Castaneda
"Trying to define yourself is like trying to bite your own teeth." - Alan Watts
"Life begins at the end of your comfort zone." - Neale Donald Walsch
"You are the universe expressing itself as a human for a little while." - Eckhart Tolle
"Sometimes you wake up. Sometimes the fall kills you. And sometimes, when you fall, you fly." - Neil Gaiman, Fables &amp; Reflections
"Tell me, what is it you plan to do, with your one wild and precious life?" - Mary Oliver
"Early on, if I was alone two three nights in a row, I'd start writing poems about suicide" Jack Nicholson
"Never argue with a fool, onlookers may not be able to tell the difference." - Mark Twain
"It has become appallingly obvious that our technology has exceeded our humanity." - Albert Einstein
"Past heroism is no excuse for present misconduct" -Frank Reagan
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." Eleanor Roosevelt
"The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion." - Albert Camus
"Reddit is like Wikipedia but without all the dumb facts."
"From surface, it is desired. From core, it is not. From evolution, hypocrisy acquired. From discovery, revolution brought."
"May I never be complete. May I never be content. May I never be perfect." - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"You can't hate the GOOD, only if you force yourself, the same thing with GOD." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Nothing we do ever stands by itself. If it is good, it will serve some good purpose in the future. If it is evil, it may haunt us and handicap our efforts in unimagined ways." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"He"s got enough money to burn a wet mule." -- Southern US saying.
"Kill a man, and you're a murderer. Kill millions of men, and you're a conqueror. Kill everyone, and you're a God"- Jean Rostand
"If there were no eternal consciousness in a man, if at the bottom of everything there were only a wild ferment, a power that twisting in dark passions produced everything great or inconsequential; if an unfathomable, insatiable emptiness lay hid beneath everything, what would life be but despair?"
"Remind yourself that, no matter how real the future event looks in your mind, your feelings don't indicate anything about the outcome of that event; they are just a response to your thoughts in that moment." (-Matt Hattersley)
"Man needs his difficulties because they are necessary to enjoy success."-APJ.Abdul Kalam
"Never get in a shit fight with a pig. You just get dirty and the pig has fun"
"We"re all afraid, you know. to get up on stage. Maybe you"ll mess up. Maybe they"ll totally reject you. Even so, you grit your teeth and get up on stage anyway. Something compels us moves us to play music."
"When you no longer care if other people know how many bruises and the depth of the suffering you have gone through in order to reach the goal or accomplish that task, you need to know that you ..." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Love is patience on the dark side of the other, because its other side deserves it." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Lucky action is not smart because you can not learn from it if you fail, to learn you need to plan, there is nothing random in this universe, everything has a blueprint." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"The right question is usually more important than the right answer", Plato 428-348 BC
"If you don't know where you're going, any road'll take you there" - George Harrison.
"Things change. And friends leave. Life doesn't stop for anybody." - Stephen Chbosky.
"It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live." - J.K. Rowling.
"It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not." - Andr Gide.
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous.
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost.
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain.
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West.
"Don't lie to protect my feelings. I'd rather you speak the truth with love and respect. I'll be fine!" - Izey Victoria Odiase
"You can plan a pretty picnic, but you can't predict the weather" - Andr 3000
"If you can"t fly then run, if you can"t run then walk, if you can"t walk then crawl, but whatever you do you have to keep moving forward." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Life is about making an impact, not making an income"-Kevin Kruse
"There are times when I am convinced I am unfit for any human relationship." Franz Kafka
"Love yourself so you can love others so others can love you." - The Universe
"Sometimes it"s the people no one imagines anything of who do the things that no one can imagine." - Alan Turing
"If the doors of perception were cleansed, everything would appear to man as it is, infinite." - William Blake
"Real Queens Fix Each Other's Crowns."
"The only non-biased news source is common sense." -Me in the shower
"What you are basically, deep, deep down, far, far in, is simply the fabric and structure of existence itself." (-Alan Watts)
"We can now destroy or we can cherish. The choice is ours." David Attenborough (Planet Earth)
"Fairy tales are more than true: not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten" -Neil Gaiman
"Learning how to be still, to really be still and let life happen - that stillness becomes a radiance." - Morgan Freeman
"Cherish the moment because one day you'll realize that the heart you feel is not the heart thought by the world. But that heart is inter connected to the spiritual soul of the time you existed." - Sonic Jet
"War isn't Hell. War is war, and Hell is Hell. And of the two, war is a lot worse ... There are no innocent bystanders in Hell. War is chock full of them - little kids, cripples, old ladies. In fact, except for some of the brass, almost everybody involved is an innocent bystander." Hawkeye (M*A*S*H)
"The two most important days of your life are the day you are born, and the day you know why." - Lisa Nichols
"Those who do not move, do not notice their chains.." Rosa Luxemburg
"The two most important days of your life are the day you are born, and the day you know why. - Lisa Nichols
"It is easier to build strong children than to repair broken men."  Frederick Douglass
"Far better to sweat for peace than to bleed in war" - Tom (TM)
"Aim for success, not perfection. Never give up your right to be wrong, because then you will lose the ability to learn new things and move forward with your life." - Dr. David M. Burns
"Time is something not adjustable but attainable." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"When you innovate, you've got to be prepared for everyone telling you you're nuts". Larry Ellison
"I've seen better sides of beef been run over by a combine" - Dell Conagher
"In the beginner"s mind there are many possibilities; in the expert"s mind there are few." Shunryu Suzuki
"Sometimes you don't feel the weight of something you've been carrying until you feel the weight of its release."
[NSFW] "Labor to keep alive in your breast that little spark of celestial fire, called conscience." George Washington
"Everybody dies, but some spend a whole life digging their grave." - Shon Mehta, The Timingila
"If you weren't around, I'd probably be someplace way the hell off. In the woods or some goddamn place. You're the only reason I'm around, practically." - J.D. Salinger
"I will persist until I succeed. I was not delivered unto this world in defeat, nor does failure course in my veins. I am not a sheep waiting to be prodded by my shepherd. I am I lion and I refuse to talk, to walk, to sleep with the sheep. I will not hear those that weep and complain...
"We must be willing to get rid of the life we"ve planned, so as to have the life that is waiting for us." Joseph Campbell
"Health is the greatest of God's gifts...yet it hangs on a thread as fine as a spider's web and the tiniest thing can make it snap, leaving the strongest of us helpless in an instant." Jennifer Worth
"War, it uses humanity's best to do humanity's absolute worst. It takes our strength, courage, resilience, our intelligence and creativity... our heroes.. and in return we get death, destruction, hatred, suffering; it cripples and maims, it crushes the innocent, it leaves ruin in its wake."
"I walk slowly, but I never walk backward."- Abraham Lincoln
"The Republicans investigated Hillary Clinton for three years for violating IT policy..." -glaucomatose, Washington Post commenter
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace." - Jimi Hendrix
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace." - Jimi Hendrix
"There's an experience worse than blindnessit's the certainty that your vision is perfect and the horror that there's no world around you to see." - Unknown
"Religion is the sigh of the oppressed creature, the heart of a heartless world, just as it is the spirit of a spiritless situation. It is the opium of the people" - Karl Marx
"You get a little moody sometimes but I think that's because you like to read. People that like to read are always a little fucked up." - Pat Conroy
"You have to dream before your dreams can come true."-APJ.Abdul Kalam
"Who dares to teach must never cease to learn." - John Cotton Dana
"To do something which you really love is always better than doing just to impress others." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Heard she was a player, told her nice to meet you I'm the coach."
"The laws of Nature are written in language of mathematics" - Galileo
"Man suffers only because he takes seriously what the gods made for fun." -Alan Watts
"When the world pushes you to your knees, you"re in the perfect position to pray"  Hazrat Ali Ibn Abu-Talib A.S
"The philosophers have only interpreted the world, in various ways. The point, however, is to change it" - karl marx
"The hardest thing to do is to be true to yourself especially when everybody is watching." - Dave Chappelle
"You cannot shake hands with a clenched fist".-Indira Ganghi
"Stand in the ashes of a trillion dead souls and ask the ghosts if honor matters. The silence is your answer." -Javik
"The mind creates the abyss, the heart crosses it."  Sri Nisargadatta Maharaj
"Good judgment comes from experience, and a lot of that comes from bad judgment."Will Rogers
"The only journey is the one within."Rainer Maria Rilke
"Lord, make me an instrument of thy peace. Where there is hatred, let me sow love."Francis of Assisi
"All that we see or seem is but a dream within a dream."Edgar Allan Poe
"There is no charm equal to tenderness of heart." Jane Austen
"It is not enough that we do our best; sometimes we must do what is required." - Winston S. Churchill
"For humans to fly, we must first steal our wings"
"It were not best that we should all think alike; it is difference of opinion that makes horse races." -Mark Twain
''I was meaning to'' doesn't cut it. It's like saying "I have an itch", nobody cares." - anonymous
"Be the white dot on the dark side of everyone's heart, through that white dot, the light of God reaches to that dark side." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"In the future they reckon you will be able to wake up and eat a yoghurt you can have a chat with" - Karl Pilkington.
"Be the white dot on the dark side of everyone's heart, through that dot the light of God reach that dark side." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Let not any one pacify his conscience by the delusion that he can do no harm if he takes no part, and forms no opinion. Bad men need nothing more to compass their ends, than that good men should look on and do nothing." --- John Stuart Mill
"When you meet people, show real appreciation, then genuine curiosity." - Martha Beck
"The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion." - Albert Camus
"Love is the only force capable of transforming an enemy into a friend." - Martin Luther King
"All reading for pleasure is escape, whether it be Greek, mathematics, astronomy, Benedetto Croce, or The Diary of the Forgotten Man. To say otherwise is to be an intellectual snob, and a juvenile at the art of living."  Raymond Chandler
"Courage is going from failure to failure without losing enthusiasm." - Winston Churchill
"Everything is changing. People are taking their comedians seriously and the politicians as a joke." - Will Rogers
"You try to make sense of your life. Everybody tries to do that, I think and part of making sense of things is trying to find reasons... or constants... things that don"t fluctuate" - Stephen King
''Your work is going to fill a large part of your life, and the only way to be truly satisfied is to do what you believe is great work. And the only way to do great work is to love what you do. If you haven't found it yet, keep looking. Don't settle.''-Steve Jobs
"Until you make the unconscious conscious, it will direct your life and you will call it fate." - C.G. Jung
"Education is the most powerful weapon which you can use to change the world" - Nelson Mandela
"People who deny the existence of dragons are often eaten by dragons. From within." - Ursula Le Guin
"My opinion is worth as much as you opinion. But people started thinking that my opinion was worth as much as your facts. And that"s just not true." - Ricky Gervais
"Do not allow me to forget you." - Gabriel Garcia Mrquez [HB]
"You can't have a million-dollar dream with a minimum wage work ethic"
"No one will ever understand your feelings unless you interact." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The light dove, in free flight cutting through the air the resistance of which it feels, could get the idea that it could do even better in airless space." - Immanuel Kant
"Beware the wrath, of a patient adversary." John C. Calhoun
"If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people to collect wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long for the endless immensity of the sea.." Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"Self-belief and hard work will always earn you Success"-Virat Kohli the famous Indian Cricketer
"I don't have fake friends, because i'm honest with everyone, be true, be yourself, that's all that matters." - Mounssif Bouhlaoui
"It"s better to have and not need than to need and not have." - My Dad every single day
"I DON'T HAVE FAKE FRIENDS, BECAUSE I'M HONEST WITH EVERYONE, BE TRUE, BE YOURSELF, THAT'S ALL THAT MATTERS." - MOUNSSIF BOUHLAOUI
"thank God for unanswered prayers." - Garth Brooks
"The art of writing is the art of discovering what you believe." - Gustave Flaubert
"The question we have to ask ourselves is, what success is to us, what success is to you...Whatever your answer, don"t choose anything that will jeopardize your soul. Prioritize who you are, who you want to be, and don't spend time with anything that antagonizes your character." -Matthew McConaughey
"Prioritize who you are, who you want to be, and don't spend time with anything that antagonizes your character." - Matthew McConaughey
"Do not underestimate the 'power of underestimation'. They can't stop you, if they don't see you coming." - Izey Victoria Odiase
"Life isn't how many breaths you take, but it's the moments that take your breath away."
"The physical toll of surpassing one's limits is greater the deeper one steps into the state of the gods"
"I don't believe in taking right decisions" "I take decisions and then make them right"-Ratan Tata
"Life is like an online game, if you rage quit to early your team mates will suffer, stay true to you and the people who help you." (-me)
"Sometimes morality is grey" - u/bigavz
"Remember that without the depth of water, the sun can create a desert." --Siolo Thompson
"Life is full of beauty. Notice it. Notice the bumble bee, the small child, and the smiling faces. Smell the rain, and feel the wind. Live your life to the fullest potential, and fight for your dreams." -Ashley Smith
"The point of journalism is the truth. The point is not to improve society." -Sebastian Junger
"Ours is a culture where we wear our ability to get by on very little sleep as a kind of badge of honor that symbolizes work ethic, or toughness, or some other virtue...
"The later it gets the gayer it gets!"
"To burn with desire and keep quiet about it is the greatest punishment we can bring on ourselves." - Federico Garca Lorca,
"There is nothing more important to true growth than realizing that you are not the voice of the mind - you are the one who hears it." - Michael A. Singer, The Untethered Soul: The Journey Beyond Yourself
"She means well, but she always manages to do the wrong thing. She has a real talent for it." - Beverly Cleary, Fifteen
"No end in sight. No end insight. No end. Insight." - M. Juchau
"Solitary trees, if they grow at all, grow strong" - Sir Winston Churchill [18741965, British]
"Nothing is permanent but change" - Elbert Hubbard [18561915, American]
"Honesty is the color of the soul, without color there is no beauty." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Learning never exhausts the mind." Leonardo da Vinci
"Do not mind anything that anyone tells you about anyone else. Judge everyone and everything for yourself." Henry James
"The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity. The fears are paper tigers. You can do anything you decide to do. You can act to change and control your life; and the procedure, the process is its own reward." Amelia Earhart
"It is better to be feared than loved, if you cannot be both." Niccolo Machiavelli
"Let us sacrifice our today so that our children can have a better tomorrow." A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"Accent's a little kind of... muddled." "Really? So is your tan."
"yeah devs 2wls yeah friend sold for like 1wl trd i give rocket shoes too" -arayat
"You're off to great places! Today is your day! Your mountain is waiting so get on your way!" - Dr Seuss
"Never judge a man by where he drinks, but how he holds it" (Please elaborate and explain)
"I loved who I fell in love with, not who he became."
"We pretty much all tune in, despite the grotesquerie of watching an industry congratulate itself on its pretense that it's still an art form..." - David Foster Wallace on the Oscars
"I don't know anything about luck. Only that the more I practice, the more lucky I get." - Ingemar Stenmark, legendary Swedish alpine skier
"The more refined and subtle our minds, the more vulnerable they are." - Paul Tournier
"Success is measured by results, not by hard work"
"If we were meant to stay in one place, we would have roots instead of feet." - Rachel Wolchin
"As democracy is perfected, the office of president represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron." - H.L. Mencken
"As democracy is perfected, the office of president represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron." - H.L. Mencken
"The road to hell is paved with good intentions." - Unknown.
"It"s amazing that more people have climbed Mount Everest than have broken the 4-minute mile" -Sir Roger Bannister
"Hold fast to dreams, for if dreams die, life is a broken-winged bird that cannot fly." -Langston Hughes
"Knowing what it feels to be in pain Is exactly why we try to be kind to others."-Jiraiya (Naruto)
"We are more than dying flies in a shithouse, though we are that, too." - Jim Harrison
"The fact that millions of people share the same vices does not make these vices virtues, the fact that they share so many errors does not make the errors to be truths, and the fact that millions of people share the same form of mental pathology does not make these people sane." - Erich Fromm
"What will you do without freedom?" -William Wallace
"If there is nothing you can share with other people, try to be close to Things...
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams."  Charles Bukowski
"Twice two makes four against my will." - Dostoevsky
"Just because something is common sense doesn't mean it's common practice." - author unknown
"Thanks to Laziness, Humans have invented New Techs to Work Less and Level Up." - loge de la Paresse School
"Let the words of my mouth, and the meditation of my heart, be acceptable in thy sight, O Lord, my strength, and my redeemer." - The Bible (KJV).
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Finally, brethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things are honest, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things." - The Bible (KJV).
"Nobody likes Trump. Except for the people who do." -A client of mine who is Autistic
"Raise your words, not voice. It is rain that grows flowers, not thunder" -J. Rumi
"You can run from lava, but you can never run from yourself" - Me 2018
"The first step to getting the things you want out of life is this: decide what you want." - Ben Stein
"You cannot shake hands with a clenched fist." Indira Gandhi
"There is nothing permanent except change." Heraclitus
"If it's flipping hamburgers at Mcdonalds, be the best hamburger flipper in the world. Whatever it is you do, you have to master your craft." - Snoop Dogg
"When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on." Franklin D. Roosevelt
"I love you the more in that I believe you had liked me for my own sake and for nothing else." John Keats
"The most difficult thing is the decision to act, the rest is merely tenacity. The fears are paper tigers. You can do anything you decide to do. You can act to change and control your life; and the procedure, the process is its own reward." Amelia Earhart
"The unreality of games gives notice that reality is not yet real." - Theodor W. Adorno
"Everything has been figured out, except how to live." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"Kid, you'll move mountains" - Dr. Seuss
"If you need motivation to do something it meand you don't want to do it so, better you don't do it."
"If workers knew how Neural Networks work, they would know how doomed they are" - Harry Bergman
"Knowledge speaks. Wisdom listens." // "When the world values the power of love over the love of power the world will know peace." With these two quotes guiding us, I think we'll be very successful.
"Today you are You, that is truer than true. There is no one alive who is Youer than You." -Happy Birthday Dr. Seuss!
"The only difference as compared with the old, outspoken slavery is this, that the worker of today seems to be free because he is not sold once for all, but piecemeal by the day, the week, the year, and because no one owner sells him to another, but he is forced to sell himself in this way..."
"A defeated argument that refuses to be obliterated can remain very alive." - Amartya Sen
"Statisticians, like artists, have the bad habit of falling in love with their models." -George Box
"I have a very good brain" --- Donald Trump
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment" - Ralph Waldo Emerson.
"Do Not feel ashamed if the amount of charity you give is small, because to refuse the needy is an act of greater shame. Imam Ali (AS)"
"If you truly value your life, do not waste time by doing nothing." - Krishnendu Pramanick
" Today you are you, that is truer than true, there is no one alive that is youer than you!"-Dr. Suess
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it." - Confucius
"Best doctor in the world is a veterinarian. He can"t ask his patients what"s the matter. He"s just got to know." -Will Rogers
"Happiness is like a butterfly, the more you chase it, the more it will evade you, but if you notice the other things around you, it will gently come and sit on your shoulder." - Henry David Thoreau
"Reality continues to ruin my life." - Bill Watterson.
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." - Albert Einstein.
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde.
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous.
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss.
"Loving our neighbor is not in fact loving the person but loving the goodness that is inside the person." -Emanuel Swedenborg
"A ladder that can only be climbed by stepping on others, is not worth being at the top of." -me
"Everybody feels the evil, but no one has courage or energy enough to seek the cure. The desires, the repinings, the sorrows, and the joys of the present time lead to nothing visible or permanent, like the passions of old men, which terminate in impotence."
"The seven ages of man: spills, drills, thrills, bills, ills, pills and wills." -- Richard J. Needham
"Some people think they can find satisfaction in good food, fine clothes, lively music, and sexual pleasure. However..."
"People, the ones that can really hurt you, get close enough to do it. They are people that get inside you and tear you apart, make you feel like you're never gonna recover. You sit here all confused about it, but you have it. You have everything. Hold on to it, two hands, and never let go. Got it?"
"Love is just like a pear. Try to describe the shape of a pear. You can't really do it, just like you can't explain or describe love." - Dandelion
"Do all the good you can. By all the means you can. In all the ways you can. In all the places you can. At all the times you can. To all the people you can. As long as ever you can." -John Wesley
"If you can't get under her, get over her" - Bar Patron
"Too many people spend money they haven't earned, to buy things they don't want, to impress people they don't like." Will Rogers
"Nature does not know extinction; all it knows is transformation. Everything science has taught me, and continues to teach me, strengthens my belief in the continuity of our spiritual existence after death." -Werner Von Braun
"It is love alone that leads to right action. What brings order in the world is to love and let love do what it will" - Krishnamurti
"We are never so defenseless against suffering as when we love" -Sigmund Freud
"There is no conceivably correct tone to take when it comes to the end of the world, so you might as well make a rueful little joke." - Benjamin Kunkel
"People who bite the hand that feeds them, usually lick the boot that kicks them." - Eric Hoffer
"You must do the thing which you think you cannot do." --Eleanor Roosevelt
[Origin Question] "To the World You May Be One Person, but to One Person You May Be the World"
"Life is what happens to us while we are making other plans." - Allen Saunders.
"Often, the surest way to convey misinformation is to tell the strict truth." Mark Twain
"If you truly value your life, do not waste time by doing noting." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Find what you're afraid of most and go live there." - Chuck Palahniuk, writer
"It's hard to have a good day with a bad attitude or a bad day with a good attitude" - Joe Moore
"Will of God.. whatever you wanna call it.. you call it Jesus, call it Mohammed, call it goobybob, call it nuclear mind, call it blow the world up, call it your heart. Whatever you wanna call it, it's still music to me. It's there. It's the will of life." - Charles Manson
"They (police) are quite tough when pulling over a person of color for a broken taillight. A white kid with a gun tho? I think it's donut time." --- Random Internet Stranger
"I think it's healthy for a person to be nervous. It means you care - that you work hard and want to give a great performance. You just have to channel that nervous energy into the show." - Beyonce Knowles
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West.
" In this world, we pluck our misfortunes from the tree of our incompetence" - Unknown
"Life is what happens to us while we are making other plans." - Allen Saunders.
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw.
"None but ourselves can free our minds." - Bob Marley
"The guys who won World War II and that whole generation have disappeared, and now we have a bunch of teenage twits." Clint Eastwood
"We all make choices, but in the end our choices make us." - Andrew Ryan (Bioshock)
"He has one of those calmly dismayed faces one finds on elderly road-menders and philosophers." -Bob Shaw
"I guess I just had to show the world that a Jew has guts,"-Jack Ruby.
"Be the person you needed when you were younger." - Ayesha Siddiqi
"If an alien was trying to look like an American President, he'd look exactly like Michael Pence." -Some dude overheard at Starbucks
"The only person that scares me more than Trump as President would be Michael Pence." -Some dude overheard at Starbucks
"It's in the hardest times we grow the most" -A Day To Remember, "I Remember"
"Wisdom is the reward you get for a lifetime of listening when you"d have preferred to talk." Doug Larson
"We can complain because rose bushes have thorns, or rejoice because thorn bushes have roses" - Abraham Lincoln.
[REQUEST] If you were a CEO...
"You miss 100% of the shots you don't take" - Wayne Gretzky
"Wherever we look upon this earth, the opportunities take shape within the problems" - Nelson A. Rockefeller
''I like being alone. I have control over my own shit. Therefore, in order to win me over, your presence has to feel better than my solitude. You're not competing with another person, you are competing with my comfort zone.'' -Horacio Jones
"The kind of news day where "barbra streisand cloned a dog" barely registers." Joe Berkowitz
''I like being alone. I have control over my own shit. Therefore, in order to win me over, your presence has to feel better than my solitude. You're not competing with another person, you are competing with my comfort zone.'' -Horacio Jones
"The totalitarian states can do great things, but there is one thing they cannot do: they cannot give the factory-worker a rifle and tell him to take it home and keep it in his bedroom. ..." George Orwell
"Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend." -Albert Camus
"Son, you don't have bad luck. The reason that bad things happen to you is because you're a dumbass" - Red Forman (That 70's Show)
"Wear your tragedies as armor, not shackles" -Unknown
"If you keep ignoring the situation, you will never find a solution." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"I don't want to die without any scars." - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"Are the people you are listening to experts in selling or experts in their given fields or both? Many can sell their services with a greater expertise than the expertise they have in the services they are selling." - Loren Weisman
"I feel that no human being group deserves a 'homeland' in the usual sense of the word...
"Work on Purpose. Play on Purpose. Rest on Purpose. Do not let yourself or anyone else waste your time" -Izey Victoria Odiase
"I"ve got an ideaan idea so smart that my head would explode if I even began to know what I"m talking about." - Peter Griffin.
"People are of two types: they are either your brothers in faith or your equals in humanity"-Ali Ibn Abi Talib
 I"m not crazy; my reality is just different than yours.  - author unknown
"If you don't read the newspaper, you're uninformed. If you do read the newspaper, you're mis-informed." - (attributed to:) Mark Twain
"We seldom realize, for example that our most private thoughts and emotions are not actually our own. For we think in terms of languages and images which we did not invent, but which were given to us by our society." - Alan Watts
"Maturity is when you stop complaining and making excuses, and start making changes." - Roy T. Bennett
"Time heals all wounds. But not this one. Not yet." -- Marie Lu, Champion
"Time has no meaning, Love will endure.." -- Jude Deveraux
"Time is the most valuable thing that a man can spend." -- Diogenes Lartius
"The writer's curse is that even in solitude, no matter its duration, he never grows lonely or bored." -- Criss Jami, Killosophy
"Realize deeply that the present moment is all you will ever have." -- Eckhart Tolle
"the tired sunsets and the tired people - it takes a lifetime to die and no time at all." -- Charles Bukowski
"The future starts today, not tomorrow." --John Paul II
"This is a new year. A new beginning. And things will change." --Taylor Swift
"You can have it all. Just not all at once." -- Oprah Winfrey
"Yesterday is gone. Tomorrow has not yet come. We have only today. Let us begin." --Mother Teresa
"Stop smiling at me like that when we're talking about chastity belts" -someone's girlfriend
"People who submit to a single leader, who believe and listen to him, most assuredly wander in the dark along with their leader."
"Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars" -Khalil Gibran
5 out of 6 scientists say Russian Roulette is safe
"How noble is the sad heart who would sing joyous songs with joyous hearts." - Kahlil Gibran
"If you are not encountering defeat on a fairly regular basis, you are not trying hard enough." -Christopher Sommer
"Everything that I could say would fade into insignificance - if you could only know how my heart feels"
"What do we live for, if not to make life less difficult for each other?" - George Eliot
"My ex-girlfriend used to have a really weird fetish: she used to like to dress up as herself And act like a fucking bitch all the time." - Bo Burnham
"Modern libertarianism is the disguise adopted by those who wish to exploit without restraint..." -George Monbiot
"It"s a most distressing affliction to have a sentimental heart and a skeptical mind." (-Nagulb Mahfouz)
"Happiness is the only GOOD, the time to be happy is NOW, the place to be Happy is HERE" - Robert G. Ingersoll
"If someone shows you their true colors, don't try to repaint them" -Unknown
"Feelings that come back are feelings that never left" - Frank Ocean
"The way I see it, if you want the rainbow, you've got to put up with the rain." - Dolly Parton.
"Be kind, for everyone you meet is fighting a battle you know nothing about." - Wendy Mass
"Too lenient and you may as well be too cruel. Save your enlightened attitude for the victory party." - Egon Musk
"Just because nobody complains doesn't mean all parachutes are perfect." -Benny Hill
"After a shooting spree, they always want to take the guns away from the people who didn"t do it."William S. Burroughs
"Appear weak when you are strong, and strong when you are weak." -Sun Tzu
"Black Panther turns racial politics into what Malcolm X called "politricks" . . . The media's enthusiasm for this bland action flick is maddening. The problem isn't one particular movie, but the celebration of the illusion of progress." -Armond White
"Think, think wrong if you must, but by all means, think for yourself"
"Think. Think wrong if you must. But by all means *think for yourself*"
"Whatever you are, be a good one." - Abraham Lincoln
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain.
"Reality continues to ruin my life." - Bill Watterson.
"A loving person lives in a loving world. A hostile person lives in a hostile world. Everyone you meet is your mirror" -- Ken Keyes, Jr. [19211995, American]
"A loving person lives in a loving world. A hostile pers on lives in a hostile world. Everyone you meet is your mirror" -- Ken Keyes, Jr. [19211995, American]
"The only way out of the labyrinth of suffering is to forgive." - John Green.
"Those things that hurt, instruct" -- Benjamin Franklin [17061790, American]
"This morning, I told the flowers what I"d do for you, and they BLOSSOMED" - Rupi Kaur
"It has been proven now scientifically that an affirmative thought is hundreds of times more powerful than a negative thought."  Michael Bernard Beckwith
"For every man there exists a bait which he cannot resist swallowing." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"We are all equal in the end."- Big Fishy
"Your relationship with yourself sets the tone for every other relationship you have." - Robert Holden
"A lie always leaves a drop of poison behind." - Francois de Callieres
"Lack of direction, not lack of time, is the problem. We all have twenty-four hour days." -- Zig Ziglar
"I dream my painting and I paint my dream." --Vincent van Gogh
"There are decades where nothing happens; and there are weeks where decades happen." Vladimir Lenin
"I"m not sitting here watching the world turn, you know I"d rather spin it. it"s my world and we"re all living in it" - Milo Murphy
"Our destiny lies in our thinking quality and how we react to it." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"We used to look up in the sky and wonder about our place in the stars, now we just look down and worry about our place in the dirt." - Matthew McConaughey (Cooper) in Interstellar
"You see that rocket ship leave yesterday? We can maybe leave this planet. We gonna be dealing with aliens. You think black and white gonna be a problem? Wait till you start running into motherfuckers with three or four dicks! Bug-eyed motherfuckers!" - George Clinton
"A window of opportunity won't open itself." - Dave Weinbaum.
"Stone is more stony than it used to be." -- Friedrich Nietzsche
"Education is the most powerful weapon we can use to change the world" Nelson Mandela
"Worrying is a wastage of your imagination." - Walt Disney
"There"s class warfare, all right, but it"s my class, the rich class, that"s making war, and we"re winning." - Warren Buffett
"A false friend and a shadow attend only while the sun shines." - Benjamin Franklin
"The meaning of life is just to be alive. It is so plain and so obvious and so simple. And yet, everybody rushes around in a great panic as if it were necessary to achieve something beyond themselves." - Alan Watts
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent."-Eleanor Roosevelt
"Faith is the art of holding on to things your reason has once accepted, in spite of your changing moods."C.S. Lewis
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim. Accept no one's definition of your life; define yourself."Harvey Fierstein
"Keep your eyes on the stars and your feet on the ground."Theodore Roosevelt
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind."Dr. Seuss
"Only you can change your own world. No one else." -- Nina Hrusa
"If life"s pen; passion is ink!" -- Israelmore Ayivor, Six Words Inspiration
"Having friends was weird . . . but in a good way." -- Gwenda Bond, Triple Threat
"Don"t be silent on your talent!" -- Israelmore Ayivor, Six Words Inspiration
"When it is late, everyone cares!" -- Israelmore Ayivor
"Who can stand the weight of God's wrath?" -- Lailah Gifty Akita
"Passion is a blazing flame." -- Lailah Gifty Akita
"Jesus Christ is a holy servant of God." -- Lailah Gifty Akita
"If we read, we shall renew our minds." -- Lailah Gifty Akita
"I had no plans of any destination. I wish to flow like a river." --- Lailah Gifty Akita
"Despair is suffering without meaning" - Viktor Frankl
"...Some dance to remember, some dance to forget..."
"Great achievement is usually born of great sacrifice, and is never the result of selfishness." - Napoleon Hill
"If you never did, you should. These things are fun and fun is good." - Dr. Seuss
"Every minute you spend in planning saves 10 minutes in execution; this gives you a 1,000 percent Return on Energy!" - Brian tracy
"I wish life was not so short,' he thought. 'Languages take such a time, and so do all the things one wants to know about." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Peace will come to the hearts of men when they realize their oneness with the universe, It is everywhere." - Black Elk
"It is better to be feared than loved, if you cannot be both." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"She was a girl who knew how to be happy even when she was sad. And that's importantyou know?"  Marilyn Monroe.
"Hard work is simply the refuge of people who have nothing whatever to do." - Oscar Wilde
"Never tell the truth to people who are not worthy of it." - Mark Twain
"Get me a record player, 12 cats, a large pizza, a box of bagels and a half dozen midgets. I have a plan" - Unknown
"IT"S FUNNY THE WAY MOST PEOPLE LOVE THE DEAD. ONCE YOU ARE DEAD, YOU ARE MADE FOR LIFE. YOU HAVE TO DIE BEFORE THEY THINK YOU ARE WORTH ANYTHING"  Jimi Hendrix
"Pull over!" "No, it's a cardigan, but thanks for noticin'!"
"I walk slowly, but I never walk backwards" - Abraham Lincoln
"If your actions inspire others to dream more, learn more, and become more, you are a leader." - John Quincy Adams
"If you don't like boobs, don't go see 'Red Sparrow'". -Jennifer Lawrence on '60 Minutes'
"The less the prudence with which others conduct their affairs, the greater the prudence with which we must conduct our own." - Warren Buffett
"Never ruin an apology with an excuse." - Benjamin Franklin.
"They can conquer who believe they can." - Virgil
"The world of reality has its limits; the world of imagination is boundless." - Jean-Jacques Rousseau
"If you're tired of starting over, stop giving up" - Shia LaBeouf
"The closest thing to god on earth is a woman"s body; it"s where life comes from" -Rupi Kaur
"I check my pulse and if I can find it, I know I"ve got a chance." - Paul Newman
"In life, like Chess, forethought wins" - Charles Buxton
"It's easy to believe that no one should depend on society for help when you yourself happen not to need such help." -Asimov
"I survived because the fire inside me burned brighter than the fire around me" -Joshua Graham
"I don't like to arrange things. If I stand in front of something, instead of arranging it, I arrange myself". Diane Arbus
"A slip of the foot you may soon recover, but a slip of the tongue you may never get over." - Benjamin Franklin.
"The bourgeois want art voluptuous and life ascetic; the reverse would be better." - Theodor Adorno,
"People can only understand something if they are willing to be understood." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The great thing about getting older is that you don't lose all the other ages you've been." - Madeleine L'Engle
"We don"t inherit the Earth from our ancestors, we borrow it from our children."Native American Proverb
"It is better to be on the right side of wrong than to be on the wrong side of right."
"The best day of your life is the one on which you decide your life is your own. No apologies or excuses. No one to lean on, rely on, or blame. The gift is yours  it is an amazing journey  and you alone are responsible for the quality of it. This is the day your life really begins." --Bob Moawad
"Who you are is a result of who you were, but where you end up depends entirely on who you choose to be from this moment forward." -Hal Elrod
"The goal of life is not to relax on the beach, sipping mojitos all day. The purpose is to find something you love that adds value to the world." -Ben Foley
"You Never Get A Second Chance to Make a First Impression"  Will Rogers.
"In three words I can sum up everything I"ve learned about life: it goes on." Robert Frost.
"Often when you think you're at the end of something, you're at the beginning of something else." Fred Rogers
"Rudeness is the weak man's imitation of strength." -Edmud Burke
"In America, we don't worship government, we worship God." - President Donald Trump
"If you"re reading this Congratulations, you"re alive. If that"s not something to smile about, then I don"t know what is." Backseat Goodbye
"I'll leave tomorrow's problems to tomorrow's me. " -Saitama (One Punch Man)
"I'll eave tomorrow's problems to tomorrow's me." -Saitama(One Punch Man)
"As long as I am learning something, I figure I'm OK - it's a decent day." - Hunter S. Thompson
"I have not failed. I"ve just found 10,000 ways that won"t work." - Thomas A. Edison
""If you assume that there is no hope, you guarantee that there will be no hope. If you assume that there is an instinct for freedom, that there are opportunities to change things, then there is a possibility that you can contribute to making a better world." -Noam Chomsky
" aint nothin like a little fear to make a paper man crumble" -unknown
" my dearly beloved, if i am to die today and never see the sweet face of you, i want you to know that i am no great man and am lucky to have such a great woman as you" - Bill Hickok
"i try not to think. it interferes with being nuts"- leo valdez
"i stay awake for fear of talking in my sleep" - unknown
"if we are all born to die, and we all die to live, then whats the point in living life if it just contradicts?"
"dont throw shade just so you can shine"
"You have to be odd to be number one"- theodore geisel
"Don"t worry about failures, worry about the chances you miss when you don"t even try." - Jack Canfield
"America has five percent of the world"s population, and yet 31 percent of the world"s mass shootings. We"re worried about people coming to this country. They should be worried about us going to theirs." -Dale Hansen
"The bourgeois want art voluptuous and life ascetic; the reverse would be better." -Adorno
"It's better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for something you are not." - Andr Gide
"Like the whippoorwill and the baby's cry I've got a song, I've got a song And I carry it with me and I sing it loud If it gets me nowhere, I'll go there proud." -Jim Croce
"The best world leaders don"t do the best things in the world, they will only make you think they do"
"The best presidents don"t do the best things in the world, they only make their people thing they do" - Myself
"Between the idea of a hero, and the reality of human struggle, lies a shadow that can cripple you" -- Tom Russell
"...for the whole work of man really seems to consist in nothing but proving to himself every minute that he is a man and not a piano-key!" - Dostoievski, Notes From Underground
"Stop counting only those things you have lost! What is gone, is gone! So ask yourself this. What is there... that still remains to you?!" - Jinbei
"And these children that you spit on as they try to change their worlds are immune to your consultations. They're quite aware of what they're going through." - David Bowie
"It is easier to build strong children than to repair broken men" --Frederick Douglass
"Ignorance and blind faith is why people still believe in an invisible man in the sky and think the Earth is flat. No one wants to do their own research. Speaking of, I have a way to get us a few million dollars if you just send me a few thousand."
"What would you have me do? Look at my men. Their courage hangs by a thread. If this is to be their end then I would have them make such an end, as to be worthy of rememberance." -Theoden
"Death is nothing, but to live defeated and inglorious is to die daily." -Napoleon
"In times of crises, the wise build bridges while the foolish build barriers." - Black Panther.
"In troubled times, wise men build bridges while fools build walls." - Black Panther.
"We loved with a love that was more than love." -- Edgar Allan Poe
"Where there is love there is life." --Mahatma Gandhi
"The dinosaurs aren't remembered for much more than their bones." - Kanye West
"Never love anyone who treats you like you're ordinary." -- Oscar Wilde
"You love me. Real or not real?" I tell him, "Real." -- Suzanne Collins
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." --William Shakespeare
"A thing is not necessarily true because a man dies for it." - Oscar Wilde
"I am not pretty. I am not beautiful. I am as radiant as the sun." --Suzanne Collins, The Hunger Games
"The truth is rarely pure and never simple." --Oscar Wilde, The Importance of Being Earnest
"The reason I talk to myself is because I"m the only one whose answers I accept." --George Carlin
"I believe that I interpret the will of the Congress and of the people when I assert that we will not only defend ourselves to the uttermost but will make it very certain that this form of treachery shall never again endanger us." -FDR
"The unexamined life is not worth living." -- Socrates
"What's meant to be will always find a way" -- Trisha Yearwood
"Pain is temporary. Quitting lasts forever." -- Lance Armstrong, Every Second Counts
"I"m not a soldier, Major! When we took those hostages we became mercenaries; and mercenaries get paid! I want my FUCKING MONEY!" -Tony Todd
"We accept the love we think we deserve." --Stephen Chbosky
"Never wipe your tears if you still wanna cry, Never settle for an answer if you still want to know, Never say 'yes' if you want to say 'no' Never say 'stay' if you want to say 'go' - Paulo Coelho
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." -- Elbert Hubbard
"The things you bury deepest in the garbage always end up on top when dumped out" - Me while cleaning my room
"When you"re accustomed to privilege, equality feels like oppression." - source unknown
"What are we going to do about ignorance and apathy? I don"t know and I don"t care." William Safire [19292009, American]
"For the human being, the answers we need and seek are those that lead to friendship, and these change as the questions change."
"There is no dignity when the human dimension is eliminated from the person. In short, the problem with pornography is not that it shows too much of the person, but that it shows far too little." - John Paul II
"Time flies like an arrow; fruit flies like a banana." - Anthony G. Oettinger
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The problem with gun control is everyone want to be the last person with a gun."
"Not my chair, not my problem."
"We can"t help everyone, but everyone can help someone."--Ronald Reagan
"Religion in society is like salt. A little bit is good but too much will fuck up your food" - Chris Rock
"I am afraid we must make the world honest before we can honestly say to our children that honesty is the best policy." - George Bernard Shaw.
"'leadership from adults wasn't getting us anywhere'..." -/u/ZZZ_123
"The dead can't have unfinished business. They can't want, or think, or do. That's what makes them dead. It's the living who chose to be haunted." -Jeff Winger
"I heard that pictures don't change, just the people inside of them do" - Lost In The Moment by Therapy Session feat. Andreas Moss
"You, me, or nobody is gonna hit as hard as life. But it ain't about how hard you hit. It's about how hard you can get hit and keep moving forward; how much you can take and keep moving forward. That's how winning is done!" - Rocky in Rocky Balboa
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test his character, give him power." - Abraham Lincoln
"We do have a lot in common. The same air, the same Earth, the same sky. Maybe if we started looking at what's the same instead of always looking at what's different, well, who knows?" - Meowth (Pokmon)
"Life owes you nothing. You owe yourself everything." - Corey Taylor
"History will be kind to me, for as I intend to write it!" - Winston Churchill
"We will change, because we can change. I know it. We may be weak but we just have to be, if not then we wouldn't have any reason to grow, to get strong. I know that it may seem futile to you but its not because we are getting stronger with every step we take." - Trisha Elric
"You must be ready to burn yourself in your own flame: how could you become new, if you had not first become ashes?" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The era of big government is over." Bill Clinton
" Freedom begins where it ends ignorance " - Victor Hugo
" Freedom begins where it ends ignorance " - Victor Hugo
"When someone wrongs us, we want the maximum amount of punishment. But when we do wrong, we want the maximum amount of understanding and forgiveness."  someone on Humans of Newyork
"If your only goal is to become rich, you will never achieve it."--John D. Rockefeller
"It"s not about the cards you"re dealt, but how you play the hand." - Randy Pausch, The Last Lecture
"Growth is an erratic forward movement: two steps forward, one step back. Remember that and be very gentle with yourself." - Julia Cameron
"If we do not want to die together in war, we must learn to live together in peace." -- Harry Truman, April 25, 1945
"Time is an illusion. Lunchtime doubly so." - The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy
"The only person you should try to be better than is the person you were yesterday." Anonymous
"The biggest difference I've noticed between successful people and unsuccessful people isn't intelligence or opportunity or resources. It's the belief that they can make their goals happen." - James Clear
"Having a life without any madness is like singing a song without any rhythm." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Never argue with an idiot. They will only bring you down to their level and beat you with experience." George Carlin
"When the character of a man is not clear to you, look at his friends." Japanese Proverb
"Believe in your infinite potential. Your only limitations are those you set upon yourself." - Roy T. Bennett
"The idea that you control something and no one else is allowed to do something similar is ridiculous". Simon Cowell
"We are so often caught up in our destination we forget about the journey, especially the amazing people we meet on the way. Appreciate the people around you
"In nature there are neither rewards nor punishment; there are only consequences."  Robert B. Ingersoll
"You can either be the man, or work for the man."
"If you want to live a happy life, tie it to a goal, not people or objects" -Albert Einstein
"It isn't actually very difficult to stay off of my shit list. That's how I know god is stupid and satan is weak." - Real Guyman
'Supposing a tree fell down, Pooh, when we were underneath it?'....'Supposing it didn't,' said Pooh after careful thought. Piglet was comforted by this. - A.A. Milne
"You have to stand up for some things in this world." -- Marjory Stoneman Douglas
"It's not what you look at that matters, it's what you see." - Henry David Thoreau
"Law always chooses sides on the basis of enforcement power. Morality and legal niceties have little to do with it when the real question is: Who has the clout?" - Bene Gesserit Council Proceedings: Archives #XOX232
"This consciousness that is myself of selves, that is everything, and yet nothing at all  what is it? And where did it come from? And why?" - Julian Jaynes
"Start where you are. Use what you have. Do what you can." Arthur Ashe
"When you make peace with authority, you become the authority". Jim Morrison, The Doors
"It is an evil not to call evil an evil." -- Niccol Machiavelli
"If you empathize with stupidity you're half way to thinking like an idiot." Ian M. Banks, Consider Phlebas
"...the sight of what is going on is so necessary to young men, who wish always to see the world traverse their horizon, be that horizon only the street." - Alexandre Dumas, The Count of Monte Cristo
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." -- Mark Twain
"But better to get hurt by the truth than comforted with a lie." --Khaled Hosseini
"Do not set yourself on fire in order to keep others warm." - Anonymous.
"Our enemies are innovative and resourceful and so are we. They never stop thinking about new ways to harm our country and our people and neither do we." - George W. Bush
"Divide each difficulty into as many parts as is feasible and necessary to resolve it."
"We mourn the dead, but few mourn the living dead."
"Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending." Maria Robinson
"It gets easier. Every day it gets a little easier. But you got to do it every day. That's the hard part. But it does get easier."-Baboon(Bojack Horseman)
"Good judgement comes from experience, and a lot of that comes from bad judgement" - Will Rogers
"Why let go of yesterday? Because yesterday has already let go of you. " -Dr Steve Maraboli
"Always remember people who have helped you along the way, and don"t forget to lift someone up." - Roy T. Bennett
"You can win a fight with violence, but never an argument."- Martn the blacksmith.
"I'm not afraid of death; I just don't want to be there when it happens." - Woody Allen
"Fear cuts deeper than swords"-George R.R Martin
"A work of art is above all an adventure of the mind"  Eugene Ionesco
"Everyone has a plan 'till they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson
"There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves." Will Rogers
"Fifty thousand years ago there were these three guys spread out across the plain and they each heard something rustling in the grass..." - Peter Watts, Echopraxia
"The question isn't who is going to let me, it's who is going to stop me" - Ayn Rand
"Everything you can imagine is real." - -Pablo Picasso.
"Souls are like athletes, that need opponents worthy of them, if they are to be tried and extended and pushed to the full use of their powers, and rewarded according to their capacity." -Thomas Merton
"You have to be grateful for the time that you had and then realize you should focus on today and the future." --- Bill Clinton (when asked if he missed being a President)
"Be a nuisance where it counts; Do your part to inform and stimulate the public to join your action. Be depressed, discouraged, and disappointed at failure and the disheartening effects of ignorance, greed, corruption and bad politicsbut never give up." -- Marjory Stoneman Douglas
"Public men are proud to be servants of the State, and would be ashamed to be masters of it." -- Sir Winston Churchill
"Stand up for what you believe in even if you are standing alone" - Sophie Scholl
"You can't hang on to yourself. You don't have to try not to hang on to yourself. It can't be done, and that is salvation. 'Memento Mori,' 'be mindful of death.' "
"We have to stop CONSUMING our culture. We have to CREATE culture" (Full quote in text)
"When you part from your friend, you grieve not; for that which you love most in him may be clearer in his absence, as the mountain to the climber is clearer from the plain." - Khalil Gibran
"I don't know if charlie's silence here today is right or wrong. I'm not a judge or jury, but I can tell you this: he won't sell anybody to buy his future! and that's my friends is called integrity. That's called courage. Now that's the stuff leaders should be made of". Al Pacino, Scent of a Woman
"The key to empowerment is to give yourself permission to think and to act"
"Ideas shape the course of history." - John Maynard Keynes
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live."- Norman Cousins
"Sometimes you need to dance with the shoes you have on." Where does this quote originate?
"Our greatest glory is, not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall."-Oliver Goldsmith
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened."- Dr. Seuss
"The lack of self love is the root of all suffering"
"I don't recall ever mourning being left out. I don't recall ever watching the other kids running about madly and wishing I could join them. Rather, I thought of the possibility with distaste. You see, I had my books. I would rather read." -Asimov
"I don't recall ever mourning being left out. I don't recall ever watching the other kids running about madly and wishing I could join them. Rather, I thought of the possibility with distaste. You see, I had my books. I would rather read."
"Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings." - Anais Nin
"If you don't know where you are going, every road will get you nowhere" Henry Kissinger
"One cannot find his true potential unless someone cherish it." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The purpose of a storyteller is not to tell you how to think, but to give you questions to think upon." - Brandon Sanderson
"Be a good person but don't waste time to prove it"
"It is our failure to become our perceived ideal that ultimately defines us and makes us unique. It's not easy, but if you accept your misfortune and handle it right. Your perceived failure can become a catalyst for profound reinvention"
"Power is crack-cocaine for your ego and battery-acid for your soul" - David Mitchell
"We are all the heroes of our own story. Without even realizing, we are probably the villain in someone else's." - Leroy O'Neil
"Dreams without goals are just dreams" (Denzel Washington)
"The truth is, everyone is going to hurt you. You just got to find the ones worth suffering for." - Bob Marley
"When god became lonely he created man, Or was it When man became lonely he created god."
"I don't grow up. In me is the small child of my early days." - MC Escher
"Life is a process of becoming, a combination of states we have to go through. Where people fail is that they wish to elect a state and remain in it. This is a kind of death." Anas Nin
"Well, I don't know how many years on this Earth I got left. I'm going to get really weird with it. " - Frank R
"It is never too late to be what you might have been." - George Eliot
"Showing off is the fool's idea of glory." Bruce Lee
"The world is what it is; men who are nothing, who allow themselves to become nothing, have no place in it." V.S. Naipaul, A Bend in the River
"Funny thing about being in the limelight. You never know when the lights will come crashing down on your head." -- Bill Lewis
"Friendship is everything. Friendship is more than talent. It is more than the government. It is almost the equal of family." - Don Corleone (The Godfather)
"There he goes. One of God's own prototypes. A high-powered mutant of some kind never even considered for mass production. Too weird to live, and too rare to die."  Hunter S. Thompson
"All of humanity's problems stem from man's inability to sit quietly in a room alone." Blaise Pascal
"Resistance is futile" - The Borg.
"Their concept of beauty is manufactured, I am not. I am human" -Rupi Kaur
"Nobody can save you from yourself but almost everybody can help you to save you from yourself." - Sanshi Dectroyev
"You break women in like shoes" -Rupi Kaur
"5 mins of pleasure, 9 months of pain"
"For each ecstatic instant We must an anguish pay In keen and quivering ratio To the ecstasy. " -Emily Dickinson "For each ecstatic instant We must an anguish pay In keen and quivering ratio To the ecstasy. " -Emily Dickinson
"The effect you have on others is the most valuable currency there is" - Jim Carrey
"For every dark night, there's a brighter day." - Tupac Shakur
"He who controls the narrative, controls the universe" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Opportunism without competence is a path to fairyland." -Kenneth R. Andrews
"I didn't think; I experimented." - Anthony Burgess
"There is no elevator to success  you have to take the stairs" - Anonymous.
"Humility is not to think less of yourself but to think of yourself less"
"Do not pray for easy lives, my friends. Pray to be stronger men." -JFK
"Love is not just admiration for strength, it is also tolerance for weakness and recognition of ambivalence." - Alain de Botton
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
. I"ve missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I"ve lost almost 300 games. 26 times I"ve been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I"ve failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed. Michael Jordan
"Only fire can temper the blade."
"You know, what the hell, it's not all a drag. And I'm thinkin' to myself, I should stop ruining my life - searching for answers I'm never gonna get, and just enjoy it while it lasts." - Woody Allen [full quote in post]
"There are people who like gourmet burgers and the there are people who like to order cheeseburgers with no cheese" - Jeury San
"Suffering is necessary until you realise it is unnecessary" - Eckhart Tolle
"If you are judging someone, you are not likely to understand them. If you understand someone, you are not likely to judge them." -Duncan Schott
"If you are judging someone, you most likely do not understand them. If you understand someone, you are not likely to judge them." -unknown
"Sound like crap until you don't"-Branford Marsalis
"The deeper the trench, the higher the peak" - Witt Lowry
"Passion is an unmatched fuel" - Gary Vaynerchuk
"Peace begins with a smile." - Mother Teresa
"Don't you see? It's Galaxy-wide. It's a worship of the past. It's a deterioration - a stagnation!" - Isaac Asimov, Foundation
"To have peace with this peculiar life; to accept what we do not understand; to wait calmly for what awaits us, you have to be wiser than I am." - MC Escher
"Sometimes you just have to pee in the sink" Charles Bukowski
"Friendship is Love without his wings!" - Lord Byron
"There are many ways of going forward, but only one way of standing still." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Little minds are tamed and subdued by misfortune; but great minds rise above them." - Washington Irving
"The greatest challenge to any thinker is stating the problem in a way that will allow a solution." -- Bertrand Russell
"We must reject the idea that every time a law's broken, society is guilty rather than the lawbreaker. It is time to restore the American precept that each individual is accountable for his actions." - Ronald Reagan
"The penalty for procrastination is the loss of hopes and dreams." Tai Lopez
"When you awaken to the reality that you are part of everything, you want for no thing."
"There"s people to impress and stuff to do so might as well get on it" u/DaRandomBro 2018
"If I could live my life again, knowing what I know now, I wouldn"t change a thing. Sometimes I was a real idiot, doing stupid things that I still regret. But they made me who I am today. Still weird, but myself. You wouldn"t be you without your past. Even in the very small details" -Unknown
"A dog has the soul of a philosopher." - Plato
"[The 2 children] also had many quarrels [...] but they always made it up again: so that years later, when they were grown up, they were so used to quarreling and making up again that they got married so as to go on doing it more conveniently." -C.S. Lewis, The Horse and His Boy
"Even if you"re on the right track, you"ll get run over if you just sit there." - Will Rodgers.
"It takes a great deal of bravery to stand up to our enemies, but just as much to stand up to our friends."  J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Philosopher's Stone
"Surround yourself with positive images and quotes that motivate and inspire you to be the best version of yourself. Program your subconscious to work for you." Author Unknown
"In the souls of the people the grapes of wrath are filling and growing heavy, growing heavy for the vintage."
"You can be comfortable or courageous, but you cannot be both."
"It's always too early to quit." - Norman Vincent Peale
"i got the point that i should leave you alone but we both know that im not that strong" - derek sanders
"telling someone why you like them is like explaining what water tastes like"- unknown
"Leave a little to nature: she understands her business better than we do." Montaigne, Essays, A.D. 1595
"In Switzerland, they had brotherly love, they had five hundred years of democracy and peace  and what did that produce? The cuckoo clock." - Orson Welles as Harry Lime
"People tend to forget their duties, but remember their rights" - Indira Gandhi
"Most geniuses, especially those who lead others-prosper not by deconstructing intricate complexities, but by exploiting unrecognized simplicities." - Andy Benoit
"[S]ocialism is directed toward a social-ethical end. Science, however, cannot create ends and, even less, instill them in human beings; science, at most, can supply the means by which to attain certain ends." - Albert Einstein, Why Socialism? (1949)
"Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see" - Mark Twain
"When the going gets tough, put one foot in front of the other and just keep going. Don"t give up." - Roy T. Bennett
"If you believe very strongly in something, stand up and fight for it." - Roy T. Bennett
"It's not about ideas. It's about making ideas happen." - Scott Belsky
"I am indebted to my father for living, but to my teacher for living well." -Alexander the Great
"Go to Heaven for the climate. Hell for the company" - Mark Twain
"Freedom is the right to tell people what they do not want to hear." - George Orwell
"I'm very concerned that our society is much more interested in information than wonder; in noise, rather than silence" - Fred Rogers
"Sometimes it's better to be kind than to be right. We do not need an intelligent mind that speaks, but a patient heart that listens." - Buddha
"yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, but today is a gift, that is why they call it the present" - oogway
"yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, but today is a gift, but today is a gift, that is why they call it the present"
"It is not the load that breaks you down. It's the way you carry it." Lou Holtz
"Greatness and madness are next door neighbors and they often borrow each other"s sugar."  Joe Rogan
"The media turns us all into whores" - Personal Quote
"You can not teach a selfish person to be unselfish, by any means. That is to say, whatever a selfish person does. Whether it be giving his body to be burned or giving all that he possesses to the poor, he will still do it in a selfish way of feeling." -Alan Watts
"All you need is the plan, the road map, and the courage to press on to your destination " -instalife.quotes
"He who wonders discovers that this in itself is wonder." - MC Escher
"Have enough courage to trust love one more time and always one more time." - Maya Angelou
"If stupidity got us into this mess, then why can't it get us out?" - Will Rodgers.
"Leave the gun, take the cannoli." --Peter Clemenza
"All sizzle, no steak."
"I have loved justice and hated iniquity; therefore, I die in exile." - Pope Gregory VII
"..and now he's actin' like, "Oh, well, this is life, I guess," Nah, fuck that shit. Listen man, you can still do what you wanna do, you gotta trust that shit." - Drake
(quote in text) -church
"I was once interviewed by Barbara Walters and while we were off camera, she wondered whether I didn't sometimes want to do other things, rather than writing...
"Formal education will make you a living. Self-education will make you a fortune."  Jim Rohn
"Nothing is impossible; the word itself says "I"m possible"!" - Audrey Hepburn
"Never half-ass two things, whole-ass one thing." - Ron Swanson
"Knowledge is power" Francis Bacon
"The only darkness is ignorance" - Shakespeare
"Let the improvement of yourself keep you so busy that you have no time to criticize others." - Roy T. Bennett
"If you want to be happy, be." -Leo Tolstoy
"We adore chaos because we love to produce order." - MC Escher
"Speak only if it improves upon the silence" - Gandhi
"He who fights with monsters might take care lest he thereby become a monster. And if you gaze for long into an abyss, the abyss gazes also into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Norman. What did you do? Norm, you sneaky snail. What did you do? Wait a second, did you"
"Marriage is a great institution. I'm not ready for an institution yet." - Mae West
"Positive Mind. Positive Vibe. Positive Life." - unknown
"this a compilation of my observations while trapped in this god forsaken nation". J Cole
"Bigamy is having one wife too many. Monogamy is the same." - Oscar Wilde.
"Sometimes when you're in hell the angels look like devils" - my best friend a long while back
"It's so cruel to let people love you. All you're doing is promising that one day you'll break their hearts."
"Europe has a healthcare system (although not perfect). America has a healthcare business. Very different." - oriain81
"my prick is dearer to me than life itself" -Augustus
"Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent." Issac Asimov
"Let us always meet each other with smile, for the smile is the beginning of love."-Mother Teresa
"It's so simple to be wise. Just think of something stupid to say and then don't say it." - Sam Levenson
"If you want to experience the beauty of a sunrise, you must first stumble through the dark of night, then you will find solace in it's juxtaposition."
"He who controls the past controls the future. He who controls the present controls the past." - George Orwell
"You see sir, If I was to bear that insult, I would be committing a great disservice upon myself".
"Life doesn"t have to be perfect, it just has to be lived." - Dexter Morgan
"I would have made a good Pope." - Richard M. Nixon.
"You are wasting time reading this quote."
"There are two means of refuge from the misery of life  music and cats." - Albert Schweitzer
"So let us then try to climb the mountain, not by stepping on what is below us, but to pull us up at what is above us, for my part at the stars; amen." - MC Escher
"If you have time for reddit, you have time for anything."
"With my eyes closed, I would touch a familiar book and draw its fragrance deep inside me. This was enough to make me happy." -Haruki Murakami, Norwegian Wood
"It will be of little avail to the people that laws are made by men of their own choice, if the laws be so voluminous that they cannot be read, or so incoherent that they cannot be understood." -James Madison
"How surely are the dead beyond death. Death is what the living carry with them. A state of dread, like some uncanny foretaste of a bitter memory. But the dead do not remember and nothingness is not a curse. Far from it." Suttree.
"If you're afraid - don't do it, - if you're doing it - don't be afraid!" - Genghis Khan
"Allow yourself to cry tears of both joy and sorrow, for they all water the garden of enlightenment."
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough."-Mae West
"We're all sinners. And we all think we need to be punished. Even if our sins don't exist." - From Electric Dreams (Episode: "Real Life")
"You put chemicals in your food so they can stay on your shelves longer even if it means your stay on the planet is shorter." - Conversations with God (book 2), to humanity.
"Blessed is the man, who has nothing to say, abstains from giving wordy evidence of the fact." - George Eliot.
"The death of a child makes no sense; the death of millions... what sense could it make" -Elie Wiesel
"...institutions must advance also to keep pace with the times. We might as well require a man to wear still the coat which fitted him when a boy as civilized society to remain ever under the regimen of their barbarous ancestors." - Thomas Jefferson
"Working everyday in a different way with the sense of learning will bring Joy, not burden." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Too many overly woke people, when you stay awake for so long you start to get Tired" - Charlemagne Tha God
" Fill your life with experiences, Not things. Have stories to tell, Not stuff to show. " - Unknown
"When life gives you lemons, just say, "Fuck the lemons" and bail" - Paul Rudd
"It's sport for people, it's fun to get on at night and unleash their own self-loathing by attacking someone else who they think has a happier life - or something, I dunno." - Mary-Louise Parker
"A flower falls, even though we love it; and a weed grows, even though we do not love it" - Dogen
"Success is to be measured not so much by the position that one has reached in life as by the obstacles which he has overcome." - Booker T. Washington
"A life well lived is not free from sadness and pain. Only a life not lived is free from sadness and pain."
"Everything conspired to force me into an abnormal way of life as a youngster..."
"All of humanity's problems stem from man's inability to sit quietly in a room alone." - Blaise Pascal
"We may brave human laws, but we cannot resist natural ones." -Jules Verne
"After a shooting spree, they always want to take the guns away from the people who didn't do it. I sure as hell wouldn't want to live in a society where the only people allowed guns are the police and the military." - William S. Burroughs
"The purpose of learning is growth, and our minds, unlike our bodies, can continue growing as we continue to live." - Mortimer J. Adler
"It's all about mastering the skill of ignoring ignorance" Rihanna.
"Pain is the reflection of your Determination which creates Perfection." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed." -James Madison
"Prayers without accordant action are silent lies told to oneself, heard by no God, amounting to nothing. Action is the language of truth, the prayers of the Saints." - Mark Ruffalo
"The early bird gets eaten, but the early worm gets eaten" - Unkown
"Don't bend; don't water it down; don't try to make it logical; don't edit your own soul according to the fashion. Rather, follow your most intense obsessions mercilessly." -Franz Kafka
"In retrospect Sandy Hook marked the end of the US gun control debate. Once America decided killing children was bearable, it was over."  Dan Hodges.
"Every single time you help somebody stand up, you are helping humanity rise." - Steve Maraboli
"The best way to find out if you can trust somebody is to trust them." - Ernest Hemingway
"The world is full of magic things, patiently waiting for our senses to grow sharper." - W. B. Yeats
"Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings." - Anas Nin
"You are not entitled to your opinion. You are entitled to your informed opinion. No one is entitled to be ignorant." - Harlan Ellison
"Nothing is lost if one has the courage to proclaim that all is lost and we must begin anew." - Julio Cortzar
"Always remember, your focus determines your reality." - George Lucas
"Maybe this world is another planet's Hell." - Aldous Huxley.
"If you move hastily I'll put a bullet in you" - Kurt Russell in Bone Tomahawk
"Rape is one of the most terrible crimes on earth and it happens every few minutes. The problem with groups who deal with rape is that they try to educate women about how to defend themselves. What really needs to be done is teaching men not to rape. Go to the source and start there." KURT COBAIN
"No law's gonna change us We have to change us. Whatever God you believe in We come from the same one Strip away the fear Underneath it's all the same love About time that we raised up" - Macklemore
"The only way to discover the limits of the possible is to go beyond them into the impossible." - Arthur C. Clarke
"The most important things are the hardest things to say. They are the things you get ashamed of, because words diminish them -- words shrink things that seemed limitless when they were in your head to no more than living size when they're brought out........"- Stephen King (The Body)
"Nothing will work unless you do." - Maya Angelou
"And when the orange man raw doggeth a wily harlot..." - (Mulligans 3:16)
"Life is neither good nor bad, but both, and always either; a backward forward to and fro inside itself, ever inward left and right forever, til it starts to stop stop-starting, and at full speed, comes to a halt where it both began and ended."
[HELP] Trying to remember quote along the lines of: "Nature is a place where even man will not remain."
"Only the weak are cruel. Gentleness can only be expected from the strong." - Felice Leonardo Buscaglia
"People who live in a glass house have to answer the door." - Karl Pilkington
"You are much more than the meaning of the word 'the best', because you are unlimited." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Words you say never seem to live up to the ones inside your head. The lives we make never seem to get us anywhere but dead." - Chris Cornell
"Indeed, I tremble for my country when I reflect that God is just." -Thomas Jefferson
"Love does not begin and end the way we seem to think it does. Love is a battle, love is a war; love is a growing up." - James Baldwin
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." Charles Darwin
"If you don't Build your dream, someone else will hire you to help them Build theirs." - Dhirubhai Ambani
"I guess everybody has a cause, you know? ... I have an advantage to advance this cause. I was born with this face." --- Kim Jung Un Impersonator at the PyeongChang Olympics Opening Ceremonies
"The most intimate thing we can do is to allow people we love most to see us at our worst. At our lowest. At our weakest. True intimacy happens when nothing is perfect." Amy Harmon
"True love is when both people think they have the better half of the deal." (-Simon Sinek)
"An Achiever always thinks Innovative and works Creative." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"You don"t need someone to complete you. You only need someone to accept you completely." Unknown
"Change your life today. Don't gamble on the future, act now, without delay."- Simone de Beauvoir
"Good people are like candles. They burn themselves up to give others light." Unknown
"What"s the worst thing I"ve stolen? Probably little pieces of other people"s lives. Where I"ve either wasted their time or hurt them in some way. That"s the worst thing you can steal, the time of other people. You just can"t get that back" Chester Bennington *Linkin Park*
"There are no secrets to success. It is the result of preparation, hard work, and learning from failure." - Colin PowellRead
"Every artist dips his brush in his own soul, and paints his own nature into his pictures." - Henry Ward Beecher
"It is no small art to sleep: for that purpose you must keep awake all day." Friedrich Nietzsche
"You are a saucy boy." - William Shakespeare
"Too many people are working jobs they don't really like lifestyles they don't really enjoy for people they don't really care about" -Adam Mcwhirter
"Nothing in all the world is more dangerous than sincere ignorance and conscientious stupidity."-Martin Luther King, Jr.
"During times of universal deceit, telling the truth becomes a revolutionary act."  George Orwell
*_*
"Action is the foundational key to success." - Pablo Picasso
"I often feel that death is not the enemy of life, but its friend; for it is the knowledge that our years are limited which makes them so precious." - Joshua Loth Liebman
"It's like balancing on a tightrope. Constantly careful and steady. But sometimes, I wish I would just fall..."
"Life"s a dirty game. You gotta play dirty to win it."- Harris
"Poverty is the worst form of violence."  Mahatma Gandhi
"The fact that we live at the bottom of a deep gravity well, on the surface of a gas covered planet going around a nuclear fireball 90 million miles away and think this to be normal is obviously some indication of how skewed our perspective tends to be." - Douglas Adams
"Never mistake motion for action." Ernest Hemingway
"He who knows he has enough is rich" Lao Tzu
"Deep into that darkness peering, long I stood there, wondering, fearing, doubting, dreaming dreams no mortal ever dared to dream before." -Edgar Allan Poe
'She was saddened by the cruelty of a world in which the living can only live by predation of those creatures weaker than themselves, it seemed a poor way to order a universe.' Louis De Bernieres
"We love to eat. We love to pray. Mold over mind, HOORAY!" -Lard
"Yet he dismisses without notice his thought, because it is his. In every work of genius we recognize our own rejected thoughts; they come back to us with a certain alienated majesty." - Emerson
"Twenty percent of people don't care about your problems and the other eighty percent are really, really happy you have them" - Daymond John
"What most people consider "real life" is no more than a dream they wake up to each morning."
"Maybe true travel is not the transportation of the body, but a change of perception, renewing the mind." - Ben Okri
"In order to earn respect. You must respect yourself" - Annoymous
"The secret is to show up, do the work, and go home." -Christopher Sommer
"If you want it, go get it, because you deserve it!"
"The best brains of the Nation may be found on the last benches of the Classroom"-A.P.J.Abdul Kalam
"Your Will is the most accurate way to predict the Future" - Elon Musk
"Nobody in life gets exactly what they thought they were going to get. But if you work really hard and you're kind, amazing things will happen. I'm telling you, it's just true" -Conan
"It is best to keep one"s own state intact; to crush the enemy"s state is only second best." - Sun Tzu
"Love is the answer, but while you're waiting for the answer, sex raises some pretty good questions." Woody Allen *Happy Valentine* :p
"Success is determined by those who prove the impossible, possible." - James Pence
"a dead end is always the safest route"
"The great thing in the world is not so much to seek happiness as to earn peace and self-respect."  Thomas Huxley
"The one person you"ll be spending the rest of your life with is you. Treat yourself with love and respect."  Elle Sommer
"The universe is a cruel, uncaring void. The key to being happy isn't a search for meaning. It's to just keep yourself busy with unimportant nonsense, and eventually, you'll be dead."  Mr. Peanutbutter
"To die for a religion is easier than to live it absolutely." - Jorge Luis Borges
"Winners suffer before the race, losers suffer after" Porter Sweat
"It's so hard to forget pain, but it's even harder to remember sweetness. We have no scar to show for happiness. We learn so little from peace."  Chuck Palahniuk
"I"d rather have four quarters than one hundred pennies". -Al Capone
"The best advice I"ve ever received: "no one else knows what they"re doing either."" Charles Bukowski
"Your desires are inflamed, your aversions are low, your purposes are inconsistent, your motives are out of harmony with nature, your opinions are ill-considered and mistaken." - Epictetus
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful about what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut, Mother Night
"...when government officials spend money on weapons instead of cures..."-Tao te Ching
"Well, you don't make anybody greater by making them less." - Gilbert Gonzales
"Through space the universe encompasses and swallows me up like a mere point; through thought I encompass it." - Blaise Pascal
"We are all responsible for all."  Dostoyevsky
"The whole art of teaching is only the art of awakening the natural curiosity of young minds for the purpose of satisfying it afterwards." - Anatole France
"I"ve always liked women with some sadness in their eyes; with some blush on their cheeks; with some innocence in their hearts; with some desire on their lips; with some sins in their past." - Damian Corvium
"See the bad in yourself and the good in others".  Imam Ali
"Nothing worth having was ever achieved without effort." - Theodore Roosevelt
"The only difference between death and taxes is that death doesn"t get worse every time Congress meets." - Will Rogers
"There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves." - Will Rogers
"I believe that there should be a very much heavier progressive tax on very large incomes, a tax which should increase in a very marked fashion for the gigantic incomes." -Theodore Roosevelt-
"I knew that if I failed I wouldn't regret that, but I knew the one thing I might regret is not trying." - Jeff Bezos
"If you want to know what a man's like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire
"I received the fundamentals of my education in school, but that was not enough. My real education, the superstructure, the details, the true architecture, I got out of the public library." -Asimov
"If you want to be a writer, you must do two things above all others: read a lot and write a lot. There's no way around these two things that I'm aware of, no shortcut." - Stephen King
"It's not easy to solve a complicated problem and ready-made ideological solutions don't work, they make it worse."
"For in the sciences the authority of thousands of opinions is not worth as much as one tiny spark of reason in an individual man." - Galileo Galilei, Frammenti e lettere.
"And I, too, felt ready to start life all over again.
"Impossible only means that you haven"t found the solution yet."
"Beauty is mysterious as well as terrible. God and devil are fighting there, and the battlefield is the heart of man." -Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"Innovation distinguishes between a leader and a follower." -Steve Jobs
"When dealing with people, remember you are not dealing with creatures of logic, but creatures of emotion." - Dale Carnegie
"Only dumb people try to impress smart people. Smart people just do what they do." -Chris Rock
"Everyone you meet always asks if you have a career, are married, or own a house as if life was some kind of grocery list. But no one ever asks you if you are happy" - Heath Ledger
"Look back over the past, with its changing empires that rose and fell, and you can foresee the future, too." - Marcus Aurelius
"To be angry with the right person, to the right degree, at the right time, for the right purpose, in the right way  that is not easy." Aristotle
"If you could kick the person in the pants responsible for most of your trouble, you wouldn't sit for a month" Theodore Roosevelt
"And don't ever let them make you feel like saying what you want is unbecoming. If you were supposed to watch your mouth all the time I doubt your eyes would be above it" Mike Cooley
"I was never more certain of how far I was away from my goal than when I was standing next to it."  Vincent from GATTACA
"One person can make a difference, and everyone should try." - John F. Kennedy
"There's only two things in life I respect: Adolf Hitler, and not women." - Australian Shitposter
"No matter how bad things may seem, they can't get any better and they can't get any worse, because that's the way things fucking are and you better get used to it..."
"Your troubles are only the concern of those willing to share in that concern with you" - Me
"The meaning of life is that it stops." -Franz Kafka
"There is only one boss. The customer. And he can fire everybody in the company from the chairman on down, simply by spending his money somewhere else." -Sam Walton
make it a good life"
"People who think they know everything are a great annoyance to those of us who do." -Isaac Asimov
"There"s too much smoke to see it / there"s too much broke to heal this / I love you, I love you / and all of your pieces"
"The Enrichment Center reminds you that the Weighted Companion Cube will never threaten to stab you and, in fact, cannot speak." -GlaDos
"A best way to dreams come true ia to wake up" - Muhammed Ali
"Stars can't shine without darkness"
" Selfish a judgment readily passed by those who have never tested their own power of sacrifice. " -George Eliot
"One of the most devastating things in this world is finding out a genuine, special connection you thought you had with someone was just a common thing from their point of view."
"The universe is full of magical things patiently waiting for our wits to grow sharper." - Eden Phillpotts (A Shadow Passes)
"You will improve or disappear"
"Everyone has that one Special Quality which no one has in the whole World." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Attachment leads to suffering." -Buddha
"I spent a year of my life learning to dance, only to find that the steps weren't as important as having the courage to commit to them." - Steven Mix
"A republic, if you can keep it." Franklin upon being asked whether the United States was to have a monarchy or a republic.
"Why must fireflies die so young?" Setsuko in Grave of the Fireflies
"A child is a person who can't understand why someone would give away a perfectly good kitten." -Doug Larson
"She tried to seem unreachable, but the wall of her impregnability was built of bricks in the form of her weaknesses." - Damian Corvium
"if one is going to express animus towards something, one should have the correct something in mind, rather than a straw version of it" - Klumpenhouwer
"Light thinks it travels faster than anything but it is wrong. No matter how fast light travels, it finds the darkness has always got there first, and is waiting for it." -Terry Pratchett
"There are different kinds of darkness. There is the darkness that frightens, the darkness that soothes, the darkness that is restful; the darkness of lovers, and the darkness of assassins. It becomes what the bearer wishes it to be, needs it to be. It is not wholly bad or good." -Sarah J. Maas
"If you want to lose your religion, make friends with the priest." Gurdjieff (or his father)
"The most important step a man can take. It's not the first one, is it? It's the next one. " - Brandon Sanderson
"Every man at some point in his life is gonna lose a battle. He"s gonna fight and he"s gonna lose. But what makes him a man, is that in the midst of that battle he does not lose himself."  Eric Taylor, Friday Night Lights
"Everybody is a genius. But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will live its whole life believing that it is stupid." - Albert Einstein
"She wasn't doing a thing that I could see, except standing there leaning on the balcony railing, holding the universe together." - J. D. Salinger, "A Girl I Knew"
"A new form of thinking is essential if mankind is to survive and move toward higher levels." - Albert Einstein
"Only a few businesses will succeed by having the lowest price, so most will need a strategy that includes customer services." - Bill Gates
"To win big, you sometimes have to take big risks." - Bill Gates
"We rise in glory as we sink in pride." -Andrew Young
"Time isn't wasted, when you're getting wasted" - Asher Roth
"We do not act rightly because we have virtue or excellence, but we rather have those because we have acted rightly."  Aristotle
"Democracy would only remain in the minds and on paper, if among its supporters there were no really power-loving natures, for which the people were just an object and the ideals-means to an end."-Oswald Spengler
"One second not equals to Billions of Dollars".
"The only certainty is that nothing is certain." - Pliny the Elder
"What gift do you carry secretly inside of you that none of us knows about? Whatever it is, we need it! It will require pain to bring it forth, but that's what makes it so valuable. - Jonathan Puddle"
"Be faithful to that which exists within yourself." - Andre Gide
"Vast majority of the countries of the world view Russia as a natural guarantor of global stability and defender of values such as rule of international law, central role of UN, sovereign equality of states and respect for their right to determine their future"  S Lavrov (Russian Foreign Minister)
"The difference between winning and losing is most often not quitting." Walt Disney
"Unless your intention no quote will change you"
"There is nothing scarier than an ambitious lawyer." - Anonymous
"Hard work alone gives us Satisfaction".
"Being Responsible at your Work not only enhances your Workability but also increases your Dignity." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Confidence has no Competition" - Anonymous
" Although I may describe love, when I experience it I'm speechless"- rumi
"If you understand comedy, you understand life, Drama, death, tragedy  everybody has these. But with humour you've got all these, and the antidote. You have found the answer." - Eric Sykes, English writer, comedian and actor [b.4 May 1923 - d.4 July 2012]
"Life is in the pause"- Black Dog
"Small Mistake will lead to big Mistake".
"You are your own friend as well as enemy." - Bhagavad Gita
"One question that gets me hazy: am I or are they the one who is crazy" -Albert Einstein
"Curiosity will conquer fear even more than bravery will." - James Stephens
"To those of you who received honors, awards and distinctions, I say well done. And to the C students, I say you, too, can be president of the United States."- 43rd U.S. President
"Of course I talk to myself. I like a good speaker, and I appreciate an intelligent audience." - Dorothy Parker
"Yea, all things live forever, though at times they sleep and are forgotten." -H. Rider Haggard
"Be humble and don't be proud "it will take you to the top of the happiness.
"If you're down, smile, and smile until you have a reason to smile"
"Honest people are a refuge: You know they mean what they say." - Sam Harris, Lying
"A proud man is always looking down on things and people; and, of course, as long as you are looking down, you cannot see something that is above you." - C.S. Lewis, Mere Christianity
"The real hopeless victims of mental illness are to be found among those who appear to be most normal. Many of them are normal because they are so well adjusted to our mode of existence, because their human voice has been silenced so early in their lives." -- Aldous Huxley
"Keep your eyes on the stars, and your feet on the ground." - Theodore Roosevelt
"The degree of civilization in a society can be judged by entering its prisons." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Life is short and there will always be dirty dishes, so let's dance."  James Howe (Totally Joe)
"Monsters are real, and ghosts are real too. They live inside us, and sometimes, they win." -Stephen King
"And above all things, never think that you're not good enough yourself. A man should never think that. My belief is that in life people will take you at your own reckoning" - Issac Asimov
"If you"re worried about something, ask yourself if there is anything you can do about it. If yes, do it! If no, stop worrying." -My Grandfather
"The truest things rarely have to be spoken." -Unknown
"Love betters what is best." - William Wordsworth
"If you're willing to break up over an ice sculpture, you guys should absolutely not get married. Because who gets to choose the ice sculpture, who should take out the trash, who has to stay home and make the mini pizzas, that's the little stuff.
"If it ain't broke, don't fix it." - Yours Truly
"Losing is not the end of the world. Not knowing what you believe and not caring about it enough to fight for it? That's the worst thing in the world." --- Trey Gowdy
"The outcome of any serious research can only be to make two questions grow where only one grew before" - Thorstein Veblen
...
"I don't run from my problems. I sit on my couch, play on my phone and ignore them like all other adults." - Unknown
"I think confidence is silent and insecurity is loud. America is the most powerful country in all of human history, everybody knows it, and we don"t need to show it off."  Sen. John Kennedy (R-La.), 2018
"I mean, I'm tripping balls here." - Elon Musk
be the change you want to see in the world"
'The price good men pay for indifference to public affairs is to be ruled by evil men.'- Plato
"No act of kindness is random."
"Have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow know what you truly want to become" - Steve Jobs
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow, Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The more you you explain it, the more I don't understand it" - Mark Twain
#Climate change is real
"He who knows only his own side of the case, knows little of that." -- John Stuart Mill
"Faith is the bird that feels the light when the dawn is still dark." - Rabindranath Tagore
"It"s not about ideas. It"s about making ideas happen." (-Scott Belsky)
"When buffeted and beaten by life's storms
"Its not how hard you hit. It"s how hard you get hit... and keep moving forward" - Rocky
"Its not how hard you hit. It"s how hard you get hit... and keep moving forward" - Rocky
"Its not how hard you hit. It"s how hard you get hit... and keep moving forward" - Rocky
"Luck is what happens when preparation meets opportunity" - Seneca
"My life needs editing." Mort Sahl
"There's no excuse for causing our own extinction."  Dr. Sylvia Earle
"Past memories stand still with the time they share, thrive in the present, for soon the present will be the past." -Ross Carter
"Be what you are. This is the first step toward becoming better than you are." - Julius Charles Hare
"True love stories never have endings." __ Richard Bach
"The darkest nights produce the brightest stars."  John Green
"You cannot have a positive life and a negative mind." - Joyce Meyer
"Don't ever take a fence down until you know why it was put up." - Robert Frost
"What you can imagine depends on what you know." - Daniel C. Dennett
"If somebody tells you that there's a rule, break it. That's the only thing that moves things forward." Hans Zimmer
"Don"t look for big things, just do small things with great loveThe smaller the thing, the greater must be our love." - Mother Teresa
"Those who do not move, do not notice their chains.", Rosa Luxumberg
"I am still learning." - Michelangelo
"I'd take the awe of understanding over the awe of ignorance any day."- Douglas Adams,
"Progress is impossible without change. And those who cannot change their mind cannot change anything." George B. Shaw
"You're at a crossroad, Jim. Move backwards in the hopes to move forward, or move forward and hope never to look back."
"Have you ever wondered what a human life is worth? That morning, my brother"s was worth a pocket watch." - Ruta Sepetys, Between Shades of Gray
"Everyone needs a coach. It doesn"t matter whether you"re a basketball player, a tennis player, a gymnast or a bridge player."  Bill Gates
"It isn't the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out; it's the pebble in your shoe." - Muhammad Ali
"And that's still tripping me out. I mean, I'm tripping balls here." -Elon Musk
"And that's still tripping me out. I mean, I'm tripping balls here." Elon Musk
"Forget purpose. It's ok to be happy without one. The quest for a single purpose has ruined many lives." -James Altucher
"When you compare the sorrows of real life to the pleasures of the imaginary one, you will never want to live again, only to dream forever." - Alexandre Dumas, The Count of Monte Cristo
"It"s the job that"s never started takes longest to finish" - old gaffer (J.R.R)
"We are born to love, but die trying to find it." - me (couldn't find other author if there is one)
"Any idiot can face a crisis - it's day to day living that wears you out." - Anton Chekhov
"I don't want to survive. I want to live."  WALL-E
"Sometimes you gotta RUN before you WALK"- Tony Stark(Iron Man)
"To be certain, every day there can be a revelation or a new discovery. I treasure the memory of past misfortunes. It has added more to my bank of fortitude" - Bruce Lee
"Not all those who wander are lost." - J. R. R. Tolkien
"Being brave doesn"t mean you aren"t scared. Being brave means you are scared, really scared, badly scared, and you do the right thing anyway." Neil Gaiman
"There are people who are dancing through Life and others who are crying through Life. The irony is that Life is the samewhat we do is purely our Choice." - RV Vijaya
'The decline of the aperitif may well be one of the most depressing phenomena of our time.' Luis Bunuel
'Request' Looking for a particular quote
"I do know that for the sympathy of one living being, I would make peace with all. I have love in me the likes of which you can scarcely imagine and rage the likes of which you would not believe. If I cannot satisfy the one, I will indulge the other." - "Frankenstein", Mary Shelley
"Only someone who knows how to remain essentially silent can really talk -- and act essentially" - Sren Kierkegaard
"When I was your age, they would say you could become cops or criminals; today what I'm saying to you is this: When facing a loaded gun, what's the difference?" - Frank Costello
"Once you are born in this world you"re old enough to die." Sren Kierkegaard
"A nation can survive its fools, and even the ambitious. But it cannot survive treason from within..." - - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"....Wait without thought, for you are not ready for thought..." -T. S Eliot
"Isn't it enough to see that a garden is beautiful without having to believe that there are fairies at the bottom of it too?" - Douglas Adams
"Do it now, most times later becomes never."
""No" is not a boundary  I can reach the sky" Georgia Girl Scout on CBS Evening News, this evening
"Man is sometimes extraordinarily, passionately, in love with suffering." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"If the freedom of speech is taken away then dumb and silent we may be led, like sheep to the slaughter." George Washington
"Dealing with the temporary frustration of not making progress is an integral part of the path towards excellence. If it was easy, everyone would do it." -Coach Sommer
"Dealing with the temporary frustration of not making progress is an integral path of the path towards excellence. If it was easy, everyone would do it." -Coach Sommer
"He who paints the land blue and the sky green ought to be sterilized" - Adolf Hitler
"You should criticize power even if you agree with it." - Lupe Fiasco
"In the End, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile, but is morally treasonable to the American public. Nothing but the truth should be spoken about him or any one else." Theodore Roosevelt
"When we give up on our dreams, we die while still alive." - Robin Sharma
"It seems we"re so invincible, the truth is so cold"- So Far Away- Avenged Sevenfold
"Every child comes with the message that God is not yet discouraged of man." - Rabindranath Tagore
"Love takes off masks that we fear we cannot live without and know we cannot live within." - James Baldwin
"Love the harvest more than you hate the hard work" - Anon
"Courage isn't having the strength to go on - it is going on when you don't have strength." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"We can fight our enemies now, while we are stronger than they are - or we can wait, and fight them when they are stronger than us." (Who Said This?)
"The greatness of a man is not in how much wealth he acquires, but in his integrity and his ability to affect those around him positively" - Bob Marley
"Idealism is fine, but as it approaches reality, the costs become prohibitive." -- William F. Buckley Jr.
"Climb mountains not so the world can see you, but so you can see the world" - Unknown
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today" - H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
:)
"There was a girl next to me who wasn't beautiful until she smiled and I felt that smile come at me in heat waves following, soaking through my body and out my finger tips in shafts of color and I knew somewhere in the world, somewhere, that there was love for me" -Basketball Diaries - Jim Carrol
"Sometimes the hardest part isn't letting go but rather learning to start over." - Nicole Sobon
"When you"re presented with questions or answers about any problem, you should ask yourself: Do I like this answer? And if you do you should be suspicious, because you"re much more likely to accept something that appeals to you whether it"s right or not."  Lawrence Krauss
"Start where you are. Use what you have. Do what you can."  Arthur Ashe
"The greatest achievements in life are those that were achieved by the exceptional and those who dared to toss normality out the window." -- Unknown
"We've got a very strange God that makes salvation depend on believing in him on bad evidence. If you've lived 2000 years ago, God was performing miracles, there was evidence galore! But, apparently, he's tired of being so helpful now." - Sam Harris
1 Perception is reality; what you believe to be true is [actually] your truth. -Dr. Phil
"There never Was a Good War or a Bad Peace." - Benjamin Franklin
"And God said 'Love Your Enemy,' and I obeyed him and loved myself." - Kahlil Gibran
 When we see our uniqueness as a virtue, only then do we find peace. 
"I believe that oxygen suffices all of us, That's why I breathe and I'm relaxed" - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"There"s nothing wrong with having butterflies as long as you can get them to fly in formation." - Georges St. Pierre
"All for ourselves, and nothing for other people, seems, in every age of the world, to have been the vile maxim of the masters of mankind." -Adam Smith
"Act in such a way that you treat humanity, whether in your own person or in the person of another, always at the same time as an end and never simply as a means." -Immanuel Kant
"All feedback is relevant, even if it's not true." - Ford Taylor
"Three things in human life are important: the first is to be kind; the second is to be kind; and the third is to be kind." -Henry James
"Man is born free, and everywhere he is in chains." - Jean-Jacques Rousseau
"Wrong does not cease to be wrong because the majority share in it." -Leo Tolstoy
"Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent." -Isaac Asimov
"What we learn from History is that no one learns from History" -Otto von Bismarck
"A coward dies a thousand deaths, the gallant never taste of death but once." -Julius Caesar
"There is no point at which you can say, "Well, I'm successful now. I might as well take a nap." Carrie Fisher
"Say What You Mean", An Excerpt from An Antidote To Chaos - Jordan B. Peterson
"Think thousand times before taking a decision, but after taking decision never turn back even if you get thousand difficulties!" -Adolf Hitler
"More people should learn to tell their dollars where to go instead of asking them where they went."  Roger Babson.
"Do what you love and you"ll never work a day in your life."
"Get busy living or get busy dying". Shawshank redemption, 1994.
"As you grow older, you realize it becomes less important to have more friends and more important to have real ones."
"Do something wonderful. People may imitate it." - Albert Schweitzer
"You will never be able to experience everything. So, please, do poetical justice to your soul and simply experience yourself." Albert Camus
"Nations whose nationalism is destroyed are subject to ruin." -Muammar al-Gaddafi
"Those who say religion has nothing to do with politics do not know what religion is." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Selfishness is the only real atheism; aspiration, unselfishness, the only real religion." - Israel Zangwill
"A true leader is not the one with the most followers, but the one who creates the most leaders" - Conversations with God
"The happiness of a man in this life does not consist in the absence but in the mastery of his passions." - Alfred Tennyson
"If we are not free, no one will respect us." | A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal."  Albert Camus
"Be optimistic, exhibit patience, shut your mouth, and execute." Gary Vaynerchuk
"I"m learning to love the sound of my feet walking away from things not meant for me." Unknown
"Hustle until you no longer need to introduce yourself."
"The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion." -Albert Camus
"You believe in incomprehensible, contradictory and impossible things. . ." -Voltaire (Continued)
"No, I don"t accept your apology unless you buy me a bag." - Cardi B
"The greatest act of cleverness is to conceal one's being clever." - Francois de la Rochefoucauld
"A nation that doesn't honor its past, has no future." -Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"I would rather be accused of breaking precedents than breaking promises." -John F. Kennedy
"The whole world seems to live under the banner 'Freedom is wonderful--but only for me.'" -Asimov
"When life gives you lemons, cut them in to wedges and slip them in to vodka tonics." - Tom Haverford
"You don't have to be great to get started, but you have to started to be great." - Les Brown
"Don"t cling to a mistake just because you spent a lot of time making it." - unknown
"Over himself, over his own body and mind, the individual is sovereign." --- John Stuart Mill
"Protect yourself from your own thoughts" Rumi
"The earth is the earth as a peasant sees it, the world is the world as a duchess sees it, and anyway a duchess would be nothing if the earth was not there as the peasant sees it." - Gertrude Stein.
"Photography is an Art of making Subject Alive Forever." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"In our age, there is no such thing as 'keeping out of politics.' All issues are political issues, and politics itself is a mass of lies, evasions, folly, hatred and schizophrenia." - George Orwell
"Death is nothing, but to live defeated and inglorious is to die daily." -Napoleon Bonaparte
"I buy expensive suits, they look cheap on me" - Warren Buffett
"I think that as little girls we are conditioned to believe that cruelty and love somehow have a connection and that is like the sort of era that we need to evolve out of." - Uma Thurman
"We are such stuff As dreams are made on; and our little life Is rounded with a sleep." - Shakespeare
"Gotta have opposites dark and light, light and dark in a painting. It"s like in life. Gots have a little sadness once in a while so you know when the good times come. I"m waiting on the good times now." - Bob Ross
"Gotta have opposites dark and light, light and dark in a painting. It"s like in life. Gots have a little sadness once in a while so you know when the good times come. I"m waiting on the good times now." - Bob Ross
"Gotta have opposites dark and light, light and dark in a painting. It"s like in life. Gots have a little sadness once in a while so you know when the good times come. I"m waiting on the good times now." - Bob Ross
"Just because you want something doesn't mean it won't make you miserable." -Unknown
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile, but is morally treasonable to the American public. " -Theodore Roosevelt
"No detail of life was too small or too humble for him. He appreciated and loved it all." -from the film "Loving Vincent"
"I believe in the sun-even when it does not shine; I believe in love-even when it is not shown; I believe in God-even when He does not speak." - found on a wall of a cellar in a Jewish concentration camp during WWII
"America can always be counted on to do the right thing.... After exhausting all possible alternatives." -Sir Winston Churchill
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power." -Abraham Lincoln
"None are more hopelessly enslaved than those who falsely believe they are free." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"I, myself, am made entirely of flaws, stitched together with good intentions." - Augusten Burroughs
"Saruman believes it is only great power that can hold evil in check. But that is not what I have found. I've found that it is the small things, everyday deeds of ordinary folk that keeps the darkness at bay. Small acts of kindness and love." - Gandalf, "The Hobbit: An Unexpected Journey"
"Each person must live their life as a model for others" - Rosa Parks
" Don't cling to a mistake just because you spent a lot of time making it " - Unknown
"The difference between the strong and weak is the limits of their lives,the strong die fast and early, but the weak die slowly and lives more."
"The first step towards getting somewhere is to decide that you are not going to stay where you are."  J.P. Morgan
"Knowing yourself well allow you to reach deep realization of people minds by talking to them for a short time."
"If the only thing keeping a person decent is the expectation of divine reward, then brother, that person is a piece of shit" -Russ Cole (Matthew McConaughey) in True Detective
"I would point out that Japan's proposal at the Versailles Peace Conference on the principle of racial equality was rejected by delegates such as those from Britain and the United States" - Hideki Tojo
"It was the best of times, it was the worst of times. . ." (Continued)
"I don't make jokes. I just watch the government and report the facts." - Will Rogers
"You"re a leader when you decide to become one. There"s no initiation or a title. Just a decision."
"The songs that you love, the books that you love, the TV that you love, the conversations that you have about people that are kind of nourishing to you, help you  those are your potatoes . . . and you have to have that stuff in order to make it long enough to get back to Earth." - Linda Holmes
"I am no bird; and no net ensnares me; I am a free human being with an independent will." - Charlotte Bronte
"When we see men of a contrary character, we should turn inwards and examine ourselves." -Confucious
"Be with those who bring out the best in you, not the stress in you."
"he is not a lover who does not love forever"-Euripides
"I do not live for what the world thinks of me, but for what I think of myself." - Jack London
"Exercise is like an addiction. Once you're on it, you feel like your body needs it.- Elsa Pataky"
""The reason that most of us are unhappy most of the time is that we set our goals not for the person we"re going to be when we reach them, but we set our goals for the person we are when we set them." _Jim Coudal
"Ideas are easy, implementation is hard" - Guy Kawasaki
"No matter how you feel, get up, dress up, show up, and never give up"-Regina Brett
"Life can only be understood backwards; but it must be lived forwards." - Sren Kierkegaard
"You are a piano, dirtied by the hands of humans; and yet, you hold onto such purity, somehow. There is someone out there, somewhere, who will come along and make the most beautiful music with you."
"I shiver, thinking how easy it is to be totally wrong about people; to see one tiny part of them and confuse it for the whole." Lauren Oliver
"In the depth of winter, I finally learned that within me there lay an invincible summer" -Albert Camus
"I've had recurring nightmares; I was loved for who I am." -Muse, in their song Hoodoo
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." -Mohandas Gandhi
" I will love the light for it shows me the way, yet I will endure the darkness for it shows me the stars. " - Og Mandino
"Walking with a friend in the dark is better than walking alone in the light." - Helen Keller
"Every morning we are born again. What we do today is what matters most"- buddha
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Live like a solider, die like a saint."
"Only in silence the word, only in dark the light, only in dying life: bright the hawk's flight on the empty sky." - Ursula K.Le Guin, A Wizard of Earthsea
"Do not pray for easy life, pray for strength to endure the difficult one" - Bruce Lee
"Strive not to be a success, but rather to be of value"Albert Einstein
"Homelessness is a nationality now" - Margaret Atwood, *Cat's Eye*
"I slept and dreamt that life was joy. I awoke and saw that life was service. I acted and behold, service was joy."  Rabindranath Tagore
"Homelessness is a nationality now." - Margaret Atwood, Cat's Eye
"It's very dangerous to wave to people you don't know because what if they don't have hands? They'll think you're being cocky." - Mitch Hedberg
"The expert in something was once a beginner"
"When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on" - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"There's not an American in this country free until every one of us is free." - Jackie Robinson
"It's not over when you lose, but when you end it"
"I did not know a significant person stretching into bed until late in the morning." - Jonathan Swift
"I only have two hands, but my heart has twenty."
"If you break into my house, I will shoot you. My wife will also shoot you. And then she'll explain for 30 minutes WHY she shot you." -Jeff Foxworthy
"Be amaze of how colorful life is. Live day as if it will be your last, love someone as if he or she won't be with you forever, be kind to strangers as if they are your Family." - Genevieve
"Enjoy the little things in life, one day you'll look back and realize that they were big things" - Sophie Kelly
"Life is not a problem to be solved, but a reality to be experienced." - Soren Kierkegaard
"Evil begins when you begin to treat people as things." - Terry Pratchett
"Normal" is a setting on a washing machine, not a benchmark in society. Be yourself and ignore the noise.- Norm Kelly
"It is not enough to have a good mind; the main thing is to use it well." - Rene Descartes
"Um, thanks, eh, anti-suicide keychain." - Moe Szyslak
"Life begins at the end of your comfort zone" - Neale Donald Walsch
"The greatest ethical test that we're ever going to face is the treatment of those who are at our mercy." -- Lyn White
"Nothing is so strong as gentleness. Nothing is so gentle as real strength." -- Ralph W. Sockman
"Happiness cannot be pursued; it must ensue." Viktor E. Frankl
"It's good to be loved, but profound to be understood" -P. De Rossi
"Now and then it"s good to pause in our pursuit of happiness and just be happy."  My Fortune Cookie
"You only fail when you stop trying."
"The Devil is and Always Will be a Gentleman"
"You cannot carpet the world, but you can wear slippers."
"Test yourself on mankind. It is something that makes the doubter doubt, the believer believe." -Franz Kafka
"They say that the universe does not make sense. But the universe has no obligation to make sense to us, now does it?"
"Both optimists and pessimists contribute to society. The optimist invents the aeroplane, the pessimist the parachute." - George Bernard Shaw
"Doing is the only way to do"
"Never be afraid to be a poppy in a field of daffodils." - Michaela DePrince
"Once you label me you negate me." - Sren Kierkegaard
"Every failure is a step to success." - William Whewell
"Mass genocide is the most exhausting activity anyone can engage in... next to soccer." -Loki, from the movie Dogma
"Where we cannot invent, we may at least improve." - Charles Caleb Colton
"Let us not seek the Republican answer or the Democratic answer, but the right answer. Let us not seek to fix the blame for the past. Let us accept our own responsibility for the future." - John F. Kennedy
"Act as if what you do makes a difference. It does." - William James
"Accept the challenges so that you can feel the exhilaration of victory."  GEORGE S. PATTON
"It's my life to live. I don't owe you an explanation as to how I live it." - Bill Lewis
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"SPEAK only when you feel that your words are better than your SILENCE" - Gautam Buddha
"Don't ruin a good today by thinking about a bad yesterday, let it go"
"I haven't failed, i've just found 10,000 ways that won't work" - Thomas Edison
"Truth is so obscure in these times, and falsehood so established, that, unless we love the truth, we cannot know it." - Blaise Pascal.
"It is difficult to free fools from the chains they revere" - Voltaire
"Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"All Things are Difficult Before they are Easy"  Thomas Fuller
"If, for some reason, we make some big mistake and IBM wins, my personal feeling is that we are going to enter a computer Dark Ages for about twenty years." - Steve Jobs
"Nothing can cure the soul but the senses, just as nothing can cure the senses but the soul." - Oscar Wilde
"When we are wrong, we may admit it to ourselves. And if we are handled gently and tactfully, we may admit it to others and even take pride in our frankness and broad-mindedness. But not if someone else is trying to ram the unpalatable fact down our esophagus." - Dale Carnegie
"The minute you think of giving up, think of the reason why you held on so long" - Vaibhav More
"You can and inevitably will be surprised by your own ability. It is often not a question of 'can' you do it. The learning. The work. The achievement. It is instead a question of 'will' you." -Avery Regelman
"It"s a slow process, but quitting won"t speed it up."
"It's not 'If I can't be happy, then no one can'. It's 'If I can't be happy, then I can make others happy.'"
"You can, and eventually will be surprised by your own ability. Often times, it is less of a question of 'can' you. The learning. The work. The achievement. It is usually a question of 'will' you." -Avery Regelman
"Violence is man re-creating himself." - Frantz Fanon
"...to be loved is worth monogamy." Will Durant
"The hottest place in hell is reserved for those who stand by in times of great moral conflict." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"I can't give you a sure-fire formula for success, but I can give you a formula for failure: try to please everybody all the time." - Herbert Bayard Swope
"It's really hard to design products by focus groups. A lot of times, people don't know what they want until you show it to them." - Steve Jobs
"A life without a pug is possible, but pointless." -Loriot (German humorist)
"God gives us life, but the world's landlord is the devil"-Zafn
"It is certain, in any case, that ignorance, allied with power, is the most ferocious enemy justice can have." - James Baldwin
"To be prepared for war is one of the most effective means of preserving peace." - George Washington
"Don't try to be fearless. ... Just try to prevent fear from making your decisions for you." - Chris Guillebeau
"Go for it now. The future is promised to no one" -WAYNE DYER
"I"m really rich.", Donald Trump
"Americans are dreamers, too!" President Donald J. Trump
"Pride is the mask of one's own faults." -Jewish proverb
"I made an app with all quotes", Me
" We don't arrange people in our hearts, their deeds do " - Andrei Tarkovsky
"To love someone deeply gives you strength. Being loved by someone deeply gives you courage." - Lao Tzu
"Your frontal cortex isn"t even developed yet." -Joe Rogan
"I am not a product of my circumstances. I am a product of my decisions." - Stephen Covey
"Man will never be free until the last king is strangled with the entrails of the last priest" - Denis Diderot
"I am not a product of my circumstances. I am a product of my decisions."
"The truth will set you free. But not until it is finished with you." David Foster Wallace
"...frightful, and painfully, and disagreeably human." Queen Victoria on seeing an orangutan in London zoo, 1842
"A party without cake is just a meeting." - Julia Child
"Hadn't one of my all-time favorite reveries been to become a cranky hermit, live unperturbed in my house, and have things brought to me like a monarch or tribal lord?" - Laurie Notaro
"Humanity does not ask us to be happy. It merely asks us to be brilliant on its behalf." - Orson Scott Card
"Great minds discuss ideas, average ones discuss events, and small minds discuss people." Eleanor Roosevelt
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." - Mark Twain
"Unless your work gives you trouble, it is no good." -Victor Hugo
"Our virtues and our failings are inseparable, like force and matter. When they separate, man is no more." -Nikola Tesla
"A single day is enough to make us a little larger." - Paul Klee
"Better to be a Warrior in a Garden that a Gardener in a War"  Sun Tzu
'Every blessing ignored becomes a curse' - Pauli coelho - the alchemist
"There's no better feeling in the world than a warm pizza box on your lap." -Kevin James
"Hatred is never ended by hatred but by love" -Buddha
"It is odd to watch with what feverish ardour Americans pursue prosperity, ever tormented by the shadowy suspicion that they might not have chosen the shortest route to get it..." Alexis de Tocqueville
"Winter must be cold for those with no warm memories."
"There is always something to learn from every person you meet in your life." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Just as there is no such thing as a collective or racial mind, so is there no such thing as a collective or racial achievement. There are only individual minds and individual achievements." -Ayn Rand, The Virtue of Selfishness, 127
"Man stands face to face with the irrational. He feels within him his longing for happiness and for reason. The absurd is born of this confrontation between the human need and the unreasonable silence of the world." - Albert Camus
"Paranoia happens when lies overshadow trust."-Fredrick Njoroge
"Some people have a way with words, and other people...oh, uh, not have way." - Steve Martin
"Wars start when two parties haven't taken the time to learn each other's tongues." - Tomson Highway
"Battle is the most magnificent competition in which a human being can indulge. It brings out all that is best; it removes all that is base. All men are afraid in battle. The coward is the one who lets his fear overcome his sense of duty. Duty is the essence of manhood." - George S. Patton
"Battle is the most magnificent competition in which a human being can indulge. It brings out all that is best; it removes all that is base. All men are afraid in battle. The coward is the one who lets his fear overcome his sense of duty. Duty is the essence of manhood." - George S. Patton
"It is man that makes truth great, not truth that makes man great." -Confucius
" Whenever men and women straighten their backs up, they are going somewhere, because a man can't ride your back unless it is bent " - Martin Luther King Jr.
"When you're attacking FBI agents because you're under criminal investigation, you're losing." - Sarah Huckabee Sanders
"The FBI's secret plan to elect Hillary Clinton by holding a press conference..." -Matthew Yglesias
"I love nature partly because she is not a man, but a retreat from him" - Henry David Thoreau
"If you must break the law, do it to seize power; in all other cases observe it." Julius Caesar
"It"s not the years in your life that count. It"s the life in your years." - Edward J. Stieglitz
"None are more enslaved than those who believe they are free." -Goethe
"Courage is not the absence of fear, but rather the judgment that something else is more important than one's fear." - Ambrose Hollingworth Redmoon
"Stop what you are doing. Go outside and breathe. The world will not end if you take ten minutes for yourself" - cwote
"The goal is not to be perfect by the end. The goal is to be better today." (-Simon Sinek)
"If you are lonely when you are alone, you are in bad company." - Jean Paul Sartre
"We are so lonely in life that we must ask ourselves if the loneliness of dying is not a symbol of our human existence"-Emil Cioran
"Man was born free, and he is everywhere in chains" -Jean-Jacques Rousseau
11 powerful ways to make 2018 successful &amp; fulfilling!
"Do the one thing you think you cannot do. Fail at it. Try again. Do better the second time. The only people who never tumble are those who never mount the high wire. This is your moment. Own it." -Oprah Winfrey
"The 4 Hour Work Week was rejected 27 times" -Tim Ferris
"Every dictatorship is based on altruism." - Ayn Rand
"The thing that causes religion is a class war. If there were no rich , no poor , if everyone were equal , religion would be soon to disappear. People only develop religion when they're unhappy with this world." - Jim Jones
"I have the strong feeling that, should the time come for me, having had no role in my birth, I would like there to be a choice I might make about how I die".  Sir Patrick Stewart
"Ever since World War I, superior force is no longer measured in terms of men or horses, but in the means to wreak destruction." - Saul David
"The moment you're ready to quit is usually the moment right before the miracle happens. Don't give up."
"Apologies are great, but they don"t really change anything. You know what does? Action."  Stella Young
"Live your life as though your every act were to become a universal law." - Immanuel Kant
"Men and melons are hard to know." Benjamin Franklin
"Count each day as a separate life." Marcus Annaeus Seneca
"The general idea of the rich helping the poor, I think, is important." - Bill Gates
"You can't blame everyone else for who you are as there are no others. There is only one being, your imagination, or as some call it: God." -Anonymous
"You can't blame everyone else for who you are, for there are no others, there is only one, your imagination, or as some call it: God." -Anonymous
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing." - Plato
"Destiny is usually around the corner. Like a thief, a hooker, or a lottery vendor: it's three most common personifications. But what destiny does not do is home visits. You have to go for it yourself"-carlos zafn
"Why am I as I am? To understand that of any person, his whole life, from Birth must be reviewed. All of our experiences fuse into our personality. Everything that ever happened to us is an ingredient." - Malcolm X
"Now remember, Kif, the quickest way to a girl's bed is through her parents. Have sex with them and you're in." -Zapp Brannigan
"To be Modern is Essential, but without Losing your Mind." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"What luck for rulers that men do not think." -Adolf Hitler
"You never know how strong you are until being strong is the only choice you have" - Bob Marley
[Those Who Mind Don"t Matter, and Those Who Matter Don"t Mind](https://quoteinvestigator.com/2012/12/04/those-who-mind/), anonymous
"Those Who Mind Don"t Matter, and Those Who Matter Don"t Mind" , anonymous, not Dr. Zuess
"Peace at home, peace in the world." -Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
"The more you know, the more you know you don't know." - Aristotle
"We can change our lives. We can do, have, and be exactly what we wish." - Tony Robbins
"Never hate your enemies. It affects your judgment." -Mario Puzo
"Be soft. Do not let the world make you hard. Do not let pain make you hate. Do not let the bitterness steal your sweetness. Take pride that even though the rest of the world may disagree, you still believe it to be a beautiful place." - Kurt Vonnegut
'Never go to bed angry, stay awake and plot your revenge - Author Unknown
"How can we avoid the two extremes: too great bossism in giving orders, and practically no orders given?...My solution is to depersonalize the giving of orders, to unite all concerned in a study of the situation, to discover the law of the situation and obey that." -Mary Parker Follett
"Indifference and neglect often do much more damage than outright dislike." - J.K. Rowling
"You cannot teach a man anything; you can only help him to find it within himself" - Galileo
"Nothing diminishes anxiety faster than action." Walter Anderson
"Nothing diminishes anxiety faster than action." Walter Anderson
"I"m not much, but I am all I have." Unknown
"Happiness is dependent on self-discipline. We are the biggest obstacles to our own happiness. It is much easier to do battle with society and with others than to fight our own nature." - Dennis Prager
10 Best Motivational Quotes
"I don't study to know more, but to ignore less" - Juana Ines de la Cruz
"Having big tits because your fat is like having a fast ca because it's falling off a cliff"
"Pain is a part of life. We cannot eliminate it nor do we want to. The pain will guide you" - A German anesthesiologist
"If life has treated you like trash and you still make an effort to be a good person, I appreciate you. Thank you." Unknown
"The two most important days in your life are the day you are born and the day you find out why." -Mark Twain
"There need be no value hierarchy among the needs." --A.H. Maslow, from Motivation and Personality, 1954
"... there was maybe 30 seconds of fun that happened over and over and over and over again. And so, if you can get 30 seconds of fun, you can pretty much stretch that out to be an entire game." - Jaime Griesemer
"A little understanding, a little tolerance, and a little fun. You will be amazed when you see how you can relax yourself on the back of this planet!"- Somerset Mom .
"A little understanding, a little tolerance, and a little fun. You will be amazed when you see how you can relax yourself on the back of this planet!"-Somerset Mom
"The real gift of gratitude is that more grateful you are, the more present you become."-Robert Holden
"If you want to be happy, be." - Leo Tolstoy
"Experience is simply the name we give our mistakes." - Oscar Wilde
"He who has not yet reached the opposite shore should not make fun of him who is drowning." - West African Proverb.
"Pride is pleasure arising from a man's thinking too highly of himself."
"When you have to shoot, shoot, don't talk". - Eli Wallach (The Ugly), The Good, The Bad and The Ugly
"Don"t compare yourself with anyone in this world. If you do so, you are insulting yourself."  Bill Gates
"Decide if something is a dream or a goal because a dream is something you fantasize about that will probably never happen. A goal is something you set a plan for, work toward, and achieve." -Triple H
"The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting." - Sun Tzu, The Art of War
"Love doesn"t need a reason. Pure Love will come from the heart without reason.
"The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion." - Ernest Hemingway
"Without wearing any mask we are conscious of, we have a special face for each friend." - Oliver Wendell Holmes, Sr.
"No greater damage could be done to our economy or to our society than to attempt to 'professionalize' management by 'licensing' managers, for instance, or by limiting access to management to people with a special academic degree." --Peter Drucker, The Practice of Management, 1954.
"Let me never fall into the vulgar mistake of dreaming that I am persecuted whenever I am contradicted." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"If you were absent during my struggle, don't expect to be there in my success" - Will Smith
"The key to successful leadership today is influence, not authority." - Ken Blanchard
"If you can overcome the learning curve you'll be able to avoid any danger, however severe" -Whis
"Reality is shaped by the forces that destroy it." - D. Harlan Wilson
"Seek joy in these last precious moments." - The Voice, Furi (Video Game)
"Life is weird. But you know what's weirder than life? The fact that we find life weird. Because how can that be if life is the only thing we know?"
"There is no reciprocity. Men love women, women love children, children love hamsters." - Alice Thomas Ellis
"Limitations exist if you let them" - Vaibhav More
"I prayed to the gods for a horse, the gods never answered. So I stole one instead." -The theif, Immortals (2011)
"How bold one gets when one is sure of being loved." -Sigmund Freud
"Muddy water is best cleared by leaving it alone." - Alan W. Watts
"No man has a good enough memory to be a successful liar" - Abraham Lincoln
"I've given Truman the chance to lead a normal life. The world, the place you live in is the sick place. Seahaven is the way the world should be." - The Truman Show
"When you reach the end of your rope, tie a knot in it and hang on."-Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere." -Martin Luther King
" The consequences of our actions are the scarecrows of fools, and the beacons of wise men. "
"People do not seem to realize that their opinion of the world is also a confession of character." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Nature doesn't ask your permission; it doesn't care about your wishes, or whether you like its laws or not. You're obliged to accept it as it is, and consequently all its results as well." - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"The secret to leaving any toxic situation like an abusive relationship, a bad job, a one-sided friendship, etc is confidence in yourself, independent mindset, respect for self, a dash of selfishness, reasonable amount of pride and divorce of the dependency syndrome." - Kristopher
"A person who does not have beauty inside own heart only in proportion loves to get admired of own outside beautiful looks from the people." - Anuj Kumar
"There is no greater hell than one's own mind"
(Jean Anouilh) Our entire life - consists ultimately in accepting ourselves as we are.
"Do not fear the winds of adversity. Remember, a kite rises against the wind rather than with it." Unknown
"When you're falling off a cliff, flap your arms... you've got nothing to lose" --D Benson
"Behind every young child who believes in himself is a parent who believed first." Matthew L. Jacobson
"When you sling mud at another person, you not only get your hands dirty, you also lose ground." - Ravi Zacharias
"Relationships are about taking a leap of faith. That"s why it"s called jumping in."
"Accuracy takes precedence over speed." - J. Michael Plaxco, Plaxco's Shooting Principles No. One
"A father is a reality-concealing machine, a machine for dishing up lies to kids, and that isn't even the worst of it: secretly he believes that he represents reality." - Yukio Mishima, The Sailor Who Fell from Grace with the Sea
"There are wounds that never show on the body that are deeper and more hurtful than anything that bleeds." - Laurell K Hamilton
"Good design is obvious. Great design is transparent."  Joe Sparano
"Create your own visual style let it be unique for yourself and yet identifiable for others."  Orson Welles
"Stupidity is ignorance in the face of evidence." - Myself
"If you think math is hard, try web design." -Trish Parr
"If everyone gave one thread, the poor man would have a shirt." - Russian Proverb
"Experience is a harsh teacher; first comes the test, second comes the lesson" - Jigsaw
"We struggle for the goal but after achieving it realize that the road was beautiful than destiny and so is life"- Anonymous
"Do I love you? My God, if your love were a grain of sand, mine would be a universe of beaches." - William Goldman, The Princess Bride
"Chains of habit are too light to be felt, until they are too heavy to be broken." Warren Buffett
"Without courage, wisdom bears no fruit." - Baltasar Gracian
"They laugh at me because I'm different. I laugh at them because they're all the same" - The Joker
"Favored above Kings and Emperors is the stillborn child" - Mark Twain
"I like the seas as they are. It doesn't have to happen. You don't have to test everything to destruction just to see if you made it right." -Neil Gaiman and Terry Pratchett, Good Omens
"A true friend is the most precious of all possessions and the one we take the least thought about acquiring." - Francois de La Rochefoucauld
"Learning is more important than Earning." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"It's only after we've lost everything that we're free to do anything." -Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"it is far better for a man to go wrong in freedom than to go right in chains" - Thomas Henry Huxley
"The hunger for love is much more difficult to remove than the hunger for bread." - Mother Teresa
"Oh comforting solitude, how favorable thou art to original thought!" - Santiago Ramn y Cajal
"You always admire what you really don't understand." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"Better never to have met you in my dream than to wake and reach for hands that are not there."- tomo No Yakamochi
"What would you do if you weren"t afraid?" Unknown
"The light at the end of the tunnel is a train waiting to run you over" -Myself
"Follow the money, you'll have anything. Follow your passion, you'll need nothing"
"Your Dreams May Seem Unimportant To People, But As Long As You Believe In Yourself, You Don't Have To Trade Your Passion For their Approval !"
"If somebody tells you that there's a rule, break it. That's the only thing that moves things forward." -Hans Zimmer
"No one is free, even the birds are chained to the sky" - Bob Dylan
"Everything we see hides another thing, we always want to see what is hidden by what we see." -Ren Magritte
"We all bear scars,... Mine just happen to be more visible than most."- Sarah J. Maas
"All your life you will be conditioned to die. And for the most part, you'll be happy." - Anonymous.
"All your life you will be conditioned to die, and you'll be happy for the most part of it." - Anonymous.
"Mediation, because some questions can"t be answered by Google." -- Unknown
"you were my hearts desire before you were known to me"-Ovid
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." - Aristotle
"Read not to contradict and confute; nor to believe and take for granted; nor to find talk and discourse; but to weigh and consider."  Francis Bacon
"Kanye is my bitch." Stuart Copeland
"In times of extremes, extremists win. Their ideology becomes a religion, anyone who doesn't puppet their views is seen as an apostate, a heretic or a traitor, and moderates in the middle are annihilated. - Margaret Atwood
"Enlightenment is when the wave realizes it is the ocean" - Thich Nhat Hanh
"You can't fix stupid, so why get mad about it?" (-Brian Jawahir)
"Whenever an ideologue makes a character judgement that judgement is almost always true about themselves"-Sargon
"The sole meaning of life is to serve humanity." - Leo Tolstoy
"If you don"t do it this year, you"ll be one year older when you do." - Warren Miller
"You may see me struggle but you will never see me quit."
"Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending."-Maria Robinson
"What on earth could be more luxurious than a sofa, a book, and a cup of coffee?" - Anthony Trollope
"There is no love sincerer than love food" - George Bernard Shaw
"Times have not become more violent. They have just become more televised." - Marilyn Manson
"You want a friend in Washington? Get a dog..." President Harry Truman
"Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player that struts and frets his hour upon the stage and then is heard no more: it is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing." - Shakespeare
"When I do good, I feel good. When I do bad, I feel bad. That's my religion." -AbrahamLincoln
"To be able to think, you have to risk being offensive." - Jordan Peterson
"I made myself speak without thinking. This was the only way I could sound human." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"If you pick the right people and give them the opportunity to spread their wingsand put compensation as a carrier behind ityou almost don't have to manage them."  Jack Welch
"If your actions inspire others to dream more, learn more, do more and become more, you are a leader." - John Quincy Adams
"Everyone that you fight is not your enemy and everyone who helps you is not your friend." - Mike Tyson.
"Each has his past shut in him like the leaves of a book known to him by heart and his friends can only read the title." - Virginia Woolf
"It is good that war is terrible, otherwise men would grow fond of it." - General Robert E. Lee
"We have to continually be jumping off cliffs and developing our wings on the way down." (-Kurt Vonnegut)
"What the human being is best at doing is interpreting all new information so that their prior conclusions remain intact." - Warren Buffett
"We are the children of children and we live as we are shown." - John Patrick Shanley (Joe Versus the Volcano)
"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have."
"Anyone who has ever looked into the glazed eyes of a soldier dying on the battlefield will think hard before starting a war.." Otto Von Bismarck
"As an optimist i don't think i have a drinking problem, i have a drinking opportunity" - Stephen Colbert
"The noblest art is that of making others happy" - PT Barnum
"Come sleep with me: We won't make Love, Love will make us."  Julio Cortazar
"When we are wrong, we may admit it to ourselves. And if we are handled gently and tactfully, we may admit it to others and even take pride in our frankness and broad-mindedness. But not if someone else is trying to ram the unpalatable fact down our esophagus."  Dale Carnegie
"I tried to make Guinness myself once, at home. I took a loaf of pumpernickel bread, and put it in the blender, and then buried it in the yard for about six weeks. I got sick as a dog." - Conan O'Brian
"Do not raise your children the way your parents raised you; they were born for a different time. " - Ali ibn Abi Talib (599661 A.D.)
"You do not just wake up and become the butterfly - growth is a process" Rupi Kaur
"There are only two means of refuge from the miseries of life Music and Cats!" -Albert Schweitzer
"In yoga, there's this philosophy, 'svaha.' I call it 'Fuck It, let go.'" -Jason Nemer
"Know thy self, know thy enemy. A thousand battles, a thousand victories." - Sun Tzu
"libraries were full of ideas perhaps the most dangerous and powerful of all ideas" - Sarah J Maas
"The optimist thinks this is the best of all possible worlds. The pessimist fears it is true. " - J. Robert Oppenheimer
"Wicked men obey from fear; good men, from love." -Aristotle
"When things go wrong, you"ll find they usually go on getting worse for some time; but when things once start to go right they often go on getting better and better."
"If they can make penicillin out of moldy bread, they can sure make something out of you." -- Muhammad Ali
"We all do no end of feeling, and we mistake it for thinking." -- Mark Twain
"Digital design is like painting, except the paint never dries." -Neville Brody
"Graphic design will save the world right after rock and roll does." David Carson
"The alternative to good design is always bad design. There is no such thing as no design."  Adam Judge
'Your life is the most "choose-your-own" adventure that you'll get. Play it how you want to.'
"Travelling is not just seeing the new; it is also leaving behind. Not just opening doors; also closing them behind you, never to return." - Jan Myrdal
"Die partei ist Hitler! Hitler aber ist Deutschland wie Deutschland Hitler ist! Hitler, Sieg Heil! Sieg Heil! Sieg Heil!" - Rudolf Hess
"Anything can happen, but it usually doesn't." - Robert Benchley
"I don't know half of you half as well as I should like; and I like less than half of you half as well as you deserve." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Love and work are the cornerstones of our humanness." -Freud
"Go on and do your work. Do it well. It is all you can do." -Ursula K. Le Guin
"Silence, darkness and these countless familiar scents and the warmth of the land had become (in their way) as necessary to him as air." -description of Stephen Maturin from Master and Commander
"Am I entitled to my ego if my ego has manufactured impressive results?" - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"With identity the decisions revolves around who is saying what and not what they're saying." -moot
"Always, over and over, these days and nights will come, the anxiety, the aversion, the doubt. And I will still live, and I will still love life." Hermann Hesse
"The difference between the novice and the master is that the master has failed more times than the novice has tried." - Koro-sensei-Ansatsu Kyoushitsu/Assasination Classroom
"Mozart, Beethoven, and Chopin never died. They simply became their music."
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees Opportunity In Every Difficulty." -Winston Churchill
"Time moves in one direction, memory in another." William Gibson
"Courage is the fear to proceed despite all adversity. For without the strength and determination to live your own life, you will remain always in the shadow of another. Stand up and be yourself. It's all you have." -- Bill Lewis
"Courage is the fear to proceed despite all adversity. For without the strength and determination to live your own life, you will always remain in the shadow of another. Stand up and be yourself. It's all you have." -- Bill Lewis
"You and the world are not two separate entities with separate problems; you and the world are one" - Krishnamurti
"As soon as I had seen her, I was lost. For Beauty's wound is sharper than any weapon's, and it runs through the eyes down to the soul. It is through the eye that love's wound passes, and I now became a prey to a host of emotions."-Achilles Tatius
"The human mind is a lot like the human egg, and the human egg has a shut-off device. When one sperm gets in, it shuts down so the next one can"t get in" - Charlie Munger
"The human mind is a lot like the human egg, and The human egg has a shut-off device. When one sperm gets in, it shuts down so the next one can"t get in" - Charlie Munger
"Travelling is not just seeing the new; it is also leaving behind. Not just opening doors; also closing them behind you, never to return." - Jan Myrdal
"Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great." - Mark Twain.
"Nobody walks a difficult path without stumbling now and again." - Tam al'Thor [Brandon Sanderson/Robert Jordan --Towers of Midnight]
"Love doesn't just sit there, like a stone; it has to be made, like bread, remade all the time, made new. - Ursula K. LeGuin
"There's probably infinite dimensions, but I'm here with you, in this one, so why would I try to find them?" -Neil Hilborn
"People do not seem to realize that their opinion of the world is also a confession of their character." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The city is tired, the houses are tired, the stones are tired. We are not tired." _Unknown Red Army Soldier
"The arc of the moral universe is long, but it bends towards justice." -Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Perfection is achieved not when there is nothing to add, but when there is nothing to be removed.." Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"The future is predetermined by the character of those who shape it." - Davos
"Here is a lesson in creative writing. First rule: Do not use semicolons. They are transvestite hermaphrodites representing absolutely nothing. All they do is show you've been to college." -Kurt Vonnegut
"One person can make a difference, and everyone should try" - JFK
"You don't need to know everything. Everything you need to know will come to you when you need to know it. If you fail or make a mistake then you needed to know that." - Alan Watts
"Build a man a fire, and he'll be warm for a day. Set a man on fire, and he'll be warm for the rest of his life" - Terry Pratchett
"I wondered if that was how forgiveness budded, not with the fanfare of epiphany, but with pain gathering its things, packing up, and slipping away unannounced in the middle of the night." - Khaled Hosseini, The Kite Runner
"The longer you look back, the farther you can look forward." _Winston Churchill
"Nobody talks about the most important equation in particle physics; Love multiplied by Jesus equals Salvation" -Albert Einstein
[request] quote about being healthy to the grave
"Prayer is not asking. It is a longing of the soul. It is daily admission of one"s weakness. It is better in prayer to have a heart without words than words without a heart." - Mahatma Gandhi
"It is possible to commit no mistakes and still lose. That is not a weakness; that is life" - Jean-Luc Picard
"The poet only asks to get his head into the heavens. It is the logician who seeks to get the heavens into his head. And it is his head that splits." -Gilbert Keith Chesterton
"Don't let what you are, stop you from being what you could be" -Jordan B. Peterson
"Ironically, sometimes doing nothing at all is the most efficient way to respond to a crisis."
"You have to be willing to lose your life in order to find it" -Jordan B. Peterson
"It is not how smart you are, it is how you are smart." -Howard Gardner
"Discovery consists of seeing what everybody has seen and thinking what nobody else has thought." - Jonathan Swift
"Still, still to hear her tender-taken breath, And so live everor else swoon to death."-John Keats
"A man will renounce any pleasures you like but he will not give up his suffering." - G.
"Train people well enough so they can leave, treat them well enough so they don't want to." - Richard Branson
"I am out with lanterns, looking for myself." Emily Dickinson
"In politics, stupidity is not a handicap." -Napoleon Bonaparte
"It was never because of my strengths that I won. I won because I accepted my weaknesses." - AGodNotToBeNamed
"No regrets and yet every regret'" -Lagertha
"Sometimes, the thing you didn't expect is what you really wanted after all. Maybe the best thing to do is stop trying to figure out where you're going and just enjoy where you're at." - JD, Scrubs
"We don't know enough about life to know what the good news is and the bad news is, we pretend to know and act on it" -Kurt Vonnegut
"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal." - Albert Camus
"The difference between successful people and very successful people is that very successful people say 'no' to almost everything " - Warren Buffet
"We lie best when we lie to ourselves." Stephen King
"I am searching for the bones of your father but cannot distinguish them from those of a slave."  Diogenes of Sinope (as he was asked by Alexander the Great what he was doing when staring into a pile of bones)
"Tolerance and apathy are the last virtues of a dying society." Aristotle
"But would if you miss" - Cortana "I won"t" - John117
"Every adversity, every failure, every heartache carries with it the seed of an equal or greater benefit." - Napoleon Hill
"Know where you stand in someones life. If it's at the bottom, stand somewhere else" - Optimum1997
"I am never happier than when I am alone in a foreign city; it is as if I had become invisible." - Storm Jameson
"Whatever you are physically....--all those things matter less than what your heart contains. If you have the soul of a warrior, you are a warrior. All those other things, they are the glass that contains the lamp, but you are the light inside it." -Cassandra Clare, The Clockwork Prince
"It's like being sick all the time, I think...
"It's like being sick all the time, I think....
"Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much." - Oscar Wilde
[Help] Need to find a quote on assassination plans or something like it
"From a lover to a life, the one thing you'll never get back is a moment." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"At its height, the state of being in love threatens to obliterate the boundaries between ego and object."-Sigmund Freud
"I think about life And I think about death And neither one particularly appeals to me"
"No act of kindness, no matter how small, is ever wasted." - Aesop
"Monday is the perfect day to correct last week's mistakes"
"If you are meditating and a devil arrives, make the devil meditate." - G.
"They say don't judge a book by it's cover. Well the real problem is most people can't read worth shit."
[request]. I can't remember who said it but I remember the gist. Anyone remember?
"There is nothing either good or bad, but thinking makes it so." - Shakespeare
"Most folks are about as happy as they make up their minds to be." - Abe Lincoln
"Sometimes the road less traveled is less traveled for a reason." - Jerry Seinfeld
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names. " -John F. Kennedy
"That's how it goes, you think you're on top of the world, and suddenly they spring Armageddon on you." -Neil Gaiman and Terry Pratchett, Good Omens
"From each according to his ability, to each according to his needs" - Karl Marx
"Don't let the mistakes and disappointments of the past control and direct your future." Zig Ziglar
"Nothing haunts us like the things we don't say."  Mitch Albom
"The literal meaning of life is whatever you're doing that prevents you from killing yourself"-Unknown
"We become what we think about most of the time and that's the strangest secret." -- Earl Nightingale
"Above all, don"t lie to yourself. The man who lies to himself and listens to his own lie comes to a point that he cannot distinguish the truth within him, or around him, and so loses all respect for himself and for others."  Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"Science is organized knowledge. Wisdom is organized life." - Immanuel Kant
"There's a grain of truth in every joke."
"Those very philosophers even in the books which they write about despising glory, put their own names on the title-page. In the very act of recording their contempt for renown and notoriety, they desire to have their own names known and talked of." Cicero
"The bureaucracy is expanding to meet the needs of the expanding bureaucracy." - Oscar Wilde
"Tell me to what you pay attention and I will tell you who you are" -Jos ortega y gasset
"Procure for me at once a chariot or a flying carpet or a well-trained dragon, or whatever is usual for royal and noble persons in your land. Then bring me to places where I can get clothes and jewels and slaves fit for my rank. Tomorrow I will begin my conquest of the world." C.S. Lewis
"He who has a why to live for can bear almost any how." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Kidness makes you the most beautiful person in the world no matter what you look like".
"Create enough hunger and everyone becomes a criminal" - Ra's al Ghul
"He is not lonely who takes pride in solitude" -One Punch Man
"If a man does not keep pace with his companions, perhaps it is because he hears a different drummer. Let him step to the music which he hears, however measured or far away" -Thoreau
"Before you speak, listen. Before you write, think. Before you spend, earn. Before you invest, investigate. Before you criticize, wait. Before you pray, forgive. Before you quit, try. Before you retire, save. Before you die, give." - William A. Ward.
"It's a crime to spend time and energy on art while children are dying in Africa because of a lack of food..." - An Artist
"But love is blind and lovers cannot see the pretty follies that themselves commit"-William Shakespeare
"She was a rebel. She had wild eyes. Her voice was tempting. She had a simple taste  only black. In black she looked the brightest.That woman was a genius in the daytime and a beauty at night. She was both an apple and a snake." "That Goddamn Woman" by Avan T.Garde
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams." - Dr. Seuss
"When a man finds a conclusion agreeable, he accepts it without argument, but when he finds it disagreeable, he will bring against it all the forces of logic and reason."  Thucydides, 460-395 BC
"There's something nice and safe about having money."  E.L. Konigsburg (From the Mixed-Up Files of Mrs Basil E. Frankweiler)
"To learn something new, you need to try new things and not be afraid to be wrong." - Roy T. Bennett
"Laugh as much as you breathe and love as long as you live" - Andrea Levy
"If you are willing to look at another person"s behavior toward you as a reflection of the state of their relationship with themselves rather than a statement about your value as a person, then you will, over a period of time cease to react at all." - Yogi Bhajan
"Failure is success if we learn from it." - Malcolm Forbes
"Imagine that the country is like a dog. The terrorist attacks are like fleas biting the dog, but what the terrorists are really after is not to bite the dog. It"s to have the dog, in an attempt to get the fleas on him, chew himself to pieces." - Dan Carlin
"In spite of everything, I still believe that people are really good at heart." - Anne Frank
"When we look back on history, the progress of Western civilization and human rights is actually founded on the violation of law." -Edward Snowden
"The most basic form of human stupidity is forgetting what we are trying to accomplish" -Friedrich Nietzsche
"When every card in the deck is stacked against you, the only way to win a hand is to break the rules. You beg, borrow, and steal, as the old adage goes, and if you happen to get caught in the act, at least youve gone down fighting the good fight." Paul Auster, The Book of Illusions..
"The art of war is simple enough. Find out where your enemy is. Get at him as soon as you can. Strike him as hard as you can, and keep moving on." - Ulysses S. Grant
"The art of war is simple enough. Find out where your enemy is. Get at him as soon as you can. Strike him as hard as you can, and keep moving on." - Ulysses S. Grant
"No government ever succeeded in changing the moral convictions of its subjects by force." - Lawrence Sullivan "Sully" Ross
"There is only one person who could ever make you happy, and that person is you." David Burns
"A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away." - Antoine de Saint-Exupry https://www.reddit.com/r/Graphic_Design_Quotes/
To bear trials with a calm mind Robs misfortune of its strength and burden.  -Seneca 
"The more I'm let alone and not worried the better I can function" -Ernest Hemingway
"Emotion without reason lets people walk all over you; reason without emotion is a mask for cruelty." - Nalini Singh
"When life leaves us blind, love keeps us kind" -Chester Bennington
"When life leaves us blind, life leaves us kind" -Chester Bennington
"The idea that advanced apes shoot through the air in tubes and sleep with boners all the time make this whole existence hilarious." - /u/DrDisastor
"Remembering that you are going to die is the best way I know to avoid the trap of thinking you have something to lose. You are already naked. There is no reason not to follow your heart." - Steve Jobs
"Everything ends, and it's always sad, but everything begins again too and that's always happy"
"Responsibility, that's what gives life meaning" - Jordan B. Peterson
"The opposite of a true statement is a false statement, but the opposite of a profound truth is usually another profound truth." -Niels Bohr
"Trust is like an eraser, it gets smaller and smaller after every mistake."
"The worst of all deceptions is self-deception" - Plato
"Even a bad weekend is better than a good Monday." -- Bill Lewis
"Until you make the unconscious conscious, it will direct your life and you will call it fate." (-Carl Jung)
"We would accomplish many more things if we did not think of them as impossible." - Vince Lombardi
"Your abusive partner doesn't have a problem with his anger; he has a problem with your anger". - Lundy Bancroft
"Never apologize for how you feel. No one can control how they feel. The sun doesn"t apologize for being the sun. The rain doesn"t say sorry for falling. Feelings just are" - Iain S. Thomas
"No matter how much experience you have, there"s always something new you can learn and room for improvement." - Roy T. Bennett
"Love is not times fool"-William Shakespeare
"I now realize that the circumstances of one"s birth are irrelevant. It"s what you do with the gift of life that makes you who you are."
"Truth  It"s the New Hate Speech: During times of universal deceit, telling the truth becomes a revolutionary act"  George Orwell
"The ending of a person's life is just like the last chapter of a book. It reflects what content was written, the conclusion being happiness or bitterness." - Unknown
"When the world is running down, You make the best of what's still around" - The Police
"When the world is running down You make the best of what's still around" - The Police
"An investment in knowledge always pays the best dividends." - Benjamin Franklin
"The essence of being human is that one does not seek perfection." - George Orwell
"The difference between insanity and belief lies all in the number of believers." - Baron Reiter (Arrow)
"The bad thing is that, killing is crime, otherwise i might have killed many people" -Vaibhav More
'Your only given a little spark of madness, and if you lose that, your nothing' - Robin Williams
"Sex is like boxing. If one of the parties didnt agree to participate, the other one is commiting a crime"- John Oliver
"The most valuable thing is perspective. With it, you can find everything else."
"Act as if you are the controlling force in your life and you will be." -Richard Bandler
"Life is what happens to you while you"re busy making other plans" -John Lennon
"I am not afraid of an army of lions led by a sheep; I am afraid of an army of sheep led by a lion." - Alexander the Great
"Life is like a piano; the white keys represent happiness and the black keys shows sadness. But as you go through life's journey, remember that the black keys also create music." - Ehssan.
"Gamble everything for love, if you are a true human being. If not, leave this gathering." (-Rumi)
"You take people, you put them on a journey, you give them peril, you find out who they really are." - Joss Whedon
"If you"re in the luckiest one per cent of humanity, you owe it to the rest of humanity to think about the other 99 per cent." - Warren Buffett
"There are all these moments you think you won't survive. And then you survive." - David Levithan
"You"re frustrated because you keep waiting for the blooming of flowers of which you have yet to sow the seeds." - Steve Maraboli
"Somebody told me there was no such thing as truth. I said, "If that's the case then why should I believe you?""Lecrae
"If you are not the hero of your own story, then you're missing the whole point of your humanity." - Steve Maraboli
"I can't imagine a person becoming a success who doesn't give this game of life everything hes got." - Walter Cronkite
"Don't watch the clock; do what it does. Keep going." - Sam Levenson
"life has no intrinsic worth, but is kept in motion merely by desire and illusion." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Design research is systematic enquiry."
"If you want to be a doormat you have to lay yourself down first." - Oscar Wilde
"By not following your dreams you"re making it easier for the rest of us to follow it." - Me
"People don't need love. What they need is success in one form or another. It can be love but it needn't be." - Charles Bukowski
"Without music, life would be a mistake."
"I do not like to repeat successes I like to go on to other things." - Walt Disney Company
"Enlightenment is achieved only when, in addition to knowing what an author says, you know what he means and why he says it."  Mortimer J. Adler, How to Read a Book
"When I was a child, I used to pray to God for a bicycle. But then I realized that God doesn"t work in that wayso I stole a bike and prayed for forgiveness!"  Emo Phillips
"Life is not a spectator sport, and if your watching you'll watch it go on without you."
"When I'm gone sing me that song, will you?" I cant remember where the quote is from bit i find it deeply personal and touching. If anyone knows i would appreciate being reminded of the origin.
"When nothing goes right, go to sleep."
"These pods were supposed to make household chores easier, not tempt our children to swallow harmful chemicals. I saw one on my staffer's desk and I wanted to eat it."  U.S. Senator Chuck Schumer commented on Tide Pods
"There is no hunting like the hunting of man, and those who have hunted armed men long enough and liked it, never care for anything else thereafter." - Ernest Hemingway
"There is no hunting like the hunting of man, and those who have hunted armed men long enough and liked it, never care for anything else thereafter." - Ernest Hemingway
"fast food will never not be a thing unless there is faster food" - anonymous
"your value is not only determined by how much you give. its also determined by how much you can take."
" You should not make everyone happy, but you should not hurt anyone "- George Bernard Shaw
"Change your conception of yourself and you will automatically change the world in which you live. Do not try to change people; they are only messengers telling you who you are. Revalue yourself and they will confirm the change." - Neville Goddard
"Start by doing what"s necessary; then do what is possible; and suddenly you are doing the impossible." Francis Of Assisi
"It is the content that makes the connection and continues to keep people connected." - Loren Weisman
"Design is a response to a specific problem. You are given a problem to solve, and then you let the problem itself tell you what your solution is." - Chip Kidd
"Getting fired from Apple was the best thing that could have ever happened to me. The heaviness of being successful was replaced by the lightness of being a beginner again. It freed me to enter one of the most creative periods of my life." - Steve Jobs
"Between the mighty and the modest, truth is the great leveler" - Sen. Jeff Flake
"I'm not a body with a soul, I'm a soul that has a visible part called the body." - Paulo Coelho
"I divide my officers into four groups. There are clever, diligent, stupid, and lazy..." [con] Kurt von Hammerstein-Equord
"I divide my officers into four groups. There are clever, diligent, stupid, and lazy..." [con] Kurt von Hammerstein-Equord
"Most people are not just comfortable with their ignorance, but hostile to anyone who points it out." - Plato
"Life happens wherever you are, you might as well live it." -unknown
"Success will be within your reach only when you start reaching out for it." - Stephen Richards
"Edit your life frequently and ruthlessly. It's your masterpiece after all." -Narcotics Anonymous
"You want to speak with a Spaniard, you learn Spanish. You want to frolic in France, you learn French. You want to commune with the cosmos, you learn Mathematics  the language of the Universe." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"The only way we will survive is by being kind. The only way we can get by in this world is through the help we receive from others. No one can do it alone, no matter how great the machines are." - Amy Poehler
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days before you've actually left them." - Andy Bernard
"Besides, nowadays, almost all capable people are terribly afraid of being ridiculous, and are miserable because of it." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"Nothing is so difficult as not deceiving oneself." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Choose your battles carefully, for if you turn everything you say into a fight for the finish, you could win every argument and still lose the war."
"One of the surprising discoveries of modern psychology is how easy it is to be ignorant of your own ignorance." - Daniel Dennett
"Thousands of geniuses live and die undiscovered - either by themselves or by others". - Mark Twain
"Any fool can be happy. It takes a man with real heart to make beauty out of the stuff that makes us weep." - Clive Barker
"You see things; you say, 'Why?' But I dream things that never were; and I say 'Why not?" - George Bernard Shaw
"Life always begins with one step outside of your comfort zone." - Shannon L. Alder
"Do what is right, not what is easy nor what is popular." - Roy T. Bennett
"You never change your life until you step out of your comfort zone; change begins at the end of your comfort zone." - Roy T. Bennett
"Perhaps in every state beneath the sun, Or high, or low, in cradle or in stall, The day of birth is fatal to us all." -Giacomo Leopardi
"It felt familiar. But just because it was familiar, it didn"t make it easy." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"It felt familiar. But just because it was familiar didn"t make it easy." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing
"You never have to change anything you got up in the middle of the night to write." ____ Saul Bellow____
"Simplicity is the most difficult of all concepts."
"Respect should be given unequivocally to everyone unless they do something to lose it"
"Everything is good which takes away one plaything and delusion more, and drives us home to add one stroke of faithful work." Emerson, 1860
"I was within and without, simultaneously enchanted and repelled by the inexhaustible variety of life." - F. Scott Fitzgerald (The Great Gatsby)
"Life comes at you fast. It hits you and tries to escape and be expressed in any way possible. In a way, it's a lot like...lightning." - Chris Colfer, Struck By Lightning
"Everyone you meet has a part to play in your story. And while some may take a chapter, others a paragraph, and most will be no more than scribbled notes in the margins, someday, you'll meet someone who will become so integral to your life, you'll put their name in the title." -Beau Taplin
"Crazy people are not crazy if one accepts their reasoning." - Gabriel Garcia Marquez
"You must not fight too often with one enemy, or you will teach him all your art of war." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"I"m pissed off for greatness because if you ain"t pissed off for greatness that means you"re OK with being mediocre" -Ray Lewis
"The discourse on harassment, seems to me as if it was conducted by 9-year-old virgins talking about some sexual act that none of them have ever had." - Michael Crichton
"War is merely the continuation of policy by other means." - Carl von Clausewitz
"If the circumstances make it such that you can't fuck a man in the ass, then just peckerslap him. Better to let him know who's in charge than to let him think he's got the keys to the car." - President Lyndon B. Johnson
"gucci gang gucci gang gucci gang gucci gang" - lil kill myself
"There are three responses to a piece of design  yes, no, and WOW! Wow is the one to aim for." - Milton Glaser
"you cant see me" - john cena
"two plus two is four, minus one thats three, quick maths" - big shaq
"A good compromise, a good piece of legislation, is like a good sentence; or a good piece of music. Everybody can recognize it. They say, 'Huh. It works. It makes sense." Barack Obama
"Better that ten guilty persons escape than that one innocent suffer." -Sir William Blackstone
"To be yourself in a world that's trying to constantly make you something else is the greatest accomplishment" - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"There is one good, knowledge and one evil, ignorance."
"Never tell people how to do things. Tell them what to do and they will surprise you with their ingenuity." - General George Smith Patton, Jr.
"It's better to offer no excuse or explanation than to lie." - Bill Lewis
"If you're not careful, the newspapers will have you hating the people who are being oppressed, and loving the people who are doing the oppressing." - Malcolm X
"It is better to offer no excuse or explanation than to lie." - Bill Lewis
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives life fully is prepared to die at any time." - Mark Twain
"The only way to get ahead is to find errors in conventional wisdom" -Larry Ellison
"I used to think the human brain was the most wonderful organ in my body. Then realized who was telling me this" -Emo Philips
"The master has failed more than the novice has tried."
"For with much wisdom comes much sorrow; the more knowledge, the more grief." -Solomon
"Some infinities are bigger than other infinities." - John Green
"Desire is the heart which beats meaning into our lives." - Goodbye, Mr. Nothing by F.K. Preston
"how horrible it is to love something that death can touch" -Unknown
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." Dr. Seuss
"Pander yourself sometimes. Tell yourself 'I love you' and actually take the time to feel that love."
"The most important thing a father can do for his children is to love their mother". - Theodore Hesburgh
"Courage starts with showing up and letting ourselves be seen."
"You don"t have to make yourself miserable to be successful. It"s natural to look back and mythologize the long nights and manic moments of genius, but success isn"t about working hard, it"s about working smart." -Andrew Wilkinson, founder of MetaLab
"Nothing in all the world is more dangerous than sincere ignorance and conscientious stupidity." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous
"I do not pretend to understand the moral universe; the arc is a long one, my eye reaches but little ways; I cannot calculate the curve and complete the figure by the experience of sight; I can divine it by conscience. And from what I see I am sure it bends towards justice." - Theodore Parker
"The true symbol of the United States is not the bald eagle; it is the pendulum" -Supreme Court Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
'The task must be made difficult, for only the difficult inspires the noble- hearted.'  Sren Kierkegaard
"All warfare is based on deception..." [cont] - Sun Tzu
"Love is all you need? No actually, Beatles. You also need a person to do it with, Beatles." Jeremy Usborne (Robert Webb)
"We know that from time to time, there arise among human beings people who seem to exude love as naturally as the sun gives out heat." - Alan Watts
"Go to bed; tired is stupid." -Ursula K. Le Guin, A Wizard of Earthsea
"It is an absolute outrage how so many pampered, affluent, upper-middle-class professional women chronically spout snide anti-male feminist rhetoric, while they remain completely blind to the constant labor and sacrifices going on all around them as working-class men create and maintain..." [cont.]
"I love you as one loves another person whom one simply cannot do without. You give my life purpose, and maybe that's enough. Because that's just about the greatest gift one friend can give another." - Stewie Griffin
"I don't love you. You don't love me. We're just two lonely people trying to hate ourselves a little less. Maybe that's all we're ever going to be. Maybe that's all we ever were." - BoJack Horseman
"The universe is a cruel, uncaring void. The key to being happy isn't a search for meaning. It's to just keep yourself busy with unimportant nonsense, and eventually, you'll be dead," - Mr. PeanutButter from BoJack Horseman
"I hated every minute of training, but I said, Don"t quit. Suffer now and live the rest of your life as a champion." Muhammad Ali
"There is only one happiness in this life, to love and be loved". George Sand
"The time is always right to do what is right." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"I cannot remember the books I have read any more than the meals I have eaten. Even so, they have made me." -- Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The [Social Media] incentive structure is to maximize 'engagement,' which is a sanitized way of talking about addiction." -Jaron Lanier (during interview from the Ezra Klein podcast)
"When you are going through something hard and wonder where God is, remember that a teacher is always quiet during a test." - Unknown
"Crazy Fat is better than Lazy Fat" - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that" - Martin Luther King Jr
"Look at everything always as though you were seeing it either for the first or last time: Thus is your time on earth filled with glory." - Betty Smith, A Tree Grows in Brooklyn
"Man starts over again everyday, in spite of all he knows, against all he knows." - Emil Cioran
"Man starts over again everyday in spite of what he knows against what he knows" -Emil Cioran
"Reading makes immigrants of us all. It takes us away from home, but more important, it finds homes for us everywhere." - Jean Rhys
"Metal rusts, music lasts forever." - Patrick Rothfuss
"There is nothing that is going to make people hate you more, and love you more, than telling the truth." - Stefan Molyneux
"When life gives you lemons, just say fuck the lemons and bail" - Kunu
"When arguing with a fool make sure the other one isn't doing the same thing". -TedEx.
"Don't raise your voice, improve your argument." - Desmond Tutu
"Love and compassion are necessities, not luxuries. Without them, humanity cannot survive." - Dalai Lama XIV
"it wasn't easy - but nothing is"
"Twice the pride, double the fall."
"Political correctness is quite simply getting the target population to silence itself." - David Icke on the War on Freedom of Speech
"Better is bread with a happy heart than wealth with vexation." -Pharaoh Amenemope
"Never fall in love with an idea. They"re whores. If the one you"re with isn"t doing the job, there"s always, always, always another." - Chip Kidd
"Graphic design will save the world right after rock and roll does." - David Carson
"This life, which had been the tomb of his virtue and of his honor, is but a walking shadow; a poor player, that struts and frets his hour upon the stage, and then is heard no more: it is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing." - William Shakespheare
"Things don"t have to change the world to be important." - Steve Jobs
"Do not condemn the judgement of another because it does not agree with your own. You may both be wrong."  Dandemis
"Another flaw in the human character is that everybody wants to build and nobody wants to do maintenance." - Kurt Vonnegut
"If you are giving best at your work, then you must have confidence in it." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"Learn what is to be taken seriously and laugh at the rest." - Hermann Hesse
"Everybody has a responsibility for their own lives, but not everyone has the prerequisites for taking this responsibility" -- Who said this?
"One of the biggest paradoxes of our world: memories vanish when we want to remember, but fix themselves permanently in the mind when we want to forget." -Emil Cioran
"Sometimes when you innovate, you make mistakes. It is best to admit them quickly, and get on with improving your other innovations." - Steve Jobs
"Death must be so beautiful. To lie in the soft brown earth, with the grasses waving above one's head, and listen to silence. To have no yesterday, and no tomorrow. To forget time, to forgive life, to be at peace..." - Oscar Wilde
"Either we shall find what it is we are seeking or at least we shall free ourselves from the persuasion that we know what we do not know." -Plato
"When dictatorship is a fact, revolution is a duty"." - Armadeu de Prado
"When people have invested their identities into clichs, the only counter argument they have is 'being offended'." - Stefan Molyneux
"The same man with sunken eyes saw me, and described yellow so perfectly" Frank Ocean - Eyes Like Sky
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein
"Beauty is mysterious as well as terrible. God and devil are fighting there, and the battlefield is the heart of man." Fyodor Dostoevsky
"I talk to myself because I"m the only one whose answers I believe and have come to understand." -- Bill Lewis
"Charity begins at home and justice begins next door." -Charles Dickens
"Where have you bin Laden?" Jim Jeffries
"Young people must take it upon themselves to ensure that they receive the highest education possible so that they can represent us well in future as future leaders." - Nelson Mandela
"Young people must take it upon themselves to ensure that they receive the highest education possible so that they can represent us well in future as future leaders." - Nelson Mandela
"Success is a lousy teacher. It seduces smart people into thinking they can"t lose." - Bill Gates
"The fact is that far more crime and child abuse has been committed by zealots in the name of God, Jesus and Mohammed than has ever been committed in the name of Satan. Many people don"t like that statement, but few can argue with it." - Carl Sagan
"Some editors are failed writers, but so are most writers."T.S. Eliot
"Our Civilization lives under the illusion of Eternal Happiness as something possible to achieve instead of Accepting the Changing Nature of the Universe" - Tao
"Some people build their future, some people buy it" -A. Motika
"Success is best addiction, try it once" - Akash More
"Don"t tell me this hurts for you too. A killer cannot sue for the bruises on his knuckles or the blood on his shoes." - Beau Taplin
"Never allow someone to be your priority while allowing yourself to be their option." - Mark Twain
"I will never ask you to fight for me. I have neither the insecurity nor the arrogance to believe that wars must be won and lost to earn or keep my love." - Beau Taplin, Buried Light
"Cats are intended to teach us that not everything in nature has a purpose." - Garrison Keillor
"My favorite things in life don"t cost any money. It"s really clear that the most precious resource we all have is time." - Steve Jobs
"The world is changed by your example, not by your opinion." Paulo Coelho
"Do not allow anyone to be one of your necessities, while you are among his options!" - Mark Twain
"The more despair you feel about you, the more you remember They're just living things .... and you can replace them With better living things."- will Smith
"Such is my love, to thee I so belong, That for thy right myself will bear all wrong." -William Shakespeare
"Human ideologies are based on human believe and acceptance of one ideology by all human is not possible as long as each human could find answers about his existence by his own mind." - Zaman Ali
"Struggle of power is natural in human because with power their individuality prevails over others." - Zaman Ali
"There are those who wrap themselves in flags and blow the tinny trumpet of patriotism as a means of fooling the people." George Galloway
"A man must consider what a rich realm he abdicates when he becomes a conformist." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Congratulations! Today is your day. You're off to Great Places! You're off and away!" - Dr. Seuss, Oh, The Places You'll Go!
"Oftentimes. when people are miserable, they will want to make other people miserable, too. But it never helps." - Lemony Snicket
"You are entitled to your own opinion, but you are not entitled to your own facts." - Daniel Patrick Moynihan
' Give me your hungry, your tired your poor I'll piss on 'em that's what the Statue of Bigotry says Your poor huddled masses, let's club 'em to death and get it over with and just dump 'em on the boulevard' Lou Reed, Dirty Boulevard
"Once, men turned their thinking over to machines in the hope that this would set them free. But that only permitted other men with machines to enslave them." -Frank Herbert
"Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tost to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!" - Emma Lazarus
"If we could be satisfied with anything, we should have been satisfied long ago." Seneca
"The common belief is that greater education leads to a greater tolerance and appreciation of human individual variation. If only it were true."  Michael Gazzaniga
"Great things in business are never done by one person. They're done by a team of people." - Steve Jobs
"The world is indeed full of peril, and in it there are many dark places; but still there is much that is fair, and though in all lands love is now mingled with grief, it grows perhaps the greater." - J.R.R.Tolkien, The Fellowship of the Ring
"But I find that for myself, without exception, the more I deal with the work as something that is my own, as something that is personal, the more successful it is." - Marian Bantjes
"There must be those among whom we can sit down and weep and still be counted as warriors." - Adrienne Rich
"'The time has come to talk of other things Of shoes and ships and sealing wax Of cabbages and kings And while the sea is boiling hot And whether pigs have wings Kaloo Kalay no work today We're cabbages and kings" -The Walrus (Lewis Carroll)
"There's no such thing as 'death with honor'. Just death." Tom Mankiewicz
"All are architects of Fate, Working in these walls of Time; Some with massive deeds and great, Some with ornaments of rhyme." -Longfellow
"If you are not willing to learn, no one can help you! If you are determined to learn, no one can stop you!" Zig Ziglar
"Anti-intellectualism has been a constant thread winding its way through our political and cultural life, nurtured by the false notion that democracy means that 'my ignorance is just as good as your knowledge.'" - Isaac Asimov
"The dumbing down of America is most evident in the 30 second sound bites (now down to 10 seconds or less), lowest common denominator programming, credulous presentations on pseudoscience and superstition, but especially a kind of celebration of ignorance." - Carl Sagan
"The root of all superstition is that men observe when a thing hits, but not when it misses." - Werner Heisenberg
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best."
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened."
"It is better to burn out than to fade away" Gerard Way
"Refuse to accept the belief that your personal happiness, financial security, career success or professional relevance relies on the next update of the latest technology or social media. While relevance in life is a state of mind, don't allow others to dictate your future." -- Bill Lewis
"Meditation is a form of prayer. It is a silent prayer. It is a reaching out into the unknown, and simultaneously a reaching inside to the unknown."  Adyashanti
"Humans see what they want to see." - Rick Riordan
"If you make people think they're thinking they'll love you, but if you really make them think, they'll hate you." - Don Marquis
"I have lov'd her ever since I saw her; and still I see her beautiful" -William Shakespeare
"There will always be haters. And the more you grow the more they hate; the more they hate the more you grow." - Anthony Liccione
"If you want the best the world has to offer, offer the world your best." - Neale Donald Walsch
"Things usually end the way they started. Fast or slow, important or not, silly or stupid."
"Some people are just fucked." -Anonymous
"The good times of today are the sad thoughts of tomorrow" Bob Marley
"The best deed of a great man is to forgive and forget." Imam Ali
"Never give up on a dream just because of the time it will take to accomplish it. The time will pass anyway." - Earl Nightingale
#just a thought
"If a man speaks or acts with a pure thought, happiness follows him, like a shadow that never leaves him."  Buddha
"The only Zen you can find on the tops of mountains is the Zen you bring up there." - Robert M. Pirsig
"Happiness is a warm puppy." - Charles M. Schulz
"perfectionism is just fear in fancy shoes and a mink coat, pretending to be elegant when actually it's just terrified". - Elizabeth Gilbert, Big Magic: Creative Living Beyond Fear
"Whoever saves one life, saves the world entire." - Thomas Keneally
"I had always hoped that this land might become a safe &amp; agreeable Asylum to the virtuous &amp; persecuted part of mankind, to whatever nation they might belong" - George Washington
"If you lose your wealth, you have lost nothing. If you lose your health, you have lost something. But if you lose your character, you have lost everything" - Woodrow Wilson
"Experience is simply the name we give our mistakes." Oscar Wilde
"Wear gratitude like a cloak, it will feed every corner of your life."  Rumi
"It's funny the way most people love the dead. Once you are dead, you are made for life." - Jimi Hendrix
"It is not the state which commands us, but we who command the state. It is not the state which has created us, but we who have created our state." --Adolf Hitler, 1935
"Women and children can be careless, but not men." - Don Corleone
"Success consists of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm" -Winston Churchill
"Don't worry about failures, worry about the chances you miss when you don't even try." -Jack Canfield
"If text kisses were real kisses, the world would be an orgy." - Mark Corrigan (David Mitchell)
"I strive for two things in design: simplicity and clarity. Great design is born of those two things." - Lindon Leader
"And I asked myself about the present. How wide it was, how deep it was, how much was mine to keep." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Before you're disciplined, you're not free" - Jordan Peterson
"Textbooks are just guidebooks" -Kishidan and Hiroshi Kitadani
"Better to write for yourself and have no public, than to write for the public and have no self." - Cyril Connolly
"There was nowhere to go but everywhere, so just keep on rolling under the stars." - Jack Kerouac
"Any man is liable to err, only a fool persists in error." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"A childhood without books  that would be no childhood. That would be like being shut out from the enchanted place where you can go and find the rarest kind of joy." - Astrid Lindgren
"Body sucks you in, mind keeps you." - u/superdupi [/r/askreddit] about Love and Sex...
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"All this he saw, for one moment breathless and intense, vivid on the morning sky; and still, as he looked, he lived; and still, as he lived, he wondered." - Kenneth Grahame, The Wind In the Willows
"I know I'll get famous one day, the question is for good or evil" - Me
"One word frees us of all the weight and pain of life; that word is love." -Sophocles
"Life is all or nothing so do something."
"Better three hours too soon than a minute too late." - William Shakespeare
"Connect with people who remind you of what you truly are." - Ralph Smart
" We designers, we don"t work in a vacuum. We need business people. We are not the fine artists we are often confused with."
"Throughout history, people with new ideaswho think differently and try to change thingshave always been called troublemakers."
"Do not judge me by my successes, judge me by how many times I fell down and got back up again." - Nelson mandela
"The moment one gives close attention to anything, even a blade of grass it becomes a mysterious, awesome, indescribably magnificent world in itself." - Henry Miller
"We cling to our own point of view, as though everything depended on it. Yet our opinions have no permanence; like autumn and winter, they gradually pass away." - Zhuangzi
"If your neighbor has a completely different view on abortion, gay marriage, stem cell research, all of those things, you still are both Americans. Neither one of you is necessarily more patriotic than the other. Neither loves their country any more than the other one does." - Dr Phil McGraw
"You never really understand a person until you consider things from his point of view." - Harper Lee
"There is nothing impossible to him who will try." - Alexander the Great
"A man who puts on his armor should not boast like one who takes his armor off" - Ben Hadad I
"Life is short. Drive fast. Leave a sexy corpse." -Stanley Hudson from The Office
"I've missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I've lost almost 600 games. 26 times I've been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I've failed over and over and over again in my life. That is why I succeed!" - Michael Jordan
"In youth, it was a way I had, To do my best to please. And change, with every passing lad To suit his theories. But now I know the things I know And do the things I do, And if you do not like me so, To hell, my love, with you." - Dorothy Parker
"The US publishing industry is publishing nonfiction books whose purpose is not to inform but to entertain in the most debased fashion, pornography without the sex." - Piero Scaruffi
"Good design is all about making other designers feel like idiots because that idea wasn"t theirs." - Frank Chimero
"The problem with the world is that the intelligent people are full of doubts, while the stupid ones are full of confidence." - Charles Bukowski
"Bombarding people with knowledge doesn't help. It doesn't do anything to explain things to people, but here I am just explaining the facts over and over again. Maybe the joke's on me." -Dan Kahan
"No man who says 'I'm as good as you' believes it. The St. Bernard never says it to the toy dog, nor the scholar to the dunce, nor the employable to the bum, nor the pretty woman to the plain." -Screwtape
"People hear what they want to hear and then stop listening." -Tom Nichols
"It is impossible in this world to arrange for full justice to be done to everyone." -- Lawrence Durrell ("The Alexandria Quartet: Clea") (1960)
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston S. Churchill
"Read not to contradict and confute; nor to believe and take for granted; nor to find talk and discourse; but to weigh and consider." - Francis Bacon [Essay - Of Studies]
"The art of being wise is the art of knowing what to overlook." - William James
"We may encounter many defeats, but we must not be defeated." - Maya Angelou.
"You will never age for me, nor fade, nor die." -William Shakespeare
"Life is about moments; don"t wait for them, create them." - Tony Robbins
"The only impossible journey is the one you never begin." - Tony Robbins
"The mind is a wonderful servant, but a terrible master." - Robin S. Sharma
"The stupid person thinks that he is as smart, or smarter than, a smart person. And therein lies his stupidity."  Chris Langan,
"The stupid person thinks that he is as smart or smarter than, a smart person. And therein lies his stupidity."  Chris Langan
"Do not seek to follow in the footsteps of the wise. Seek what they sought." - Matsuo Basho
"Vulnerability is the birthplace of innovation, creativity and change." - Bren Brown
"Either write something worth reading or do something worth writing."
"Never argue with stupid people. They will drag you to their level and beat you with experience" -Mark Twain
"Never argue with stupid people. They will drag you to their level and beat you with experience"-Mark Twain https://www.pinterest.com/pin/636766834787382315/
"Content precedes design. Design in the absence of content is not design, it"s decoration." - Jeffrey Zeldman
"If I have to justify or prove my friendship to you by liking or sharing a post, then we are not friends. People I call friends, don't use passive-aggressive approaches with their friends to bump up their likes, shares or connections online. " - Loren Weisman
"Let me live, love, and say it well in good sentences" - Sylvia Plath
"Talking to oneself is the only way to ensure the quality of conversation" --Dazzle Razzle
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education." -Mark Twain
"Sometimes the questions are complicated and the answers are simple." - Dr. Seuss
"In the raging rapids of life, you can choose to be the water in the river or the boulder in the middle of the river."
"Jump, and you will find out how to unfold your wings as you fall" -Ray Bradbury
"Stupidity has a knack of getting it's way" - Albert Camus, from The Plague
"Success is most often achieved by those who don't know that failure is inevitable."
"Success is most often achieved by those who don't know that failure is inevitable."
"That's always seemed so ridiculous to me, that people want to be around someone because they're pretty. Its like picking your breakfast cereals based on color instead of taste." - John Green.
"Working with Free Mind is better than the one preoccupied with." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"To be free is not merely to cast off ones chains, but to live in a way that respects and enhances the freedoms of others." - Nelson Mandela
"No rational argument will have a rational effect on a man who does not want to adopt a rational attitude." - Karl Popper
"Whenever a theory appears to you as the only possible one, take this as a sign that you have neither understood the theory nor the problem which it was intended to solve." - Karl Popper
"For you, I was a chapter. For me, you were the book." - Tom McNeal
"if you think your life is a movie and you are the hero, you will sink into the endless drama and you will forget the most important point that is you are the director of this movie." - Mounssif BOUHLAOUI
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." - Albert Einstein
"There is always some madness in love. But there is also always some reason in madness." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I never want to be away from you again, except at work, in the restroom or when one of us is at a movie the other does not want to see." - Lemony Snicket, The Beatrice Letters
"Praying To God is Like watching flies fuck."- George Carlin
"Life is to be lived, not controlled; and humanity is won by continuing to play in face of certain defeat." - Ralph Ellison
"I imagine one of the reasons people cling to their hates so stubbornly is because they sense, once hate is gone, they will be forced to deal with pain." - James Baldwin
"I can"t be everyone"s friend, but I don"t have to be anyone"s enemy." Me
"Yes! I'm me! I am careful and logical and I look up things I don't understand! When I hear people use the wrong words, I get edgy! I am good with cheese. I read books fast! I think! And I always have a piece of string! That's the kind of person I am!" - Terry Pratchett, The Wee Free Men
"It"s chaos, be kind". -Michelle E McNamara.
"Digital design is like painting, except the paint never dries." - Neville Brody
"Being alive is great, you can eat at Denny's, you can wear a hat whenever you want to, it's wonderful." Norm Macdonald
"I'm a firm believer that happiness makes people prettier. It's a noticeable glow." Author Unknown
#I_want_it_i_will_get_it -self believe
"We're each of us alone, to be sure. What can you do but hold your hand out in the dark?" - Ursula K. Le Guin
'Tis a fearful thing
"Bitcoin is a reaction from young people to change the old's people system that can't include them." - Keiser Report
"We are all killers, on land and on sea; Bonapartes and Sharks included." - Herman Melville, Moby-Dick
"Man"s capacity for justice makes democracy possible, but man"s inclination to injustice makes democracy necessary." -- Reinhold Niebuhr
"What ails the truth is that it is mainly uncomfortable, and often dull. The human mind seeks something more amusing, more caressing." -- H.L. Mencken
#Stop_douting_yourself_work_hard_and_make_it_happen
"The best thing you can do is teach people to write because there's no difference between that and thinking" - Jordan B. Peterson
"Now I know the things I know, and I do the things I do; and if you do not like me so, to hell, my love, with you!" - Dorothy Parker
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"Who is more humble? The scientist who looks at the universe with an open mind and accepts whatever the universe has to teach us, or somebody who says everything in this book must be considered the literal truth and never mind the fallibility of all the human beings involved?"
"I can see how it might be possible for a man to look down upon the earth and be an atheist, but I cannot conceive how a man could look up into the heavens and say there is no God." - Abraham Lincoln
"I don't give a damn." -a former boss
"There can't be nothing because this is nothing."
"There are things no magic can destroy, for they are magic themselves"-Tessa Gray, Infernal devices
"The tyrant dies and his rule is over, the martyr dies and his rule begins." - Sren Kierkegaard, The Journals of Kierkegaard
"The aim of art, the aim of a life can only be to increase the sum of freedom and responsibility to be found in every man and in the world. It cannot, under any circumstances, be to reduce or suppress that freedom, even temporarily." -Albert Camus
"What is the price of experience? Do men buy it for a song? Or wisdom for a dance in the street? No, it is bought with the price of all the man hath, his house, his wife, his children."- William Blake
"One type of abuse is the beginning of another abuse. The power and control are the reasons behind all the actions" Can someone tell me what is the meaning of this
"We can know only that we know nothing. And that is the highest degree of human wisdom." - Leo Tolstoy
"Always remember that you are absolutely unique. Just like everyone else." - Margaret Mead.
"Violent ground-acquisition games such as football are in fact a crypto-fascist metaphor for nuclear war." -Robert Downey Jr.
"Look, the world is full of books. Moaning because no one wants to read yours is like complaining that you"ve been standing on the street corner with your dick out for an hour and nobody"s given you a blowjob. Still it hurt me." - Paul Murray, _The Mark and the Void_
"Fear does not create lasting peace." - Dave Chappelle
"Young lady you mean well. You declare this is racist and that is racist, but you are young, white, and living in America. You don't know what is like to walk in my shoes, and I won't always be around to tell ya, but the statue will.."
"Believe and act as if it were impossible to fail." - Charles Kettering
"There is nothing which we receive with so much reluctance as advice." - Joseph Addison
" When you are at your best, try to Help those who are at their worst "- will Smith.
"We don"t need more Hindus, more Christians, or more Muslims  we need more Buddhas, more Jesuses, and more Krishnas  then there will be true change."  Sadhguru
"A human being, the more intelligent he becomes, the more confused he gets  every step is a confusion. Only an idiot is dead sure. The sign of intelligence is that you are constantly wondering. Idiots are always dead sure about every damn thing they are doing in their life."  Sadhguru
"Whatever the present moment contains, accept it as if you had chosen it. Always work with it, not against it. Make it your friend and ally, not your enemy. This will miraculously transform your whole life." - Eckhart Tolle
"One of my metrics for a good doctor is how often they say 'this could be wrong' or 'I don't know.'" -Tim Ferriss
"From even the greatest of horrors, irony is seldom absent" - H.P. Lovecraft
"The only trip you will regret is the one you don"t take." - Author Unknown
"Gotta have opposites, light and dark and dark and light, in painting. It"s like in life. Gotta have a little sadness once in awhile so you know when the good times come. I'm waiting on the good times now." - Bob Ross
"Count your age by friends, not years. Count your life by smiles, not tears." - John Lennon
"Dying in war is not honorable, it's respectful."
"The large print giveth, and the small print taketh away" - Tom Waits
"Have I gone mad? I'm afraid so. You're entirely Bonkers. But I will tell you a secret, All the best people are." - Lewis Carroll, Alice in Wonderland
"no autocrat wields a power comparable to that enjoyed by an old devil planning to kill himself" -Emil Cioran
"Sometimes things fall apart, that"s God"s love in disguise" - Todd Rundgren
"Written in pencil so say my life, for without the eraser there would be no change." Bill Lewis
"The most wasted of all days is one without laughter." - Nicolas Chamfort
"Evolution is taught as fact, Mr Speaker! It"s just a theory. I believe that one day scientists will come to see that only creation by God makes sense" - Mike Pence
"Sometimes reasonable men must do unreasonable things." -Marvin Heemeyer
"Holding onto anger is like drinking poison and expecting the other person to die." - Unknown.
"Fate rarely calls upon us at a moment of our choosing." - Optimus Prime
"Before Elvis, there was nothing." - John Lennon
"I'd rather be hated for who I am, than loved for who I am not."- Kurt Cobain.
"Some stars may be bright, but do not point the way. So it is with success, money, career, honors and pleasures, when these become our lives." - Pope Francis
"I love this mansion, though it is too many windows ...to open halfway each morning ...to close halfway each night." -Jim Carrol, Basketball Diaries
"Some people bring out the worst in you, others bring out the best, and then there are those remarkably rare, addictive ones who just bring out the most. Of everything. They make you feel so alive that you"d follow them straight into hell, just to keep getting your fix." - Karen Marie Moning
"When the whole world is running towards a cliff, he who is running in the opposite direction appears to have lost his mind." C. S. Lewis
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow man; true nobility is being superior to your former self."-Ernest Hemingway.
"Well, the coldest nights do bring the warmest thoughts." - My Friend's Unfinished Book
"That is what I do, is I do things proper."
"Rome wasn't built in a day. But it sure fell in a few."
"Just because you do not take an interest in politics doesn"t mean politics won"t take an interest in you." - Pericles
"Life is an easy walk, but a hard run. You should simply jog."
"You can wish for every little thing to be great and you will then be content, or you can wish to be content and then every little thing will be great" - Unknown
"This is a country that I don't want looking foolish, and it's not going to look foolish as long as I'm here." Donald J Trump
"we only come to find out the true value of things in the absence of it
"You can change what you do, but you can't change what you want." -Thomas Shelby, the Peaky Blinders TV Series
"Numbers, the most boring of all the shapes" - Titus Andromedon
"I demolish my bridges behind me - then there is no choice but forward." - Fridtjof Nansen
"The more we know about life the less we understand, and the more we dig the more we just dig ourselves deeper."
"Life is pain, and pain is temporary, so life is too"
"Tears can not bring you joy, but joy can bring you tears" Lucky Dube.
"Jim Carrey doesn"t exist"  Jim Carrey
"A simple HELLO could lead to a million things"
"The word is a flame burning in a dark glass" - Sheila Watson
"You have a slippery quality, it makes me think of phlegm. And dual personalities, I hate both of them." - John Cooper Clarke
"People were always getting ready for tomorrow. I didn't believe in that. Tomorrow wasn't getting ready for them. It didn't even know they were there." -Cormac McCarthy, The Road.
"I believe there is another world waiting for us. A better world. And I'll be waiting for you there." - David Mitchell, Cloud Atlas
"If you don"t like something, change it. If you can"t change it, change the way you think about it."  Mary Engelbreit
"We seldom realize that our most private thoughts and emotions are not actually our own. For we think in terms of languages and images which we did not invent, but which were given to us by our society." - Alan Watts
"For every minute you are angry you lose sixty seconds of happiness." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Rome wasn't built in a day, but they were laying bricks every hour." - John Heywood.
"Some of you say, "Joy is greater than sorrow," and others say, "Nay, sorrow is the greater." But I say unto you, they are inseparable. Together they come, and when one sits alone with you at your board, remember that the other is asleep upon your bed." - Kahlil Gibran, The Prophet
"How often have I said that when you have excluded the impossible whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth." The Man Who Never Lived and Will Never Die
"When you're screwing up and nobody says anything to you anymore, that means they've given up on you." - Randy Pausch
"Don't be so thirsty for opportunity that you drink from every cup handed to you. That's how you get poisoned."
"No brooding over old worries, let's start a new series. Forget about all the negativities, think of new possibilities. Here to conquering a new frontier, that's all I wish in the upcoming new year."  Shon Mehta
"For last year's words belong to last year's language And next year's words await another voice. And to make an end is to make a beginning." - T.S. Eliot
"You can no more win a war, than you can win a earthquake" -Jeanette Rankin
"I am, somehow, less interested in the weight and convolutions of Einstein"s brain than in the near certainty that people of equal talent have lived and died in cotton fields and sweatshops." - Stephen Jay Gould
"How much courage does it take to fire up your tractor and plow under a crop you spent six or seven years growing?.......,
"You can spend minutes, hours, days, weeks, or even months over-analyzing a situation; trying to put the pieces together, justifying what could've, would've happened... or you can just leave the pieces on the floor and move the fuck on." - Tupac Shakur
"Never love anyone who treats you like you're ordinary." - Oscar Wilde
"As for monkeys, I would have five, and they would be named: See No Evil, Hear No Evil, Speak No Evil, Do Pretty Much Whatever The Hell You Want, and Expensive Attorney." - Tad Williams
"Your attitude, not your aptitude, will determine your altitude." - Zig Ziglar
"You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is like an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Do What Thou WIlt" - Aleister Crowley
"I see now that the circumstances of one's birth are irrelevant. It is what you do with the gift of life that determines who you are." - Mewtwo
"Our greatest glory is not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall." - Confucius
"If you can dream it, you can do it." -- Walt Disney
"Sometimes it is through losses so horrifically painful that we realize the most meaningful of gains."
"Being a bisexual male is hard because almost everybody will think you're gay: from your male friends to girls you like"
"I wish that every human life might be pure transparent freedom" - Simone de Beauvoir
"Our deepest emotions are precisely those that are the hardest to express"- Neville Goddard
"Want of money and the distress of a thief can never be alleged as the cause of his thieving, for many honest people endure greater hardships with fortitude. We must therefore seek the cause elsewhere than in want of money, for that is the miser's passion, not the thief's." - William Blake
"If you change the way you look at things, the things you look at change." - Wayne Dyer
"The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear, and the oldest and strongest kind of fear is fear of the unknown" - H.P.Lovecraft
"I wasn"t sure if people would get the "8" thing, but they did. It goes to show that when you take a big creative risk, it can really pay off." - Avril Lavigne on Sk8er Boi
"I wasn"t sure if people would get the "8" think, but they did. It goes to show that when you take a big creative risk, it can really pay off." - Avril Lavigne motivationally talking about the song Sk8er Boi
"Suppose we've chosen the wrong god. Every time we go to church we're just making him madder and madder." - Homer Simpson
"When I came back to Dublin I was courtmartialed in my absence and sentenced to death in my absence, so I said they could shoot me in my absence." - Brendan Behan.
"She was the kind of girlfriend God gives you young, so you'll know loss the rest of your life." - Junot Daz
"Nothing great was ever achieved without enthusiasm." - Ralph Emerson
"They can keep their heaven. When I die, I"d sooner go to Middle Earth." - George R.R. Martin
"Why don't I kill myself? If I knew exactly what keeps me from doing so, I should have no more questions to ask myself since I should have answered them all." -Emil Cioran
"So it"s true when all is said and done, grief is the price we pay for love." -E.A. Bucchianeri
"To be trusted is a greater compliment than to be loved."-George MacDonald
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks that other throw at him." -- David Brinkley
"The one you love and the one who loves you are never, ever the same person." - Chuck Palahniuk, Invisible Monsters
"The three most harmful addictions are heroin, carbohydrates, and a monthly salary." - Nassim Nicholas Taleb
"What you do speaks so loudly that I cannot hear what you say." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Oh, seek, my love, your newer way; I'll not be left in sorrow. So long as I have yesterday, Go take your damned tomorrow!" - Dorothy Parker
"lay quietly. "Were you planning on leaving us?" he added mildly." - John Flanagan,
"Have a mind that is open to everything, yet attached to nothing." - Wayne Dyer
"Friends are God's way of apologizing for your family." - Wayne Dyer
"How lucky I am to have something that makes saying goodbye so hard." Winnie The Pooh
"...each of us was born at this time because we have a mission to accomplish." - John Perkins (Confessions of an Economic Hit Man)
"There is no flag large enough to cover the shame of killing innocent people." -Howard Zinn
"If Hillary Clinton can"t satisfy her husband, what makes her think she can satisfy America?" -Donald Trump
"If we have no peace, it is because we have forgotten that we belong to each other." - Mother Teresa
"There is no act of faith more beautiful than the generosity of the very poor." - Gregory David Roberts
"Expect nothing. You will never be disappointed." -Anonymous
"We all know we're no good pieces of shit from the time we could breathe.. after a while you just kind of become bad." -Mickey Knox
"Cigarette is a pinch of tobacco rolled up in a piece of paper with fire on one end and a fool on the other end" Robert Mugabe
"I attribute my success to this: I never gave or took any excuse." - Florence Nightingale
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Elenor Roosevelt
"Keep love in your heart. A life without it is like a sunless garden when flowers are dead."-Oscar Wilde
"If happiness is the goal - and it should be - then adventure should be a top priority." - Richard Branson
"If youth knew; if age could." - Sigmund Freud
"It is better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to open ones mouth and remove all doubt." Abraham Lincoln
"The only way to find true happiness is to risk being completely cut open." - Chuck Palahniuk, Invisible Monsters
"Are you selling with soul or do you come off like you are selling your soul? If people only see you selling your expertise all the time, without experiencing elements of you sharing the expertise and knowledge you have, then what reason are you giving them to trust you or buy? " Loren Weisman
"The Christmas truce of 1914 reminds us that even in the unlikeliest of places, hope can still be found." - Queen Elizabeth II
"A fool dreams of the happiness of marriage while single, and dreams of happiness of bachelorism while married." - Saneatsu Mushanokoji
"Finish each day before you begin the next, and interpose a solid wall of sleep between the two. This you cannot do without temperance." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Knowledge is the best weapon and education is its strategy." -Me
"If I used to ask myself, over a coffin, "what good did it do the occupant to be born?" I now put the same question about anyone alive." -Emil Cioran
"The final forming of a person"s character lies in their own hands." -Anne Frank
"The penis does not obey the order of its master, who tries to erect or shrink it at will, whereas instead the penis erects freely while its master is asleep. The penis must be said to have its own mind." - Leonardo da Vinci
"Life itself is the proper binge." - Julia Child
"There is only one only thing worse than being talked about, and that is not being talked about" - Oscar Wilde
"Actual happiness always looks pretty squalid in comparison with the overcompensations for misery." - Aldous Huxley
"I am not always good and noble. I am the hero of this story, but I have my off moments."  P.G. Wodehouse (Love Among the Chickens)
"Honesty is a very expensive gift, Don"t expect it from cheap people." - Warren Buffett
"I want everything" --Agent Smith. "Would that include a bullet from this gun?" --Morpheus
"Invisible Pink Unicorns are beings of awesome mystical power. We know this because they manage to be invisible and pink at the same time. Like all religions, ...
"I don't blame you for writing of me as you have. You had to believe other stories, but then I don't know if any one would believe anything good of me anyway." - Billy the Kid
"You have everything needed for the extravagant journey that is your life." - Carlos Castaneda
"To know, is to know you know nothing. That is the meaning of true knowledge." -- Socrates
"Act upon thy market, thy market acts upon you"  Unknown
"Our brains are constantly hacked to make us desire things we don't actually need for our psychological and physical wellbeing, but we're ok with that..."
"Time is the longest distance between two places." - Tennessee Williams
17 Famous Graphic Design Quotes http://designtoolnews.com/17-famous-graphic-design-quotes/
"Good things are coming down the road. Just don"t stop walking." - Robert Warren Painter Jr.
"And most controversies have arisen from this, that men do not rightly explain their own mind..." - Baruch Spinoza, Ethics
"When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable." - Jess C. Scott, The Intern
"Anything is a bomb of you with increase the voltage enough."-Dexter
"No passion so effectually robs the mind of all its powers of acting and reasoning as fear." - Edmund Burke
"The stupid believe they are awake, busily and brightly assuming they understand things, calling this man ruler, that one herdsmanhow dense! Confucius and you are both dreaming! And when I say you are dreaming, I am dreaming, too." - Zhuangzi
"The battle plan is the first casualty of war, as soon as the first shot is fired the plan goes out the window" -Travis M. Jacobs
'When everything is beautiful, nothing is beautiful.'
"Learn to work harder on yourself than you do on your job. If you work hard on your job you"ll make a living, if you work hard on yourself you can make a life."  Jim Rohn
"Just because you"re a bird doesn"t mean you"re an ornithologist." - David Epstein
"Many people might have attained wisdom had they not assumed they already had it" - Unknown
"When absurdity becomes reality, comedians become the voice of reason." /u/petgreg on Seth McFarlane talking about Trump
"If we watch ourselves honestly we shall often find that we have begun to argue against a new idea even before it has been completely stated." - Wilfred Trotter
"I don"t even jerk off to her, that"s how much I like her. I still just jerk off to that wedding album I found in the garbage." - C.K.
"I am glad that I paid so little attention to good advice; had I abided by it I might have been saved from some of my most valuable mistakes." - Edna St. Vincent Millay
"The highest form of ignorance is when you reject something you know nothing about." - Sadhguru
"Not to be born is undoubtedly the best plan of all. Unfortunately, it is within no one's reach." -Emil Cioran
"An eye for an eye leaves the whole world without depth perception" -Unknown
"They say money can't buy happiness, but I decided I'd rather do all my crying in a Corvette" - Royce Da 5' 9"
"Don't waste your energy trying to change opinions ... Do your thing, and don't care if they like it." - Tina Fey
"Stick to your equipment. Don"t let anyone tell you that you can"t make beats on a bucket with some sticks.This is hip-hop. If you can drop 40 points a night in Chuck Taylor"s, do it. You don"t need Nike Shox." - 9th Wonder
"Killing people because they killed someone is a fascist approach: it's considering that you cannot help them and genes must be erased. They lost in 1945." - Me.
"All that we see or seem is but a dream within a dream." - Edgar Allan Poe
"Our knowledge can only be finite, while our ignorance must necessarily be infinite." - Karl Popper
"Bias, like beauty, is often in the eye of the beholder. Facts are your firewall against bias." -Tom Brokaw
"Honesty is the cornerstone of all success, without which confidence and ability to perform shall cease to exist." - Mary Kay Ash
"It's not the load that weighs you down, it's the way you carry it." - C.S. Lewis
"If a man has no sauce, he is lost. But the same man can get lost in the sauce. -Gucci Mane
"Don"t compare yourself with anyone in this world. If you do so, you are insulting yourself."  Bill Gates
"Where do you get those superior airs of yours?" "I've managed to survive, you see, all those nights when I wondered: am I going to kill myself at dawn?" -Emil Cioran
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge." - Stephen Hawking
"I love the winter, with its imprisonment and its cold, for it compels the prisoner to try new fields and resources." Thoreau
"Just because she likes the same bizzaro crap you do doesn't mean she's your soulmate." - 500 days of summer.
"I can't change the direction of the wind, but I can adjust my sails to always reach my destination." - Jimmy Dean
"One day your life is going to flash before your eyes, make sure its worth watching" -Gerard Way
"Don't let making a living prevent you from making a life" - John Wooden
"A nation can survive its fools, and even the ambitious. But it cannot survive treason from within. An enemy at the gates is less formidable, for he is known and carries his banner openly.
"Perfection is not when there is no more to add, but no more to take away"
"You do not need to commit yourself 24/7 to building your dream. You do need to commit to making every hour you work on your dream to be as effective and productive as possible So you can have the life you always wanted before, during and after your dream comes to fruition. - Loren Weisman
"The fishing is best where the fewest go"
"I dreamed I was a butterfly, flitting around in the sky; then I awoke. Now I wonder: Am I a man who dreamt of being a butterfly, or am I a butterfly dreaming that I am a man?" - Zhuangzi
"Be polite, be professional, but have a plan to kill everybody you meet."  James Mattis
"Not everything that is faced can be changed; but nothing can be changed until it is faced." - James Baldwin
"Because a thing seems difficult for you, do not think it impossible for anyone to accomplish."  Marcus Aurelius
"Today having power means knowing what to ignore." - Yuval Noah Harari.
"Why do old men wake so early? Is it to have one longer day?" - Hemingway
"When the hunter sets traps only for rabbits, tigers and dragons are left uncaught." -Li Po
"It"s up to brave hearts, sir........
"Whoever said, "It"s not whether you win or lose that counts," probably lost." Martina Navratilova (Tennis Player)
"Let us sacrifice our today so that our children can have a better tomorrow." - A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
[Help to Find]"I am willing to let people suffer for my success"
"The fault we admit to is seldom the fault we have, but it has a certain relationship to it, a somewhat similar shape, like that of a sleeve to an arm." -Mignon McLaughlin -The Neurotic's Notebook
"Theres a thin line between confidence and delusion "
"Luxury is not a necessity to me, but beautiful and good things are." - Anas Nin
"To struggle is to life" - me
"To be living is the the best power man can have. The ability of manipulating and intimidating are just fleeting strength leading you to bigotry. The power to make a choice to make a change in your life is mastery."-Unknown
"It is by no means an irrational fancy that, in a future existence, we shall look upon what we think our present existence, as a dream." - Edgar Allan Poe
"You realize that our mistrust of the future makes it hard to give up the past." - Chuck Palahniuk, Survivor
"I think in terms of the day's resolutions, not the years'." - Henry Moore
"Whether you think you can, or you think you can't--you're right." - Henry Ford
"15 years ago, the internet was an escape from the real world. Now, the real world is an escape from the internet." - Noah Smith
"If money's where you find happiness, you'll always be poor." -NF in his song, "Remember This"
"The bad news, nothing lasts forever. The good news, nothing lasts forever". - Unknown
"The three great elements of modern civilization, gunpowder, printing, and the Protestant religion" - Thomas Carlyle
"Fifteen hundred years ago everybody knew the Earth was the center of the universe. Five hundred years ago, everybody knew the Earth was flat, and fifteen minutes ago, you knew that humans were alone on this planet. Imagine what you'll know tomorrow." Agent Kay
"Both optimists and pessimists contribute to society. The optimist invents the airplane, the pessimist the parachute." - George Bernard Shaw
"One"s knowledge is what he speaks in times of wrong"- Unknown
"Silence isn"t empty. It"s full of answers." Unknown
"Don't you know I love you?!" She whispered to me once. It was the loudest thing I've ever heard.
"I am willing to sacrifice what I am for what I know I can become." - Grant Cardone
"Can you see that you live as if you will die tomorrow and instead you procrastinate as if you will live forever?" N Shoomkloom
"I am willing to sacrifice what I am for what I know I can become." - Grant Cardone
"It"s interesting to hear the way the world argues, agitates, and persuades; how it threatens, how it shams and lies; how everybody is right and doesn"t want to hear the other side." -- Ryszard Kapuscinski (Another Day of Life) (2001)
"Success seems to be connected with action. Successful people keep moving. They make mistakes, but they don't quit." -- Conrad Hilton
"They said IT ALL STARTS WITH A DREAM, but here i don't have a time to take a nap" - Vaibhav More
"In life and business, there are two cardinal sins. The first is to act without thought and the second is not to act at all." -Carl Icahn
"A great dream is not as good as a great memory. The dream can be had by anyone. The memory  must be made." - Eric Thomas
"If we have our own Why in life, we shall get along with almost any How."  Friedrich Nietzsche, Twilight of the Idols
"No tears in the writer, no tears in the reader. No surprise in the writer, no surprise in the reader." - Robert Frost
"The scariest moment is always just before you start." - Stephen King
"If I loved you less, I might be able to talk about it more." - Jane Austen, Emma
"Most people spend their entire lives trying to impress others that they often forget to impress themselves."
"You will turn over many a futile new leaf till you learn we must all write on scratched-out pages." -Mignon McLaughlin -The Neurotic's Notebook
"My birth was the first of my misfortunes. " -J.-J. Rousseau
"Don't only practice your art, but force your way into it's secrets, for it and knowledge can raise men to the Divine." -Ludwig van Beethoven
"Ask not what you can do for your country. Ask what"s for lunch." - Orson Welles
"From emptiness I emerged, to emptiness I return." -gaudog
"We are all just broken vases trying to keep flowers alive" -CloudKid
"You are never too old to set a new goal or dream a new dream" - C.S Lewis
"The problem with quotes on the internet is that it is hard to verify its authenticity" -Abe Lincoln
"You have to be odd to be number one"- Dr. Seuss
"Some people are old at 18 and some are young at 90. Time is a concept that humans created."- Yoko Ono
"Do you think depression is funny?" "I think it's funny in the way death is funny  in that it's not. You cope with it by laughing." -from the podcast 'The Hilarious World of Depression'
"What does it mean to be a safe space for another human being? It means you don't have an agenda." - Ram Dass
"We cannot expect people to have respect for law and order until we teach respect to those we have entrusted to enforce those laws." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Falling down is part of life. Getting back up is living." - Unknown
"The Old Year has gone. Let the dead past bury its own dead. The New Year has taken possession of the clock of time. All hail the duties and possibilities of the coming twelve months!" - Edward Payson Powell
"The greatest teacher, failure is." -Yoda
"Insanity is relative. It depends on who has who locked in what cage." - Madeleine Roux, Asylum
"I would be frustrated waiting for their stuff, so I'm going to go and fix your code and now it runs five times faster, you idiot." - Elon Musk
"The ones who say you can"t or won"t are probably the ones scared that you will"
"The more dominant a woman feels, the more secure a man she needs to find"
"A hungry stomach , an empty pocket and a broken heart can teach you the best lessons of life. "
"A pessimist, they say, sees a glass as being half empty; an optimist sees the same glass as half full. But a giving person sees a glass of water and starts looking for someone who might be thirsty G. Donald Gale
"Make mistakes of ambition and not mistakes of sloth. Develop the strength to do bold things, not the strength to suffer." Niccol Machiavelli
"A pessimist, they say, sees a glass as being half empty; an optimist sees the same glass as half full. But a giving person sees a glass of water and starts looking for someone who might be thirsty G. Donald Gale
"No matter how many mistakes you make or how slow you progress, you are still way ahead of everyone who isn"t trying." - Tony Robbins
"I think housework is far more tiring and frightening than hunting is, no comparison, and yet after hunting we had eggs for tea and were made to rest for hours, but after housework people expect one to go on just as if nothing special had happened." -Nancy Mitford
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best."
"Facts don"t care about your feelings."  Ben Shapiro
"If the brain were so simple we could understand it, we would be so simple we couldn't." - Lyall Watson
"Never be a spectator of unfairness or stupidity. The grave will apply plenty of time for silence." -Christopher Hitchens
"First order of business: Feed the trap. Work the hours to feed the trap. Having fed the trap, shit, piss, preparing to again feed the trap. Because it is your trap, defend it at all costs." -George Saunders
"I am stronger than I am broken." *Roxane Gay
"Confidence is the food of the wise man but the liquor of the fool." -Vikram from The Office
"Depression is like the pain an eagle feels while ripping its beak to live 40 more years, it's the Universe changing from one state to another, it's your brain destroying old connections and creating new ones." - A Strange Voice Inside a Mind
"Worrying does not take away tomorrow's troubles. It takes away today's peace." - Unknown.
"Woman was made from the rib of a man. Not from his head to top him, nor his foot to be stepped on by him, but from his side to be equal to him, under his arm to be protected by him, and near his heart to be loved by him." - Unknown
"Nationalism is an infantile disease. It is the measles of mankind." Albert Einstein
"It costs absolutely nothing to be nice" -Freddie Kitchens
"As we exist death is not, and when death is we are not. Death is, therefore, no relation either to the living or to the dead, given that it is nothing for the former, and the latter are not." - Epicurus
"How these madmen give themselves away! The real God taketh heed lest a sparrow fall; but the God created from human vanity sees no difference between an eagle and a sparrow." - Bram Stoker
"They say life is a journey, and by definition a journey is when the trip itself garners more impotence than the destination; so do we live for the destination or the trip?" -me
"How these madmen give themselves away! The real God taketh heed lest a sparrow fall; but the God created from human vanity sees no difference between an eagle and a sparrow." - Brad Stoker
"Frankly there is absolutely no collusionVirtually every Democrat has said there is no collusion. There is no collusionI think it"s been proven that there is no collusionI can only tell you that there is absolutely no collusion -President Donald J. Trump
"Be peaceful, be courteous, obey the law, respect everyone; but if someone puts his hand on you, send him to the cemetery." -Malcolm X
"Most of the world's work is done by people who don't feel very well." Winston Churchill
"Love the discipline you know, and let it support you. Entrust everything willingly to the gods, and then make your way through life  no one"s master and no one"s slave." - Marcus Aurelius
"Be the person you would do anything for. Be the person you will not let down. It"s time to respect yourself and your dream; both truly deserve that respect." - Loren Weisman
"There comes a point where you no longer care if there's a light at the end of the tunnel or not. You're just sick of the tunnel" - Ranata Suzuki
"For travel to be delightful, one must have a good place to leave and return to." - Frederick B. Wilcox
"If someone is able to show me that what I think or do is not right, I will happily change, for I seek the truth, by which no one was ever truly harmed. It is the person who continues in his self-deception and ignorance who is harmed."  Marcus Aurelius
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music"-Friedrich Nietzsche
"Instead of wielding fitness technology to solve problems, increase self-education..." - Brian Mackenzie, Unplugged
"I was a dog. No, why blame the dogs?"  Charles Bukowski
"The best way to predict the future is to invent it." -Alan Kay
"To assume the answer before you ask the question leads you nowhere."  Lawrence Krauss
"Comedy is the most powerful tool to rebel against the absurdism of existence" - Shiva Goddhartha
"Aging and death, grief, Lamentation, pain, Sadness and torment Are born from birth." -Ngrjuna
"People like good ones but they never respect them" - Vaibhav More
"The only difference between the saint and the sinner is that every saint has a past, and every sinner has a future."-Oscar Wilde
"People are not a thing that you can sacrifice. Anyone who looks on to the world as if it is a game of chess, deserves to lose." Person of Interest
"If Bob Mueller were any more biased, we"d have to give him credentials for the mainstream media." - Rep. Matt Gaetz (R-FL)
"Real generosity towards the future lies in giving all to the present" - Albert Camus
"Always go too far, because that's where you'll find the truth" - Albert Camus
"No matter how good I get at tennis... I'll never be good as... a wall." -Mitch Hedberg.
"Happiness is the ability to get properly distracted from the idea of Death" - Saddha Krahtanhi
"I never eat than i need, Never suffer than i did" - Utkarsh Pachauri
"And no one is such a LIAR as the indignant man." Nietzsche
"I imagine one of the reasons people cling to their hates so stubbornly is because they sense, once hate is gone, they will be forced to deal with pain." - James Baldwin
"To achieve the impossible; it is precisely the unthinkable that must be thought."  Tom Robbins
"After all, when you seek advice from someone it"s certainly not because you want them to give it. You just want them to be there while you talk to yourself." - Sir Terry Pratchett
"If you only ever give 90% in training then you will only ever give 90% when it matters." Michael Owen
"If you want someone to share something with you, first share something with them"
"That"s real acting: You learn to play like Django Reinhardt and then forget again. If I learned to play like Django Reinhardt, I"d fucking remember it." - Elvis Costello, on Sean Penn
"The usefulness of a cup is in its emptiness" - Bruce Lee
"Show the man the world, the man is shocked" - unknown
"I feel too knowledgable to the point of knowinag I'm not, for this world.. And the world feels too acknowledged to me yet I know ignorance is existent alongside the knowledge." - Acknowledged Ignorant Person
"A person travels everywhere leaving his sorrows behind" -Adam
"Faith, hope, and love. And the greatest of these is love. Money, power, and knowledge. And the greatest of these is power."
"Never give up on a dream just because of the time it will take to accomplish it. The time will pass anyway." - Earl Nightingale
"Better a hundred times not be born; But if we must see the light, The least harm is still to return Where you come from, and the sooner the better!" -Sophocles
"What comes easy wont last and what lasts won't come easy." - Unknown
"The greatest teacher, failure is" - Yoda
"The less you talk, the more you're listened to." - Pauline Phillips
"They"re in love with this idea called love, it"s a shame that they believe it"ll come for us all." - The Weeknd "Wanderlust"
"Honest hearts produce honest actions." - Brigham Young
"Would you mind if that post, pic, comment or content was seen tomorrow, next week, next month and next year? If the answer is yes, then don"t post it today." - Loren Weisman
"Love is that priceless thing that a poor can easily have but sometime hard for rich one to get some" - Vaibhav More.
"Is," "is," "is"the idiocy of the word haunts me. If it were abolished, human thought might begin to make sense. I don't know what anything "is"; I only know how it seems to me at this moment." - Robert Anton Wilson
"A man can't ride your back unless it's bent."- Martin Luther King.Jr
"Whatever our souls are made of, his and mine are the same." -Emily Bronte
"If human extinction seems imminent, try to relax. You're just giving cephalopods a shot." - Pahanin Errata
"Life is precious, life is short, and the idiots who made this film are taking two hours of my life, and robbing it from me in order to give me less than nothing." -- Roger Ebert
'Is man one of God's blunders, or is God one of man's blunders?'-Friedrich Nietzsche
"Five percent of people think, ten percent of people think they think, and the other eighty-five percent would rather die than think."  Thomas Edison
"Self-belief is what makes us Successful." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"And now I'm right back where I started. Sober and miserable." - Alyson Noel, Evermore
"I may be drunk, Miss, but in the morning I will be sober and you will still be ugly." - Winston Churchill
"Make your own Bible. Select and collect all the words and sentences that in all your readings have been to you like the blast of a trumpet." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"There was once a man who was frightened by his own shadow and scared of his own footprints, so he tried to escape them by running away." - Zhuangzi
"If you really look closely, most overnight successes took a long time." -Steve Jobs
"Whatever we plant in our subconscious mind and nourish with repetition and emotion will one day become reality." Earl Nightingale
"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have." -- Thomas Jefferson
"Human life is nothing but suffering, and there is no truce in its sentences." -Euripides
"If you're dumb, surround yourself with smart people. If you're smart, surround yourself with smart people who disagree with you." - Aaron Sorkin
"It is one thing to make a mistake, and quite another thing not to admit it. People will forgive mistakes of judgment. But people will not easily forgive the mistakes of ill intention, bad motives, and the prideful justifying cover-up of the first mistake." - Stephen Covey
"Most of us spend too much time on what is urgent and not enough time on what is important." - Stephen Covey
"It is one thing to make a mistake, and quite another thing not to admit it. People will forgive mistakes of judgment. But people will not easily forgive the mistakes of ill intention, bad motives, the prideful justifying cover-up of the first mistake." - Stephen Covey
"One faces the future with one's past." - Pearl S. Buck
"It would be possible to describe everything scientifically, but it would make no sense; it would be without meaning, as if you described a Beethoven symphony as a variation of wave pressure." - Albert Einstein
"Your assumptions are your windows on the world. Scrub them off every once in a while, or the light won't come in." - Isaac Asimov
"We surrender our freedom to the verdicts of strangers." - Nikos Marinos
"If a Writer falls in love with you, you can never die" - Mik Everett
"Stay away from negative people. They have a problem for every solution."  Albert Einstein
"Some things are up to us, and some things are not up to us."  Epictetus
"Every day, in every way, I"m getting better and better"  mile Cou
"There is no God higher than truth" - Gandhi
"If I had eight hours to chop down a tree, I'd spend six sharpening my axe."  Abraham Lincoln
"Where there is a will, there is a way. If there is a chance in a million that you can do something, anything, to keep what you want from ending, do it. Pry the door open or, if need be, wedge your foot in that door and keep it open." Pauline Kael
"Birds born in a cage think flying is an illness"-Alejandro Jodorowsky
"Those who expect to be both ignorant and free, expect what never was and never will be." - Thomas Jefferson
"If you think education is expensive, try ignorance." - Derek Bok.
" It takes one to know one " means, to know the truth you have to experience it and or you have to make connections to it. By Sagar Gorijala.
"The brothers who made the matrix are ladies now"
"The brothers who made the matrix are ladies now" -Peter Griffin
"Kirk beat the Kobayashi Maru by reprogramming the simulator. That"s it." -Sheldon Cooper
"All opinions are not equal. Some are a very great deal more robust, sophisticated and well supported in logic and argument than others." -Douglas Adams
"Once you abandon all truths, all your choices will be the right ones."
"Pride is a commodity that can be purchased again later. One's life is not."
"I find I am much prouder of the victory I obtain over myself, when, in the very ardor of dispute, I make myself submit to my adversary"s force of reason, than I am pleased with the victory I obtain over him through his weakness." - Michel de Montaigne, The Complete Essays
"The man who asks a question is a fool for a minute, the man who does not ask is a fool for life." - Confucius
"Your success will only be as large as your effort"
"There are three types of lies: lies, damn lies, and statistics." - Mark Twain
"Until one has loved an animal, a part of one's soul remains unawakened." -Anatole France
"People are beautiful when they do beautiful things." -Welcome to Night Vale
"Publishing a book does not make you an authority or an expert. Authorship doesn"t not equal authority." - Loren Weisman
"Your assumptions are your windows on the world. Scrub them off every once in a while, or the light won't come in." - Isaac Asimov
"For me, I am driven by two main philosophies: know more today about the world than I knew yesterday and lessen the suffering of others. You'd be surprised how far that gets you."
"Though my soul may set in darkness, it will rise in perfect light; I have loved the stars too fondly to be fearful of the night."
"It isn't pollution that's harming the environment. It's the impurities in our air and water that are doing it. " George W. Bush
"I thought such awful thoughts that I cannot even say them out loud because they would make Jesus want to drink gin straight out of the cat dish."  Anne Lamott
"Life"s too short for a boring book. If the book is boring, put it down. If it doesn"t capture your interest, it"s not your fault, it"s the book"s fault. Life"s too short for a boring book." - My father
"I am very bad inside my mind but I just had a good ability to hide it like many human has" - Vaibhav More
"Don't waste your life watching memes on the Internet" - My mind.
"Against the dark background of the atomic bomb, the United States does not wish merely to present strength, but also the desire and the hope for peace." - Dwight D. Eisenhower
"People shouldn't be afraid of their government. Governments should be afraid of their people." - Alan Moore
"Life was not a valuable gift but death was
"love is a beautiful emotion, but far more empires have been built, books written, wrongs righted, fights won, and ambitions realized out of vengeful desire to prove some critic wrong, than all the love in the world. Love is grand, but hate and fear last longer." -A. G. Martinez
"Love is a beautiful emotion, far more empires have been built, books written, wrongs righted, fights won, and ambitions realized out of vengeful desire to prove some critic wrong, than all the love in the world. Love is grand, but hate and fear last longer." -Antonio Garcia Martinez
"A man who has not passed through the inferno of his passions has never overcome them." [Carl Jung]
"We should never resent the truth, even if it hurts." -Duncan Idaho
"When the world turns its back on you, you turn your back on the world." - Timon The Lion King
"Why do beautiful songs make you sad?' 'Because they aren't true.' 'Never?' 'Nothing is beautiful and true."
"Now I may be an idiot, but there"s one thing I am not sir, and that sir, is an idiot."  Peter Griffin
"Truth does not become more true by virtue of the fact that the entire world agrees with it, nor less so even if the whole world disagrees with it."  Maimonides
"Happiness is not something ready made. It comes from your own actions." - Dalai Lama XIV
"Use only that which works, and take it from any place you can find it." Bruce Lee
"A man will never heed the voice of a woman until it"s too late".  Anonymous
"My name is surrounded with such hate and fear that no one can judge what is the truth and what is false, what is history and what myth."
"Do not mistake intelligence for curiosity. Some of the smartest people will never ask a good question in their life."
"The way love can change a person is truly frightful."
"Don't quote me boy, cuz i ain't said shit" Easy E
"There are two ways to be fooled. One is to believe what isn't true; the other is to refuse to believe what is true." - Sren Kierkegaard
"Why should you continue going after your dreams? Because seeing the look on the faces of the people who said you couldn"t will be priceless." Kevin Ngo
"Too rarely are people seemingly aware, rather exploring grim adverse yearnings." -Me
"Life can only be understood backwards, but it must be lived forwards."
"I haven't been able to tell one car from another since 1924. They all look alike now, the way they make 'em." - *Crack-Up*, 1946
"Christmas is the day that holds all the time together ".
"Shitty beginnings often have composted endings." - Elijah Hutton
"Hate is like acid, it destroys the vessel which holds it."
"Change your life today. Don"t gamble on the future, act now, without delay." Simone de Beauvoir
"For every minute you are angry you lose sixty seconds of happiness." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Cry. Forgive. Learn. Move on. Let your tears water the seeds of your future happiness." - Steve Maraboli
"I'm a success today because I had a friend who believed in me and I didn't have the heart to let him down."
"Don't spend time beating on a wall, hoping to transform it into a door.
"A dream become a goal when action is taken toward its achievement" -Bo Bennett
"There is no teacher but the enemy. No one but the enemy will tell you what the enemy is going to do. No one but the enemy will ever teach you to destroy and conquer. Only the enemy shows you where you are weak. Only the enemy shows you where he is strong." - Orson Scott Card"s Ender"s Game
"Every one of us is, in the cosmic perspective, precious. If a human disagrees with you, let him live. In a hundred billion galaxies, you will not find another." - Carl Sagan, Cosmos
"The truth may be puzzling. It may take some work to grapple with. It may be counter-intuitive. It may contradict deeply held prejudices. It may not be consonant with what we want to be true. But our preferences do not determine what"s true."  Carl Sagan
"It's hard to tell gifts of the spirit from clever counterfeits." The Mountain Goats, Prowl Great Cain
"Life isn't short, you just gotta do more." - Logan Paul
"Tolerance implies no lack of commitment to one's own beliefs. Rather it condemns the oppression or persecution of others. - John F. Kennedy
"Of all the judgments we pass in life, none are more important and difficult to accept than the ones we pass on ourselves." -Nathaniel Branden
"We sleep safely in our beds because rough men stand ready In the night to visit violence upon those who would do us harm."
"Success is a direct result of the number of experiments you perform."
"Opportunity is a haughty goddess who wastes no time with those who are unprepared." - George Samuel Clason
"They say 'life is short', right? But this year, I realized life's not short. You just gotta do more." - Logan Paul 2017
"An eye for an eye will make us all blind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Every skill you acquire doubles your odds of success." -Scott Adams
"I am a forest, and a night of dark trees: but he who is not afraid of my darkness, will find banks full of roses under my cypresses." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Ill shoot you with a bow and arrow, just to watch you die slow." Delusional Thomas
"You lose what you have and then pray it comes back to you better" - Titus Andromedon
"Never regret anything because at one time it was actually what you wanted ... never dwell on the past " @imjohnvee
"Anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job." -Douglas Adams
"Better to be slapped with the truth than kissed with a lie." - Russian proverb.
"The word 'Islam' means 'peace.' The word 'Muslim' means 'one who surrenders to God.' But the press makes us seem like haters." - Muhammad Ali
"If you trust in yourself, and believe in your dreams, and follow your star. . . you'll still get beaten by people who spent their time working hard and learning things and weren't so lazy."  Terry Pratchett (A Hat Full of Sky)
"Is our culture doomed? I ask myself, as I finish putting what is now a full glass of Franzia into my ass."
"The greatest prison people live in is the fear of what other people think." - David Icke
"Dance first. Think later. It's the natural order" - Samuel Beckett
"Books don't need batteries."
" The art challenges the technology, and the technology inspires the art. "  John Lasseter
"These mountains that you are carrying, you were only supposed to climb." -Nayyirah Waheed
"genius is eternal patience" --Michelangelo
"To have committed every crime but that of being a father" -Emil Cioran
"To commit every crime but that of being a father" -Emil Cioran
"The inherent vice of capitalism is the unequal sharing of blessings; the inherent virtue of socialism is the equal sharing of miseries." - Winston Churchill
"The only person that you should be in competition with is the person that you see in the mirror " @imjohnvee
"It takes as much money to smile as to pay rent in this place"
"We are put on this planet to create , not to work like machines " @imjohnvee
"Wanting to be someone else is a waste of who you are." - Kurt Cobain
"Your days pass like rainbows, like a flash of lightning, like a star at dawn. Your life is short. How can you quarrel?" - Gautama Buddha
"Life is a river always flowing. Do not hold onto things. Work hard." - Gautama Buddha
"The best teachers are those who show you where to look, but don't tell you what to see." - Alexandra K. Trenfor
"There is a myth of exceptionalism in America that prevents it from looking outward, and learning from the world." - Umair Haque
"I'm not a cop I'm a fry cook at steak and shake" by a fry cook at steak and shake and not a cop.
"Our house is burning and we look elsewhere. Nature mutilated, overexploited is not able to recover and we refuse to admit it. From North to South, it suffers from ill-development, and we are indifferent. Earth and humanity are in great peril and we are accountable." - Jacques Chirac, 2002.
"Fascism is capitalism in decay." - Vladimir Lenin
"Capitalism is the astounding belief that the most wickedest of men will do the most wickedest of things for the greatest good of everyone." - John Maynard Keynes
"If you do not tell the truth about yourself you cannot tell it about other people." - Virginia Woolf
"Technology is best when it brings people together."
"The best revenge is massive success". Frank Sinatra
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened."
"Man is the only creature who refuses to be what he is." - Albert Camus
"Destroy my desires, eradicate my ideals, show me something better, and I will follow you." -Dostoyevsky
"If someone doesn"t value evidence, what evidence are you going to provide to prove that they should value it? If someone doesn"t value logic, what logical argument could you provide to show the importance of logic?"  Sam Harris
"It's not just that we as individuals can change the world we are changing the world everyday each of us through the choices we make. The world isn't somehow seperate from our actions and passions and beliefs the world is made out of our actions and passions and beliefs."
"Once again rest assured that our brightest days are still to come." - President Donald J. Trump
"Honesty is incompatible with amassing a large fortune." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The mind of America is seized by a fatal dry rot - and it's only a question of time before all that the mind controls will run amuck in a frenzy of stupid, impotent fear." - Hunter S. Thompson
"How deeply insane does one need to be, to notice their own insanity?" - Elijah Hutton
"We have some nightmares, but we also have dreams." - Frank Capra
"I'm too busy working on my own grass to notice if yours is greener." Author Unknown
"The belief in a supernatural source of evil is not necessary; men alone are quite capable of every wickedness." -- Joseph Conrad
"We have grasped the mystery of the atom and rejected the Sermon on the Mount. Ours is a world of nuclear giants and ethical infants." -- Omar Bradley
"All is not lost, all is not lost. Become who you are. It happens once in a lifetime."
"All is not lost, all is not lost. Become who you are. It happens once in a lifetime."
"Where there is little risk, there is little reward" - Evel Knievel
"The world is not beautiful, therefore it is." - Keiichi Sigsawa in Kino no Tabi
"I hate people that say, "He's a nice person once you get to know him." Might as well just say, "He's a dickhead, but you'll get used to it." - Unknown
"It's okay to be scared. Being scared means you're about to do something really, really brave." - Mandy Hale
"The best way to predict the future is to create it."
"Backing up your argument with unnamed sources, rumored facts &amp; hearsay only backs your view and your professional reputation into a corner." - Loren Weisman
"Completely overcoming laziness is possible only by two means; either because of fear of not doing or because of love of doing."
"And if all that is meaningless, I want to be cured. Of a craving for something I cannot find, and of the shame of never finding it." - T.S. Eliot
"You have to be odd to be number one."
"life is learning, and one must always learn" -Mayoo Indiran-
"Every man walks his own path, and every path has its fair share of locked doors. You never know who holds the key to a door you"ll need to open one day, so you best treat people as if they are all keyholders." - A.J. Darkholme
"Whenever you do a thing, act as if all the world were watching" . Thomas Jefferson
"The best part of doing something bad is when you stop"
"The French love the cock" David Seymour NZ act party
"Life exists only at this very moment, and in this moment it is infinite and eternal, for the present moment is infinitely small; before we can measure it, it has gone, and yet it exists forever" - Allan Watts
"Logic will get you from A to B. imagination will take you everywhere." Albert Einstein
"Logic will get you from A to Z, imagination will get you everywhere." - Albert Einstein
"The more hypersensitive you are to discomfort, the less happy you will be; so don't give a fuck about inconvenience: be a Viking." - Odin
'I don't want to be the other half of your soul. I want to be the one who reminds you that you're already whole'. - G.S.
"Find a place inside where there's joy, and the joy will burn out the pain." Joseph Campbell
"Search for the seed of good in every adversity." Og Mandino
"Ask something you regret and at least you will have an answer. Leave something unsaid and you will wish for the simplicity of regret." - Elijah Hutton
"No one has a greater asset for his business than a man's pride in his work." - Hosea Ballou
"If you need inspiring words, don't do it." Elon Musk
"Don't see it as a problem but see it as an opportunity" -unknown
"My fault, my failure, is not in the passions I have, but in my lack of control of them." - Jack Kerouac
"Talent hits a target no one else can hit, Genius hits a target no one else can see." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Time passes quickly; find the value and quality in it as there is no option for quantity." - B. James Newark
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"Children have a rhyme: 'Sicks and Stones shatter bones, but names can never hurt you' They are children, What know they of the truth of things?' -Peter David spoken from Galen to Vir in Babylon 5 Armies of Light and Dark
"Wise men speak because they have something to say, Fools because they have to say something." -Plato
''If you don't behave as you believe, you will end by believing as you behave.'' - Fulton J. Sheen
"It's never too late to love yourself again." - Bryant McGill
"Whoever is careless with the truth in small matters cannot be trusted with important matters" - Albert Einstein
"I look forward to a great future for America - a future in which our country will match its military strength with our moral restraint, its wealth with our wisdom, its power with our purpose." - John F. Kennedy
"To learn who rules over you in society, simply find out who you are not allowed to criticize"  Voltaire
"America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves." - Abraham Lincoln
"Time goes on. So whatever you"re going to do, do it. Do it now. Don"t wait." Robert De Niro
"Life is short, and it is here to be lived." Kate Winslet
"sometimes even music cannot substitute for tears"
"When I was a young man, I admired clever people. Now that I am older, I admire kind people." -Rabbi Milton Steinberg
"You don"t remember what happened. What you remember becomes what happened." John Green
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves." - Carl Jung
"you are the snakeskin and I keep shedding you somehow, my mind is forgetting every exquisite detail of your face, the letting go has become the forgetting, which is the most pleasant and saddest thing to have happened" -Rupi Kaur
"Sometimes people don't want to hear the truth because they don't want their illusions destroyed." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"A little progress everyday add up to BIG results."
"Do not seek to follow in the footsteps of the wise; seek what they sought."  Matsuo Basho
"A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer." - Bruce Lee
"I'm assualting you with a stolen house"- A friend of mine
"The true man wants two things: danger and play. For that reason he wants a woman, as the most dangerous plaything." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Get gabbin" or get going!" -NPC from World of Warcraft
"Socialism never took root in America because the poor see themselves not as an exploited proletariat, but as temporarily embarrassed millionaires." - John Steinbeck
"... As soon as I reflect, I can see that clinging to these hatreds will contribute nothing either to my security or to my happiness..." - Baruch Spinoza, Ethics
"Maturing is realizing how many things don"t require your comment." - Rachel Wolchin
"What can I do, I'm just a person. This is the line we always seem to hear. You just sit, things get worse and watch TV and drink your beer." - Charles Manson
"The way many aspiring entrepreneurs eat up motivation without information or direction is a root cause of so many failures today. They are ready to spend a fortune to be inspired to do the work, but won't spend a penny on learning what work needs to be done and how to do it." - Loren Weisman
"I wish we never had kids" - your mom
"Whatever others are committing to us, we'll sort of deal with it somehow. Worse it is with what we have committed on ourselves" - Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"Wouldn't you like to be a pepper too?" - # 5
"Since you make evil or good by your own thoughts, it is your ruling of your thoughts which proves to be your principal concern." William James
"I reject your reality and substitute my own!" - Adam Savage (Mythbusters)
'...and anything a man knows, anything he has not merely heard rumbling and roaring, can be said in three words.' Kurnberger
'... is some riddle solved by my surviving forever?' Ludwig Wittgenstein
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"Fire tries gold, misfortune tries brave men." --Seneca
"We would rather see those to whom we have done a benefit, than those who have done us one." Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of strong." Mahatma Gandhi
"Women are made to be loved, not understood." - Oscar Wilde
"Never allow someone to be your priority while allowing yourself to be their option." - Mark Twain
"Stress is caused by the difference between the way things are and the way we want them to be." - Anonymous
"GENIUS IS ETERNAL PATIENCE." --Michelangelo
"Did you ever notice that when you blow in a dog"s face he gets mad at you? But when you take him in a car, he sticks his head out the window." - Steve Bluestone
"One day I will find the right words, and they will be simple." -Jack Kerouac, The Dharma Bums
"There are over 550 million firearms in worldwide circulation. That's one firearm for every twelve people on the planet. The only question is: How do we arm the other 11?" -Yuri Orlov
"Maturing is realizing how many things don"t require your comment." Rachel Wolchin
"So I walked back to my room and collapsed on the bottom bunk, thinking that if people were rain, I was drizzle and she was a hurricane." - John Green
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself." - Rumi
"You can"t wake a person who is pretending to be asleep." - Navajo proverb
"Take away the veil of darkness and your Demons are frightened." - Elijah Hutton
"Free government cannot long endure if property is largely in a few hands and large masses of people are unable to earn homes, education, and a support in old age." -Rutherford B. Hayes
"If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you erase yourself" - Louis C.K.
"If you run into an asshole in the morning, you ran into an asshole. If you run into assholes all day, you're the asshole." -Raylan Givens, Justified
"If I knew what was in those diaries I would have taken them." - Karl Josef Silberbauer (The Nazi officer who arrested Anne Frank)
"If you argue for your limitations, you get to keep them. Leap and grow your wings on the way down." Les Brown
"You get a strange feeling when you"re about to leave a place. Like you"ll not only miss the people you love but you"ll miss the person you are now at this time and this place, because you"ll never be this way ever again." - Azar Nafisi
"Let the waters settle, and you will see the moon and the stars mirrored in your own being." - Rumi
"He rippled one hand through the air as if mimicking the turbulent waves, but was frustrated to see she didn't understand his gesticulations." - Kathryn Hockett (Gentle Warrior)
"Regardless of my transient joys, I am never free of a feeling of melancholy which somehow forms the base of my heart." -Chopin
"There are awesome things worth dying for...there is nothing worth killing for." -Dick Gregory
"A sane is often sad whereas a stupid is most of the time glad. "- Romania
"Scout made an obscene suggestion about her and her bridge." - Temperatures Rising by Sandra Brown
"Our mind is not a vessel to be filled but a fire to be kindled" - Plutarch
"To determine the true rulers of any society, all you must do is ask yourself this question: Who is it that I am not permitted to criticize?" - Voltaire
"It takes a long time to grow an old friend." - John Leonard
"The gods like to play a trick on famous composers, by making them deaf. This often backfires, since, of course, being deaf doesn't stop them hearing the music in their heads, it just prevents them from hearing the distraction." - Terry Pratchett
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." William Shakespeare
"Tell your kids that you love them daily. That way when you discipline them. They will believe you." - James Thomas
"Take pride in what others try to hide." - Blaine Ludy
"I choose you. And I'll choose you over and over and over. Without pause, without a doubt, in a heartbeat. I'll keep choosing you." - Unknown
"Think with your heart and move with your head" - KONGOS
"Until you make the unconscious conscious, it will direct your life and you will call it fate." - Carl Jung
 "The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be." - Jeff Olson
"The happiness of your life depends upon the quality of your thoughts." - Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"Never tell the truth to people who are not worthy of it." - Mark Twain
"Someone else is happy with less than what you have." - Mandy Adith
"I love you not for the way you speak or the way you smile or the way your beautiful eyes stare into my soul. I love you because everytime I think of you I feel like a lost traveller, who has finally found the way back home - Jiteshkhanna
"Life is what happens to you while you"re busy making other plans". John Lennon
" Never hit a lady, but don"t hesitate to curb stomp a bitch."
*Daughter*: "What happens when you stop loving someone... Or when He stops loving you? *Mother*: "-Well, you cry a little, and wait for the Sun to come out. It always does." --The Sound of Music
"The past can never change but future is still in your power" - Azhar Sabri
"I have found the best way to give advice to your children is to find out what they want and advise them to do it." - Harry Truman
"Vengeful words will always taste sweeter in your own mouth." - Elijah Hutton
"An eye for an eye will only make the whole world blind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"I asked a Burmese why women, after centuries of following their men, now walk ahead. He said there were many unexploded land mines since the war."  Robert Mueller
"If your number one goal is to make sure that everyone likes and approves of you, then you risk sacrificing your uniqueness, and, therefore, your excellence." -Unknown
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"If you don"t climb the mountain, you can"t see the view." - Harvey Mackay
"A tongue has no bones but it is strong enough to break a heart. Be careful with the words you speak to those you care about." - Random
"Not everyone gets to be in the parade. Someone has to watch." - Mr. Walker
"Some people grow old, but they never grow up." - Domics
"A thinker sees his own actions as experiments and questions--as attempts to find out something. Success and failure are for him answers above all." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"It would be possible to describe everything scientifically, but it would make no sense; it would be without meaning, as if you described a Beethoven symphony as a variation of wave pressure.
"Your assumptions are your windows on the world. Scrub them off every once in a while, or the light won't come in."
"Space is big. You just won't believe how vastly, hugely, mind-bogglingly big it is. I mean, you may think it's a long way down the road to the chemist's, but that's just peanuts to space.
"Forgive many things in others; nothing in yourself." - Ausonius
"After I'm dead I'd rather have people ask why I have no monument than why I have one" - Cato The Elder
"Don't tell me the sky's the limit when there are footprints on the moon"  Paul Brandt
"Be happy with who you are and what you do, and you can do anything you want."
[Quote too long for title] Takasu Ryuuji and Aisaka Taiga, about love.
"Even the word hopeless is not devoid of hope.' -Blinkous 'Blinky' Galadrigal(Trollhunters)
"When someone leaves your life, those exits are not made equal. Some are beautiful, and poetic, and satisfying. Others are abrupt and unfair. But most are just unremarkable, unintentional, clumsy." Griffin McElroy
"If there is any one secret of success, it lies in the ability to get the other person"s point of view and see things from that person"s angle as well as from your own." - Henry Ford
"Spend fiddies, pet kitties, suck titties." -Unknown
"In order to be effective truth must penetrate like an arrow - and that is likely to hurt." - Wei Wu Wei
"The average 70-year-old, is just an 11-year-old with 59 years of experience."  Jed McKenna
"The average 70-year-old, is just an 11-year-old with 59 years of experience."  Jed McKenna
"God didn't promise days without pain, sun without rain, but He did promise strength for the day and light for the way"- Randy Awkings
"At some point in your childhood, you and your friends went outside to play together for the last time, and nobody knew it" - Unknown
"Let the past die. Kill it, if you have to. That's the only way to become what you were meant to be." -Kylo Ren
'Democracy is beautiful in theory; in practice it is a fallacy. You in America will see that some day.' -Benito Mussolini
"Where I walk, the crowd parts." -rbf
"The bottom line is, insults only hurt when they come from someone I respect." - Kresley Cole
"If only I didn't have social anxiety... what the world would look like." -Unknown
"I'm not sorry for some of the things I've done, just to feel a little love." -??
"Wanting positive experience is a negative experience; accepting negative experience is a positive experience" - ???
"You say 'happiness', I say 'Ha, penis' " - Shin Chan
"Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know." -Ernest Hemingway
"Some people in this world can be represented by fire. They're not here to hurt anyone, it's only when you get too close for too long that you get hurt." - Me
"Yesterday is but today's memory,tomorrow is today's dream " Khalil Gibran
!ereH leahciM ecuasV yeH - Michael Stevens
"The people who have nothing are the ones who have everything."
"If anyone tells you that a certain person speaks ill of you, do not make excuses about what is said of you but answer, "He was ignorant of my other faults, else he would not have mentioned these alone." - Epictetus
"To err is human; to forgive divine." - Alexander Pope
"I wish I could show you, when you are lonely or in darkness, the astonishing light of your own being." - Hafiz
"To worry is to hold onto a cloud. You cannot grasp air that moves continuously; rain only loosens your grip."
"Dreaming is good until it's the only thing you're doing." -rbf
"A lot of parents will do anything for their kids, except let them be themselves" - Banksy
"The way to get started is to quite talking and begin doing". Walt Disney
"Communism is vital for a functioning penis." -Eugene Khim
"Two of my favorite things are sitting on my front porch smoking a pipe of sweet hemp, and playing my Hohner harmonica."  Abraham Lincoln
"Make the most you can of the Indian Hemp seed and sow it everywhere." -President George Washington, 1794
"Remember that there is nothing stable in human affairs; therefore avoid undue elation in prosperity, or undue depression in adversity." Isocrates
"Dreams are illustrations...from the book your soul is writing about you." Marsha Norman
"One day your life will flash before your eyes, make sure it's worth watching." - Gerard Way
"Never argue with stupid people. They will drag you down to their level, and beat you with experience."
"Corporations are people. People who need tax breaks paid for by actual people." Ancient Republican proverb
"Feminists are desperately anxious to prove that women are as strong and as capable as men. Clearly they are nagged by a fear that women may NOT be as strong and as capable as men." -Kaczynski
"all is going to be fine in the end. If it is not yet fine, it is not yet the end." - Oscar Wilde
"Life is an orchestra that plays all kinds of music, and we are supposed to dance along."
"The whole point of getting things done is knowing what to leave undone." - Oswald Chambers
"The optimist, as you probably know, is a person who, when he wears out his shoes, just figures he's back on his feet." -Hartman Rector, Jr.
"A wise man once said nothing." - Unknown
"A Wise man once said Nothing." - Unknown
"Too many people go through life waiting for things to happen instead of making them happen!" - Myself
"A champion is someone who gets up, even when he can't." - Edgar A.
"Sometimes it takes a good fall to really know where you stand" - Hayley Williams
"You can't go back and change the beginning, but you can start where you are and change the ending." - C.S. Lewis.
"Cry. Forgive. Learn. Move on. Let your tears water the seeds of your future happiness." - Steve Maraboli
"It is difficult for me to imagine what 'personal liberty' is enjoyed by an unemployed hungry person".-Joseph Stalin.
"I'd rather laugh with the sinners than cry with the saints. The sinners are much more fun. Only the good die young." - Billy Joel
"The flower that blooms in adversity is the rarest and most beautiful of all." - Mulan
"Once you go smooth sack, you never go back" - Spencer G. Sotelo, 2014
"Even if all the experts agree, they may well be mistaken." - Bertrand Russell
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people are so full of doubts." - Bertrand Russell
"When in doubt, be yourself."
"Laughter is like a windshield wiper, it doesn't stop the rain but allows us to keep going." - Unknown
"We ask 18-year-olds to make huge decisions about their career and financial future, when a month ago they had to ask to go to the bathroom." -Adam Kotsko
"Giving Up And Letting Go Are Two Totally Different Things That Means Exactly The Same Thing...You Loose. But Sometime When We Loose, We Win" - Dr zeus
"Times have not become more violent. They have just become more televised." - Marilyn Manson
"When the people fear the government, there is tyranny; when the government fears the people, there is liberty." Thomas Jefferson
"Someone is sitting in the shade today because someone planted a seed a long time ago." - Warren Buffet.
"Make bold choices and make mistakes. It's all those things that add up to the person you become" . Angelina Jolie
"Ignorance might be bliss for the ignorant, but for the rest of us it's a right fucking pain in the arse" - Ricky Gervais
"Don"t make a habit out of choosing what feels good over what"s actually good for you" - Eric Thomas
"How did it get so late so soon?" - Dr. Seuss
"It is important to note that Internet access is not a necessity in the day-to-day lives of Americans and doesn"t even come close to the threshold to be considered a basic human right." - Michael O'Rielly, FCC Commissioner, June 2015
"If I quit now, I will soon be back to where I started. And when I started I was desperately wishing to be where I am now." - Unknown
"If I quit now, I will soon be back to where I started. And when I started I was desperately wishing to be where I am now." - Unknown
"It is a fair summary of constitutional history that the landmarks of our liberties have often been forged in cases involving not very nice people." -- Felix Frankfurter (US Supreme Court Justice)
"Periods of tranquility are seldom prolific of creative achievement. Mankind has to be stirred up." - Alfred North Whitehead
"It seems to me that if you or I must choose between two courses of thought or action, we should remember our dying and try so to live that our death brings no pleasure to the world." - John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"I like to make up my own quotes and attribute them to very smart people so that I can use them to win arguments" - Albert Einstein
"I suspect that the neural circuits that we use to lie to others, also censor our own thoughts." - Eliezer Yudkowsky
"Sharing pictures of yourself in front of houses you don"t own, standing by cars you don"t drive, and holding money that isn"t yours as you lie that it is, only sets you up for questions you can"t answer and a completely false foundation." - Loren Weisman
"Fairytales are more than true. Not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten." -Neil Gaiman
"To vote is to wield authority; it is the supreme authority from which all other authority derives... Force if you will!the franchise is force, naked and raw, the Power of the Rods and the Ax. Whether it is exerted by ten men or by ten billion, political authority is force." - Robert A. Heinlein
"That man is the richest whose pleasures are the cheapest." - Henry David Thoreau
"[May you] scorn the pleasure that comes from the majority"s approval. The many speak highly of you, but have you really any grounds for satisfaction with yourself if you are the kind of person the many understand? Your merits should not be outward facing." - Seneca
"It began in mystery, and it will end in mystery, but what a savage and beautiful country lies in between." - Diane Ackerman
"To attribute some purpose or end to political community in advance would seem to preempt the right of citizens to decide for themselves. It also risks imposing values not everyone shares" - Michael J. Sandel
"Truth comes first because it is for ever while loyalty has to be continuously earned!" - Jessica Alba
"A person who speaks out often the thoughts with the word "YOU" seems to be in some sort of baseless hue of superiority that s/he has an authority to give all an advice &amp; they have to think her/him as wise." - Dr. Rich
"Belief is the death of intelligence. If one can only see things according to one's own belief system, one is destined to become virtually deaf, dumb, and blind." - Robert Anton Wilson
"When the Know-Nothings get control, it will read "all men are created equal, except Negroes, and foreigners, and Catholics." When it comes to this I should prefer emigrating to some country where they make no pretense of loving liberty-to Russia, for instance.." - Abraham Lincoln
"Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life" Steve Jobs
"One needs to be slow to form convictions, but once formed they must be defended against the heaviest odds." - Mahatma Gandhi
"O, do not pray for easy lives. Pray to be stronger...! Do not pray for tasks equal to your powers. Pray for powers equal to your tasks!" - Phillips Brooks
"God promised us eternal life. But god did not posses the power at that time, so he created Minecraft"
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself". George Bernard Shaw
"There's a world of difference between truth and facts. Facts can obscure the truth." - Maya Angelou
"It is my belief that foreign travel narrows the mind wonderfully." - Warhammer 40k
"The more a person loves to have online likes on own face, the less should be believed on whatever s/he says." - Anuj Somany
"An emerald shines even if it's worth is not spoken of." - Marcus Aurelius
"Love bears all things, believes all things, hopes all things, endures all things."
"Start where you are. Use what you have. Do what you can." Arthur Ashe
"I'm a success today because I had a friend who believed in me and I didn't have the heart to let him down."  Abraham Lincoln
"I find a duck's opinion of me is very much influenced by whether or not I have bread." - Mitch Hedberg
"The best and most beautiful things in this world cannot be seen or even heard, but must be felt with the heart."  Helen Keller
"Pessimists are idiots for ignoring success. Optimists are idiots for ignoring issues. As With everything in life, the best people are the least extreme."-Unknown
"Bones heal, Pain is Temporary, and Chicks dig Scars" -Evel Knievel
"Life is a storm, my young friend. You will bask in the sunlight one moment, be shattered on the rocks the next. What makes you a man is what you do when that storm comes." - Alexandre Dumas, The Count of Monte Cristo
"We are process, not reality..."
"Repugnant is a creature who would squander the ability to lift an eye to heaven conscious of his fleeting time here." - Tool
"Just imagine the silence in the world, if people talked only what they knew.." - Karel Capek
"To a man with a hammer, everything looks like a nail." - Mark Twain.
"Be thankful for being imperfect as then we always have the enjoyment of learning and growing!" - - Adrian McGinn
"Gluttony is the act of digging a grave with your own teeth." - Enock Maregesi
"You can have an easy life, or you can grow, but you can't do both." - Anonymous
"On the last day on earth, the person you became will meet the person you could have become." - Anonymous
"Listen more than you talk. Nobody learned anything by hearing themselves speak" - Richard Branson
"Life consists of two days, one for you and one against you. So when it"s for you, don"t be proud and reckless. And when it"s against you, be patient for both days are a test for you" Imam Ali
"Paradoxically, the increasingly democratic dissemination of information, rather than producing an educated public, has instead created an army of ill-informed and angry citizens who denounce intellectual achievement and distrust experts."
"Words may inspire but only action creates change." (-Simon Sinek)
"I'd rather learn from one bird how to sing than teach ten thousand stars how not to dance." (-E.E. Cummings)
"I LOVE YOU, AND THAT'S THE BEGINNING AND THE END OF EVERYTHING" - F. SCOTT FITZGERALD
"In the process of trying to find a way to take away the pain, she came to realize she took away the ability to feel at all."
"You don"t choose your family. They are God"s gift to you, as you are to them" - Desmond Tutu
"If you always make the right choice, you haven"t truly lived" -Myself
"Simplicity is perfection in disguise" - Unknown
"Only you and you alone can change your situation. Don't blame it on anything or anyone". Leonardo Dicaprio
"Small opportunities are often the beginning of great enterprises."  Demosthenes
"Love" is when someone trusts you, more than you trust yourself.
"The problem with inner child is that if it keeps showing too often, people label you as childish." - Shon Mehta
?
"it is a tragic story... but it's not all sad... I think there's more in my future than my past" - Steve Gleason
"Stories are never told of the ones who stayed the same, only of those who changed." -Anonymous
"The arc of the moral universe is long, but it bends toward justice." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"LIFE IS PAIN I HATE-" - Jeremy "The Hotdog" Elbertson
"I like the night. Without the dark, we'd never see the stars." - Stephenie Meyer, Twilight
"I used to think the worst think in life was to end up alone, it's not. The worst thing is life is to end up with people who make you feel alone." - Robin Williams
"What is freedom of expression? Without the freedom to offend, it ceases to exist." -Salman Rushdie
"A guy named Adolf Hitler won an election in 1932 ... and 50 million people died as a result ... what I learned as a little kid is that politics is, in fact, very important." - Bernie Sanders
"People manufacture drama so they can get through their lives because they are so empty"
"Right is right even if everyone is against it. Wrong is wrong even if everyone is for it." - William Penn
"Do or do not, there is no try." -Master Yoda
"It"s no use going back to yesterday, because I was a different person then." - Lewis Carroll
"The lizard that falls high from the iroko tree to the ground praises itself if no one else did"- Chinua Achebe. African quote.
"Only a Sith deals in absolutes." - Obi-Wan Kenobi, Jedi master
"In my experience, desire is desire, love is love. I have never fallen for individuals . I know this is hard for people to do ,but I don't understand why it's so hard when it's so obvious."
"Hate is increased by being returned, but can be destroyed by love." - Baruch Spinoza, Ethics
"America would not be the world capital of incarceration if it could figure out a way to intervene in the lives of young men before they commit acts of violence, rather than after." Burl Cain, warden of Angola Penitentiary
"The victory that counts is the one that endures" -Edward Foley
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you." - Maya Angelou, I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings
"The most beautiful experience we can have is the mysterious. It is the fundamental emotion that stands at the cradle of true art and true science."
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"The fact that we live at the bottom of a deep gravity well, on the surface of a gas covered planet going around a nuclear fireball 90 million miles away and think this to be normal is obviously some indication of how skewed our perspective tends to be."
"Never attribute to malevolence what is merely due to incompetence" - Arthur C. Clarke, 3001: The Final Odyssey"
"I fear the day that technology will surpass our human interaction. The world will have a generation of idiots." - Albert Einstein
"Effective branding comes down to creating a sense of comfort, recognition, and trust in your engagement, your message, and your products. It is more about the content and message than the logo and the colors." - Loren Weisman
"Live the wonderful life that is in you" - Oscar Wilde
"he placed his hands on my mind before reaching for my waist my hips or my lips he didn't call me beautiful first he called me exquisite - how he touches me" - Rupi Kaur, Milk and Honey
"The kindest words my father said to me Women like you drown oceans." - Rupi Kaur, Milk and Honey
"And in the end, we were all just humans, drunk on the idea that love, only love, could heal our brokenness." - Christopher Poindexter, Naked Human
"I will never, ever believe in the words "too late" because it is never too late to be exactly who you wish, do exactly what you should, say exactly what needs to be heard, and live the exact life you should be living." - Tyler Knott Gregson, Chasers of the Light: Poems from the Typewriter Series
" the wind will drive the clouds and the little stars will shine"Lambosid
"The wind will drive the clouds and the little stars will shine"lambosid
"It's alright now. I learned my lesson well. You can't please everyone, so you got to please yourself." - Rick Nelson
"Dreaming is not enough for what we desire, we must work hard to achieve it." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"If you're going through hell, keep going" . Winston Churchill
"We are all born ignorant, but one must work hard to remain stupid." - Benjamin Franklin.
"If you don't enjoy the process to achieve something, you don't deserve it" -Me
"All kings are jaded on the battlefield"
"Volatility is greatest at turning points, diminishing as a new trend becomes established." George Soros
"What we think is not always right and the thing which is right, we don't bother to think." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing."
"Don't think or judge, just listen." - Sarah Dessen, Just Listen
"We believe in ordinary acts of bravery, in the courage that drives one person to stand up for another." - Veronica Roth, Divergent
"I can't go on. I must go on. I will go on" - Anon
"Death smiles at us all. All a man can do is smile back." Marcus Aurelius
"If you make people think they're thinking, they'll love you; but if you really make them think, they'll hate you."  Don Marquis
"A lot of times people who make accusations..."
"You can't bring Trump down by revealing what a piece of shit he is, he campaigned as the biggest piece of shit in America. That's what his voters signed up for. The sky is blue, water is wet, Trump is a piece of shit. It is known. No minds will be changed by this." -/u/foldingcouch
"You can have it all. Just not all at once."
"And all you touch and all you see / Is all your life will ever be" - Pink Floyd
"When the debate is lost, slander becomes the tool of the loser" - Socrates
"No snowflake in an avalanche ever feels responsible." - Stanislaw Jerzy Lec
"When someone wrongs us, we want the maximum amount of punishment. But when we do wrong, we want the maximum amount of understanding and forgiveness."  someone on Humans of Newyork
"When someone wrongs us, we want the maximum amount of punishment. But when we do wrong, we want the maximum amount of understanding and forgiveness."  someone on Humans of Newyork
"My biggest fear is that people will see me the way I see myself"- Anonymous
"Sometimes I wonder whether the world is being run by smart people who are putting us on or by imbeciles who really mean it." - Laurence J. Peter
'Your not going to be happy unless your going mach 2 with your hair on fire, and you know it' - Charlie speaking to Maverick
"Humanity's soul must be shaken to its very depths, frightened by unfathomable and seemingly senseless crimes. Crimes that benefit no one, whose only objective is to inspire fear and terror. Because the ultimate purpose of crime is to establish the endless empire of crime." - Dr. Mabuse
"All quotes on the internet are true." - Albert Einstein
"A person's a person, No matter how small." Dr Seuss
"Money is power and power gives you choice."
"No tree, it is said, can grow to heaven unless its roots reach down to hell" - Carl Jung
"We do have a distorted view of our fantasies in society, but that's because we don't talk about them enough." - Sasha Grey
"I would be very proud if, one day, I"m held in the same esteem as George Best or Beckham. It"s what I"m working hard towards."  Cristiano Ronaldo
"What we think, we become." -Buddha
"The biggest communication problem is we do not listen to understand. We listen to reply." - Stephen R. Covey.
"For A Great Low Rate You Can Get Online, Go To The General And Save Some Time!" -The General
"Give people what you could never give yourself" -mee
"If you judge people, you have no time to love them". Mother Teresa
"We have the Right to Dream for what we want to Achieve." - Krishnendu Pramanick
"It is truly astounding that in the time of human history, suffrage and equality is still not fully upon the women of the Earth. Those men who perpetuate patriarchy may denounce the abilities of women, but who reprimands them when they get home late from work?" -Mark Twain
"To be Happier, Healthier, and Wealthier choose a Positive Mental Attitude. React and respond Positively. That"s the biggest wealth of life." - Myself
"Worries come and worries goThey challenge us and make us Grow!" - Zed
"To believe in something, and not to live it, is dishonest." - Mahatma Gandhi
"I can't give you a sure-fire formula for success, but I can give you a formula for failure: try to please everybody all the time." - Herbert Bayard Swope
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston S. Churchill
"My brain is only a receiver. Within the Universe there is a core from which we obtain knowledge, strength, and inspiration. I have not penetrated into the secrets of this core, but I know that it exists." (Nikola Tesla)
'The saddest truth about life is that it goes by'
"There are two things a person should never worry about: things they can help, and things they cannot." -Plato
[Meta][Discussion] What's the best variation on a quote similar to "Learn to be comfortable with being uncomfortable."?
"An archaeologist is the best husband a woman can have The older she gets the most interested he is in her." - Agatha cristie
"It is possible that longing for something is better than actually having it. I've heard it said that satisfaction is the death of desire." Hank Moody, Californication
"In a country well governed, poverty is something to be ashamed of. In a country badly governed, wealth is something to be ashamed of." - Confucius
"You're my oxygen and I'm dying to breathe"- Unknown
"'What time is it?' said the judge to Joey when they met./ 'Five to ten,' said Joey. The judge says, 'That"s exactly what you get.'" - Bob Dylan
"'What time is it?' said the judge to Joey when they met./ 'Five to ten,' said Joey. The judge says, 'That"s exactly what you get.'"
"Science without religion is lame. Religion without science is blind." - Albert Einstein
"A witty saying proves nothing." - Voltaire
"Adversity reveals genius. Prosperity conceals it." - Horace
"You may be hurt if you love too much, but you will live in misery if you love too little."-Napoleon Hill
"She is both the disease and the cure" -unknown
"Good judgment comes from experience, and a lot of that comes from bad judgment." - Will Rogers
"You're on a spiritual journey, period, and we're all going to end up at the same place, if there is such a thing. And maybe there isn't. Maybe there's just this and that's it. There's me and a teacup, that's it. There's us. We're the universe, man. I like that, that's fine." - Jim Carrey
"Live as if you were living a second time, and as though you had acted wrongly the first time." Viktor E. Frankl
"Let everyone else call your idea crazy... just keep going. Don't stop. Don't even think about stopping until you get there, and don't give much thought to where 'there' is. Whatever comes, just don't stop." -Phil Knight
"Never regret something, because at one point everything you did was exactly what you wanted to do. And sometimes that"s the hardest thing to realize." - Kid Cudi
"If at first you don't succeed, try, try again. Then quit. No use being a damn fool about it.
"I can't give you a sure-fire formula for success, but I can give you a formula for failure: try to please everybody all the time." - Herbert Bayard Swope
"The American is the Englishman left to himself." --Alexis de Tocqueville
"The foolish man seeks happiness in the distance; the wise grows it under his feet." James Openheim
'People are locking their doors and switching off their nervous systems...' JG Ballard
"To love is nothing. To be loved is something. But to love and be loved, that"s everything." - T. Tolis
"In wine there is wisdom, in beer there is strength, in water there is bacteria." -David Auerbach
"The purpose of war is peace " Pablo Escobar
"Being entirely honest with oneself is a good exercise." - Sigmund Freud
"He who learns must suffer. And even in our sleep pain that cannot forget falls drop by drop upon the heart, and in our own despair, against our will, comes wisdom to us by the awful grace of God." -Aeschylus
"When you are dead, you do not know that you are dead. All of the pain is felt by others. The same thing happens when you are stupid." - Unknown.
"We hardly ever realize that we can cut anything out of our lives, anytime, in the blink of an eye."
"Freedom is not worth having if it does not include the freedom to make mistakes" - Mahatma Gandhi
"Have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow know what you truly want to become". Steve Jobs
"My story isn't sweet and harmonious, like invented stories. It tastes of folly and bewilderment, of madness and dream, like the life of all people who no longer want to lie to themselves" - Hermann Hesse
"The meaning of life is to live"-unknown
"If you run into an asshole in the morning, you ran into an asshole. If you run into assholes all day, you're the asshole." -Raylan Givens, Justified
"When you"re attacking FBI agents because you"re under criminal investigation, you"re losing." -Sarah Huckabee Sanders
"I am a God amongst myself" - my little bother, very enthusiastically
"If I go first, I'll wait for you there..."
"It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not." - Andr Gide, Autumn Leaves
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"The wealthy, on their part, had no sooner begun to taste the pleasure of command, than they disdained all others, and, using their old slaves to acquire new, thought of nothing but subduing and enslaving their neighbors." -Rousseau, Discourse on Inequality (1754)
"On particularly rough days when I"m sure I can"t possibly endure, I like to remind myself that my track record for getting through bad days so far is 100%. And that"s pretty good."
"On particularly rough days when I'm sure I can't possibly endure, I like to remind myself that my track record for getting through bad days so far is 100%. And that's pretty good." -- Unknown
"Things like that happen all the time in this great big world of ours. It`s like taking a boat out on a beautiful lake on a beautiful day and thinking both the sky and the lake are beautiful." - Haruki Murakami
"Talk to yourself like you would to someone you love."  Bren Brown
"The beautiful thing about learning is that no one can take it away from you." (-B.B. King)
"I'm not farting, my butt is clapping." - Self Quote
"I'm not farting, my but is clapping." - Self Quote
"If you want to change the way people respond to you, change the way you respond to people." -Timothy Leary
"Don"t ask what the world needs. Ask what makes you come alive and go do it. Because what the world needs is more people who have come alive." - Howard Thurman
"I want to live my life, not record it." - Jackie Kennedy
"If you want to be happy, do not dwell in the past, do not worry about the future, focus on living fully in the present." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"I am a composer, not a fortuneteller" -Finnish composer Jean Sibelius to his wife Aino when asked when is he going to return from a drinking binge.
"So stop eating yourself up. Things will go where they're supposed to go if you just let them take their natural course" - Haruki Murakami
"And I, who imagined I would live forever, what am I becoming ? But that I've spent a lifetime on and in this world where you lived is a truth and a beauty forever, and death itself can't do anything against me." - Jean d'Ormesson, 92 french writer, passed away hours after writing these last lines.
"She reminded him that the weak would never enter the kingdom of love, which is a harsh and ungenerous kingdom, and that women give themselves only to men of resolute spirit, who provide the security they need in order to face life." - Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"There is no sinner without a future and no saint without a past" (st.augustine)
"There is no pain too unbearable to handle unless it literally kills you."
"All happiness depends on courage and work." - Honor de Balzac
"People don't notice whether it is winter or summer when they are happy". Anton Chekhov
"The reason kids are crazy is because no one can face the responsibility of bringing them up!" - John Lennon
"The important thing is not to stop questioning. Curiosity has its own reason for existence. One cannot help but be in awe when he contemplates the mysteries of eternity, of life, of the marvelous structure of reality. It is enough if one tries merely to comprehend a little of this mystery each day.
"One, remember to look up at the stars and not down at your feet. Two, never give up work. Work gives you meaning and purpose and life is empty without it. Three, if you are lucky enough to find love, remember it is there and don't throw it
"The best way to cheer yourself is to try to cheer someone else up." - Mark Twain
"You can be the ripest, juiciest peach in the world and someone out there is still going to hate peaches"
"Attitude is a choice. Happiness is a choice. Optimism is a choice. Kindness is a choice. Giving is a choice. Respect is a choice. Whatever choice you make makes you. Choose wisely." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"Cry. Forgive. Learn. Move on. Let your tears water the seeds of your future happiness." - Steve Maraboli
"I'm what's known as a 'triple threat' in Hollywood: I sing, I dance, and I don't sexually harass people." - Neil Patrick Harris
"[They] agreed that it was neither possible nor necessary to educate people who never questioned anything." - Joseph Heller
"Music has always been a matter of Energy to me, a question of Fuel. Sentimental people call it Inspiration, but what they really mean is... - Hunter S. Thompson
"So we shall let the reader answer this question for himself: who is the happier man, he who has braved the storm of life and lived or he who has stayed securely on shore and merely existed?" - Hunter S. Thompson
"A man who procrastinates in his choosing will inevitably have his choice made for him by circumstance." - Hunter S. Thompson
"You must always be willing to work without applause." - Ernest Hemingway
"Buying books would be a good thing if one could also buy the time to read them in." Arthur Schopenhauer
''I thought you were the whore with a heart of gold. Instead you"re just a whore with a real whore"s heart'' - Kenny Powers
"We are bad men living among bad men, and only one thing can calm us-we must agree to go easy on each other." Seneca
"I Will always choose a lazy person to do a difficult job.... Because he will find an easy way to do It" - Bill Gates
"Read, read, read. Read everythingtrash, classics, good and bad, and see how they do it. Just like a carpenter who works as an apprentice and studies the master. Read! You"ll absorb it. Then write. If it is good, you"ll find out. If it"s not, throw it out the window." William Faulkner
"Don"t try to get into someone else"s head. It"s hard enough to get out of your own."
"Curiosity Killed The Cat"
"Sex only sells so much. Promoting authority and capability with your online content over sexy selfies and spammy self hype creates better connections, contacts, and conversions to profit." - Loren Weisman
"We're all addicted to something that takes away the pain" - Belle Aurora, Raw
"A psychiatrist once said that I gambled in order to escape the reality of life. I told him that"s why everybody does everything." - Norm Macdonald
"Your time is your life. Period. How you spend it ends up being what your life is." - Henry Cloud, psychologist
"It's impossible," said pride. "It's risky," said experience. "It's pointless," said reason. "Give it a try," whispered the heart. -- Unknown.
"You're a fucking moron if you use default browser styles." - Eleanor Roosevelt
'There is neither good nor bad but thinking makes it so.' Hamlet, Shakespeare (summarizing Marcus Aurelius)
'There is neither good nor bad but thinking makes it
"The un-aimed arrow never misses"
"Kill them with success, Bury them with a smile "(Harvey Specter)
"War is an ugly thing, but not the ugliest of things" - John Stuart Mill
"Nothing is ours, Lucilius, except for our time." -Seneca
"Nothing is ours, Lucilius, except for our time". -Ciceron
"Big beats are the best; get high all the time." - Super Hans, reciting the Big Beat Manifesto.
""This spirit of compassion is what the dictators are really afraid of." -Anastasia Lin
"Doubt kills more dreams than failure ever will" -Karim Seddiki
"Damn ye, you are a sneaking puppy, and so are all those who will submit to be governed by laws which rich men have made for their own security" -"Black Sam" Bellamy
"It's like there's this instruction manual that explains how to talk to people and everyone in the world got a copy except me." Adventure Zone
"I fix nothing, I let it go." Jean-Paul Sartre
" The highest fulfillment of man / Is to become food for the crawling things/The worms of the tomb they are pure / Their purity elevates them / Above the putrefying pride of our race" - Karl Sanders
"Tomorrow and plans for tomorrow can have no significance at all unless you are in full contact with the reality of the present, since it is in the present and only in the present that you live."  Alan Watts
"Self-correction begins with self-knowledge." - Baltasar Gracian, philosopher
"Bad days don't make it a bad relationship. Good days don"t make it a good relationship. It"s the general feeling we get when we think about our partner, and not the excitement or stress on any particular day, that defines our fulfillment."
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"Learn from the failures as much as the successes." James Dyson
"Learn from the failures as much as the success." James Dyson
"The truth is a compliment made to a statement."
"Kindness is like snow- it beautifies everything it covers"
"The cave you fear to enter holds the treasure that you seek."  Joseph Campbell
" I was outraged to learn that the president wanted to outsource operations at some American ports to the United Arab Emirates. " - Francine Busby
"The more horrifying this world becomes, the more art becomes abstract." Paul Klee
"You cannot get wet from the word 'water'." - Alan Watts
"I'm never gonna die in no ghetto. If a man turns around and punches me in the head the fight's on. If he cuts me the fight's on. If I'm shot the fight is on. I'm not losing no fight to no scumbag out there in no ghetto. Period. That's it. No sunnuvabitch out there is gonna get me." - James Phillips
"Sometimes life moves in mysterious ways" -Ayaka Hirahara
"wealth is like health: Its utter absence can breed misery, but having it doesn"t guarantee happiness." -David G. Myers
"Fidelity Seven-tenths of Success in Action" -James Barton
"The richness of life lies in the memories we have forgotten"
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right, for you"ll be criticized anyway" -Eleanor Roosevelt
"We can't help everyone but everyone can help someone" - Ronald Reagan
"Who are we to question the motives of these giants of commerce whose whims rule the course of our nation." - John Kennedy Toole, A Confederacy of Dunces
[APP] I made an Android app that let's you read Motivational Quotes with beautiful graphics in background
"Courage doesn't always roar. Sometimes courage is the little voice at the end of the day that says I'll try again tomorrow." -Mary Anne Radmacher
(help: need to confirm how quote is phrased) Berthold Brecht
"Pour your heart into something meaningful and your life will fill with joy."
"Grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, the courage to change the things I can, and the wisdom to know the difference." -Reinhold Niebuhr
"I asked a Burmese why women, after centuries of following their men, now walk ahead. He said there were many unexploded land mines since the war." -Robert Mueller
"Some talk to you in their spare time and some free their time to talk to you. Learn the difference." - Unknown.
"If a nation expects to be ignorant and free, in a state of civilization, it expects what never was and never will be. " - Thomas Jefferson
"One, remember to look up at the stars and not down at your feet. Two, never give up work. Work gives you meaning and purpose and life is empty without it. Three, if you are lucky enough to find love, remember it is there and don't throw it
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"IF SHE WERE TO WIN THIS ELECTION, IT WOULD CREATE AN UNPRECEDENTED CONSTITUTIONAL CRISIS. IN THAT SITUATION, WE COULD VERY WELL HAVE A SITTING PRESIDENT UNDER FELONY INDICTMENT AND ULTIMATELY A CRIMINAL TRIAL."- Donald J. Trump
"Your happiness is to not need happiness." -Seneca
"Am I tough? Am I strong? Am I hard-core? Absolutely. Did I whimper with pathetic delight when I sank my teeth into my hot fried-chicken sandwich? You betcha." - James Patterson
"Humor keeps us alive. Humor and food. Don't forget food. You can go a week without laughing. - Joss Whedon
"Most everything you think you know about me is nothing more than memories. Haruki Murakami
"There can never be enough blood in Russel Brand's feces." -Hans Teeuven's mother.
"No matter how you die, or what action you take, since you're born, life is just a Suicide Game." from SG Suicide Game by Haidji
"When one looks at the mountains, seas, and clouds, there is beauty. When one looks at mankind, there is terror, violence, and anger."
"The universe is full of magical things patiently waiting for our wits to grow sharper."Eden Phillpotts
"They call you heartless; but you have a heart and I love you for being ashamed to show it." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"You might say I have FAITH in science and numbers. I'll say you take your Holy Book, I'll take a parachute and I will see you at the bottom of the cliff."
"Your enemies are not those who you meet on the battlefield sent to test your strengths but those who stand by your side ,with a dagger up their sleeve, sent to test your weaknesses" - Paulo Cohelo in the Manuscript found in Accra
"If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous he will not bite you. This is the principal difference between a dog and man." - Mark Twain
"Don't ask yourself what the world needs. Ask what makes you come alive and go do it. Because what the world needs is people who have come alive." - Howard Thurman
"If pussy was a stock, it would be plummeting right now, because you've flooded the market with it! You'd given it away too easy!" - Dave Chappelle
"It can take a lifetime to become what you always were to begin with."
"Don't wait for extraordinary opportunities, seize common occasions and make them great. -Orison Swett Marden
"Moderation is required in everything, even in moderation" - Harvey Stemann
"It's very important to respect other people's beliefs. It's probably more important to call stupidity by it's name." - Hans Teeuwen
"Life is like playing a violin solo in public and learning the instrument as one goes on." - Samuel Butler
" An archaeologist is the best husband a woman can have . The older she gets the more interested he is in her . " - Agatha cristie
"If someone hates me, I'd rather them just be open about it so I don't waste any time trying to impress them."- Someone from Reddit
"Human superiority or inferiority is not determined by sexual difference but by the degree to which one has perfected one"s nature and morals." Christine de Pizan
"Waste no more time arguing about what a good man should be. Be one." (-Marcus Aurelius)
"We live in a world in which we need to share responsibility. It's easy to say "It's not my child, not my community, not my world, not my problem." Then there are those who see the need and respond. I consider those people my heroes."-Fred Rogers
"As if you could kill time without injuring eternity." - Henry David Thoreau
"Popcorn for breakfast! Why not? It's a grain. It's like, like, grits, but with high self-esteem." - James Patterson
"Stupid dreams. Even the good ones are bad, because they remind you how poorly reality measures up." - Neal Shusterman
"We shall never know all the good that a simple smile can do." - Mother Teresa
"There is always more misery among the lower classes than there is humanity in the higher." - Victor Hugo, Les Misrables
"Happiness quite unshared can scarcely be called happiness; it has no taste." - Charlotte Bront
"Eccentric is a nice word to replace 'weird' and 'crazy', which you can use when you really like someone." from "The Umbrella" - Harables Short Stories 1 by Haidji
"The most valuable businesses of coming decades will be built by entrepreneurs who seek to empower people rather than try to make them obsolete."  Peter Theil
"It really is best not to get too attached to anyone in your life. They're there for a reason, I think, but the reason is seldom permanent" -- Dave Sim
"Such obligations are based, not on the Hague convention ... which is applicable in time of war, but on certain general and well-recognized principles, namely: elementary considerations of humanity..." - ICJ
"Oh no please. It's my fault, for thinking you cared. Let me take yet another step back, give you room to be a Coward. Give you more air" --Vera Valentine
"I cannot settle for pieces of you," she said. "There is no falling for you, there is only falling into you, and I fear you have no bottom." Then she left.
" You don't want to get the same kind of advice from everyone on your board. " - M. Kathleen Casey
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today" - H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"Matt Lauer can suck it."-Dr. Rick Marshall
"Matt Lauer can suck it." Dr. Rick Marshall
"It has been said that civilization is twenty-four hours and two meals away from barbarism." - Neil Gaiman
"It has been said that civilization is twenty-four hours and two meals away from barbarism" (Neil Gaiman - Good Omens)
"The peacock is the clearest sign of an arrogant creation which is insecure, because a peacock makes you look at its feathers because it's insecure about its skinny legs." - Ali Ibn Abi Talib
"Every hammer hitting a hot piece of metal and shaping it into a hammer was once the metal being shaped by another hammer" -xXxHussarxXx
"It's in the work, the doing, that you will find meaning; not in the applause."
"Freedom has many difficulties, and democracy is not perfect; but we have never had to put a wall up to keep our people in, to prevent them from leaving us." - JFK, 1963
"Patriotism is supporting your country all the time, and your government when it deserves it." - Mark Twain
"Happiness is that you have three things: something you do, something you love, and something you aspire to" - Tolstoy
"Race hate isn't human nature; race hate is the abandonment of human nature." Orson Welles
"please believe that things are good with me, and even when they're not, they will be soon enough. And i will always believe the same about you." - Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
"If there is a tit-for-tat escalation Trump will have difficulty improving relations with Russia, which has just thrown U.S.A. election to him" - K. T. MacFarland, U. S. Deputy Nation Security Advisor
"Courage breeds creativity; cowardice represses fear and is mastered by it. But, conscience asks the question, is it right? And there comes a time when we must take a position that is neither safe, nor politic, nor popular, but one must take it because it is right." - Martin Luther King Jr
"If more of us valued food and cheer and song above hoarded gold, it would be a merrier world." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Happiness is holding someone in your arms and knowing you hold the whole world." - Orhan Pamuk, Snow
"All you need is love. But a little chocolate now and then doesn't hurt." - Charles M. Schulz
"Time  the one asset none of us are ever going to get more of."  Gary Vaynerchuk
"Insanity is relative. It depends on who has who locked in what cage." - Ray Bradbury
"One out of every twenty-one Black American males will be murdered in their lifetime." Boys in the Hood
"Happiness [is] only real when shared" - Jon Krakauer, Into the Wild
"Be the change you want to see in the world." - Mahatma Ghandhi
"The ache of every man to touch his potential is the throb that beats out the truth of the American Declaration of Independence and the Constitution."  Marion Barry
"Worrying is like praying for what you don"t want." - Lara Casey
"Quality is the result of a million selfless acts of carenot just of any great method that descends from the heavens" - Robert C. Martin
"I realise there"s something incredibly honest about trees in winter, how they"re experts at letting things go." (Jeffrey McDaniel)
"It's been my experience that you can nearly always enjoy things if you make up your mind firmly that you will." - L.M. Montgomery, Anne of Green Gables
"Dear past: Thank you for all the lessons. Dear future: I'm ready."
"The beauty of truth: whether it is bad or good, it is liberating"-Paulo Coelho
"I inspire myself." - Tommy Wiseau
"Nothing is so firmly believed as that which is least known." - Michel de Montaigne
"Look at this photograph" -Chad Kroger
"Everyone matters. Even your enemy."
"Seeking the cause, we forget the purpose."
"Searching for the cause, we forget the purpose."
"The beautiful thing about being a fag is that you can do whatever the fuck you want."
"we put too in front of too many things" - Original by me lol
"The worst part of success is trying to find someone who is happy for you." - Bette Midler
"Where are you running to Gilgamesh? Tge endless life you are looking for, you shall never find."
"Look weak when you are strong, and look strong when you are weak" - Sun Tzu
"Never eat the local thing. You know why it's local? Because it's shit, that's why it's local." - Dylan Moran
"It matters what people actually are. Rather than what they can be made to seem to be." - Sam Harris
"He with his fingers in too many pies, surely eats too much and dies" - My friend in a moment of spontaneous genius.
"Trees are poems the earth writes upon the sky, We fell them down and turn them into paper, That we may record our emptiness." - Kahlil Gibran
"Art is how we decorate space, music is how we decorate time." -Jean-Michel Basquait-
" What we achieve inwardly will change outer reality. " - Plutarch
"Yes: I am a dreamer. For a dreamer is one who can only find his way by moonlight, and his punishment is that he sees the dawn before the rest of the world."  Oscar Wilde
"Sometimes the world around makes you do things you would never do out of the circumstances" Haidji - SG Suicide Game
"A man is not old until regrets take the place of dreams"- John Barrymore
"I've got nothing to do today but smile." - Paul Simon
"Words are free. It's how you use them, that may cost you." - Rev J. Martin
"Your conscience is the measure of the honesty of your selfishness. Listen to it carefully." - Richard Bach
"We all make mistakes, so don't let anyone judge yours harder than theirs."
"Hope Smiles from the threshold of the year to come, Whispering 'it will be happier'..." - Alfred Tennyson
"If you are still looking for that one person who will change your life, take a look in the mirror." Roman Price
"He lived like a Devil and died like a Saint." - Haidji - SG Suicide Game
"We named the group Body Count because every Sunday night in L.A., I'd watch the news, and the newscasters would tally up the youths killed in gang homicides that week and then just segue to sports. 'Is that all I am,' I thought, 'a body count?'" __Ice-T
"It was childish to feel disappointed, but childishness comes almost as naturally to a man as to a child." -Issac A,simov
"Caring but not T-H-A-T much is the middle ground between clinging to it and winging it." - Herb Cohen
"You can never be ready; you can only be good enough." -random guy in my organic chemistry course the day of the final exam
"My religion is nature. That"s what arouses those feelings of wonder and mysticism and gratitude in me." - Oliver Sacks
"The only thing I know is this: I am full of wounds and still standing on my feet." -Nikos Kazantzakis
"I wake up every morning with a great desire to live joyfully. - Anna Howard Shaw
"We make a living by what we get. We make a life by what we give."  Winston S. Churchill
"You are not defeated unless you accept defeat" - Roman proverb(?)
"However far man may extend himself with his knowledge, however objective he may appear to himself - ultimately he reaps nothing but his own biography." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The wicked are wicked no doubt, and they go astray, and they fall, and they come by their desserts. But who can tell the mischief that the very virtuous do?" William Makepeace Thackeray
"We are what we do repeatedly"
"Feelings are real but they aren't reality."-Dan Harmon
''Curiosity is the want of learning, stupidity is teh inability of learning when teached, ignorance is not wanting to learn.'' -me, unless someone else thought of it before
"When I created the Web, I didn't have to ask anyone's permission." - Tim Berners-Lee, creator of the Web, on net neutrality in 2006
"The first sip of science will make an atheist, but the bottom of the glass awaits God." -Werner Heisenberg
"Safety rules are written in blood" - Unknown
"I am the inferior of any man whose rights I trample underfoot." - Horace Greeley
1 Need help finding a book on quotes (description below with pictures of pages)
" we don"t become aware of the greatest blessings of life  healthy, youth and freedom  until we have lost them " - Paul Edwards
"The most heartfelt and heartbreaking love letters have never been written, for we lack the words to fully express the depth of the love, joy and anguish experienced by a single soul that resides in two people who have been separated by the harsh realities of the physical world."
"If you can help it, don"t be a creator. Be the exploiter. They get rich. You never will" - Keith Giffen
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W.P. Kinsella
"So be sure when you step, Step with care and great tact. And remember that life's A Great Balancing Act. And will you succeed? Yes! You will, indeed! (98 and  percent guaranteed) Kid, you'll move mountains.
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." - Herman Melville
"Try not to become a man of success. Rather become a man of value." - Albert Einstein
"If at first you don't succeed, try, try again. Then quit. No use being a damn fool about it." - W.C. Fields
"I can't give you a sure-fire formula for success, but I can give you a formula for failure: try to please everybody all the time." - Herbert Bayard Swope
"We are meat." Francis Bacon
"Having devoted the first half of my life to the dark, I feel obliged to revere any pinpoint of light now." - Mary Karr
"A life without cause is a life without effect" - Dildano
"Eat Properly, Exercise, Live Well". Messiahsez Sez That Yo!
"The privilege of a lifetime is being who you are." - Joseph Campbell
"Do or do not, there is no try" - Master Yoda
"Sanity and happiness are an impossible combination." - Mark Twain
"Pee is stored in the balls" - Albert Einstein
"Be gentle first with yourself if you wish to be gentle with others." Lama Yeshe
"Everyone makes a greater effort to hurt other people than to help himself." Alexis Carrel
"And the saddest thing about my regret I can't forgive me, and you can't forget." - Lang Leav, Love &amp; Misadventure
"You only live once. But if you live right, once is enough" -Unknown
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"Some people spend their entire lives learning the difference between what one wants, and what will satisfy." -Unknown
"Without Africa, France will slide down into the rank of a third world power"- Former French President Jacques Chirac
"You can't be happy unless you're unhappy sometimes"." - Lauren Oliver, Delirium
"Even the strongest blizzards start with a single snowflake."  Sara Raasch
"Getting no message is also a message."- Habib Nasr
"Peace can be found within, no matter the external circumstances." Allan Lokos, Patience: The Art of Peaceful Living
"The very spring and root of honesty and virtue lie in good education." - Plutarch
"Happiness is having a large, loving, caring, close-knit family in another city." - George Burns
"Modesty was an invitation to the chase and doubled beauty"s power." - Will Durant - The Age of Reason - Virtue and Vice
"And then it started raining. I love rain. You know why? Because it fills human ears with the sounds the Earth has been making for millions of years. Not the bullshit we've been making up."
"The winds and waves are always on the side of the ablest navigators." - Edward Gibbon
"If you love someone, everything is negotiable. If you don't, everything is a door." - Carrie Fisher
"I carry my awareness of defeat like a banner of victory" - Fernando Pessoa
"Jesus Christ knew he was God. So wake up and find out eventually who you really are. In our culture, of course, they"ll say you"re crazy and you"re blasphemous, and they"ll either put you in jail or in a nut house (which is pretty much the same thing). However if you wake up in India..."
"The reason I don"t worry about society is, nineteen people knocked down two buildings and killed thousands. Hundreds of people ran into those buildings to save them. I"ll take those odds every fucking day." - Jon Stewart
:)
"It's Weezy F Baby come to take a shit and urine On the toilet bowl bitches, pussy ass niggas" -Lil Wayne
"We need to accept that we don"t always make the right decisions, that we"ll screw up royally sometimes. Understand that failure is not the opposite of success, it"s part of success." - Arianna Huffington
"Mix in consideration with your determination in the conversations or emails you start or send during solicitation." - Loren Weisman
"Make no mistake about why these babies are here - they are here to replace us." - Jerry Seinfeld
"You cannot protect yourself from sadness without protecting yourself from happiness." - Jonathan Safran Foer
"Happiness is a warm puppy." - Charles M. Schulz
"I may be wrong, but it seems rare in our age to find a widely praised person whose own mouth is not the source of that praise." - Giacomo Leopardi
"The truth is incontrovertible. Malice may attack it, ignorance may deride it, but in the end, there it is."-Winston Churchill
"When the going gets weird, the weird turn pro."
"I have spent many chapters if my life trying to write an introduction" . - Pablo Pardoen
"A little learning is a dangerous thing." - Alexander Pope
"That man has no regard for lawn maintenance." - Tony Stark, about Thor
"To love oneself is the beginning of a lifelong romance." - Oscar Wilde, An Ideal Husband
"It won't do to say to a man, ' You can create. Do so.' It is much safer to wait for a man to say, 'I can create, and I will do so whether you wish it or not.'" - from the short story 'Profession' by Asimov
"If you love a flower, don"t pick it up. Because if you pick it up it dies and it ceases to be what you love. So if you love a flower, let it be. Love is not about possession. Love is about appreciation."- Osho
"A finger blast from Lucifer..." - The Devil is a Part Timer light novel
"I had to go see about a girl" -good will hunting
"Solitude is fine but you need someone to tell that solitude is fine." -- French Writer Honore de Balzac
"One does not become enlightened by imagining figures of light, but by making the darkness conscious." - Carl Jung
"I'm not here for the long life, I'm here for the good life."
"stand in the ashes of a trillion souls, and ask them if they can shut up for a minute. their silence is your answer."
"You know, a long time ago being crazy meant something. Nowadays everybody"s crazy." -- Charles Manson
[question] "War is young men dying and old men talking." - Franklin Roosevelt
"A person"s character is nothing more and nothing less than the sum of his choices. You can"t choose your height or race or many other physical traits, but you fine tune your character every time you decide right from wrong and what you personally are going to do about it." - Lawrence W. Reed
"The trick to happiness wasn"t in freezing every momentary pleasure and clinging to each one, but in ensuring one"s life would produce many future moments to anticipate." -Brandon Sanderson
"Count your age by friends, not years. Count your life by smiles, not tears." - John Lennon
"Wow" -Owen Wilson
"In the beginning there was nothing, which exploded." - Terry Pratchett, Lords and Ladies
"Science and religion are not at odds. Science is simply too young to understand." - Dan Brown, Angels &amp; Demons
"An expert is a person who has made all the mistakes that can be made in a very narrow field." - Niels Bohr
"Faith is not belief without proof, but trust without reservation." - D. Elton Trueblood
"Keep your eyes on the stars and your feet on the ground." Theodore Roosevelt
"Honesty is the first chapter in the book of wisdom." - Thomas Jefferson
"A signature reveals a man's character - and sometimes even his name."
"if you're 4'5 in the colony of midgets you're pretty big"
"Don"t count your friends when you"re on top of the world. Count your friends when the world is on top of you. It"s a more accurate count."
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"I'm sure the universe is full of intelligent life. It's just been too intelligent to come here." - Arthur C. Clarke
"We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a very average star. But we can understand the Universe. That makes us something very special." - Stephen Hawking
"I did not attend his funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying I approved of it."
"Going to church doesn"t make you a Christian any more than going to a garage makes you an automobile." - Billy Sunday, Billy Sunday, the Man and His Message: With His Own Words Which Have Won Thousands for Christ
"The greatest good you can do for another is not just share your riches, but to reveal to him his own." - Benjamin Disraeli
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams."
"In the depth of winter, I finally learned that within me there lay an invincible summer."  Albert Camus
"The most precious possession that ever comes to a man in this world is a woman's heart."
"there has been approximately 125,000 human generations before you, and what have you given this world?"
"Some things don't last forever, but some things do. Like a good song, or a good book, or a good memory you can take out and unfold in your darkest times, pressing down on the corners and peering in close, hoping you still recognize the person you see there."
"Logic leads both ways"
"Knowledge has no value except that which can be gained from its application toward some worthy end." -Napoleon Hill
"The only people I think I'm better than are people who think they're better than me."
"Into the darkness they go, the wise and the lovely. " - Edna St. Vincent Millay
"There's an opposite to dj vu. They call it jamais vu. It's when you meet the same people or visit places, again and again, but each time is the first. Everybody is always a stranger. Nothing is ever familiar." - Chuck Palahniuk
"It is unworthy of excellent men to lose hours like slaves in the labour of calculation which could safely be relegated to anyone else if machines were used. - Gottfried Wilhelm Leibniz
"Never judge someone until you've walked a mile in his shoes. That way, when you do judge him, you're a mile away and you have his shoes." -Emo Phillips
"Happiness is not something ready made. It comes from your own actions." - Dalai Lama XIV
"Before you jump back up on that horse that threw you off, take a minute to figure out why you got tossed in the first place." - Loren Weisman
"A problem properly stated is a problem partly solved." - Henry Hazlitt
"The structure of the atom cannot be seen but is nonetheless known. I know about lots of things I've never seen. And so do you. You can't show proof of the truest thing of all, all you can do is believe. Weep and believe." -Clarice Lispector
"Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see." - Mark Twain
"Nature has cunning ways of finding our weakest spot." - Call Me By Your Name
"The purpose of life is to find your gift. The meaning of life is to give it away." -David Viscott
"When I created the Web, I didn't have to ask anyone's permission." - Tim Berners-Lee, creator of the Web, on net neutrality in 2006
"Don't tell your daughter that when a boy is mean or rude to her it's because he has a crush on her. Don't teach her that abuse is a sign of love" - unknown
"Don't sweat the petty things and don't pet the sweaty things." - George Carlin
"I don't have pet peeves - I have major psychotic fucking hatreds." - George Carlin
"An obsession and overinvestment in emotion fails us for the simple reason that emotions never last." Excerpt From The Subtle Art of Not Giving a F*ck Mark Manson
"If it don't make dollars then it don't make sense" -Casper TNG
"The most beautiful experience we can have is the mysterious. It is the fundamental emotion that stands at the cradle of true art and true science." - Albert Einstein, The World As I See It
"The fact that we live at the bottom of a deep gravity well, on the surface of a gas covered planet going around a nuclear fireball 90 million miles away and think this to be normal is obviously some indication of how skewed our perspective tends
"The important thing is not to stop questioning. Curiosity has its own reason for existence. One cannot help but be in awe when he contemplates the mysteries of eternity, of life, of the marvelous structure of reality. It is enough if one tries merely to comprehend a little of this mystery each day.
"I know nothing with any certainty, but the sight of the stars makes me dream." - Vincent Van Gogh.
"When thinking about life remember this: no amount of guilt can change the past, and no amount of anxiety can change the future." - Unknown
"One, remember to look up at the stars and not down at your feet. Two, never give up work. Work gives you meaning and purpose and life is empty without it. Three, if you are lucky enough to find love, remember it is there and don't throw it away." - Stephen Hawking
"If we knew what it was we were doing, it would not be called research, would it?" - Albert Einstein
"Don"t be a know-it-all, be a learn-it-all."  Satya Nadella, CEO, Microsoft
"Science without religion is lame, religion without science is blind." - Albert Einstein
?? "Superstition is knowledge deduced or obtained without logic. Consequently, ... since logic could not be deduced via logic, logic is therefore superstitious." (http://www.apologeticscourses.com/TextBooks/Logic1)
"There's leaders and there's followers. And I'd rather be a dick than a swallower." - Kanye West
"Honesty is more than not lying. It is truth telling, truth speaking, truth living, and truth loving." - James E. Faust
"Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know." - Ernest Hemingway, The Garden of Eden
"Things that are real are given and received in silence" - Meher Baba
"live to the point of tears"
"Time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." - Marthe Troly-Curtin, Phrynette Married
"In loneliness, the lonely one eats himself; in a crowd, the many eat him. Now choose." Friedrich Nietzsche
"Life's too short to be following all those damn rules." - Denny Duquette, Grey's Anatomy
"At some point, you're no longer growing up, you're aging. But no one can pinpoint that moment exactly." - Richard Linklater
"In 1969 I gave up women and alcohol, it was the worst 20 minutes of my life" -George Best
"Lifes a bitch then you die." -Nas
"[W]e are deeply answerable for the use we make of our reason, our means of information, and our various opportunities of arriving at a correct judgment." - George Boole
"Be alone, that is the secret of invention; be alone, that is where ideas are born." -Nikola Tesla
"The function of music is to release us from the tyranny of conscious thought." - Anon
"The reason why we find ourselves in a position of impotency is not because the enemy has sent men to invade our shores, but rather because of the traitorous actions of those who have had all the benefits that the wealthiest nation on earth has had to offer..." - Joseph McCarthy
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston S. Churchill
"If you can't do great things, do small things in great ways." - Napoleon Hill
"Facts do not cease to exist because they are ignored" (Aldous Huxley)
"Most miss a life they've never lived."
''Throw your dreams into space like a kite, and you do not know what it will bring back, a new life, a new friend, a new love, a new country.'' - Anas Nin
"The human race is fundamentally insane. If you put two of us into a room together, we're soon gonna start figuring out good reasons to kill one another." - Frank Darabont
"Take any job you can, even if you hate it, and be grateful you're not homeless." - Advice for Millenials after 2008
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"No person is important enough to make me angry." - Carlos Castaneda
"If she's amazing, she won't be easy. If she's easy, she won't be amazing. If she's worth it, you won't give up. If you give up, you're not worthy. ...Truth is, everybody os going to hurt you; you just gotta find the ones worth suffering for.
"BE STRONG In this hard cruel world, only the strong may know peace and happiness. To be weak is to invite aggression, oppression, tyranny, misery and woe."
"The only thing that you absolutely have to know, is the location of the library." - Albert Einstein
"As many languages you know, as many times you are a human being" - Tomas Garrigue Masaryk
"The difference between genius and stupidity is: genius has its limits." - Alexandre Dumas fils
"...the Devil doesn"t come dressed in a red cape and pointed horns. He comes as everything you"ve ever wished for..." Tucker Max
"In the end, the only things worth doing are the things that might possibly break your heart." Colum McCann
"Make the lie big, make it simple, keep saying it, and eventually they will believe it." - Adolf Hitler
[Request] Looking for a "quote" mocking inspirational quotes, saw it pass this week, there was a black guy doing a funny face on the picture.
"Communication is the greatest destroyer of talent because it makes everybody like everybody else." -Charles Bukowski
'The Fasting Cure' Upton Sinclair
"Sometimes the smallest step in the right direction ends up being the biggest step of your life. Tiptoe if you must, but take a step."  Naeem Callaway
"There's nothing wrong with having a tree as a friend." - Bob Ross
"Hold on loosely, but don't let go. If you cling too tightly, you're gonna lose control." - 38 Special
"Faking that you care and love someone is like faking orgasm. The other person knows." - Bill Lewis
"You'll find another.' God! Banish the thought. Why don't you tell me that 'if the girl had been worth having she'd have waited for you'? No, sir, the girl really worth having won't wait for anybody."  F. Scott Fitzgerald (This Side of Paradise)
"Great art is horseshit, buy tacos."  Charles Bukowski
"Life is essentially an endless series of problems ,The solution to one problem is merely the creation of the next one" Excerpt From The Subtle Art of Not Giving a F*ck Mark Manson
"Ah, there"s nothing more exciting than science! You get all the fun of sitting still, being quiet, writing down numbers, paying attention . . . science has it all."  Principal Skinner
"The world is a hellish place, and bad writing is destroying the quality of our suffering." Tom Waits
"Whether you think you can, or you think you can't -- you're right." - Henry Ford.
"Your past mistakes are meant to guide you, not define you."  Ziad K. Abdelnour
"We are born to be real, not to be perfect."
"There's a difference between a Pilot and an Aviator, one is a technician and the other is an artist in love with flight."
"Should the fact that some don't want to hear an opinion mean that no one else gets to?" --Arthur Brooks
"The ability to speak multiple languages is an asset, but the ability to keep your mouth shut in any language is priceless."
"Making plans for the future is of use only to people who are completely capable of living in the moment" - Alan Watts
"I'll tell you a little secret about the blues: it's not enough to know which notes to play; you gotta know why they need to be played." - George Carlin
"Seeing someone reading a book you love is seeing a book recommending a person"
"Our deepest fear is not that we are inadequate. Our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure. It is our light, not our darkness, that most frightens us."
" so I guess the type of husband I am trying to be is to have treated my wife in a way that when all is said and done, when our lives have passed, when we meet in heaven inshAllah and she could choose anyone, she would still choose me. "
"So much wasted time." - David Cassidy
"Stop spending money to be nominated for worthless awards with no substance and no worth to your career." - Loren Weisman
"Bill Lewis has marked himself SAFE during Small Business Saturday shopping."-- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe."
"Crazy people don't know they're going crazy. They think they're getting saner." - John Locke
"Wanting positive experience is a negative experience; accepting negative experience is a positive experience." -Excerpt From The Subtle Art of Not Giving a F*ck Mark Manson
"The master knows that if people believe in a life after this one, their whole outlook on life will be different, and they will have a distinct sense of personal responsibility and morality." - Sogyal Rinpoche
"When someone shows you who they are, believe them." Maya Angelou
"How do I know the past is not a fiction, conceived to reconcile the difference between my state of mind and the present?" Unknown
"If we are too terrified to ask questions, then who will? And how will we advance?"-Myself
"Happiness lies in the joy of achievement and the thrill of creative effort." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"We ask 18-year-olds to make huge decisions about their career and financial future, when a month ago they had to ask to go to the bathroom." -Adam Kotsko
"Having a rough day? Remember, it's better to be pissed off than pissed on"
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"What hurts me is perceiving that even after we did everything we did, made everything we made, we are still the same and we are still living like our parents" - Elis Regina, brazilian singer.
"Old minds are like old horses; you must exercise them if you wish to keep them in working order." - John Adams
"You can laugh at Johnny Knoxville and Woody Allen" - Seth MacFarlane
"I've seen men watch an H-bomb blow an island into a hole and then go home and sleep. That's the way men are." -from the short story 'Hell-Fire' by Isaac Asimov
"Grief is not an enemy we fight, it's on that we survive."
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"The greatest mistake is to run from the rest." - Jake Heinrichs
"When you're happy you enjoy the music. When you're sad you understand the lyrics." - Frank Ocean.
"For if leisure and security were enjoyed by all alike, the great mass of human beings who are normally stupefied by poverty would become literate and would think for themselves; and when once they had done this, they would sooner or later realise that the privileged minority's had no function" 1984
"One day you will ask me which is more important? My life or yours? I will say mine and you will walk away not knowing that you are my life." - Kahlil Gibran
"It is never too late to be what you might have been." - George Eliot
"Be Weird. Your Strangeness Is Your Magic" - Parker Lewis
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Hell is other people." -Jean Paul Sartre
"I want to love everyone, and therefore I want to speak all languages" - Vaslav Nijinsky
"I wasn't poor, I was po, I couldn't afford the whole r" - Big L
"It is not how much we have, but how much we enjoy, that makes happiness." - Charles Spurgeon
"You should take the approach that you"re wrong. Your goal is to be less wrong." - Elon Musk
"If animals were able to formulate a religion, they would surely depict humans as the devil." - William Ralph Inge
"Does holding a pan handle harder cause your body heat to increase faster? Ice doesn't freeze because of wind chill. What is insane?" - Denver Ross
"I play by lifes rules. It's not because I'm scared. It's because I've seen the worst and I never want to go back there."
"If someone says he is for free speech just tell him that pedophilia is alright. And now you will know if he really stands for free speech or just for speech that he agrees with. Sadly, a lot of people that say they are for freedom of speech are just hypocrites." Nikusuke Doguro
"Every person has two birthdays. The day they are technically born -- The scientific aspect -- And the day they see Star Wars for the first time." --Jakob Stegelmann
"Do not indulge in dreams of having what you have not, but reckon up the chief of the blessings you do possess, and then thankfully remember how you would crave for them if they were not yours." - Marcus Aurelius
"Gratitude turns what we have into enough."
"I used to think the worst thing in life was to end up all alone, it"s not. The worst thing in life is to end up with people that make you feel all alone."Robin Williams
"I used to think the worst thing in life was to end up all alone, it"s not. The worst thing in life is to end up with people that make you feel all alone."Robin Williams
"Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free speech because you have nothing to say." - Edward Snowden
"It"s choice  not chance  that determines your destiny." - JEAN NIDETCH
"Do not save what is left after spending, but spend what is left after saving." - Warren Buffett
"There is one day that is ours. Thanksgiving Day is the one day that is purely American." - O. Henry
"Half of what I say is meaningless, but I say it so that the other half may reach you" - Khalil Gibran
"Success is a science; if you have the conditions, you get the result." - Oscar Wilde
"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"All that we see or seem is but a dream within a dream." -Edgar Allan Poe
"Reality continues to ruin my life." - Bill Watterson, The Complete Calvin and Hobbes
"That's the problem with drinking, I thought, as I poured myself a drink. If something bad happens you drink in an attempt to forget; if something good happens you drink in order to celebrate; and if nothing happens you drink to make something happen." - Charles Bukowski, Women
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"Happy Thanksgiving." - Most Americans
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"I think, therefore I am." - Rene Descartes.
"Just like the universe expands, so does happiness. The train doesn't stop now. But when it does, all we have left is memories. We must learn how to enjoy the ride. If we wait until we catch happiness to be happy, we will never be happy." -Unforgiving Happiness
"Absorb what is useful, Discard what is not, Add what is uniquely your own."  Bruce Lee
"They say misery loves company, and while this may be true, it's not always to make the company solely miserable- many just want others who understand their pain, those who don't sympathize, but empathize."
"They say misery loves company, and while this may be true, it's not that always to make the company solely miserable- many just want others who understand their pain, those who don't sympathize, but empathize."
"I'm gonna lean up against you, you just lean right back against me. This way, we don't have to sleep with our heads in the mud. You know why we a good partnership, Forrest? 'Cause we be watchin' out for one another. Like brothers and stuff." - Bubba
"Nothing in life is to be feared,it is only to be understood. now is the time to understand more, so that we may fear less" - Marie Curie
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt, This is My Story
"Chronic remorse, as all the moralists are agreed, is a most undesirable sentiment...
"There are no limits, you are only limited by however far you want to be limited." - Chuck Schuldiner
"Americans are broad-minded people. They'll accept the fact that a person can be an alcoholic, a dope fiend, a wife beater, and even a newspaperman, but if a man doesn't drive, there is something wrong with him." -Art Buchwald
"To photograph: It is to put on the same line of sight the head, the eye, and the heart." (Henri Cartier-Bresson)
"A man's gotta make at least one bet a day, else he could be walking around lucky and never know it." -Jim Jones
'All animals are equal, but some animals are more equal than others.'- George Orwell, Animal Farm
"If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous he will not bite you. This is the principal difference between a dog and man." - Mark Twain
"In the end the Shadow was only a small and passing thing: there was light and high beauty for ever beyond its reach." JRR Tolkien, The Return of the King
"A wise man proportions his believe to the evidence." - David Hume
"That's how stories happen  with a turning point, an unexpected twist. There's only one kind of happiness, but misfortune comes in all shapes and sizes. It's like Tolstoy said. Happiness is an allegory, unhappiness a story." -Haruki Murakami
"Just because you do not take an interest in politics doesn't mean politics won't take an interest in you." Pericles
"The people who cast the votes don't decide an election, the people who count the votes do." -Stalin
"You may have to fight a battle more than once to win it." Margaret Thatcher
"So many books, so little time." - Frank Zappa
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"A ghost isn't a dead person with unfinished business - it is a living person carrying the weight of the dead." - Stephen
"In order to change something, you have to forget emotions and empower facts" - Me
"To be innovative, we can't look to what others have done. The whole idea of blazing a path is that there was no path there before."
"If you want the truth, you have to forget feelings snd empower facts" -Me
"A portrait is not a likeness. The moment an emotion or fact is transformed into a photograph it is no longer a fact but an opinion. There is no such thing as inaccuracy in a photograph. All photographs are accurate. None of them is the truth."  Richard Avedon (American photographer)
"Good friends, good books and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain
"When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us." - Helen Keller
"I may not have gone where I intended to go, but I think I have ended up where I needed to be." - Douglas Adams, The Long Dark Tea-Time of the Soul
"If you imagine someone who is brave enough to withdraw all his projections, then you get an individual who is conscious of a pretty thick shadow." - Carl Jung
"I know that the thing under my bed doesn"t exist. But I also know that if I keep my feet under the blanket, it won"t grab my ankle."  Stephen King
"The Internet is uncontrollable. And if the Internet is uncontrollable, freedom will win." - Ai Weiwei
"Prevention is better than cure." - Desiderius Erasmus.
"The world is moving so fast that the person who says it can't be done is generally interrupted by someone doing it" - Elbert Hubbard
"This game is rigged, man. We like the little bitches on a chessboard" - Preston 'Bodie' Broadus (The Wire)
"Fall is so beautiful yet everything is dying"
"First they came for the Socialists, and I did not speak out Because I was not a Socialist. [...] Then they came for the Jews, and I did not speak out Because I was not a Jew. Then they came for meand there was no one left to speak for me." - Martin Niemller. Net Neutrality WILL affect you.
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying." - Arthur C. Clark.
"Now We've Begun To Walk Different Roads"
"All of us get lost in the darkness; dreamers learn to steer by the stars"
"You drinking soda is the reason I live in a big-ass house."
"Giving up smoking is the easiest thing in the world. I know because I've done it thousands of times." - Mark Twain
"the mundane world (samsara) is inseparable from enlightenment"
"We didn't have a word for our, as you guys call gay lesbian people, and so we coined that word [two-spirit] as an umbrella for all our tribes. We never said 'well, you are transgender; you are bisexual; you are lesbian.' We never used those terms; those were all from Western culture"
"I've made an odd discovery. Every time I talk to a savant I feel quite sure that happiness is no longer a possibility. Yet when I talk with my gardener, I'm convinced of the opposite." - Bertrand Russell
"It ain't what they call you, it's what you answer to." W. C. Fields
"A discriminating irreverence is the creator and protector of human liberty." - Mark Twain
"All's well that ends well." - Shakespeare
"All the conditions necessary for murder are met if you shut two men in a cabin measuring 18 feet by 20 and leave them together for two months." - Valery Ryumin (journal entry written on Salyut 6 space station)
"Just because someone emailed you does not make it an invitation to add them to your email list. Show a greater respect to those connected with you to grow greater engaged numbers. And the excuse of "they can just unsubscribe" is pretty petty &amp; awfully unprofessional." - Loren Weisman
"Every opportunity you have to meet another is another opportunity to meet yourself." - Philosophical Panda
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"They can't rattle your cage if you don't live in one."
"He had a wife, a job and a little girl, and except under extraordinary conditions of elation or depression was inclined to consider that to be an adequate bargain struck with life." From the short story Franchise by Isaac Asimov
"...unrequited love does not die; it's only beaten down to a secret place where it hides, curled and wounded. For some unfortunates, it turns bitter and mean, and those who come after pay the price for the hurt done by the one who came before." - Elle Newmark, The Book of Unholy Mischief
"One of the greatest regrets in life is being what others would want you to be, rather than being yourself." - Shannon L. Alder
"Emotion without action is the ruin of the soul" - Edward Abbey
"A girl expecting rescue never learns to save herself."  Kate Morton
"Don't you find it odd," she continued, "that when you're a kid, everyone, all the world, encourages you to follow your dreams. But when you're older, somehow they act offended if you even try." -Ethan Hawke
"We get into the habit of living before acquiring the habit of thinking" - Albert Camus
"This world has only two kinds of people: villains and smiling villains." - Brent Weeks, The Broken Eye
"All paths are the same, leading nowhere. Therefore, pick a path with heart!" - Carlos Castaneda
"Sometimes I can feel my bones straining under the weight of all the lives I'm not living." -Jonathan Safran Foer
"If one spends an entire life looking towards matrimony, him or her will spend an entire life looking back on it as well."
"We can have democracy in this country, or we can have great wealth concentrated in the hands of a few, but we can't have both." - Louis D. Brandeis
"We lie best when we lie to ourselves." -Stephen King
"people go but how they left will always stay"
"Let us never know what old age is. Let us know the happiness time brings, not count the years." - Ausonius
"Sometimes it's reassuring knowing I'm not the only one pretending to be normal." - Dexter Morgan
"I am my father's daughter. I'm not afraid of anything." - Elizabeth
"Lemme tell you guys, the internet is a sport. It's all about who can whine the loudest." - Filthy Frank
"It is always easier to fight for one's principles than to live up to them." - Alfred Adler
"Sometimes a hypocrite is nothing more than a man in the process of changing." - Brandon Sanderson, Oathbringer
"Mistakes are always forgivable if one has the courage to admit them." Bruce Lee
"The Sky Is Covered By Clouds"
"People change and forget to tell each other." Lillian Hellman , Toys in the Attic [1960]
"The real measure of your wealth is how much you'd be worth if you lost all your money." Anonymous
"Life's but a walking shadow, a poor player, that struts and frets his hour upon a stage and then is heard no more." - Shakespeare
"You never really know a man until you stand in his shoes and walk around in them." - To Kill a Mockingbird, Harper Lee
"Just as one cannot know what he might see until he opens his eyes, one cannot know what he might feel until he opens his heart." - Philosophical Panda
"For me personally, exploration isn't about conquering nature, planting flags or leaving your mark. It's about the opposite: opening yourself up and allowing the place to leave its mark on you." - Benedict Allen, explorer
"God, grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change; courage to change the things I can; and the wisdom to know the difference." - The Serenity Prayer by Reinhold Niebuhr.
"There is pleasure in the pathless woods." - Lord Byron
"The reason why the world lacks unity, and lies broken and in heaps, is, because man is disunited with himself." Ralph Waldo Emerson, Nature.
"Gradually it was disclosed to me that the line separating good and evil passes not through states, nor between classes, nor between political parties either -- but right through every human heart"
"Stay close to any sounds that make you glad you are alive." - Hafiz
"There is no such thing as a moral or an immoral book. Books are well written, or badly written. That is all." - Oscar Wild
"If I had a flower for every time I thought of you...I could walk through my garden forever."  Alfred Tennyson
"The loneliest moment in someone"s life is when they are watching their whole world fall apart, and all they can do is stare blankly." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"I find that a duck"s opinion of me is very much influenced over whether or not I have bread." - Mitch Hedberg
"We're not in Wonderland anymore Alice." - Charles Manson
"I've never fooled anyone. I've let people fool themselves. They didn't bother to find out who and what I was. Instead they would invent a character for me. I wouldn't argue with them. They were obviously loving somebody I wasn't." - Marilyn Monroe
"There's a difference between what people want and what will keep them satisfied. Rarely are they two in the same."
"To know a man, observe how he wins his object, rather than how he loses it; for when we fail, our pride supports; when we succeed; it betrays us." -Charles Caleb Colton
"Generally speaking, punishment makes men hard and cold; it concentrates; it sharpens the feeling of alienation; it strengthens the power of resistance." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Winter is coming" - Game of Thrones
"You shouldn't be afraid of death, only lost time." - me.
"The desire to rule has often appeared to me a sign of inward weakness: they fear their own slave soul and shroud it in a royal cloak." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"This is the symbol of my administration. This is a cross between a spoon and a fork. No more false choice between the left utensil and the right utensil. This is not an ideological choice. This is a choice in the middle and a choice for the future. This is a big, new ideathe spork." - Bill Clinton
"what's meant for you will reach you even if it's beneath two mountains. what isn't won't reach you even if it's between your two lips."
"Every time you smile at someone, it is an action of love, a gift to that person, a beautiful thing."  Mother Teresa
"A penny saved is a penny earned But a stolen case of beers gets you a hell of a lot drunker." Infectious Grooves
"I can"t decide if I"m not good enough or under appreciated, and that"s a weird place to be."
"I know God won"t give me anything I can"t handle. I just wish he didn"t trust me so much."  Mother Teresa
"Not all of us can do great things. But we can do small things with great love."  Mother Teresa
"If you judge people, you have no time to love them."  Mother Teresa
"Service is the highest spiritual discipline. Prayer and meditation, or knowledge of scripture...cannot help you reach the goal as quickly as service can. Service has a double effect, it extinguishes the ego and gives bliss." - Sathya Sai Baba
"Well, first of all, let me say that I might have made a tactical error in not going to a physician for 20 years. It was one of those phobias that really didn't pay off." - Warren Zevon
"Pride, where Wit fails, steps in to our defence, And fills up all the mighty void of sense." - Alexander Pope
"But better to get hurt by the truth than comforted with a lie." - Khaled Hosseini
"Sometimes you climb out of bed in the morning and you think, I'm not going to make it, but you laugh inside  remembering all the times you've felt that way." - Charles Bukowski
"We find the untied threads"
"Nobody exists on purpose, nobody belongs anywhere, everybody"s gonna die. Come watch TV."
"Men control the world, but women control men"-unknown
"I've always preferred mythology to history. History is truth that becomes an illusion. Mythology is an illusion that becomes reality." - Jean Cocteau.
"If you want to make everybody happy, don't be a leader - sell ice cream" - Steve Jobs
"You are the finest, loveliest, tenderest and most beautiful person I have ever known  and even that is an understatement"  F. Scott Fitzgerald, personal quote
"It is the mark of an enlightened mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." Unknown
"Only I can change my life.No one can do it for me" - Carol Burnett."It always seems impossible until it's done" - Nelson Mandela"Don't watch the clock; Do what it does.Keep Gong" - Sam Levenson for more visit http://www.statusdare.com/2017/11/whatsapp-status-motivational.html
"Oh mankind! You come from a drop of semen, and you will leave as a piece of dust; you don't know when you came or when you're leaving, so why do you walk around thinking you know everything?" - Imam Ali inb Abi Talib
"Now you can measure the mark of a man on the day that he dies In the mixture of memory and wreckage that he leaves behind" - Frank Turner, Song for Josh
"The only thing harder than saying goodbye, is saying nothing at all."
"The absence of a message sometimes is a presence of one." - Hasse Jerner
"Don't blow off another's candle for it won't make yours shine brighter." - Jaachynma N.E. Agu, The Prince and the Pauper
"People like to invent monsters and monstrosities. Then they seem less monstrous themselves.
"Your decision never matters, you're not a girl." - a really pretentious girl in my study hall
"It takes ten times as long to put yourself back together as it does to fall apart."
"We will never have a perfect world, but it's not romantic or nave to work toward a better one." -Steven Pinker
"Trees are poems the earth writes upon the sky, We fell them down and turn them into paper, That we may record our emptiness." - Kahlil Gibran
"Uber, the world"s largest taxi company, owns no vehicles. Facebook, the world"s most popular media owner, creates no content. And Airbnb, the world"s largest accommodation provider, owns no real estate. Something interesting is happening." - Tom Goodwin
"Was there ever a dog that could fly?"
"If you promised what you do not have yet. You will lose desire to get it"
"Smooth sailing never made a strong sailor" [anonymous]
"It is ironic how those so hungry for an honest opinion are so quickly offended by that honesty. If you are not ready to hear the bad with the good, don"t ask." - Loren Weisman
"Tonight should be a free-fire idea zone. Watch a DVD, eat some pizza, fuck each other. I'm serious. Fuck a chicken if that's what it takes. Watch a chicken fucking a horse." - Alan Johnson
"I speak English, the language that Jesus spoke! He did in the movie that I watched! - Jim Gaffigan
"The sun will rise whether or not you're awake to see it, and the sun will set even if you beg it not to"
"The greater danger for most of us lies not in setting our aim too high and falling short; but in setting our aim too low and achieving our mark." - Michelangelo.
"Now, here, you see, it takes all the running you can do, to keep in the same place. If you want to get somewhere else, you must run at least twice as fast as that. Lewis Carroll, Through the Looking-Glass"
"You may not believe in global warming, but global warming believes in you"  Bill McKibben
"Now, here, you see, it takes all the running you can do, to keep in the same place. If you want to get somewhere else, you must run at least twice as fast as that. Lewis Carroll, Through the Looking-Glass" Excerpt From Shoe Dog Phil Knight This material may be protected by copyright.
"Maybe I am villain in your story, but I am hero in mine." - Shon Mehta, The Timingila
"There nothing heavier in the scales than good character."- Prophet Muhammad
"You may have someone in your mind, someone in your heart, someone in your dream, someone in your life, but I am your someone when you have no one." - Allah
"No politician should ever let himself be photographed in a bathing suit." - Adolf Hitler
"Go eat a pear" -Alex 2017
"I"ve never been the most important person to anybody- not even myself."
"If being open-minded and joyful is against your political beliefs, then you know, fuck you." - Tre Cool
"The lovers of God never run out of patience, for they know that time is needed for the crescent moon to become full".-Rumi
"We choose our joys and sorrows long before we experience them".-Khalil Gibran
"Ten devishes can sleep beneath one blanket Two kings cannot rein in one kingdom". -Saadi
"She was unstoppable, not because she did not have failures or doubts, but because she continued despite them." -- Beau Taplin
"If you find me not within you, you will never find me. For I have been with you, from the beginning of me".-Rumi
"If you love somebody, let them go, for if they return, they were always yours. And if they don"t, they never were".-Khalil Gibran
"A guitar is something you can hold and love and it's never going to bug you. But here's the secret about the guitar - it's defiant. It will never let you conquer it. The more you get involved with it, the more you realize how little you know." - Les Paul
"Socialism never took root in America because the poor see themselves not as an exploited proletariat but as temporarily embarrassed millionaires." - Ronald Wright, A Short History of Progress
"There are no happy endings. Endings are the saddest part, So just give me a happy middle And a very happy start." Shel Silverstein, A Light in the Attic
"Learn what is to be taken seriously and laugh at the rest."  Hermann Hesse
"You know, the world could always use more heroes" - Tracer In Overwatch
"I swear to you gentlemen, that to be overly conscious is a sickness, a real, thorough sickness." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky, Notes from Underground
"No human being is ever beyond redemption. The possibility of renewal exists so long as life exists. How to support that possibility in others &amp; in ourselves is the ultimate question." -Gabor Mat
"I wasn't a great student, but I loved learning, and I loved facts. I will sit in front of a dictionary and just read. I may not even retain all the words, but I like accumulating knowledge."
"If you think you"re enlightened, go spend a week with your family." -Ram Dass
"I like that treadmill over there, it dies all the work for you, all you have to do is move your feet" -my old cross country coach
"The most difficult questions you can ask are those only you can answer." - Philosophical Panda
"I"m rightly tired of the pain I hear and feel, boss. I"m tired of bein on the road, lonely as a robin in the rain. Not never havin no buddy to go on with or tell me where we"s coming from or goin to or why. I"m tired of people bein ugly to each other..."
"If you don't know where you're going, any road will get you there." - Lewis Caroll
''If you love what you do you 'll never work another day in your life." Mark Twain
"One day you will ask me which is more important? My life or yours? I will say mine and you will walk away not knowing that you are my life." -Khalil Gibran
" Better late than never, but never late is better. Anonymous
"If you enjoy seeing an animal terrified or in pain, you are a cunt" - Ricky Gervais
"Be an explorer. The world is filled with wonder and magical things." - Flavia
"That which has been created is an immeasurably small sliver of that which has been imagined." - Philosophical Panda
"I can't afford to hate anyone. I don't have that kind of time." Akira Kurosawa
"When we are born, we cry that we are come to this great stage of fools." - William Shakespeare, King Lear
"If people do not believe that mathematics is simple, it is only because they do not realize how complicated life is." - John von Neuman
"The only person you should try to be better than is the person you were yesterday."Anonymous
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind."Dr. Seuss
" What you know you can't explain, but you feel it. You've felt it your entire life, that there's something wrong with the world. You don't know what it is, but it's there, like a splinter in your mind, driving you mad." (-Morpheus)
"How is it that hardly any major religion has looked at science and concluded, "This is better than we thought!"...
100+ Dr. APJ Abdul Kalam Thoughts Quotes and Words
''Stay positive and happy. Work hard and don't give up hope. Be open to criticism and keep learning. Surround yourself with happy, warm and genuine people.''- Tena Desae
"Happiness is a choice. You can choose to be happy. There"s going to be stress in life, but it"s your choice whether you let it affect you or not." - Valerie Bertinelli
"The majority of the people are not so afraid of holding a wrong opinion, as they are of holding an opinion alone." -Soren Kierkegaard
"I hate quotes. Tell me what you know" -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"...luxury always comes at someone else"s expense. One of the many advantages of civilization is that one doesn"t generally have to see that, if one doesn"t wish. You"re free to enjoy its benefits without troubling your conscience." Ann Leckie
"All this hurrying from place to place won"t bring you any relief, for you"re travelling in the company of your own emotions, followed by your troubles all the way." Seneca
"Beauty is power; a smile is its sword." - John Ray
"I was raised by books. Books, and then my parents."-Elon Musk
"To truly know someone, eat them and walk a mile in their feet." Kha'Zix
"No matter what you do, your job is to tell your story."  Gary Vaynerchuk
"Don't grow up, it's a trap."
"I cried because I have no shoes, until I met a man with no feet." - Helen Keller
"Walk on road, hm? Walk left side, safe. Walk right side, safe. Walk middle, sooner or later [makes squish gesture] get squish just like grape." Mr. Miyagi
"Unless you try to do something beyond what you have already mastered, you will never grow. Every job is a self portrait of the person who did it ... Autograph your work with excellence." - Vince Lombardi
" Knowledge talks Wisdom listens " JIMI HENDRIX
"Lose an hour in the morning, and you will be all day hunting for it." -Richard Whately
"Be happy for this moment. This moment is your life." - Omar Khayyam
"Just as the light of the stars is most easily discerned under the darkest of skies, life"s light is most easily discerned in its darkest of moments." - Philosophical Panda
"Problems are guidelines, not stop signs." Robert Schuller
''Before you embark on a journey of revenge, dig two graves''- Confucius
"I would be easier to convince Mormons to drink coffee, than to get gamers not to buy Battlefront II." --Les Edgar
"To think is easy. To act is hard. But the hardest thing in the world is to act in accordance with your thinking." - Johann von Goethe
"I hated every minute of training, but I said, don't quit. Suffer now and live the rest of your life as a champion." - Muhammad Ali
"Great minds talk about ideas, average minds talk about events, and small minds talk about people." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"A pessimist sees the difficulty in every opportunity; an optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty." - Winston Churchill
"If you really want to do something, you'll find a way. If you don't, you'll find an excuse." - Jim Rohn
"nobody move, I can't find my contact lens" -Winston Churchill
"Success is a lousy teacher. It seduces smart people into thinking they can't lose" - Bill Gates
"Things begin on a whim. But ends and revisions take decisions." - oc
"She was a rainbow, but he was color blind" -Unknown
"She's a rainbow but he was color blind" -Unknown
"The chief danger in life is that we take too many precautions. We are on Earth but for a minute. Live life in your vision - not in the vision of others." -- Bill Lewis
"The chief danger in life is that we take too many precautions. We are on this Earth but for a minute. Live life in your vision - not in the vision of others." -- Bill Lewis
"The chief danger in life is that we take too many precautions. We are on this Earth but for a minute. Live your life in your vision - not in the vision of others." -- Bill Lewis
"I have the attention span of a goldfish and the determination of a shark. "
'Religion is a popular misunderstanding of poetry.' Joseph Campbell
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"A person who will live to 200 years, may very well be alive today".
"To him who is determined it remains only to act." -Italian Proverb
"You hear people say 'Hearing voices is a sign of madness', you know, but what is a thought but a voice inside your head? Surely it is madness to hear no voice at all."
"There is no greater misfortune for a man than to be governed by his wife: in such case he is neither himself nor his wife, he is a perfect nonentity." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"To permit irresponsible authority is to sell disaster." - Robert A. Heinlein
"The time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." - Bertrand Russell
"Don't compare your beginning to someone else's middle." Jon Acuff
"Seen a lot of things in this old world" - Stevie Wonder
"Do not wait for leaders; do it alone, person to person."  Mother Teresa
"The sun will rise even if you're not awake to see it. And the sun will set even if you beg it not to. "
"TODAY is the first day of yhe rest of your LIFE"
"Life will break you. Nobody can protect you from that, and living alone won"t either, for solitude will also break you with its yearning. You have to love. You have to feel. It is the reason you are here on earth. You are here to risk your heart. You are here to be swallowed up..." - Louise Erdrich
"It's amazing how just two minutes with the right person can make your entire day." -- Bill Lewis
"The purpose of life is to be defeated by greater and greater things." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"He who endures what he could change acts no less than than he who interferes in order to attain another result." - Ludwig von Mises, Human Action
"You can know all the facts and still not know the truth." - Dan Rather
"You don"t need another human being to make your life complete, but let"s be honest. Having your wounds kissed by someone who doesn"t see them as disasters in your soul but cracks to put their love into is the most calming thing in this world."- Emery Allen
"The heights by great men reached and kept were not attained by sudden flight but they, while their companions slept, were toiling upwards in the night" - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Daemons. They don't stop working. They are always active. They seduce. They manipulate. And even though you're with me, it makes no difference. We all must deal with them alone. (-Mr. Robot)
"Check yourself. Check your references. Check your claims. Allow all those checks to be cashed in truth. Bad results from those bad checks highlighting overdrawn, unsubstantiated and unproven hype will keep you in a negative balance with your reputation and financial situation." - Loren Weisman
"It is easier to figure out your place in the universe than it is to figure out your place in the world." - Philosophical Panda
"The way of the warrior is the resolute acceptance of death" - Miyamoto Musashi
"The unexamined life is not worth living." - Socrates
"The world has the habit of making room for the man whose words and actions show that he knows where he is going." - Napoleon Hill
"Do not dwell in the past, do not dream of the future, concentrate the mind on the present moment." - Buddha
"All great achievements have one thing in common - people with a passion to succeed." - Pat Cash
"The best way to make your dreams come true is to wake up." - Paul Valery
"Dead flowers are less depressing than plastic ones." -Mae, "Night in the Woods"
"As a consequence of the slavish 'categoryitis' the scientifically illogical, and as we shall see, often meaningless questions..." - Buckminster Fuller
"Sometimes, he thought, real love is silent as well as blind." -Stephen King, The Stand
"Aim high - Expect nothing" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Aim high - Expect nothing" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The snow goose need not bathe to make itself white. Neither need you do anything but be yourself."
"Never believe that anti-Semites are completely unaware of the absurdity of their replies...." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"Sometimes it's easier taking the path of least resistance, but no great love story ever started because it was easy. Greatness can't be born from simplicity; Great love is born from challenges &amp; the ability to overcome them.
"Nobody wakes up thinking, "my world will explode today. My world will change." Nobody thinks that. But sometimes it happens. Sometimes we wake up. We face our fears, we take them by the hand, and we stand there...waiting, hoping, ready, for anything." -Meredith Grey
"Thousands of candles can be lighted from a single candle, and the life of the candle will not be shortened. Happiness never decreases by being shared." - Buddha
"Impossible is a word to be found only in the dictionary of fools" - Napoleon
"Never mess with a truly frustrated virgin when he is on a quest for a girlfriend to share true love and trust with" -Christian Weston Chandler
"I wanted to swallow myself by opening my mouth very wide and turning it over my head so that it would take in my whole body, and then the Universe, until all that would remain of me would be a ball of eaten thing which little by little would be annihilated: that is how I see the end of the world."
"Maybe we feel empty because we leave peaces of ourselves in everything we used to love" -Drake
"It is easy to believe we are each waves and forget we are also the ocean." - Jon J. Muth
"Stop looking for happiness in the place you lost it."
"It is impossible to truly understand a love song until you have lived the lyrics." - Philosophical Panda
"I will not be another flower, picked for my beauty and left to die. I will be wild, difficult to find and impossible to forget." - Erin Van Vuren
"The frequent, and often wonderful, success of the most ignorant quacks and imposters, both civil and religious, sufficiently demonstrate how easily the multitude are imposed upon by the most extravagant and groundless pretensions." - Adam Smith, Theory of Moral Sentiments
"I lie to myself all the time but I never believe me." -s.e. Hinton
"In international studies we've had clinics that prescribe heroin to confirmed addicts. They hold down jobs. They're good with their families. They don't break the law. So what creates the problem with heroin addiction is mostly the arbitrary laws that say that it's not okay to use." -Gabor Mate
"The true measure of success is how many times you can bounce back from failure." - Stephen Richards
"Neither fire nor wind, birth nor death can erase our good deeds."  Buddha; Siddhrtha Gautama
"If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous he will not bite you. This is the principal difference between a dog and man." - Mark Twain
"Monday Quote: "We either make ourselves happy or miserable. The amount of work is the same." - Carlos Castaneda
"Faith is the strength by which a shattered world shall emerge into the light." - Helen Keller
"The only thing we have to fear is fear itself" -Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Everyone sees the unseen in proportion to the clarity of their heart." - Rumi
"It"s a most distressing affliction to have a sentimental heart and a skeptical mind."  N. Mahfouz
"If you want to ask where the flowers come from, even the gods of spring don't know." -?
"Finally someone takes me seriously enough to ask for my word of honor, and it"s a villain." - Sherwood Smith, Remalna's Children
"Being honest may not get you many friends, but it will always get you the right ones."  John Lennon
"We have learned from history that people are united by questions. It is the answers that divide them." - Elie Wiesel
"Travel is the only thing you buy that makes you richer." - Unknown
"Everything you've ever wanted is on the other side of fear" -George Addir
"It's sad how just two minutes with one very wrong person can ruin your entire day." -- Bill Lewis
"If only the self-righteous had mirrors maybe they"d see all the things they have in common with their villain." -unknown
"If the ocean can calm itself, so can you. We are both salt water mixed with air." - Nayyirah Waheed
"I'm in an abusive relationship with life."
"Find what you love, and let it kill you." - Charles Bukowski
"Grab hold of urself, I knw wht it"s like 2 gt blown away. I knw tht u"ve done ur dirt &amp; u"ve dug ur grave: it feels like it won"t b saved. I say grab hold urself &amp; face those days whn u feel like it always rains. I"ve c'n the sunny side of hell, which I nvr thought I"d find 4 myself." - Grieves
"Your life does not get better by chance, it gets better by change." - Jim Rohn
"Everything is Chaos, Be kind" - Michelle McNamara
"Failure Will Never Overtake Me If My Determination To Succeed Is Strong Enough."- Og Mandino
"Give me six hours to chop down a tree and I will spend the first four hours sharpening my axe." - Abraham Lincoln
"It"s Not Whether You Get Knocked Down, It"s Whether You Get Up."  Inspirational Quote By Vince Lombardi
"I wonder how many people I"ve looked at all my life and never seen."  John Steinbeck
"If you want truth to go round the world you must hire an express train to pull it; but if you want a lie to go round the world, it will fly; it is light as a feather and a breath will carry it." Rev. Charles Haddon Spurgeon (1855).
"America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves." -Abraham Lincoln
"You Learn More From Failure Than From Success. Don"t Let It Stop You. Failure Builds Character."- Unknown
"The Way Get Started Is To Quit Talking And Begin Doing." -Walt Disney
"Beautiful tomorrow never comes !when it comes,its already today !in the search for beautiful tomorrow,don"t lose your wonderful "today". Wish you all a happy sunday and a wonderful week ahead."
"Despite everything, no one can dictate who you are to other people" - Prince
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts." Bertrand Russell
"My madness is my love towards mankind" - Vaslav Nijinsky
"Whoever is trying to bring you down is already below you" -Unknown
"Climate is what we expect, weather is what we get." Mark Twain
"I like being alone, but lately I"ve been lonely and it hurts."  Unknown
"Instinct is the nose of the mind." Madame De Girardin
"If you fall I'll be there" -The floor
"No medicine cures what happiness cannot." - Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"People label themselves with all sorts of adjectives. I can only pronounce myself as 'nauseatingly miserable beyond repair'." - Franz Kafka
"Speak your truth quietly and clearly; and listen to others, even to the dull and ignorant; they too have their story." -Max Ehrnann
"Sometimes you tell someone to never speak to you again and then the phone rings and you hope it's them. It's the most twisted logic of all time." - John Mayer
"The less you think about your oppression, the more your tolerance for it grows." - Assata Shakur
"Those who change personality to fit in are like snakes. They shed their skin to grow into a new one, so that they can fit in with others. While they may be granted success, they will never be happy, because they were never meant to be in that skin." - Spechie (Paraphrased)
"Often the challenges we face require not the strength to hold on, but the strength to let go." Monument Valley II
"No one has ever changed the world by doing what the world tells them to do." - Eddy Zhong
"Success comes to those who are too busy to look for it." - Thoughty2
"The tree that would grow to heaven must send its roots to hell." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"They slipped briskly, into an intimacy, from which they never recovered" - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"If You Cannot Do Great Things, Do Small Things In A Great Way!" - Napoleon Hill
"Be with someone that feels like home" -Unknown
"The honor of your presentation, execution, experience, and growth will do much more for you and your career over false claims that have no substance yet." - Loren Weisman
"All those who gain power are afraid to lose it." -Sheev Palpatine
"Armstice Day has become Veterans' Day. Armstice Day was sacred. Veterans' Day is not." - Kurt Vonnegut, "Breakfast of Champions".
"When the axe came into the woods, many of the trees said, 'At least the handle is one of us.'" - Turkish Proverb
"In America, anyone can become president. That"s the problem." -George Carlin
"It isn't the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out, it's the pebble in your shoe." - Muhammad Ali
"Being a winner doesn't begin when you finish a game. Being a winner begins when you wake up, when you open your eyes. Winning is a mindset, if you push yourself and learn from your mistakes, you'll never lose."
"Never give up, for that is just the place and time that the tide will turn." Harriet Beecher Stow
"One of the few good things about modern times: If you die horribly on television, you will not have died in vain. You will have entertained us." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Those who fight a fair war never win." -- Bill Lewis
"Show me a hero and I'll write you a tragedy." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right, for you"ll be criticized anyway." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"There will be obstacles. There will be doubters. There will be mistakes. But with hard work, there are no limits." Michael Phelps
"She didn't say it, I only thought she said it. So really it was my thought, my words, and not hers. How could I confuse "I love you" with "May I take your order?" - Jarod Kintz
"A professional is someone who can do his best work when he doesn"t feel like it." Alistair Cooke
"Am I Real? Do I exist? Because nobody looks at me. Nobody touches me. I speak to people and they don't hear me. They're looking over my shoulder to see who else is there. Nobody looks in my eyes any more, I'm alone and I'm dying of loneliness." -Leo Buscaglia - Living, Loving, and Learning
"Your neck is very grippable, very ergonomic" -Me
"I am running this bitch, you are just the dog walker" - Childish Gambino
"Identity politics requires almost no intellectual effort and leaves you with an overwhelming sense of moral superiority." Jordan B Peterson
"No time to grieve for roses when the forests are burning."  Juliusz Sowacki
"The Light of lights looks always on the motive, not the deed The Shadow of Shadows looks on the deed alone." - W.B. Yeats
"When a person tells you that you hurt them, you don't get to decide that you didn't." -Louis CK
"you have to be odd to be number one" -dr.suess
"All theory is against freedom of the will; all experience for it." - Samuel Johnson
"Peace cannot be kept by force; it can only be achieved by understanding." - Albert Einstein
"In relations between the mighty and the weak, between the rich and the poor, between the master and the servant, it's liberty that oppresses, and the law which liberates." - Henri Lacordaire
"If you forgive people enough you belong to them, and they to you, whether either person likes it or not... the squatter"s rights of the human heart." - James Hilton, Time and Time Again
"Stop drowning your dreams by jumping into waters that you are unable to swim in." - Loren Weisman
"Learn you cannot judge people - enjoy them or ignore them!" - My Grandmother
"Show me your friends and I'll show you your future" -Unknown
"Do not fear what appears to be a change or a lost.
"Being defeated is often a temporary position. Giving up is what makes it permanent." -- Marilyn vos Savant
"You build on failure. You use it as a steppingstone. Close the door on the past. You don't try to forget the mistakes, but you don't dwell on it. You don't let it have any of your energy, or any of your time, or any of your space." - Johnny Cash
"Wilderness is not a luxury but a necessity of the human spirit" - Edward Abbey
"Sometimes life is about risking everything for a dream only you can see" -Unknown
"Sleep is that golden chain that ties health and our bodies together" -Thomas Dekker
"A little thought and a little kindness are often worth more than a great deal of money" - John Ruskin
"I don't want to be interesting. I want to be good" - Ludwig Mies van der Rohe
"Every new beginning comes from some other beginning's end" - Seneca
"Happiness cannot be traveled to, owned, earned, worn or consumed. Happiness is the spiritual experience of living every minute with love, grace, and gratitude" - Denis Waitley
"A strong, positive self-image is the best possible preparation for success" - Joyce Brothers
"I want to live my life, not record it." - Jackie Kennedy
"Art, freedom and creativity will change society faster than politics" - Victor Pinchuk
"A day without sunshine is like, you know, night" - Steve Martin
"You cannot escape the responsibility of tomorrow by evading it today" - Abraham Lincoln
"Don't Give Up What You Want Most, For What You Want Now." - Unknown Author
"How in the hell could a man enjoy being awakened at 6:30 a.m. by an alarm clock, leap out of bed, dress, force-feed, piss, brush teeth, and fight traffic to get to a place where essentially you made lots of money for somebody else and were asked to be grateful for the opportunity to do so?"
"Sometimes we expect so much from others, because we would be willing to do that much for them" -Unknown
"1 in 3 [demographic] do X thing instead of Y" - uGallowboob
"The angels are lost in perpetual contemplation of an infinite glory."
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"He who makes a beast out of himself gets rid of the pain of being a man" -Samuel Johnson
"One kind word can warm three winter months." Japanese Proverb
"Just because I identify as male doesn't mean I want the products I buy to as well" -Justin McElroy
"Life can be wonderful if you"re not afraid of it. All it takes is courage, imagination  and a little dough."  Charlie Chaplin
"If we lived forever, maybe we'd have time to understand things. But as it is, I think all we can do is open our eyes and appreciate how strange and brief this all is." - What Remains of Edith Finch
"A point of view can be a dangerous luxury when substituted for insight and understanding." Marshall McLuhan
"I do not pretend to understand the moral universe; the arc is a long one, my eye reaches but little ways; I cannot calculate the curve and complete the figure by the experience of sight; I can divine it by conscience. And from what I see I am sure it bends towards justice." - Theodore Parker
"A bore is someone who deprives you of solitude without providing you with company."  Oscar Wilde
"Humans fear change because to change invokes our oldest and most powerful fear, the fear of the unknown." -me
"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal." - Albert Camus
"When you make a mistake, admit it, correct it, and learn from it immediately." Stephen R. Covey
"Progress is only ever made to those who are inspired, or desperate."
"A negative mind will never give you a positive life" -Unknown
"If one day, my words are against science, choose science." Mustafa Kemal Atatrk
"Instead of a war on poverty they got a war on drugs so the police can bother me" -Tupac Shakur
"Managing to follow through for a day is good. But, managing to follow through every day, for days, weeks and months creates authentic and consistent results." - Loren Weisman
"Obstacles are put in your way to see if what your fighting for is really worth it"-anonymous
"People change like seasons" - J cole
"When you control the mail, you control information." - Newman
"Have you noticed how capitalists tend to refer to 'the market' as some nebulous force that can't be understood or constrained? Do you want your captain to romanticize getting lost in an ocean that doesn't have to exist?" - Uncle Nickelbags
"A limit of time is fixed for you, which if you do not use for clearing away the clouds from your mind, it will go and you will go, and it will never return." - Marcus Aurelius
"Nothing ever ends poetically. It ends and we turn it into poetry. All that blood was never once beautiful. It was just red." Kait Rokowski
"Life changes for the better when we realize that we don't have to know everything and we don't have to pretend that we do." (-Simon Sinek)
"You can plan a pretty picnic, but you can't predict the weather." - Andre 3000
"Cake is good. But you cannot have sex with cake." - Fez
"Laughter as a way of surviving should only ever be the last resort" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Laughter as way to survive should only ever be the last resort" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Do not look at the faces in the illustrated papers. Look at the faces in the street." G. K. Chesterton
"The world is a mysterious place. To believe that the world is only as you think it is, is stupid." - Carlos Castaneda
"It's easier said, than done"
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"I'm asking you to help them, accept them as human beings -- not as philanthropy, but as human beings who deserve all our support." -Sunitha Krishnan
"I just say that to the universe, 'More frosting.'" -Ian Punnet
"If you do not see humour in the serious, and the serious in humour, you have understood neither." - Anonymous
"Keep your eyes on the stars, and your feet on the ground." Theodore Roosevelt
"Our most meaningful relationships are often those that continued beyond the juncture at which they came closest to ending."
"Aim for the moon. If you miss, you may hit a star." W. Clement Stone
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their dreams." Eleanor Roosevelt
"Press forward. Do not stop, do not linger in your journey, but strive for the mark set before you." George Whitefield
"Where there is a will, there is a way. If there is a chance in a million that you can do something, anything, to keep what you want from ending, do it. Pry the door open or, if need be, wedge your foot in that door and keep it open." Pauline Kael
"Believe in yourself! Have faith in your abilities! Without a humble but reasonable confidence in your own powers you cannot be successful or happy." Norman Vincent Peale
"Our pain is not a punishment from a judgmental god, nor a mistake in a broken universe, nor evidence of our failure and unenlightened ignorance, but a profoundly alive spiritual teaching" - Jeff Foster
"I have been waiting to leave ever since I figured out there were roads willing to take me anywhere I wanted to go." - Unknown
"I have great respect for that man, and if he have great concerns about me, there most be some truth to it." Abraham Lincoln [His reply when Abraham Lincoln was once told by a reporter that another government official has sharply criticized him. What did the president have to say to that?]
"Most people are far too much occupied with themselves to be malicious." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Fool me once, strike one. Fool me twice, strike three" -Michael Scott (The Office)
"Sometimes quietly taking the credit can advertise you and your ability in a much louder way than telling everyone that you were the one that did it." - Loren Weisman
"The key to happiness is maximizing each day. So if you're unhappy, here's a simple prescription: Live harder." - Laird Hamilton
"Sometimes to know a virtue is necessary first to know its opposite" - Aristotle
"We identify in our experience a differentiation between what we do and what happens to us" -Alan Watts
"Have more than you show. Speak less than you know." William Shakespeare
"How much do you really value intelligence when, as a society, you continue to do unintelligent things?" - John Moffitt
"young women are the early adopters of popular culture. They"re kind of hit-makers for the rest of society." - Jeremy Liew
"Hell is other people" Jean-Paul Sartre
"God has a million names. Sages and saints have seen Him in a million forms; they have seen Him with eyes closed and eyes open. They have extolled Him in all the languages and dialects of man; but yet, His glory is not exhausted." - Sathya Sai Baba
"One must need to be strong; otherwise, one never becomes strong." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The mind is like the stomach. It is not how much you put into it that counts, but how much it digests  if you try to feed it with a shovel you get bad results." - Albert Jay Nock
"To whom do you award the right to decide which speech is harmful, or who is the harmful speaker?" - Christopher Hitchens (full quote in description)
"There are only two tragedies in life: one is not getting what one wants, and the other is getting it." - Oscar Wilde
"Life sucks, and then you die" - Ray Jessel
"They deem me mad because I will not sell my days for gold; And I deem them mad because they think my days have a price." Kahlil Gibran
"Food is not rational. Food is culture, habit, craving and identity" - Jonathan Safran Foer
"You can be the moon and still be jealous of the stars" - Gary Allan
"A window covered with raindrops interests me more than a photograph of a famous person" - Saul Leiter
"Education is what remains after one has forgotten what one has learned in school" - Albert Einstein
"You don't need a silver fork to eat good foo" - Paul Prudhomme
"The secret of a happy marriage is finding the right person. You know they're right if you love to be with them all the time" - Julia Child
"An animal's eyes have the power to speak a great language" - Martin Buber
"Exercise should be regarded as a tribute to the heart." - Gene Tunney
"I think we dream so we don't have to be apart for so long. If we're in each other's dreams, then we can play together all night." -Bill Watterson (Calvin and Hobbes cartoonist)
"I was in uniform for four years, and I know that heroism doesn't occur from taking orders, but rather from people who through their own willpower and strength are willing to sacrifice their lives for an idea." - Thor Heyerdahl
"There cannot be a crisis next week. My schedule is already full" - Henry Kissinger
"Beginning today, treat everyone you meet as if they were going to be dead by midnight. Extend to them all the care, kindness and understanding you can muster, and do it with no thought of any reward. Your life will never be the same again" - Og Mandino
"A hero is someone who has given his or her life to something bigger than oneself" - Joseph Campbell
"If this is coffee, please bring me some tea; but if this is tea, please bring me some coffee" - Abraham Lincoln
"Setting goals is the first step in turning the invisible into the visible" - Tony Robbins
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live" - Norman Cousins
"Laziness is nothing more than the habit of resting before you get tired" - Jules Renard
"A positive attitude causes a chain reaction of positive thoughts, events and outcomes. It is a catalyst and it sparks extraordinary results" - Wade Boggs
"There is no love without forgiveness, and there is no forgiveness without love" - Bryant H. McGill
"Find a place inside where there's joy, and the joy will burn out the pain" - Joseph Campbell
"Keep your face always toward the sunshine - and shadows will fall behind you" - Walt Whitman
"Change your thoughts and you change your world" - Norman Vincent Peale
"The world, universe, God, whatever you call it, has so much more in store if you just sit back and relax and do what's right in front of you" - Jane Lynch
"Being lonely does things to you. And feeling shit and bitter and angry all the time just, eats away at you." -Simon, Cry Of Fear
"It's funny. Don't ever tell anybody anything. If you do, you start missing everybody."-J.D. Salinger
"We are all just walking each other home." -Ram Dass
"Love is just a thing until you find someone to share it with." -B. James Newark
"The receptivity of the great masses is very limited, their intelligence small, but their power of forgetting is enormous" - Adolf Hitler
"Be soft. Do not let the world make you hard. Do not let the pain make you hate. Do not let the bitterness steal your sweetness. Take pride that even though the rest of the world may disagree, you still believe it to be a beautiful place" -- Iain Thomas, I Wrote This For You
"There are only two types of people. Those who think there are only two types of people, and those who don't."
"Successful people become great leaders when they learn to shift the focus from themselves to others." - Marshall Goldsmith
"For some of us, books are as important as almost anything else on earth. What a miracle that it is, that out of these small, flat, rigid squares of paper unfolds world after world after world; worlds that sing to you, comfort, quiet or excite you. (Anne Lamott)
"For some of us, books are as important as almost anything else on earth. What a miracle that it is, that out of these small, flat, rigid squares of paper unfolds world after world after world; worlds that sing to you, comfort, quiet or excite you.
"It doesn't take a lot of dogs to shepherd many sheep"
"It doesn't take many dogs to shepherd many sheep"
"It doesn't take a lot of dogs to sheppard many sheep"
"Together, our nations remind the world of the boundless potential of societies that choose freedom over tyranny, and who set the free. And we will free, and we will sacrifice, and we will hope, and we will make things beautiful, especially the aspirations of your people." Donald J. Trump
"Thinking you"re perfect, is an imperfection in itself" -me
"If cruise control was invented today, they'd call it AI." --Hal Abelson
"A bore is someone who deprives you of solitude without providing you with company." - Oscar Wilde
"Give me medically assisted suicide or give me death!"
"The greatest thing you'll ever learn is just to love and be loved in return." - Jeffrey P. Dennis
"Power is not a means, it is an end" - George Orwell, 1984
"Everything in life is speaking in spite of its apparent silence." - Hazrat Inayat Khan
"It is not your fans or your customers" job to market you. Stop treating them like it is." - Loren Weisman
"Life knows two miseries; getting what you don't want and not getting what you want."
"Ignore those that make you fearful and sad, that degrade you back towards disease and death." - Jalaluddin Rumi
"If you love a flower, do not pluck it. Because if you pluck it, it dies and ceases to be what you love. So let it be. Love is not about possession, love is about appreciation."
"You have to learn to get up from the table when love is no longer being served." Nina Simone
"In retrospect Sandy Hook marked the end of the US gun control debate, Once America decided killing children was bearable, it was over." - Dan Hodges
"People who think they know everything are a great annoyance to those of us who do." - Isaac Asimov
"Things don't change, only the way you look at them." - Carlos Castaneda
"People who think they know everything are a great annoyance to those of us who do." - Isaac Asimov
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr., A Testament of Hope: The Essential Writings and Speeches
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Life may not be the party we hoped for, but while we're here, we should dance." Anonymous
"Plant your garden and decorate your own soul, instead of waiting for someone to bring you flowers." Jose Luis Borges
"Believe you can and you're halfway there." T. Roosevelt
"The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear, and the oldest and strongest kind of fear is fear of the unknown" -H.P Lovecraft
"If you want to go fast, go alone. If you want to go far, go together." African proverb
"The woman who follows the crowd will usually go no further than the crowd. The woman who walks alone is likely to find herself in places no one has been before." Albert Einstein
"A man who flies from his fear may find that he has only taken a shortcut to meet it." Sador, Children of Hrin
"Write one thing on the wall that can make a Sad person happy and a Happy person Sad: I wrote, ["this too shall pass"] -Fuck if I know
"THE EGO WANTS QUANTITY BUT THE SOUL WANTS QUALITY"-unknown
"I"m bored" is a useless thing to say. You live in a great, big, vast world that you"ve seen none percent of. Even the inside of your own mind is endless. It goes on forever, inwardly - you understand? The fact the you"re alive is amazing. So you don"t get to be bored." - LOUIS C.K.
"One day at a time is all we do, One day at a time is good for you"-John Lennon
"Even on your ugliest days, you still match someone"s type. Even on your best looking days, there are people who won"t look twice."-unknown
"See through haters. Whomever the hater may be. To the scared inner-child crying out for love, behind their attention seeking angry facade."-Donnie Wahlberg
"Keep on going, and the chances are that you will stumble on something, perhaps when you are least expecting it. I never heard of anyone ever stumbling on something sitting down." Charles F. Kettering
"The world exists as you perceive it. It is not what you see... but how you see it. It is not what you hear... but how you hear it. It is not what you feel... but how you feel it."- Rumi
"I think this is the most extraordinary collection of talent, of human knowledge, that has ever been gathered together at the White House  with the possible exception of when Thomas Jefferson dined alone." -President John F. Kennedy to a gathering of Nobel laureates, 1962
"Born to late to explore the world" "Born to early to explore the universe"
"The most terrifying words in the English language are: 'I'm from the Republican Party and I'm here to reform.'" - pch101, Washington Post user
"I'm not a genius, I just read a lot of books!" -My history teacher
"The problem with love these days is that society has taught the human race to stare at people with their eyes rather than their souls."  Testy McTesterson
"It's Okay To Be White." - Anonymous
"If you want a job working for someone else then help yourself, but then that would be a contradiction because you wouldn't really be helping yourself you'd be helping somebody else" - Suli Breaks
"Computers aren't the thing. They are the thing that gets us to the thing."
"Fixing personality negatives is a lot easier than fixing character negatives." -- Paul Manafort (quoted in the Montreal Gazette)
"It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it." -Douglas Adams
"That place of true healing is a fierce place. It's a place of monstrous beauty and endless dark and glimmering light. And you have to work really, really, really hard to get there, but you can do it." (-Cheryl Strayed, *Brave Enough*)
"There is almost no aspect, no function, no part of your brain that's not subject to improvement by engaging it in an appropriate way." - Dr. Michael Merzenich (pioneer of neuro-plasticity)
"Admire ability, experience, and knowledge over fame or wealth. Just because someone is a celebrity, it doesn"t make them an authority. Fame does not mean someone has experience, expertise or ability. And just because a celebrity or millionaire said it, doesn't make it true." - Loren Weisman
"I always wonder why birds stay in the same place when they can fly anywhere on earth. Then I ask myself the same question."  Harun Yahya
"The greatest among you will be your servant. For those who exalt themselves will be humbled, and those who humble themselves will be exalted." - Matthew 23:11-12
"If you don't get what you want, you suffer; if you get what you don't want, you suffer; even when you get exactly what you want, you still suffer because you can't hold on to it forever. Your mind is your predicament." - Dan Millman (quote continued)
"Your worst is someone's best, and your best is someone's worst."
"What's real? You eyeballs think the sky is blue, but that's just sun rays farting apart in the barf of our atmosphere. The sky is black" - BMO
"These violent delights have violent ends"
"You have everything needed for the extravagant journey that is your life." - Carlos Castaneda
'It would be too easy to say that I feel invisible. Instead, I feel painfully visible, and entirely ignored.' - David Levithan
'It would be too easy to say that I feel invisible. Instead, I feel painfully visible, and entirely ignored. - David Levithan
"After silence, that which comes nearest to expressing the inexpressible is music." - Aldous Huxley
"What's real? Your eyeballs think the sky is blue, but that's just sun rays farting apart in the barf of our atmosphere. The sky is black." - BMO
"If you don't get what you want, you suffer; if you get what you don't want, you suffer; even when you get exactly what you want, you still suffer because you can't hold on to it forever. Your mind is your predicament." - Socrates
"But I, being poor, have only my dreams. I have spread my dreams under your feet. Tread softly because you tread on my dreams." - Yeats
"I have to stay away from human beings because somehow I am not one. Everything that is real to me is what is hallucination for others." - Jeremiah Tower
"Be prepared" - Boy Scout Motto
"Life is hard. Life will never not be hard." -Unknown
"Those who turn to God for comfort may find comfort but I do not think they will find God." -Mignon McLaughlin - The Neurotic's Notebook
"I"m not doing it to upset you, okay? This is my problem. I want other people to tell me how they feel. But I"m not so sure I want to return the favor." - Benjamin Alire Senz
"DO MORE THINGS THAT MAKE YOU FORGET TO CHECK YOUR PHONE"
"Numbers alone don't count for much in history. History is often shaped by small groups of foreword looking innovators, rather than by the backward looking masses." Yuval Noah Harari, Homo Deus
"Half of what I say is meaningless. But I say it so that other half may reach you." Kahlil Gibran
"Do Not Stop When You Are Tired. Stop When You Are Done"
"The best way to pay for a lovely moment is to enjoy it." - Richard Bach
"Either you're really on the top of the world, or you're swimming upside down." - Marvin De Lazarus
''Death smiles at us all. All a man can do is smile back'' - Marcus Aurelius
"The greater the love, the greater the tragedy when it's over." - Nicholas Sparks
"The further a society drifts from the truth, the more it will hate those that speak it." George Orwell
"Seek respect, not attention. It lasts longer."  Ziad Abdelnour
"One should judge a man mainly from his depravities. Virtues can be faked. Depravities are real."  Klaus Kinski
"We walk alone in the world. Friends, such as we desire, are dreams and fables." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Making love with a woman and sleeping with a woman are two separate passions, not merely different but opposite. Love does not make itself felt in the desire for copulation but in the desire for shared sleep (a desire limited to one woman)." - Milan Kundera
"To achieve great things, two things are needed: a plan, and not quite enough time." Leonard Bernstein
"The gods of the past have become as their own devils in order to live."  Anton Szandor LaVey, "The Satanic Bible"
"Meg, you're my daughter. I would accept you if you were gay, blind or retarded... but you're not." - Lois Griffin
"Everyone want's people they like to be right. That's why popular people are fucking dumb." - Rick Sanchez (Rick and Morty)
"The hottest of fires, forge the sharpest of blades." - Jacob Heinrichs
"Every isolated passion, is, in isolation, insane; sanity may be defined as synthesis of insanities."- Bertrand Russell
"Every isolated passion is, in isolation, insane: sanity may be defined as a synthesis of insanities." - Bertrand Russell
"Despair is only for those who see the end beyond all doubt. We do not." - Gandalf the Grey
"If you pay enough attention, everyone's an aphorist." - Jason Doonazie
"There are times you blame the apple, and there are times you blame the tree." -- Bill Lewis
"Your reputation within the community is like your credit score. Everything you do can affect it." -- Bill Lewis
"We don"t see things the way they are. We see them the way we are"  Talmud
"Life is like photography. You need the negatives to develop." - Unknown
"Those who wish to seek out the cause of miracles and to understand... nature as philosophers, and not to stare at them in astonishment like fools, are soon considered heretical and impious, and proclaimed as such by those whom the mob adores as the interpreters of nature and the gods. For these-"
" One of the hardest parts of life is deciding whether to walk away or to try harder." - Myself
"Usually the strongest people are the people who went through the most pain. " - Mark Collwayun
"Space may be the final frontier, but it"s made in a Hollywood basement" - Red Hot Chili Peppers
"What hurts more, the pain of hard work or the pain of regret?" -Boston Celtics Training Facility Poster
"And in the end, it's not the years in your life that count; it's the life in your years." - Abraham Lincoln
"You miss 100% of the shots you don"t take." Wayne Gretzky
"When the evanescent is carefully contemplated, something timeless is revealed." Edward Rothstein (New York Times)
"To laugh often and much; to win the respect of intelligent people and the affection of children to leave the world a better place to know even one life has breathed easier because you have lived. This is to have succeeded." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"It takes 20 years to build a reputation and five minutes to ruin it. If you think about that, you'll do things differently." - Warren Buffett
"Breathe. You're going to be okay. Breathe and remember that you've been in this place before. You've been this uncomfortable and anxious and scared, and you've survived. I know it feels unbearable right now, but keep breathing, again and again. This will pass. I promise it will pass"-Daniell Koepke
"The first man who compared woman to a rose was a poet, the second, an imbecile."
"The tried and tested way of active measures is to use an adversary"s existing weaknesses against himself, to drive wedges into pre-existing cracks." -Thomas Rid
"Do not take life too seriously. You will never get out of it alive." - Elbert Hubbard
"Be how you want others to see you as." - Anonymous
"A nation cannot survive treason from within..." - Justice Millard Caldwell [For the full quote - see the post text.]
"The reason we haven"t made self-conscious machines is primarily because we are in denial about what makes us self-...
"A girl, no matter how many times she denies it, she will always remember every detail, every moment, every piece of the memories you've left her. No matter how much she tries to forgot, it will always be there." - Myself
"The two most common elements in the universe are Hydrogen and stupidity." - Harlan Ellison
"If you really want to do something you'll find a way. If you don't, you'll find an excuse." -- Jim Rohn
"If you really want to do something you'll find a way. If you don't, you'll find an excuse." -- Jim Rohn
"A mistake is only a mistake if you don't learn anything from it, once you learned something from it, it becomes a lesson."
"There is nothing you could have done" -Starfire (Teen Titans)
"All the drive in the world is worthless if you are driving yourself off a cliff. Match the motivation, determination and drive with education, organization, and implementation to cross the finish line." - Loren Weisman
"Keep your face always toward the sunshine - and shadows will fall behind you." - Walt Whitman
"Simplicity is the ultimate sophistication." - Leonardo da Vinci
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do, so throw off the bowlines, sail away from safe harbor, catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore, Dream, Discover." - Mark Twain
"Up to a point a person"s life is shaped by environment, heredity, and changes in the world about them. Then there comes a time when it lies within their grasp to shape the clay of their life into the sort of thing they wish it to be." - Louis L'Amour
"It is said that heroes are not born...they're made. In the fires of conflict...in the forge of heroes." - Jake Heinrichs
"I keep myself busy with things to do, but every time I pause I still think of you" - unknown
"Win the day everyday, eventually you will win big and the secret to winning the day is to win the mornings."
"I never tasted a cough medicine I didn"t love." - George Costanza
"Real freedom is having a pornographic wallpaper on your computer and not worrying about it." -Alan Smithee
"Happiness is not something you postpone for the future; it is something you design for the present." - Jim Rohn
"Get busy living, or get busy dying." - Stephen King
"Our character is but the stamp on our souls of the free choices of good and evil we have made through life." John C. Geikie
"I find it sad that by not talking about who I sleep with, that makes me mysterious. There was a time when I would have been called a gentleman." - Kevin Spacey
"There's no such thing as bad weather, only unsuitable clothing." - Alfred Wainwright
"A man of knowledge lives by acting, not by thinking about acting." - Carlos Castaneda
"At present machinery competes against man. Under proper conditions machinery will serve man. There is no doubt at all that this is the future of machinery..." - Oscar Wilde
"Ethics is a weak man's way of winning a fight." - Jacob Heinrichs
"A harmless man is not a good man. A good man is a very dangerous man who has that under voluntary control." -Jordan Peterson
"The illusion which exalts us is dearer to us than ten thousand truths." - Anton Chekhov, "Gooseberries"
"98% of us will die at some point in our lives." Ricky Bobby
"It's better to light a candle than to curse the darkness" - Chinese Proverb
"The best part about making a Spiderman game is that you're making a Spiderman game. The hardest part is that it's a Spiderman game."
"An object at rest stays at rest... unless acted upon by an unbalanced force" - Isaac Newton
"The journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step." - Lao Tzu
"All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence, and then success is sure."  Mark Twain
"To those human beings who are of any concern to me I wish suffering, desolation, sickness, ill-treatment, indignities..." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I am good, but not an angel. I do sin, but I am not the devil. I am just a small girl in a big world trying to find someone to love." - Marilyn Monroe
"Very often tears are the last smile of love." Stendhal
"Life is either a daring adventure or nothing."  Hellen Keller
"Instant gratification leads to instant regret" - Anonymous
"When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace." Jimi Hendrix
"The weak hype of analytics without the stronghold of conversions to sales and profits is not something to promote. Stop hyping the online numbers and start delivering better content and engagement to create the true physical sales numbers." - Loren Weisman
"Friendly reminder: There is such a thing as TOO wack." - Karmous Kurtis
"If opportunity doesn't knock build a door" - Milton Berle
"Fate, my friend, you say the strangest things." -Julian Casablancas
"She was a unique constellation of attributes; she was my Halley's comet. But the universe is designed to break your heart, right?" (-Must Love Dogs)
"Violence can read like poetry. You just have to describe the act as if you"re in love with the way your characters bleed." - The Artist, The Audience and a Man Called Nothing
"Normal is an illusion. What is normal for the spider is chaos for the fly." - Charles Addams
"Doubt kills more dreams than failure ever will." (-Suzy Kassem)
"If a man whistles at you, don't turn around. You are a lady not a dog." Niall Horan
"Women remember the men who made them laugh, men the women who made them cry." - Henri de Regnier
"For every Michael Jordan, there's an Earl Manigault. We all can't make it. Somebody has to fall. I was the one." - Earl Manigault
"WHAT'S WRONG WITH ASSHOLES, BABY? YOU'VE GOT AN ASSHOLE, I'VE GOT AN ASSHOLE! YOU GO TO THE STORE AND BUY A PORTERHOUSE STEAK, THAT HAD AN ASSHOLE! ASSHOLES COVER THE EARTH! IN A WAY TREES HAVE ASSHOLES BUT YOU CAN'T FIND THEM, THEY JUST DROP THEIR LEAVES.
"We're all puppets, Laurie. I'm just a puppet who can see the strings." - Dr. Manhattan
"Let us be grateful to the people who make us happy; they are the charming gardeners who make our souls blossom." (-Marcel Proust)
"Scars dont heal when you keep cutting" - Ramsay
"There is no shame in not knowing. The shame lies in not finding out." - Russian Proverb
"And the day will come when, to the bane and enlightenment of man, the plague will awaken its rats, and send them forth to die in a happy city." - Albert Camus, La Peste, 1947
"Thoughts in the mind determine your course, steering your life for better or worse" - James Allen
[REQUEST] Who said something along the lines of "Computers are perfect, humans are not?"
"The trust things rarely have to be spoken."
"For cold there"s hot. For dry there"s wet. For wind there"s calm. For night there"s day, which might not seem like weather to you, but it is. Embrace the weather  and you"ll understand the balance of the world." Dean Koontz, Brother Odd
"For cold there"s hot. For dry there"s wet. For wind there"s calm. For night there"s day, which might not seem like weather to you, but it is. Embrace the weather  and you"ll be understand the balance of the world." - Dean Koontz, Brother Odd
"Suitability test, Ricky." - Jim Lahey "I'll wear a suit if I have to, I don't care - I'll be here." - Ricky, *Trailer Park Boys*
"The love of knowledge is a kind of madness." -C.S. Lewis
"Do the best you can, and never stop" - Stephen Wiltshere
"Do or Do not, there is no try" - Yoda
"some moments are nice, some are nicer, some are even worth writing about." - Charles Bukowski
"Discontent is the first step in the progress of a man or a nation." Oscar Wilde
"The words you speak become the house you live in." Hafiz
"True love is not wen he calls you everyday to tell you, his at the corner or outside. .True love is when you don't see him for weeks and still feel like your CRUSH won't love you like he does." - William Marsh
"People are bloody ignorant apes"
"Learn to value yourself, which means: fight for your happiness." - Ayn Rand
"Silence is a girls loudest cry" - Malvika
"Don"t let your ears witness what your eyes didn"t see. Don"t let your mouth speak what your heart doesn"t feel." - Mark Callway Stire
"No ones life is perfect! Life is about making mistakes and how you succeed anyways!" - Andres "DraMatik" Gonzalez
"The only way to get ahead is to find errors in conventional wisdom." - Larry Ellison
"The moment that everything becomes nothing is the moment nothing becomes everything"
"Life rises out of death, death rises out of life"
"Just because someone looks, acts, or seems healthy and fine does not mean they aren"t suffering in some way. Be gentle and kind." UNKNOWN
"And how we burned in the camps later ... deserved everything that happened afterward." -Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn [full quote too long, see post]
"In the new country they use taxes, in the old country they used bayonets." -Michener, The Drifters
"We need 4 hugs a day for survival. We need 8 hugs a day for maintenance. We need 12 hugs a day for growth." Virginia Satir
"That say love wins. I think hate has a pretty strong track record." Jodah Friedlander
"The day you lose someone isn"t the worst. At least you"ve got something to do. It"s all the days they stay dead." -The Doctor
"The ones who you don't like will like you, and the ones you do like won't like you back. Welcome to dating."
"When you are rich, famous, and universally loved, only one pursuit remains: raping your fellow man." Anonymous
"When you are rich, famous, and universally loved, only one pursuit remains: raping your fellow man." Kevin Spacey
"We judge others by their actions, but ourselves by our intentions"
"Usually when people are sad, they don't do anything. They just cry over their condition. But when they get angry, they bring about a change." Malcolm X
"Sometimes it"s the journey that teaches you a lot about your destination. Sometimes it"s about going there, not getting there." - Drake
"You can only fulfill your dreams if you wake up"-anonymous
"Death twitches my ear; "Live," he says. "I'm coming." - Virgil
"The irony of man's condition is that the deepest need is to be free of the anxiety of death and annihilation, but it is life itself which awakens it, and so we must shrink from being fully alive." - Ernest Becker
"Whether ours shall continue to be a government of laws and not of men is now for Congress and ultimately the American people" [to decide]. - Archibald Cox, special prosecutor appointed to investigate the Watergate scandal, after being fired by President Nixon
"That is not dead which can eternal lie, And with strange aeons even death may die." - Abdul Alhazred, Necronomicon
"People who cares about karma/upvotes/downvotes in Reddit are kids" - Not Me
"I am human just like you, living life from a different view" - Anonymous
"The biggest fish in the river gets that way by never bein' caught" William Bloom
"I am not what happened to me. I am what I choose to become." Carl Jung
"Sometimes when things are falling apart they may actually be falling into place." - J. Lynn
"Nodding your head, saying yeah, yeah and pretending to know things you don't is right up there with one of the worst things you can do when you hire someone to help you and your career." - Loren Weisman
"It's probably wrong to believe there can be any limit to the horror which the human mind can experience." - Stephen King, Pet Sematery
"But where sleep is the goal, life lacks meaning" -Nietzsche
"Human life is but a series of footnotes to a vast obscure unfinished masterpiece" -Pale Fire by Vladimir Nabokov
"The sun kept on with its slipping away, and I thought how many small good things in the world might be resting on the shoulders of something terrible." - Carol Rifka Brunt, Tell the Wolves I"m Home
"We were nostalgic for a time that wasn't yet over."
"What do you want to do In this life? Every step from here should be In pursuit of that goal." - HIMYM (possibly paraphrased)
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W.P. Kinsella
"Give freely to the world these gifts of love and compassion. Do not concern yourself with how much you receive in return, just know in your heart it will be returned."-Steve Maraboli
"Let me tell you this, the older you do get the more rules they"re gonna try to get you to follow. You just gotta keep livin" man, L-I-V-I-N."-Dazed and Confused
"Laws are like sausages, it is better not to see them being made." -Otto von Bismarck
"If you can't make it better you might as well make it worse" -Dave
"There is no shortcut. It takes time to build a better, stronger version of yourself." Unknown
"Curiosity is the beginning of wisdom." -Francoise Sagan
"Everything passes, but not everything is forgotten." - Bunin Ivan
"You don't have a right to the cards you believe you should have been dealt. You have an obligation to play the hell out of the ones you're holding." (-Cheryl Strayed)
"Advertising signs that con, you Into thinking you're the one, That can do what's never been done, That can win what's never been won, Meantime life outside goes on, All around you." -Bob Dylan
"It was as if she'd fall over, like a toy top, if she stopped spinning." - Matthew Desmond, Evicted
"Happiness blooms in the presence of self-respect and the absence of ego. Love yourself. Love everyone around you. Love everyone in the whole world. Know that your own life is of infinite importance, as is every other life." - Jonathan Lockwood Huie
"Man"s capacity for justice makes democracy possible, but man"s inclination to injustice makes democracy necessary." Reinhold Niebuhr
"Quite often we forget the term 'No' is a complete sentence. Don't put someone off in fear of disappointing them. Just say 'No' and be done with it. No explanation necessary." -- Bill Lewis
"Find someone who doesn"t make you feel ashamed of your inner world....
"We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act, but a habit." - Aristotle.
"Quite often we forget the term 'No' is a complete sentence. We don't have to explain ourselves in not wanting to do something. Don't put someone off in fear of disappointing them. Just say 'No' and be done with it." -- Bill Lewis
"You play the hand you are dealt and do the best with it you can." - Mills Lane, legendary boxing referee
"Thou shalt not, thou son of a whore, make subjects of Christian sons; we have no fear of your army, by land and by sea we will battle with thee, fuck thy mother." - Zaporozhian Cossacks, 1676
"Do not let what you cannot do interfere with why you can do." - John Wooden
"The present is the ever moving shadow that divides yesterday from tomorrow. In that lies hope." - Frank Lloyd Wright
"Education is what survives when what has been learned has been forgotten." - B. F. Skinner
"The Cold War isn't thawing; it is burning with a deadly heat. Communism isn't sleeping; it is, as always, plotting, scheming, working, fighting." -Richard M. Nixon
"We all yearn for what we have lost. But sometimes, we forget what we have." - Mitch Albom
"Advice is what we ask for when we already know the answer but wish we didn't." - Erica Jong
"I have seen the throne of the gods, and it was empty!" -Corypheus, Dragon Age Inquisition
"There is nothing impossible to him who will try."  Alexander the Great.
"And that's the world in a nutshell, an appropriate receptacle." -Stan Dunn
"Torture produces nothing worthwhile. The poor wretches say anything that comes into their mind that the interrogator wishes to hear." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"If god wanted you alive he wouldn't have sent me" -Genghis Khan
"The truth is, everyone is going to hurt you. You just got to find the ones worth suffering for." - Bob Marley
"I don"t believe in the "supernatural," I believe in the "supernormal." To me there is nothing that goes against nature. If it seems incomprehensible, it"s because we haven"t been able to understand it yet." - Richard Matheson
"Wine is constant proof that god loves us and loves to see us happy" -Benjamin Franklin
"Life's too short for softcore porn." -Traincar graffiti I saw once
"Do not take life too seriously. You will never get out of it alive." -- Elbert Hubbard
"We need the sun to come back out. After so long.. I think we deserve the sun."- Gerald"s Game
"Silence, I discover, is something you can actually hear." -Haruki Murakami
,,She wears strength and darkness equally well, the girl has always been half goddess, half hell.""-Nikita Gill
"It is difficult to get a man to understand something, when his salary depends upon his not understanding it!" - Upton Sinclair
"Life isn"t about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself."- George Bernard Shaw
"Worry is like a rocking chair, it will give you something to do, but it won"t get you anywhere." - VANCE HAVNER
"Treat everyone like they're you, living another life" - Joe Rogan
"If someone is trying to sell you with only past credentials and older accolades without including present examples and up to date proof, you might be dealing with someone that is sharing expired information and does not have the up to date knowledge to help you." - Loren Weisman
"How do we know any of us even have this thing they call 'free will' anyhow?" "We definitely don't," the bard said. "We're fictional characters in a novel. Everything we do and say is predetermined." - Alexis Rivers
"If a man never faces anything he fears, he will come to fear everything he faces." - Alexis Rivers
''THE THINGS YOU OWN END UP OWNING YOU'' FIGHT CLUB
"Rehashing a story over and over again doesn't make it true." -- Bill Lewis
"A hero is paid in love, not gold," Sir Edward said. "I'd much rather be paid in gold, replied Sir Hecnick. The old knight sighed, "So would I. Love is a cheap thing." - Alexis Rivers from Sir Hecnick's Terrific Tale
"Put a fancy name next to any stupid thought, and some if not at all will give it more thought than before." -Mark Twain, Abraham Lincoln, Albert Einstein, etc
"We walk alone in the world. Friends, such as we desire, are dreams and fables." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"who's more foolish, the fool or the fool who follows him" -Obi-Wan Kenobi
"Imagine your life is perfect in every respect; what would it look like?"- Brian Tracy
"Sometimes it is the people no one imagines anything of who do the things that no one can imagine." -Alan Turing in the Imitation Game
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." Dr. Seuss
"Never get so busy making a living you forget to make a life". -/u/NotMathMan821
"A hero is paid in love, not gold."
"A Hero is paid in love, not gold."
"I don't always share my belief with others, but I don't have to express my disbelief either." -Unknown-
"The word "good" has many meanings. For example, if a man were to shoot his grandmother at a range of five hundred yards, I should call him a good shot, but not necessarily a good man." - G.K. Chesterton
"May we think of freedom, not as the right to do as we please, but as the opportunity to do what is right." - Peter Marshall
"Don't allow those around you to control the direction of your life." -- Bill Lewis
"Love is a game we want to win, But we're only a pawn on the wrong playboard." MD
"One can only forget about time by making use of it." - Charles Baudelaire
"A computer lets you make more mistakes faster than any invention in human history- with the possible exceptions of handguns and tequila" - Rich Radcliffe
"A computer lets you make more mistakes faster than any invention in human history- with the possible exceptions of handguns and tequila" - Rich Radcliffe
"We are torn between nostalgia for the familiar and an urge for the foreign and strange. As often as not, we are homesick most for the places we have never known." - Carson McCullers
"I have crossed oceans of time to find you." - Dracula
"Despite the constant negative press covfefe" - Donald J Trump (twitter post)
"In order to become the master, the politician poses as the servant." - Charles de Gaulle
"Politicians are like diapers. They both need changing regularly and for the same reason." - Mark Twain
"No matter what side of the argument you are on, you always find people on your side that you wish were on the other." - Jascha Heifetz
"Communication and a clear mutual understanding between two people or more can help to build the best route to success in any venture." - Loren Weisman
"The poets have been mysteriously silent on the subject of cheese." -G.K. Chesterton
"We must be our own before we can be another"s." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Do not let what you cannot do interfere with what you can do." -John Wooden
"Either you run the day, or the day runs you." -Jim Rohn
"You can't outwit an idiot." - Jake Heinrichs
"It's both funny and cruel; how the fires we begin end up burning us alive."
"Death is a stripping away of all that is not you. The secret of life is to 'die before you die' -- and find that there is no death." - Eckhart Tolle
"When people say "it's always the last place you look". Of course it is. Why would you keep looking after you've found it?" - - Billy Connolly
"I am sufficiently proud of my knowing something to be modest about my not knowing all." - Vladimir Nabokov
"And love is evil  spell it backwards, I'll show ya" -Marshal Mathers
"Judge a man by his questions rather than his answers." - Voltaire
"Knowledge speaks, but wisdom listens." - Jimi Hendrix
"Hegel remarks somewhere that all great world-historic facts and personages appear, so to speak, twice. He forgot to add: the first time as tragedy, the second time as farce" - Karl Marx
"If I have a book that thinks for me, a pastor who acts as my conscience, a physician who prescribes my diet, and so on - then I have no need to exert myself. I have no need to think, if only I can pay; others will take care of that disagreeable business for me." - Immanuel Kant
"Demanding change and justice is worlds different from devoting time and efforts to making those changes and creating that justice." - Loren Weisman
"Knowledge of syphilis is not instruction to get it. Likewise, knowledge of an opposing point of view is not instruction to eradicate itnor embrace it." - Lenny Bruce
"It's raw!"-Gordon Ramsay
'' Never make fun of someone if they mispronounce a word.It means they learned it by reading. "- Anonymous
"When they say I couldn't, that's when I say that I can. Everything I'm not made me everything I am." -SonReal
"There comes a day when you're gonna look around and realize happiness is where you are." (-Moana)
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." -Mark Twain
''Everything you can imagine is real.'' - Pablo Picasso
".................." -Michael Meyers (Halloween)
"Hayek warns us against thinking of the "formation of abstractions" as "actions of the mind." We should think of the formation of concepts "as some-thing which happens to the mind, or that alters that structure of relationships which we call the mind" Roger Koppl quoting Friedrich Hayek
"We're in a giant car heading towards a brick wall, and everyone's arguing over where they're going to sit." - David Suzuki
"Love does not claim possession, but gives freedom." - Rabindranath Tagore
"Don't take rest after your FIRST VICTORY. Because if you FAIL in SECOND, more lips are waiting to say your first victory was just LUCK" - APJ-Abdul Kalam
"Once you replace negative thoughts with positive ones, you'll start having positive results."
"Nobody can give you freedom. Nobody can give you equality or justice or anything. If you"re a man, you take it." - Malcolm X
"Truths delivered by lies are no less true." -Thomas Durant, Hell on Wheels
"Too many people spend money they haven't earned, to buy things they don't want, to impress people that they don't like." - Will Rogers
"What"s the point in having freedom if you"re just going to do what everyone else does?"
"Sexual liberation is a form of control." - Dr. E. Michael Jones
"There is no such thing as negative progress" - Unknown
"He who saves one life saves the world entire."
"Often the hands will solve a mystery that the intellect has struggled with in vain." - Carl Jung
"I am Groot" - Groot
"The past has no power over the present moment." _Eckhart Tolle
"I've always wanted to be somebody, but now I realize I should have been more specific" -Lily Tomlin
"Depth of friendship does not depend on length of acquaintance." - Rabindranath Tagore
"Choices are a consecuence of choices created by consecuences." - Antartika Pump
"Loneliness does not come from having no people around you, but from being unable to communicate the things that seem important to you." - Carl Jung
"Never forget who you are, the rest of the world will not. Wear it like armor and it can never be used to hurt you." -Tyrion Lannister
"Loneliness does not come from having no people around you, but from being unable to communicate the things that seem important to you." - Carl Jung
"The man who asks a question is a fool for a minute, the man who does not ask is a fool for life." - Confucius
"Sometimes you have to sacrifice something that is more beautiful for your eyes, for something that is more beautiful for your heart.." - Unknown
"Over the years you get to see what a struggle life is for most people, how tough it is, how easy it is to be judgmental and criticise and stand outside of situations and impart your wisdom and judgment.
"Being greedy for fresh inspiration and ideas is a craving worth having!" - Adrian McGinn
"The difference between stupidity and genius is that genius has its limits."  Albert Einstein
"I shall not commit the fashionable stupidity of regarding everything I cannot explain as a fraud."- C.G. Jung
"There is a great distance between listening and reading to actually applying and doing. Take the information in, learn it and then work on applying it in order to reach your dreams." - Loren Weisman
"Let go of the past and keep moving forward." (-Meet The Robinsons)
"The oldest and strongest emotion of mankind is fear, and the oldest and strongest kind of fear is fear of the unknown." -Howard Phillips Lovecraft
"If the wounds on her heart and the bruises on her soul were translated on her skin, you wouldn't recognize her at all." - Random
"Friendship is always a sweet responsibility, never an opportunity". - Khalil Gibran
"My best friend is the one who brings out the best in me." - Henry Ford
" Every end is a new Beginning" - APJ Abul Kalam
"Don't run from trouble, you ain't never gonna get that far." -Brer Fox
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything" - Mark Twain
"Kids today are detestable...and it's no good saying that the ones you read about are a minority. They're not a minority of they're all yours and you have to wait for the car to get home to know your daughter hasn't got pregnancy or leprosy." -Groucho Marx
"Realize that feelings are fleeting and life is a constant transition."
"A calm and modest life brings more happiness than the pursuit of success combined with constant restlessness." - Albert Einstein
"Your lack of attention to detail is why no one is paying attention to you. Professionalism, communication and follow through builds real success."- Loren Weisman
"[E]xperience...is a matter of sensibility and intuition, of seeing and hearing the significant things, of paying attention at the right moments, of understanding, and coordinating. Experience is not what happens to a man; it is what a man does with what happens to him." - Aldous Huxley
"[E]xperience is a matter of sensibility and intuition, of seeing and hearing the significant things, of paying attention at the right moments, of understanding, and coordinating. Experience is not what happens to a man; it is what a man does with what happens to him." - Aldous Huxley
"[E]xperience...is a matter of sensibility and intuition, of seeing and hearing the significant things, of paying attention at the right moments, of understanding, and coordinating. Experience is not what happens to a man; it is what a man does with what happens to him."
"A traveler without observation is a bird without wings." Jack Kerouac
"You'll know you have the devil's attention when people expect you to run a race while carrying their baggage and act like it's normal." - Scary Pratchett
"No people will tamely surrender their Liberties, nor be subdued, when knowledge ...and virtue is preserved. [But] when People are ignorant, debauched in their Manners, they will sink under their own weight without the Aid of foreign Invaders." - Samuel Adams
"I pray that our Heavenly Father may assuage the anguish of your bereavement, and leave you only the cherished memory of the loved and lost, and the solemn pride that must be yours to have laid so costly a sacrifice upon the altar of freedom." - Lincoln, to a mother who lost sons in the Civil War
"One of the most beautiful qualities of true friendship is to understand and to be understood." - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"Nothing in life is to be feared; it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more so that we may fear less." Marie Curie
"How dismal it is to see present day Americans yearning for the very orthodoxy that their country was founded to escape." - Christopher Hitchens
"Freedom of the Press, if it means anything at all, means the freedom to criticize and oppose." George Orwell
"A good relationship is not a refuge from your problems, but an oasis where you can grow better as a person." -Shon Mehta
"It is the moral factor which decides the fate of nations: man's spirit can prove greater than the power of leviathan. A nation is swiftly overcome if its spirit is weak; but with unyielding determination it can vanquish powers that appear to be utterly invincible" - Gwynfor Evans
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use." - Sren Kierkegaard.
"Believe deep down in your heart that you're destined to do great things." - Joe Paterno
"Share your smile with the world. It"s a symbol of friendship and peace." - Christie Brinkley
"Don"t walk behind me; I may not lead. Don"t walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend."  Albert Camus
"You often hear that pot leads to harder drugs. But I think alcohol is what leads you to everything, because it takes away the fear. The worst drug experimentation I ever did was because I was drunk and didn't care." - Chris Cornell
"A quiet and modest life brings more joy than a pursuit of success bound with constant unrest."  Albert Einstein
"I was born when she kissed me. I died when she left me. I lived a few weeks while she loved me." - Humphrey Bogart (In a Lonely Place 1950)
[Request] Something along the lines of "There's nothing more painful than watching someone badly argue for one of your beliefs."
"Without work, all life goes rotten, but when work is soulless, life stifles and dies." Albert Camus
"If you don't become an actor, you'll never be a factor." -Lupe Fiasco
"I hear and I forget. I see and I remember. I do and I understand." Confucius
"You are not free until you have no need to impress anybody." - Joyce Meyer
"You keep putting one foot in front of the other, and then one day you look back and you"ve climbed a mountain" - Tom Hiddlestone
"I'm not interested in your little ideas. I'm interested in something much larger." - Delacourt
"There"s no sense to it. My wife was a true crime writer and researcher and the phrase she hated the most was, "everything happens for a reason."...
"O" - Izobel
"Silence is a true friend who never betrays.Confucius
"I know very little about anything, but I do know this: if you can live your life without an audience, you should do it." -Bo Burnham
"A calm and modest life brings more happiness than the pursuit of success combined with constant restlessness."  AlbertE Einstein
"Millions saw the apple fall, but Newton was the one to ask why." - Bernard Baruch
"Unhappiness is not knowing what we want, and killing ourselves trying to get it" - Don Harold
"Be a yardstick of quality. Some people aren't used to an environment where excellence is expected." Steve Jobs
"To fall in love is to create a religion that has a fallible god." - Jorge Luis Borges
"Give a man a tree and he'll tree for a day. Teach a man to tree and he'll great society for the rest of his life." - Elder Wisdom
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." -Mark Twain
"This life is just a test..." - Mike Love
"He is a bold surgeon, they say, whose hand does not tremble when he performs an operation upon his own person; and he is often equally bold who does not hesitate to pull off the mysterious veil of self-delusion, which covers his view the deformities of his own conduct." - Adam Smith
"True freedom lies in a power to decide, to constitute problems themselves." - Giles Deleuze
"Everybody acts out a myth, but very few people know what their myth is. And you should know what your myth is, because it might be a tragedy. And maybe you don't want it to be." - Jordan Peterson
"In the end, it is your responsibility to read the small print, whether it is for contracts, investors, services or anything else. You can blame everyone else for your mistakes, but when you sign for them and sign up for them, you are now responsible to pay for those errors." - Loren Weisman
"Men with power obey neither policy nor principle. No one is different; no one is neutral." General Amajagh (Batman V Superman: Dawn of Justice)
"It"s okay if every weekend doesn"t lead to big moments and campfires and laughter that carries on for hours and hours. Some weekends might be quiet, still, with plenty of room to contemplate. And in that contemplation room, there is room to grow." Morgan Harper Nichols
"Never look back unless you are planning to go that way." -Henry David Thoreau
"We must all try to empathize before we criticize. Ask someone what"s wrong before telling them they are wrong." (-Simon Sinek)
"No one is perfect until you fall in love with them."
"The easiest way to lose something is to want it too badly." - J.D. [Scrubs]
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow (wo)man; true nobility is being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"Be weird. Be random. Be who you are. Because you never know who would love the person you hide." -C.S. Lewis
"It is impossible for a man to learn what he thinks he already knows." - Epictetus
"Life doesn't come with a remote control, you have to get up and change it yourself" - Unknown
"It's important to create what you desire to, not what people expect you to." - Shigeru Miyamoto
"Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free speech because you have nothing to say." - Edward Snowden
"If you want to be successful, you must respect one rule. NEVER TO LIE TO YOURSELF." - Paulo Coelho
"If you cannot do great things, do small things in a great way." Napoleon Hil
"The best revenge is to be unlike him who performed the injury." - Marcus Aurelius
"Change is hard at first, Messy in the middle, And gorgeous at the end." -Robin Sharma
"I believe the good you do for others comes back to you. But if you do something good for some person and more than two people know about it  you and the other person  then you didn't do it for the right reason." - George Steinbrenner
"You can"t wake a person who is pretending to be asleep." -Navajo expression
"Kind words do not cost much. Yet they accomplish much." Blaise Pascal
"This, then, is the human problem: there is a price to be paid for every increase in consciousness. We cannot be more sensitive to pleasure without being more sensitive to pain." Alan Watts
''The real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new landscapes, but in having new eyes.'' - Marcel Proust
"He is happy, whose circumstances suit his temper; but he is more excellent, who can suit his temper to any circumstances." - David Hume (An Enquiry Concerning the Principles of Morals)
"We are not at peace with others because we are not at peace with ourselves." - Thomas Merton
"If you are willing to look at another person"s behavior toward you as a reflection of the state of their relationship with themselves rather than a statement about your value as a person, then you will, over a period of time cease to react at all." - Yogi Bhajan
"Make sure to allow people to take care of you." Mickalene Thomas
"Do not hide, duck or cover when you are asked to give an answer or information that someone is not going to like. Answer the questions, even if the answers are not what others want to hear." - Loren Weisman
"People don't get what they deserve. They just get what they get. There's nothing any of us can do about it." - House M.D
"I have been quiet today because fear in my heart has been fighting with frustration in my brain, leaving little energy for my mouth." Camron Wright "The Rent Collector"
"I have taken more good from alcohol than alcohol has taken from me" Winston Churchill
"Life is like a box of chocolates. A cheap, thoughtless, perfunctory gift that nobody ever asks for.
"Why clog your brain with a bunch of hypothetical-maybe-what-if bullshit?" - Sterling Archer
"On the journey to myself I"ve been so many people."  Indigo Williams
"The decisions you make, and the actions that follow, are a reflection of who you really are." -Samurai Jack
"Not saying 'thank you' is a missed opportunity for having good things continue to happen to you."--Jules
"You can't buy youth, but you can buy the youth for a pittance." - Yoo Byung-Jae
''I've seen things you people wouldn't believe. Attack ships on fire off the shoulder of Orion. I watched C-beams glitter in the dark near the Tannhuser Gate. All those moments will be lost in time, like tears in rain. Time to die.'' - Roy Batty - Blade Runner (1982)
"When we love, we have no need to understand what is happening, because everything is happening inside us."
"To quote the Oscar Wilde quote about living rather than existing in its original context is the rarest thing in the world. Most people only quote the second part of it without context, and that is all." -dilatory_tactics, douche
"Still a man hears what he wants to hear, and disregards the rest" - Paul Simon
"I fight for the ones that can't fight, and if I lose, at least I tried." -Corey Taylor (Pulse of the Maggots)
"Dead people receive more flowers than the living ones, because regret is stronger than gratitude." -Anne Frank
"Work hard in Silence;Let success make the noise"
"Some stories don't have happy endings. Even love stories. Maybe especially love stories." - Kristin Hannah
"If You"re Going Through Hell, Keep Going" - Winston Churchill
"Life is a tragedy when seen in close-up, but a comedy in long-shot."  Charlie Chaplin
"We think too much and feel too little."  Charlie Chaplin
[Serious] What are some famous quotes or lines that include; I choose death?
"Fate is merely the trifling lullaby of fat kings and whores." - Maestro Brenf Broign
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people just exist." -Oscar Wilde
"The world is moving so fast that the person who says it can't be done is generally interrupted by someone doing it." Elbert Hubbard
"If you are not presenting your message with confidence and self-belief, why should anyone have confidence or belief in your message?" - Loren Weisman
"We do leave tiny pieces of ourselves with every person and place we have loved..." (-Victoria Erickson)
"We need not destroy the past. It is gone." - John Cage
"There's always a good idea in your mind, you just need something to trigger it"
"When you're young, you're scared of the monsters under the bed. When you're older, you learn to be scared of the monsters within yourself."
"If you have a goal, write it down. If you do not write it down, you do not have a goal - you have a wish." - Steve Maraboli
"The insufferable arrogance of human beings to think that Nature was made solely for their benefit, as if it was conceivable that the sun had been set afire merely to ripen men's apples and head their cabbages." - Cyrano de Bergerac
"It has been well said that an author who expects results from a first novel is in a position similar to that of a man who drops a rose petal down the Grand Canyon of Arizona and listens for the echo." - P.G. Wodehouse
"Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence." - Carl Sagan
"Threatened by shadows at night / And exposed in the light / Shine on you crazy diamond!" - Pink Floyd
"Sometimes people don't want to hear the truth because they don't want their illusions destroyed." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"To think of our greatest anxiety as an insignificant event, not only in the life of the universe but also in the life of our own soul, is the beginning of wisdom. To think this way right in the midst of our anxiety is the height of wisdom."  Fernando Pessoa
"Condemnation without investigation is the height of ignorance." - A Wise Person once said
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." _ Elbert Hubbard
"Fun" isn't a dirty word. It's also not a word that means "not art" or "lacking drama." And the word "funny" likewise doesn't negate artistic integrity or drama. - Mark Hughes
"I am not denying that great gains have resulted from the evolution of civilized society. But those gains have been made at the price of enormous losses, whose extent we have scarcely begun to estimate" -Jung
"The greatest hindrance to life is the waiting for tomorrow and the loss of today." - Seneca
"Now the gate has been unlatched, and headstones pushed aside. Corpses shift and offer room... A fate you must abide" -Gravemind
"Making the simple complicated is commonplace; making the complicated simple, awesomely simple, that's creativity." - Charles Mingus
"I'd rather have a bottle in front of me than a frontal lobotomy." - Tom Waits
"It isn't the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out, it's the pebble in your shoe." - Muhammad Ali
"Everybody is a genius. But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will live its whole life believing it is stupid" -Albert Einstein
"The confidence that comes from having a truly loving partner is immeasurable." - me
"Breathe and wait ten seconds before you put up that post. Is that content good for today, tomorrow, next week, next month and next year? If not, alter it, to create a professional endurance to your content" - Loren Weisman
"I would rather walk with a friend in the dark, than alone in the light." Helen Keller
"Finding good players is easy. Getting them to play as a team is another story." Casey Stengel
"The only two certainties in life are death and taxes." - unknown
"I don't need time, I need a deadline." - Duke Ellington
"The best way to make your dreams come true is to wake up." -P Valery
"No problem can withstand the assault of sustained thinking" - Voltaire
"When you hear a new idea, resist the temptation to tear it down in favour of making sense of it." - Michael Lewis quoting Kahneman
"The words of a president have an enormous weight, and ought not to be used indiscriminately." - Calvin Coolidge
"What"s dangerous is to not evolve" Jeff Bezos
"When, during the course of an interview for The New Yorker, I told the interviewer that I believed stories are found things, like fossils in the ground, he said that he didn"t believe me. I replied that that was fine, as long as he believed that I believe it." Stephen King
"Luck is what happens when preparation meets opportunity." - Seneca
"If you love something, you can never let it go, not even for a second, or it's gone forever."
"In this bright future you can't forget your past." .Marley
"Don't worry about a thing, every little thing is gonna be alright" .bob
"One love, one heart, one destiny." .BoBMarley
"Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing it incorrectly and applying the wrong remedies." Groucho Marx
"Only in darkness are we revealed [...] Goodness is not goodness that seeks advantage. Good is good in the final hour, in the deepest pit without hope, without witness, without reward. Virtue is only virtue in extremis." - Hooded Figure (Doctor Who)
"I Assume, Therefore I Am" -M.E.
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein
"The problem is not the problem. The problem is your attitude about the problem." - Captain Jack Sparrow
"A small popcorn and no drink is no way to start a relationship" - Bobby Hill
"And what matters aint the whos baddest, but the ones that stop you falling from your ladder".
"The problem is the not problem. The problem is your attitude about the problem." - Captain Jack Sparrow
"Cause life is a lesson, you learn it when you're through."  Limp Bizkit.
"Life's true gift lies in your freedom to design it beautifully."
"A moment's insight is sometimes worth a life's experience." - Oliver Wendell Holmes
"Luck is what you have left over after you give 100 percent." Langston Coleman
"Death is not the opposite of life, but a part of it." - Haruki Murakami
"Don't believe everything you hear. there are always three sides of the story; yours, theirs and the truth" - Unknown
"Your crisis isn't my priority. Lack of proper planning on your part isn't my problem." -- Bill Lewis
"The cream does not always rise to the top! There is a serious misconception, misconnection, and mistake in this idea of thinking." - Loren Weisman
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it." - Confucius
"To hell with circumstances, I create opportunities" - Bruce Lee -
"You miss 100% of the shots you don"t take." Wayne Gretzky
"I get it now. I get it. The things that you hope for the most are the things that destroy you in the end."  John Green
"Humans are disgusting creatures bent on self-destruction masked as self-preservation." -Myself
"The language you speak determines how you think." - Sapir-Whorf
"Even you can't know yourself, until death." _ anonymous
"Aging is an extraordinary process where you become the person you always should have been."  David Bowie
"it's just because I don't remember what is the standard answer to a problem and have to think it out anew that occasionally I get an original idea" Friedrich Hayek
"The psychotic drowns in the same waters in which the mystic swims with delight." - Joseph Campbell
"I hope that people will finally come to realize that there is only one 'race' - the human race - and that we are all members of it."-Margaret Atwood
"In the end, the greatest snowball isn"t a snowball at all: It"s fear." - Dwight Schrute
"The worst crime committed by OJ Simpson was making the Kardashians famous." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"We have seen our discourse degraded by casual cruelty. At times, it can seem like the forces pulling us apart are stronger than the forces binding us together." - Former President George W Bush
"We make a living by what we get. We make a life by what we give." Sir Winston Churchill
"Don"t oversell what or where you are, especially in today"s industry. It is easier now than ever to be found out as a big-talking beginner or a liar. On the other hand, honesty is strength; use it." - Loren Weisman
"God gave us the gift of life; it is up to us to give ourselves the gift of living well."-Voltaire
"There is nothing permanent except change. "-Heraclitus
"Be weird. Your strangeness is your magic." - Parker Lewis
"One need not be a prophet to be aware of impending dangers. An accidental combination of experience and interest will often reveal events to one man under aspects which few yet see." - F.A. Hayek
"We make a living by what we get, we make a life by what we give." - Winston Churchill
"When all is said and done, success without happiness is the worst kind of failure." - Louis Binstock
"True revolutionaries do not flaunt their radicalism. They cut their hair, put on suits and infiltrate the system from within." - Saul Alinsky
"What is it with rich people thinking they can starve the poor into good behavior?" - David Wong
"Nothing makes the earth seem so spacious as to have friends at a distance; they make the latitudes and longitudes." -Henry David Thoreau
"Physics isn"t Christian, though it was invented by Christians. Algebra isn"t Muslim, even though it was invented by Muslims. Whenever we get at the truth, we transcend culture, we transcend our upbringing." - Sam Harris
"The more you weigh, the harder you are to kidnap. Stay safe, eat cake." - Unknown Legend
"The law of creative inflation: a follow up to a beloved work must be at least twice as good to overcome the nostalgic boost that the original gets." - Emmett Bergson
"Sex without love is as hollow and ridiculous as love without sex." - Hunter S. Thompson
"What country can preserve it"s liberties if their rulers are not warned from time to time that their people preserve the spirit of resistance?" -Thomas Jefferson
"We, the people are rightful masters of both Congress and the courts  not to overthrow the Constitution, but to overthrow the men who pervert the Constitution."  Abraham Lincoln
"Oh God, he was old. He'd be dead by now if he wasn't already." - My father
"Sometimes when you meet someone there"s a "click". I don"t believe in love at first sight, but I believe in that click."  Ann Aguirre
"In order to succeed, we must first believe that we can" - Nikos Kazantzakis -
"Music was better when ugly people were allowed to make it."
"The one who falls and gets up is so much stronger than the one who never fell"
"If I am I because you are you, and you are you because I am I, then I am not I and you are not you. But if I am I because I am I, and you are you because you are you, then I am I and you are you."  Rabbi Menachem Mendel of Kotzk
"You reap what you sow, Artyom. Force answers force, war breeds war, and death only brings more death. To break this vicious cycle one must do more than just act without any thought or doubt" - Khan, Metro 2033
""Ask yourself whether you are happy", observed the philosopher John Stuart Mill, "and you cease to be so." At best, it would appear, happiness can only be glimpsed out of the corner of an eye, not stared at directly." - Oliver Burkeman
"The grass is always greener, where the dogs are shitting" -Chris Cornell
"Most men lead lives of quiet desperation and go to the grave with the song still in them." - Henry David Thoreau
"Putting time, energy, and effort into counterattacking your critics, giving rebuttals to bad reviews, or arguing with people who don"t like you or your business are all a big waste of time." - Loren Weisman
"Invest not in me, but yourself. Things may work out a bit better for you." -- Bill Lewis
"The secret of getting ahead is getting started." -Mark Twain
"I walked a mile with Sorrow And ne'er a word said she; But, oh, the things I learned from her When Sorrow walked with me." - Robert Browning Hamilton
"One day I just woke up and realized that I can"t touch yesterday. So why the heck was I letting it touch me?" Steve Maraboli
"Asking yourself a question, that"s how resistance begins. And then ask that very question to someone else."- Remco Campert
"It's chaos. Be kind." Michelle E. McNamara
"And as for your damn parrot fanciers, if they don"t care about anything much beyond things that go squawk in cages then one day there"ll be someone in charge of this place who"ll make them choke on their own budgies. You want that to happen?" Terry Pratchett, The Truth
"The real you is not a puppet which life pushes around; the real, deep down you is the whole universe." (-Alan Watts)
"Life is like a box of chocolate, sucks for you if you don't like chocolate." -anonymous
"Life is one of the darkest jokes deviced by the universe, but I happen to love darkjokes." -Somebodybro
"For the most part, the job is dealing with good people having a very bad day" Chicagopolice Officer Mario Valenti
"Whosoever is delighted in solitude, is either a wild beast or a god." - Aristotle
"Those who know, do. Those that understand, teach." - Aristotle
"The educated differ from the uneducated as much as the living differ from the dead." - Aristotle
"A question in your nerves is lit. Yet you know there is no answer fit to satisfy, ensure you not to quit. To keep it in your mind and not forget that it is not he or she or them or it that you belong to." - Bob Dylan
"When you get hard work you get success, and we put a lot of years into it." - Selena Quintanilla
"Perhaps they are not stars, but rather openings in Heaven where the love of our lost ones pours through and shines down upon us to let us know they are happy." - Eskimo Proverb
"The sun shines and warms and lights us and we have no curiosity to know why this is so; but we ask the reason of all evil, of pain, and hunger, and mosquitoes and silly people." -- Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Never give up. Today is bad, tomorrow will be worse, but the day after will be sunshine." - Jack Ma
"You"ll never find a rainbow if you"re looking down."  Charlie Chaplin
"What you have said in the dark will be heard in the daylight, and what you have whispered in the ear in the inner rooms will be proclaimed from the roofs." -Luke 12:3
"Do you hate people?" "I don't hate them...I just feel better when they're not around."- Charles Bukowski
"Life could be wonderful if people would leave you alone."  Charlie Chaplin
"The love of knowledge is a kind of madness." - C.S. Lewis
"You"ll find that life is still worthwhile, if you just smile."  Charlie Chaplin
"A day without laughter is a day wasted."  Charlie Chaplin
"Reading Is To The Mind, As Exercise Is To The Body." Brian Tracy
"Winning takes precedence over all. There"s no gray area. No almosts." -Kobe Bryant (NBA player)
"Every person, place and thing on this planet is interconnected with love"
"Seek to understand first and be understood second." - Someone on Reddit
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." - William Shakespeare
"Live each day as if your life had just begun."  Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe
"The real opportunity for success lies within the person and not in the job."  Zig Ziglar
"The bad news is you"re falling through the air, nothing to hang on to, no parachute. The good news is there"s no ground." - Chgyam Trungpa
"Most people would rather be certain they're miserable, than risk being happy." - Robert Anthony
"All that we are is the result of what we have thought. The mind is everything. What we think we become." - Buddha
"It is not the strongest of the species that survive, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." - Charles Darwin
"If you are lucky enough to find a way of life you love, you have to find the courage to live it." - John Irving
"Patriots always talk of dying for their country, and never of killing for their country." - Bertrand Russell
"Follow effective action with quiet reflection. From the quiet reflection will come even more effective action." - Peter Drucker
"All of us do not have equal talent, but all of us should have an equal opportunity to develop our talents." - John F. Kennedy
"Whoever becomes imbued with a noble idea kindles a flame from which other torches are lit, and influences those with whom he comes in contact, be they few or many. How far that influence, thus perpetuated, may extend, it is not given to him here to see." - Henry George
"There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves." -Will Rogers
"Your volume speaks volumes. Be aware of your dynamics, your tones as well as the loudness and softness of your voice on the phone and in person." - Loren Weisman
"We accept the love we think we deserve." Stephen Chbosky
"To ensure good health: eat lightly, breathe deeply, live moderately, cultivate cheerfulness, and maintain an interest in life." -William Londen
"All, everything that I understand, I only understand because I love."  Leo Tolstoy
"It's supposed to be hard. If it were easy, everyone would do it."Jimmy Dugan, A League of Their Own
"I can be changed by what happens to me but I refuse to be reduced by it." Maya Angelou
"A man who flies from his fear may find that he has only taken a shortcut to meet it." Sador, Children of Hrin
"He who has overcome his fears will truly be free." - Aristotle
"Opportunity is missed by most people because it is dressed in overalls and looks like work." -- Thomas A. Edison
"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome." - Isaac Asimov
"The grass is not, in fact, always greener on the other side of the fence. Fences have nothing to do with it. The grass is greenest where it is watered. When crossing over fences, carry water with you and tend the grass wherever you may be." - Robert Fulghum
"The only source of knowledge is experience." - Albert Einstein
"The traveler was active; he went strenuously in search of people, of adventure, of experience. The tourist is passive; he expects interesting things to happen to him. He goes 'sightseeing'." - Daniel J Boorstin
"He who has a why to live can bear almost any how" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"the only difference between the novice and the master is the master has failed more times then the novice has tried" - korosensei
"If a free society cannot help the many who are poor, it cannot save the few who are rich." John F. Kennedy
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." Marilyn Monroe
"This country has gotten where it is in spite of politics, not by the aid of it. That we have carried as much political bunk as we have and still survived shows we are a super nation." Will Rogers
"They say life is a game, so I made a game plan"  Assassin
"If we did all the things we are capable of doing, we would literally astound ourselves." - Thomas Edison
"Joy is what happens to us when we allow ourselves to recognise how good things really are." -Marianne Williamson
"If you think you are too small to be effective, you have never been in the dark with a mosquito." - Betty Reese
'The victories are deeds" - The righteous Tom
"Sometimes the best thoughts are those kept to yourself. That way they can't be used against you in politics or at work, in print or social media, or in a court of law." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"The most useful piece of learning for the uses of life is to unlearn what is untrue."  Antisthenes
"If you are ready to face the fears, take the steps, do the work, be more than you thought you ever could, &amp; attack the dream, what is keeping you? Lose all the excuses &amp; replace them with all the reasons for success. Commit to the dream or quit. There really is no middle ground." - Loren Weisman
"If one in the bubble, two in the rear, one will fly forward. The other draws near." -Albert Einstein
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." Dr. Seuss
"If you live through defeat, you're not defeated. If you are beaten but acquire wisdom, you have won. Lose yourself to improve yourself. Only when we shed all self-definition do we find who we really are." RZA
"For you, I was a chapter. For me, you were the book." - Tom McNeal
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant." - Robert Louis Stevenson
"I'm not superstitious, but I am a little stitious" - Michael Gary Scott
"Try to realize it's all within yourself no one else can make you change, and to see you're only very small and life flows on within you and without you" - George Harrison
"If you don't know where you're going, any road will take you there" - George Harrison
"Everybody wants happiness, nobody wants pain. But you can"t have a rainbow without a little rain." - Dolly Parton
"Have nothing in your house that you do not know to be useful, or believe to be beautiful" -- William Morris
"Don"t confuse my personality with my attitude. My personality is who I am. My attitude depends on who you  Frank Ocean
"To Confront a Person With His Own Shadow is to Show Him His Own Light." - Carl G.Jung
"Don"t worry about those who talk behind your back. They are behind you for a reason."
"The better the life, the shorter it'll seem." -Me
"In 1977 I had 7 bucks in my pocket and knew two things: I"m broke as hell and one day I won"t be" - Dwayne Johnson
"I was addicted to the words she spoke. Her tongue was my drug and she was me dealer."
"Don't weep for the stupid, you'll be crying all day" - Alexander Anderson
"Works of art make rules but rules do not make works of art." - Claude Debussy (Companion to Contemporary Musical Thought)
"Every sound perceived by the acute ear in the rhythm of the world about us can be represented musically. Some people wish above all to conform to the rules, I wish only to render what I can hear." - Claude Debussy (Debussy on Music, 1910)
"If you can look into the seeds of time, And say which grain will grow and which will not, Speak then to me, who neither beg nor fear Your favours nor your hate." - Shakespeare (Macbeth act 1, sc. 3)
"It is not the strongest of the species that survive, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." - Charles Darwin
"If you don"t know history, then you don"t know anything. You are a leaf that doesn"t know that it is part of a tree." -- Michael Critchton
"I can accept failure, everyone fails at something. But I can't accept not trying." - Michael Jordan
"Do something instead of killing time, because time is killing you." -- Pablo Coelho
"Never mistake motion for action." - Ernest Hemingway
"You cannot change your destination overnight, but you can change your direction overnight." - Jim Rohn
"Those who educate children well are more to be honored than they who produce them; for these only gave them life, those the art of living well." - Aristotle
"There is no better way to find out the true heart, honor, and professionalism of a person, than seeing how they handle themselves and others when facing a crisis, disaster or intense level of pressure." - Loren Weisman
"Raise your words, not your voice. It is rain that grows flowers, not thunder."
"Life without memory is no life at all, just as an intelligence without the possibility of expression is not really an intelligence."  Buuel
"Superlative it was not. But perfect, yes." The Elephant Vanishes, Haruki Murakami
"There may be more beautiful Times, but this one is ours."  Jean Paul Sartre
"I started writing because I had to. Because my world was on fire and nobody was saying anything. Now my world is still on fire, but people keep applauding my ability to describe the flames."  Ijeoma Oluo
"Evil men do as they please. Men who would be good...they must do as they are allowed." - Ripper Street
"Direct action is not always the best way. It is a far greater victory to make another see through your eyes than to close theirs forever."
"The tragedy of life is not so much what men suffer, but rather what they miss." - Thomas Carlyle
"Would I rather be feared or loved? Easy. Both. I want people to be afraid of how much they love me."  Michael Scott, The Office
"Educating the mind without educating the heart is no education at all." - Aristotle
"This world needs trust. If you've set yourself against that you are my enemy." - Polly Graff
"Judge not before you judge yourself. Judge not if you"re not ready for judgment." _BoB Marley
"Money can't buy you life" _BoB Marley
"My music fights against the system that teaches to live and die." _Bob marley
"one love, one heart" _ Bob Marley
"Slut, you think I won't choke no whore / 'Til the vocal cords don't work in her throat no more?" -Eminem
"Maybe all one can do is hope to end up with the right regrets"  Arthur Miller
[Fictional] Have you ever seen the aftermath of a suicide bombing?
"Fill your house with stacks of books, in all the crannies and all the nooks." Dr. Seuss
"Everybody wants to save the Earth; nobody wants to help Mom do the dishes." - P.J. O'Rourke, All the Trouble in the World
"This is not the place for you" Control Freak Reddit Mods
"Here is a list of fearful things: The jaws of sharks, a vulture's wings, The rabid bite of the dog's of war, The voice of one who went before. But most of all the mirror's gaze, which counts us out our numbered days." - Clive Barker
"Patience is bitter, but its fruit is sweet." - Aristotle
"A friend to all is a friend to none." - Aristotle
"While working with different people in different cities with very different viewpoints, I noticed one very similar theme: The people who blamed everything and everybody else for their lack of success tended to continue to have a lack of success." - Loren Weisman
"When I became a man I put away childish things, including the fear of childishness and the desire to be very grown up." - C.S. Lewis
"Writing gives you the illusion of control, and then you realize it's just an illusion, that people are going to bring their own stuff into it." David Sedaris, Interview in Louisville Courrier-Journal, June 5, 2005.
"Let us be grateful to the people who make us happy; they are the charming gardeners who make our souls blossom."  Marcel Proust
"The trouble with the world is that the stupid are cocksure and the intelligent are full of doubt."  Bertrand Russell
"Yes: I am a dreamer. For a dreamer is one who can only find his way by moonlight, and his punishment is that he sees the dawn before the rest of the world."  Oscar Wilde
"Readers used to ask me at autographing events if it wasn't hard making the transition from practicing law to writing fantasy. I told them there was hardly any difference at all." - Terry Brooks
"It is those who pick you up when they have no strength left for themselves, they are the real unsung heroes."  Unknown
"Throughout history, it has been the inaction of those who could have acted, the indifference of those who should have known better, the silence of the voice of justice when it mattered most: THIS has made it possible for evil to triumph." - Wasalu Jaco
"Man can live about forty days without food, about three days without water, about eight minutes without air...but only for one second without hope." (-Hal Lindsay)
"If you want to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first create the universe." Carl Sagan
"The limits of my language mean the limits of my world." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Doubt is not a pleasant condition, but certainty is an absurd one." -- Voltaire
"Experts are great for telling you what you shouldn't do. For that they are useful. But for what you should do--they don't have a clue." - Manoj Bhargava
"If you are saying the same thing as everyone else, then why would and why should anyone think you are different from everyone else?" - Loren Weisman
"Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see." Mark Twain
"The Only Way To do Great Work is to Love What You Do" - Steve Jobs
"When you separate yourself by belief, by nationality, by tradition, it breeds violence. So a man who is seeking to understand violence does not belong to any country, to any religion, to any political party or partial system; he is concerned with the total understanding of mankind."
"When ladies like you they"re like medicine, when they hate you they"re like poison" -Uber driver
"New York will be a great place  if they ever finish it"  O. Henry
"On stage, I make love to 50,000 people, and then I go home alone." -Janis Joplin
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"Fool me once, strike one. But fool me twice? Strike three." - Michael Scott
"My wife and I were happy for 20 years. Then we met." - Rodney Dangerfield
"It's true, a ship is safest in harbor; but that's not what ships are for."
"Your heart is the size of an ocean. Go find yourself in its hidden depths." -Rumi
"Dude, where is my car?"
"Sorrow prepares you for joy.
"I'm not as smart as I used to be, because I used to be the smartest man in the world" -Me
"Stop acting so small. You are the universe in ecstatic motion." -Rumi
"Adopt this mindset: I will get a little better every day. The cumulative effect of that will transform your entire life." - Bill Phillips(The Better Man Project)
"To get so consumed with chasing a goal that doesn"t necessarily have to define you is a fool"s errand and I wanted to have a healthy perspective on it. Not only a healthy perspective on the fame itself, but the pursuit of wealth and the pursuit of surface values." --- Josh Hartnett
"Being lost is a part of the Path" - Hylda Gothemberg
"You have enemies? Good. That means you've stood up for something, sometime in your life." Winston Churchill
"Chords that vibrate the sweetest pleasure, Thrill the deepest notes of woe." - Robert Burns
"To dare is to lose one's footing momentarily. Not to dare is to lose oneself" -Sren Kierkegaard
"Fuck the free world".(slim shady)
"The more you engage and connect, the more engagements and connections you will have." - Loren Weisman
"The most interesting emerging religion is Dataism, which venerates neither gods nor man  it worships data." -Yuval Noah Harari (Homo Deus: A Brief History of Tomorrow)
"If you want peace, you don't talk to your friends. You talk to your enemies."  Desmond Tutu
"True forgiveness is when you can say, Thank you for that experience.'" - Oprah Winfrey
"No such way to live avoiding noise in life." - Unknown
"I no longer desire anything the Universe does not desire for me."  Unknown
"To be a great man, you can't be a good one." - Unknown
"Happiness is the meaning and the purpose of life, the whole aim and end of human existence." - Aristotle
"Ever Tried. Ever failed. No matter. Try again. Fail again. Fail better." -Samuel Beckett
"What I am certain is that I don"t want to find myself some day in a new century, an old bitter woman looking back, wishing that right now I"d had more nerve." -Charles Frazier (Cold Mountain)
"You're only as good as the people you hire." Ray Kroc
"Whether you believe in an all mighty spiritual being or not... it"s always healthy to have faith in something when life"s got you down."
"I learned a long time ago that reality was much weirder than anyone's imagination." Hunter S. Thompson
"If you can't say something good about someone, sit right here by me." -Alice Roosevelt (Saturday Evening Post, 4 Dec 1965)
"We may not be saints, but we're loyal and we pay our debts." -Dean Winchester, Supernatural
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Every nation or group of nations has its own tale to tell. Knowledge of the trials and struggles is necessary to all who would comprehend the problems, perils, challenges, and opportunities which confront us today." - Winston Churchill
"A vacation is like love - anticipated with pleasure, experienced with discomfort, and remembered with nostalgia" - Evan Esar
"The Jew is immunized against all dangers:
"Start where you are, use what you have, do what you can." Arthur Ashe
"It is a bad plan that admits of no modification." - Publilius Syrus
"If you know the way broadly you will see it in everything." - Miyamoto Musashi
"A great deal of success in life depends on the relationship you have with yourself, your partner and your money." - Kim Ha Campbell
"all cool things happen by accident" - Yolandi Visser (DIE ANTWOORD)
"Age is an issue of mind over matter if you don't mind it doesn't matter." Mark Twain #quotes
"People must learn that hatred and prejudice create only destruction" --Elly B. Gross (Holocaust Survivor)
"Overconfidence is not always a luxury one can afford." - Dr. Gregory P. Tapis, CPA
"Beauty always has rules. It"s a game. I resent the beauty game when I see it controlled by people who grab fortunes from it and don"t care who they hurt. I hate it when I see it making people so self-dissatisfied that they starve and deform and poison themselves." -Ursula Le Guin
"Imagination was given to man to compensate him for what he is not; a sense of humor for what he is." - Francis Bacon
"To be upset over what you don't have is to waste what you do have" -- Unknown
"Enjoy every sandwich." - Warren Zevon.
"Only Getting the A and Z without the B through Y, leaves you SOL." - Loren Weisman
"No matter how many tears you got to cry, just let yourself shine like the stars in the sky; the dreams you chase may seem hard to achieve,but one day you will if you have believe"._ Gabriel La'bard
"It"s far better to buy a wonderful company at a fair price, than a fair company at a wonderful price." - Warren Buffet
"Anybody can become angry  that is easy, but to be angry with the right person and to the right degree and at the right time and for the right purpose, and in the right way  that is not within everybody's power and is not easy." - Aristotle
"Bitches be snakes, get well soon" Fortay cant remember the name of song
"Poor people have a big tv. Rich people have a big library".
"It doesn't matter if you are right or not, if you are being an asshole nobody gives a shit anyway."
"Wishing to be friends is quick work, but friendship is a slow ripening fruit." - Aristotle
"Happiness depends upon ourselves." - Aristotle
"Some people want to see you fail. Disappoint them." -Muaaz Shakeel
"It"s been said that most people, when they get old and are at the end of life"s journey, tend to regret the things they didn"t do rather than the things they did."
"I don"t want to spoil your fun, you"re having a good time. I just wanna saying it"s idiotic what you"re doing."- Larry David
"I'm a scholar. I try to understand, and I despise cheap, quick, ready-made answers." -Andreas Eschbach
"There are essentially only two drugs that Western civilization tolerates: Caffeine from Monday to Friday to energize you enough to make you a productive member of society, and alcohol from Friday to Monday to keep you too stupid to figure out the prison that you are living in." -Bill Hicks
"I began to understand that suffering and disappointments and melancholy are there not to vex us or cheapen us or deprive us of our dignity but to mature and transfigure us." - Herman Hesse
"None are more hopelessly enslaved than those who falsely believe they are free; It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." -Jiddu Krishnamurti
"The more you weigh, the harder you are to kidnap. Stay safe.Eat cake" - Bakery
"Young architects can change the world by not building buildings" -Virgil Abloh
"Never lose an opportunity of seeing anything beautiful, for beauty is God's handwriting." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"People who boast about their IQ are Losers"_Stephen Hawking.
"If you truly love someone, you fight for him/her even if there"s no chance of winning."
"Ask a kid to draw a car, he will draw it red" Enzo Ferrari
"We must be willing to let go of the life we"ve planned, so as to have the life that is waiting for us." - Joseph Campbell
"Either be a good parent to your career or just give your dream up for adoption." - Loren Weisman
"Pain is inevitable. Suffering is optional." - M. Kathleen Casey
"Life always waits for some crisis to occur before revealing itself at its most brilliant." - Paulo Coelho
"The power of intelligence..." -Albert Einstein
"If you can't handle me at my worst, just remember that I handle me at my worst and that makes me stronger than you."
"No great mind has ever existed without a touch of madness." - Aristotle
"I'd rather be dead than average." - Mike Bell
"It's gonna take the man in me to conquer this insanity" Tupac
"The happiness of this life depends less on what befalls you than the way in which you take it." - Elbert Hubbard
"If you let your learning lead to knowledge, you become a fool. If you let your learning lead to action, you become wealthy."Jim Rohn
"Never let the sadness of your past and the fear of your future ruin the happiness of your present!" Author Unknown
"People who boast about their IQ are losers." - Stephen Hawking
"Never be afraid to raise your voice for honesty and truth..." William Faulkner
"The people on the Internet who complain about the show were going to hate it no matter what I did, so I don't really care about their opinions" - Seiji Mizushima
"Educating the mind without educating the heart is no education at all." - Aristotle
"Hope is a waking dream." - Aristotle
"One of my professors said something in class the day I finally told him I needed help. He said that you could look at things as though you"re struggling, or striving. I"ve tried to remember that when I feel like I am stuck in mental quicksand. I"m striving"  Annabel Rodman
"Many of life"s failures are people who did not realize how close they were to success when they gave up." -Thomas A. Edison
"Life becomes easier when you learn to accept the apology you never got."
"If you are going through hell, keep going." Sir Winston Churchill
"Interpretation is the revenge of the intellect upon art."
"Chasing angels or fleeing demons, go to the mountains." "Getting to the top is optional. Getting down is mandatory." "Climb if you will, but remember that courage and strength are nought without prudence, and that a momentary negligence may destroy the happiness of a lifetime."
"Work is the curse of the drinking classes." -Oscar Wilde
"What is a friend? A single soul dwelling in two bodies." - Aristotle
"I don't believe in love, it's losing its power. Honeymoon suites turn to hotel rooms by the hour." - Unknown
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." - Aristotle
"Experiencing frustration and overcoming it through skill and practice are more rewarding than a well-crafted ending." -Shigeru Miyamoto, creator of Super Mario Bros.
"Honesty is a very expensive gift. Do not expect it from cheap people."  Unknown
"Every society gets the kind of criminal it deserves." - J F Kennedy
"The more you know, the more you know you don't know." - Aristotle
"Gold is the most precious of all commodities; gold constitutes treasure, and he who possesses it has all he needs in the world, as also the means of rescuing souls from purgatory, and restoring them to the enjoyment of paradise." -Christopher Columbus
"Everyone is a moon, and has a dark side which he never shows to anybody." - Mark Twain
"Experience is a hard teacher because she gives the test first, lesson afterwards."
"...and even then, what happens, if after all the sacrifices and investments you've made, you don't succeed? How will you react? That was pretty deep, but it's a reality." - Houngoungagne
"We're all eating a giant shit sandwich out here, nobody cares. I don't care" - Bill Burr
"By three methods we may learn wisdom: First, by reflection, which is noblest; Second, by imitation, which is easiest; and third by experience, which is the bitterest." - Confucius
"If you're drinking to forget, please pay in advance"
"It's gonna take the man in me to conquer this insanity" Tupac
"For the doctrine of Black supremacy is as dangerous as white supremacy. God is not interested merely in the freedom of black men and brown men and yellow men but God is interested in the freedom of the whole human race, the creation of a society where all men will live together as brothers"
"I demolish my bridges behind me...then there is no choice but to move forward" - Fridtjof Nansen, Norwegian explorer &amp; Nobel Peace Prize laureate
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read. It was books that taught me that the things that tormented me most were the very things that connected me with all the people who were alive, who had ever been alive." - James Baldwin
"Worrying is praying for what you don't want." J.R.R. Tolkien
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts."
"There has never been a statue erected to honor a critic." Zig Ziglar
"Sharing the same exact content, message or advertisements over and over again only showcases your limited content and a serious lack of depth in your message." - Loren Weisman
"Knowing yourself is the beginning of all wisdom." - Aristotle
1N73LL1G3NC3 15 7H3 4B1LL17Y 70 4D4P7 70 CH4NG3 - Stephen Hawking
"Time flies like an arrow; fruit flies like a banana." - Anthony G. Oettinger
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." - Albert Einstein
"Where you used to be, there is a hole in the world, which I find myself constantly walking around in the daytime, and falling in at night." -St. Vincent Millay
"Alright lady, Fine! Fine! You are not a whore. But, you are wearing a whore's uniform." -Dave Chapelle
"Every other sin hath some pleasure annexed to it, or will admit of an excuse; envy alone wants both. Other sins last but for awhile; the gut may be satisfied, anger remits, hatred hath an end, envy never ceaseth." --Robert Burton
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." -- Confucius
"Don't waste your time chasing approval from others" -Muaaz Shakeel
"I disapprove of what you say, but I will defend to the death your right to say it." - Voltaire
"Imagine God using you as the answer to someone's prayer."  Saniya Khan
"Everyone says that love hurts, but that is not true..." - vide infra
"A person who hates everyone once loved someone too much."
"Find what brings you joy and go there." - Jan Phillips
"Just as we tend to assume that the world is as we see it, we naively suppose that people are as we imagine them to be" - Carl Jung
"I may not be there yet, but I'm closer than I was yesterday." Author Unknown
"Issues or fears of confrontation tend to showcase unhealthy &amp; unprofessional communication. If you are trusting someone to tell you all the good, bad &amp; ugly, but they only give you the good out of their fears and confrontational issues the bad &amp; the ugly can grow worse quickly."  Loren Weisman
"If an injury has to be done to a man it should be so severe that his vengeance need not be feared." - Niccol Machiavelli
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"How many legs does a dog have if you call the tail a leg? Four. Calling a tail a leg doesn't make it a leg." - Abraham Lincoln
"Kids acting up and won't do chores or homework? Don't take away their electronics, just hide the charger and watch the fear in their eyes as the battery drains toward 0 percent." -- Bill Lewis
"The greatest discovery of all time is that a person can change his future by merely changing his attitude." Oprah Winfrey
"Success is to be measured not so much by the position that one has reached in life as by the obstacles which he has overcome."- Booker T. Washington
"You can sway a thousand men by appealing to their prejudices quicker than you can convince one man by logic." - Robert A. Heinlein
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"You're a fucking moron." - Secretary of State Rex Tillerson
"The United States has great strength and patience, but if it is forced to defend itself or its allies, we will have no choice but to totally destroy North Korea." - A Fucking Moron
"Laugh, and the world laughs with you; weep, and you weep alone." - Ella Wheeler Wilcox
"The sky calls to us. If we do not destroy ourselves, we will one day venture to the stars." -- Carl Sagan
"The Best Revenge Is To Live On And Prove YOURSELF." - Unknown
"Miracles happen everyday, change your perception of what a miracle is and you'll see them all around you." - Jon Bon Jovi
"I always thought of the music industry as the drunk girl at a party who forgot who she came with." -Rocco Deluca
"When the speech condemns a free press, you are hearing the words of a tyrant." -- Thomas Jefferson
" Learning, empowering, studying, practicing, and not repeating the same mistakes will help you move forward, move up, and move on to where you want to be." - Loren Weisman
"Those who say it can not be done, should not interrupt those doing it." - Chinese Proverb
"We are kept from our goal not by obstacles but by a clear path to a lesser goal." - Robert Brault
"Anything invented after you're thirty-five is against the natural order of things." Douglas Adams
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"The future is uncertain but the end is always near." -- Jim Morrison
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Walking on water and producing software to specifications are easy, as long as both are frozen" -- Unknown
"People change so that you can learn to let go, things go wrong so that you appreciate them when they're right, you believe lies so you eventually learn to trust no one but yourself, and sometimes good things fall apart so better things can fall together." - Marilyn Monroe
"Why did this disease choose me? I cannot carry it, if it's just for the word: Fate." - Kito Aya, One Liter of Tears: A Young Girls Fight for Life (Aya's Diary)
"The worst crime committed by OJ Simpson was making the Kardashians famous." -- Bill Lewis
"He loved asses so much...he became one"
"Better to ask twice than lose your way once." - Danish Proverb
"The more I want to get something done, the less I call it work." Richard Bach, writer
"Anyone who thinks sitting in church can make you a Christian must also think that sitting in a garage can make you a car." - Garrison Keillor
"Maybe this is the calm before the storm" -- Donald Trump in a meeting this week with senior military staff
"If we did all the things we are capable of, we would literally astound ourselves." Author Unknown
"For every minute you are angry you lose sixty seconds of happiness." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"An item in possession seldom retains the same charm that it had in pursuit." - Pliny the Younger
"Beware the barrenness of a busy life." - Socrates
"Marketing and promoting doesn"t come down to the likes, the pins, the plus ones, the followers, the fans, the friends, the views, or the plays online. Marketing and promoting comes down to the conversions." - Loren Weisman
"I have love in me the likes of which you can scarcely imagine and rage the likes of which you would not believe. If I cannot satisfy the one, I will indulge the other." - Mary Shelley, Frankenstein
"Suppose we've chosen the wrong god. Every time we go to church we're just making him madder and madder." - Homer J. Simpson
"You are a lot better than you probably think you are." William Walter
"Sometimes you need to remind yourself that you were the one who carried you through the heartache. Having the strength to take care of yourself when everyone around you is trying to bleed you dry, that is the strongest thing in the universe."
"If we could read the secret history of our enemies, we should find in each man's life sorrow and suffering enough to disarm all hostility." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Doing nothing is saying everything." - Evergreen_Night
"Keep only those things that speak to your heart." - Marie Kond
"The Best Way To Predict Your Future, Is To Create It." - Abraham Lincoln
"If you aren't making a difference in other people's lives, you shouldn't be in business" - Richard Branson
"Aging is an extraordinary process where you become the person you always should have been." David Bowie
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken" - Oscar Wilde
"Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I have many problems in my life but my lips don't know that ,they always smiles" - Charlie Chaplin
"I really don't want to say things such as 'I want to go back as how things were before.' I recognize how I am right now, and I will continue to live on." - Kito Aya
"People shouldn't dwell on the past. It's enough to try your best in all that you're doing now." -Kito Aya.
"The women with the highest walls have the deepest love." r.h. Sin
"The woman with the highest walls have the deepest love" - r.h. Sin
"Comparison is the thief of joy." Theodore Roosevelt
"The art of life is the art of avoiding pain, and he [she] is the best pilot, who steers clearest of the rocks and shoals with which it is beset" (Thomas Jefferson)
"You can't change the world with words unless those words are written in blood" - Anonymous
"If your life changes, you can change the world, too."- Yoko Ono
"Hope is the only thing stronger than fear" - Unknown
"Just when I think I have learned the way to live, life changes." -Hugh Prather
"If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people to collect wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long for the endless immensity of the sea." Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Learn the rules and learn the game, before you start breaking the rules and start trying to change the game. Your education, experience, and understanding of what was and what is, will give you the best foundation and chance to change what will be." - Loren Weisman
"For every dark night, there"s a brighter day" -Tupac
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire." Charles Bukowski
"Losing is a learning experience. It teaches you humility. It teaches you to work harder. It's also a powerful motivator." Yogi Berra
"I may be President of the United States, but my private life is nobody's damned business." - Chester A. Arthur, 21st U.S. President
"If you are depressed you are living in the past. If you are anxious you are living in the future. If you are at peace you are living in the present."  Lao Tzu
"Lots of people want to ride with you in the limo, but what you want is someone who will take the bus with you when the limo breaks down."  Oprah Winfrey
"Do not grow old, no matter how long you live. Never cease to stand like curious children before the Great Mystery in which we were born." -Albert Einstein
"The most important thing in life is to learn how to give out love, and to let it come in."  Morrie Schwartz
"More often than not, opportunity is disguised as hard work. Recognize it or not, success and good fortune await those who partake." -- Bill Lewis
"Self-conquest is the greatest of victories. Mighty is he who conquers himself." - Bruce Lee
"Put your heart, mind, and soul into even your smallest acts. This is the secret of success." - Swami Sivananda
"Happiness is not something you postpone for the future; it is something you design for the present." -Jim Rohn
"Yesterday is gone. Tomorrow has not yet come. We have only today. Let us begin." - Mother Teresa
"Death ends a life, not a relationship." - Mitch Albom, Tuesdays with Morrie
"To the well-organized mind, death is but the next great adventure." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
"The first step toward success is taken when you refuse to a captive of the environment in which you first find yourself."  Mark Caine
"As a Christian, I have no duty to allow myself to be cheated, but I have the duty to be a fighter for truth and justice." -- Adolph Hitler, 1922
"You know you've got it bad, when you miss something you never had." -- Unknown
"Nothing takes the taste out of peanut butter quite like unrequited love" -- Charles Schultz
"Sometimes, the worst jobs lead to the right path." - Me
"If the Angel comes, it will be because you have convinced her, not by tears, but by your humble resolve to always be a beginner." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"For let Philosopher and Doctor preach Of what they will and what they will not,each Is but one link in an eternal chain That none can slip nor break nor over-reach." "Crimson nor yellow roses nor The savour of the mounting sea Are worth the perfume I adore That clings to thee."
"You can't talk peace and have a gun" - Francis Magalona
"The world I belong in has no fear. But I live in a fearful world. Faces lie. Each face I encounter... is suffering."-my own creation
"All of these...moments...will be lost, in time, like tears in rain." -Bladerunner
"One person can change the whole world for the better, as long as they don't give a damn who gets the credit" - Unknown
"October Country... that country where it is always turning late in the year. That country where the hills are fog and the rivers are mist; where noons go quickly, dusks and twilights linger, and midnights stay..."
"If I had a gun with two bullets and I was in a room with Hitler, Bin Laden, and Toby, I would shoot Toby twice." - Michael Scott
"There is never enough time to do everything, but there is always enough time to do the most important thing." - Brian Tracy
"The purpose of a writer is to keep civilization from destroying itself" - Albert Camus
"Life is full of obstacles... play it smart and you"ll be at peace... play stupid, I wish you luck my good friend."
"If your beliefs are not useful to you, or they are not bringing you peace and abundance, update them!" - Kim Ha Campbell
"If you doodoo on yourself" - Tyler the Creator
"On the last day of love, my heart cracked inside my body" The Sun and her flowers
"The world breaks everyone and afterward, many are strong at the broken places. But those that will not break, it kills." (-Ernest Hemingway)
"To know even one life has breathed easier because you have lived is to have succeeded." -Bessie A. Stanley
"The minute something works, it ceases to be interesting. As soon as you have spelled something out, you should set it aside." Rosemarie Trockel
"If you don"t know your tendencies and can"t analyze when you are most effective, then how can you get the most done in the least amount of time with the best results?" - Loren Weisman
"Everybody who tells you how to act has whiskey on their breath." John Updike
"Don't die with your music still inside you." (-Dr. Wayne Dyer)
"Defending a position by citing free speech is the ultimate concession. You're saying that the most compelling thing you can say for your position is that it's not literally illegal to express." - Randall Monroe
"Education is not the amount of information that we put into your brain and runs riot there, undigested, all your life. If you have assimilated five ideas and made them your life and character, you have more education than any man who has got by heart a whole library." - Vivekananda
"Focus on delivering value to customers money will follow"
[Request] Help finding an apparent quote from Alice's Adventures in Wonderland: "Sometimes up is down. Sometimes down is up."
"Smile. It may not make it all okay, but it could make someone else's day"  -Unknown
"Feminism is Important." - Some Broad
''The master has failed more times than the beginner has even tried'' -Stephen McCranie
"Die if you must, but never kill." - Cndido Mariano da Silva Rondon
.... listen to the American public and to the law enforcement community and support a ban on the further manufacture of (automatic) weapons. - Gerald R. Ford, Jimmy Carter, Ronald Reagan 1994
"I have lived a life of miracles, and I shall live forever, the flesh looks wasted but the spirit is alive and well." - Elmer
"There"s nothing magnificent about telling the truth, it"s just living the truth that makes your life honest." - Mindfulfil
"Keep the momentum while you are moving to guarantee additional motion and momentum." - Loren Weisman
"The people who were trying to make this world worse are not taking the day off. Why should I?" -Bob Marley
"You can't keep the birds from flying overhead, but you can keep them from building nests in your hair." -- Martin Luther, in reference to anxious and counter-productive thoughts.
"Actions speak louder than words but not nearly as often." -Mark Twain
"The price of success is hard work, dedication to the job at hand, and the determination that whether we win or lose, we have applied the best of ourselves to the task at hand." Vince Lombardi
"It"s the friends you can call up at 4 a.m. that matter."  Marlene Dietrich Related
"Some fail because after they choose the direction for their careers, they spend too much time second-guessing their decision." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Try to be a rainbow in someone's cloud." - Maya Angelou
"Fate is the name that we give the infinite and unceasing operation of thousands of intertwined causes." -Jorge Luis Borges
"If you want to awaken all of humanity, awaken all of yourself." - Lao Tzu
"Aspire to Inspire before you Expire!"  Eugene Bell Jr.
" And for one desperate moment then he crept back in her memories. God, it's so painful when something that is so close is still so far out of reach." - Tom Petty
"Hope. Rebellions are built on hope."
"Your time is limited, so don"t waste it living someone else"s life. Have the courage to follow your heart." - Steve Jobs
"Courage is like a muscle, wear it down, exercise it, strain it to hell and it might just come back stronger than ever." -Myself.
"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil, is for good men to do nothing." -Edmund Burke
"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing"
"Without music, life would be a mistake." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The best way to predict the future is to invent it." - Alan Kay
"Your imagination is your preview of life"s coming attractions." - Albert Einstein
"What we fear doing most is usually what we most need to do." -Tim Ferriss
"The best dreams happen when you"re awake." -Cherie Gilderbloom
"the same state of mind is expressed throughout the world with remarkable uniformity; and this fact is, in itself, interesting as evidence of the close similarity in ... mental disposition of all the races of mankind." Charles Darwin, 1872
"the same state of mind is expressed throughout the world with remarkable uniformity; and this fact is, in itself, interesting as evidence of the close similarity in ... mental disposition of all the races of mankind." Charles Darwin, 1972
"I dispute your statement that it took us long for that statement, because it is us who determine the timing and agenda of our statements, nobody else. So I don"t know what is late [or] is early to you." - EU Commision spokesman Margaritis Schinas
"We live in a world in which politics has replaced philosophy." - Martin L. Gross
"For centuries, lovers of death have tried to make us lose the flavor for living. They never succeeded."  Charlie Hebdo cartoonist, in the wake of the 11/13/15 Paris terror attacks
"Reality is just a crutch for people who can't handle drugs." - Robin Williams
"I love nature partly because she is not man, but a retreat from him."  Henry David Thoreau
"The energy of the crowd is insane. Twenty thousand people. It's the biggest jolt of adrenaline. It's very hard to explain. You know the old story about the woman lifting the car off her kid? It's in that realm. You can actually hurt yourself and not know it."- Tom Petty
"We need the iron qualities that go with true manhood. We need the positive virtues of resolution, of courage, of indomitable will, of power to do without shrinking the rough work that must always be done." -Theodore Roosevelt
"To the extent that we are rational we share the same identity." - Rebecca Goldstein
"You are the student. That problem. You are that loudly liked "problem of his day." You are that quietly stricken "system of his problem." You will be infested inside a delightful stupid system. I might be sold by an outstanding praise. My good life may may the balls."
"When you are kind to people, it"s like visiting a bank. You put kindness in, and you get kindness back- with interest!" - Herman Munster
"Are you joining a conversation or taking it over? Stay aware of how you join a conversation and of your effect on a conversation." - Loren Weisman
"What is success? It is being able to go to bed each night with your soul at peace."  Paulo Coelho
"The freedoms of others should be respected, including the freedom to offend. To willfully and unjustly encroach upon the freedoms of another is to forgo your own." - The Satanic Temple
"Don"t go through life, grow through life." Eric Butterworth
"Life's too mysterious to take too serious." Mary Engelbreit
"In the world of tomorrow, there is no sorrow, for the man with the loaded gun."
"Trust yourself. You know more than you think you do." - Benjamin Spock, pediatrician
"Focus on being productive instead of busy" -Tim Ferriss
"I like feeling strong. It keeps my mental floor higher." Pink
"Champions behave like champions before they're champions; they have a winning standard of performance before they are winners." - Bill Walsh
"Don"t wait. The time will never be just right." Napoleon Hill
"Society will always be too fragile to accept us for all that make us beautiful." RM Drake
"Try to be a rainbow in someone"s cloud." Maya Angelou
"Learn from the mistakes of others. You can never live long enough to make them all yourself." - Groucho Marx
"Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our fears." Les Brown
""I think we"re fucked," Oxford scientist Stephen Emmott on climate change
"Enjoy life while you can. Because if you're lucky it's going to be 20 years before it hits the fan." -- James Lovelock, author, scientist on climate change
"One"s body is inviolable, subject to one"s own will alone." -- The Satanic Temple
50 Inspiring Quotes to Help You Overcome the Fear of Failure
"When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be." Lao Tzu
"Life is what happens to you while you"re busy making other plans." John Lennon
"If your actions inspire others to dream more, learn more, do more and become more, you are a leader." - John Quincy Adams
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt.
"... millions long for immortality who don't know what to do with themselves on a rainy Sunday afternoon." - Susan Ertz
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it. " - Charles R. Swindoll
"What Am I to you?!" -Carina. "Treasure" - Said Barbosa
"If you want to fly, give up everything that's weighing you down." - Unknown
"A comfort zone is a beautiful place, but nothing ever grows there."  Author Unknown
"History is merely a list of surprises. It can only prepare us to be surprised yet again." - Kurt Vonnegut
"The struggle for justice is an ongoing and necessary pursuit that should prevail over laws and institutions." -- The Satanic Temple
"Sometimes we build such high walls for protection that we forget that our greatest enemy can grow from within." -Eishes Chayil
"I don't like my Teddy." - Eddie
"You are not entitled to your opinion. You are entitled to your informed opinion. No one is entitled to be ignorant." -Harlan Ellison
"Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable" -JFK
"Without ash to rise from, a Phoenix would just be a bird getting up" - Schmidt, a character in the sitcom New Girl
"The King asked his wise men for some single thing that would make him happy when he was sad, but sad when he was happy. They consulted and came back with a ring engraved with the message 'This Too Will Pass'" -A Sufi Woman in 'Red Mars' by Kim Stanley Robinson
"One should strive to act with compassion and empathy towards all creatures in accordance with reason." -- The Satanic Temple
"A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer"- Bruce lee/Raymond Reddington
"It's better to burn out than to fade away." --- Neil Young
"This [Puerto Rico] is an island. Surrounded by water. Big water. Ocean water." - Trump
"Life is not a race, we all have plenty of time to fuck it up."
"The roots of true achievement lie in the will to become the best that you can become." Harold Taylor
"Anything which has been defined has now become a harmful stereotype" - Gary Greatorex
"Life is like a ten-speed bicycle. Most of us have gears we never use." - Charles M. Schulz
"The most devastating thing artists can do to their career is get in their own way, and way too many people do. It"s not any excuse you can come up with that determines whether you succeed or you fail. It is youno one else." - Loren Weisman
"Hard work beats talent when talent doesn"t work hard." -Tim Notke
"Hard work beats talent when talent fails to work hard."  Kevin Durant
"The Only Limit To Our Realization Of Tomorrow Will Be Our Doubts Of Today."- Franklin D. Roosevelt
"People pay for what they do, and still more for what they have allowed themselves to become. And they pay for it very simply; by the lives they lead." - James Baldwin
"We cannot change the cards we are dealt, just how we play the hand." - Randy Pausch [The Last Lecture]
"It is not when you realize you can do anything you want that you are truly free, but when you realize you can think anything you want"
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"There are some people that come into your life as blessings, while others come in your life as lessons. The question is whether you learn from those lessons." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"We aim above the mark to hit the mark." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The future belongs to those who believe in the beauty of their DREAMS." Eleanor Roosevelt
"Knowledge Speaks, But Wisdom Listens." - Jimi Hendrix
"Give a man a hole and what does he have? Nothing. But give a man a shovel and he can dig a hole to contain the nothing" - Harold, Total Drama
"Give a man a hole and what dose he have? Nothing. But give a man a shovel and he can dig a hole to contain the nothing" - Harold, Total Drama
"People are fallible. If we make a mistake, we should do our best to rectify it and resolve any harm that may have been caused." -The Satanic Temple
"I've been to Hell. You've only read about it." - Marquis de Sade
"You can never have it all. But, you can make the greatest out of what you do have." -Rachel Wolchin
"What is the secular basis of Judaism? Practical need, self-interest. What is the worldly religion of the Jew? Huckstering. What is his worldly God? Money.-Karl Marx
"This song makes me want to scream Allah u akbar and defuse the bomb" - Random Youtube guy
"We spend very little time in childhood, but we spend our entire lives getting over it." -Unknown
"The desert seems vast, even endless, and yet scientists tell us that somewhere, even now, there is snow." Welcome To Night Vale
"The highest form of patriotism is dissent." -Hunter Stockton Thompson
"We are all born ignorant, but one must work hard to remain stupid" -Benjamin Franklin
"Carrying someone else"s weight is only going to weigh down on you and add stress, frustration, and pain. Choose who you work with and play with wisely." - Loren Weisman
"Every petal of blue lupin is edged with white, so that a field of lupins is more blue than..."  East of Eden by John Steinbeck
"My first wish is to see this plague of mankind, war, banished from the earth." - George Washington
"I know one thing: that I know nothing." - Socrates
"True victory isn't about winning against someone strong. It's about defending what's important to you"- Might Duy
"Sixty - two thousand four hundred repetitions make one truth." Aldous Huxley, *Brave New World*
"Isn"t it a bit unnerving that doctors call what they do "practice"?"  George Carlin
"Have the courage to let go of who you think you should be in order to be who you are." - Mindfulfil
"Happiness is not something you can acquire. It is your capability to surrender yourself to this very moment." - Mindfulfil
"If you want something you"ve never had, you need to do something you"ve never done."
"The greatness of a nation and its moral progress can be judged by the way its animals are treated." -Mahatma Gandhi
"The greatness of a nation can be judged by the way its animals are treated." -Mahatma Gandhi
"Why would you support capitalism, when you haven't the prospect of owning any capital?"
"There's the way things are and the way things should be in life. If you spend your time focusing on the way things should be, chances are, you will become quite a miserable person."
"For a long time, she held a special place in my heart. I kept this special place just for her, like a 'Reserved' sign on a quiet corner table in a restaurant. Despite the fact that I was sure I"d never see her again." -Haruki Murakami, South of the Border, West of the Sun
"Don't Wish It Was Easier, Wish You Were Better" - Jim Rohn
"Everybody is talking about peace but nobody does anything about it in a peaceful way."-John Lennon
"If liberty means anything at all, it means the right to tell people what they do not want to hear." George Orwell
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right  for you'll be criticized anyway." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." Robert Frost
"Have the courage to let go of who you think you should be in order to be who you are."
"Happiness is not something you can acquire. It is your capability to surrender yourself to this very moment."
"Waking, after all, was an almost natal state. You surfaced without history, then spent the blinks and yawns reassembling your past, shuffling the shards into chronological order before fortifying yourself for the present."
"This is an island, surrounded by water. Big water. Ocean water." - President Donald J. Trump
"Playing the blame game is stupid and childish. Even if it is someone else"s fault, the blame game is wasted time, effort, and energy that takes you somewhere that is not going to get you anywhere." - Loren Weisman
"Learn to watch your drama unfold while at the same time knowing you are more than your drama."  Ram Dass
"Hate is baggage. Life's too short to be pissed off all the time. It's just not worth it."
"Ultimately, people see in you what they want, rather than who you are."
"One of the greatest tragedies in life is to lose your own sense of self &amp; accept the version of you that is expected by everyone else" -K.L. Toth
"Act as if what you do makes a difference. It does." William James
"Don't use your first idea, the dumb kids will use that. Don't use your second idea, the clever kids will use that. Use your third idea - that's all yours" - Instructor on my training course
"In theory, there is no difference between theory and practice. But, in practice, there is."-- Jan L.A. van de Snapchat
"I have only one principle i.e. change the principle according to time changes, because sometimes life is greater than these principles" - Vaibhav More
"Some people says that don't bite a dog just because he bitten you because then there is no difference in you and him, but i says that i am ready to be anything to teach lesson to that fool dog because thats how world works now!!!"
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"When we"re all living in the space of the inner child, loving, honoring, respecting, and embracing its desires, we are at peace. " - Kim Ha Campbell
"You have to be odd to be number one" -Dr.Suess
"He is the happiest man who can set the end of his life in connection with the beginning." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe (Maxims and Reflections, 1819)
"It"s not the load that breaks you down  it"s the way you carry it!"  Lena Horne
"Any Fool Can Know. The Point Is To Understand." - Albert Einstein
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"We train young men to drop fire on people, but their commanders won't allow them to write 'fuck' on their airplanes because it's obscene." --Apocalypse Now
"If good things lasted forever, would we appreciate how precious they are?" - Hobbes, from the comic book Calvin and Hobbes by Bill Watterson.
"I suppose it's hard for a fanatic to admit a mistake. Isn't that the whole point of being a fanatic? You're always right. Everything is the Lord's will." - Lord Varys in Game of Thrones, G. R. R. Martin
"I suppose it's hard for a fanatic to admit a mistake. Isn't that the whole point of being a fanatic? You're always right. Everything it the Lord's will." - Lord Varys, in Game of Thrones, G. R. R. Martin
"Time is a great teacher, but unfortunately it kills all its students." - Hector Berlioz
"The most important things in life are accomplished by people who have kept trying."
"What goals would you be setting for yourself if you knew you could not fail?" -Robert Schuller (1977)
"Your willingness to create a change in beliefs, a shift in energy, an acceptance of where you are, and the courage to make the right choices for yourself will make you into the hero you were always destined to be." - Kim Ha Campbell
" Those that people doubt,God will bring them out"
"I"ve spent so much of my life looking for love in all the wrong places." - Hugh Hefner, 1926-2017
"Solitude is a good place to visit but a poor place to say." - Josh Billings
"The mind is not a vessel that needs filling, but a woodpile that needs igniting." - Plutarch
"It"s not about the amount of time you put in, it is the way you spend the time on the work you need to get done. Saying that you worked ten hours on something that went nowhere is not really anything to brag about." - Loren Weisman
"You are not responsible for the programming you picked up in childhood. However, as an adult, you are one hundred percent responsible for fixing it."
"Don't face problems or bad situations, accept them and let them be as a part of life" - a Happy Man
- May I ask you a question, Father? - Please. - If you created me who created you? - Ah. The question of the ages which I hope you and I will answer one day. All this. All these wonders of art design, human ingenuity all utterly meaningless in the face of the only question... (Alien: Covenant-2017)
"It doesn't take much to be a hero. It simply takes the courage to do what others have not." - Jacob Heinrichs.
"Never counter the illogical with logic. For you will find those born in illogic know their areas of expertise far better than you know yours." - Jacob Heinrichs
"Wisdom doesn't come without regret" - CS
"We either make ourselves miserable, or we make ourselves strong. The amount of work is the same."  Carlos Castaneda
"He's more myself than I am. Whatever our souls are made of, his and mine are the same." - Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
"Effective communication is 20% what you know and 80% how you feel about what you know."  Jim Rohn
"Tupac was one of the biggest thugs I know and he always wore his seat belt" Ice Cube
"Sometimes You Win, Sometimes You Learn." - John Maxwell
"Happiness is not a station you arrive at, but a manner of traveling." Margaret Lee Runbeck
"Everything Will Be Okay In The End. If It's Not Okay, It's Not The End." - John Lennon
"It"s very hard to get a man to understand something when his salary depends on him not understanding it." --Upton Sinclair
"Life is too short to be living somebody else's dream." -Hugh Hefner
"Anything can be a dildo, if you are brave enough!" -Abraham Lincoln
"Breath in the good shit, breathe out the bullshit" - Charles Bukowski [X-post r/Getmotivated]
"Yes, terrible things happen, but sometimes those terrible thingsthey save you." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Choose those you give your trust to carefully. Be caring; be loving; be creative. But also be careful." - Loren Weisman
"When one is in love one has no love left for anyone" - Marcel Proust
"When did the future switch from being a promise to a threat?" - Chuck Palahniuk
"He doesn't even like, get us man" -Charlie
"The inner child never wants to hurt anyone; your inner child always comes from a place of love." - Kim Ha Campbell
"It has been my experience that folks who have no vices have very few virtues." - Abraham Lincoln
(The Truth about the Truth.) Speaking the truth is easy but dealing with the consequences ain't in most situations. So we lie lie lie and oh boy it feels good.
"With the new day comes new strength and new thoughts." Eleanor Roosevelt
"...the greatness comes not when things go always good for you, but the greatness comes when you're really tested, when you take some knocks, some disappointments, when sadness comes, because only if you have been in the deepest valley...
"Information is not knowledge." - Albert Einstein
"To oppose corruption in government is the highest obligation of patriotism." - G. Edward Griffin
"Your task is not to seek for love, but merely to seek and find all the barriers within yourself that you have built against it." - Rumi
" You wish to be called righteous rather than act right. [...] I say, wrong must not win by technicalities." -Aeschylus
"Love is a serious mental disease" -Plato
"The peoples of Islam will always be closer to us than, for example, France". - Adolf Hitler
"Knowledge creates pain, while pain forms knowledge."
"Beware that, when fighting monsters, you yourself do not become a monster for when you gaze long into the abyss. The abyss gazes also into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and they don"t want anyone else to feel like that." - Robin Williams
"The best and most beautiful things in this world cannot be seen or even heard, but must be felt with the heart."  Helen Keller
"People often say motivation doesn"t last. Well neither does bathing, that"s why we recommend it daily." - Zig Ziglar
(Desperately looking) "a man who does not reach what he knows to be his potential is a life not worth living at all"
"I saw my life branching out before me like the green fig tree in the story... -Sylvia Plath
"Those who forge their own paths are the ones who change the world"- Rob, food service worker at GMU
"When a work appears to be ahead of its time, it is merely the time that is behind the work." - Jean Cocteau
"Nothing is particularly hard if you divide it into small jobs." - Henry Ford
"Freedom is the oxygen of the soul." - Moshe Dayan
"Mistakes are a part of being human. Appreciate your mistakes for what they are: precious life lessons that can only be learned the hard way."-Al Franken
"Ninety-nine percent of the world's lovers are not with their first choice. That's what makes the jukebox play." -Willie Nelson
"I hope your rambles have been sweet, and your reveries spacious." -Emily Dickinson
"When you feel you have limited or no freedom whether in business, personal or spiritual pursuits It's time to begin exploring other options and choices out there. You always have options and choices in life." - Kim Ha Campbell
"People demand freedom of speech as a compensation for the freedom of thought which they seldom use."  Soren Kierkegaard
"You are your brain, so you are you." - me 5 minutes ago
"The map had been the first form of misdirection, for what is a map but a way of emphasizing some things and making other things invisible?" - Jeff VanderMeer, Annihilation
"No one deserves to be lonely in a world that doesn't know that their kind of harmless love exists."
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Anyone can give up, it's the easiest thing ever. But to hold it together when everyone else thinks you'd fall apart is true strength." Author Unknown
"There's stupid, and then there's ugly-stupid. You don't want to be ugly-stupid." - Coach Coachguy
"Sometimes it takes everything you ever thought you wanted, to fully understand it's nothing you need." (-Mandy Hale)
"You can want, wish, and dream all day, but those that prepare, work, learn, practice, and problem-solve are the ones that find success in sports, business, music, or whatever. Back up what you want with doing the work it takes to get it." - Loren Weisman
"I mean, they say you die twice. One time when you stop breathing and a second time, a bit later on, when somebody says your name for the last time." - Banksy
"Many painters are afraid of the blank canvas, but the blank canvas IS AFRAID of the truly passionate painter who dares  and who has once broken the spell of 'you can"t.'" -van Gogh
"That's my theory: Lies ultimately lead to tragedy"  Hans Teeuwen
"Aim high and stay focused. It's through will, strength and determination that you will succeed." - Bill Lewis
"My love: You are strong and you will do well in life... -Black Hawk Down Closing Scene
"If people haunt their past that could daunt their future."
"At the midpoint on the journey of life, I found myself in a dark forest, for the clear path was lost..." - Dante Alighieri, Inferno
"Learn from the mistakes of others. You can never live long enough to make them all yourself." - Groucho Marx
"To have what you have never had, you have to do what you have never done." - Roy T. Bennett
"If opportunity doesn"t knock, build a door."  Milton Berle
"Life Is Hard. After All, It Kills You." - Katharine Hepburn
"When you talk you are repeating what you already know. But if you listen, you may learn something new." Dalai Lama
"Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable." - John F. Kennedy
"Like the narcissistic contortionist, I've buggered myself."  David Mitchell (as Shakespeare in "Upstart Crow")
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein
"Sometimes a person we love, through no fault of his own, can't see past the end of his nose."  Mary Poppins
"Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable." - John F. Kennedy
"Poverty in America is market potential unrealized" - Andrew Young...
"True ignorance is not the absence of knowledge, but the refusal to acquire it." - Karl Popper
"Calling for change and being part of making change are two very different things. Stop calling for change and be a part of making the change you want to see." - Loren Weisman
"Be a dick not a cock." -Chris Barz-Brown
"Too often we underestimate the power of a touch, a smile, a kind word, a listening ear, an honest compliment, or the smallest act of caring, all of which have the potential to turn a life around." - Leo Buscaglia
"Never Give A Sword To A Man Who Can't Dance"
"Sometimes a person has to go a very long distance out of his way to come back a short distance correctly." - Edward Albee
"When cynicism becomes the default language, playfulness and invention become impossible. Cynicism scours through a culture like bleach, wiping out millions of small, seedling ideas. " -Caitlin Moran
"My bed is a magical place where I suddenly remember everything I forgot to do."  Anonymous
"Most people say use your head; I say use your heart. It will guide you closer to where you want to be. The head should be following the heart, not the other way around." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Instead of worrying about what you cannot control, shift your energy to what you can create." - Roy T. Bennett
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Money Defines Your Relationship" - My Own
"Behind me is infinite power, before me is endless possibility, around me is boundless opportunity." Author Unknown
"We don't learn to just know how to read a map, but to find a new direction"
"'There's too much risk in loving' the young boy said. 'No' said the old man. 'There's too much risk in not'." - Atticus
"I grew up understanding what it was like to not have health insurance for eight years. So this idea that I"m somehow the "Hollywood elite" and this guy [Trump] who takes a shit in a gold toilet is somehow the man of the people is laughable." -George Clooney
"The tradition of all the dead generations weighs like a nightmare on the brain of the living." - Karl Marx
"To educate a man in mind, and not in morals, is to educate a menace to society."  Theodore Roosevelt
"Everything you want is on the other side of fear." (-Jack Canfield)
"Life is a game. Money is how we keep score."  Ted Turner
"Success is to be measured not so much by the position that one has reached in life as by the obstacles which he has overcome." Booker T. Washington
"Age is no better, hardly so well, qualified for instruction as youth for it has not profited as much as it has lost." -Henry David Thoreau, Walden
"Any idiot can face a crisis. It is this day-to-day living that wears you down."  Anton Chekhov
"You have to find the right distance between people. Too close, and they overwhelm you. Too far, and they abandon you."  Unknown
"The grass is always greener where the dogs are shitting" - Chris Cornell, Soundgarden
"If someone tells me they're offended, I'm still waiting to hear their point." - Christopher Hitchens
"Stand for the flag, kneel before God." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"And I am not afraid of dying. Any time will do, I don"t mind. Why should I be frightened of dying? There"s no reason for it. You"ve got to go sometime." - Gerry O"Driscoll
"Wear your failure as a badge of honor" - Sundar Pichai
"Destroy tradition, and you destroy the sense of responsibility." Elizabeth Bowen ("The Death of the Heart") (1938)
"Choose your relationships widely. Being alone will never cause as much loneliness as being in the wrong relationship."
"Procrastination is the art of keeping up with yesterday." - Don Marquis
"It all comes down to a choice, what would you rather, stay how I am and watch the days get darker, or forgive myself get on with my life and not look back after" -- Plan B [Everyday]
"By staying open minded and listening to the needs and desires of your inner child, you open yourself up to the possibilities of anything and everything." - Kim Ha Campbell
'Beneath the makeup and behind the smile I am just a girl who wishes for the world.' - Marilyn Monroe
[Request] I'm looking for a quote about thinking
"Life Is Not A Fairy Tale. If You Lose Your Shoe At Midnight, You're Drunk." - Unknown Legend
"It's the job that's never started as takes longest to finish" - JRR Tolkien
"Clothes make the man. Naked people have little or no influence on society." - Mark Twain
'I do not think you can name many great inventions that have been made by married men.' - Nikola Tesla
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"Yo, can I be a colander for Christmas?" - Me 2k17
"A friend is someone who can see the truth and pain in you even when you are fooling everyone else. "-Unknown
"Every new beginning comes from some other beginning"s end." - Marcus Annaeus Seneca
"and I still believe, that maybe one day, I will be able to give my heart to someone..without the worry of having it return back to me broken."
"Flags are bits of colored cloth that governments use first to shrink-wrap people"s minds &amp; then as ceremonial shrouds to bury the dead." - Arundhati Roy
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." -Mark Twain
"I like the stars. It"s the illusion of permanence, I think. I mean, they"re always flaring up and caving in and going out. But from here I can pretend I can pretend that things last. I can pretend that lives last longer than moments. gods come and gods go. Mortals flicker and flash and fade. World
"I have given my whole soul to someone who treats it as if it were a flower to put in his coat." -Oscar Wilde
"United there is little we cannot do in a host of cooperative ventures. Divided there is little we can do--for we dare not meet a powerful challenge at odds and split asunder." - President John F. Kennedy
"People have forgotten how to tell a story. Stories don"t have a middle or an end any more. They usually have a beginning that never stops beginning." Steven Spielberg
"Bojack,When you get sad, you run straight ahead-" Bojack Horseman S.1 Ep.12
"When you're dead, you're not going to know it. While difficult and painful for others, it won't make any difference to you. The same applies when you're stupid. While others will know it, you won't realize a thing." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Think of how stupid the average person is, and realize half of them are stupider than that." - George Carlin
"Creativity and fear are conjoined twins... they were born together, they share the same organs; they're always going to be together." -- Elizabeth Gilbert
"You will become way less concerned with what other people think of you when you realize how seldom they do." - David Foster Wallace [Infinite Jest]
"It was an honor to visit the White House until you showed up." - LeBron James to President Trump
"Grant that I should seek rather to understand than to be understood." - St. Francis of Assisi
"William E. Lewis Jr. has marked himself SAFE during Doomsday this 23rd day of September, 2017. "
"The need for certainty is the greatest disease the mind faces." --Robert Greene
"You do not merely want to be considered the best at what you do, you want to be considered the only one that does what you do" -Jerry Garcia
"When rich speculators prosper while farmers lose their land; when government officials spend money on weapons instead of cures; when the upper class is extravagant and irresponsible..." -Tao te Ching
"Expect what you will, that doesn't mean life will give it to you." - unknown
"Eventually soulmates meet, for they have the same hiding place." - Robert Brault
"The biggest risk is not taking any risk... In a world that changing really quickly, the only strategy that is guaranteed to fail is not taking risks." - Mark Zuckerberg
"HERE"S HOW I THINK OF MY MONEY  AS SOLDIERS  I SEND THEM OUT TO WAR EVERYDAY. I WANT THEM TO TAKE PRISONERS AND COME HOME, SO THERE"S MORE OF THEM". - KEVIN O"LEARY.
"My dream is of a place and a time where America will once again be seen as the last best hope of earth." -Abraham Lincoln
"We saw too much beauty to be cynical, felt too much joy to be dismissive, climbed too many mountains to be quitters, kissed too many girls to be deceivers, saw too many sunrises not to be believers, broke too many strings to be pro's and gave too much love to be concerned where it goes...."
"Alcohol is your enemy."
"I break the chains that bind me. I leave the clown I was behind me. It was wonderful of you to remind me, that if I looked I would find me." Kurt Vonnegut, A Song for Selma
"A nation that continues year after year to spend more money on military defense than on programs of social uplift is approaching spiritual death." Martin Luther King Jr.
"I am thankful and blessed to be in a position where I have learned as much from those that have taught me as I have from those that I continue to teach." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Everybody is identical in their secret unspoken belief that way deep down they are different from everyone else." - David Foster Wallace
"All you touch and all you see, is all your life will ever be" - Pink Floyd
"There's a value in having secrets. After all, we are nothing more or less than what we choose to reveal". - Frank Underwood, House of Cards
"Your girlfriend is on Kik, WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger, Snapchat, Tango, Viber, has a profile on Plenty of Fish, and you think she is dating you alone? If so, you deserve to be in Guinness World Records as the Greatest Fool Ever." -- Bill Lewis
"The line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being." - Alexander Solzhenitsyn
"Why should I be sad? I have lost someone who didn"t love me. But they lost someone who loved them."
"The best weapon against an enemy is another enemy." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"common knowledge is always at least half wrong"
"War is not a pleasant subject to contemplate in all its horrid reality, and because of this the reality is hidden behind fine phrases and brave music and bright uniforms." -Jawaharlal Nehru
"I've found little that is 'good' about human beings on the whole. In my experience most of them are trash, no matter whether they publicly subscribe to this or that ethical doctrine or none at all." -Freud
"You pompously call yourselves Republicans and Democrats. There is no Republican Party. There is no Democratic Party. There are no Republicans nor Democrats in this House. You are lick-spittlers and panderers, the creatures of the Plutocracy." - Jack London, The Iron Heel 1908
"You know life is what we make it, and a chance is like a picture, it"d be nice if you just take it."  Un-thinkable by Alicia Keys ft. Drake
"History is on the move, Captain. Those who cannot keep up will be left behind, to watch from a distance. And those who stand in our way will not watch at all." - Thrawn
"There are some things that money cannot buy, like manners, morals, intelligence and class." Author Unknown
"Forget the past  the future will give you plenty to worry about."  George Allen, Sr
"Quote me as saying that that Imperial bastard will never set foot in Louisiana, and that when I call him a sonofabitch I am not using profanity, but am referring to the circumstances of his birth." --Governor of Louisiana Huey Long, when the head of the KKK threatened to campaign in his state.
"One Day? or day one, You decided
"Knowledge rests not upon truth alone, but upon error also." - C.G. Jung
"Time's arrow neither stands still nor reverses. It merely marches forward." - Joseph Sugarman, Bojack Horseman
"what country can preserve it"s liberties if their rulers are not warned from time to time..." - Thomas Jefferson
"The beginning of wisdom is the statement 'I don't know'. The person who cannot make that statement is one who will never learn anything." -Thrall
"And I won't fight in vain, I'll love you just the same" The Lumineers
"The man who takes away music is no man at all"-Me
"From life's school of war: what does not kill me makes me stronger"  Friedrich Nietzsche, Twilight of the Idols
"Another method of handling a perceived negative energy is to temporarily remove yourself emotionally and physically, from the situation." - Kim Ha Campbell
"No one heals himself by wounding another." -St. Ambrose of Milan
"If only it were all so simple! If only there were evil people somewhere insidiously committing evil deeds, and it were necessary only to separate them from the rest of us and destroy them...
"Never lose hope. Storms make people stronger and never last forever." - Roy T. Bennett
"If you have a strong purpose in life, you don't have to be pushed. Your passion will drive you there." - Roy T. Bennett
"If it's true that our species is alone in the universe, then I'd have to say the universe aimed rather low and settled for very little." - George Carlin
"Everything is changing. People are taking their comedians seriously and the politicians as a joke." Will Rogers
"Too many people spend money they haven't earned to buy things they don't want to impress people they don't like." -- Will Rogers
"You think money can solve any problem, but all it's good for is buying the things it can, and leaving you free to pursue the things it can't". - ANN HERENDEEN.
"People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does bathing. That's why we recommend it daily." Zig Ziglar
"You inherit your parents' trauma but you will never fully understand it..." Bojack Horseman
"It is a common experience that a problem difficult at night is resolved in the morning after the committee of sleep has worked on it." John Steinbeck
"In a class society where everybody's guilty, the only crime is getting caught. In a world of thieves, the only final sin is stupidity" - Hunter S Thompson (Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas)
"The world is round and the place which may seem like the end may also be only the beginning." -Ivy Baker Priest
"I'm a college graduate. ... I'm a citizen. I pay my taxes. I've never been arrested. ... I'm a professional. I show up at work on time, I know my lines, I hit my mark, and I treat the other actors and the crew members with respect. That's a role model." -Samuel L. Jackson, 2013
"There's something in the Bible about falling sparrows," Kevin said. "About his eye being on them. That's what's wrong with God; he only has one eye." - from Valis by Philp K. Dick
"Experience is simply the name we give our mistakes." - Oscar Wilde
"Passion is oxygen of the soul." (-Bill Butler)
"Have you ever noticed that anybody driving slower than you is an idiot, and anyone going faster than you is a maniac?"  George Carlin
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best."
"Sometimes silence is the best way to let someone know they did something wrong."  Author Unknown
"There are people who put their dreams in a little box and say, 'Yes, I've got dreams, of course I've got dreams.' Then they put the box away and bring it out once in awhile to look in it, and yep, they're still there." - Emma Bombeck
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today." H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"Pippin glanced in some wonder at the face now close beside his own, for the sound of that laugh had been gay and merry. Yet in the wizard's face he saw at first only lines of care and sorrow;
"We're all pretty bizarre. Some of us are just better at hiding it, that's all." - Andrew, The Breakfast Club
"Of the demonstrably wise there are but two: those who commit suicide, and those who keep their reasoning faculties atrophied with drink." Mark Twain
"Love your enemies, for they tell you your faults." Benjamin Franklin
"The Anarch is the positive counterpart of the anarchist...." - Erst Junger
"I"m not trying to be anyone"s saviour. I"m just trying to think about the future and not be sad." - Elon Musk, The future we"re building  and boring
"Ass, titties, ass-n-titties. Ass ass titties titties, ass-n-titties..." - DJ Assault
"Our lives are defined by opportunities, even the ones we miss." Eric Roth, The Curious Case of Benjamin Button
"Blessed are the poor in spirit, for theirs is the kingdom of heaven." J.C.
"Night is beautiful when you are happycomforting when you are in griefterrible when you are lonely and unhappy." -L.M. Montgomery
"Every industry today has to fight complacency, prepare to see the disruption coming and then be flexible enough to adapt swiftly." - Lakshmi Mittal, the Largest Steelmaker on Earth.
"The work you have to do to accomplish your needs and desires is going to be a harder road than working on the needs and desires for someone else." - Kim Ha Campbell
"It was the Law of the Sea, they said. Civilization ends at the waterline. Beyond that, we all enter the food chain, and not always right at the top." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Every normal man must be tempted, at times, to spit on his hands, hoist the black flag, and begin slitting throats." -H.L. Mencken
"The problem in Venezuela is not that socialism has been poorly implemented but that socialism has been faithfully implemented." - Donald Trump
"We all have dreams. But in order to make dreams come into reality, it takes an awful lot of determination, dedication, self-discipline, and effort." Jesse Owens
"It is not the mountain we conquer, but ourselves." (-Sir Edmund Hillary)
"Of all the things that can boost emotions, motivation, and perceptions during a workday, the single most important is making progress in meaningful work." - Teresa Amabile
"Don't Judge Humanity As A Whole On The Indiscretions Of A Few" - Ricky Morgan
"There's no use running if you're on the wrong road." Warren Buffet
"In the minds of geniuses we find once more, our own neglected thoughts" -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I'm not afraid of death, i'm afraid to lose my mom" -Timothy
"My deeply held belief is that if a god anything like the traditional sort exists, our curiosity and intelligence are provided by such a good. We would be unappreciative of those gifts . . . If we suppressed our passion to explore the universe and ourselves." - Carl Sagan
"As long as one heart still holds on, then hope is never really gone."  Garth Brooks, The Change
"It Is Better To Light A Candle Than Curse The Darkness" :)
'Cowards die many times before their deaths; the valiant never taste of death but once." - Shakespeare
"Don"t judge people in their reduced circumstances, nobody aspires to be there."
" If your dreams don't scare you they are too small " - Richard Branson -
"It's harder to be kind than clever."
"To see a man beaten not by a better opponent, but by himself is a tragedy."  Cus D"Amato
"I'm too positive, that's my biggest weakness. I get it from my mother. My life is going to shit around me but I won't do anything about it because I'm just happy I'm here at all"
"You never know how strong you are until being strong is your only choice." - Bob Marley
"People may call me insane. I prefer the term 'excessively imaginative'." - Jacob Heinrichs
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best."
'Should I kill myself or have a cup of coffee?' - Albert Camus
"Thus did a handful of rapacious citizens come to control..." -Kurt Vonnegut
"Men are so simple of mind, and so much dominated by their immediate needs, that a deceitful man will always find plenty who are ready to be deceived."- Niccol Machiavelli
"God gives every bird its food, but He does not throw it into its nest." J.G. Holland
"The more open we are, the more we can learn. The more we learn, the more we recognize that every one of us is a hero."- Kim Ha Campbell
""I'll work with anyone, no matter how evil, to do good. I'll work with no one, no matter how good, to do evil." I recently came across this quote but can't remember (or figure out) where I read it or who said it. Can anyone help?
"I have always loved too much or not enough." -Dorianne Laux
"It is possible to commit no mistakes and still lose. That is not a weakness; that is life." -- Jean-Luc Picard
"If size really mattered, then the elephant would be the king of the jungle"
"...And all that's best of dark &amp; bright, meet in her aspect and her eyes" - *She Walks in Beauty* by Lord Byron
"Let not the fear of the wolf keep you from the forest." - Russian Proverb
"When the rich make war, it's the poor who suffer." - Russian Proverb
"Trust yourself. Create the kind of self that you will be happy to live with all your life." - Golda Meir
"Education the mind without educating the heart is no education at all." - Aristotle -
"The distance doesn't matter. Only the first step is difficult" - Marquise Du Deffand
"To abandon facts is to abandon freedom. If nothing is true, then no one can criticize power, because there is no basis upon which to do so. If nothing is true, then all is spectacle." Dr. Timothy Snyder
"The moon looks upon many night flowers; the night flowers see but one moon." Jean Ingelow
"How could we not talk about family when family"s all that we got?"  Wiz Khalifa  See You Again ft. Charlie Puth
"Suicide doesn"t take away the pain, it gives it to someone else" -Author Unknown
"If poeple don't laugh at your dreams, at-least twice in a weak you think very small"- Deepak Chopra
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"The dance between darkness and light will always remain the stars and the moon will always need the darkness to be seen, the darkness will just not be worth having without the moon and the stars." - C. JoyBell C.
"We have enslaved the rest of the animal creation, and have treated our distant cousins in fur and feathers so badly that beyond doubt, if they were able to formulate a religion, they would depict the Devil in human form." - William Ralph Inge
"Reality is the union of perspectives." -Me
"With such a hell in your heart and your head, how can you live? How can you love?" - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"Learning without application achieves the same ends as ignorance." - Gerard Puccio quoting an old friend
"Hell is paved with good intentions."  Samuel Johnson, John Ray, Saint Bernard of Clairvaux and others
"The greatest healing therapy is friendship and love." Hubert H. Humphrey
"Education is the biggest prostitution. It makes both knowledge and students a whore." ------John Johnson(The one who being fucked by education for 20 years.)
"Look where it is and you'll find it" meaning
"Pessimism leads to weakness, optimism to power" - William James
"If you can"t trust yourself, love yourself and believe in your dreams, it makes it hard for anyone else to trust, love or believe in you." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Do I not destroy my enemies when I make them my friends" -Abraham Lincoln
"Inteligent computers will have the ability to commit suicide if Facebook is down."
"There is no exercise better for the heart than reaching down and lifting people up." - John Holmes
"I am indebted to my father for living, but my teacher for living well." - Alexander the Great
"I can choose to be grateful even when my emotions and feelings are still steeped in hurt and resentment" - Henri Nouwen 1992
"Nothing can happen more beautiful than death." -Walt Whitman
"No matter where life takes me, find me with a smile."  Mac Miller
"Intelligent computers will have the ability to commit suicide if Facebook is down."
"As soon as man lifts his nose from the ground and starts sniffing at eternal problems like life and death, the meaning of a rose or a star cluster--then he is in trouble."
"If you torture the data long enough, it will confess to anything" - Ronald Coase
"Sincerity is the key to success. Once you can fake that, you"ve got it made." -- Groucho Marx
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as thought nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." - Albert Einstein
"The definition of the good society is one in which virtue pays." Abraham Maslow, psychologist
"Tough Times Never Last, But Tough People Do" - Robert H. Schuller
"The most painful thing is losing yourself in the process of loving someone too much, and forgetting that you are special too." - Ernest Hemingway
"Half of being smart is knowing what you are dumb at." - David Gerroid
"Diamonds form under pressure".
"It matters not how a man dies, but how he lives. The act of dying is not of importance, it lasts so short a time." - Samuel Johnson
"Life moves on, whether we act as cowards or heroes. Life has no other discipline to impose, if we would but realize it, than to accept life unquestioningly." -Henry Miller
"You can choose your friendsbut you can't choose your neighbours. Countries have to accept that and stop fighting wars. Why do thousands have to die for some piece of land? I travel around the world for Unicef and I sometimes wonder why we even have borders." - Jackie Chan -
"Look where it is and you'll find it" meanjng
"Raise your words, not voice. It is rain that grows flowers, not thunder."- Jalaluddin Rumi
30 Heart Touching Sad Love Quotes that Make You Cry [Infographic] - Statree
"Our days are happier when we give people a bit our heart rather than a piece of our mind"-happsters
"Nothing is more sad than the death of an illusion" - Arthur Koestler
"Old age and corruption beats youth and beauty every time" - Anthony Bourdain
"Old age and corruption beat youth and beauty every time" - Anthony Bourdain
"Let us read and let us dance; these two amusements will never do any harm to the world." -Voltaire
"At what point do you become stronger than your strongest excuse?" -Inky Johnson
"Well my heart is gold and my hands are cold"-halsey
"Too often we underestimate the power of a touch, a smile, a kind word, a listening ear, an honest compliment, or the smallest act of caring, all of which have the potential to turn a life around." -Leo Buscaglia
1 year = 365 opportunities 
"People were created to be loved. Things were created to be used. The reason why the world is in chaos, is because things are being loved and people are being used." -John Green
"Perhaps when we find ourselves wanting everything, it is because we are dangerously close to wanting nothing."
"When man falls from grace, he becomes his own God" - Who said this?
"We make our own fortunes and call them fate." - Benjamin Disraeli
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams." - Dr. Seuss
"Only the convinced convince."
"I Cried When I Had No Shoes, But I Stopped Crying When I Saw A Man Without Legs...! Life Is Full Of Blessings, Sometimes We Don't Value It" - William Shakespeare
'Take it easy, but take it' - Woody Guthrie
"DON"T WATCH THE CLOCK, DO WHAT IT DOES. KEEP GOING"
"Having faith in your plan is the first step to success."
'How can you wonder your travels do you no good, when you carry yourself around with you? You are saddled with the very thing that drove you away.' - Socrates
"50,000 fans are ready to binge drink for a couple of hours - I can't wait - adult men playing a simple child's game, all while being paid more than the president ... looks like the millionaires are ready to play their game, so, we can stop stalling with the mindless chatter" Key &amp; Peele
"Let us rise up tonight with a greater readiness. Let us stand with a greater determination. And let us move on in these powerful days, these days of challenge, to make America what it ought to be. We have an opportunity to make America a better nation." - MLK
"Telling someone that they can not be sad because other people have it worse is like saying that someone can not be happy because somebody else has it better."
"Life is like an ice cream sundae, and I'm swallowing it slowly. Please don't make me have to show thee exactly what I ate today." - u/Miskatonica
"The only difference between me and a madman is that I'm not mad." -Dali
"It took me four years to paint like Raphael, but a lifetime to paint like a child." Picasso
"My interest lies in the future, because I'm going to spend the rest of my life there." - Joseph F. Kettering
"You're in my blood like holy wine/You taste so bitter and so sweet//But I could drink a case of you/And I would still be on my feet, I would still be on my feet" --Joni Mitchell
"Faith is a place of mystery, where we find the courage to believe in what we cannot see and the strength to let go of our fear of uncertainty."  Brene Brown
"We are only seeking Man. We have no need of other worlds. We need mirrors. We don't know what to do with other worlds. A single world, our own, suffices us; but we can't accept it for what it is. We are seaching for an ideal image of our own world: we go in quest" Solaris by Stanislaw Lem
"When you reach your destiny you find that the road to it was more beautiful"
"I like to think that if you put your trust out there; if you really give people the benefit of the doubt, see their best intentions, people will rise to the occasion." - Paul Rudd (Our Idiot Brother)
"We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light." - Plato
"What an idealist, people will say. Not at all: It is just that the others are scum." -Frantz Fanon
"Yet he dismisses without notice his thought, because it is his. In every work of genius we recognize our own rejected thoughts; they come back to us with a certain alienated majesty." - Emerson
"The biggest risk is not taking any risk. In a world that is changing really quickly, the only strategy that is guaranteed to fail is not taking risks." - Mark Zuckerberg -
"My mentality is that of a samurai. I would rather commit seppuku than fail."  Elon Musk
"This life is short, the vanities of the world are transient, but they alone live who live for others, the rest are more dead than alive." - Swami Vivekananda
"And all plans, safeguards, policing, and coercion are fruitless. We find after years of struggle that we do not take a trip; a trip takes us." -John Steinbeck
"You need to learn how to select your thoughts just the same way you select your clothes every day. This is a power you can cultivate."
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"The real troubles in your life are apt to be things that never crossed your worried mind, the kind that blindside you at 4 p.m. on some idle Tuesday."-sunscreen song
"Finding your phone after some time away from it, only to see no notifications is both depressing and relieving."-unknown
"We are silenced by ideas of what it means to be normal which are entirely abnormal."-Alain De Botton
"The people who most care about you will not especially admire your achievements; they like you anyway."-Alain De Botton
"No matter how good or bad you think life is, wake up each day and be thankful for life. Someone somewhere else is fighting to survive."-unknown
"Nothing is more humiliating than to see idiots succeed in enterprises we have failed in."  Gustave Flaubert
"You need to learn how to select your thoughts just the same way you select your clothes every day. This is a power you can cultivate."
"The whole Earth is the Sepulchre of famous men; and their story is not graven only on Stone over their native earth, but lives on far away, without visible symbol, woven into the stuff of other men's lives." - Pericles
"I am a showman by profession...and all the gilding shall make nothing else of me." - PT Barnum
"God created war so that Americans would learn geography." -Mark Twain
"Intelligent computers will have the ability to commit suicide if Facebook is down." -  2017 CaptainDork
"As beliefs, energies, and acceptance can change, so can choices. Don"t feel that because you have made a choice, it has to last forever. If it is time to change a choice, change it!" - Kim Ha Campbell
"I still suck at running. But everyday I suck a little less" - Joe Rogan after going for a run.
"I USED TO WANT TO SAVE THE WORLD. TO END WAR AND BRING PEACE TO MANKIND. BUT THEN, I GLIMPSED THE DARKNESS THAT LIVES WITHIN THEIR LIGHT. " Wonderwoman 2017
"I sometimes feel that I have nothing to say and I want to communicate this." Damien Hirst
"The best teachers are those who show you where to look, but don't tell you what to see." - Alexandra K Trenfor
"36-48 hours locked up in the house, I see the population in Florida increasing in 9 months! #HurricaneIrmaBabies." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Without a humble but reasonable confidence in your own powers, you cannot be successful or happy." Norman Vincent Peale
"Hey Darryl, sorry, you did not go to college, so you have to take the jobs you can get." -Randy Marsh, South Park
... Throughout my lifetime, I've left pieces of my heart here and there. And now, there's almost not enough to stay alive. But I force a smile, knowing that my ambition far exceeded my talent. There are no more white horses or pretty ladies at my door. - From the movie "Blow"
"Instead of expending energy to fit into the group, it"s better to expend energy to find the group in which we fit." (-Simon Sinek)
"Of all the words in mice and men, the saddest are, 'It might have been. '" -Kurt Vonnegut (Cat's Cradle)
"In this hall of mirrors, built by liars; I am a pale reflection of myself." - Sam Lake
"Success is usually the culmination of controlling failure" - Sylvester Stalone -
"The life of every man is a diary in which he means to write one story and writes another; and his humblest hour is when he compares the volume as it is with what he vowed to make it". - James M. Barrie
"Our greatest weakness lies in giving up. The most certain way to succeed is always to try just one more time." -Thomas.A.Edision
"Be very, very careful what you put into that head, because you will never, ever get it out." - Thomas Wolsey
"Music is a language that anyone can speak if you're willing to listen"
"Too often in life, something happens and we blame other people for us not being happy or satisfied or fulfilled. So the point is, we all have choices, and we make the choice to accept people or situations or to not accept situations." - Tom Brady
"Son, you don't have bad luck. The reasons bad things happen to you, is because you're a dumbass." - Red Forman, That 70s Show
"A small man who does mighty deeds is far greater than a mighty man who does small deeds." - Jacob Heinrichs
"Happiness is like a butterfly, the more you chase it, the more it will evade you, but if you notice the other things around you, it will gently come and sit on your shoulder." Henry David Thoreau
"You can take the man out of Balcatta, but you can't take the Balcatta out of the man" -Vince L'Abbate
"And God said love your greatest enemy. So I did and loved myself" - Khalil Gibran
"I used to think the worst thing in life was to end up all alone, it"s not. The worst thing in life is to end up with people that make you feel all alone."Robin Williams
"In order to move on, you must understand why you felt what you did and why you no longer need to feel it."-Mitch Albom
"There are two types of people in this world, those who are humble and those who are about to be humbled." - Matt Deggs, SHSU Baseball Coach
"Impossible is just a big word thrown around by small men and women who find it easier to live in the world they've been given than to explore the power they have to change it." Muhammad Ali
"We believe climate change is here to stay  it"s a reality, despite all of the naysayers. We know that these things have occurred as a result of the profligacy of the countries that are rich, and have abused the system...
"Tell them I was the warmest place you knew and that you turned me cold" -Rupi Kaur
"Only those who attempt the absurd can achieve the impossible." -Albert Einstein
"Sometimes you have to get knocked down lower than you've ever been to stand up taller than you ever were." Unknown
"Stop connecting with the world. Connect with yourself on your beach. Stop thinking. Stop analyzing. Start feeling. Start dreaming." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Discreet power requires soft power. Soft power requires hard ignorance. Hard ignorance is never the best option." - Tatrus
"You don't learn to walk by following the rules. You learn by doing and by falling over." - Richard Branson -
"Those who really possess sensibility ought early to be taught that it is a dangerous quality..." Ann Radcliffe
"If you're an axe murderer but you don't have an axe, that doesn't mean that you're moral" - Jordan Peterson
"In individuals, insanity is rare; but in groups, parties, nations and epochs, it is the rule." - Nietzsche
"The Minute Of Giving Up Just Think That Why Did You Hold On For So Long And Hold Some More" - Vaibhav More
"The most complicated skill is to be simple." (-Dejan Stojanovic)
"You must take your opponent into a deep, dark forest where 2+2=5, and the path leading out is only wide enough for one" - Mikhail Tal
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream."-C. S. Lewis
"The American fascists..... method is to poison the channels of public information. With a fascist the problem is never how best to present the truth to the public but how best to use the news to deceive the public into giving the fascist and his group more money or more power." - Henry Wallace'1940
"Once in a while it really hits people that they don't have to experience the world in the way they have been told to." - Alan Keightley
"An Eye For An Eye Makes The Whole World Blind" - Mahatma Gandhi
"Be The Energy You Want To Attract"
"The rich would have to eat money, if the poor did not provide food." -Russian Proverb
"The unspooling of ink has brought me much comfort always, and often have I written what I would not speak." From the novel The Weight of Ink by Rachel Kadish
"You can not, black or white, call yourself the supreme race when moved out of comfort by the opposition's color, their skin color. That is no form of demonstrating or being a supreme being." - xxxtentacion
"Just because my path is different, doesn't mean I'm lost. "
'I give you the mausoleum of all hope and desire, which will fit your individual needs no better than it did mine or my father's before me - William Faulkner
"The difference between the impossible and the possible lies in a person"s determination." -Tommy Lasorda
"It's kind of fun to do the impossible." Walt Disney
" I failed in some subjects in exam, but my friend passed in all. Now he is an engineer in Microsoft and I am the owner of Microsoft. " - Bill Gates
"Are you paralyzed with fear? That"s a good sign. Fear is good. Like self-doubt, fear is an indicator. Fear tells us what we have to do. Remember one rule of thumb: the more scared we are of a work or calling, the more sure we can be that we have to do it." -Steven Pressfield
"Behind every beautiful thing, there's some kind of pain."-Bob Dylan
"Move fast and break things. Unless you are breaking stuffs, you are not moving fast enough. "
"Neither the life of an individual nor the history of a society can be understood without understanding both." - C. Wright Mills
"A match is won by good offensive. A championship is won by good defensive" - Jan Molby comments Liverpool FC vs Sivilla - CL
"A match is won with a good offensive. A championship is won with a good defensive" - Jan Molby comments Liverpool FC vs SIvilla CL
"... even if some splendid theory never has any practical use, it remains of value on its own account; for the understanding of the world is one of the ultimate goods." - Bertrand Russell
"Be someone"s Sunday, not Saturday night."
"Opportunities lies in the place where the complaints are" - Jack Ma
"By connecting your inner child to your internal being, you bring out the hero in you that is inside all of us." - Kim Ha Campbell
"We were together. I forget the rest." -Walt Whitman
"The question of whether Machines Can Think...is about as relevant as question of whether Submarines Can Swim."-Edsger Djkstra
" If the only thing keeping a person decent is the expectation of divine reward.. then brother, that person is a piece of shit! " - Rust Cohle [True Detective]
"Many an opportunity is lost because a man is out looking for four-leaf clovers." Author Unknown
"It's better to ask some of the questions than to know all the answers." James Thurber
"The Best Brains Of The Nation May Be Found On The LAST BENCHES Of The Class Room" - Dr. A. P. J. Abdul Kalam (Late Former President of India)
"Sometimes it takes a good fall to really know where you stand."
"Be humble be hungry and be the hardest worker in the room" - The Rock
"It"s not what you look at that matters, it"s what you see."Henry Davis Thoreau
"Accept responsibility for your life. Know that it is you who will get you where you want to go, no one else."-Les Brown
"Las mentiras son necesarias cuando la verdad es muy difcil de creer." Pablo Escobar
"Don"t limit a child to your own learning, for he was born in another time." Rabindranath Tagore
"You will never be happy if you continue to search for what happiness consists of. You will never live if you are looking for the meaning of life." - Albert Camus
"Nothing in nature blooms all year, be patient with yourself."
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says "I"m possible"!"-Audrey Hepburn
"If You Don't Fight For What You Want, Then Don't Cry For What You Lost." - Lord Krishna in Bhagvad Gita.
"Don't come to me with problems. Come to me with solutions"
" Yesterday I was Clever, So I wanted to Change the World. Today I am Wise So I am Changing Myself " - Rumi
"I am not discouraged, because every wrong attempt discarded is another step forward." -Thomas Edison
"Life is like an onion: You peel it off one layer at a time, and sometimes you weep."-Carl Sandburg
"Anything essential is invisible to the eyes." - Saint Exupery, The Little Prince
"Failures Defeat Losers, But It Inspire Winners" - Unknown
"Cleopatra"s nose: Had it been shorter, the whole aspect of the world would have changed" - Blaise Pascal
"what matters most is how well you walk through the fire"- Charles Bukowski
"Life is really simple, but we insist on making it complicated."Confucius
"Choosing love over hatedoesn't blind you to the deeds of those who do wrong, it provides you clearer vision to combat those who do wrong."-Donnie Wahlberg
"I was on my third or fourth lifetime when you were born."  Unknown
"Each night I close my eyes another day away from youth; away from dreams I held and love I had. Some nights I think of death but she never comes. And so I wake up to a new day and simply start again - knowing these demons to still be true yet believing that somehow they're not." - Unknown
"Do something be something, do nothing be nothing."
"If you want to be happy, set a goal that commands your thoughts, liberates your energy, and inspires your hopes." Andrew Carnegie
"What do you do in the face of fear?" - Bulldog Drummond #UncommonQuestions
"Leaders are made, not born" -John Foster
"Failure is the condiment that gives success its flavor." - Truman Capote
"I can climb high in my heels." - My Mom; in reference to her succeeding so much at her job despite sexism induced hindrances.
"Anyway that's the iPhone X. We only made 10 of them, and we've hidden them somewhere inside this theater. Good luck!"
"We continue to make more money when snoring than when active." - Warren Buffett
"I'm a problem solver. I love people. The more complicated they are, the more I get into them, and I just want to understand what makes them tick." - Paul Walker
"The BEACH Success System is a process to be used over and over again. It"s not a one-time exercise." - Kim Ha Campbell
"If we would only give, just once, the same amount of reflection to what we want to get out of life that we give to the question of what to do with a two weeks' vacation, we would be startled at our false standards and the aimless procession of our busy days." -Dorothy Canfield Fisher
"[We] are blushing with pride for being the standout guinea pigs in nature's laboratory" - Thomas Ligotti
"If you focus on results, you will never change. If you focus on change, you will get results." -Jack Dixon
"Donald Trump is the Bobby Brown of Presidents." -Wanda Sykes
"To know your enemy is a good thing. To know yourself, better." -Jacob Heinrichs
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"We must let go of the life we have planned, so as to accept the one that is waiting for us."- Joseph Campbell
"At first people refuse to believe that a strange new thing can be done, then they begin to hope it can be done, then they see it can be done--then it is done and all the world wonders why it was not done centuries ago. "- Frances Hodgson Burnett, The Secret Garden
"If You're Born In September It's Pretty Safe To Assume Your Parents Started Their New Year With A Bang!" - Unnamed Legend
"If i ever let my head down it will be just to admire my shoes."  Author Unknown
"Sight is a faculty. Seeing is an art."
"Get honest with people about who you are, what you want, and how you expect to be treated. Standards only scare off the people not meant for you."
"You either hate losing bad enough to change or you hate changing bad enough to lose."  Orrin Woodward
"You were gold, but if she wanted silver, then thats ok."
"Pray to God, fine; but keep rowing to shore." - Russian Proverb
"A critic is a man who knows the way, but can't drive the car." - Kenneth Tynan
"Just pretend you are happy, and eventually you"ll forget you"re pretending." - Bojack Horseman
"Quotable" - Chrome Extension that displays a random quote from your collection in each new tab.
"My argument against God was that the universe seemed so cruel and unjust. But how had I got this idea of just and unjust? A man does not call a line crooked unless he has some idea of a straight line. What was I comparing this universe with when I called it unjust?" -C.S. Lewis
[request] a specific Francois Truffaut (I think) quote.
"There is a life and there is a death, and there are beauty and melancholy between." - Albert Camus
"When one has nothing to lose, one becomes courageous. We are timid only when there is something we can still cling to".
"You are a human with one life and it is up to you to make it the best life you can."  Dan Howell
"Killing is killing whether done for duty, profit, or fun. Men murdered themselves into this democracy." - Richard Ramirez
"The lover of inquiry must follow his beloved wherever it may lead him." -Plato
"One of the definitions of sanity is the ability to tell real from unreal. Soon we'll need a new definition." - Alvin Toffler
"It is difficult to get a man to understand something when his salary depends on his not understanding it." Upton Sinclair
"It is only the constant exertion and working of our sensitive, intellectual, moral, and physical machinery that keep us from rusting." Charles Simmons
"When your laboratory explodes, lacing your body with a supercharged elixir, what do you do? You don't just lie there. You crawl out of the rubble, hideously scarred, and swear vengeance on the world. You keep going. You keep trying to take over the world." Soon I Will Be Invincible
"Lose Lips Sink Ships" - WWll Propaganda Poster
90 Cute I Miss You Quotes about Imply That You Miss Someone - Statree
"Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent. Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent. Is he both able and willing? Then whence cometh evil? Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God?" -Epicurus
"If not for Osama bin Laden, September 11 would only be remembered as Bear Bryant's birthday." - Fred Thompson as DA Arthur Branch on "Law And Order"
"Sometimes Bad Decision Make Great Stories."
"I didn"t realize it, but the days came along one after another, and then two years were gone, and everything was gone, and I was gone." F. Scott Fitzgerald
"The ink of the scholar is more sacred than the blood of the martyr" - Islamic Proverb
"People fear they merely will be sent to hell, not considering they might make it for themselves."
"Things change. And friends leave. Life doesn't stop for anybody." - Stephen Chbosky, The Perks of Being a Wallflower
"Believe nothing you hear, and only one half that you see." - Edgar Allan Poe
"We all live under the same sky, but we don"t all have the same horizon."  Konrad Adenauer
"Music is the invisible string that can connect one heart to another"
"Physical fitness is not only one of the most important keys to a healthy body, it is the basis of dynamic and creative intellectual activity. " - John F. Kennedy
"Every dream begins with a dreamer. Always remember, you have within you the strength, the patience, and the passion to reach for the stars to change the world." Unknown
"Although I cannot move, in my mind I am free." - Stephen Hawking
"These mountains that you are carrying, you were only supposed to climb."  Najwa Zebian
"I have never made but one prayer to God, a very short one: Oh Lord, make my enemies ridiculous. And God granted it." - Voltaire
"I already worked hard enough to like myself, I won't do that again just for other people to like me. " -anonymus
"IT IS NOT THE STRONG THAT WIN. IT IS THOSE WHO WIN THAT ARE STRONG." - Palkia, pmd 2
"The dark does not destroy the light; it defines it." - Bren Brown
"I think perfection is ugly. Somewhere in the things humans make, I want to see scars, failure, disorder, distortion." - Yohji Yamamoto
"Treat the world like a head." - Karl Pilkington
"If you want to kill the devil, draw a map to heaven and keep a close eye on the people who start acting shifty." - Real Guyman
"I don't wish to deny them the sunshine, I just want to be there with them." - My mum
"A lot of times you see some things online, that are not fully what they seemed to be. Not because someone is trying to fool you. Its just because its not what you expect it to be." - The "Best Weatherman Ever" Alan Sealls, Sept 9, 2017
"I am just a human being trying to make it in a world that is rapidly losing its understanding of being human"-John Trudell
"World Domination is such an ugly phrase, I prefer World Optimisation." - HJPEV
"What are you doing?" "Just rapping and being sad." - Me in response to my mother
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"A life. A life, Jimmy, you know what that is? It"s the shit that happens while you"re waiting for moments that never come." - Lester Freamon [WIRE]
"The "paradox" is only a conflict between reality and your feeling of what reality "ought to be" - Richard Feynman
"It"s nothing to do with sex; it"s an interest in cartoon animals," - A Furry.
"Florida is currently undergoing the largest evacuation in United States history. Millions of people are fleeing Hurricane Irma, the most powerful storm to ever make landfall in North America. Now imagine if no other state would take them in..."-Jeremy McLellan
"We live in a world where a cunt has more fans than a scholar." - M.F. Moonzajer
"... In the midst of death life persists, in the midst of untruth truth persists, in the midst of darkness light persists." - Mahatma Gandhi
"You didn't stop being a kid all at once, with a big explosive bang. The kid in you just leaked out, like the air of a tire." - Stephen King
"I was in a hurry, for despite everything I couldn"t rid myself of the feeling that I was mortal." -Isaac Asimov
"Death in college is just like sex. You wouldn't believe how many times it almost happened" -Dead like me(?)
"When the last tree is cut, the last fish is caught, and the last river is polluted; when to breathe the air is sickening, you will realize, too late, that wealth is not in bank accounts and that you can"t eat money." - Alanis Obomsawin
"The quality of your day is largely determined by the attitude you have towards the things you can't control." - u/bwalidou28
.same the not are fun and Love -Joe Hill, NOS4A2
"If you want to lift yourself up, lift up someone else. Booker T. Washington"
"Humor is the instinct for taking pain playfully." - Max Eastman
"Cowards die many times before their actual deaths." - Julius Caesar
"The true teacher defends his pupils against his own personal influence. He inspires self-distrust. He guides their eyes from himself to the spirit that quickens him. He will have no disciple." -A. Bronson Alcott
"Give a guy a big nose and some weird hair and he"s capable of anything." - Frank Zappa
"Forget the dragon, leave the gun on the table, this has nothing to do with happiness"
"When Life Changes And Becomes Harder, Change Yourself To Become Stronger"
"I have found... a lot of hopefulness where a lot of people... want what you want: clean water, a day without conflict, basically a fist full of fifties and a day without fear." - Henry Rollins speaking about Iran when asked about the country that gave him hope for the future of civilization.
"The ability to differentiate between life challenges and who you are at the core is everything. A failed business, relationship or dream doesn"t make you a failure as a person." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Love is never security. Love is a state in which there is no desire to be secure, it is a state of vulnerability." - Jiddu Krishnamurti
"Be like a duck. Remain calm on the surface and paddle like crazy underneath" - Micheal Caine
"When I was 5 years old, my mother always told me that happiness was the key to life. When I went to school, they asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up. I wrote down "happy". They told me I didn"t understand the assignment, and I told them they didn"t understand life." - John Lennon
"My point, once again, is not that those ancient people told literal stories and we are now smart enough to take them symbolically, but that they told them symbolically and we are now dumb enough to take them literally." - John Dominic Crossan
"Tis so much to be a king, that he only is so by being so."  Michel de Montaigne
"The greatest crimes in the world are not committed by people breaking the rules but by the people following the rules" - Banksy
"But who prays for Satan..." - Mark Twain
"If you focus on results, you will never change. If you focus on change, you will get results." -Jack Dixon
"How frail the human heart must be... A mirrored pool of thoughts..." - Sylvia Plath
"Stupidity is not the lack of knowledge, but the illusion of having it." - Grigore Iulian
"Laziness is nothing more than the habit of resting before you get tired." Jules Renard
"All the so-called "secrets of success" will not work unless you do." Author Unknown
"The drummer's main function is to exert enough energy and enthusiasm on the rest of the band to force them to play over their heads." - Buddy Rich
"That person then, whoever it may be, whose mind is quiet through consistency and self-control, who finds contentment in himself, who neither breaks down in adversity nor crumbles in fright, nor burns with any thirsty need nor dissolves into wild and futile excitement, that person is ..."
"Why am I hoping to live every time i pray for dying"
"It is our attitude at the beginning of a difficult task which, more than anything else, will affect its successful outcome." - William James
"You must live in the present, launch yourself on every wave, find your eternity in each moment." (-Henry David Thoreau)
''In a society that has destroyed all adventure, the only adventure left is to destroy that society.'' - Unknown
"Before you embark on a journey of revenge, dig two graves." - Confucius
"Every end has a new beginning!!!" - Vaibhav More
"The process of acceptance is to train your mind to focus on what you have." - Kim Ha Campbell
"My barn having burned to the ground. I can now see the moon"
"Morality is the best of all devices for leading mankind by the nose." -- Friedrich Nietzsche
"Creativity is intelligence having fun."  Albert Einstein
"Our true mentor in life is science." - Mustafa Kemal Ataturk, founder of Turkey
"Lack of direction, not lack of time, is the problem. We all have twenty-four hour days." (-Zig Ziglar)
"It is what it is. It was what it was. It will be what it will be. Don't stress it." - Dulce Ruby
'Infatuation is fleeting while love is an unwavering conviction'
"Beauty is how you feel inside, and it reflects in your eyes. It is not something physical."  Sophia Loren
"If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you erase yourself" - Louis C.K.
"From a certain point onward there is no longer any turning back. That is the point that must be reached." -Kafka
"If the door doesn't open , it's not your door"
"Success is not permanent, same in case of failure" keep trying
"Make mistakes of ambition and not mistakes of sloth. Develop the strength to do bold things, not the strength to suffer." Niccol Machiavelli
"Have you ever become friends with someone and then you get to know them and it's like - No Wait - I really don't like you after all. Can we stop this friendship thing?" -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"If you want to be loved, love." Seneca
"If the full moon loves you, why worry about the stars?" Tunisian Proverb
"With great power comes great electricity bill" Unknown author
"I have learned to seek my happiness by limiting my desires, rather than in attempting to satisfy them"  John Stuart Mill
" It is my belief that everything that occurs in life - both good and bad - should be used to forge oneself, to better oneself "
"Some people masturbate to temporarily replace their partners when they are absent, whereas some people masturbate to temporarily live in the present." - Mokokoma Mokhonoana
"[Life]... had only been the cover and the title page: now at last [in death] they were beginning Chapter One of the Great Story which no one on earth has read: which goes on for ever: in which every chapter is better than the one before." -C.S. Lewis
"There are seven days in a week and someday isn't one of them." - Shaquille O'Neal
"Don't Think About What Can Happen In A Week, A Month, Or A Year. Focus On The 24 hours in front of you, and do what you can to get closer to where you want to be." - Eric Thomas
"We are all a little broken. But last time I checked, broken crayons still color the same. "-Trent Shelton
"Rejection doesn"t mean you aren"t good enough; it means the other person failed to notice what you have to offer." - Mark Amend
"Whoever is trying to bring you down is already below you"
"On Being Idle"
"I trust everything people communicate, except their words." - Rachel Wolchin
"I love sleep. My life has the tendency to fall apart when I'm awake, you know?" - Ernest Hemingway
"Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more, so that we may fear less." Marie Curie
"Although it is not true that all conservatives are stupid people, it is true that most stupid people are conservative." - John Stuart Mill
"God is irrelevant. Whether God exists or not, we leave it to the theologians to discuss the question and thrash it out."
"If you aren't practicing what you preach, how can, and why should, anyone trust you?" - Kim Ha Campbell
"Love loves to love love" - James Joyce (Ulysses)
"Act as if what you do makes a difference. It does." - William James
"Every time you spend money you're casting a vote for the kind of world that you want"
"Two eyes, two ears, a chin, a mouth, 10 fingers, two nipples, a butt, two kneecaps, a penis. I have just described to you the Lochness Monster, and the reward for its captureall the riches in Scotland. So I have one question, why are you here?"
"It is error alone which needs the support of government. Truth can stand by itself." - Thomas Jefferson
"You treat your woman like a person, then a princess, then a goddess, and then a person again." - Shawn Spencer
"Don"t judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant." Robert Louis Stevenson
"Sometimes the very thing you"re hiding from the world might be the one thing that makes you exceptionally beautiful to a special someone." (-Bruce Bryans)
"Where you used to be, there is a hole in the world, which I find myself constantly walking around in the daytime, and falling in at night. I miss you like hell." - Edna St. Vincent Millay
"In this world of extremes, we can only love too little." (-Rich Cannarella)
"The wisest guru is your inner you." (-Karen Salmansohn)
"Is there no way out of the mind?" - Sylvia Plath
"The significant problems we face cannot be solved at the same level of thinking we were at when we created them" - Albert Einstein
"If you do for others what they can do for themselves, we take away their opportunity to learn and grow."
"It is far easier to see brave men die than to hear a coward beg for life."- Jack London, The Iron Heel
"A hungry stomach , an empty pocket and a broken heart can teach you the best lessons of life. "
"Pride is not the opposite of shame, but it's source. True humility is the only antidote to shame." -General Iroh
"Our lives are made up of choices. Big ones, small ones. It starts out so innocently, you don't even notice: go to this party or that movie, listen to this song, or read that book, and then, somehow, you've chosen your college and career; your boyfriend or wife." - Abigail Haas
"Skillful pilots gain their reputation from storms and tempests." Epictetus
"Nothing in the world can bother you as much as your own mind, I tell you. In fact, others seem to be bothering you, but it is not other, it is your own mind." - Sri Sri Ravi Shankar
"Good people are good because they"ve come to wisdom through failure." -William Saroyan
"We all in the same game just different levels. Dealing with the same hell just different devils." - Jadakiss (big dogg status)
"People are chasing cash, not happiness. When you chase money, you're going to lose. You're just going to. Even if you get the money, you're not going to be happy." -Gary Vaynerchuk
"You can be as mad as a mad dog at the way things went, you can curse the fates, but when it comes to the end, you have to let go." - Eric Roth
"Change your thoughts and you change your world." Norman Vincent Peale
"The secret to getting ahead is getting started." -Mark Twain
"Believe you can and you're halfway there" -Theodore Roosevelt
"Well begun is half done" -Aristotle
"If you obey the rules you miss all the fun." -Katharine Hepburn
"Stop all the moaning and bemoaning of fate. God isn't listening or else it's too late."
"As one door closes, another opens. Opportunity awaits those who strive to achieve. Don't fail yourself. You and only you are what it takes to succeed." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Amazing, isn't it, how you can get hit squarely on the head with the clue-hammer, and walk away thinking only 'gee, I wonder why I have this headache.'" - /u/TooLateForMeTF
"I wanted to illuminate the whole earth. There is enough electricity to become a second sun. Light would appear around the equator, just like a ring around Saturn." -Nikola Tesla
"Call to me and I will answer you, and will tell you great and hidden things that you have not known." God, Jeremiah 33:3
"If you are not willing to risk the unusual, you will have to settle for the ordinary." - Jim Rohn
"When the world says, 'Give up', Hope whispers, 'Try it one more time'." Author Unknown
"It's not development if a cannibal starts using a fork" - Stainslaw J. Lec
"if you feel happy, Smile with all your heart. if you're down, smile with all your might."-Paul Guillermo
"I desire the things which will destroy me in the end" - Sylvia Plath
"In matters of style, swim with the current; in matters of principle, stand like a rock." - Thomas Jefferson
"If you haven"t thought about quitting even once when working on your business, that business is not your real passion." - Kim Ha Campbell
"A surplus of effort could overcome a deficit of confidence" - Sonia Sotomayor
"If Opportunity Doesn't Knock, Build A Door" -Milton Berle
"If you haven"t though about quitting even once when working on your business, that business is not your real passion." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Don't believe everything you think... "
"Logic will take you from A to B. Imagination will take you everywhere." - Albert Einstein
"The stock market is filled with individuals who know the price of everything, but the value of nothing." - Phillip Fisher
"What you have become, is the price you paid to be what you used to want." - Mignon McLaughlin
"It's Not How We Make Mistakes, But How We Correct Them That Defines Us" - Rachel Wolchin
"A man in love is incomplete until he has married. Then he's finished."
"If only, if only, the moon speaks no reply; Reflecting the sun and all that's gone by. Be strong my weary wolf, turn around boldly. Fly high, my baby bird, My angel, my only" - Louis Sachar
" 'If only, if only,' the woodpecker sighs, 'The bark on the tree was as soft as the skies.' While the wolf waits below, hungry and lonely, crying to the mo-oo-on, 'If only, if only.' " - Louis Sachar
"When the apocalypse happens and the population is all but wiped out they will use the sperm in my hair to repopulate the world."  Michelle
"An answer that was right the first time may not be right again the second."  Italo Calvino
"If you make friends with yourself you will never be alone."  Maxwell Maltz
"He had to learn to lose. That was the price of success."-Colum McCann, Let the Great World Spin
"Don't waste your time trying to get people to love you. Spend your time with those who already do."- Anonymous
"That's all history is, after all: scar tissue." - Stephen King
"Twenty-five of us gathered together and said we should rape 10 women each, and we did it," he said. "I've raped 53 women. And children of five or six years old.
"The creative adult is the child who survived." Ursula K. Le Guin
"Outside of a dog, a book is man's best friend. Inside of a dog it's too dark to read." - Groucho Marx
"You see the big fur covered mass in between the head and tail of the badger? That's pure muscle. See those feet it's got? Attached to those are opposable claws 4 inches long. Think of a moving, angry bear trap with one of the more clever mammalian brains and a penchant for joyous violence.(cont.)"
"Rape worse at start but only when the willy goes in. After the woman relaxes you can enjoy it like normal intercourse" -Abid Jee, Muslim cultural mediator for migrants
"I shit enough each day to fertilize a farm" - My coworker who spends more time in the washroom than at work.
"Find someone you can build with, not just chill with." unknown
"The bravest men in war are not the first to charge the enemy line but those who charge in after the first wave over the bodies of their dead brothers into the enemy line" - Anonymous
"You may have to fight a battle more than once to win it." - Margaret Thatcher
"He." -Bernardo, Hamlet
"As long as we"re breathing, we have a chance to start over and build a stable future." - Kim Ha Campbell
"It is not your environment, it is you - the quality of your mind, the integrity of your soul, and the determination of your will that will decide your future and shape your life..." Benjamin Elijah Mays
"(T)he Government of the United States of America is not, in any sense, founded on the Christian religion." - George Washington
"Everything you have ever wanted is on the other side of fear"-George Addair
"We drink too much, smoke too much, spend too recklessly, laugh too little, drive too fast, get too angry, stay up too late, get up too tired, read too little, watch tv too much. We have multiplied our possessions but reduced our values. We talk too much, love too seldom, and hate too often..."
"Sometimes when you don't know what else to say, a simple 'thank you' will work." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Gods are fragile things; They can be killed by a whiff of science or a dose of common sense." - Richard Dawkins
"It's all about falling in love with yourself and sharing that love with someone who appreciates you, rather than looking for love to compensate for a self love deficit." -Eartha Kitt
"I had always hoped that this land might become a safe and agreeable asylum to the virtuous and persecuted part of mankind, to whatever nation they might belong." - George Washington
"It is said that all endings are merely beginnings, waiting to be born." -- Mata Nui
"If you point a gun at someone, you"d better make sure you shoot him. And if you shoot him, you"d better make sure he"s dead. Because if he isn"t then he"s gonna get up and try to kill you." - Coen Brothers
"Courage isn't the absence of fear, but an urgent impulse to do something despite fear." - Grant Cardone
"The purpose of life is to be defeated by greater and greater things." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"The wise man bowed his head solemnly and spoke: 'There's actually zero difference between good and bad things. You imbecile. You fucking moron'" -dril
"The only way to find true happiness is to risk being completely cut open." - Chuck Palahniuk, Invisible Monsters
"Backpacking is the art of knowing what NOT to take." - Sheridan Anderson
"We are all born to die - the difference is the intensity with which we choose to live." --- Gina Lollobrigida
"There was no difference between men, in intelligence or race, so profound as the difference between the sick and the well." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"You see everything when the world doesn't see you." -Larry from AHS: Hotel
"First, though, we must wake up to what our schools really are: laboratories of experimentation on young minds, drill centers for the habits and attitudes that corporate society demands..." - John Taylor Gatto
"The greatest service which can be rendered to any country, is to add a useful plant to it's culture." -- -Thomas Jefferson, 1800
"The greatest service which can be rendered to any culture, is to add a useful plant to it's culture." - Thomas Jefferson, 1800.
"extreme boredom provides its own antidote" - Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"A goal without a plan is only a wish." Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"The world is a dangerous place, not because of those who do evil, but because of those who look on and do nothing." - Albert Einstein
"If you're going through hell, keep going." - Winston Churchill
"No matter how strong you are, no matter how smart you are or tough you can be, the world will find a way to break you. And when it does, the only thing you can do is hold on." - Taylor Jenkins Reid
"The pursuit of transparency and connectivity in all aspects of existence, by destroying privacy, inhibits the development of personalities with the strength to take lonely decisions." - Henry Kissinger, World Order
"Many of us are guilty of not taking enough time to dial into our inner child's voice." - Kim Ha Campbell
"It is forbidden to kill; therefore all murderers are punished unless they kill in large numbers and to the sound of trumpets." -Voltaire
7 billion people, 14 billion faces.
"Freedom is not the absence of commitments, but the ability to choose - and commit myself to - what is best for me." - Paulo Coehlo, The Zahir
"But she did look back, and I love her for that, because it was so human. So she was turned to a pillar of salt. So it goes. People aren't supposed to look back. I'm certainly not going to do it anymore." -Kurt Vonnegut
"When you come to a fork in the road, take it." -Yogi Berra
"The object of life is not to be on the side of the majority, but to escape finding oneself in the ranks of the insane." - Marcus Aurelius
"Sometimes we give too much too soon. Sometimes we hold back for too long. This is our beautiful dance. Our imperfect dance. This is the dance that makes us human." (-Simon Sinek)
"...And there will be someone that comes along one day and offers you an entire galaxy when you only expected a single planet."
"You didn't want to be my friend in elementary school. You didn't want to be my friend in junior high school. And you certainly weren't my friend in high school. Why on Earth do you want to be my Facebook friend today?" -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"When a woman threatens to call the police or calls the police to make false allegations against you, she is attempting to rob you of your freedom, destroy your reputation, your career and interfere with other relationships. This is definitely a deal-breaker." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"'We're not handicapped. We're handicapable.' These poor people have been bullshitted by the system into believing that if you change the name of the condition somehow you"ll change the condition. Well, hey cousin  doesn"t happen!" - George Carlin
"There are people who have money and people who are rich."  Coco Chanel
"It is better to be lucky. But I would rather be exact. Then when luck comes you are ready." -Santiago, The Old Man and the Sea
'There were things Thor did when something went wrong. The first thing he did was ask himself if what had happened was Loki's fault... the next thing he did when something went wrong was go and ask Loki for advice.'
"Don't even trip dawg."-Rick
"We're all pretty bizarre. Some of us are just better at hiding it, that's all." - Andrew Clark
"When you tear out a man's tongue; you are not proving him a liar; you're only showing the world that you fear what he might say." -Tyrion Lannister
"You no faces no faces at all laughing at nothing- let me tell you I have drunk in skid row rooms with imbecile winos whose cause was better whose eyes still hold some light whose voices retained some sensibility, and when the morning came we were sick but not ill, poor but not deluded..."
"Choose life. Choose a job. Choose a career. Choose a family. Choose a fucking big television, choose washing machines, cars, compact disc players and electrical tin openers. Choose good health, low cholesterol , and dental insurance. Choose fixed interest mortgage repayments..."
"When relationships become a ledger of profit and loss, you have no friends, no loved ones, just pluses and minuses. You are absolutely alone." - John Teller (Sons of Anarchy)
"Exercise Makes You Look Better When Your Naked, But So Does Tequila... Your Choice." - Anonymous
"Wal-Mart has everything but a cashier." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"To be free is not merely to cast off one's chains, but to live in a way that respects and enhances the freedom of others." @NelsonMandela
''It's hard to love, even harder not to love, but the hardest thing is to find a loved one who loves you''. - Unknown
"Time flies. It's up to you to be the navigator." - Robert Orben
"When you're ugly and someone loves you, you know they love you for who you are. Beautiful people never know who to trust." - Drax the Destroyer
"Don't be afraid to give your best to what seemingly are small jobs. Every time you conquer one it makes you that much stronger. If you do the little jobs well, the big ones will tend to take care of themselves." Dale Carnegie
"How sad" she said softly. "Surely it is only with friends that one can be at peace." "It is easier with strangers for they touch your life but for an instant. You do not disappoint them, for you owe them nothing; neither do they expect anything. Friends you can hurt because they expect everything"
"Ladies and gentlemen, take my advice. Pull down your pants and slide on the ice." - Dr. Sidney Freedman [M*A*S*H].
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society" -Jiddu Krishnamurti
"if you like someone but can't remember the sound of there voice at the end of the day. You don't love them" -a thingy I made
"It is the brain, the little gray cells on which one must rely. One must seek the truth within--not without." - Poirot" - Agatha Christie
"But hey, when you live in Watts, you need a little smack to get by, you know what I mean? You need something soft and comfortable in your life, "cause you"re not going to get it from what"s around you. And society isn"t going to give it to you." -Jerry Garcia
"You know what the issue is with this world? Everyone wants a magical solution for their problems, and everyone refuses to believe in magic." - Alice in Wonderland
"No one can tell what goes on in between the person you were and the person you become. No one can chart that blue and lonely section of hell. There are no maps of the change. You just come out the other side... Or you don"t." - Stephen King
"Illusion is no longer possible, because the real is no longer possible."  Jean Baudrillard
"If money is your God, Who's your Devil? If everybody dies, what make you special?" -B.o.B.
"Virtual friends can be as real and unconditional as reality itself. Be careful for what you say on social media, though, as we live in a hypersensitive society. People are simply looking for a reason to be offended and make a huge deal about nothing." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"We've all done bad things. It doesn't mean we're bad people."
"Business opportunities are like buses, there's always another one coming" - Richard Branson -
"Flattery is a fine tuned song in the ears of those who crave attention" - Eric Nguemkam
"The goal is to move the thinking that we do every day to the feeling that we often ignore and don't pay attention to." - Kim Ha Campbell
"There is something at once sobering and absurd in the extent to which we are lifted by the attentions of others and sunk by their disregard"-Alain De Botton
"Life is just a game, just put your hands up and smile. And you will be the happiest one playing it." - Hicham Labidi
"Never judge teenagers, they're a work in progress." - Emily Eadie
"When gods are at war, salvation lies in the arts" - Alphonse Mucha, a Czech Art Nouveau painter who died after being targeted and interrogated by the Gestapo
"We are all atheists about most of the gods that humanity has ever believed in. Some of us just go one god further." - Richard Dawkins, The God Delusion.
"The worst thing about being lied to is simply knowing you weren't worth the truth."  Unknown
"From the first moment of life, men ought to begin learning to deserve to live." - Jean-Jacques Rousseau
"I'd rather be a could-be if I cannot be an are; because a could-be is a maybe who is reaching for a star. I'd rather be a has-been than a might-have been, by far. For a might-have been has never been, but a has was once an are." -Milton Berle
"The real self is something which is discovered in one's experiences, not something imposed upon it" - Carl Rogers
"You must even let your own experience tell you it's own meaning; the minute you tell it what it means, you are at war with yourself"
"People are not mirrors. They see you completely different than the way you see yourself."  Unknown
"Be mindful even if your mind is full"-De La Vega
"We are reflections of one another, walk with love"-mylittlenotes
"There is only one person who could ever make you happy, and that person is you." - David Burns
"Growth is painful. Change is painful. But nothing is as painful as staying stuck somewhere you don't belong." @MissMandyHale
"Only courage in the face of doubt can lead one to the answer." - Nyx Avatar
"The word onomatopoeia is onomatopoeia because it is derived from the sound the word makes when it is said." - Ken M
"Beliefs are our foundation and our guiding compass, navigating us through life." - Kim Ha Campbell
'Keep your face to the sunshine and you can never see the shadow.'- Helen Keller
"Don't sweat the petty things and don't pet the sweaty things." - George Carlin
"Most of us will die twice; Once when we take our last breath, and again when the world forgets our name." - T. Archman
"Finish every day and be done with it. You have done what you could; some blunders and absurdities no doubt crept in; forget them as soon as you can. Tomorrow is a new day; you shall begin it serenely and with too high a spirit to be encumbered with your old nonsense." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it." - George Santayana
"Social media allows one to be the person they aren't in real life. Given that opportunity, it never ceases to amaze me why so many choose to be stupid." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"It is not the consciousness of men that determines their being, but, on the contrary, their social being determines their consciousness." - Karl Marx
"There are people in this world that would rather see you miserable, than risk you being happy. Don't fall for their false sense of friendship. If saving yourself means walking away completely, do so while you can. It's just not worth the heartache and aggravation." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
" Where the head goes, the body follows. Perception precedes action. Right action follows the right perspective." (-Ryan Holiday)
"The trick is in what one emphasizes. We either make ourselves miserable, or we make ourselves happy. The amount of work is the same." - Carlos Castaneda
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap, but by the seeds you plant."  Robert Louis Stevenson
"America is not anything if it consists of each of us. It is something only if it consists of all of us." -Woodrow Wilson
"Hummingbirds are the sharks of the sky" - Jordan Maron 30/8/17
"Care about what other people think and you will always be their prisoner." Lao Tzu
"The pioneers of a warless world are the young men who refuse military service" - Albert Einstein.
"To travel is to discover that everyone is wrong about other countries." - Aldous Huxley
"A journey is best measured in friends, rather than miles."  Tim Cahill
"If our brains get too smart, they might become self aware and take over our bodies." - Ken M
"No parent should have to bury their child." -Lord of the Rings
"This money can't buy me a time machine.This money can't buy me another you"
"Thinking you're important - is good. Thinking you're more important than anyone else - is not. "It's also important, to know the difference.-Donnie Wahlberg
"The best cure for one's bad tendencies is to see them fully developed in another person."-Alain De Botton
"If you have your health these days you're a millionaire"-dad
"Don't search for defining moments because they will never come. The moments that define you have already happened. And they will already happen again." - Peter Dinklage
"The only people we can think of as normal are those we don't yet know very well."-Alain De Botton
"Thinking is difficult, that's why most people judge."-Carl Jung
"It's touching that almost everyone you meet, however outwardly accomplished, craves reassurance you like them and think they're doing OK."-Alain De Botton
"I would challenge you to a battle of wits, but I see you are unarmed!" - William Shakespeare
"Bad programmers worry about code. Good programmers worry about data structures and their relationships" - Linus Torvalds
"The closer one gets to the top, the more one finds there is no top." Nancy Barcus
"it's hard to save a stubborn captain who wants to go down with his ship"
"Abundance is more than your money, your title or your profession." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Let me never fall into the vulgar mistake of dreaming that I am persecuted whenever I am contradicted." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Be alone, that is the secret of invention; be alone, that is when ideas are born" - Nikola Tesla
"The inauthentic man does not recognize his self, he recognizes himself only by his dress; he recognizes that he has a self only by externals." -Kierkergaard
"Ignoring enough details life can appear completely periodic..and predictable"
"One can choose to go back toward safety or forward toward growth. Growth must be chosen again and again; fear must be overcome again and again." (-Abraham Maslow)
"Good things happen when you set your priorities straight." (-Scott Caan)
"Love is the great miracle cure. Loving ourselves works miracles in our lives." (-Louise Hay)
"If you think you can't blame anyone on anything then blame your parents for everything"
"SHE IS WATER. Powerful enough to drown you. Soft enough to cleanse you. Deep enough to save you."Adrian Michael
"At every moment of our lives, we all have one foot in a fairy tale and the other in the abyss"-Paulo Coelho
"There are those people in life that are better behind the scenes than seen or heard." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"All changes, even the most longed for, have their melancholy; for what we leave behind us is a part of ourselves; we must die to one life before we can enter another." - Anatole France
"Creativity is imagination guided by logic through memory"
"Reality is, you know, the tip of an iceberg of irrationality that we've managed to drag ourselves up onto for a few panting moments before we slip back into the sea of the unreal." - Terence McKenna
"False loyalty is worse than betrayal" - Me
"In The End We Only Regret The Chances We Didn't Take" - Lewis Carroll
"My heart is French but my ass is international" - Arletty
"You are entitled to your own opinion, but you are not entitled to your own facts."  Daniel Patrick Moynihan
"You can safely assume that you've created God in your image when it turns out that God hates all the same people you do." -- Anne Lamott
"What I want is to be needed. What I need is to be indispensable to somebody. Who I need is somebody that will eat up all my free time, my ego, my attention. Somebody addicted to me. A mutual addiction." - Chuck Palahniuk, Choke
"It's fine to fight for someone who loves you. It's a waste of time to fight for someone to love you" *-unknown*
"The best way out is always through."
'Begin with the end in mind' - Stephen Covey
"Real love doesn't meet you at your best. It meets you in your mess."  J.S. Park
"Being isolated at times doesn't always mean that you want to distance yourself from others; it simply means that you need some space to see things clearly." Wazim Shaw
"In any finite world if you keep retreating you will end up encircled"
"I've heard talk of false gods, and even false devils. This day calls for doubt of false nature, however. Trust not he who would rebuke you for extinguishing a musk fly without addressing the circumstances that allowed for musk flies." - Aeropus
"You can only conquer Rome when Caesar's not at home."
"Some people think it's an insult to the glory of their sickness to get well. But the time poultice is no respecter of glories. Everyone gets well if he waits around." - John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"It's so hard when I have to, and so easy when I want to." Annie Gottlier
"To have success, you can't let failure stop you. To have great success, you can't let success stop you." Robert Brault
"While there is a lower class, I am in it, while there is a criminal element, I am of it, and while there is a soul in prison, I am not free." -- Eugene V. Debs, in trial for being against WWI
"I want to grasp things with the mind the way the penis is grasped by the vagina." On infrathin in art, Marcel Duchamp to Lawrence Steefel, first quoted in Steefel's 1960's Princeton doctoral dissertation, then in Learning Mind - Experience into Art edited by M.J. Jacob &amp; J. Baas, 2009, page 3.
"'We tend to become like the worst in those we oppose.' - Bene Gesserit Coda" Frank Herbert, Chapterhouse Dune 1986
"The sooner we accept the situation, the sooner we can work on course-correction." - Kim Ha Campbell
"I have learned all kinds of things from my many mistakes. The one thing I never learn is to stop making them." -Nicomo Cosca
"I knew who I was when I woke up this morning, but I must have changed several times since then." The Madhatter in Alice and Wonderland by Lewis Carrol
"In spite of everything I shall rise again: I will take up my pencil, which I have forsaken in my great discouragement, and I will go on with my drawing." -Vincent van Gogh
"A single loyal friend is worth more than a house full of pesky relatives." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Knowledge is knowing that a tomato is a fruit, wisdom is not putting it in a fruit salad" - Miles Kington
"I prefer to hate and remember than forgive and forget." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
" If men could only know each other, they would neither idolize nor hate." -Elbert Hubbard
"Try your best these days to tell people just what you think. You never know when they walk out of a room if it's going to be the last time you see them."
"Life is what happens to you while you're busy making other plans." - Allen Saunders
"Sometimes I wonder whether the world is being run by smart people who are putting us on or by imbeciles who really mean it." - unknown source
"I have heard there are troubles of more than one kind. Some come from ahead and some come from behind. But I've bought a big bat. I'm all ready you see. Now my troubles are going to have troubles with me!" Dr. Seuss
"Neither fire nor wind, birth nor death can erase our good deeds." Buddha.
"Inside each and every one of us is one true authentic swing, something we was born with, something that's ours and ours alone, something that can't be taught to ya or learned, something that got to be remembered." - Bagger Vance
"For my part I deem those blessed to whom, by favour of the gods, it has been granted either to do what is worth writing of, or to write what is worth reading..." -Pliny The Younger, Roman Magistrate
"There is virtue in work and there is virtue in rest. Use both and overlook neither." Alan Cohen
"To love or have loved, that is enough. Ask nothing more."  Les Misrables
"Tell people there's and invisible man in the sky who created the universe, and a vast majority will believe you. Tell them the paint is wet, and they have to touch it to be sure". - George Carlin
"Great things are done by a series of small things brought together." Vincent Van Gogh
"I didn"t come this far, only to come this far."
"Eighty percent of success is showing up." Woody Allen
"If it doesn"t challenge you, it doesn"t change you."
"Nature did not care. To life she set one task, gave one law. To perpetuate was the task of life, its law was death." Jack London - The Law of Life
"What we do now echoes in eternity." - Marcus Aurelius, Roman Emperor and Philosopher
"This is the paradox: man is out of nature and hopelessly in it; he is dual, up in the stars and yet housed in a heart-pumping, breath-gasping body that once belonged to a fish and still carries the gill-marks to prove it." -Ernest Becker
"Take the opportunity to learn from your mistakes: Find the cause of your problem and eliminate it. Don't try to be perfect; just be an excellent example of being human." - Anthony Robbins
"We fight for men and women whose poetry is not yet written but which will presently be as enviable and as renowned as any." - Robert Gould Shaw
"Skepticism and worrying about what others think kill more dreams and aspirations than failure ever will. Worry not of others as it is your life to live." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"If you're successful in life, you will win false friends and make true enemies. Succeed anyway, for they will lose in the long run." -- William E. Lewis Jr.
"Doubt kills more dreams than failure ever will." - Suzy Kassem
"all that is necessary for the triumph of evil is that good men do nothing. " Edmund Burke said
"Nature did not care. To life she set one task, gave one law... Jack London
"We boil at different degrees." - Clint Eastwood
'Existence is a series of footnotes to a vast, obscure, unfinished masterpiece' - Vladimir Nabokov
"And as we let our own light shine we unconsciously give other people permission to do the same. As we are liberated from our own fear, our presence automatically liberates others." - Marianne Williamson
"Does growing up just change your body, or also your soul?" - Beemo, Adventure Time
"What better way to hide the truth than in the mouth of a lier" - DefinitelyTrollin
"Act as if what you do makes a difference. It does." William James
"Wealth is the ability to fully experience life."  Henry David Thoreau
"Imagine Your Life Is Perfect In Every Respect; What Would It Look Like?" Brian Tracy
"Both [music and gymnastic] have in view chiefly the improvement of the soul." - Plato
"Revolutions, like trees, must be judged by their fruit." -- Ignazio Silone
"By forgiving others, you consciously cut ties with the negative energies that are binding you." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Dream big and dare to fail. Norman Vaughan"
"The very essence of instinct is that it's followed independently of reason." - Charles Darwin
"Pride is not the opposite of shame, but its source. True humility is the only antidote to shame." -- Uncle Iroh
"You don't grab power. You accumulate it, quietly, without anyone noticing" - Grand Nagus Zek
"Personally, I always find my comments and observations most interesting. You haven"t truly lived until you have seen the world through the eyes of madness." -- Vezon
"You work so you can live, you don't live so you can work"
"If you have a problem with me, chances are you'll get over it. If not, it's time to move on. I'm not changing for you." -- Bill Lewis
"As a child I assumed that when I reached adulthood, I would have grown-up thoughts." David Sedaris
"A man talking sense to himself is no madder than a man talking nonsense, not to himself."
"Ain't no thing but a chicken sandwich"
"Just because they say they're praying for you in your face, doesn't mean they aren't laughing at your struggle behind your back". Trent Shelton
"Don't bite the hand that feeds you".
"Wrap it before you tap it" -Benjamin Franklin
"Stars can't shine without darkness. " - D.H. Sidebottom, Fragile Truths
"Life Is Short. Smile While You Still Have Teeth" - Mallory Hopkins
"The greatest prison people live in is the fear of what other people think." - David Icke
"At some point you have to realise that some people can stay in your heart, but not in your life".
"If you wanna hire great people and have them stay working for you, you have to let them make a lot of decisions and you have to be run by ideas not hierarchy. The best ideas have to win, otherwise good people don't stay." - Steve Jobs
"Words can be like X-rays if you use them properly -- they"ll go through anything. You read and you"re pierced." - Aldous Huxley, Brave New World
"There really is only one essential ingredient to fascism- it's victimhood" -Imperium (2016)
"We do not need magic to transform our world. We carry all of the power we need inside ourselves already." - JK Rowling
"... there's nothing of importance in life-except how well you do your work. Nothing. Only that. Whatever else you are, will come from that. It's the only measure of human value." - Ayn Rand
"You know you have made a theoretical advance when you can no longer reconstruct why you failed for so long to see the obvious." - Daniel Kahneman
"War must be..." J.R.R. Tolkien
"It is one thing to make money and another thing to keep it. In fact, making money is often easier than keeping it."- Bernard Baruch
"Just because someone regrets something doesn't mean they've changed."
"If we cannot now end our differences, then at least we can make the world safe for diversity." -John F. Kennedy
"Always look ahead and above yourself. Always try to improve on yourself. Always strive to elevate your craft"- Jiro Ono
"People do not die from suicide; they die from sadness."  Unknown
"May not be your apartment, but something in your life needs straightening up. You think you've got nothing that needs cleaning, be careful, because that means it's everything."  Coda, The Beginner's Guide
"The day the child realizes that all adults are imperfect, he becomes an adolescent; the day he forgives them, he becomes an adult; the day he forgives himself, he becomes wise."  Alden Nowlan
"True wisdom begins when we accept things as they are." (-Legend of Korra)
"Change can be good or bad, depending on your point of view." (-Legend of Korra)
'If you're not outraged, you're not paying attention.' - Heather Heyer (2017)
"Common sense is the least common of all senses" -Unknown
"16 Whatever the mind of man can conceive and believe, it can achieve. Napoleon Hill"
"I believe in Karma. If the good is sown, the good is collected. When positive things are made, that returns well ". 
"Most people want to see you to do better, but not doing better than them". London Mond
"Social media allows one to be the person they aren't in real life. Given that opportunity, it never ceases to amaze me why so many choose to be stupid." -- Bill Lewis
"To heal a wound you need to stop touching it." - Author Unknown
"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude. Don't complain." Maya Angelou
...the kingdom of Kharizm, or more appropriately the Kleptarchy or Kleptocracy of the Turkmans... -Frederic J. Goldsmid
"If we did all the things we are capable of, we would literally astound ourselves." Thomas A. Edison
"We never taste happiness in perfection, our most fortunate successes are mixed with sadness." Pierre Corneille
"Absorb what is useful, Discard what is not, Add what is uniquely your own."  Bruce Lee
"Realize your dreams and live, not your fears. Life's too short to worry about the opinion of others." -- Bill Lewis
"Actions have consequences. Being ignorant or stupid doesn't excuse responsibility for your actions and they may have a lasting impact on the rest of your life." -- Bill Lewis
"And a mistake repeated more than once is a decision." - Paulo Coelho
"Common sense is a flower that doesn't grow in everyone's garden." - Author Unknown
"A man's face is his autobiography. A woman's face is her work of fiction." - Oscar Wilde
"Your woman stopped complaining and she"s all glowing and looks good? Congratulations! Now she"s not your woman any more".
"Never make a woman you love cry, it will be painful to see another man wipe her tears".
"Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see".
"To expect the unexpected shows a thoroughly modern intellect." - Oscar Wilde
"A world is enough for a wise" - Melania Trump
"The more social media we have, the more we think we're connecting, yet we are really disconnecting from each other". JR
"Being a smart person it means to know things; It means to learn from your mistakes." - Ben Ukhanov
"I was born to make mistakes, not to fake perfection" - Drake
"When you have to make a choice and don"t make it, that is in itself a choice." -William James
"Our complaint is against what will be done this year, not what was done between 1861 and 1865." - Benjamin Harrison
"I guess she's my cousin, but she needs some sweet lovin anyway" - Dead South
"As a housewife, I feel that if the kids are still alive when my husband gets home from work, then hey, I've done my job". Roseanne Barr
"Beware that, when fighting monsters, you yourself do not become a monster... for when you gaze long into the abyss. The abyss gazes also into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The only joy in the world is to begin. It is good to be alive because living is beginning, always, every moment."  Cesare Pavese
"Men always want to be a woman's first love, women like to be a man's last romance." -Oscar Wilde
"Normal is an illusion. What is normal for the spider is chaos for the fly." - Charles Addams
A woman is like a tea bag - you can't tell how strong she is until you put her in hot water. Eleanor Roosevelt
Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live. Norman Cousins
"Actions have consequences. Being ignorant or stupid doesn't excuse responsibility for your actions and they may have a lasting impact on the rest of your life." -- Bill Lewis
"There is no terror in the bang, only in the anticipation of it" Alfred Hitchcock
"If you wish death or violence against one group of people, don't be surprised or triggered when they throw the same words back at you. Only common sense can stop this cycle."
"Life is what happens to you while you"re busy making other plans. John Lennon"
"You Are Confined Only By The Walls You Build Yourself" - Andrew Murphy
"When someone smells so bad you want to smack them with a bar of soap and a fire hose! That"s happening."  Found on Twitter (@RichHenson13)
"Decide that you want it more than you are afraid of it." Unknown
"There are two great days in a person's life - the day we are born and the day we discover why". William Barclay
"What you get by achieving your goals is not as important as what you become by achieving your goals.'  Henry David Thoreau
"What is today, but yesterday's tomorrow?" -Mr. Krabs
"What is today, but yesterday's tomorrow?"
"Should they be allowed to win merely because of the gifts God gave them? Well I say, cheating is the gift man gives himself." -Charles Montgomery Burns
"The darker your past, the stronger your redemption. Believe not in others, but yourself." -- Bill Lewis
"Close the door behind you and rid yourself of profound distraction. Lifelong happiness is dependent on it." -- Bill Lewis
"If there were a day to put all of my eggs into one basket, that day would be Easter." -- Bill Lewis
"I regret being nice and giving my time, effort and energy to the unappreciative. I'm not here to conform or apologize to get along. Unworthy people and causes are no longer a priority in my life." -- Bill Lewis
"Rumor is not fact, it is innuendo. Heard not from my tongue, it did not occur." -- Bill Lewis
"When one door closes, don't always wish for another to open. Sometimes you want to get nails and a hammer to make sure it stays shut." -- Bill Lewis
"It's the small details that make up the big picture." -- Bill Lewis
"As oil will rise above water, the truth will set you free against all evil." -- Bill Lewis
"Actions always prove why your words mean absolutely nothing to me." -- Bill Lewis
"It's hard to learn from your mistakes without consequences." -- Bill Lewis
"Close the door behind you and rid yourself of misery and profound distraction. Lifelong happiness is dependent on it." -- Bill Lewis
"Don't confuse civility with weakness. It takes a great deal of determination, strength and wisdom to treat another with courtesy and respect while they treat you with arrogance, disrespect and scorn." -- Bill Lewis
"Don't throw money at the problem - walk away from it. You'll be wealthier from it down the road." -- Bill Lewis
"The way I look at it - you have two lives. The one you're born into - the other you make for yourself." -- Bill Lewis
"Respect - its all about respect. Absent respect, you have nothing." -- Bill Lewis
"Your outlook on life depends on how you perceive it and those around you." -- Bill Lewis
"Being single is not just a social media status. It's a lifestyle that best describes a person who is smart enough to enjoy life without depending on others." -- Bill Lewis
"When everything else is gone, balls are all any of us really have left. The question is: Are your's made of flesh and blood, or steel?"
"There are fears that are worth facing and there are fears that are not. You don't have to face all fears, only the ones that are relevant to you at that moment in time." - Kim Ha Campbell
"Good things come to people who wait, but better things come to those who go out and get them." Anonymous
"To live a creative life, we must lose our fear of being wrong." Anonymous
"You cannot shake hands with a clenched fist" - Indira Gandhi
"The heart is a muscle like any other and the best exercise you can do for it is called picking yourself up off the floor." (-Iain Thomas)
"One of the reasons that knowledge is in a state of useless overproduction is that..." [continued inside]
"There is nothing either good or bad but thinking makes it so." (-Shakespeare)
"Necessity may be the mother of invention but is also the father of crime" - Napoleon Hill
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"If it's yours, it will be yours no matter what happens. Be yourself, love your life, and good things will come. Don't be upset! Don't be jealous! Be kind and you will get what you are deserved!
"If it's yours, it will be yours no matter what happens. Be yourself, love your life, and good things will come!"
"I'm always soft for you, that's the problem. You could come knocking on my door five years from now and I would open my arms wider and say 'come here, it's been too long, it felt like home with you." Azra T.
"You say, 'Something's wrong. I can tell. What is it? 'And he'll look amazed and say,' How did you know? '' He does not realize something's always wrong, with everyone ... "David Foster Wallace
"All the talent in the world doesn"t excuse deliberate rudeness."  Lee Iacocca
"When writers die they become books which is after all not too bad an incarnation." - J. L. Borges
"Happiness is a choice, not a result. Nothing will make you happy until you choose to be happy. No person will make you happy unless you decide to be happy. Your happiness will not come to you. It can only come from you." - Ralph Marston
"I don't have a favourite decade. I like to remember the whole of my professional life as one wonderful party" - Debbie Reynolds
"Be the cause of your future, not only the result of your past" - Author Unknown
"The difference between a successful person and others is not a lack of strength, not a lack of knowledge, but rather in a lack of will." Vincent T. Lombardi
"Success doesn't come to you. You go to it." Marva Collins
"When you come out of the storm, you won"t be the same person who walked in. That"s what this storm"s all about" - Haruki Murakami
"So toss away stuff you won't need in the end, but keep what's important - and know who's your friend" - Phish
"When you're at the end of your rope, tie a knot and hold on." Theodore Roosevelt
true
"It's not the years in your life, but the life in your years that count" - Wil Dasovich
"Every time you are tempted to react in the same old way, ask if you want to be a prisoner of the past or a pioneer of the future." (-Deepak Chopra)
"Freedom was a word that everyone mentioned but none of us knew. There wasn"t much left for anyone to die for, except the right to remain peculiar." -Colum McCann, Let the Great World Spin
"Freedom was a word that everyone mentioned but none of us knew. There wasn"t much left for anyone to die for, except the right to remain peculiar." -Colum McCann, *Let* *the* *Great* *World* *Spin*
"Freedom was a word that everyone mentioned but none of us knew. There wasn't much left for anyone to die for, except the right to remain peculiar." - Colum McCann, *Let the Great World Spin*
"We have a moral and ethical obligation to leave the planet better than we found it," - Dale Ross
"The very rich are getting richer and all the others are going broke. The big holders are not shrewd or ruthless or enterprising. They don't have to say or think anything." - William S. Burroughs, "Junkie" (1953)
"Our arts, particularly music, are more livelier than any sport. I play with my 'raagas.' And there is no defeat here. Only victory for everyone - singers, listeners and the music itself." - M. Balamuralikrishna
"Let us never know what old age is. Let us know the happiness time brings, not count the years."- Ausonius
"While nature has given us every advantage of soil, climate, and geographical position, man is still vile. But such large steps have lately been taken in the true direction, that the patriot has a right to take courage." - Thaddeus Stevens.
"It is not a lack of love, but a lack of friendship that makes unhappy marriages." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"It doesn"t matter if the glass is half full or half empty if you think you can make a better glass."
"A lot of parents will do anything for their kids, except let them be themselves" - Banksy
"The darkest hour is just before the dawn"
'Here is a rule to remember in future, when anything tempts you to feel bitter: not 'This is misfortune,' but 'To bear this worthily is good fortune.' - Marcus Aurelius
"Don't envy what people have, emulate what they did to have it." @alphabetsuccess
"When life brings you full circle, pay attention. There's a lesson there." - Mandy Hale
"Try to learn to breathe deeply, really to taste food when you eat, and when you sleep really to sleep. Try as much as possible to be wholly alive with all your might, and when you laugh, laugh like hell. And when you get angry, get good and angry. Try to be alive. You will be dead soon enough."
"Hard work beats talent when talent fails to work hard." - Tim Notke
"Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from mediocre minds." - Albert Einstein
"Hillary Clinton I think is a terrific woman. I am biased because I have known her for years. I live in New York. She lives in New York. I really like her and her husband both a lot." -- Donald Trump
"Don"t wait. The time will never be just right."  Napoleon Hill
"Love playing a game you always seem to lose"
"Honey, we aren"t here on this earth to rise above life. We are here to walk through the mud. The magic is in the mess."
"The falling of the whole empire is here to hold you" -Gorillaz
"When dealing with people, let us remember we are not dealing with creatures of logic. We are dealing with creatures of emotion, creatures bristling with prejudices and motivated by pride and vanity." - Dale Carnegie
"You have to learn the rules of the game. And then you have to play better than anyone else."  Albert Einstein
"Make your life a masterpiece. Imagine no limitations on what you can be, have or do." Brian Tracy
"I feed my dog Taco Bell so it farts on my dick with the force of a wind turbine" -Akash Khan, 2017
"If you correct your mind, the rest of your life will fall into place." (-Lao Tzu)
"Life's challenges are not supposed to paralyze you -- they're supposed to help you discover who you are." - Bernice Johnson Reagon
"What we learn from history is that people don't learn from history." -- Warren Buffett
"Life Is Like Photography, We Develop From The Negatives" - Ziad K. Abdelnour
"Please call me Cordelia" -Anne of Green Gables.
"For mine is a generation that circles the globe in search of something we haven't tried before. So never refuse an invitation. Never resist the unfamiliar. Never fail to be polite, and never outstay your welcome. Just keep your mind open and suck in the experience." - Alex Garland
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"My weaknesses have always been food and menin that order."  Dolly Parton
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream." --C.S. Lewis
"There is nothing to writing. All you do is sit down at a typewriter and bleed." - Ernest Hemingway
"Turn your obstacles into opportunities and your problems into possibilities." - Roy T. Bennett
"Always remember that when a man goes out of the room, he leaves everything in it behind...When a woman goes out she carries everything that happened in the room along with her." - Alice Munro (Too Much Happiness)
"A woman's dress should be like a barbed-wire fence: serving its purpose without obstructing the view."  Sophia Loren
*"It's like Anal sex, Acid - It's for special occasions, not for everyday"* - Steve Hughes
"The task at hand for every generation is twofold: to know what planet we leave to our children and what children we leave for our planet."  Pierre Rabhi
"The sad truth is that the truth is sad." -Lemony Snicket
"Disbelieving is hard work." - Daniel Gilbert
"Do not fear the winds of adversity. Remember, a kite rises against the wind rather than with it." Unknown
"Its stupid to miss someone you didnt even get along with" - John Green
"During times of universal deceit..."
"Never argue with stupid people, they will drag you down to their level and then beat you with experience" -Mark Twain
"If you want to achieve greatness, stop asking for permission." - Anonymous
"Everyone you will ever meet knows something you don"t." - Bill Nye
"The greatest advantage from gambling comes from not playing it at all." - Girolamo Cardano
"Someone's quality of life is entirely dictated upon their perception of martyrdom." -Anonymous
"Positive thinking will let you do everything better than negative thinking will." Zig Ziglar
"All of the animals except for man know that the principle business of life is to enjoy it."  Samuel Butler
"As long as I distract myself, drench myself into a fantasy world where all the awful nearly resembles the void, I think I'll be fine." -Anonymous
"Don't hesitate to do something fearing it'll just only be a phase. Life is a collection of phases"
"I'll call myself a dipshit, just so I can make mistakes."
"The only thing worse than being talked about is not being talked about." (-Oscar Wilde)
"Tomorrow is promised to no one. Prioritize today accordingly."
"The reason I talk to myself is because I"m the only one whose answers I accept." - George Carlin
"And once the storm is over, you won"t remember how you made it through, how you managed to survive. You won"t even be sure, whether the storm is really over. But one thing is certain. When you come out of the storm, you won"t be the same person who walked in. That's what this storm"s all about."
"I can never full enjoy anything. Part of me is already missing that which is present for it will soon come to pass, while the other part is hoping for a similar future which may never come."
"Three things cannot be long hidden: the sun, the moon, and the truth." -Buddha
"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude. Don't complain." Maya Angelou
"There are two ways to enter the final chamber, free or not free. The choice is ours."
"I would feel real trapped in this life if I didn't know I could commit suicide at any time." -Hunter S. Thompson
"You know when you're young and you think your dad is superman, but then you grow up and realize he's just a drunk who wears a cape." -Dave Attell
"Make the most of the best and the least of the worst." - Robert Louis Stevenson
"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot paint' , then by all means paint, and that voice will be silenced." - Vincent van Gogh
"Curiosity is the beginning of wisdom" - Francoise Sagan
"Ability is what you're capable of doing. Motivation determines what you do. Attitude determines how well you do it." -Lou Holtz
"Enjoying the journey makes it much easier to reach the destination."
"May the shadow of the moon fall on a world at peace." - ABC News report from February 26, 1979 about the world of August 21, 2017
"The secret of joy in work is contained in one word -- excellence. To know how to do something well is to enjoy it." Pearl Buck
"I always had this certain contentment--I wouldn't call it happiness--it was more of an inner balance." -Bukowski
'Only time can heal what reason cannot' - Seneca
"To live a creative life, we must lose our fear of being wrong."
"All I know now is regret, it follows like a silhouette along the cobblestone behind me, but has nothing to say except to innocently ask, a voice as delicate as glass, "Do you see me when we pass?" ,but I continue on my way." -Norma Jean
"Just remember that sometimes, the way you think about a person isn"t the way they actually are."  John Green
"Let the improvement of yourself keep you so busy that you have no time to criticize others." - Roy T. Bennett
"She wants to kill you, dick." - Batman
"We are all creatures of habit whether that be good habits or bad habits." - My middle school football coach
"[A]nd soon now we shall go out of the house and go into the convulsion of the world, out of history into history and the awful responsibility of Time." Robert Penn Warren, All the King's Men
"If you have come here to help me, you are wasting your time. But if you have come because your liberation is bound up with mine, then let us work together." -Lilla Watson
"Why should I be sad? I have lost someone who did not love me. But they lost someone who loved them. "
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today." - H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"The nine most terrifying words in the English language are: 'I'm from the government and I'm here to help.'" -- Ronald Reagan
"History is so often the product of thoughtlessness: it is the offspring of human stupidity, the fruit of benightedness, idiocy, and folly." -- Ryszard Kapuscinski
"If you stare into the void and it blinks first, you win, but the prize is insanity." -unknown
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment."  Ralph Waldo Emerson
"When life leaves us blind, love keeps us kind." -Chester Bennington
"When the morning comes it doesn't, seems to say a lot to me" -Gorillaz
"We deem those happy who from the experience of life have learned to bear its ills without being overcome by them." Juvenal
"Most men are disguised by sobriety; and it is when they are drinking that men display themselves in their true complexion of character." -Thomas De Quincy (confessions of an opium eater)
"Men are imperfect creatures,Left to their own devices, all they really wanna do is play with their dicks and eat chicken. Men need to be led."
"To have what you have never had, you have to do what you have never done." - Roy T. Bennett
"Life is a joke. Death is the punchline."
"She was beautiful, but she was beautiful in the way a forest fire was beautiful: something to be admired from a distance, not up close." - Terry Pratchett
"i walk slowly,but i never walk backward" - Abraham Lincoln
"Most people think they are extremely unique, so I try to remind myself I am nothing but the same so that I may try to be different..."
"If you don't lie in bed at 1 in the morning and think 'what the fuck am I doing with my life' you're doing something wrong"
"1st amendment doesn't protect assholes from criticism. The right to act like an asshole and be called an asshole's the same fucking right." - Sam Halpern
"It is an impressively arrogant move to conclude that just because you don"t like something, it is empirically not good." -Tina Fey
"As you can see, I have memorized this utterly useless piece of information long enough to pass a test question. I now intend to forget it forever. You"ve taught me nothing except how to cynically manipulate the system. Congratulations." - Bill Watterson
"It took me four years to paint like Raphael, but a lifetime to paint like a child."  Pablo Picasso
"I drank to drown my sorrows, but the damned things learned how to swim."  Frida Kahlo
"I feel sorry for people that like politics. They miss so much." - Nigel Kneale
"They say nothing is impossible, yet I do nothing every day." - Winnie the Pooh
"The wonders of technology, it's is easier for a man with one arm to fire a bazooka than to put on his pants." -Roy William Harper, Jr.
"Make the most of the best and the least of the worst." Robert Louis Stevenson
"Dogma and belief are straightjackets on the mind, blindfolds to the awereness and limitations on the thoughts" -Tom Campbell
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." -Mark Twain
"When I found it could talk I felt a new interest in it, for I love to talk; I talk all day, and in my sleep, too, and I am very interesting, and would never stop, if desired." Quoted from Eve's Diary, written by Mark Twain.
"Get going. Move forward. Aim High. Plan a takeoff. Don't just sit on the runway and hope someone will come along and push the airplane. It simply won't happen. Change your attitude and gain some altitude. Believe me, you'll love it up here." - Donald J. Trump
"You don't know about real loss , 'cause it only occurs when you've loved something more than you love yourself . And I doubt you've ever dared to love anybody that much ."Good will hunting
"Making Mistakes Is A Lot Better Than Not Doing Anything." - Billie Joe Armstrong
"The aim of argument, or of discussion, should not be victory, but progress." - Joseph Joubert
"If a peaceful accommodation cannot be reached, than violent revolution is inevitable" Abraham Lincoln.
"Fill your house with stacks of books, in all the crannies and all the nooks." Dr. Seuss
"There are two reasons why we don"t trust people: 1. We don"t know them. 2. We do know them."  Unknown
"One feels as if one is dissolved and merged into Nature. Even more than usual, one feels the insignificance of the individual, and it makes one happy." Albert Einstein
"It is better to keep your mouth closed and let people think you're a fool than to open it and remove all doubt." - Mark Twain
"It is better to keep your mouth closed and let people think you're a fool than to open it and remove all doubt." - Mark Twain
"I just hope that one day - preferably when we"re both blind drunk - we can talk about it." -J.D. Salinger
"If you want to change your life. You need to change your priorities" - Anonymous
"Never ruin an apology with an excuse."- Benjamin Franklin
"Confession is always weakness. The grave soul keeps it's own secrets, and takes its own punishment in silence" - Dorothy Dix
"We will embarrass our descendants just as our ancestors embarrass us. This is moral progress." -Sam Harris
"You"ll miss the best things if you keep your eyes shut." - Dr Seuss
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." Albert Einstein
"Be self-reliant and your success is assured." Unknown
"You are as good as you ever will be at the moment". Constantin Brancusi Book: "ART IS THE HIGHEST FORM OF HOPE"
[How people]directly relate to one another in the ordinary exigencies of life is much more fundamental to a democratic way of life than the principle of "one person, one vote, majority rule." Person-to-person, citizen-to-citizen relationships are what life in democratic societies is all about
"You are as good as you ever will be at the moment."
"Doubt means don't." -Oprah Winfrey
"Selfish people want to believe everyone's as self important and uncaring as they are" - /u/big_benz
"What's a Bogey Lowenstein?" (-10 Things I Hate About You)
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The ache for home lives in all of us. The safe place where we can go as we are and not be questioned." (-Maya Angelou)
"If you have a key that can open any lock, you have a master key. If you have a lock that can be opened by any key then you have a broken lock." Brian Mujati
"It's not about where you end up, or how you got there, it's about where you're going next" - Steve Jobs
"The only lies for which we are truly punished are those we tell ourselves." (-V.S. Naipaul)
"If there be time to expose through discussion the falsehood and fallacies, to avert the evil by the process of education, the remedy to be applied is more speech, not enforced silence." - Justice Louis D. Brandeis" concurring opinion in Whitney v. California (1927)
"The best way to teach your kids about taxes is by eating 30% of their ice cream" - Bill Murray
"Thousand of candles can be lighted from a single candle, and the life of the candle will not be shortened. Happiness never decreases by being shared." Buddha
"Never stop dreaming, never stop believing, never give up, never stop trying, and never stop learning." - Roy T. Bennett
"We the human species are so intelligent and we do such astonishing things. We can fly to the moon but we still do stupid things." - Ken Sturdy, a WW2 veteran after watching the premiere of Dunkirk, speaking about war.
"The American fascist would prefer not to use violence. His method is to poison the channels of public information." -Henry A. Wallace, former U.S. VP
"To safeguard our country, one can live without candy but one cannot live without bullets." - Kim jong-il
"Without music, life would be a mistake." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"We all carry these things inside that no one else can see they hold us down like anchors" - BMTH
"Nonviolence is the answer to the crucial political and moral questions of our time: the need for man to overcome oppression and violence without resorting to oppression and violence. Man must evolve for all human conflict a method which rejects revenge, aggression and retaliation..."
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant." Robert Louis Stevenson
"We should live, act and say nothing to the injury of anyone. It is not only best as a principle, but it is the path to peace and honor" -Robert E. Lee
"History, despite its wrenching pain, Cannot be unlived, and if faced with courage, Need not be lived again." Maya Angelou
"A setting sun still whispers a promise for tomorrow." Jeb Dickerson
"The reason I don"t worry about society is, nineteen people knocked down two buildings and killed thousands. Hundreds of people ran into those buildings to save them. I"ll take those odds every fucking day." - Jon Stewart
"When all is said and done more will have been said than done"
"As you walk down the fairway of life you must smell the roses, for you only get to play one round." Ben Hogan
"When you can't find the sunshine, be the sunshine." Unknown
"I think having land and not ruining it is the most beautiful art anyone could ever want to own". -Andy Warhol
"Sex at age ninety is like trying to shoot pool with a rope." - George Burns
&lt;&lt;  PreviousNext  Edit Quote There is nothing on this earth more to be prized than true friendship. There is nothing on this earth more to be prized than true friendship. ---Thomas Aquinas
"Your Best Teacher Is Your Last Mistake" - Ralph Nadar
"In Italy, fascists divide themselves into two categories: fascists and antifascists." -Ennio Flaiano
"The road to wisdom? Well, it"s plain and simple to express: Err and err and err again but less and less and less." Piet Hein
"I don't like to watch my own movies - I fall asleep in my own movies." - Robert De Niro
"All alone beside the streams, and up the mountain-sides of dreams, the strangest things are these for me, both things to eat and things to see. And many frightening sights abroad, till morning in the land of Nod. Try as I like to find the way, I never can get back by day..."
"What is patriotism but the love of the food one ate as a child"  Lin Yutang
"Since we live in the heads of those who remember us, we lose control of our lives and become who they want us to be." - David Eagleman
"They never pay the slaves enough so they can get free, just enough so they can stay alive and come back to work. I could see all this. Why couldn"t they?" Charles Bukowski
"We're bornalone, we live alone, we die alone. Only through our love and friendship can wecreate the illusion for the moment thatwe're not alone." -Orson Welles
"I Disapprove of What You Say, But I Will Defend to the Death Your Right to Say It" - Evelyn Beatrice Hall
"Rien n'est si dangereux qu'un ignorant ami ; Mieux vaudrait un sage ennemi"  Jean de La Fonteine, "Fables"
"Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry, and narrow-mindedness, and many of our people need it sorely on these accounts. Broad, wholesome, charitable views of men and things cannot be acquired by vegetating in one little corner of the earth all one's lifetime." - Mark Twain
"Sentience truly is humanity's curse. It's inevitable knowledge that we all cease to exist, as unfeeling as the dust we are. We walk on the bodies of our fallen cousins." -Jeff Jefferson, 2017
"Holy cow!!!" -Harry Caray
"Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche, "Beyond Good and Evil" (1886)
"There"s 7 billion 46 million people on the planet and most of us have the audacity to think we matter" - George Watsky
"Sitting quietly, doing nothing, Spring comes, and the grass grows by itself." Zenrin Kush
"It is wise to keep in mind that no success or failure is necessarily final. "Unknown
"Imagination is everything. It is the preview of life"s coming attractions." Albert Einstein
"We cannot expect people to have respect for law and order until we teach respect to those we have trusted to enforce those laws." -Hunter Stockton Thompson
"Worry often gives a small thing A BIG SHADOW" -- Swedish Proverb
"Why do you hate so and so, so much? And he answered with his shameless impudence, "I"ll tell you. He had done me no harm. But I played him a dirty trick, and ever since I have hated him." - Fyodor Dostoevsky, The Brothers Karamazov
"Those members of society who work acquire nothing; those who acquire do not work."- Karl Marx
1861. Alexander H Stephens, Vice President of the Confederacy...
"The hardest thing to judge is what level of risk is safe" - George Soros -
"Why fit in when you born to stand out"-Dr. Suess
"Those boys you hang out with? Whatever they do, do the opposite. People,will see you, and not group you in with them"
"Only those who attempt the absurd will achieve the impossible." M.C. Escher
"Imagine your life is perfect in every respect; what would it look like?" Brian Tracy
"Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Wishing is not enough; we must do." Johann Wolfgang Von Goethe
"Never forget what it's like to the the world as a child..."
"Do not mourned the waves, the leaves, and the clouds. Because even in darkness the wonder and the beauty of the world never leaves, it's always there, waiting to be seen again." - Senua from Hellblade: Senua's Sacrifice
"I mean, in a way Idiocracy kind of looks optimistic right now" - Mike Judge
"Not having the best situation, but seeing the best in your situation is the key to happiness." - Marie Forleo
"You become what you love. So, choose wisely what you love." - Yasmin Mogahed
"Hello babies. Welcome to Earth. It's hot in the summer and cold in the winter. It's round and wet and crowded. On the outside, babies, you've got a hundred years here. There's only one rule that I know of, babies- God damn it, you've got to be kind." - Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
"Is not impermanence the very fragrance of our days? Flare up like flame and make big shadows I can move in. Let everything happen to you: beauty and terror. Just keep going. No feeling is final." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"Hello babies. Welcome to Earth. It's hot in the summer and cold in the winter. It's round and wet and crowded. On the outside, babies, you've got a hundred years here. There's only one rule that I know of, babies-"God damn it, you've got to be kind." - Kurt Vonnegut Jr.
"The best way to predict your future is to create it" - Peter Drucker
"Put your heart, mind, and soul into even your smallest acts. This is the secret of success." - Swami Sivananda
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"To be alive in this beautiful, self-organizing universe - to participate in the dance of life with senses to perceive it, lungs that breathe it, organs that draw nourishment from it - is a wonder beyond words." - Joanna Macy
"The truth that many people never understand, until it is too late, is that the more you try to avoid suffering, the more you suffer." - Thomas Merton
"Be strong enough to let go and wise enough to wait for what you deserve."  Unknown
"Life can only be understood backwards; but it must be lived forwards."  Sren Kierkegaard
"Love is like the wind, you can't see it but you can feel it." - Nicholas Sparks, A Walk to Remember
"Friendship is far more tragic than love. It lasts longer." -Oscar Wilde
"It's only in the mysterious equations of love that any logical reasons can be found." - John Nash
"Love the life you live, live the life you love"--Anonymous
"Whether you hang yourself or do not hang yourself, you will regret both. This, gentlemen, is the essence of all philosophy." - Sren Kierkegaard
"You mistake stars reflected in a pond for the night sky" - Vilgefortz (The Witcher Universe)
"I've never found it hard to hack most people. If you listen to them. Watch them, their vulnerabilities are like a neon sign screwed into their heads." -Elliot Alderson in Mr. Robot, spoken by Rami Malek. Written by Sam Esmail
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." -- John F. Kennedy
"All this happened, more or less" - Kurt Vonnegut, Slaughterhouse-Five (1969)
"Exile makes sense when you realize, you were never really home in the first place"
"To the whole world your only one person but to one person you can be the whole world"-Dr. Suess
"Try to learn something about everything and everything about something." - Thomas Huxley
'If you're not outraged, you're not paying attention.' - Heather Heyer
"If you're not outraged, you're not paying attention." -Heather Heyer
"We all have ability. The difference is how we use it." - Charlotte Whitton
"Democracy is non-negotiable." - Liberty Prime.
"Everything works out in the end and if it hasn't worked out yet then it isn't the end"-Chinese proverb
"The storm starts when the drops start dropping when the drops stops dropping then the storm starts stopping"-Dr. Suess
"I am Groot!" - Baby Groot
"The difference between successful people and really successful people is that really successful people say no to almost everything" - Warren Buffett -
"Misfortunes make us wise" - Mary Norton
"Do what you can, with what you have, where you are." Theodore Roosevelt
"Not all of us can do great things. But we can do small things with great love." Mother Teresa
"War is the business of the barbarians" - Napoleon Bonaparte
"The love of knowledge is a kind of madness." - C.S. Lewis
"Understanding is the first step to acceptance, and only with acceptance can there be recovery." -J.K. Rowling (Professor Dumbledore)
"Life is a gamble. I felt the weight of that the first time I left home for good. I walked out of that house into the unknown & it scared the shit out of me but the adventure of hitting life straight on was a thrill I"ll never forget." -Sam Shepard
"Ignoring your passion is slow suicide. Never ignore what your heart pumps for. Mold your career around your lifestyle, not your lifestyle around your career."  Kevin Claiborne
"I am not looking to escape my darkness, I am learning to love myself there." (-Rune Lazuli)
"Deal with the big while it is still small." - Lao Tzu
"We have flown the air like birds and swum the sea like fishes, but have yet to learn the simple act of walking the earth like brothers" Martin Luther King Jr
"We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we used when we created them." - Albert Einstein
"I get it now; I didn't get it then. That life is about losing and about doing it as gracefully as possible... and enjoying everything in between." Mia Farrow
"The grass looks greener on the other side because you're not there to cast a shadow on it." - Anonymous
"The right man in the wrong place can make all the difference in the world. So, wake up, Mister Freeman. Wake up and... smell the ashes". -G Man
"You forgetI"m not locked in here with you you"re locked in here with me!"
"we hope for our own people and are convinced that socialism is inseparable from nationalism." - Adolf Hitler
"Stop giving other people the power to control your happiness, your mind, and your life. If you don't take control of yourself and your own life, someone else is bound to try." - Roy T. Bennett
"Life doesn"t require that we be the best, only that we try our best." - H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"There's not a word yet, for old friends who've just met" - Jim Henson
"... remember while today it is me, we all shall fall" - Dwight Schrute
"Bring balance, not leave it in darkness." -/u/WaterGuy12
"Death is not the greatest loss in life.The greatest loss is what dies inside us when we live." -Norman Cousins(Insta@quote_czar)
"All our dreams can come true, if we have the courage to pursue them." -Walt Disney
'We love just once in our lifetime and spend the rest of our lives looking for something similar' - old Russian saying
"Reasoning will never make a man correct an ill opinion, which by reasoning he never acquired." - Jonathan Swift
"No one is born hating another person because of the color of his skin, or his background, or his religion. People must learn to hate, and if they can learn to hate, they can be taught to love, for love comes more naturally to the human heart than its opposite." - Nelson Mandela
"You can't be that kid standing at the top of the waterslide overthinking it. You have to go down the chute." -Tina Fey
"Our problem is we take unnecessary risks when we don"t need to but we are too scared to take risks when we really need to"
"Without a humble but reasonable confidence in your own powers you cannot be successful or happy." - Norman Vincent Peale
"There"s winning and there"s losing, and in life you have to know they both will happen. But what"s never been acceptable to me is quitting." - Magic Johnson
"Sometimes to know a virtue is necessary first to know its opposite" Aristotle.
"Our enemies are not the Jews or the Christians, our enemy is our own ignorance." -Ali ibn Abi Talib
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." George Bernard Shaw
"All suffering originates from craving, from attachment, from desire." - Edgar Allen Poe
"Aim above morality. Be not simply good, be good for something." - Henry David Thoreau
"Some white people hate black people, and some white people love black people, some black people hate white people, and some black people love white people. So you see it's not an issue of black and white, it's an issue of lovers and haters." Eden Ahbez
"Creative productivity is somewhat different, because for one thing, you have to spend time in ways that markets and our culture don't really recognize as productive." -John Green
"I love those who do not know how to live, except by going under, for they are those who cross over." - Friedrich Nietzsche, Thus Spoke Zarathustra
"Maybe some people just aren't meant to be in our lives forever. Maybe some people are just passing through. It's like some people just come through our lives to bring us something: a gift, a blessing, a lesson we need to learn. You'll have that gift forever." (-Danielle Steel)
"When I look at my life and its secret colours, I feel like bursting into tears."  Albert Camus
"Great leaders create more leaders, not followers." - Roy T. Bennett
"Two Wongs don't make a White" - Winston Peters, NZ politician.
"Every Exit is an Entry Somewhere Else"
"Did you know George Washington smoked a lot of dope? They called him Ganja George. Of course you didn't know, cause they don't teach that shit in school." -Zahid
"If the only thing keeping a person decent is the expectation of divine reward then, brother, that person is a piece of shit." -Rustin Cohle (Played by Matthew McConaughey in True Detective: Season 1) Written by Nic Pizzolatto
"Quotes are for dumb people who can't think of something intelligent to say on their own." -Bo Burnham
"We waste so many days waiting for the weekend. So many nights wanting morning. Our lust for future comfort is the biggest thief of life" -Joshua Glenn Clark
"When your work speaks for itself; don't interrupt." - Henry J. Kaiser
"Never ruin an apology with an excuse."- Benjamin Franklin
"I've noticed that everyone pro abortion have been born" -Ronald Regan
"If we were to wake up some morning and find that everyone was the same race, creed, and color, we would find some other causes for prejudice by noon."Senator George Aiken
"Oftentimes have I heard you speak of one who commits a wrong as though he were not one of you, but a stranger unto you and an intruder upon your world..." - Kahlil Gibran
"Oftentimes have I heard you speak of one who commits a wrong as though he were not one of you, but a stranger unto you and an intruder upon your world..." - Kahlil Gibran
"They shall beat their swords into plowshares. And their spears into pruning hooks. Nation shall not lift up sword against nation. Neither shall they learn war any more." - Isaiah
"Intelligent people suffer in the heaven of their minds, while those who accompany ignorance are blessed in suffering"
"God gives every bird a worm, but he does not throw it into the nest" - Swedish Proverb
"Listen to the cry of a woman in labor at the hour of giving birth look at the dying man's struggle at his last extremity, and then tell me whether something that begins and ends thus could be intended for enjoyment."  Sren Kierkegaard.
"We Zig when you Zag, bitches." - Craig Ferguson
"Maybe that's what we look for in the people we love, the spark of unhappiness we think we know how to extinguish." -Tom Perrotta
"You wake up every morning to fight the same demons that left you so exhausted the nigbt before, and that my love, is bravery."
"You don't wanna smoke cigarettes but you fuckin' have to. You can't deal with the stress. You smoke. You devalue yourself. You look at yourself and you realize if you were judging yourself you would judge yourself unfavorably. If you're stealing. If you're hurting people..." Joe Rogan
"You are entitled to your own opinion, but you are not entitled to your own facts."  Daniel Patrick Moynihan
"Knowing your own darkness is the best method for dealing with the darknesses of other people." - Carl Jung
"Prejudice saves us a painful trouble, the trouble of thinking." --Rabbi Alfred Bettleheim
"The best place to find a helping hand is at the end of your own arm." Swedish proverb
...I am rejoiced that slavery is abolished... So fully am I satisfied of this, as regards Virginia especially, that I would cheerfully have lost all I have lost by the war, and have suffered all I have suffered, to have this object attained."
"Some men are born mediocre, some men achieve mediocrity, and some men have mediocrity thrust upon them." -Joseph Heller
"Loneliness does not come from having no people around you, but from being unable to communicate the things that seem important to you." - Carl Jung
"The law, in its majestic equality, forbids the rich as well as the poor to sleep under bridges, to beg in the streets, and to steal bread."-Jacques Anatole Franois
"Shadows are falling and I'm running out of breath, keep me in your heart for a while. If I leave you it doesn't mean I love you any less, keep me in your heart for a while." - Warren Zevon
"I am repelled by wholesomeness." - George Carlin
"I used to think the worst thing in life was to end up all alone, it"s not. The worst thing in life is to end up with people that make you feel all alone."Robin Williams
"My philosophy is: It's none of my business what people say of me and think of me. I am what I am and I do what I do. I expect nothing and accept everything. And it makes life so much easier." Anthony Hopkins
"You"ve asked her for sympathy, and she"s not sympathetic; you"ve wanted her to be practical, and she"s not practical. You"ve been selfish; you"ve been exactingand so has shebut it wasn"t anybody"s fault." - Virginia Woolf
"If they make a muppet version of you you've basically won the game of life"
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world" -Mahatma Gandhi
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened" -Dr. Seuss
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and they don"t want anyone else to feel like that" - Robin Williams
"Everything will eventually come to an end. So try to savor the moment, cuz time flies don't it? The beauty of life, you gotta make it last for the better, Cuz nothin' lasts forever" - Nas
"I don't do neutral. I don't believe in turning our heads. I believe in righteous collective fire against all injustice. We are not here to simply survive. We are here to pave the way for new generations..." Victoria Erickson
"You'll laugh at your fears when you find out who you are." -Piccolo
"Be the love you never received."
"Trust your instincts, and make judgements on what your heart tells you. The heart will not betray you." - David Gemmell, Fall of Kings
"Trust your instincts, and make judgements on what your heart tells you. The heart will not betray you." - David Gemmell, Fall of Kings
"Trust your instincts, and make judgements on what your heart tells you. The heart will not betray you." - David Gemmell, Fall of Kings
"There is a power so organized, so subtle, so complete, so pervasive, that they had better not speak above their breath when they speak in condemnation of it." - President Woodrow Wilson
"Bitter, bitter was the pain and wilder and wilder grew her song, for she sang of the Love that is perfected by Death, of the Love that dies not in a tomb." - Oscar Wilde *The Nightingale and the Rose*
"As Churchill said, it's the Englishmen's inalienable right to live wherever the hell he likes... I say, what do you think, it's gonna vanish? It's not going to be there when I get back?" - John Lennon (Last Interview)
"Go as far as you can see and you will see further." - Zig Ziglar
"Never do 2 illegal things at once. Have a hooker in the car? Be the best driver in human history." - /u/TheForeverAloneOne
"If you have to fight a dragon you should go to it's lair before it comes to your village" - Jordon Peterson
"What's it called when you almost win? Oh yeah; losing!"
"One must not judge everyone in the world by his qualities as a soldier, otherwise we should have no civilization" -Field Marshall Rommel
"I hold it the unalienable right for any man to go to hell in his own way." -Robert Frost
"You have power over your mind, not outside events. Realize this
"Why fit in? When you born to stand out." - Dr. Suess
"If you can't do anything about it, then let it go. Don't be a prisoner to things you can't change." -Tony Gaskins
"She wants a warrior lover, with wild eyes, strong hands, and a poet's heart."-N.R Hart
"We accept the love we think we deserve." -Stephen Chbosky
"Holding onto anger is like drinking poision and expecting the other person to die" -Buddha
"Strive not to be a success, but rather to be of value." -Albert Einstein
"Dreams is not what you see in sleep, is the thing which doesn't let you sleep"- Abdul Kalam
"The mind is everything. What you think you become." Buddha
"Most of the time, nobody"s thinking about you at all! They are too busy worrying about their own lives, and if they are thinking about you at all, they are wondering what you are thinking about them." - Jack Canfield
"There comes a point where you no longer care if there's a light at the end of the tunnel or not. You're just sick of the tunnel."- Ranata Suzuki
"History is filled with the sound of silken slippers going downstairs and wooden shoes coming up."  Voltaire
"I"d rather be a failure at something I love than a success at something I hate." - George Burns
"The most exciting phrase to hear in science, the one that heralds new discoveries, is not "Eureka!" but "That"s funny..." -- Isaac Asimov
"Others wish that we wouldn't be wishing for so many wishful things, but being hopeful is the only hope among the hopeless."
"It"s better to go slow in the right direction than to go fast in the wrong direction." -Simon Sinek
"Time heals all wounds, unless you pick at them." -Shaun Alexander
"You must always be willing to work without applause." - Ernest Hemingway
"Either you deal with what is the reality, or you can be sure that the reality is going to deal with you." -Alex Haley
"Beliefs, whether true or not, are among the realest things that dictate us as human beings." -Adam Strech
"Food Quotes"
"Another flaw in the human character is that everybody wants to build and nobody wants to do maintenance." Kurt Vonnegut
"Instead of worrying about what you cannot control, shift your energy to what you can create." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"Be mindful. Be grateful. Be positive. Be true. Be kind." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"It"s only after you"ve stepped outside your comfort zone that you begin to change, grow, and transform." - Roy T. Bennett
"Attitude is a choice. Happiness is a choice. Optimism is a choice. Kindness is a choice. Giving is a choice. Respect is a choice. Whatever choice you make makes you. Choose wisely." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"This, too, will pass." - Eckhart Tolle, A New Earth
"You wanna fly, you got to give up the shit that weighs you down." - Toni Morrison
"The breezes at dawn have secrets to tell you. Don't go back to sleep! You must ask for what you really want. Don't go back to sleep! People are going back and forth across the doorsill where the two worlds touch. The door is round and open. Don't go back to sleep!" - Jalaluddin Rumi
"Focus on making yourself better, not on thinking that you are better." - Bohdi Sanders
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do, so throw off the bowlines, sail away from safe harbor, catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore, Dream, Discover." Mark Twain
"The greatest gift...."
'Those without dignity can survive if they have food to eat' 'Those without food can endure their hunger as long as they have diginity' 'But those who have lost both stop caring and deseperately cling to anything' - oda nobunaga
"My first rule of conversation is this: I never learn a thing while I"m talking. I realize every morning that nothing I say today will teach me anything, so if I"m going to learn a lot today, I"ll have to do it by listening." - Larry King
"Loving you has been the most profound, intense, painful experiance of my life. In fact, it"s been almost too much to bear." - Hank Moody
"You get in life what you have the courage to ask for." -Oprah Winfrey
50 Inspirational Travel Quotes
"the world is changing boys, it's time we change too" - Vulture
"There's never enough time to do all the nothing you want." - Calvin & Hobbs
"Continuous effort - not strength or intelligence - is the key to unlocking our potential." - Winston Churchill
"Friends progress is almost never leaps and bounds, it's little steps. Yes we got to the moon by the end of the decade the goal was set, but that wasn't a leap, and it wasn't a bound, it was however an insanely large amount of little steps." -me
"Dating with no intent to marry is like going to the grocery store with no money. You either leave unhappy or take something that isn't yours." -Jefferson Bethke
"To be or not to be is not the question to become or not to become is the question" - Eltacore
"Stay afraid, but do it anyway. What"s important is the action. You don"t have to wait to be confident. Just do it and eventually the confidence will follow." - Carrie Fisher
"Only the dead have seen the end of war" - Plato
"Everybody wants to take responsibility when you win, but when you fail, all these fingers are pointing." - Mike Krzyzewski
1000+ Motivational and Inspirational Quotes
"Whatever we plant in our subconscious mind and nourish with repetition and emotion will one day become a reality." Earl Nightingale
"Ponte Las Pillas" - My Mother
"You can't have a better tomorrow if you are thinking about yesterday all the time." - Charles Kettering
"Everything you need is inside You. Go set the World on Fire." Darren Hardy
"Ah, when to the heart of man Was it ever less than a treason To go with the drift of things, To yield with a grace to reason, And bow and accept and accept the end Of a love or a season?" - Robert Frost's "Reluctance"
"Stay away from negative people. They have a problem for every solution" - Albert Einstein
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever"-Mahatma Gandhi
"What if I told you I'm incapable of tolerating my own heart?" -Virginia Woolf
"I like the way you die boy". Worthy of a tshirt?
"The world is moving so fast that the person who says it can't be done is generally interrupted by someone doing it." - Elbert Hubbard
"Some people awaken spiritually without ever coming into contact with any meditation technique or any spiritual teaching. They may awaken simply because they can't stand the suffering anymore." - Eckhart Tolle
"All the talent in the world doesn't excuse deliberate rudeness." - Lee Iacocca
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts."  Winston Churchill
"I said "Somebody should do something about that." Then I realized I am somebody." - Lily Tomlin
"We're all mad here." - Lewis Carroll
"You are not allowed to post there." - Weak Mods from /r/quotes
"It's not that I'm so smart, it's just that I stay with problems longer." - Albert Einstein
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don"t matter, and those who matter don"t mind." - Dr. Seuss
"If I have the belief that I can do it, I shall surely acquire the capacity to do it even if I may not have it at the beginning" - M.K. Gandhi
"I could fake "smart" for my teachers and "sincere" for my parents and "interested" for my friends. But when it was two o'clock in the morning all alone, in the dark, I wasn"t sure who I needed to be. Sometimes I Act Crazy: Living With Borderline Personality Disorder
"And once the storm is over, you won"t remember how you made it through, how you managed to survive. But one thing is certain. When you come out of the storm, you won"t be the same person who walked in. That"s what this storm"s all about." - Haruki Murakami
"Dreams will get you nowhere, a good kick in the pants will take you a long way." - Baltasar Gracian
"Looking at cleavage is like looking at the sun. You don't stare at it. It's too risky. Ya get a sense of it and then you look away." - Seinfeld
"I'm sorry. Both for losing her and for the inevitability that one day you're going to forget about her. I'm honestly not sure which one hurts worse." - /u/Zediac (full quote in post)
"You will never reach your destination if you stop and throw stones at every dog that barks." - Winston S. Churchill
"Picture your chakras opening as flowers and at the center of each is a slow-motion explosion of sweet light." Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"If you don"t build your dream, someone else will hire you to help them build theirs." - Dhirubhai Ambani
"There"s always a way if you"re committed." -Tony Robbins
"If you cannot make a change, change the way you have been thinking. You might find a new solution." - Maya Angelou
"Life"s challenges are not supposed to paralyze you; they"re supposed to help you discover who you are." - Bernice Johnson Reagon
"Forget past mistakes. Forget failures. Forget everything except what you"re going to do now and do it." - William Durant
"If you have good thoughts they will shine out of your face like sunbeams and you will always look lovely" - Roald Dahl
"Im going to show you how great I am!" - Muhammed Ali
"The art of communication is the language of leadership." -James Humes
"The propagandist's purpose is to make one set of people forget that certain other sets of people are human." - Aldous Huxley
"Mankind's potential is just like his stupidity, limitless."
"Just be a good person"- Every good person (overall) ever
"The reading of all good books is indeed like a conversation with the noblest men of past centuries who were the authors of them, nay a carefully studied conversation, in which they reveal to us none but the best of their thoughts." - Rene Descartes
"The world sometimes feels like an insane asylum. You can decide whether you want to be an inmate or pick up your visitor's badge. You can be in the world but not engage in the melodrama of it; you can become a spiritual being having a human experience thoroughly and fully." - Deepak Chopra
"Now remember ______ , take offense to everything everybody says!"
"So let's annihilate everything, I say. That's my philosophy. God denies the world, and I deny God. Long live nothing, for it's the only thing that exists." - Albert Camus
"I dont feel threatened by people who ask questions. Its those who refuse to answer them that frighten me". - Jason Bacchetta.
"The only thing that overcomes hard luck is hard work." Harry Golden
"You are entitled to your own opinions, but you are not entitled to your own facts" -- Anonymous
'When you see a good person, think of becoming like her/him. When you see someone not so good, reflect on your own weak points.' - Confucius
"We should always invest as though the best is yet to come but the worst could be right around the corner."-Josh Brown
"Isn't funny how day by day nothing changes, but when you look back everything was so dofferent." -C.S Lewis
[Question] Who said "You should not assume just because a man was Greek, that he was correct"?
".....in which even the fruits of victory would be ashes in our mouth" -JFK
"Only I can change my life. No one can do it for me." Carol Burnett
"Men ought either to be well treated or crushed, because they can avenge themselves of lighter injuries, of more serious ones they cannot; therefore the injury that is to be done to a man ought to be of such a kind that one does not stand in fear of revenge." - Niccolo Machiavelli
"You must understand that there is more than one path to the top of the mountain."  Miyamoto Musashi
''The unknown is a drug for those who are distorted by the public denial''
"Future generations will look back on TV as the lead in the water pipes that slowly drove the Romans mad." Kurt Vonnegut
"Only I can change my life. No one can do it for me." Carol Burnett.
'Necessity, the tyrant's plea' Milton
'People who drink to drown their sorrow should be told that sorrow knows how to swim' - Ann Landers
"If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you erase yourself" - Louis C.K.
"Find a purpose to serve, not a lifestyle to live." - Criss Jami
"To hell with being ashamed of what you liked." - Ralph Ellison
"To hell with being ashamed of what you liked." - Ralph Ellison
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde
"Our scientific power has outrun our spiritual power. We have guided missiles and misguided men." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"We become what we behold." -Marshall McLuhan
"The aim of art is to represent not the outward appearance of things, but their inward significance." - Aristotle
"In peace sons bury fathers, but in war fathers bury sons" - Herodotus
"Those who do not acknowledge their past cannot foresee their future."
"Let us try for once not to be right." -Tristan Tzara
"My mind begins to seem like a video game: I can either play it intelligently, learning more in each round, or I can be killed in the same spot by the same monster, again and again." - Sam Harris
"The world's a bad place, a bad place, a terrible place to live...but I don't want to die." - Marmalade, "Reflections of My Life"
"Friendship ... is born at the moment when one man says to another "What! You too? I thought that no one but myself . . ." - C.S. Lewis, The Four Loves
"Attitude is a little thing that makes a big difference." Winston Churchill
"If our friendship depends on things like space and time, then when we finally overcome space and time, we"ve destroyed our own brotherhood....
"When you laugh the world laughs with you when you cry the world laughs even harder" - The Joker. I think.
"You must want to spend the rest of your life with yourself first" - a guy from Bali
"If you are still looking for that one person who will change your life, take a look in the mirror." - Roman Price
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"In the end, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Beware the fury of a patient man" - John Dryden
"It's the worst part of seeing old friends: when your rose-coloured memories become undone by reality." - Brad Meltzer
7. "It's the worst part of seeing old friends: when your rose-coloured memories become undone by reality." - Brad Meltzer
"The best thing about the worst time of your life is that you get to see the true colors of everyone" -- Anonymous
"You want to reclaim your mind and get it out of the hands of the cultural engineers who want to turn you into a half-baked moron consuming all this trash that's being manufactured out of the bones of a dying world." -Terence McKenna
" Follow the path of the unsafe, independent thinker. Expose your ideas to the dangers of controversy. Speak your mind and fear less the label of "crack-pot" than the stigma of conformity. And on issues that seem important to you, stand up and be counted at any cost." - Thomas J. Watson
"We live on a placid island of ignorance in the midst of black seas of infinity, and it was not meant that we should voyage far." - H.P. Lovecraft
"Negative people talk and your dreams begin to wither off. But they begin to sprout in the fragrance of hope when they find a new soil! Change your environment!" - Israelmore Ayivor
"Life will not break your heart. It'll crush it." - Henry Rollins
"Observe good faith and justice toward all nations. Cultivate peace and harmony with all." - George Washington
"You just need to remember that experts can be wrong too, so you still need to critically examine ideas - even when they come from a certifiable genius." - Adam Conover in 'Adam Ruins Everything'
"It's up to you how far you go. If you don't try, you'll never know!" Merlin, "Sword in the Stone"
"The best way to tell someone you love them isn't 'I love you' it's 'I want to grow old with you'"
"Real Queens fix each other's crowns"
"Nothing splendid has ever been achieved except by those who dared believe that something inside themselves was superior to circumstance." --Bruce Fairchild Barton
"It's all about the first person you want to tell good news to"
"The history of our Revolution will be one continued lie from one end to the other..." - John Adams
"I loved her against reason, against promise, against peace, against hope, against happiness, against all discouragement that could be." Charles Dickens
"There is no such thing as a "self-made" man. We are made up of thousands of others. Everyone who has ever done a kind deed for us, or spoken one word of encouragement to us, has entered into the make-up of our character and of our thoughts, as well as our success."  George Matthew Adams
"Act as if it were impossible to fail." Dorothea Brande
"Big words seldom accompany good deeds." Charlotte Whitton
"Let your life lightly dance on the edges of Time like dew on the tip of a leaf."  Rabindranath Tagore
"Sometimes, I fall more in love with an echo than the real thing." -Shinji Moon
"If you don't know where you're going, you might not get there." - Yogi Berra
"It is not the critic who counts; not the man who points out how the strong man stumbles, or where the doer of deeds could have done them better. The credit belongs to the man who is actually in the arena....
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." Charles Darwin
"Showing off is the fool's idea of glory." - Bruce Lee
"If only there were evil people somewhere insidiously committing evil deeds, and it were necessary only to separate them from the rest of us and destroy them. But the line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart?"
"Truth is truth, regardless of human opionion" - unknown
"The greatest use of life is to spend it for something that will outlast it." - William James
"You cannot buy the revolution. You cannot make the revolution. You can only be the revolution. It is in your spirit, or it is nowhere." - Ursula K. Le Guin, The Dispossessed
"In school we learn that mistakes are bad, and we are punished for making them. Yet, if you look at the way humans are designed to learn, we learn by making mistakes. We learn to walk by falling down. If we never fell down, we would never walk." - Robert T. Kiyosaki, Rich Dad, Poor Dad
"But I was still alive, and in my book, where there's life, there's hope." - Bryce Courtenay, The Power of One
"I don't know but it's just y'know just do you, let it fly, keep it real and enjoy yourself. You ain't tryna be something then you're just being yourself and that's you! That's who you are. God bless it." - Mac Demarco
" Can I take a punch ? Now that's a question unlikely to be answered ." - Muhammad Ali
"Between flattery and admiration there often flows a river of contempt." - Minna Antrim
"Facebook is an illusion, an emotional shield we use against the harsh realities of life. It's not the real world. It turns us into shallow beings subconsciously pressured to one up other people not knowing it's affecting us negatively same way cancer does."
"Anyone can love a rose, but it takes a lot to love a leaf. It's ordinary to love the beautiful, but it's beautiful to love the ordinary."  Unknown
"Don"t walk behind me; I may not lead. Don"t walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend."  Albert Camus
"Anybody can sympathise with the sufferings of a friend, but it requires a very fine nature to sympathise with a friend"s success." - Oscar Wilde
"A friend is one that knows you as you are, understands where you have been, accepts what you have become, and still, gently allows you to grow." - William Shakespeare
"Action may not always bring happiness; but there is no happiness without action." - Disraeli
"What's the knife for?" -John Bobbit
"It is idle to expect any great advancement in science from the superinducing and grafting of new things upon old. We must begin anew from the very foundations, unless we would revolve for ever in a circle with mean and contemptible progress." - Francis Bacon
"Your intelligence doesn't override your desire to destroy yourself." -John Darnielle
"In struggle and chaos, the next step is still our choice." Brendon Burchard
"We have to create culture, don't watch TV, don't read magazines, don't even listen to NPR. Create your own roadshow. The nexus of space and time where you are now is the most immediate sector of your universe, and if you're worrying about Michael Jackson..." -Terence McKenna (Full quote below)
"If you want to be on time, you must be early" -- Joe (a cab driver in Boston that I rode with)
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." Gandhi-
"Train yourself to remain calm under all circumstances. Only in a state of tranquility can we find the way out of our predicaments." -Jerry Corsten
"Two Things Define You: Your Patience When You have Nothing and Your Attitude When You have Everything" -- Anonymous
"An increasingly pagan and hedonistic people - we are learning finally that the forests and mountains and desert canyons are holier than our churches - therefore let us behave accordingly." Edward Abbey
"Beauty is power, a smile is its sword. My greatest beauty secret is being happy with myself."
"Be happy with what you have and are, be generous with both, and you won"t have to hunt for happiness." William E. Gladstone
"Whoever is careless with the truth in small matters cannot be trusted with important matters." - Albert Einstein
"Just keep moving forward and don't give a shit about what anybody thinks." - Johnny Depp
"In the absence of clearly-defined goals, we become strangely loyal to performing daily trivia until ultimately we become enslaved by it." - Robert A. Heinlein
"Reality will break your heart, survival will not be the hardest part, it's keeping all your hopes alive when all the rest of you has died" Paramore
"If you want happiness for an hour  take a nap. If you want happiness for a day  go fishing. If you want happiness for a year  inherit a fortune. If you want happiness for a lifetime  help someone else." - Chinese Proverb
"History doesn't repeat itself, but it does rhyme."- Mark Twain
"Life Is 10% What Happens To Us, And 90% How We React To It" - Charles R. Swindoll.
"Please, someone tweet me right and tell me how that was somehow inappropriate so I can tell you to go fuck yourself" -Bill Maher
"Just knowing you're out there, thinking about me , caring about me .. makes me feel safe All my fears , all my yesterdays wash away. And only hope remains in the promise of your embrace ." - Pablo Nerudo
"You make me thank God for every mistake i ever made because each one led me down the path that brought me to you" - Pablo Nerudo
""Just knowing you're out there, thinking about me , caring about me .. makes me feel safe All my fears , all my yesterdays wash away. And only hope remains in the promise of your embrace ." - Pablo Nerudo
'It is easy to hate and it is difficult to love. This is how the whole scheme of things works. All good things are difficult to achieve; and bad things are very easy to get.' - Confucius
'It is easy to hate and it is difficult to love. This is how the whole scheme of things works. All good things are difficult to achieve; and bad things are very easy to get.'
"I can't take back that we moved too fast, so I withdrew from you to let our love last. To spare your body from paralyzing pain, and numbing thoughts haunting my brain." - Anna Yegiyan
"It is not the critic who counts; not the man who points out how the strong man stumble.....
"We make a living by what we get, but we make a life by what we give."  Winston Churchill
"Women and wine, game and deceit. Make wealth small and want great." -B. Franklin
"You are atoms, and your atoms are not caring if you are existing. Your atoms are monstrous existence." Night in the Woods
"Woe to him that is alone when he falleth; for he hath not another to help him up." - Ecclesiastes 4:10
"Beware of little expenses; a small leak will sink a great ship." -- Benjamin Franklinq
"Life is a waterfall. We're one in the river and one again after the fall." - System of a Down, Aerials
"You have the constitutional right to be a dumbass." - Judge Bryant Durham Jr.
"One of the key problems today is that politics is such a disgrace, good people don't go into government." - Donald Trump
"The day the child realizes that all adults are imperfect, he becomes an adolescent; the day he forgives them, he becomes an adult; the day he forgives himself, he becomes wise."  Alden Nowlan
"Not all trees grow straight. Some grow however makes them happy." - Bob Ross
"I Came To A Point Where I Needed Solitude And Just Stop The Machine Of Thinking And Enjoying What They Call Living, I Just Wanted To Lie In The Grass And Look At The Clouds" -Jack Kerouac
"Re-examine all that you have been told... dismiss that which insults your soul." - Walt Whitman
"Never does the human soul appear so strong as when it foregoes revenge and dares to forgive an injury." - Edwin Hubbel Chapin
"Empathy is the most mysterious transaction that the human soul can have, and it's accessible to all of us, but we have to give ourselves the opportunity to identify, to plunge ourselves in a story where we see the world from the bottom up or through another's eyes or heart." - Sue Monk Kidd
"The planet does not need more successful people. The planet desperately needs more peacemakers, healers, restorers, storytellers, and lovers of all kind." -Dalia Lama
"One day your parents picked you up, sat you down, and never picked you up again." - unknown
"A guy should find out what the woman likes . Every woman is different , so you can't just assume what works on one will work on another . " - Chasey Lain
"Anger is an acid that can do more harm to the vessel in which it is stored than to anything on which it is poured." -Mark Twain
"Anger is an acid that can do more harm to the vessel in which it is stored than to anything on which it is poured. I'm not sure what "anything on which it is poured." -Mark Twain
"When your heart is in love, you're floating; weightless. When you lose that love, you have to reenter the atmosphere. And it can get pretty rough." - Jim Carrey
"And Max, the king of all wild things, was lonely and wanted to be where someone loved him best of all."  Maurice Sendak
"Life"s challenges are not supposed to paralyze you; they"re supposed to help you discover who you are." - Bernice Johnson Reagon
"A candle loses nothing by lighting another candle." - James Keller
"One deals with the hatred of this world either by internalizing it, ignoring it, or becoming hatred itself."
"Reality doesn't impress me. I only believe in intoxication, in ecstasy, and when ordinary life shackles me, I escape, one way or another. No more walls." - Anas Nin
"The thing that is really hard, and really amazing, is giving up on being perfect and beginning the work of becoming yourself." Anna Quindlen
"Better to be silent and thought of a fool then to speak and remove all doubt." - Mark Twain
"The wound is where the light enters" - Rumi
"Human nature is not a machine to be built after a model, and set to do exactly the work prescribed for it, but a tree, which requires to grow and develop itself on all sides, according to the tendency of the inward forces which make it a living thing." - John Stuart Mill
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts."  Winston Churchill
"Life is war and every day is a battle to me, I'm on the brink of insanity, between extreme intelligence and split personalities." - Immortal Technique
"You must be better than everybody else, if not, you're not special and you're a failure" - Society
"The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of the strong." -Mahatma Ghandi
"The most beautiful thing in the world is, of course, the world itself." - Wallace Stevens
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks others have thrown at him."  David Brinkley
"Behind every favorite song is an untold story"
"Believe in yourself and you will be unstoppable."
"Neither knife nor sword, neither spear nor staff, neither arrow nor shank, can surpass the greatest weapon. Time itself." -me
"Victory is sweetest when you've known defeat." - Malcolm Forbes
"If you are not fired with enthusiasm, then you will be fired with enthusiasm." - Vince Lombardi
"If you wanna hire great people and have them stay working for you, you have to let them make a lot of decisions and you have to be run by ideas not hierarchy. The best ideas have to win, otherwise good people don't stay." - Steve Jobs
"All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better" -- Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Dude, sucking at sumthin" is the first step towards being sorta good at something." - Jake the Dog, Adventure Time
"Whoever travels without a guide needs two hundred years for a two-days journey" - Rumi
"The more you know, the more you know you don't know." - Aristotle
"You cannot swim for new horizons until you have courage to lose sight of the shore." - William Faulkner
"Life"s challenges are not supposed to paralyze you; they"re supposed to help you discover who you are." - Bernice Johnson Reagon
"Don't try to be a yin, when you're a yang."
"Sometimes it's ok not to be ok but to be real" (Jessie J, modified)
"Thou shan't hast to be neediest man on'st planet to bemoan thy abject misery, nor shan't thou hast to be most opulent to rejoice in thy delight."- me
"Don't be a yin, when you're a yang"
"Logic will get you from A to Z; imagination will get you everywhere." - Albert Einstein
"If you can't intelligently argue for both sides of an issue, you don't understand the issue well enough to argue for either." --/u/GBlink's Dad
"Do not pursue the past. Do not lose yourself in the future. The past no longer is. The future has not yet come. Looking deeply at life as it is. In the very here and now, the practitioner dwells in stability and freedom. We must be diligent today." - The Buddha
"To succeed in life, you need three things: a wishbone, a backbone and a funny bone."
"We are drowning in information, and yet starving for wisdom."  Unknown
"As if the natural world's been turned upside down."  Lord Mandrake
"The internet landed in our laps without creating a curriculum that empowers you to know when someone online is full of shit" - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"It is the night-black Massachusetts legendary which packs the really macabre 'kick'. Here is material for a really profound study in group neuroticism; for certainly, none can deny the existence of a profoundly morbid streak in the Puritan imagination."-HP Lovecraft
"The Universe is under no obligation to make sense to you." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"A life, Jimmy. You know what that is? It's the shit that happens while you're waiting for moments that never come...." - The Wire
"Those who restrain desire, do so because theirs is weak enough to be restrained." - William Blake, The Marriage of Heaven and Hell
"One wanders to the left, another to the right; both are equally in error, but are seduced by different delusions." - Horace
"What seems to us as bitter trials are often blessings in disguise."  Oscar Wilde
"Well done is better than well said." Benjamin Franklin
"If you really believe in what you're doing, work hard, take nothing personally and if something blocks one route, find another. Never give up." - Laurie Notaro
"If you do what you"ve always done, you"ll get what you"ve always gotten" - Tony Robbins
"What seems to us as bitter trials are often blessings in disguise."  Oscar Wilde
"Weakness of attitude becomes weakness of character." - Albert Einstein
"To live alone is the fate of all great souls." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"The illiterate of the 21st century will not be those who cannot read and write, but those who cannot learn, unlearn, and relearn." - Alvin Toffler
" Wolf ! Wolf ! " - the boy from ' The boy who cried wolf '
"In 1996, shortly before his death, Sagan recorded a message to future Mars explorers: 'Whatever the reason you're on Mars is, I'm glad you're there. And I wish I was with you.'"
"Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending." - Maria Robinson
"A ship is safe in harbor, but that's not what ships are for." - William G.T. Shedd
"Do to others as you would have them do to you." - Luke 6:31
"At first, dreams seem impossible, then improbable, and eventually inevitable." - Christopher Reeve
"What the hell was that? What's going on here?" (Unknown)
"You're Something Between A Dream And A Miracle" -Elizabeth Barrett Browning
"The greatest illusion of this world is the illusion of separation. Things you think are separate and different are actually one and the same. We are all one people, but we live as if divided."- Guru Pathik, from Avatar: The Last Airbender (S2E19)
"I think and think and think, I've thought myself out of happiness one million times, but never once into it." - Jonathan Sufran Foer
"Time passes, and little by little everything that we have spoken in falsehood becomes true." - Marcel Proust
"No one has ever properly understood me. I have never fully understood anyone. No one understands anyone else." -Goethe
"If You Love Two People At The Same Time, Choose The Second. Because If You Really Loved The First One, You Wouldn't Have Fallen For The Second"
"... a mind needs books as a sword needs a whetstone, if it is to keep its edge." - George R.R. Martin
"We are the one species that can formulate a vision of what values are worth pursuing and then pursue the opposite" - Nathaniel Branden
"Mind is more than immediate explicit awareness. It is a complex architecture of structures and processes. It includes more than the verbal, linear, analytic processes popularly if misleadingly described sometimes as "left-brain" activity. It includes ....." - Nathaniel Branden
"Drinking water is essential to a healthy lifestyle." - Stephen Curry
"I like your Christ, I do not like your Christians. Your Christians are so unlike your Christ." - Mohandas Gandhi
"If cookout is a creamery, why can't they cream in me?"
"The most expensive thing in the world is freedom."  Unknown
"There are numerous ways in which God can makes us lonely and lead us back to ourselves"- Hermann Hesse
"...Everyone's different. Every person my size has a different life, a different history. Different ways of dealing with it. Just because I'm seemingly okay with it, I can't preach how to be okay with it." -Peter Dinklage
"God is slumbering - and in his sleep he is dreaming up all of us" -unknown
"I don't believe in man, God nor Devil. I hate the whole damned human race, including myself... I preyed upon the weak, the harmless and the unsuspecting. This lesson I was taught by others : Might makes right." - Carl Panzram
"There is absolutely no possibility of having any pleasure at all without skill. Money doesn't buy pleasure....ever." - Alan Watts
"Fight every battle everywhere, always in your mind. Everyone is your enemy, everyone is your friend. Every possible series of events is happening all at once. Live that way and nothing will surprise you. Everything that happens will be something that you"ve seen before." - Petyr Baelish
"There are too many fish in the sea, to despair over one loss" -Anonymous
"If ignorance is bliss... then slap the grin off my face" - Solomon Torvus (character in Harbinger, a 2003 rpg)
"What does not destroy me makes me strong." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I'll never be able to make a Tim Curry performance as good as Tim Curry." -Bill Skarsgrd
"Today is your day, your mountain is waiting. So get on your way." -Dr Suess
"The obsession with suicide is characteristic of the man who can neither live nor die, and whose attention never swerves from this double impossibility." - Emile M. Cioran
"Quiet people have the loudest minds." - Stephen Hawking
"I do try to kill something for my wife every year, just to reconnect with my caveman roots. Recently, I got a big five-pound lobster, brought it home, and ripped its head off with my teeth. Then we boiled it for a nice romantic dinner. Then I got lucky." -Rainn Wilson
"In the middle of every difficulty lies opportunity." Albert Einstein
"I care desperately about what I do. Do I know what product I'm selling? No. Do I know what I'm doing today? No. But I'm here, and I'm gonna give it my best shot." - Hansel (Zoolander)
"But what could you do? Only keep going. People kept going; they had been doing it for thousands of years. You took the kindness offered, letting it seep as far in as it could go, and the remaining dark crevices....
"It's so hard to forget pain, but it's even harder to remember sweetness. We have no scar to show for happiness. We learn so little from peace." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Every risk is worth taking as long as it's for a good cause, and contributes to a good life." -Richard Branson
"Talent hits a target no one else can hit; Genius hits a target no one else can see" -- Arthur Schopenhauer
"Be yourself. Everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"It's like everyone tells a story about themselves inside their own head. Always. All the time. That story makes you what you are. We build ourselves out of that story." -- Patrick Rothfuss
"Death does not concern us, because as long as we exist, death is not here. And once it does come, we no longer exist." Epicurus
"Years of love have been forgot, in the hatred of a minute" - Edgar Allan Poe
"Start with your beliefs, which will lead your thoughts, which will create your actions, which will produce your results." -Gail Lynne Goodwin
"The wisdom of life consists in the elimination of non-essentials." - Lin Yutang
"What is commonly called "falling in love" is in most cases an intensification of egoic wanting and needing. You become addicted to another person, or rather to your image of that person. It has nothing to do with true love, which contains no wanting whatsoever." - Eckhart Tolle, A New Earth
"Our knowledge has made us cynical. Our cleverness, hard and unkind. We think too much and feel too little. More than machinery we need humanity. More than cleverness we need kindness and gentleness." - Charlie Chaplin, Final Speech in The Great Dictator
"The artist is nothing without the gift, but the gift is nothing without work." - Emile Zola
"If you do not know the answer, the question was not addressed to you." - u/Quantum_Quentin
"Intelligence is knowing that tomatoes are a fruit, wisdom is knowing not to put tomatoes in a fruit bowl." - Unknown
"If I have seen further than others, it is by standing upon the shoulders of giants." Isaac Newton
"Talent hits a target no one else can hit. Genius hits a target no one else can see." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"In another life, we will meet again; though neither of us believes us, it's nice to pretend."
"The heart is an alien in the eye's of the mind"Unknown
"Greek tragedy had a fate different from that of all her older sister arts: she died by suicide, in consequence of an irreconcilable conflict" - Nietzsche
"The job is never done. So long as we live, we must work on ourselves." - Jack LaLanne
"I do not want to think about it but soon there will be nothing else but politics and as long as it is so muddy and evil it's cowardly to turn away from it." Sophie Scholl, anti-Nazi resistance fighter
"All novels, poetry, are built on the never-ending contest in ourselves of good and evil. And it occurs to me that evil must constantly respawn, while good, while virtue, is immortal. Vice has always a new fresh young face, while virtue is venerable as nothing else in the world is." - John Steinbeck
"Home can be a relative idea. Sometimes you only know it when you're not there." - Rose Blaque
"The great use of life is to spend it for something that will outlast it" -- William James
"Traveller, there is no path. The path is made by walking. By walking you make a path, and turning, you look back at a way you will never tread again. Traveller, there is no road; only wakes in the sea." - Antonio Machado
"If you are neutral in times of injustice, you have chosen the side of the oppressor." - Desmond Tutu
"The deepest principle in human nature is the craving to be appreciated" -- William James
"Do more listening than talking; talk more about them than about you." - Roy T. Bennett
"Ability is what you're capable of doing. Motivation determines what you do. Attitude determines how well you do it." - Lou Holtz
"Heaven and hell are not doors. They are burdens; you carry them with you." - Osho
"If at first you don't succeed, remove all evidence you ever tried"
"There are times when the mind is dealt such a blow it hides itself in insanity. While this may not seem beneficial, it is. There are times when reality is nothing but pain, and to escape that pain the mind must leave reality behind."  Patrick Rothfuss
"Show me your will, and I'll show your dreams!" - Life
"We are men, old enough to grow hair on our balls. Now it's time we use them before something else grows on them. - Hank Venture"
"Heroes are made in the hour of defeat. Success is, therefore, well described as a series of glorious defeats."  Gandhi
"We take delight in the immediate apprehension of form" Nietzsche
"If you were to offer a thirsty man all wisdom, you would not please him more than if you gave him a drink." - Sophocles
"If you only read the books that everyone else is reading, you can only think what everyone else is thinking."- Haruki Murakami, Norwegian Wood
"I come in peace. I didn"t bring artillery. But I"m pleading with you, with tears in my eyes: If you fuck with me, I"ll kill you all." - General James 'Mad Dog' Mattis
"To go wrong in one's own way is better than to go right in someone else's." -Feyodor Dostoyevsky
"Ignorance is bliss"
"Whether the Gods are inside or outside makes very little difference to whether there are Gods" - Jordan Peterson, Clinical Psychologist.
"We either make ourselves miserable or we make ourselves strong. The amount of work is the same." Carlos Castaneda
"If you wish to travel far and fast, travel light. Take off all your envies, jealousies, unforgiveness, selfishness, and fears." - Glenn Clark
"Every generation imagines itself to be more intelligent than the one that went before it, and wiser than the one that comes after it" -- George Orwell
"Coming together is a beginning, staying together is progress, and working together is success" -- Henry Ford
'Whenever two people meet, there are really six people present. There is each man as he sees himself, each man as the other person sees him, and each man as he really is.' William James
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Reason is powerless in the expression of love." -Rumi
"Perfection would be a bore, wouldn't it?--It would have to be. It would be inhuman." - Joseph Campbell interviewed by Bill Moyers in The Power of Myth
"but drinking cough syrup when you didn't have a cough is ironic because in reality you're sicker than you though" -mitch welling
"You Learn More From Failure Than From Success. Don"t Let It Stop You. Failure Builds Character" - Unknown
'Everything has its beauty, but not everyone sees it' - Confucius
"Perhaps one did not want to be loved so much as to be understood." - George Orwell
"... enjoy the last few weeks of freedom, leisure, beach and easy life." -My future professor on first contact
"Human history becomes more and more a race between education and catastrophe." - H.G. Wells
"What am I in the eyes of most people?" [continued inside]
"I have often thought that in the hereafter of our lives, when I owe no more to the future and can be just a man, that we may meet, and you will come to me and claim me as yours, and know that I am your husband." - King Arthur Pendragon to his wife Guenevere, before riding into his final battle.
"Success is the sum of small efforts repeated day-in and day-out." Robert Collier
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts."  Winston Churchill
"Success consists of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm" - Winston Churchill
"I'm a world class doctor, of course I know the human modification technique. Whenever I want to torture someone I use it on them, with none of the safety precautions. Those chains you are wearing are for your safety. Otherwise you'd kill yourself long before I finished operating" - Future Noah
"People will take whatever you give as if it's owed to them. Stiffen your spine or prepare for a life of being a welcome mat."
"Circumstance does not make the man, it reveals him to himself." - James Allen, 1903
"Weeds are flowers too, once you get to know them."  A. A. Milne
"Age asks with timidity to be spared intolerable pain; youth, taking fortune by the beard , demands joy like a right." -- The Dynamiter (Robert Louis Stevenson)
"Age asks with timidity to be spared intolerable pain; youth, taking fortune by the beard , demands joy like a right." -- *The Dynamiter* , Robert Louis Stevenson
"Capitalism is the astounding belief that the most wickedest of men will do the most wickedest of things for the greatest good of everyone." - John Maynard
"If you accomplish something good with hard work, the labor passes quickly, but the good endures; if you do something shameful in pursuit of pleasure, the pleasure passes quickly, but the shame endures." -Gaius Musonius Rufus
"My father had taught me to be nice first, because you can always be mean later, but once you"ve been mean to someone, they won"t believe the nice anymore. So be nice, be nice, until it"s time to stop being nice, then destroy them."
"Someone asked me what home was and all I could think of were the stars on the tip of your tongue, the flowers sprouting from your mouth, the roots entwined in the gaps between your fingers, the ocean echoing inside of your ribcage." - e.e. cummings
"Waste no more time arguing about what a good person should be. Be one." - Marcus Aurelius
"The big money is not in the buying or the selling, but in the sitting." --Jesse Livermore
"Whatever it is you're seeking won't come in the form you're expecting"  Haruki Murakami, Kafaka on the Shore
"Butterflies can't see their wings, they can't see how truly beautiful they are, but everyone else can. People are like that as well" -anonymous
"Wander often. Wonder always."
"Sometimes just standing up and fighting a losing battle is worth the costs." --- /u/Dear_Occupant
"What is clarity without vision?" - Peter Quo
"Words may inspire but only action creates change" - Simon Sinek
"being strong doesn't mean you will never get hurt. it means even if you get hurt, you will never let it defeat you." - UNKNOWN
"I don't know what's the matter with people; they don't learn by understanding, they learn by some other way - by rote or something. Their knowledge is so fragile!" - Richard Feynman
"As for the public interest, if it's in the public interest to investigate the Trump administration, it is most certainly in the public interest to investigate the REAL CRIMES, by the REAL CRIMINALS" - Mr.Gaetz
"No matter how brilliant your mind or strategy, if you"re playing a solo game, you"ll always lose out to a team."  Reid Hoffman, Co-founder of LinkedIn
"Man must evolve for all human conflict a method which rejects revenge, aggression and retaliation. The foundation of such a method is love." -Martn Luther King Jr.
"This world will give you what you ask from it, you just have to make sure you ask it for enough." Rod Zavison
"You know you can really get trapped in that web of beepers and Zenith televisions and Walkmens and discmens and floppy discs and zip drives, laser discs, answering machines and Nintendo Power Glove..." -Justin Theroux
"Just when I think I have learned the way to live,life changes." - Hugh Prather
"Every mountain top is within reach if you keep climbing." - Barry Finlay
"If you knew what life was worth, you'd look for yours on earth" -Bob Marley
"Logic will get you from A to B. Imagination will take you everywhere.
"A moral foreign policy means your positions on certain matters are clear no matter what; and that you won"t forget about them when it"s convenient. This is essential for preventing human rights and moral issues from becoming just another chip on the geopolitical gaming table." -Gary Kasparov
"Idleness is the beginning of all vice, the crown of all virtues." - Franz Kafka, writer
"When feeling overwhelmed by a faraway goal, repeat the following: I have it within me right now, to get me to where I want to be later." - Karen Salmansohn
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"It takes time time, to be time" - Mason Williams
"It takes time time; to be time" - Mason Williams
"I didn"t realize it, but the days came along one after another, and then two years were gone, and everything was gone, and I was gone." F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Be where you are, stop over-thinking, and focus on what you are doing." - Roy T. Bennett
"if you admire somebody, you should go ahead and tell them. People never get the flowers while they can still smell them." -Kanye West
"When a human kills an animal for food, he is neglecting his own hunger for justice. Man prays for mercy, but is unwilling to extend it to others. Why should he then expect mercy from God? It"s unfair to expect something that you are not willing to give. It is inconsistent."  Isaac Bashevis Singer
"A man sees in the world what he carries in his heart." -Goethe
"If you're not getting happier as you get older, you're fucking up." Ani Difranco
"Books are objects. On a table, on bookshelves, in store windows, they wait for someone to come and deliver them from their materiality, from their immobility" -George Poulet
"Who is the happier man, he who has braved the storm of life and lived or he who has stayed securely on shore and merely existed?" - Hunter S. Thompson
"You"re an American citizen, this is a major catastrophe for the American country. So I"m asking you as an American patriot to give me a sense of who leaked it."
"If you work hard, I can't guarantee success but if you don't work hard I can guarantee you won't have success." - Coach Jimmy Valano
"I'd fuck Munchkins for 8 weeks for 13$" - Bruce Greene
"Difficult roads often lead to beautiful destinations."
"Well done is better than well said." -Benjamin Franklin
"I count him braver who overcomes his desires than him who conquers his enemies; for the hardest victory is over self." -Aristotle
"In a world that isn't already ideal, one must be willing to shuck and jive for a good cause -- Chaplin, King, Gandhi, Monroe, etc.. The problem begins when people lose sight of the notion that you're entitled to anything else." - Wacky Waving Inflatable Arm Flailing Tube Man
"In a world that isn't already ideal, one must be willing to shuck and jive for a good cause -- Chaplin, King, Gandhi, Monroe, etc.. The problem begins when people lose site of the notion that you're entitled to anything else." - Wacky Waving Inflatable Arm Flailing Tube Man
"The Universe Is Full of Magical Things Patiently Waiting for Our Wits to Grow Sharper" - Eden Phillpotts
"Don't be the same. Be better."
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names."- John F. Kennedy
"Being aware of a single shortcoming within yourself is far more useful than being aware of a thousand in someone else." - Dalai Lama
"You can make almost anything sound positive by adding the word "courage." Shall I demonstrate? The courage to lie to your lover. The courage to betray your comrades. The courage to be a lazy bum. The courage to admit defeat."  Mayoi Hachikuji
"Life is like a box of chocolates - it's full of shit." - random construction worker
"Sickness is the vengeance of nature for the violation of her laws." -Charles Simmons
30 Most Famous Motivational And Inspiring Quotes Of Abdul Kalam
"The beauty of nature has been one of the great inspirations in my life." Jim Henson
"The reason we struggle with insecurity is because we compare our behind-the-scenes with everyone else's highlight reel" - Steven Furtick
"If there's a book that you want to read, but it hasn't been written yet, then you must write it." - Toni Morrison
"I fought too long to end discrimination based on race and color to allow discrimination based on gender identity to be considered acceptable" - John Lewis, American politician and civil rights leader
"Either the United States will destroy ignorance or ignorance will destroy the United States." - W.E.B. DuBois
"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"The political function of rights is precisely to protect minorities from oppression by majorities." -Ayn Rand
"Do not save what is left after spending, but spend what is left after saving"-Warren Buffettq
"Opinion of the world is also a confession of character" Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Sometimes I have a way with words Sometimes words have their way with me."  Atticus
"I love Chinese crap. Lucy Liu, Nintendo, Gangnam Style, sushi, etcetera etcetera." - Councilman Jeremy Jamm
"Nothing ever ends poetically. It ends and we turn it into poetry. All that blood was never once beautiful. It was just red."
"Love playing a game you always seem to lose"
"If people hear that you"re doing something, it might encourage others to do something." -John Hitt, President of UCF
"Fairy tales do not tell children the dragons exist. Children already know that dragons exist. Fairy tales tell children the dragons can be killed." - G.K. Chesterton
"Equipped with his five senses, man explores the universe around him and calls the adventure science." Edwin Hubble
"In harsh circumstances when there is little hope, the boldest measures are the safest." - Livy
"Remember, being faithful means more than never letting another person into your bed. It means never letting another person in your heart" -Holly Riordan
"In our age there is no such thing as 'keeping out of politics.' All issues are political issues, and politics itself is a mass of lies, evasions, folly, hatred and schizophrenia." - George Orwell
"...when a lot of things start going wrong all at once, it is to protect something big and lovely that is trying to get itself born - and...this something needs for you to be distracted so that it can be born as perfectly as possible." -Anne Lamott, Traveling Mercies
"I think that Richard Nixon will go down in history as a true folk hero, who struck a vital blow to the whole diseased concept of the revered image and gave the American virtue of irreverence and skepticism back to the people." William S. Burroughs
"The most certain sign of wisdom is cheerfulness." Michel de Montaigne
10 Quotes That Will Motivate You
"I can't run but I can walk much faster than this." - Paul Simon
"Thank you to the LGBT community! I will fight for you while Hillary brings in more people that will threaten your freedoms and beliefs." - President Trump
"Whatever the mind can conceive and believe, it can achieve." - Napoleon Hill
"I went to the worst of bars hoping to get killed. but all I could do was to get drunk again." -Charles Bukowski
"The master says 'listen' and the student starts thinking." - Jaykaran Sagar
"The difference between genius and stupidity is: genius has its limits." - Alexandre Dumas fils
"At any moment the decision you make can change the course of your life forever" - Tony Robbins
30 Romantic Love Quotes To Melt Your Woman"s Heart If Men Would Actually Say Them
"People Who Need Help Sometimes Look A Lot Like People Who Don't Need Help." -Glennon Doyle Melton
"When you come to a fork in the road, take it." - Yogi Berra
"It's all about getting people to believe in you. It's not their cash, it's their faith.Take this plane, for example".....
"One day you will wake up and there won't be any more time to do the things you've always wanted. Do it now." Paulo Coelho
"When you"re white, you don"t know what it"s like to be living in a ghetto. You don"t know what it"s like to be poor." - Bernie Sanders
"You can never get a cup of tea large enough or a book long enough to suit me." - C.S. Lewis
"I think for the most part, if you're really honest with what you want out of life, usually life gives it to you." - Ted Mosby (How I Met Your Mother)
"Our progress in degeneracy appears to me to be pretty rapid. As a nation, we begin..." - Abraham Lincoln (really)
"With the exception of the late great Abraham Lincoln, I can be more presidential than any president that has ever held this office, that I can tell you." --Donald Trump 7/25/2017
[REQUEST] "When a smart person and an idiot argue, to passers-by, they both look like idiots"....?
"Experience is not only the best teacher...it's the only teacher."
"He who has a why to live for can bear almost any how." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Fuck goals, I have standards." -XXMCID
"Tell your heart that the fear of suffering is worse than the suffering itself. No heart has ever suffered when it goes in search of its dreams, because every second of the search is a second's encounter with God and with eternity." - Paulo Coelho
"There's more beauty in the truth even if it is dreadful beauty." - John Steinbeck
"I scream the entire time I'm on an airplane. From takeoff to landing, I'm howling like a banshee." -John Travolta
"Don't tell me it's impossible, tell me you can't do it. Tell me it's never been donethe only thing we really know are Maxwell's equations, the three laws of Newton, the two postulates of relativity, and the periodic table. That's all we know that's true. All the rest are man's laws." - Dean Kamen
"I am aware that I am less than some people prefer me to be, but most people are unaware that I am so much more than what they see." Douglas Pagels
"Be fearless in the pursuit of what sets your soulon fire."
"The reasonable man adapts himself to the world; the unreasonable one persists in trying to adapt the world to himself."George Bernard Shaw
"If everywhere you go smells like shit, maybe it's time to check your shoes." - Anonymous
"If it's not happy, then it's not the end" -unknown
"I moved on her like a bitch, but I couldn't get there. And she was married. Then all of a sudden, I see her - she's now got the big phony tits and everything. She's totally changed her look" - The President of the United States
"It's incredibly annoying that what should be considered private information is so painfully public." -A Redditor
"We should not let our fears hold us back from pursuing our hopes." John F. Kennedy
"You are not here merely to make a living. You are here in order to enable the world to live more amply, with greater vision, with a finer spirit of hope and achievement. You are here to enrich the world, and you impoverish yourself if you forget the errand." Woodrow Wilson, 28th US president
"Perseverance is not a long race; it is many short races one after another." - Walter Elliot
"A man writes because he is tormented, because he doubts. He needs to constantly prove to himself and the others that he's worth something. And if I know for sure that I'm a genius? Why write then? What the hell for?" - Andrei Tarkovsky
"My conscience wants vegetarianism to win over the world. And my subconscious is yearning for a piece of juicy meat. But what do I want?" - Andrei Tarkovsky
"If the road to hell is paved with good intentions, compromises on principles are the streetlights." -Gary Kasparov
"It's everyday, bro!" - Jake Paul
"Love is that condition in which the happiness of another person is essential to your own." - Robert A. Heinlein
"Always listen to yourself, Peekay. It is better to be wrong than simply to follow convention. If you are wrong, no matter, you have learned something and you grow stronger. If you are right, you have taken another step toward a fulfilling life." - Bryce Courtenay, The Power of One
"In school we learn that mistakes are bad, and we are punished for making them. Yet, if you look at the way humans are designed to learn, we learn by making mistakes. We learn to walk by falling down. If we never fell down, we would never walk." - Robert T. Kiyosaki, Rich Dad, Poor Dad
"I am not the things my family did, I am not the voices in my head, I am not the pieces of the brokenness inside, I am light." - I Am Light, India.Arie
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"No one is an expert on the whole kernel, but you can know an area well" -Linus Torvald
"The greatest weapon against stress is our ability to choose one thought over another." William James.
"The best thing about a picture is that it never changes, even when the people in it do."  Andy Warhol
"Ships don't sink because of the water around them; ships sink because of the water that gets in them. Don't let what's happening around you get inside you and weigh you down." -Unknown
"Ruthlessness, cunning, patience, sweetness." - Carlos Castaneda
"Always there has been an adventure just around the corner--and the world is still full of corners." - Roy Chapman Andrews
"Don"t you know yet? It is your Light that lights the worlds."  Rumi
"The question isn"t who is going to let me; it"s who is going to stop me." - Ayn Rand
"You build a thousand bridges but fuck one goat. You know what they'll call you? A goat fucker." -1stSgt Frazier
"know yourself" -Socrates
"you cant decide how in love you are with someone, but you can decide how good that love is for you."
"Home is a place where you grow up wanting to leave, and grow old wanting to get back to."
"Love is a serious mental disease" -Plato
" I know that I know know nothing." -Socrates
"Action without study is fatal. Study without action is futile." --Mary Ritter Beard
"Praise is like sunlight to the human spirit; we cannot flower and grow without it." Jess Lair
"Resentment is like drinking poison and hoping it will kill your enemies." -- Nelson Mandela
"What"s the difference between a cannibal and a liberal? A cannibal doesn"t eat his friends." -- Lyndon Johnson
"All stable processes we shall predict. All unstable processes we shall control." - John Von Neumann
"We can easily forgive a child who is afraid of the dark; the real tragedy of life is when men are afraid of the light. " -Plato
"If there must be trouble, let it be in my day, that my child may have peace." -Thomas Paine
"You never change things by fighting the existing reality. To change something, build a new model that makes the existing model obsolete." - Buckminster Fuller
"We have the same problem as everyone else: It"s very hard to predict the future."- Charlie Munger
'Just improve yourself; that is the only thing you can do to better the world.' - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Love. I've been trying to remember what that feels like - to be in love. It's been a while. For whatever reason, it has passed me by. The closet I got felt like food poisoning"
"If there's one thing I've learned from playing Tetris is that mistakes accumulate and success vanishes." - by whom?
"Whether you think you can or you can't you're right." Henry Ford
"The World Will Ask You Who You Are, And If You Don't Know, The World Will Tell You." -Carl Jung
"There is no justice in the laws of Nature, Headmaster, no term for fairness in the equations of motion. The universe is neither evil, nor good, it simply does not care. The stars don't care, or the Sun, or the sky. But they don't have to! We care! There is light in the world, and it is us!"
"We have two lives, and the second begins when we realize we only have one." - Confucius
"Truth is the only safe ground to stand upon. The moment we begin to fear the opinions of others and hesitate to tell the truth that is in us, and from motives of policy are silent when we should speak, the divine floods of light and life no longer flow into our souls." - Elizabeth Cady Stanton
"Such a terrible decision it is- letting someone become your sunlight, and after they leave seeing yourself become dried out, curling up as if to die."
"Sometimes life is like this dark tunnel, you can"t always see the light at the end of the tunnel, but if you just keep moving, you will come to a better place." - general Iroh (ATLA)
"Life isn't nearly as sacred as the appreciation of passion." - Kurt Cobain
"These mountains that you are carrying, you were only supposed to climb."  Najwa Zebian
"The religious life begins when we discover that God is not a postulate of ethics, but the only adventure in which it is worth the trouble to risk ourselves." -Nicols Gmez Dvila
"The second half of a man"s life is made up of nothing but the habits he has accumulated during the first half." -Fyodor Dostoyevsky, "Demons"
"Anyone who proposes to do good must not expect people to roll stones out of his way, but must accept his lot calmly, even if they roll a few stones upon it."- Albert Schweitzer
"The eyes of others our prisons; their thoughts our cages." - Virginia Woolf
"Nothing is given as willingly, and taken as unwillingly, as advice." - Rochefoucauld
"The best people possess a feeling for beauty, the courage to take risks, the discipline to tell the truth, the capacity for sacrifice. Ironically, their virtues make them vulnerable; they are often wounded, sometimes destroyed." - Ernest Hemingway
"we were brought here on this earth to show the humans how beautiful a monster can be" -unknown
"I mean, they say you die twice. One time when you stop breathing and a second time, a bit later on, when somebody says your name for the last time." - Banksy
"just because you arent fearless doesnt mean you arent brave" -unknown
"In an age of speed, nothing could be more invigorating than going slow. In an age of distraction, nothing can feel more luxurious than paying attention. And in an age of constant movement, nothing is more urgent than sitting still."  Pico Iyer
"As democracy is perfected, the office of president represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people. On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart"s desire at last and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron."  H. L. Mencken
"no one man can carry the burden of total genocide" - Master Miller (Metal Gear Solid: Peace Walker)
"You"re only here for a short visit. Don"t hurry, don"t worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way." Walter Hagen
"I believe that every right implies a responsibility; every opportunity an obligation; every possession a duty." -John D. Rockefeller, Jr.
"I like being alone. I have control over my own shit. Therefore, in order to win me over, your presence has to feel better than my solitude. You're not competing with another person, you are competing with my comfort zones."  Horacio Jones
"People say, 'Artist, study nature!' But it is no small matter to develop what is noble out of what is common, beauty out of what lacks form." - Goethe.
"Watch your thoughts; they become words. Watch your words; they become actions. Watch your actions; they become habits. Watch your habits; they become character. Watch your character; it becomes your destiny." - Lao Tzu
"It is good to have an end to journey toward; but it is the journey that matters, in the end." - Ernest Hemingway
"The funny thing about never being asked for anything is that after a while you start to feel like maybe you don"t have anything worth giving." - Lev Grossman,
"I have an unhealthy obsession with spending money, but I have a healthy obsession with making it. So it's all good." - Conor McGregor
"You will achieve more in this world through acts of mercy than you will through acts of retribution" - Nelson Mandela
"Control the information, control the dialogue." -Me
"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have." -- Thomas Jefferson
"The simplest way to bring balance to your thoughts and emotions is unwavering commitment towards something". - Sadhguru
"Through our eyes, the universe perceiving itself. Through our ears, the universe is listening to its harmonies. We are the witnesses through which the universe becomes conscious of its glory, of its magnificence." Alan Watts
"I"ve never heard of anyone stumbling on something sitting down."  Charles F. Kettering
5 Am is the time when legends either waking up or going to sleep.
"When tyranny becomes law, rebellion is a right." - Simon Bolivar
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world" - Mahatma Gandhi
"No matter how you end up there or where you are, humans have a miraculous ability to make that place home. " -Creed Brattonn, The Office
"Being an adult means betraying your ideals and participating in the process of actively making the world a worse place." - Roman Belic, The Lord of Titties
"Money is not earned on the stock exchange with the head, but with the butt" - Andre Kostolany
"The only time its bad to be predictable is when you are in a fight with someone and they know all of your next moves."-Katelynn
"Pocket Sand" - Dale Gribble
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched -- they must be felt with the heart" - Helen Keller
"It is important that you say what you mean to say. Time is too short. You must speak the words that matter." - Kate DiCamillo, The Magician's Elephant
"I'd say in a given week I probably only do about fifteen minutes of real, actual, work." -Peter Gibbons (Office Space)
"I do not fear death. I had been dead for billions and billions of years before I was born, and had not suffered the slightest inconvenience from it." - Mark Twain
"The desire to perform all the time is usually a barrier to performing over time."  Robert Olstein
"For those who believe, no proof is necessary. For those who don't believe, no proof is possible." - Stuart Chase
"We sometimes encounter people, even perfect strangers, who begin to interest us at first sight, somehow suddenly, all at once, before a word has been spoken." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"When you do the common things in life in an uncommon way, you will command the attention of the world." - George Washington Carver
"What is human existence? It turns out it"s pretty simple: We are dead stars, looking back up at the sky." Michelle Thaller
"I think being in love with life is a key to eternal youth." Doug Hutchison
"I had always hoped that this land might become a safe & agreeable Asylum to the virtuous & persecuted part of mankind, to whatever nation they might belong." -George Washington (1788)
"For it is not death or pain that is to be feared, but the fear of pain or death." - Epictetus
"When one burns one's bridges, what a very nice fire it makes." - Dylan Thomas
"How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives." -Annie Dillard
"It is better to hear the rebuke of the wise, than for a man to hear the song of fools." --Ecclesiasties
"Live a life of love, peace, purpose and meaning. And happiness will come from this."
"We cannot become what we want to beby remaining what we are." - Max Dupree
"Nothing changes if nothing changes"
"So much more than I can carry, I keep dragging around what's bringing me down, If I just let go, I'd be set free" - Chester Bennington in 'Heavy' (Linkin Park)
"One out of a million dropouts becomes Steve Jobs. Do you know who become the losers with no jobs? The other 99,000!" -Haley Dunphy
"The most important kind of freedom is to be what you really are. You trade in your reality for a role. You trade in your sense for an act. You give up your ability to feel, and in exchange, put on a mask. There can't be any large-scale revolution...
"Rather than love, than money, than fame, give me truth."
"I learned this, at least, by my experiment: that if one advances confidently in the direction of his dreams, and endeavors to live the life which he has imagined, he will meet with a success unexpected in common hours." - Henry David Thoreau
"Try not giving a fuck, there's a lot of power in that." - Marc Maron
"Death is only the end if you assume the story is about you." -Welcome To Nightvale
"A little piece of paper with a picture drawn floats. On down the street till the wind is gone. The memory now is like the picture was then. When the paper"s crumpled up it can"t be perfect again." Chester Bennington.
"When you talk, you are only repeating what you know. But when you listen, you learn something new." -- Dalai Lama
"When elephants fight, it's the grass that suffers." -African Proverb
"Waiting for the end to come, wishing I had strength to stand. This is not what I had planned. It's out of my control." - Chester Bennington (Linkin Park)
"Progress is impossible without change and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything." George Bernard Shaw
"Keep a cool head and maintain a low profile. Never take the lead - but aim to do something big." - Deng Xiaoping
"Your mind, if you have one, is not in your head. Your head is in your mind." Alan Watts
"Nothing great is created suddenly, any more than a bunch of grapes or a fig. If you tell me that you desire a fig. I answer you that there must be time. Let it first blossom, then bear fruit, then ripen." - Epictetus
"Someone who thinks the world is always cheating him is right. He is missing that wonderful feeling of trust in someone or something." - Eric Hoffer
"whenever i'm about do something, i think, 'would an idiot do that?' and if they would, i do not do that thing." -dwight k. schrute
"Have no fear of perfection - you'll never reach it." - Salvador Dal
"That elusive thing called culture is really only an inheritable legacy available only to insufferable snobs, of which Miss Scott, I'm afraid you are a charter member." - Policeman Robert Franklin (Twilight Zone S.5 ep. 35)
"That elusive thing called culture is really only an inheritable legacy available only to insufferable snobs, of which Miss Scott, I'm afraid you are a character member." - Policeman Robert Franklin (Twilight Zone S.5 ep. 35)
"The problem with the world is that the intelligent people are full of doubts, while the stupid ones are full of confidence." - Charles Bukowski
"I seek not only to follow in the footsteps of the men of old, I seek the things they sought." - Matsuo Basho
"At the age of six, I wanted to be a cook. At seven I wanted to be Napoleon. And my ambition has been growing steadily ever since." -Salvador Dali
"The foundation of success in life is good health: that is the substratum fortune; it is also the basis of happiness. A person cannot accumulate a fortune very well when he is sick." - P. T. Barnum
"Free markets and free minds help foster a free world." - Michael Gunter (Self)
"Well, That's the problem with life, right? Either you know what you want, and then you don't get what you want. Or you get what you want, and then you don't know what you want." -Diane Nguyen, Bojack Horseman
"There is only one happiness in this life, to love and be loved." George Sand
"We have Evolved too much" - Me (Alex Ramirez)
"My mind is like a tunnel, the deeper you go into it, the darker it gets."
4. "Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves." Carl Jung
"Reality is an aggregate of the perceptions of all creatures, not just ourselves." - Jim Harrison
"People are like colors, they're everything but what they reflect themselves as..." -Chandini Meti
"No man, proclaimed Donne, is an Island, and he was wrong. If we were not islands, we would be lost, drowned in each other's tragedies." -Neil Gainman (American Gods)
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% what you do with what happens to you." -Anonymous
"IN THE END, YOU HAVE TO CHOOSE WHETHER YOU"RE GOING TO LIVE AS A SOLDIER, OR JUST ANOTHER MAN WITH A GUN." - The Boss (Metal Gear Solid 3)
"Never say you regret something, because at that moment you wanted it." -Anonomyous
"Names are a great mystery. I've never known whether the name is molded by the child or the child changed to fit the name. But you can be sure of this - whenever a human has a nickname it is a proof that the name given him was wrong." - John Steinbeck
"I like nonsense; it wakes up the brain cells." - Dr. Seuss
"Take a chance! All life is a chance. The man who goes farthest is generally the one who is willing to do and dare." Dale Carnegie
"The world is so simple, when you are." u/X014LIFE
"A nation is born stoic, and dies epicurean"  Will Durant
"Be the gains you want to see in the world" - Mahatma Gaindy
"Be the change you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Some people feel the rain. Others just get wet." - Unknown
"If you don"t pay appropriate attention to what has your attention, it will take more of your attention than it deserves."  David Allen
"If you don't find a way to make money while you sleep, you will work until you die."- Warren Buffett
"We are always the same age inside." -- Gertrude Stein
"We stopped looking for monsters under our bed when we realized that they were inside us." - Charles Darwin
"Close your eyes to what you can't imagine"-Earl Sweatshirt
"Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false, and by the rulers as useful." - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"Power is of two kinds. One is obtained by the fear of punishment and the other by acts of love. Power based on love is a thousand times more effective and permanent then the one derived from fear of punishment." - Mahatma Gandhi
"If you wait long enough, even a monster on the other side of the door becomes normal." -What Remains of Edith Finch
"Was I ever crazy? Maybe. Or maybe life is... Crazy isn't being broken, or swallowing a dark secret. It is you or me amplified. If you ever told a lie and enjoyed it. If you ever wished you could be a child forever..." - Girl, Interrupted
"I don't know why people expect art to make sense. They accept the fact that life doesn't make sense."  David Lynch
"The enduring always seems to look down upon the transient with a superiority that alternates between derision and tolerance." -Hermann Hesse
"Words are easy, like the wind; Faithful friends are hard to find." - William Shakespeare
"If you have two friends in your lifetime, you"re lucky. If you have one good friend, you"re more than lucky." - S.E. Hinton
"No person is your friend who demands your silence, or denies your right to grow." - Alice Walker
"All joy in this world comes from wanting others to be happy, and all suffering in this world comes from wanting only oneself to be happy." - Shantideva
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." Charles Darwin
"THERE IS NO SUCH THING AS LUCK ON THE BATTLEFIELD." - The Boss (Metal Gear Solid 3)
"If you want to see the true measure of a man, watch how he treats his inferiors, not his equals." -J. K. Rowling
"the world's still the same, there's just less in it" - Jack Sparrow
"Keep your eyes on the stars, and your feet on the ground."
"Even a stopped clock gives the right time twice a day" - Withnail and I
"When it rains, look for rainbows. When it's dark, look for stars."
"Someone I loved once gave me a box full of darkness. It took me years to understand that this too was a gift" - Mary Oliver.
''Imagination is everything. It is the preview of life"s coming attractions.''  Albert Einstein
"When two gay men have sex, how do they know which ones penis will open up to accept the others?" - Dwight Schrute
"Experience has shown that you can often do just fine being on the wrong side of history if you are on the right side of a pipeline." Gary Kasparov
"If you can't fly then run, if you can't run then walk, if you can't walk then crawl, but whatever you do you have to keep moving forward." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"How to convert a weak wish into a burning will? Fuel it with a strong purpose." - Jaykaran Sagar
"The value of a man should be seen in what he gives and not in what he is able to receive." - Albert Einstein
"Laziness is the best tool against those who try to enslave you." - Ulev Trovaninovsky
"May your choices reflect your hopes, not your fears." - Nelson Mandela
"Whatever you do always give 100%.Unless you are donating Blood" -collected
"Reputation is a surveillance system. A decentralized surveillance system, but a surveillance system nonetheless!" - Vinay Gupta
"The opposite of love is not hate, it's indifference..." -Elie Wiesel
"Good things happen in your life when you surround yourself with positive people." - Roy T. Bennett
"Nothing real can be threatened. Nothing unreal exists." Herein lies the peace of God. - Helen Schucman
"Nothing real can be threatened. Nothing unreal exists." Herein lies the peace of God. - Helen Schucman
"What screws us up most in life is the picture in our head of how it is supposed to to be." - Unknown
"Jim is my enemy. But it turns out, Jim is also his own worst enemy. And the enemy of my enemy is my friend. So Jim is actually my friend." - Dwight Schrute
"It was a leap of faith - to throw one's heart across a gulf, and trust another to catch it. His own was still in flight across the void, with no certainty of landing. But still in flight." - Drums of Autumn
"If life is an ocean than I am a deep and handsome fish, A fish that's drowning" - Bo Burnham
"There's always winners and losers in the evolutionary process, the main difference is how winners treat losers: that's how we know if there's progress or not." - Somebody
"There's only one thing that I know how to do well. And I've often been told that you only can do What you know how to do well. And that's be you, Be what you're like, Be like yourself, And so I'm having a wonderful time But I'd rather be whistling in the dark" - they might be giants
"To know what life is worth you have to risk it once in a while." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"if ignorance is bliss then down syndrome must be euphoria" - Frank Gallagher (Shameless)
"The man who moves a mountain begins by carrying away small stones." Confucius
"The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of the strong." - Mahatma Gandhi
"If you don't achieve your dreams you can still get a lot by trying for it. There is an expression I love, experience is what you get when you don't get what you wanted."  Randy Pausch
"You know what I consider the worst disability of all?...." -Richard Turner
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." Winston Churchill
"Life is not equal. Life is not fair. And in many instances life is not just. But life is. And therefore we must." -anonymous
"Net neutrality is the principle that Internet speeds should be limited only by the viruses you downloaded looking at porn."
"Nearly all men can stand adversity. But if you want to test a man"s character, give him power." - Robert Ingersoll
"Light is coming from you. You can't see it but everyone else can."  Unknown
"If you meet a loner, no matter what they tell you, it's not because they enjoy solitude. It's because they have tried to blend into the world before, and people continue to disappoint them." - Jodi Picoult
"There is nothing I would not do for those who are really my friends. I have no notion of loving people by halves, it is not my nature." -Jane Austen, Northanger Abbey
"Beware of the person of one book." -Thomas Aquinas
"Do not suppose that I have come to bring peace to the earth. I did not come to bring peace, but a sword. For I have come to turn a man against his father, a daughter against her mother, a daughter-in-law against her mother-in-law - a man's enemies will be the members of his own household." - Jesus
"Try not to become a person of success, but rather try to become a person of value."  Albert Einstein
"Blessed are the forgetful, for they get the better even of their blunders" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I have killed a man. But I am not a murderer." - Soghomon
"Did you ever stop to think that a dog is the only animal that doesn't have to work to make a living? A hen has to lay eggs, a cow has to give milk, and a canary has to sing. But a dog makes his living by giving you nothing but love"-Dale Carnegie
"Things are only impossible until they're not." -Jean-Luc Picard
"It is true, as they say, that the blossoms of spring are all the more precious because they bloom so briefly." - Murasaki Shikibu
"Games are won by players who focus on the playing field - not by those whose eyes are glued to the scoreboard." - Warren Buffett
"So avoid using the word "very" because it"s lazy. A man is not very tired, he is exhausted. Don"t use very sad, use morose. Language was invented for one reason, boys - to woo women - and, in that endeavor, laziness will not do. It also won"t do in your essays." - N.H. Kleinbaum
"Those who are looking for risk-free returns are more likely to find returns-free risk.": Warren Buffett
"Dieters are trapped in a nutritional Catch-22: In order not to eat a dieter needs will power. In order to have will power, a dieter needs to eat. " - Roy Baumeister
"We cannot tear out a single page of our life, but we can throw the whole book in the fire." - George Sand, Mauprat
"Don't trust everything on the internet," -Abe Lincoln
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde.
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days, before you've actually left them" -Andy Bernard, The Office
"If I didn't think, I'd be much happier; if I didn't have any sex organs, I wouldn't waver on the brink of nervous emotion and tears all the time. " - Sylvia Plath
"Life is a game with series of hurdle, to win it just play it. Don't ignore" - Akagat
"You have enemies? Good. That means you've stood up for something, sometime in your life."
"No one could ever hate me half as much as I don"t care" - Frankie Boyle
"If you only read the books that everyone else is reading, you can only think what everyone else is thinking." - Haruki Murakami
"The more you protect yourself from things that offend you, the more likely smaller things will offend you" Rudolf P Belmar
"Dead leaves picked up by the shovelful, memories and regrets also..." - Jacques Prvert
"Learn to enjoy every minute of your life. Be happy now. Don't wait for something outside of yourself to make you happy in the future. Think how really precious is the time you have to spend, whether it's at work or with your family. Every minute should be enjoyed and savored." Earl Nightingale
"Don't you ever regret knowing someone in your life. Good people will give you happiness, bad people will give you experience, while the worst people will give you a lesson and the best people will always give you memories."  Krishna
"The flower doesn"t dream of the bee. It blossoms and the bee comes."  Mark Nepo
"If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people to collect wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long for the endless immensity of the sea." - Antoine de Saint-Exupery
"Courage is the passport, when your whole world is the pier."
"A ship in harbor is safe, but that is not what ships are built for." - John A. Shedd
"When there are no facts to support lies, facts must be made." Eric Ambler ("A Coffin for Dimitrios") (1937)
"Whom the gods wish to destroy they first call promising." Cyril Connolly ("Enemies of Promise")
"... we pay a price for everything we get or take in this world; and though ambitions are well worth having, they are not cheaply won, but exact their dues of work and self-denial, anxiety and discouragement." L.M. Montgomery (Anne of Green Gables) (1908)
"We will suffera lotthen die, and then die off."
"There are seven days in a week and someday isn't one of them"
"Business is a lot like a game of tennis. Those who serve well usually end up winning."
"It will never rain roses: when we want to have more roses, we must plant more roses." George Eliot (Mary Ann Evans)
"We are here in this instant that waited for its turn since the dawn of time."
"Making plans for the future is of use only to people who are capable of living completely in the present" -Alan Watts
"It is a capital mistake to theorise before you have all the evidence. It biases the judgment." -Sherlock Holmes
"Coincidence is God's way of remaining anonymous." - Albert Einstein
"Well the S.A.T's don't mean shit. That's like believing in Scientology." - Rat Billings (Adult World)
"Well the S.A.T's don't mean shit. That's like believing in Scientology" - Rat Billings (Adult World)
"Act out being alive, like a play. And after a while, a long while, it will be true." - John Steinbeck
"The mark of the immature man is that he wants to die nobly for a cause, while the mark of the mature man is that he wants to live humbly for one."
"The art of life is the art of avoiding pain" -Thomas Jefferson
"It"s frustrating how much personal effectiveness we sacrifice because we"re too busy trying not to offend anyone."
"The world is changed. I feel it in the water. I feel it in the earth. I smell it in the air. Much that once was is lost....for none now live who remember it." - Tolkien
"The day we fret about the future is the day we leave our childhood behind." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Name of the Wind
"Which is why love's only demand is that we fall" -Shaun David Huntchinson (We Are the Ants)
"If you wish to see the truth.. then hold no opinions"
"Don't bend; don't water it down; don't try to make it logical; don't edit your own soul according to the fashion. Rather, follow your most intense obsessions mercilessly" - Franz Kafka
"Anyone can be complicated, simplicity, that's hard"
"Music Can Change lives. whether you are having a good or bad day, the power of music can change one's mood." - Jess Bowen
"Make visible what, without you, might perhaps never have been seen." (-Robert Bresson)
"The inner fire is the most important thing mankind possesses." Edith Sodergran
"It's okay to fight for someone who loves. It's not okay to fight for someone to love you. There's a huge difference."
"Birds that are born in a cage think that freedom is a crime" - Anonymous
"When another person makes you suffer, it is because he suffers deeply within himself, and his suffering is spilling over. He does not need punishment; he needs help." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"Intelligence isn"t the top trait an investor needs to have. I would rank patience and discipline above brains."- Eddy Elfenbein
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do. So throw off the bowlines. Sail away from the safe harbor. Catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore. Dream. Discover."  Mark Twain
"Complete realization & awareness of the ground reality is knowledge" - Dr. Aniruddha D Joshi
"If opportunity doesn't knock, build a door." - Milton Berle
" The walls have ears. Your ears have walls ! " ( written on a wall, may 1968, Paris )
"you and we should say what we really think, and aim only at what is possible, for we both alike know that into the discussion of human affairs the question of justice only enters where the pressure of necessity is equal, and that the powerful exact what they can, and the weak grant what they must"
"Not being heard is no reason for silence." - Victor Hugo, Les Misrables, 1862
"People remember the rule, and not what the rule was intended to do." - Anonymous
"A secret is a truth that can only be shown, not told. Everything else is simply confidential information." - Anonymous.
"I can't fucking breath, much less believe, the truth" --- Lydia by Highly Suspect
"When one is a little boy you expect a big happiness, a vast and absolute happiness. And in the meantime, as we await for this phenomenon to ocurr, we let the little joys pass by, the only ones there are." Ernesto Sbato.
"Things turn out best for the people who make the best of the way things turn out." -John Wooden
"YOUR MIND IS A POWERFUL THING. WHEN YOU FILL IT WITH POSITIVE THOUGHTS, YOUR LIFE WILL START TO CHANGE."
"a good scientist should always welcome the opportunity to be proved wrong"
"Your time is limited, so don't waste it living someone else's life. Don't be trapped by dogma - which is living with the results of other people's thinking. Don't let the noise of others' opinions drown out your own inner voice." -Steve Jobs
"Mankind Just love His/Her past,Nothing Else..." by Asif Salim
"Yes, I sometimes fail, but at least I'm willing to experiment."  Bono
"Inaction breeds doubt and fear. Action breeds confidence and courage." Dale Carnegie
"And I have one of those very loud, stupid laughs. I mean if I ever sat behind myself in a movie or something, I'd probably lean over and tell myself to please shut up." - J.D. Salinger, The Catcher in the Rye
"Love is so short, forgetting is so long." (-Pablo Neruda)
"The boat is safer anchored at the port; but that"s not the aim of boats." - Paulo Coelho
"Start where you are, with what you have. Make something of it and never be satisfied." - George Washington Carver
"Even though we"re in the same time zone, my wife is always one hour ahead of me." - Conan O'Brien
"Progress is impossible without change, and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything." George Bernard Shaw
"Consult not your fears, but your hopes and your dreams." - Pope John XXIII
"Let your hopes not your hurts shape your future." - Robert H. Schuller
"When I created the Web, I didn't have to ask anyone's permission." - Tim Berners-Lee, creator of the Web, on net neutrality in 2006
"Life is a game of chess and you never really know when you are winning or losing." -Anonymous
"My fingers are long and beautiful, as, it has been well documented, are various other parts of my body." - Donald Trump
"Never memorize something that you can look up." - Albert Einstein
"Rest in peace to my doubts. A funeral for my fears" - March Wonder
"Those who fall...will be forgotten...Those who rise up...their names will be remembered forever!" -Akande Ogundimu
"Far better is it to dare mighty things, to win glorious triumphs, even though checkered by failure... than to rank with those poor spirits who neither enjoy nor suffer much, because they live in a gray twilight that knows not victory nor defeat." -Theodore Roosevelt
"Man needs difficulties; they are necessary for health."  Carl Jung, (1916)
"They may forget what you said, but they will never forget how you made them feel." -Anonymous
"My son is a high quality person" - Donald J. Trump
"You fell victim to one of the classic blunders - the most famous of which is "never get involved in a land war in Asia" - but only slightly less well-known is this: "Never go in against a Sicilian when death is on the line"! Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha! Ha ha ha ha ha ha ha! Ha ha h--" -vizzini
"If you can market a product, you're going to do well. If you can market a great product, doubly so - but if you can market absolute SHIT, then the sky is the limit!" - me, 2017.
"Only after disaster can we be resurrected. It's only after you've lost everything that you're free to do anything. Nothing is static, everything is evolving, everything is falling apart" - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"Religion is for people who're afraid of going to hell. Spirituality is for those who've already been there." - Vine Deloria Jr.
"Never judge a book by its cover"
"Go your own way". -Fleetwood Mac
"One is the most dangerous things in the universe is an ignorant people with real grievances. It is nowhere near as dangerous, however, as an informed and intelligent society with grievances." - Miles Teg - Heretics of Dune
"If you don't learn from your mistakes, then they become regrets." John Cena
"Y'all ever met someone who brought you comfort naturally? Like when you with them you forget about anything bad and instantly feel relief."
"Investment success does not require glamour stocks or bull markets."- John Neff
"Better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to tweet and remove all doubt."
''Calm mind brings inner strength and self-confidence, so that"s very important for good health.''  Dalai Lama
"Nothing diminishes anxiety faster than action." - Walter Anderson
"Have you lost a thousand years in a single smile?" - misheard peter steele
"Knowledge finds its purpose in action and action its reason in knowledge" -- Charles Coulston Gillispie
"What serious function does a butterfly have? What economic value? A little pollination here and there for what? Milkweed? And yet, how extraordinary is it that child and adult alike note nearly every arrival of a butterfly on a plant or its path floating across a yard." -William McDonough
"God, grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, Courage to change the things I can, and Wisdom that I may know the difference" - Reinhold Niebuhr
"If only I could tell myself there's plenty fish in the sea. But see, the sea is full of sharks, fake guppies and greed. And as I find myself drownin' while I'm fightin' to breathe, I realize that I'm in love with what I thought we could be" - Witt Lowry
"I ask mummy why we can't remember the future. She always responds with ' don't ask why; it's complicated.'" - Nemo Nobody (Mr. Nobody)
"I ask mummy why we can't remember the past. She always responds with ' don't ask why; it's complicated.'" - Nemo Nobody (Mr. Nobody)
"The person who has to bake a loaf to earn the money to buy a slice of bread is not free."  Unknown
"Self respect comes with self reliance." - Abdul Kalam
"Every time a man is begotten and born, the clock of human life is wound up anew to repeat once more its same old tune that has already been played innumerable times, movement by movement and measure by measure, with insignificant variations."-Arthur Schopenhauer
"There are two rules for success: 1. Never reveal everything you know." -Edward Nashton
"We should seek the truth without hesitation; and, if we refuse it, we show that we value the esteem of men more than the search for truth." - Blaise Pascal
"I don't know. A proof is a proof. What kind of a proof? It's a proof. A proof is a proof, and when you have a good proof, it's because it's proven." - Jean Chretien
"Intelligence without ambition is a bird without wings."-Salvador Dali
"When man finally learns to control the elements... When the winds will be quiet and the earth cannot be torn apart...When there will be no loneliness... no destitution... no war... When the last hungry man, woman or child is fed... Only then will there be no need for the Red Cross."
"Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent" - Isaac Asimov.
"Don't wait for the Last Judgment. It takes place every day." --- Albert Camus
. "No battle plan, survives contact with the enemy." - Helmuth von Moltke
"Life IS pain. Anyone who says differently is trying to sell you something." - Dread Pirate Roberts
"Nobody exists on purpose, nobody belongs anywhere, everybody's gonna die. Come watch TV" - Morty Smith
"If we can judge our fellow-creatures at all, which is doubtful, it is by the books they read, and by those which, having read, they read again." -- Mary Cholmondeley from the novel Sir Charles Danvers (1889)
"Keep your eye on the doughnut, not on the hole." -David Lynch
"What is lacking among all these moralists, whether religious or rational, is an understanding of the brutal character of the behavior of all human collectives, and the power of self-interest and collective egoism in all intergroup relations..."
"Lose one friend, lose all friends, lose yourself" - Eric Matthews A.K.A Plays With Squirrels
"Existence is pain" - Mr Meeseeks
"If you dream it, you can do it." -Walt Disney
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside of you." -Maya Angelou
"Everybody has a plan until they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson.
"I Lost myself trying to please everyone. Now I'm losing everyone as I find myself."
"There is only one way to avoid criticism: Do nothing, say nothing, and be nothing." Aristotle
"no love lost, no love found" -Eminem
"Sorry losers and haters, but my I.Q. is one of the highest and you all know it! Please don't feel so stupid or insecure, it's not your fault." - Donald Trump
"Are a thousand tears, worth a single smile?" - peter steele
"It's difficult to say whether this is merely ridiculous, or totally delusional" -Joel Brenner
"When the impossibility of replacing a person is realized, it allows the responsibility which a man has for his existence and its continuance to appear in all its magnitude." - Vicktor Frankl
"Every generation throws a hero up the pop charts." - Paul Simon
''Nothing is, unless our thinking makes it so.''  Shakespeare
"I"m a guy who knows nothing - I wouldn"t know a gamma ray if it walked in here and hit me. I don"t know what a cosmic ray is. But they sound good! And that"s the important thing." - Stan Lee
"Parenting isn"t sacrifice. It"s growth into an area we didn"t anticipate." - Able Kinetic
"Growing old is mandatory; growing up is optional." - Chili Davis
"If you want to be successful, you must respect one rule: never lie to yourself." -Paolo Coelho
"Bad things do happen; how I respond to them defines my character and the quality of my life. I can choose to sit in perpetual sadness, immobilized by the gravity of my loss, or I can choose to rise from the pain and treasure the most precious gift I have  life itself."  Walter Anderson
"History is written by the victors" - Winston Churchill
"We are all one" - Nikola Tesla
"Coming back to where you started is not the same as never leaving."  Terry Pratchett
"All progress takes place out of comfort zone." When are you planning to get out of it?
"In this moment, I am euphoric. Not because of any phony god's blessing. But because, I am enlightened by my intelligence." -Socrates
"Today is the oldest you've ever been, and the youngest you'll ever be again." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"In all my life, in casting lines to and forth, it would seem connections are not made, they are discovered."
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
''You might as well ask a horse to fix a merry-go-round, he'll do his best, but mostly he'll just get horrified'' - Rick Sanchez
"Next year, you'll wish you had started today."
"There's always free cheddar in a mousetrap." - Tom Waits
"Tradition is the corpse of wisdom."
"I"d rather regret the things I"ve done than regret the things I haven"t done."  Lucille Ball
"Accept what you did not do than making excuses you could have done it"
"You destroy an enemy by making a friend of him" Abraham Lincoln
"I shall have to put up with a few caterpillars if I want to see butterflies." - Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"Sometimes life leaves a hundred dollar bill on your dresser, and you don't realize until later that it's because it fucked you."  Unknown
"Music is the movement of sound to reach the soul for the education of its virtue", Plato
"We May Encounter Many Defeats, But We Must Not Be Defeated"
"The end of all Penal Laws is that they are not to be applied." - Fichte
'For every minute you are angry you lose sixty seconds of happiness.' - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The very essence of romance is uncertainty." -Oscar Wilde
"Mostly it is loss which teaches us the worth of things"-Arthur Schopenhauer
"Snakes in the grass beneath our feet, stars in the sky above. Some moments last forever, and some fade out with love, love, love." -John Darnielle
"We sleep soundly in our beds because rough men stand ready in the night to visit violence on those who would do us harm." --- George Orwell
"Be bold, and mighty forces will come to your aid."  Basil King
"If the path before you is clear, you're probably on someone else's." -Joseph Campbell
"If the path before you is clear, you're probably on someone else's." "If the path before you is clear, you're probably on someone else's." "If the path before you is clear, you're probably on someone else's." "If the path before you is clear, you're probably on someone else's." -Joseph Campbell
"No one single answer is ever the answer" - a member of South Park's United Atheist League turned religious
"People damned to hell have a lot more time to think, and I need plenty of time to comprehend the little pocket of the universe I get to call my life." -Anonymous
"Do not confine your children to your own learning, for they were born in another time." -Ancient Chinese proverb
"I am a museum full of art but you had your eyes shut." - Rupi Kaur
"Not all readers are leaders, but all leaders are readers." - Harry S. Truman
"I live from one tentative conclusion to the next, thinking each one is final. The only thing I know for sure is that I am confused." - Hugh Prather, Notes to Myself: My Struggle to Become a Person
"Music washes away from the soul the dust of everyday life." - Berthold Auerbach
"People need to learn that their actions and words do affect other people. So be careful of what you say and do, it's not always just about you." - Jennifer Mohr
"If you judge people, you have no time to love them." - Mother Teresa
"life is as depressingly long as it is depressingly short" -some porn fanfiction I was reading but probably Nietzsche or some shit before that
"When I look at my family I have always thought, you all exist because I got laid" - Nana, Bent101.com (comedy series)
"Anyone can love a thing because. That's as easy as putting a penny in your pocket. But to love something despite. To know the flaws and love them too. That is rare and pure and perfect." -Pat Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
"You know in Botswana... You can't call a home a home... until you've consummated in it." Chandler house
"Don't try." - Charles Bukowski
"And one shall say unto him, 'What are these wounds in thine hands?' Then he shall answer, 'Those with which I was wounded in the house of my friends.'" -Zechariah 13:6
"Alone, we can do so little; together we can do so much." - Helen Keller
"My only answer as to why the Marines get the toughest jobs is because the average Leatherneck is a much better fighter. He has far more guts, courage, and better officers... These boys out here have a pride in the Marine Corps and will fight to the end no matter what the cost." Richard C. Kennard
"Freedom is something that dies unless it is used. -Hunter S. Thompson
"Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage." - Lao Tzu
"Your age doesn"t define your maturity, your grades don"t define your intellect, and rumors don"t define who you are."  Unknown
"Experimental results are believed by everyone, except the person who ran the experiment" - source anonymous, quoted by Dr. Max Gunzburger
"A woman once drove me to drink, and I never had the decency to thank her." -W. C. Fields
"One can contrive a religious motivation for virtually any choice of action, from commitment to the highest ideals to support for the most horrendous atrocities." -Noam Chomsky
"When you say 'YES' to others, make sure you are not saying 'NO' to yourself" - Paulo Coelho
"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have." Thomas Jefferson
"Music is the emotional life of most people." - Leonard Cohen
"Should man find his gods, his purpose would be to destroy them" - I don't know, please help
"When I see dead bodies, often I find myself looking at their socks, or the knots in their shoelaces. They didn't expect to die when they were getting dressed." Jeremy Bowen: Our Man in the Middle East, BBC Radio
"Don't play it like it's love. It's a memory of love."  conductor Francis Travis' instruction to a volunteer orchestra
"Disappointment is often the best of luck"- my Gran
"All things must come to an end, even when they're dripping with '90s nostalgia." -Garyx Wormuloid
"Well, ya know, the best thing money has done for me is given me a false sense of security, but a false sense of security is better than no sense of security." - Dave Chappelle
"Don't wait until you've reached your goal to be proud of yourself. Be proud of every step you take toward reaching your goal."
"You know you"ve read a good book when you turn the last page and feel a little as if you have lost a friend." -Paul Sweeney
"Cheer up beautiful people, this is where you get to make it right." Walter White to Elliot and Gretchen Schwartz
"The line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart?" - Solzhenitsyn
"Some people go to hell, others create it for themselves."
"Well, ya know, the best thing money has done for me is given me a false sense of security, but a false sense of security is better than no sense of security." - Dave Chappelle
"Dont criticize, condemn, or complain" -Dale Carnegie - How to Win Friends and Influence People
6+3=9 BUT SO DOES 5+4
"Most software today is very much like an Egyptian pyramid with millions of bricks piled on top of each other, with no structural integrity, but just done by brute force and thousands of slaves." - Alan Kay
"War is where the young and stupid are tricked by the old and bitter into killing each other" -Niko Bellic
"The difference between involvement and commitment is like ham and eggs. The chicken is involved; the pig is committed." -Martina Navratilova
"A great nation is not judged by its number of billionaires or corporate tax breaks. It's judged by how we treat our most vulnerable people." - Bernie Sanders
"I want to do it because I want to do it. Women must try to do things as men have tried. When they fail, their failure must be but a challenge to others."  Amelia Earhart
"A grownup is a child with layers on." - /r/RedditForGrownups submission page
"There was never a genius without a tincture of madness"
"Some people feel the rain. Others just get wet." - Bob Marley
"Try to be the reason someone cries every single day" - InspiroBot
"The deadliest weapon in the world is a MARINE and his rifle!" -GEN. PERSHING, US.ARMY
"The more MARINES I have around the better I like it!" -GEN. MARK CLARK, US.ARMY
"Music is subjective to everyone's unique experience." - Jared Leto
"And this I believe: that the free, exploring mind of the individual human is the most valuable thing in the world." - John Steinbeck
"I expect nothing and I'm still let down." - Dewey Wilkerson (Malcolm and the Middle)
"The key to success is to focus our conscious mind on things we desire, not things we fear." Brian Tracy
"America touts itself as the land of the free, but the number one freedom that you and I have is the freedom to enter into a subservient role in the workplace. Once you exercise this freedom you"ve lost all control over what you do, what is produced, and how it is produced." - Tom Morello
"I think...perhaps it is time to say goodbye. Thank you,my friend, for letting my last few hours mean something" Runas the Shamed
"Realize deeply that the present moment is all you will ever have." -Eckhart Tolle
"Just because you're trash doesn't mean you can't do great things. It is called 'garbage can', not 'garbage cannot'." - Oscar the Grouch
"I destroy my enemies when I make them my friends." - Abraham Lincoln
"Just because you're trash doesn't mean you can't do great things. It is called 'garbage can', not 'garbage cannot'." - Oscar the Grouch
"Whatever you feed your brain will become a reality."
"The whole history of the world is summed up in the fact that, when nations are strong, they are not always just, and when they wish to be just, they are no longer strong."  Winston Churchill
*"The whole history of the world is summed up in the fact that, when nations are strong, they are not always just, and when they wish to be just, they are no longer strong."*  Winston Churchill
"Diligence is the mother of good luck." Benjamin Franklin
"Devils are depicted with bats' wings and good angels with birds' wings, not because anyone holds that moral deterioration would be likely to turn feathers into membrane, but because most men like birds better than bats."  From the preface to The Screwtape Lettersby C. S. Lewis
"What would life be if we had no courage to attempt anything." - Vincent Van Gogh
"Come forth into the light of things. Let nature be your teacher" - William Wordsworth
"Try everything once, except incest and Morris dancing" - Sir Thomas Beecham
"When faced with untenable alternatives, you should consider your imperative" - Admiral Cain, Battlestar Galactica
"A mind all logic is like a knife all blade. It makes the hand bleed that uses it." --Rabindranath Tagore
"The Italian man has two main functions, to eat and to make love." Antonio Carluccio
"Give me six hours to chop down a tree and I will spend the first four sharpening the axe." -Abraham Lincoln
"I destroy my enemies when I make them my friends." -Abraham Lincoln
"Don"t brood. Get on with living and loving. You don"t have forever."  Leo Buscaglia
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power." - Abraham Lincoln
"When I write, I feel like an armless, legless man with a crayon in his mouth"  Kurt Vonnegut
"you could not remove a single grain of sand from its place without thereby ... changing something throughout all parts of the immeasurable whole" - Johann Gottlieb Fichte, The Vocation of Man (1800)
"Whenever we show pity, we empty our souls." -Andrei Tarkovsky
"There's a reason you separate military and the police. One fights the enemies of the state, the other serves and protects the people. When the military becomes both, then the enemies of the state tend to become the people."  Commander William Adama
"The stars don"t shine upon us, we"re in the way of their light" - David Berman
"Do what you feel in your heart to be right. You"ll be criticized anyway." Eleanor Roosevelt
"No one ever went broke underestimating the intelligence of the American people." -H.L. Mencken
"Everyone is willing to give you something for whatever it is they're hungry for."
"Sometimes it pays to stay in bed on Monday, rather than spending the rest of the week debugging Monday's code." - Christopher Thompson
"When you miss a shot, never think of what you did wrong. Take the next shot thinking of what you must do right." Tony Alfonso
'Sex is God's joke on human beings.' - Bette Davis
'Everything is changing. People are taking their comedians seriously and the politicians as a joke.' - Will Rogers
"We are a nation that won world wars without grabbing the resources of those we defeated. We helped them rebuild. We didn"t hold onto territory, other than the cemeteries where we buried our dead." -- Barak Obama in his final speech as Commander-In-Chief
"When you miss a shot, never think of what you did wrong. Take the next shot thinking of what you must do right." Tony Alfonso (Shared by www.homejobsway.com)
"Everyone knows that life isn"t fair. Saying it"s not fair suggests that you think life is supposed to be fair, which makes you look immature and naive." - Travis Bradberry
"Never attribute to malice that which is adequately explained by stupidity." -Jargon File
"Today you are You, that is truer than true. There is no one alive who is Youer than You." - Dr. Suess
"Today You Are You That Is Truer Than True There Is No One Alive That Is Youer Than You" - Dr. Suess
"Never doubt yourself. For you are as brave as the wave that throws itself upon the rocks. And my friend, it takes all the bravery in the world to live this life as you." - Millie Tang
"If you assume that there is no hope, you guarantee that there will be no hope. If you assume that there is an instinct for freedom, that there are opportunities to change things, then there is a possibility that you can contribute to making a better world." -Noam Chomsky
- Do you hate people? - I don't hate them, I just feel better when they're not around. -Charles Bukowski
"Desire to get rich fast is dangerous. My own system is to get rich slow."- Charlie Munger
"Nothing hurts a good soul and the kind heart more than to live amongst people who can't understand it."  Unknown
"Change takes time. Never quit before you are done. It might seem that you are not making any progress, but there will be subtle changes and these subtle changes are the stepping stones for that radical change you expect."
"I don't really like fireworks unless they're shot at someone" -My little brother as we discussed going to fireworks tonight
"Know yourself and you will win all battles", Sun Tzu
"Under pressure, you don't rise to the occasion, you sink to the level of your training. That's why we train so hard." -Heard from a Navy Seal
"If you don't build your own dream someone else will hire you to help build theirs." -Tony Gaskins Jr.
"Forever is composed of nows." -Emily Dickinson
"There are two rules for success in life. One: Never reveal everything you know." -The Riddler
"No one changes the world alone, and no one doesn't change it at all. We are all exceptional, and none of us are." -Hank Green
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams" - Dr. Seuss
"Unregulated world building is an odd sort of game where god tries to convince a bunch of zygotes not to kill him." - Rage Kurzwell
"I think I fall in love a little bit with anyone who shows me their soul. This world is so guarded and fearful. I appreciate rawness so much" Emery Allen
"Why say in 10 words what you can say in 2? And why say in 2 words what you can get up and do?" - Polarbear
"Remember, remember always, that all of us, and you and I especially, are descended from immigrants and revolutionists." - FDR
"That which does not kill us makes us stronger." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Use what talents you possess; the woods would be very silent if no birds sang there except those that sang best." - Henry Van Dyke
"When the last tree is cut down, the last fish eaten, and the last stream poisoned, you will realize that you cannot eat money"
"Nationalism is an infantile disease. It is the measles of mankind." - Albert Einstein
"The pessimist sees difficulty in every opportunity. The optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty." - Winston Churchill
"My advice is to never do tomorrow what you can do today. Procrastination is the thief of time." - Charles Dickens
"Did you ever stop to think, and forget to start again?" - A. A. MILNE
"Did you ever stop to think, and forget to start again?" - A. A. MILNE
"Divorce comes from the latin word divorcerum meaning 'to have your genitals torn out through your wallet'. Robin Williams
"Divorce comes from the latin word *divorcerum* meaning 'to have your genitals torn out through your wallet'." Robin Williams
"There's a fine line between fishing and just standing on the shore looking like an idiot." Mark Twain
..but the line dividing good and evil cuts through the heart of every human being. And who is willing to destroy a piece of his own heart? - Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
"Tact is the ability to tell someone to go to hell in such a way that they look forward to the trip. " Winston Churchill
"Today I met god. She is black."
"Arise! Awake! and stop not until the goal is reached". -Swami Vivekananda
"All the powers in the universe are already ours. It is we who have put our hands before our eyes and cry that it is dark".-Swami Vivekananda
"A man who doesn't love easily, loves too much." -- Twin Peaks, 2.17.
"Will is that which changes thought into energy." - Yogananda
"love in such a way that the person you love feels free." -thich nhat hanh
"love is such a way that the person you love feels free." - thich nhat hanh
"It ain't what you don't know that gets you into trouble. It's what you know for sure that just ain't so." - Mark Twain
''That Some Achieve Great Success,is Proof To All That Others Can Achieve it As Well'' - Abraham Lincoln
"What others think about you is none of your business." - Jack Canfield
"In the end, it's not the way you look that counts. It's the way you see yourself."  Unknown
"I have noticed that even those who assert that everything is predestined and that we can change nothing about it still look both ways before they cross the street." - Stephen Hawking
"I don't care if it works on your machine! We are not shipping your machine!" - Vidiu Platon.
"if you need to check inside me I must warn you that a last night I eat a fifteen cinnabun and my anus um is open like a mouth of tied dog. If you make attack on it, it may make a release."- Borat
"If you hear a voice within you say "you cannot paint," then by all means paint, and that voice will be silenced."  Vincent Van Gogh
"Never love anybody who treats you like you're ordinary." -- Oscar Wilde
"The worst form of inequality is to try to make unequal things equal." - Aristotle
"What can you know about a person? They shift in the light. You can't light up all sides at once." Richard Siken
"Let's look death in the face and say 'whatever man'" -Hugo "Hurley" Reyes, Lost
"It always seems impossible, until it's done." - Nelson Mandela
"The most important kind of freedom is to be what you really are. You trade in your reality for a role. You trade in your sense for an act. You give up your ability to feel, and in exchange, put on a mask. There can't be any large-scale revolution
"Only thoses who dare to fail greatly can ever achieve greatly." - Robert F. Kennedy
"Enjoy the little things, for one day you may look back & realize they were the BIG things" - Robert Brault
"One small crack does not mean that you are broken. It means that you were put to the test and you did not fall apart." - Linda Poindexter
"Many great ideas have been lost because the people who had them could not stand being laughed at." --Unknown
"The things that are hardest to find are a fourth player for Belot and a second player for sex." - Folk saying
"A system comprised of lone wolves cannot exist to support the common good." - Unknown
"The impediment to action advances action. What stands in the way becomes the way." - Marcus Aurelius
"If you love a flower, do not pluck it. Because if you pluck it, it dies and ceases to be what you love. So let it be. Love is not about possession, love is about appreciation."
"Love is a very powerful force, even more so when it's focused into a coherent beam of destruction." - Brian Clevinger (Black Mage, 8-Bit Theater)
"If any man wish to write in a clear style, let him be first clear in his thoughts; and if any would write in a noble style, let him first possess a noble soul." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"If you want to teach people a new way of thinking, don't bother trying to teach them. Instead, give them a tool, the use of which will lead to new ways of thinking" - Buckminster Fuller
"The high value put upon every minute of time, the idea of hurry-hurry as the most important objective of living, is unquestionably the most dangerous enemy of joy."  Hermann Hesse
"As the Zen Buddhist saying goes, how you do anything is how you do everything."  Simon Sinek
"You can't heal what you never reveal." - Jay Z
"I know that one day you will leave this place for it is in your nature and the world has more to give you than I can, but I do request from you one thing. Keep your torch lit. Never let the fire die....." full quote written out in text.
"In world history, there have never been two victors, while far too often there have been only losers. To me, this seems to have been the case in the last war already." - Hitler
"Regarding corporate mission statement: Blooming flowers wonder and require unaffordable attention." -By me
"If you can't fly, then run . If you can't run? Then walk. If you can't walk? Then crawl. No matter what keep on moving". -Dr Martin Luther King
"If you're offered a seat on a rocket ship, don't ask what seat. Just get on." - Sheryl Sandberg
"I dont always listen to Metallica, but when i do so do my neighbors"
"Whenever you see a successful person, you only see the public glories, never the private sacrifices to reach them."  Vaibhav Shah
"Beauty surrounds us" - Rumi
"God and I have a great relationship, but we both see other people." -- Dolly Parton
"The greatest happiness of life is the conviction that we are loved; loved for ourselves, or rather, loved in spite of ourselves. Victor Hugo
"Whatever happened, how did you conduct yourself  that is what determines the quality of who you are". - Sadhguru
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow men. True nobility lies in being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"Anything worth having is hard to get"
"If you want happiness for an hour  take a nap. If you want happiness for a day  go fishing. If you want happiness for a year  inherit a fortune. If you want happiness for a lifetime  help someone else." - Chinese Proverb
"It would be ugly to watch people poking sticks at a caged rat. It is uglier still to watch rats poking sticks at a caged person." - Jean Harris.
"I'll tell you my sins and you can sharpen your knife Offer me that deathless death Good God, let me give you my life" - Hozier
"Peace is the greatest lie of all." - Aatrox from League of Legends
"If someone is stupid enough to walk away from you, be smart enough to let them go."
"I like animals, all animals. I wouldn't hurt a cat or a dog - or a chicken or a cow. And I wouldn't ask someone else to hurt them for me. That's why I'm a vegetarian." Peter Dinklage
'Let your hopes, not your hurts, shape your future.'- Robert H. Schuller
'Be', don't try to become.
"The one who cares the least in a relationship wins" - Unknown
"Most people want security in this world, not liberty." - H. L. Mencken
"Don't feel sad over someone who gave up on you, feel sorry for them because they gave up on someone who would have never given up on them."  Frank Ocean
"How can I change tomorrow if I can't change today" Hatebreed
"Even porcupines make love" - Sen. Pat Roberts (R-KS)
[Help Finding Quote] I forget who said it, but to the effect of: An error early creates many errors later on.
"The only way to get ahead is to find errors in conventional wisdom." - Larry Ellison
"If, then, I were asked for the most important advice I could give, that which I considered to be the most useful to the men of our century, I should simply say: in the name of God, stop a moment, cease your work, look around you." - Leo Tolstoy
"Our prime purpose in this life is to help others. And if you can't help them, at least don't hurt them." - Dalai Lama
"If anyone told me he could skip the down markets and catch the up markets, I"d throw him out."- Charlie Munger
"Be excellent to each other" - Bill & Ted
"Goal in life is to gain wisdom, and say it to young ones"
"An individualistic existentialism based on facing directly the absurd contingency of human fate within a meaningless and alien universe." -Wikipedia
30 dogs in a suitcase
"You must be the change you wish to see in the world." -Gandhi
"You must be the change you wish to see in the world." -Gandhi
"You must be the change you wish to see in the world." -Gandhi
"What we wait around a lifetime for with one person, we can find in a moment with someone else."  Stephanie Klein
"Only brush the teeth you plan to keep."
"The president is considered the most powerful man in the world because he's the guy with the little card that contains the launch codes for our nuclear weapons, and the presidents the most influential world leader..."
"We're all pretty bizarre. Some of us are just better at hiding it, that's all" Andrew, Breakfast Club
"Every man dies. Not every man really lives." -William Wallace
"You are what your deep, driving desire is. As your desire is, so is your will. As your will is, so is your deed. As your deed is, so is your destiny," Brihadaranyaka taken from an excerpt from The Upanishads translated by Eknath Easwaran.
"I am a man of fortune, and I must seek my fortune." - Henry Every
"Displace one note, and there would be diminishment. Displace one phrase, and the structure would fall." Salieri on Mozart's Music
"On earth there is no heaven, but there are pieces of it." - Jules Renard
"Poets are scientists until they fall in love" -greenangst
"All guys are assholes. Some are assholes all of the time, all are assholes some of the time." -13 Reasons Why
"Doubting everything and believing everything are two equally convenient solutions that guard us from having to think." - Henri Poincare
"We are all atheists about most of the gods that humanity has ever believed in. Some of us just go one god further." - Richard Dawkins
"Judge your success by what you had to give up in order to get it."  Dalai Lama
"Money devalues what it cannot measure" - Ivan Illich.
"They cause inflation, in people frustration, through manipulation, they blame the other nation." - Me
"I am not young enough to know everything." -Oscar Wilde
"I hope they will have the decency to clear my name with the same publicity with which they now have besmirched it"  Michael Corleone
"Three can keep a secret, if two of them are dead." - Benjamin Franklin
"When someone tells you that it can't be done, it's a reflection of their limitations, not yours"
"The same eyes that taught me to love, taught me I'd never be good enough to be loved back."
"What kind of man would put a known criminal in charge of a major branch of government? Apart from, say, the average voter." -- Moist von Lipwig, in Terry Pratchetts 2004 novel "Going Postal"
"It isn't the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out, it's the pebble in your shoe." Muhammad Ali
"If you mean whisky, the devil's brew, the poison scourge, the bloody monster that defiles innocence...
"I have given up newspapers in exchange for Tacitus & Thucydides, for Newton & Euclid; & I find myself much the happier." Thomas Jefferson
"Yesterday is history; tomorrow is a mystery. Today is a gift, which is why we call it the present." - Bil Keane
"The past is chiseled in stone, and the present is written in pen. But the future is written in the sand, and changes with the wind"- Myself
"The purpose of a storyteller is not to tell you how to think, but to give you questions to think upon." - The Way of Kings, Brandon Sanderson
"I am not young enough to know it all." - Oscar Wilde
"There are pictures in poems, and poems in pictures." -Chinese Proverb
"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude." - Maya Angelou
"God made the country, and man made the town." - William Cowper
"We humans have the ability to see beyond our species, and that ability confers a responsibility." -William McDonough
"Uncertainty is the first step toward self-determination. Courage comes next." Hego Damask/Darth Plagueis
"The idea that everyone can have wonderful results from stocks is inherently crazy. Nobody expects everyone to succeed at poker."-Munger
"Ever Tried Ever Failed No Matter Try Again Fail Again Fail Better " - Samuel Beckett
"Once is an accident. Twice is a coincidence. Three times is enemy action." - Ian Fleming
"Even on the darkest of tunnels, there's always a light at the end of it for you to follow" - Megaman ZX
"I put instant coffee in a microwave oven and almost went back in time." - Steven Wright
[request] opposite of "ends justifies the means"
"A pint of sweat saves a gallon of blood." - General George Patton
"There is a voice that doesn't use words, Listen" - Rumi
"Don't you know yet? It is your light that lights the worlds" - rumi
"If you do tomorrow what you did today, you will get tomorrow what you got today." --Benjamin Franklin
"You decided you would be nothing. I agree." - Roomy
"So often the search for happiness takes us down a familiar street to an old address." Robert Brault, Round Up the Usual Subjects
"Never? Don't tell me never." Katherine Graham to Bob Woodward, January 1973.
"You tasted it. Isn't that enough? Of what do you ever get more than a taste? That's all we're given in life. A taste."  Philip Roth
"A man who suffers before it is necessary, suffers more than is necessary." - Luis Annaeus Seneca
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to reform (or pause and reflect)." - Mark Twain
"Some study shows the need of more. " -Chinese Proverb
"This is exactly my point: people go around calling you a midget when you want to be called a dwarf, of course you're going to blow your head off", Martin McDonagh
"The obstacle is the path." - Zen proverb
"With the blazing red hair of one she-urchin in the gutter I will set fire to all modern civilization." - G.K. Chesterton
"The world is a dangerous place, not because of those who do evil, but because of those who look on and do nothing." - Mr. Robot, Mr. Robot
"There are no happy endings. Endings are the saddest part, so just give me a happy middle, and a very happy start." - Shel Silverstein
"It is our choices, Harry, that show what we truly are, far more than our abilities." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Chamber of Secrets
"my only fear of death is coming back to this bitch reincarnated." -2pac-
[request] Looking for a quote about people unable to see their mistakes.
'If the shoe fits' quote
"Your success will be as large as your effort" - Francisco De Miranda
"A society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in." -Greek Proverb
"To myself I am only a child playing on the beach, while vast oceans of truth lie undiscovered before me." -Isaac Newton
"But this rose is an extra. Its smell and its color are an embellishment of life, not a condition of it." -Sherlock Holmes
"If your time horizon isn't 5-10 years with your investments, you aren't an investor, and they aren't investments."- The Motley Fool
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous
"So much of what we learn about love is taught by people who never really loved us."  Unknown
"Lies don't really bother me. It's the insult to my intelligence that I find offensive."  Unknown
"War is where the young and stupid are tricked by the old and bitter into killing each other" - Niko Bellic GTA 4
"You know It's funny, because I look back in the 80s and 90s traders were the kings. The back office fellas in the computer boys we would laugh at them and they got their revenge."
"Never look back unless you are planning to go that way." Henry David Thoreau
"It's not our future that decides our fate, its our past. Everything in our past, is engrained in our futures present."
"Remember: Quotes won't work unless you do"-Unknown
'Sense' is such a relative term yet we all have only been given 5, to sort things out.
"I can only note that the past is beautiful because one never realises an emotion at the time. It expands later, and thus we don't have complete emotions about the present, only about the past." - Virginia Woolf
"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot paint' then by all means paint and that voice will be silenced." - Vincent Van Gogh
"After careful consideration I've come to the conclusion that the devil would likely be really into fanfiction." - Sherlock Lolmes
"The world is like a ride in an amusement park, and when you choose to go on it you think it's real because that's how powerful our minds are." -Bill Hicks (Full quote below)
"Nothing haunts us like the things we don't say."
"Listen. Take the best. Leave the rest." - Richard Branson
"I hate waiting." -Inigo Montoya
"Consult not your fears but your hopes and your dreams. Think not about your frustrations, but about your unfulfilled potential. Concern yourself not with what you tried and failed in, but with what it is still possible for you to do."-Pope John
"Wine is constant proof that God loves us and loves to see us happy." -Benjamin Franklin
"Fuck Everything, you're gonna die no matter what" - Anonymous
"You've gotta dance like there's nobody watching, Love like you'll never be hurt, Sing like there's nobody listening, And live like it's heaven on earth." - William W. Purkey
"As a blind man has no idea of colors, so have we no idea of the manner by which the all-wise God perceives and understands all things." - Isaac Newton
"I believe some things were just meant to be" - Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D
"Too involved in tuning the world's daily lecture On the vulture culture" Fernando Ribeiro Moonspell
"A great love is a lot like a good memory
"The cool wind I enjoyed became rain. I closed the window." -Unknown
"The mind is its own place and in itself, can make a Heaven of Hell, a Hell of Heaven."-John Milton
"Don't waste a good mistake. Learn from it." - Robert Kiyosaki
"Believe in yourself. Under-confidence leads to a self-fulfilling prophecy that you are not good enough for your work." - Dr. Roopleen
"Laugh, and the world laughs with you. Cry, and you get a wet face." - my dad (I think-he always used to say it)
"Life's not about winning the race it's about finishing it."
"Goodbye? Oh no, please. Can't we go back to page one and do it all over again?" -Winnie the Pooh
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"I never did mind about the little things." - Maggie Hayward
"What breaks your bones it's not the load you're carrying, what breaks you down is all in how you carry."
"Don't quote me, boy, 'cause I ain't said sh!t."-Eazy E, 1988
"Only those who will risk going too far can possibly find out how far one can go." --T. S. Eliot
"It's so much cooler to be happy, than to be sad." - Lady Gaga
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"We were born at just the right time, which is pretty much all times ever, to explore language. To explore what can be said. What should be said? What should we send out to space? What that can be said, will you be the first to say?" - Michael Stevens
"Someone will always be prettier. Someone will always be smarter. Someone will always be younger. But they will never be you."- Kanye West
"How we deal with tragedy defines who we are. I used to be terrible at it. Beyond terrible. You are not going to let this deflate you. You are going to pick yourself up, dust yourself off, and we will figure out what the next step is." - Chris Traeger
"I can't really blame them for shouting socialist catchwords all night. This is what their voters desire. They don't desire capitalism, because capitalism means opportunity and freedom, and opportunity and freedom mean hard work."  Matt Walsh
"We get to write our own destiny with the paper, pen and ink that we are given." - Maxy Ramos
"This struggle of the human female toward sex equality will end in a new social order, with the human female as superior."
"The greatest mistake you can make in life is to be continually fearing that you will make one." - Elbert Hubbard
"Happiness is not achieved by the conscious pursuit of happiness; it is generally the by-product of other life endeavors." - Aldous Huxley
"Rather than love, than money, than fame, give me truth" - David Henry Thoreau
"She wasn"t doing a thing that I could see, except standing there leaning on the balcony railing, holding the universe together."  J.D. Salinger
"There are wolves in this world" - Nathan Ford
"So many books, so little time." - Frank Zappa
"If you must die sweetheart, Die knowing your life was my life's best part"
"The more I do, the more I can do." - Sylvia Plath
"In every work of genius we recognize our own rejected thoughts" - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Every effort should be made to stop the unjust, cruel slaughter of animals, which must be destructive to our morals" - Nikola Tesla
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky
"You cannot have mushy lips and be a champion" - Christopher Ullman
"Sometimes you have to play the role of the fool to fool the fool who think they're fooling you."  Unknown
"If people never did silly things nothing intelligent would ever get done." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"All I ever wanted was to reach out and touch another human being not just with my hands but with my heart." - Tahereh Mafi
"And then there are some who believe that old relationships can be revived and made new again. But please if you feel that way, don"t phone, don"t write, don"t arrive."
"Every person I meet it my superior..."
"Life is like an onion. You peel it off one layer at a time, and sometimes you weep." -Carl Sandburg
"If Eminem was black, he would be the next Muhammad Ali"
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"Most Things Go Unnoticed." - University of New Orleans bathroom door
"Expectations lead to disappointment"
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts."  Winston Churchill
"When we hang the capitalist, they will sell us the rope we use." - Joseph Stalin
"Never ignore a person who loves and cares for you, because one day you may realize that you"ve lost the moon while counting the stars."  Unknown
"I was young and undisciplined and just felt I was in a fucking rock 'n' roll band and I have a right to offend whoever I possibly can. I don't do that anymore" - Nick Cave
"A perfect world is never perfect just filled with lies" - Kendrick Lamar
"Everyone is uniquely different, which makes them equally important." - Unknown
"Everyone is entitled to his own opinion, but not to his own facts" - Daniel Patrick Moynihan
"I do not criticize persons, but only a state of affairs. It is they, however, who will have to answer for defensiveness at the bar of history." - Liddell Hart, 1933
"Don't quote me boy cuz I ain't said shit" - Eazy-E
"BUTT LICKER, OUR PRICES HAVE NEVER BEEN LOWER!" -Dwight K. Schrute, The Office
"It is possible to make no mistakes and lose. That is not failure; that is life." -Cpt. Jean-Luc Picard
"The best way to predict the future is to create it." Peter Drucker
"A superior pilot uses his superior judgment to avoid situations which require the use of his superior skill" - Frank Borman, Commander of Apollo 8
"Keep away from people who belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great." --Mark Twain
"Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much." - Oscar Wilde
"Once weapons were manufactured to fight wars, now wars are manufactured to sell weapons" - Arundhati Roy
"Death is one of the most profound truths ignored by humanity." - Unknown.
"If it sounds bad it means you're practicing the right thing."
"When you're stuck on a treadmill that never stops. You're always moving forward...still never getting anywhere..." - Rida
"Well I gave up smoking, women, and drinking last night, and it was the worst 15 minutes of my life" -Rodney Atkins
"If we lived forever, maybe we'd have time to understand things. But as it is, I think the best we can do is try to open our eyes, and appreciate how strange and brief all of this is." -Edith Finch from the game 'What Remains of Edith Finch'
"Not all those who wander are lost." Tolkien
"Society tells us that we're nothing, and then once we get one kind of good thing society tells us that's all we're ever gonna be, and i'm here to say like, with determination, persistence, realism and wanting success more than your next breath, you truly can do whatever you want." -Logic
"We often meet our destiny on the road we take to avoid it."  Jean de La Fontaine
"Life is long enough, and a sufficiently generous amount has been given to us for the highest achievements if it were all well invested."  Seneca
"I had sex in the chair on the plane and there was a guy watching. We ended up telling the air stewardess what was happening. Like, "This guy keeps staring at us. Can you tell him to stop?"" - Cara Delevingne
"When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be." --Lao Tzu
"Get going. Move forward. Aim High. Plan a takeoff. Don't just sit on the runway and hope someone will come along and push the airplane. It simply won't happen. Change your attitude and gain some altitude. Believe me, you'll love it up here." - Donald J. Trump
"Rock n" roll was pretty much born in The South - so was the blues, or at least a certain kind of blues. So saying "Southern rock" is like saying "rock rock."" - Gregg Allman
"If a chess piece stays too long on a square it"s going to lose its value."  Carlo Ginzburg
"Loving someone is giving them the power to hurt you, but trusting them not to."  Unknown
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Having done wrong, yet amend not, is wrong". - Confucius 
"Don't let the fear of the time it will take to accomplish something stand in the way of your doing it. The time will pass anyway; we might just as well put that passing time to the best possible use." -Earl Nightengale
"A righteous man finds fault in himself, a base person finds fault in others."  - Confucius
"Photography is the only language that can be understood anywhere in the world." - Bruno Barbey
"Between door and horizon God occurs." Athin Papadaki
"The past is not dead. In fact, it's not even past."  William Faulkner
"Anytime anybody is rude, it makes me double-check my own behavior to make sure I don't do that to other people." -Patricia Heaton
"To make others less happy is a crime. To make ourselves unhappy is where all crime starts" - Roger Ebert
"5AM when legends are either waking up or are going to sleep"
"The soul always knows what to do to heal itself. The challenge is to silence the mind." - Caroline Myss
"The roots of knowledge are bitter; only the fruit is sweet."  Aristotle
"A journey of a thousand miles begins with a cash advance".- Sadhguru
"There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves." -Will Rogers
"Dont depend on anyone too much in this world. Even your shadow leaves you when you're in darkness."
"We should strive to believe what we perceive and not the other way around."
''Never create sunshine for those who leave you in the rain.'' - Unknown
"Sometimes I"ve believed as many as six impossible things before breakfast." -Lewis Carroll
"People get confused: they fail to grasp that you are not special because of who you are but because of what you do." -Rafael Nadal
"It's only when you look at an ant through a magnifying glass on a sunny day that you realize how often they burst into flames." Harry Hill
"Mortality, buddy. Enjoy it while it's there. It doesn't last forever." -Sam Elliott
14 Life Guidelines from Socrates
"If we can find the money to kill people, we can find the money to help poeple" - Tony Benn
"If you're going through hell, keep going." - Churchill
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
'just remember well i'm happy in my hell with or without your company.' bruce haack
"Life is a journey to be experienced, not a problem to be solved."  Winnie The Pooh
"The end had better be worth the means." -Hunter Hicks
"Adapt or shit will suck" -Darwin
"The Party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command." - 1984, George Orwell
"Gratitude is a disease suffered by dogs." - J. Stalin
"I've had a lot of worries in my life, most of which never happened."- Mark Twain
"Telling a person they can't be sad because people have it worse is the equivalent of telling someone they can't be happy because people have it better."
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"When a guy steps over you, you have the moral obligation to punch him in the balls." -Charles Barkley
"She can take it on the butt all day, but one to the head and she goes down." -Vic Romano
"If you do it right, it will last forever." Massimo Vignelli
"Our lifes are given us; therefore, our default state is gratitude. It is the truth of our existence." - Charles Eisenstein, Sacred Economics
"I know, too, that death is the only god who comes when you call."- Roger Zelazny
"If we only wanted to be happy, it would be easy; but we want to be happier than other people, and that is almost always difficult, since we think them happier than they are." - Charles de Montesquieu
"The flower doesn't dream of the bee. It blossoms and the bee comes." - Mark Nepo
"The price of greatness is responsibility."-Sir Winston Churchill
"For my part I know nothing with any certainty, but the sight of the stars makes me dream." -Vincent van Gogh
"The worst form of inequality is to try to make unequal things equal." Aristotle, 384 BC - 322 BC
"Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new." - Albert Einstein
"Do I not destroy my enemies when I make them my friends?" - Abraham Lincoln Quotes
"There is nothing better than a friend, unless it is a friend with chocolate." - Linda Grayson
"Yoga is a light, which once lit, will never dim. The better your practice, the brighter the flame".- B.K.S. Iyengar
"Strive for simplicity. However, realize that true simplicity can only be achieved when the complexity is fully understood." - a dear friend
"Evil is the force that believes that its knowledge is complete" - Dr. Jordan B. Peterson
"He who knows only his own side of the case, knows little of that. His reasons may be good, and no one may have been able to refute them..."
"I don't really dream much, you kinda get tired of them not coming true, so I don't really like having them"- Victor (AKA Chance the Rapper) from Vice short "Mr.Happy"
"It's not what you achieve, it's what you overcome. That's what defines your career." Carlton Fisk
"Everything that I could say would fade into insignificance if you could only know how my heart feels"
"The master has failed more times than the beginner has even tried." - Stephen McCranie
"Coming together is a beginning; keeping together is progress; working together is success". ----Henry Ford
"What passes for hip cynical transcendence is just a fear of being really human... since to be really human is probably to be unavoidably sentimental, naive, goo-prone, and generally pathetic." -DFW
"It's a funny thing, the more I practice the luckier I get." - Arnold Palmer
"Thank you for the tragedy. I needed it for my art." -Unknown
"In a way, all of us are on trial for being weird." Jill Soloway
"The best lightning rod for your protection is your own spine" - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Run down the list of those who felt intense anger at something: the most famous, the most unfortunate, the most hated, the most whatever: Where is all that now? Smoke, dust, legendor not even a legend. Think of all the examples. And how trivial the things we want so passionately are."
"The most important thing in the world is family and love." -John Wooden
"Love is only chatter, Friends are all that matter." - Gelett Burgess
"...the line separating good and evil passes not through states, nor between classes, nor between political parties either--but right through every human heart--and through all human hearts." Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn, Gulag Archipelago (abridged version, p 312, c2007)
"Through fair or stormy weather We stand close together Like books on the shelf And pals though we may be When some latin baby Says yes, no, or maybe Each man is for himself!"
"You will only ever have two choices: love or fear. Choose love, and don't ever let fear turn you against your playful heart; all that will be left of you, is what was in your heart." -Jim Carrey
"I myself am made entirely of flaws, stitched together with good intentions."- Augusten Burroughs
"I have a dream. I chase it. I fall. I learn. I get better. I keep marching on. And so it goes." Brendon Burchard
"Sometimes even to live is an act of courage" --- Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"There is a crime here which goes beyond denunciation [...] There is a failure here that topples all our success. The fertile earth, the straight tree rows, the sturdy trunks and the ripe fruit. And children dying of pellagra must die because a profit cannot be taken from an orange." - Steinbeck

"Success consists of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm."  Winston Churchill
"Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great."  Mark Twain
"It's not what you are that holds you back. It's what you think you are not." Denis Waitley
"Let us live the highest vision of what is possible." -Inga Grace
"There comes a time where normalities become realities". -Anonymous
"Never have lives less lived been more chronicled." -Dennis Miller
"However vast the darkness, we must supply our own light" - Stanley Kubrick
"Keep your face to the sun and you will never see the shadows" - Helen Keller
"My goal is to create a life that I don't need a vacation from."  Unknown
"Rule 1, there are no rules. If you let rules, rule your life, then you will rue your life."
"People who think relationships will fix them need to fix themselves."
"It is difficult for me to imagine what 'personal liberty' is enjoyed by an unemployed hungry person." - Joseph Stalin
"Always do your best. What you plant now, you will harvest later." - Og Mandino
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says "I'm possible!"-Audrey Hepburn
"My thoughts are stars I cannot fathom into constellations." - John Green
"Politics is the art of postponing decisions until they are no longer relevant." - Henri Queuille
"Every accomplishment starts with the decision to try" -John F. Kennedy
"A mathematician is a blind man in a dark room looking for a black cat which isn't there" - Charles Darwin
"Don't Let the NOISE of other peoples OPINIONS drown out your INNER VOICE" - Steve Jobs
"Hemingway once wrote, 'The world's a fine place and worth fighting for.' I agree with the second part." - Morgan Freeman as William Somerset in Se7en
''Hell is empty and all the devils are here.'' - William Shakespeare
"The information highway is only a cesspool of opinions and ignorant babel" - Jon Haus
"A real lonely person is lonely in a crowd." Arthur, The last man of Mahana
"No bastard ever won a war by dying for his country. He won it by making some other poor dumb bastard die for his country." - George S. Patton
"You're cold and I burn. I guess I'll never learn."
"In 1969 I gave up women and alcohol - it was the worst 20 minutes of my life." George Best
'One of the hardest things you will ever have to do, my dear, is to grieve the loss of a person who is still alive.'
"There are no two words in the English language more harmful than 'good job'." - Whiplash (2014)
"A father's job is not to teach his daughter how to be a lady. It's to teach her how a lady should be treated."  Unknown
"We're all addicted to something that takes the pain away."  Unknown
"I've gone seventy-nine hours without sleep, creating. When that flow is going, it's almost like a high. You don't want it to stop. You don't want to go to sleep for fear of missing something".-Dr. Dre
"If animals could speak, mankind would weep" - Anthony Douglas
"Life an easy ride if no concern of how and where the destination is guaranteed and no fare". -Sadhguru
"Real wealth is never having to spend time with assholes."  John Waters
"Giving money and power to government is like giving whiskey and car keys to teenage boys." - P. J. O'Rourke
"A person who never made a mistake never tried anything new." Albert Einstein
"Summer? My memory flutters  had I  was there a summer?" Emily Dickinson
"Summer? My memory flutters  had I  was there a summer?" Emily Dickinson
"The Truth will set you free. But not until it is finished with you." -Infinite Jest, DFW
"If you think math is hard, try web design." -Trish Parr.
"Some men are in prison even though they walk the streets at night, other men who got the lockdown are free as a bird in flight" -Rancid
"Most Americans rightly complain that our political culture attacks too much and edifies too little. But what do we really demand of the politicians we support?" Arthur C. Brooks
"Courage is what it takes to stand up and speak, courage is also what it takes to site down and listen". - Winston Churchill
"The truth is you don"t know what is going to happen tomorrow. Life is a crazy ride, and nothing is guaranteed." Eminem
"It's better to feel pain, than nothing at all"- The Lumineers
"Ain't no Twitter in heaven." - Chance the Rapper
"Privilege is when you think that something's not a problem because it's not a problem for you personally..." David Gaider
"Wisdom comes to us when it can no longer do any good" -Gabriel Garca Mrquez
15 Father"s day quotes which everyone will fall in love with!!
"I don"t want to repeat my innocence. I want the pleasure of losing it again."  F. Scott Fitzgerald
"No tree, it is said, can grow to heaven unless its roots reach down to hell."  Carl Jung
"Every day people straighten up the hair, why not the heart?" Ernesto Che Guevara
"First I'm gonna drink this, and then I'm gonna throw up. But first I'm gonna drink that, and then I'm gonna pass out" - Homer Jackson, Ripper Street
"Left wing, Right wing, Chicken wing... isms are for slaves, be an individual, find power through unity and leave behind a better world."
"Analyze the endurance's spin" - Cooper
"Be faithfull in small things because it is in them that you strength lies" - Mother Teresa
"Surrender to oppression, or die knowing that you are free."
"I disapprove of what you say, but will defend to the death your right to say it." - Voltaire
"Start where you are. Use what you have. Do what you can."  Arthur Ashe
"How we spent our days is, of course, how we spend our lives." - Annie Dillard
"Summer? My memory flutters  had I  was there a summer?" Emily Dickinson
...identify the problem you want to solve, then solve that problem. Seems like a tautology, but I find it"s easy to waste time solving problems that don"t really matter.' Kerry Scharfglass on his "Commute Deck"
"We are like islands in the sea, separated on the surface, but connected in the deep."  William James
"How quickly would I die, if I jumped from the top of the parachutes?" - Morrissey
"The world is filled with clocks which summon us, to which we feast our fears upon."
"The media's job is to illuminate the facts not fan the flames"--Jane Sanders
"You are not entitled to your opinion. You are entitled to your informed opinion. No one is entitled to be ignorant." - Harlan Ellison
"One doesn't discover new lands without consenting to lose sight of the shore for a very long time." Andre Gide, writer
"Draw a monster. Why is it a monster?"
"It is the agreement that objective reality exists, that people of goodwill can perceive it, and that other people will change their views when presented with the facts of the matter." - Thomas E. Ricks
"We are far more united and have far more in common with each other than things that divide us" - Jo Cox
"We are far more united & have far more in common with each other than that which divide us" - Jo Cox
"We make up horrors to help us cope with the real ones." - Stephen King
"Writing, for me, is very inspiration-dependent. And inspiration can be a jerk." -Gene Luen Yang
"Your home is your heart but what a shame, 'cause not everyone's heart beats the same." -Unknown
"Solitaire is like masturbation. When you lose you just feel awful."
"Freedom is something that dies unless it"s used."  Hunter S. Thompson
"In Mongolia, when a dog dies, he is buried high in the hills so people cannot walk on his grave. The dog's master whispers into the dog's ear his wishes that the dog will return as a man in his next life." - The Art of Racing in the Rain
"In Mongolia, when a dog dies, he is buried high in the hills so people cannot walk on his grave. The dog's mast whispers into the dog's ear his wishes that the dog will return as a man in his next life." - The Art of Racing in the Rain
"People cry, not because they are weak. It is because they've been strong for too long." - Johnny Depp
"Doubt and dialogue will always be with us." -Sam Keen (From Hymns To An Unknown God)
"The true meaning of ROCK is to not listen to music at all. Isn't it? The reason being.. If you take it that ROCK doesn't cater to society and has an antiestablishment mindset then the act of listening to music itself is an act of conforming to society and that is a conflicting ethos..."
"Now I am become Death, the destroyer of worlds." - J. Robert Oppenheimer
"Tricks deserve applause, but style deserves respect" -Sergio Yuppie (from King of Downhill Slide)
"I lost everything but my house. The house in Tennessee I still own, though I don"t know how. I guess it"s because I couldn"t figure out how to put it in the car and take it to the pawn shop."  Steve Earle on feeding his addiction in the nineties
"The truth is you don"t know what is going to happen tomorrow. Life is a crazy ride, and nothing is guaranteed." Eminem
"Time is a great teacher that eventually kills all of its students"
"A leader is best when people barely know that he exists, not so good when people obey and acclaim him, worst when they despise him. Fail to honor people, They fail to honor you..." - Lao Tzu, 6th century BC
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life  It goes on." -Robert Frost
"As bad performers cannot sing alone, but in a chorus, so some persons cannot walk alone. If you are anything, walk alone; talk by yourself; and do not skulk in the chorus. Think a little at last; look about you; sift yourself, that you may know what you are."  Epictetus (x-post /r/stoicism)
"Looking at a cleavage is like looking at the sun. You don't stare at it. It's too risky. Ya get a sense of it and then you look away." - Jerry Seinfeld
"The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances: if there is any reaction, both are transformed." - Carl Jung
"One thing that we should learn from the game Tetris is that our mistakes pile up until the point where we can't do anything more about them"
"One thing that we should learn from the game Tetris is that our mistakes pile up until the point where we can't do anything more about them"
"Life is a storm, my young friend. You will bask in the sunlight one moment, and be shattered on the rocks the next. What makes you a man is what you do when that storm comes." -Alexandre Dumas
"Each of us is something of a schizophrenic personality, tragically divided against ourselves." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"The two most important things in life you never rat on your friends and you always keep your mouth shut"- jimmy Conway
"Sometimes you have to leave, not for ego but for self respect."  Unknown
"Heaven and Hell are states of mind." - Aleister Crowley
"Savor the fruit of life, my young friends. It has a sweer taste when it is fresh from the vine. But don't live too long. The taste turns bitter...after a time." -Kor, Star Trek DS9.
"I put my heart and soul into my work, and I have lost my mind in the process." - Vincent Van Gogh
"The cure to boredom is curiosity. There is no cure for curiosity." - Dorothy Parker
"This country has a mental health problem disguised as a gun problem and a tyranny problem disguised as a security problem." - Joe Rogan
'One of the principal functions of a friend is to suffer (in a milder and symbolic form) the punishments we should like, but are unable, to inflict upon our enemies.' - Aldous Huxley from the novel: A Brave New World
"However difficult life may seem, there is always something you can do and succeed at." Stephen Hawking
"Things turn out best for those who make the best of how things turn out." -Anonymous
"No one is watching, nothing is causing. Things are just happening" - Anonymous
"We lay out our lives in a narrative we understand, like a movie, but are you enjoying making it or are you wondering who's watching my movie?" - Donald Glover
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap but by the seeds that you plant." - Robert Louis Stevenson
"Sometimes the most scenic roads in life are the detours you didn't mean to take." - Angela N. Blount
"Don"t look for society to give you permission to be yourself." - Steve Maraboli
"I'll fuck you til you love me faggot!" - Mike Tyson
"Freedom in general may be defined as the absence of obstacles to the realization of desires." - Bertrand Russell
"Freedom is the right to tell people what they do not want to hear." - George Orwell
"If I walk with two persons, I will find my teacher." -Confucius from the Analects
"With freedom, books, flowers, and the moon, who could not be happy?" - Oscar Wilde
"Things dissolve, they disappear, and if you want to keep them, it takes some practice." -- Victor Lodato from the novel _Edgar and Lucy_
"A little patience, and we shall see the reign of witches pass over, their spells dissolve, and the people, recovering their true sight, restore their government to its true principles."  Thomas Jefferson, in a letter to John Taylor, June 4, 1798
"Don't let your loyalty become your slavery, if they don't appreciate what you bring to the table then let them eat alone"
"Do what you have to do until you can do what you want to do."
"Do what you **have** to do until you can do what you **want** to do."
"A blade of grass is a commonplace on Earth; it would be a miracle on Mars. Our descendants on Mars will know the value of a patch of green. And if a blade of grass is priceless, what is the value of a human being?" - Carl Sagan
"YOUR GOALS DON'T CARE HOW YOU FELL"
"I don't pay attention to the world ending. It has ended for me many times and began again in the morning." - Nayyirah Waheed
"Never idealize others. They will never live up to your expectations. Don"t over-analyze your relationships. Stop playing games. A growing relationship can only be nurtured by genuineness. "  Leo F. Buscaglia
"The primary cause of unhappiness is never the situation but your thoughts about it." Eckhart Tolle
"If people sat outside and looked at the stars each night, I'll bet they'd live a lot differently." - Bill Watterson, Calvin and Hobbes
"I have this strange feeling that I'm not myself anymore. It's hard to put into words, but I guess it's like I was fast asleep, and someone came, disassembled me, and hurriedly put me back together again. That sort of feeling." -Haruki Murakami, Sputnik Sweetheart
"What pillow can one have like a good conscience?" John Steinbeck
"All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better." Ralph Waldo Emerson
[Quote Origin] "We were dead but we didn't know it."
"The world is a stage, and you must play a part"- Someone (Elvis)
"Come out of your shell", that noxious expression which fails to appreciate that some animals naturally carry shelter everywhere they go, and that some humans are just the same." Susan Cain
"What is popular, is wrong" - Oscar Wilde
[Quote Help] "Act as if everything..."
"There are people who presume that unless something comes easily to them, they should never pursue it as a career--without realizing that some of the greatest achievements you ever attain are because you busted your ass to reach that point." -Neil deGrasse Tyson
"You and me will all go down in history with a sad Statue of Liberty and a generation that didn't agree." - Serj Tankian, Sad Statue
"The American spirit is crush-proof, Daze, because it's built on the dream of a better tomorrow, not an unhealthy clutching at yesterday!" - The First American, written by Alan Moore, Tomorrow Stories #2
"You have not lived today until you have done something for someone who can never repay you" - John Bunyan
"We came from a mystery and it's to a mystery we go" -Stephen King
"There is nothing permanent except change." -Hereaclitus
"The way out of a room is not through the door. Just don't want out. And you're free." -Charles Manson
"Go to Heaven for the climate, Hell for the company." -Mark Twain
"Only two things are infinite, the universe and human stupidity, and I'm not sure about the former." -Albert Einstein
"Arrogance is to feel superior to others. Confidence is to not feel inferior." - Ashwin Mertes
"If we are not regularly deeply embarrassed by who we are, the journey to self-knowledge hasn"t begun." Alain de Botton
"But now I have come to believe that the whole world is an enigma, a harmless enigma that is made terrible by our own mad attempt to interpret it as though it had an underlying truth" - Umberto Eco
"How wonderful is it that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world" - Anne Frank
"Death rattles those windows, the ones which have shown us life." - The Empyrean
"Thinking is difficult, that's why most people judge." - Carl Jung
"You give each story only four or five sentences to prove itself  You, too, will generally be given only four or five sentences to prove that you are worth a hearing" - John Trimble, 'Writing With Style'
"Love is the one thing you can offer someone that they always need more of." - Anon
"Rise, like lions after slumber In unvanquishable number! Shake your chains to earth like dew Which in sleep had fallen on you: Ye are manythey are few!" -- Percy Bysshe Shelley
"Everything interests me, but nothing holds me."  Fernando Pessoa
"If I didn't care for fun and such, I'd probably amount to much. But I shall stay the way I am, because I do not give a damn." - Dorothy Parker
"If you want to live a happy life, tie it to a goal, not to people or things." - Albert Einstein
"If life were easy, everybody would have one." - Chicago blues musician Corky Siegel
"There is nothing so pitiful as a young cynic because he has gone from knowing nothing to believing nothing"
"...you may fly over a land forever; you may bomb it, atomize it, pulverize it and wipe it clean of lifebut if you desire to defend it, protect it, and keep it for civilization, you must do this on the ground, the way the Roman legions did, by putting your young men into the mud." -T.R. Fehrenbach
"The race is not to the swift, nor the battle to the strong, neither yet bread to the wise, nor yet riches to men of understanding, nor yet favour to men of skill; but time and chance happeneth to them all." Ecclesiastes 9:11
"Maybe all one can do is hope to end up with the right regrets"  Arthur Miller
"You are the bows from which your children as living arrows are sent forth" - Kahlil Gibran
"You are the bows from which your children as living arrows are sent forth" - Khalil Gibran
"Appreciate those who appreciate you."
"I decided to see how it really is and they told me how it isn't very loudly." - Houf M.D.
"A circle looks at a square and sees a badly made circle."  Jeff VanderMeer
"All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Do your own thing on your own terms and get what you came here for." -----Oliver James
"the self is never to be found, but must be created, not the happy accident of passivity, but the product of a thousand actions, large and small, conscious or unconscious" -Robert Penn Warren
"Look, maybe... this challenges what you thought you were. And... maybe I'm gonna get my heart broken in a thousand different pieces. But those are maybes. You can't live your life accordin' to maybes." - Poussey Washington, Orange is the New Black
"For a time, some energy slows down, becomes matter, and pretends to be you." -Pale Lord Hiphis
"Everything that is really great and inspiring is created by the individual who can labor in freedom." - Albert Einstein
"There is a certain enthusiasm in liberty, that makes human nature rise above itself, in acts of bravery and heroism." - Alexander Hamilton
"Doubts are the most intimate thing about us" - Albert Camus
"Mistakes are always forgivable, if one has the courage to admit them" - Bruce Lee
"what's a mob to a king? what's a king to a god? What's a god to a non believer who don't believe in anything" -Kanye
"All men make mistakes, but a good man yields when he knows his course is wrong, and repairs the evil. The only crime is pride." - Sophocles, Antigone
"When they discover the center of the universe, a lot of people will be disappointed to discover they are not in it" -Bernard Bailey
"Take up one idea. Make that one idea your life  think of it, dream of it, live on that idea." Cont..
"Don't force whatever is not beautiful to be ugly, or whatever is not good to be bad." -Plato
"He felt that his whole life was some kind of dream and he sometimes wondered whose it was and whether they were enjoying it." -Douglas Adams
"I like being myself. Myself and nasty." - Aldous Huxley, A Brave New World
"It's not how big your pencil is, it's how you write your name." -Dave Mustaine
"When I'm happy and cheery they are just seasons in a year. When I'm sad and gloomy they are just ordinary days. Everyday is an ordinary day, just some are special." - Anonymous
"If your life is at an all time low, you have the perfect recipe for a cinderella story."
"Life is pain, and anyone who tells you otherwise is either lying or selling something" -From The Princess Bride
[Request] Churchill quote to british combat engineers (september 1944)
"Trust because you are willing to accept the risk, not because it"s safe or certain". -------Anonymous
"Drugs are so fucking good that they'll ruin your life." - Louis CK
"There are two reasons why I would never drink toilet water: number 1 and number 2." - Woody Paige
"When the debate is lost, slander becomes the tool of the loser" -Socrates
"The people will not revolt. They will not look up from their screens long enough to notice what"s happening" - George Orwell
"Superstition sets the whole world in flames; philosophy quenches them" - Voltaire
"Nothing ever goes away until it teaches us what we need to know" - Pema Chodron
"Nothing in all the world is more dangerous than sincere ignorance and conscientious stupidity"
"Love isn't a state of perfect caring. It is an active noun like struggle. To love someone is to strive to accept that person exactly the way he or she is, right here and now" - Fred Rogers, The World According to Mister Rogers
"I once heard a chaplain pray for what he must have known was impossible. Without a change of countenance, without a smile, with a face solemn as a sepulchre, he said: 'I pray thee, O God, to give Congress wisdom.' " -- Robert G Ingersoll
"To succeed in life, you need two things: ignorance and confidence."  Mark Twain
"The universe is under no obligation to make sense to you." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"I gave you painted air - tears I couldn't weep - truths I couldn't speak - all the words that caught in my throat" - John Geddes, A Familiar Rain
"The primitive man had to fight every day not to be hungry, and the modern man has to fight every day to be hungry."
[Poker] exemplifies the worst aspects of capitalism that have made our country so great. -Walter Matthau
"Big data is like big tobacco. Presumed to be safe for decades and when we understood the cancer it brought, it was hard for people to quit." - Peter Sunde
"Happiness=Smiles-Frowns"-Steve Wozniak
"A man may fail many times but he isn't failure until he begins to blame somebody else" - J. Paul Getty
"Umami in Japanese means 'I will suck your dick for a bite of that'." -Anthony Bourdain
"If you challenge yourself you will grow, your life will change and your outlook will be positive "
"My philosophy is worrying means you suffer twice." -Newt Scamander
"They may think that they are very smart about everything because they made millions of dollars by digging a hole in the ground and finding oil, but the talent and luck needed to become rich are not the same talent and luck needed to succeed on Parliament Hill." - Jean Chretien
"Don't pass up something that's attractive today because you think you'll find something way more attractive tomorrow." Warren Buffet.
"I like doing the wall sits because now I don't have to sit on public toilets"- My friend
"You don't need to take revenge. Just sit back and wait because Karma will get hold of those that hurt you and if you are lucky God will let you watch" -- Anonymous
"You dont have to take revenge. Just sit back and wait because Karma will get hold of those you hurt you and if you are lucky God will let you watch" -- Anonymous
"The best gift I ever gave you was my absence." -unknown
[Request] Quote about killing something inside by drinking
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift of God, which is why we call it the present". -----Bil Keane
"A person is smart. People are dumb, panicky dangerous animals and you know it. " - Agent K, Men in Black
"Depression is a disease that tries to get you alone and kill you. It tells you to run away, that you should feel guilty every time you're happy. It twists reality" - /u/BrooBu
"Have a heart that never hardens,and a temper that never tires,and a touch that never hurts " Charles Dickens
"Sometimes life hits you in the head with a brick. Don't lost faith." - Steve Jobs
"Someone will live a happier life merely because you took the time to share what you had to give."- Leo Buscaglia
"There is nothing behind the curtains of religions, people put there whatever their imaginations can fathom" - Bangambiki Habyarimana
"That's what she said!" - Micheal Scott
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"Things do not happen. Things are made to happen." - John F. Kennedy
"The key factor in industry is creativity" - Akio Morita
"Everybody makes mistakes" - Akio Morita
"Just because you can, doesn't mean you should; but just because you shouldn't, doesn't mean you can't" - Hashitagi Yuluswag
"Just because you can, doesn't mean you should, but just because you shouldn't, doesn't mean you can't" - Burglet McHamsterbutton
"The idea that the future is unpredictable is undermined every day by the ease with which the past is explained."  Daniel Kahneman
"Hope for love, pray for love, wish for love, dream for lovebut don"t put your life on hold waiting for love."
...are you aware anything that would believe you to believe... - john mccain
"The statue of justice has a blindfold on because you"re not supposed to be peeking out to see if your patron is pleased with what you"re doing." James B. Comey
"Zlatan is just a human. The same way a great white shark is just a fish. - Zlatan Ibrahimovic
"Motivation is a lotta crap." -- Dean Martin
"There is an ecstasy that marks the summit of life, and beyond which life cannot rise. And such is the paradox of living, this ecstasy comes when one is most alive, and it comes as a complete forgetfulness that one is alive." - Jack London, The Call of the Wild
"You can spend your whole life looking down avoiding shit or you could just look up and not give a damn." - Conner Smith
"Will no one rid me of this meddlesome priest?" -- James Comey (via King Henry VII)
"Spend eighty percent of your time focusing on the opportunities of tomorrow rather than the problems of yesterday."  Brian Tracy
"This is my child. I planted it. I saw it grow. I loved it. Don't cut it down..." - R.K. Narayan, Malgudi Days
"You will never find time for anything. If you want the time, you must make it." - Charles Buxton
"Two of the most important days in your life are: the day you were born and the day you find out why" -- Mark Twain
"Alcohol is humanity's friend. How can I abandon a friend?" -Yang Wenli, Legend of the Galactic Heroes
"Those who are most humble become the most successful" - Unknown
"Once you start seeing this place for the madhouse it is, you can"t stop seeing it that way. It"s everywhere, everyone. It doesn"t make any sense. That"s not life. It can"t be. I don"t know what it is, but it"s not life." Jed Mckenna
"The least of things with meaning are worth more in life than the greatest of things without it." - Carl Jung
"The least of things is worth more in life than the greatest of things without it." - Carl Jung
"Embrace your differences and the qualities about you that you think are weird. Eventually, they're going to be the only things separating you from everyone else." - Sebastian Stan
"Standing in the middle of the road is very dangerous; you get knocked down by the traffic from both sides."  Margaret Thatcher
"I am still young, I should dare to let go of everything that is to come and that which has already passed." -Tilhet, pajut ja muut
"Nobody in life gets exactly what they thought they were going to get. But if you work really hard and you"re kind, amazing things will happen." -Conan O'Brien
"Man is condemned to be free; because once thrown into the world, he is responsible for everything he does." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"You"re only here for a short visit. Don"t hurry, don"t worry. And be sure to smell the flowers along the way." Walter Hagen
"To defeat an enemy, you must know them. Not simply their battle tactics, but their history, philosophy... art." -Mit'thraw'nuruodo, Imperial Grand Admiral. Star Wars Rebels: S3E04.
"When you're not doing so well, vote for a better life for yourself. If you are doing quite nicely, vote for a better life for others" - Irvine Welsh
"Voting is the foundation stone for political action" - Martin Luther King
"I wonder how many people I've looked at all my life and never seen." -John Steinbeck
"I am thankful for all of those who said NO to me. Its because of them I"m doing it myself." - Albert Einstein
"Don"t let what you cannot do interfere with what you can do."  John R. Wooden
"What a sad era when it is easier to smash an atom than a prejudice." - Albert Einstein
"Take care of your body. It's the only place you have to live." - Jim Rohn
"Quotes doesn't prove anything." - Dave37, Reddit 7 nov 2015
"Those who are less perceptive, tend to mistake my lack of self-servitude, for hypocrisy"
"I gave wrong people the right pieces of me" - via (The Minds Journal)
"The meaning of life is to find your gift. The purpose of life is to give it away." -Pablo Picasso
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde
"Only boring people get bored."
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Yes @Tmobile, we're into BDSM." -Verizon
"You are precisely as big as what you love and precisely as small as what you allow to annoy you." - Robert Anton Wilson
"Nothing is more dangerous than a narcissist who hates himself."  Irving Layton
"The brain has the ability to bear pain by masking its sting, but at the cost of a diminished awareness. Inattention to painful truths shields us from anxiety. When such soothing inattention becomes habit, it comes to shape character." -Daniel Goleman
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society"
"I have decided to be happy because it's good for my health" - Voltaire
"Our landings in the Cherbourg-Havre area have failed to gain a satisfactory foothold and I have withdrawn the troops...The troops, the air and the Navy did all that bravery and devotion to duty could do. If any blame or fault attaches to the attempt, it is mine alone."
"People may not remember exactly what you did, or what you said, but they will always remember how you made them feel."-H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"I like pound cake, that doesn't mean it's good for me."
"Not he who has much is rich, but he who gives much."  Erich Fromm
"The meaning of life is just to be alive. It is so plain and so obvious and so simple. And yet, everybody rushes around in a great panic as if it were necessary to achieve something beyond themselves." -Alan Watts
"Care about what other people think, and you will always be their prisoner."  Lao Tzu
"I never lie because I don't fear anyone. You only lie when you're afraid." - John Gotti
"Fear not the gods when the muses are angered." - Aeropus
"A man is what he thinks about all day long." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Man is a thinking erratum. Each period in life is a new edition that corrects the preceding one and that in turn will be corrected by the next, until publication of the definitive edition, which the publisher donates to the worms." - Machado de Assis
"The beginning is the most important part of the work." - Plato
"Life isn"t about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself."  George Bernard Shaw
"I say what I want to say and do what I want to do. There's no in between. People will either love you for it or hate you for it." Eminem
"People may not remember exactly what you did, or what you said, but they will always remember how you made them feel."- H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"I have been to the darkest corners of government, and what they fear is light." - Edward Snowden
"Progress is impossible without change, and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything." - George Bernard Shaw
"It is foolish and wrong to mourn the men who died. Rather we should be thankful that such men lived." - General George Patton
"Never trust a person that has let you down more than 2 times. Once was a warning, twice was a lesson and anything more than that is simply taking advantage."
"If it makes you feel broken in any way, you need to end it before it ends you."
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched - they must be felt with the heart".__________Helen Keller
"Keep your eyes on the stars and your feet on the ground." ------Theodore Roosevelt
"In the depth of winter, I finally learned that within me there lay an invincible summer." - Albert Camus
"The future ain't what it used to be."  Yogi Berra
"Some people claim that marriage interferes with romance. There's no doubt about it. Anytime you have a romance, your wife is bound to interfere." - Groucho Marx
"I pity the man who wants a coat so cheap that the man or woman who produces the cloth will starve in the process." -23rd President Benjamin Harrison
"The strongest man in the world is he who stands most alone." - Henrik Ibsen
"God was created by evolution, inside the imagination of a primate." - Steve Fowler
"Ask me no questions, I'll tell you no lies." - Oliver Goldsmith
"Who"ll be the first person to crowdfund a war, or crowdsource a revolution; we will see these people, you and I."  Vinay Gupta, Mortal Hazard
"F-E-A-R has two meanings: 'Forget Everything and Run," or, "Face Everything and Rise." The choice is yours." - Zig Ziglar
"I'm always either learning, or at school." -Zack Lally
"If history's taught me anything, it's that good intentions don't come to anything unless there's a steady hand to guide them." - Phil Coulson, Agents of SHIELD
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education." - Mark Twain
[He] never knew that this little act of selfishness, or rather this little omission of kindness, had deprived him of that which would have crowned his ambition of a lifetime." -President William McKinley
"Fake people have image to maintain, real people just don't care." Hikigaya Hachiman
"I once called someone a 'bitch' after he did me a favor. He thought of me as a friend. Unfortunately, I never understood the difference between 'that' and kindness. This person is no longer with us. So for his sake, repay those that help you, especially your friends". - Richard Pryor
"The realest people don't have a lot of friends" - Tupac Shakur
"Love many things, for therein lies the true strength, and whosoever loves much performs much, and can accomplish much, and what is done in love is done well."  Vincent Van Gogh
"There is no one-size-fits-all way to tell your story" -Matt McCune
"If you're gonna fail, you might as well do it in style"- Stevie T
"A good friend can tell you what is the matter with you in a minute. He may not seem such a good friend after telling." - Arthur Brisbane
"how well u do something revolves completely around how you end It. because otherwise no one will believe if u did it or not." -Bill Wurtz
"I used to be a guy who was experiencing the world. And now I feel like the world and the universe experiencing a guy." - Jim Carrey
"Contrary to some tropes, it's safe to assume hell wouldn't like bureaucracy.."
"Earth provides enough to satisfy every man"s needs, but not every man"s greed." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Never let your sense of morals get in the way of doing what's right." - Isaac Asimov
"They don't understand. Don't expect them to understand. Don't want them to understand. The ones who do understand will not have to be told to understand." - Anonymous
"They don't understand. Don't expect them to understand. Don't want them to understand. The ones who do understand will not have to be told to understand."
"Our main problem is a lack of understanding of what it means to be human and that we are not separate from nature." - Jacque Fresco
"In those moments when we are listening to the society, we are forgetting who we truly are."
"It never goes too far, there are just some people who can't bear it" -Anonymous
"The appearance of impossibility is most often the result of limited vision" - Tom Campbell
"Cinderella story, out of nowhere, former greenskeeper, now about to become the Masters champion. It looks like a mirac- it's in the hole! It's in the hole!" Carl Spackler (Bill Murray) *Caddyshack* (1980)
"There he goes. One of God's own prototypes. A high-powered mutant of some kind never even considered for mass production. Too weird to live, and too rare to die." Hunter S. Thompson
"Time is what we want most,but what we use worst." - William Penn
"There is only one cause of unhappiness: the false beliefs you have in your head, beliefs so widespread, so commonly held, that it never occurs to you to question them."
"A tribe is a group of people connected to one another, connected to a leader, and connected to an idea. For millions of years, human beings have been part of one tribe or another. A group needs only two things to be a tribe: a shared interest and a way to communicate. - SETH GODIN"
"The Edge.... There is no honest way to explain it because the only people who really know where it is are the ones who have gone over. The othersthe livingare those who pushed their control ... then pulled back ... when it came time to choose between Now and Later."  Hunter S. Thompson
"The Edge.... There is no honest way to explain it because the only people who really know where it is are the ones who have gone over. The othersthe livingare those who pushed their luck ... then pulled back ... when it came time to choose between Now and Later.  Hunter S. Thompson
''The thing about tomorrows -the little girl said- is that no matter how mad at the world you are, they will be there happy to see you.'' Atticus
"It's fine to celebrate success but it is more important to heed the lessons of failure".----- Bill Gates
"Every path is the right path. Everything could've been anything else. And it would have just as much meaning"
"To know oneself is bad is to know oneself is good" - C. Strydom
"Everybody's worried about stopping terrorism. Well, there's a really easy way; stop participating in it." - Noam Chomsky
"Everybody's worriee abiut stopping terrorism. Well, there's a really easy way; stop participating in it" - Noam Chomsky
" This is the real secret of life -- to be completely engaged with what you are doing in the here and now. And instead of calling it work, realize it is play." Alan W. Watts
"Three things in human life are important: The first is to be kind. The second is to be kind, and the third is to be kind."  Henry James
"The only thing I ever got out of fame was a better table in a restaurant. And for that I gave up being able to relate to people."  David Bowie
"Talking about art is like dancing about architecture."  David Bowie
"I had an agent once who said that in an audition you have to make the women want to be you and the men want to fuck you. I said, I'm sorry, I can't just go into a room and, like, try to achieve that. That's not my motivation in life."  Chloe Sevigny
"You hear about these actresses who avoid going to fashion shows lest they not be taken seriously. I don't like going because it's such a circus. It's always anticlimactic. But I'm not ashamed to admit it: Fashion is superficial, but I love it."  Chloe Sevigny
"Resentment is like taking poison and waiting for the other person to die." - Malachy McCourt
"One often meets his destiny on the road he takes to avoid it." - Jean de La Fontaine
"Service to others is the rent you pay for your room here on earth." - Muhammad Ali
"After all, what is faith if it doesn't endure when we are tested the most?" -Frank Underwood
"When you talk, you are only repeating what already know. But if you listen, you may learn something new. - Dalai Lama
"Accept everything about yourself - I mean everything, You are you and that is the beginning and the end - no apologies, no regrets."-- Henry A. Kissinger
"Before you diagnose yourself with depression or low self-esteem, first make sure that you are not, in fact, just surrounded by assholes." - William Gibson
"You're the jelly to my burger, the knife to my soup, the glitter to my sushi, and the ketchup to my ice cream. My point is, you're worthless."
"Music is the silence between the notes". Claude Debussy
"Failure will never overtake me if my determination to succeed is strong enough"-------Og Mandino
"I can find your pants online for free. So go away." -My Girlfriend playing Destiny
'A person is going to be entertained to the limit of their own intellect' - Kool G Rap
"Sometimes there just aren't enough rocks." - Forrest Gump
"If you want a happy ending, that depends, of course, on where you stop your story."  Orson Welles
"Follow effective actions with quiet reflection. From the quiet reflection will come even more effective action."  Peter Drucker
"I have nothing to offer but blood, toil, tears and sweat." - Winston Churchill
"There's no such thing as an ending, just a place where you leave the story." - Muriel Donnelly
"You're the protagonist of your own life." -Arataka Reigen
"If you want to be a grocer, or a general, or a politician, or a judge, you will invariably become it; that is your punishment..." (rest of quote in text)
"Thinking clearly is like weight lifting, like body bulding. If you don't put enough effort it will go fat and blunt."
"An omniscient being would either go insane or would either become silent".
"How fortunate for governments that the people they administer don't think" -- Adolf Hitler.
''I find comfort in knowing that I've only lost those who didn't deserve to stay.'' R.H. Sin
"I'm sorry, but apparently the darkness has made you retarded." - Kobe Wan Kenobi
"A society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in."
"Arrogance is excusable when it stems from sorrow" - unknown
"Don"t spend time beating on a wall, hoping to transform it into a door."-----Coco Chanel
"That which is obtained easily is just as easily lost."
"People who think they know everything are a great annoyance to those of us who do." - Isaac Asimov
"And in the end, we were all just humans, drunk on the idea that love, only love, could heal our brokenness." - Christopher Poindexter
"Character is how you treat those who can do nothing for you." -unknown
"Often those that criticise others reveal what he himself lacks." - Shannon L. Alder
"Science without religion is lame, religion without science is blind." - Albert Einstein
"As if you could kill time without injuring eternity" -David Henry Thoreau
"If for every error and every act of incompetence one can substitute an act of treason, many points of fascinating interpretation are open to the paranoid imagination." - Richard Hofstadter, The Paranoid Style in American Politics and Other Essays
"America is great because she is good. If America ceases to be good, America will cease to be great." -Alexis de Tocqueville
"Let a man walk alone, let him commit no sin, with few wishes, like an elephant in the forest." -The Dhammapada
"If you ever feel as useless as a white crayon, find someone who prefers black paper."
"In the twenty-first century, the robot will take the place which slave labor occupied in ancient civilization." - Nikola Tesla
"Did you hear about the rose that grew from a crack in the concrete? Proving nature's laws wrong, it learned to walk without having feet. Funny, it seems to by keeping it's dreams; it learned to breathe fresh air. Long live the rose that grew from concrete when no one else even cared." -Tupac
"I don't understand why when we destroy something created by man we call it vandalism, but when we destroy something created by nature we call it progress. -Ed Begley Jr.
"Shadow in the flame. The flame is not so bright to itself as to those on whom it shines: so too the wise man." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"When a thing has been said, and said well, have no scruple. Take it and copy it" - Anatole France
"Love yourself first and everything else falls into line. You really have to love yourself to get anything done in this world."  Lucille Ball
"Earth provides enough to satisfy every man's needs, but not every man's greed." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Think like a queen. A queen is not afraid to fail. Failing is another steppingstone to greatness." ---Oprah Winfrey
"We appear to be experiencing a suspicious and disconcerting deficit of Gandalfs. Stand by." - Gandalf
"Life can only be understood backwards, but it must be lived forwards." - Soren Kierkegaard
"The ones who are crazy enough to think they can change the world, are the ones who do." -Steve Jobs
"Friends always make the worst enemies" -Frank Underwood
"I've always loathed the necessity of sleep. Like death it puts even the most powerful men on their backs" -Frank Underwood
"Nothing is more humiliating than to see idiots succeed in enterprises we have failed in."  Gustave Flaubert
"I drink, I smoke and I think." Scrates (former Brazilian football player)
"songs are just very interesting things to be doing with the air" - Tom Waits
"God has no religion." - Mahatma Gandhi
"There"s no better way to overpower a trickle of doubt than with a flood of naked truth." - Frank Underwood, House of Cards
"I Pray to Myself for Myself" -Frank Underwood
"Democracy is So Overrated" -Frank Underwood
"When I watch comedy alone I never laugh, I only think. When I watch comedy in the company of others, I laugh so hard I lose my breath."
"Ask not what you can do for your country. Ask what's for lunch." - Orson Welles
"I have no sense of decency, that way my other senses are enhanced" Bulldog from the comedy show Frazier. LOL.
"Nothing, I keep other people awake at night" -Secretary of Defense Gen. Mattis when asked what keeps him awake at night.
"I've found out why people laugh. They laugh because it hurts so much . . . because it's the only thing that'll make it stop hurting." - Robert A. Heinlein
"Dear lord, please help us to not die... today."
"Yes. But, he's channeling the anger that I feel." -I don't know
"The government is merely the military-industrial complex's entertainment branch" -- Frank Zappa
"I can't wait for the day my generation is in control. This giant generation gap has really stunted things." - Tony Coleman
"My mother thinks I am the best. And I was raised to always believe what my mother tells me." Diego Maradona
"You will never win if you are too scared to lose" -- Anonymous
"The fisherman know that the sea is dangerous and the storm terrible, but they have never found these dangers sufficient reason for remaining ashore."
"Don't pray when it rains if you don't pray when the sun shines."
"When a man throws a ball high in the air and catches it again, he behaves as if he had solved a set of differential equations in predicting the trajectory of the ball. He may neither know or care what a differential equation is, but it does not affect his skill with the ball." - Richard Dawkins
"Who can figure out the true meaning of "covfefe" ? ? ? Enjoy"- unknown
"Conformity is the jailer of freedom and the enemy of growth." - John F. Kennedy
"We do not inherit the earth from our ancestors; we borrow it from our children"
"Failure is only the opportunity to begin again, only this time more wisely." - Henry Ford
"People only find me interesting because they can't ever tell whether I'm serious or not"
"more time = more productive"
"The future doesn't belong to the fainthearted; it belongs to the brave." - Ronald Reagan 1/28/96, Challenger Disaster
"A delayed game is eventually good, but a rushed game is forever bad." -Shigeru Miyamoto
"It ain't what you don't know that gets you into trouble, It's what you know for sure that just ain't so". -Mark Twain
"What do you imagine the American people would think of me if I wasted my time going to the ball game?"- 22 president Grover Cleveland.
"We do not need magic to change the world, we carry all the power we need inside ourselves already: we have the power to imagine better." - J.K Rowling
"It is the way of man, to make monsters. And it is the way of monsters to destroy their makers."
"Be good at something, It makes you valuable" -Randy Pausch
"politics is the realistic process of making decisions and allocating resources in a context of scarcity and divergent interests."
"Keep your face always toward the sunshine- and shadows will fall behind you." - Walt Whitman
"I can't change the direction of the wind, but i can adjust my sails to always reach my destination." - Jimmy Dean
"Tell me and I forget. Teach me and I remember. Involve me and I learn." - Benjamin Franklin
"We are all born ignorant, but one must work hard to remain stupid."  Benjamin Franklin
"Release fear, it will keep you open to adventure." - found on a prayer flag in Sedona, AZ
"Do not be embarrassed by your failures, learn from them and start again."  Richard Branson
"If you want something badly. You just gotta believe it's gonna work out" - Andy Dwyer
"Excuses are useless; complaining is draining." - Willam Belli
"Victorious warriors win first and then go to war, while defeated warriors go to war first and then seek to win." --Sun Tzu
"Words mean more than what is set down on paper." Maya Angelou
"I may not be a Man of God, Reverend. But I know right, and I know wrong. And I have the good grace to know which is which" - Sergeant Nicholas Angel, Hot Fuzz
"If you think you're enlightened, go spend a week[end] with your family." --Ram Dass
"No, the curse is broken. Sometimes you just miss." -Ferb Fletcher
"You show up on time. When you say you're going to do something, you try to do your best at it. You don't backstab people. You don't bitch and complain about what you're doing. Being compassionate is big. And it's always important to act like a gentleman."
"Truth suffers from too much analysis" -Frank Herbert, Dune Messiah (1969)
"What is today, but yesterday's tomorrow?" - Mr Krabbs to Squidward on procrastination
"We can complain because rose bushes have thorns, or rejoice because thorn bushes have roses" - Abraham Lincoln
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." Aristotle, 384322 BC
"Society constantly expends it's efforts to correct effects instead of causes..."
"I was not going to feel sorry for myself. No, why should I? ...When I got the big scores, or when I got player of the match, or hit six sixes, had I ever asked God, 'why me?' Of course not. So when the illness came I had no right to ask 'why me?" - Yuvraj Sing
"Every person is a new door to a different world." - Six Degrees of Separation
"There is no fear in love. But perfect love drives out fear, because fear has to do with punishment. The one who fears is not made perfect in love." (1 John 4:18 NIV)
"I am 25 years old and I have killed 309 fascist invaders by now. Don"t you think, gentlemen, that you have been hiding behind my back for too long?" - Lyudmila Pavlichenko / female Soviet sniper.
#Quotes
"Friendship is like a bank account. You can't continue to draw on it without making deposits." - Anonymous
"The unexplainable belongs to essential mysteries" -Anonymous
'It is the duty of the Patriot to protect his country from its government.'- Thomas Paine
"We read, we travel, we become."  Derek Walcott
"The illiterate of the future will not be the person who cannot read. It will be the person who does not know how to learn." - Alvin Toffler
'Faith' is the first name, don't make it last name by adding word 'blind' - By Narci ( The Rapper )
"Success means doing the best we can with what we have. Success is the doing, not the getting; in the trying, not the triumph. Success is a personal standard, reaching for the highest that is in us, becoming all that we can be."  Zig Ziglar
"Judge each day not by the harvest you reap but by the seeds you plant." -Anonymous
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the Universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying." - Arthur C. Clarke
[T]here is a methodological bias in favor of taking natural discourse literally, other things being equal. For example, unless there are clear reasons for construing discourse as ambiguous, elliptical, or involving special idioms, we should not so construe it. Tyler Burge
"The difference between people who make their dreams come true and those of us who don"t is just one thing: the courage to start and the discipline to keep going." --Mel Robbins
"Victory and Defeat are commonplace among those who fight." -Chinese Proverb
"...and institutions will curl up like burnt paper."
"Sometimes in life, our fire gets covered in dust and we don"t visit very often. But the truth is, we humans, when we are being pushed, we are strong! Don"t be afraid to visit that fire, don"t be scared to depend on that fire because it is God-given in each of us." --- Bear Grylls
?Sometimes in life, our fire gets covered in dust and we don"t visit very often. But the truth is, we humans, when we are being pushed, we are strong! Don"t be afraid to visit that fire, don"t be scared to depend on that fire because it is God-given in each of us." --- Bear Grylls
"You see a person's true colors when you are no longer beneficial to their life" -- Anonymous
"Sociology isn't anthropology. If you study humans you have an obligation to help them. Apathy in that regard acts as a tacit admission of disdain." - Jane Noodall
"Come even though you have broken your vows a thousand times, Come, and come yet again. Ours is not a caravan of despair." - Rumi
"For most of history, Anonymous was a woman." - Virginia Woolf
"White supremacy + black supremacy = Straciatella Icecream" - Unknown
"For most of history, Anonymous was a woman." -Virginia Woolf
"Happiness comes in moments, & then it's gone until the next time. Could be years. But sadness settles it." - Dennis Lehane, Mystic River
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire." - Charles Bukowski
"The world will not be destroyed by those who do evil, but by those who watch them without doing anything."  Albert Einstein
"Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful".-----Albert Schweitzer
"But he will fear least to become nothing in death who has recognised that he is already nothing now . . . .
"Admit that your own private Mount Everest exists. That is half the battle." - Hugh Macleod
"Your plan has got to be clear, concise, compelling, consistent and committed. You got to have a plan" - Chris Gardner
"Some of you love sleep more than you love success" -Eric Thomas
"When truth is replaced by silence, the silence is a lie."  Yevegny Yevtushenko
"When life gives you lemons, plant a lemon tree."
"Experiment is the true master who must be followed in Physics" - Blaise Pascal
""that's the universe at large; incommensurable, nonlinear, and outside the realm of syntax."
"Whenever justice is uncertain and police spying and terror are at work, human beings fall into isolation..." - C.G. Jung
"For you, I was a chapter. For me, you were the book." - Tom McNeal
'If you are strong enough to lose you are destined to win' - Ryan Chrys
"The difference between the impossible and the possible lies in a person"s determination."  Tommy Lasorda
"A drop of ink may make a million think." - Lord Byron
"The only truly immortal investment of human labor is art!" - Adolf Hitler
"The existence of modern capitalism is dependent upon the existence of need and dependence. The day every one can wholly fulfill all of their own desires is the day capitalism has not one consumer left."
"Eat the same food that the producer eats on a daily basis, not what he sells you to eat on a daily basis" --- Unknown
"It is far easier to see brave men die than to hear a coward beg for life." -Jack London, The Iron Heel
"Failure is success if we learn from it." --- Malcolm Forbes
"Melancholyis the happiness of being sad."  Victor Hugo
"You ever feel lonely? Only around people." - Thin Red Line
"Outside of a dog, a book is man"s best friend. Inside of a dog it"s too dark to read."Groucho Marx
"You were my cup of tea, I drink coffee now."  vollenden
"I'm sorry I'm not an easy person to love."
"Stop trying to find the right woman... Just work on being the right man " Corey Bricker
"There is a giant inside every one of us just waiting to be awoken & turned loose. Embrace that feeling & go with it " Corey Bricker
"In many ways Duct Tape is like the force, it has a light side and a dark side, and it binds the whole universe together" - Adam Savage
"The cause of freedom is not the cause of a race or a sect, a party or a class-it is the cause of human kind, the very birthright of humanity." - Anna Julia Cooper
"We don"t appreciate what we have until it"s gone. Freedom is like that. It"s like air. When you have it, you don"t notice it." - Boris Yeltsin
"You will have bad times, but they will always wake you up to the stuff you weren"t paying attention to."  Robin Williams
"Struggle is a never ending process. Freedom is never really won, you earn it and win it in every generation." - Coretta Scott King
"Money won"t create success, the freedom to make it will." - Nelson Mandela
"IF YOU ARE THE HEAD THAT FLOATS ATOP THE ZIGGURAT THEN THE STAIRS THAT LEAD TO YOU MUST BE INFINITE, AND INFINITE STAIRS ARE UNACCEPTABLE!!!" - Lemongrab
"Character is destiny." - Heraclitus
"If people don't either love or hate your work, then you just haven't done all that much." -Tinker Hatfield
"Don't compare your progress with that of others. We all need our own time to travel our own distance."  Unknown
"They don't think it be like it is, but it do." --Oscar Gamble
"The resource of violence is in everyone; all that changes is our view of the justification." - Gavin de Becker, The Gift of Fear
"The end of all our exploring will be to arrive where we began and to know the place for the first time." - T.S. Eliot
"Broad, wholesome, charitable views of men and things cannot be acquired by vegetating in one little corner of the earth all one's lifetime." - Mark Twain
"Human willpower is a real force, capable of achieving absolutely anything, from the mundane to the miraculous." - Eliphas Levi
"Life cannot be better than your mindset."
"Yes officer I saw the speed limit, I just didn't see your car."
"A great civilization is not conquered from without until it has destroyed itself from within." - Will Durant
"The easiest thing I've ever done was to earn a million dollars, the most difficult thing I've ever done was to believe it could happen to me" -Les Brown
'Modest doubt is called the beacon of the wise.' Willy Shakes
'...we are but the guests of life, we begin aghast and end a ghost.' Anthony Burgess, A Dead Man in Deptford
'Selfish men make the best lovers. They're prepared to invest in the women's pleasures so that they can collect an even bigger dividend for themselves.' JG Ballard, Cocaine Nights
'A widespread taste for pornography means that nature is alerting us to some threat of extinction.' JB Ballard
"My body is my journal,and my tattoos are my story"----Johnny Depp
"So it is more useful to watch a man in times of peril, and in adversity to discern what kind of man he is; for then at last words of truth are drawn from the depths of his heart, and the mask is torn off, reality remains." - Titus Lucretius Carus
27 Great Chess Quotes from Magnus Carlsen (before becoming World Champion)
'I believe in the power of the imagination to remake the world, to release the truth within us, to hold back the night, to transcend death, to charm motorways, to ingratiate ourselves with birds, to enlist the confidences of madmen.' JG Ballard
"If you are insecure, guess what? The rest of the world is too. Do not overestimate the competition and underestimate yourself. You are better than you think." - Tim Ferriss
"I am thankful for all of those who said NO to me. It"s because of them I"m doing it myself." Albert Einstein
"The Present's Just a Pleasant Interruption To The Past."
"Every form of evil starts with just one man." - Jess (Me)
"Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent." - Isaac Asimov
"Let them judge you. Let them misunderstand you. Let them gossip about you. Their opinions aren't your problems. You stay kind committed to love & free in your authenticity. No matter what they do or say, don't doubt your worth or beauty of your truth..." -Scott Stabile
"A goal is not always meant to be reached, it often serves simply as something to aim at." - Bruce Lee
"Help young people. Help small guys. Because small guys will be big. Young people will have the seeds you bury in their minds, and when they grow up, they will change the world."----Jack MA
"I don't like em' putting chemicals in the water that turn the friggin' frogs gay."
"You have to think, so why not think big?"
"Every moment you live in the past is a moment you waste in the present." - Tony Robbins
"Winning is problematic. People like you more when you're working towards something, not when you have it." - Drake
"Teach a people to jealously safeguard their chastity without also teaching them to defend themselves..."
"You control your own life.You"re own extremely powerful".----J.K. Rowling
"Summer without you is as cold as winter. Winter without you is even colder." -Daniel Handler as Lemony Snicket
"Happiness can exist only in acceptance." (-George Orwell)
"Life is so short, so beautiful. Don"t be so serious about work. Enjoy the lives."---Jack Ma
"It is okay to be ignorant as long as you're not stupid." -Anonymous
"To cater to an audience's taste is not to respect them, and if the audience doesn't understand that, they don't deserve respect." Phil Ochs
"I'm going to stick your fucking dick up your fucking ass after I rip it off." - George Fisher, 2002.
"He is a wise man who does not grieve for the things which he has not, but rejoices for those which he has" -Epictetus
"When you feel you're too difficult to love, you'll love for crumbs,"
"Terrorists... are losers," (Donald Trump).
"tolerance means tolerating the intolerant" - me
"Never limit yourself because of others" limited imagination; never limit others because of your own limited imagination."  Mae Jemison
"What I used to be will pass away and then you'll see that all I really want now is happiness for you and me." -Elliott Smith
"We cannot change the cards we are dealt, just how we play the hand." - Randy Pausch
"Sitting quietly, doing nothing, Spring Comes, and the grass grows by itself." - Matsuo Basho
"How we spend our days is of course, how we spend our lives." Annie Dillard
"If you worry about nothing you won't survive, if you worry about everything you can't live"
"I've lost confidence in myself. The universe is against me." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"People are rewarded in public for what they've practiced for years in private" -Tony Robbins
"Over Every Mountain, There Is A Path, Although It May Not Be Seen From The Valley." -Theodore Roethke
"Peace cannot be kept by force; it can only be achieved by understanding." - Albert Einstein
"The soldier above all others prays for peace, for he must suffer and bear the deepest wounds and scars of war." - General Douglas MacArthur
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don"t matter and those who matter don"t mind." -Dr. Seuss
"How many cares one loses when one decides not to be something but to be someone." -Gabrielle
"If you see fraud and do not say fraud, you are a fraud." - Nassim Taleb
"Look at yourself as a color. You may not be everybody's favorite color but believe me, one day you will meet someone who needs you to complete his picture."  Unknown
"I'm selfish, impatient, and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control, and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." Marilyn Monroe
"I disapprove of what you say, but will defend to the death your right to say it." - Voltaire
"You can"t wait for inspiration. You have to go after it with a club." - Jack London
"Lack of direction, not lack of time, is the problem. We all have twenty-four hour days." - Zig Ziglar
"Truth is like poetry... and most people hate poetry" - The Big Short
"Cry. Forgive. Learn. Move on. Let your tears water the seeds of your future happiness." - Steve Maraboli
"Once you can accept the universe as matter expanding into nothing that is something, wearing stripes with plaid comes easy." - Albert Einstein
"Be sober, be vigilant; because your adversary the devil walks about like a roaring lion, seeking whom he may devour". 1 Peter 5:8
"You can make more friends in two months by becoming interested in other people than you can in two years by trying to get other people interested in you."  Dale Carnegie
"Sex is the consolation you have when you can't have love." - Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"[...] those living systems actually have to do something, [...] to make sense of the information. So that's what your brain evolved to do: to take what is completely meaningless and make it meaningful; because you actually have to behave. Physics doesn't have to behave, physicists do." Beau Lotto.
"Think about the rivers of blood, spilled by all those generals and emperors, so that in gloriant triumph they could become the momentary masters of a fraction of a dot" - Carl Sagan
"Think about the rivers of blood, spilled by all those generals and emperors, so that in gloriant triumph they could become the momentary masters of a fraction of a dot"
"Go to Heaven for the climate, Hell for the company." - Mark Twain
"WISE MEN LEARN MORE FROM FOOLS THAN FOOLS LEARN FROM WISE MEN." - Marcus Porcius Cato
"The brick walls aren't there to keep us out, the brick walls are there to give us a chance to show how badly we want something." -R Pausch
"We cannot solve our problems with the same thinking we use when we created them." -Albert Einstein
"Interpretation is the revenge of the intellect upon art."  Susan Sontag
"Women who seek to be equal with men lack ambition."
' It is true that liberty is precious  so precious that it must be rationed' - Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov (Lenin)
"You play like you practice."
"Our dreams can come true if we have the courage to pursue them." - Walt Disney
"If you find yourself in a hole; stop digging." - Will Rogers
"Nobody exists on purpose. Nobody belongs anywhere. Everybody's gonna die. Come watch tv." - Morty
"You are not what you make, for it will be fleeting or separate from you; you are one continuous whole. What you make reflects the choices which you have made; you are the choices."
"Existence is a strange bargain. Life owes us little; we owe it everything. The only true happiness comes from squandering ourselves for a purpose." - William Cowper
"I'll fuck you till you love me faggot"-Mike Tyson
"We struggle to comprehend the warped and twisted mind that sees a room packed with young children not as a scene to cherish but as an opportunity for carnage." BPM Theresa May
"Instead of trying to make your life perfect, give yourself the freedom to make it an adventure, and go ever upward." - Drew Houston
"You stare at your coffee hoping it gives you perspective & sanity & the ability to make sense of it all & that's a lot to ask of your coffee."  Lin-Manuel Miranda
"Whoever considers the nature of our government with discernment will see that though obstacles and delays will frequently stand in the way of the adoption of good measures, yet when once adopted, they are likely to be stable and permanent. It will be far more difficult to undo than to do." AH, 1790
"I'm not taking breaths. I'm harvesting air" - Thomas Croft
"Science investigates; religion interprets. Science gives man knowledge, which is power; religion gives man wisdom, which is control." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Our greatest fear should not be of failure  but of succeeding at things in life that don"t really matter."  Francis Chan
"Generosity is giving more than you have, and Pride is taking less than you need" - Khalil Gibran
'Man is a bad animal.' Brion Gysin
"The only valid censorship of ideas is the right of people not to listen." - Tommy Smothers
"If I tell you I'm good, probably you will say I'm boasting. But if I tell you I'm not good, you'll know I'm lying." - Bruce Lee
"If you want to shine like the sun, first you have to burn like it." - Adolf Hitler
"No, no, I do not have an addiction to suffering. I have an addiction to what the product of suffering is..." Mathew Fraser
"A drunk mind speaks a sober heart" - Jean-Jaques Rousseau
"Whilst lashing out at an insult can provide a certain gratification; a long and carefully executed revenge is far more satisfying" - Director Josef Venport
"Ah, good conversationthere"s nothing like it, is there? The air of ideas is the only air worth breathing." -Edith Wharton
"Either write something worth reading or do something worth writing." Ben Franklin
"Pleasure in the job puts perfection in the work"- Aristotle
"It's the character that's the strongest that God gives the most challenges to." -Marty O'Reilly(Return to Me)
"Take the risk of thinking for yourself, much more happiness, truth, beauty, and wisdom will come to you that way" - C. Hitchens
"I don't think we give the lazy and ineffectual among us enough credit for not being out there doing active harm" - DC Pierson
"Not all of us can do great things. But we can do small things with great love." - Mother Teresa
"Do small things with great love." - Mother Teresa
"Do smalls things with great love." - Mother Teresa
"If you pick up a starving dog and make him prosperous he will not bite you. This is the principal difference between a dog and man." - Mark Twain
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein
"I have always imagined that Paradise will be a kind of library." - Jorge Luis Borges
"Don't stop when you are tired, stop when you are done" -- Anonymous
"Quotes zijn kut" -Arend Splinter
"Out of suffering have emerged the strongest souls; the most massive characters are seared with scars." - Kahlil Gibran
"To truly love is to truly be alone, for it is love that forces you to educate the sheeple" - Amadeus Walentine, Esq
"I am part of a lost generation. . ." - Jonathan Reed (pretty long but worth the read)
"Wit has truth in it; wise-cracking is simply calisthenics with words."  Dorothy Parker
"Only the captain knows how deep his submarine can go"
"If your basic needs are covered without working, then you become bored, depressed and you would stay at home doing nothing" - A Millionaire Rentier
"People fall in love with a person, not a gender."
'Wedged as we are between two eternities of idleness, there is no excuse for being idle now.' Anthony Burgess
"What you fear will not go away. It will take you into yourself and bless you and keep you. That's the world, and we all live there." - William Stafford
"At last,after our long journey, we have arrived at the beginning" - Ancient Mentat Conundrum.
"You only say never because no one ever has" - The Princess Bride (1987)
"Can an altruistic act performed with indifference be considered true altruism?"
"Pika, Pika, Pikachuuuu!" - Pikachu
10 incredible Quotes to guide your life.
"Whatever you do in life will be insignificant. but it is very important that you do it because, You can't know.... - Will Fetters
"Lowly, unpurposeful, and random as they may appear, sidewalk contacts are the small change from which a city"s wealth of public life may grow." -- Jane Jacobs
"Criminals are made, not born"
"If you don"t know it"s impossible, it"s easier to do." - Bulldog Drummond
"A damn fine cup of coffee." -Agent Dale Cooper
"You"ve got to get up every morning with determination if you"re going to go to bed with satisfaction."  George Lorimer
"You cannot change your destination overnight, but you can change your direction overnight". Jim Rohn
"I Disapprove of What You Say, But I Will Defend to the Death Your Right to Say It" - Voltaire
"I am too pure for you or anyone." - Sylvia Plath
"Give a man a mask and he will show you his true self." - Oscar Wilde
"She is like the night, silent and beautiful, yet deadly."- urielrocks5676
"She is like the night, both beautiful and deadly."- urielrocks5676
"Let sanguine healthy-mindedness do its best with its strange power of living in the moment and ignoring and forgetting, still the evil background is really there to be thought of, and the skull will grin in at the banquet."  William James
'Smerfi!' - Lady Donegula in Rayham Carter's Novel, Gunshot Paradise, Gunsmoke Hell.
"How lucky I am to have something that makes saying goodbye so hard" -Winnie the Pooh.
"If you accomplish something good with hard work, the labor passes quickly, but the good endures; if you do something shameful in pursuit of pleasure, the pleasure passes quickly, but the shame endures." -Gaius Musonius Rufus
"Blessed are the forgetful, for they get the better even of their blunders." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"The divorce between church and state should be absolute." -20 president James A. Garfield
"The separation of Church and State in everything relating to taxation should be absolute." -James A. Garfield
"Now more than ever the people are responsible for the character of their Congress. If that body be ignorant, reckless, and corrupt, it is because the people tolerate ignorance, recklessness, and corruption." -20th President James A. Garfield
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"I will do lines on her forehead while i am in her up to my nuts"
"If you wish to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first invent the universe." --Carl Sagan
"Happiness is good health and a bad memory."  Ingrid Bergman
"Never waste your time trying to explain yourself to people who are committed to misunderstanding you."  Unknown
"Some say chivalry is dead; that's only if you can't get past the dragon." -Princess Vyadar, Knight's Gambit.
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do... Explore. Dream. Discover."  Mark Twain
"In love's arms one can rest well, but also deep in the earth; whether it will be there or here I will find rest" -Hermann Wilhelm Franz Ueltzen
"Old ways won't open new doors" - P. Diddy
"Inspiration is for amateurs. The rest of us just show up and get to work." - Chuck Close
"You are like the sunshine. Exquisite to bask in, a marvel to think of. But if I get too close, you burn." - me
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"If you accomplish something good with hard work, the labor passes quickly, but the good endures; if you do something shameful in pursuit of pleasure, the pleasure passes quickly, but the shame endures." -Gaius Musonius Rufus
[Depressing] "On the road of life you will find various obstacles, but why should you be worried about obstacles if you're standing still?"
"I never imagined that so many days would ultimately make such a small life."  Franz Kafka
"May my silences become more accurate." Theodore Roethke
"The gods can be killed. You simply have to wait until they forget that anger feels better than fear." - Voltorb
"The gods can be killed. You simply have to wait until they forget that anger feels better than fear and sadness." - Voltorb
"If you want to be happy, Live in the Present " - Anonymous
'Most people don't recognize opportunity when it comes, because its usually dressed in overalls and looks a lot like work.' - Thomas Edison
"Dreams give you fake dreams, and KILL your real ones." - Cooper Wainczak, 2017
"Physics has discovered some strange things about the world, but it has not discovered that change is an illusion."  Tim Maudlin
"Bloody you are. Bloody will thy end. Shame sets your life, and will your death attend."  Shakespeare
"Every man is guilty of all the good he did not do." - Voltaire
"I was your cure, and you were my disease. I was saving you, but you were killing me."
"If I always do what I've always done, I'll always get what I always got." - Jessie Porter
"We met each other when we were young, before we knew enough about disappointment, and once we did we found we reminded each other of it." - Nicole Krauss,
"She lived in a good land. But under every good land are the roots of oppression. And in this land those roots took hold and choked out all else." Night In The Woods
"If I always do what I've always done, then I'll always get what you've always gotten" - Jessie Potter
"Fool me once, shame on me. Fool me - can't get fooled again" - George W. Bush
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone sees it." -Confucius
"The worst part about being abused by your mother is that society teaches you they have a deep maternal bond to their children. You always see or hear about mothers who will do anything to protect their children, and would never hate or harm them...
"You ask credit, I no give, you get mad. I give credit, you no pay, I get mad. Better you mad than me mad." - sign occasionally seen in Chinese businesses
'Nothing is true, everything is permitted.' Hassan i Sabbah
"There are two types of people who will tell you that you cannot make a difference in this world: those who are afraid to try and those who are afraid you will succeed."  Ray Goforth
"Everyone knows where they're going but they don't find out until they get there" - anonymous
"The routes of the shadow go all the way down to hell" - Carl Jung
"A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away." Antoine de Saint-Exupery
'Pornography is a powerful catalyst for social change.' JG Ballard
'Reject your sense of injury and the injury itself will disappear.' Marcus Aurelius, Meditations
"He hoped he would live through this, but he was willing to die, if that was what it took to be alive." - Neil Gaiman, American Gods
"He hoped he would love through this, but he was willing to dir, if that was what it took to be alive." - Neil Gaiman, American Gods
"If all mankind minus one, were of one opinion, and only one person were of the contrary opinion, mankind would be no more justified in silencing that one person, than he, if he had the power, would be justified in silencing mankind." - John Stuart Mill
"There wasn't a key moment when I knew I wanted to quit." -Chris Cornell
"Mr. Harris said that someone who seeks revenge should dig two graves, one for his victim and one for himself. Unless I end up cutting that bitch in half, I won't be needing that second hole." - "A Dish Best Served," J. Richard Singleton
"Never underestimate the ability of a small group of dedicated people to change the world. Indeed, it is the only thing that ever has." Margaret Mead
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire."  Charles Bukowski
"When "i" is replaced with "we" even illness becomes wellness." - Malcolm X
"He has all the virtues I dislike and none of the vices I admire. "  Winston Churchill
"The Constitution is not an instrument for the government to restrain the people, it is an instrument for the people to restrain the government - lest it come to dominate our lives and interests." - Patrick Henry
"most of the misattributed quotations you run into weren't contrived to deceive anyone...." (interesting article about quotes)
"What I want is to be intimate with the knowledge that life is temporary. And then, in the shadow of that knowledge, to know how to live." -Unknown
"Fiction reveals truth that reality obscures." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"He who is not courageous enough to take risks will accomplish nothing in life." Muhammad Ali
"Good people do not need laws to tell them to act responsibly, while bad people will find a way around the laws." Platon
"The best things in life are on the other side of fear"
"A man who stands for nothing will fall for anything" -Malcolm X
"For two thousand years, Jesus has revenged himself on us for not having died on a sofa." - C.M. Cioran
"It is a poor war-chief that prays for war." -War-Chief Sona(Horizon: Zero Dawn)
"If I had known they were going to do this, I would have become a shoemaker." - Albert Einstein
"Do your own thing on your own terms and get what you came here for." -Oliver James
'It is sweet to view the sea when standing on the shore' -Archippus
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Took a class, big fun | Modern Ethics 101 | First day learned why | Ethics really don't apply" - Steve Taylor
"Love is wise, hatred is foolish." - Bertrand Russell
"Conformity is the jailer of freedom and the enemy of growth."  John F. Kennedy
"There's no problem living a double life. It's the triple, and quadruple lives, that get you in the end." -Lord of War
"If liberty means anything at all, it means the right to tell people what they do not want to hear." - George Orwell
"If you don"t value your time, neither will others. Stop giving away your time and talents. Value what you know and start charging for it."  Kim Garst
"The problem isn"t that Johnny can"t read. The problem isn"t even that Johnny can"t think. The problem is that Johnny doesn"t know what thinking is; he confuses it with feeling."  Thomas Sowell
"Any fool can criticize, condemn, and complain but it takes character and self control to be understanding and forgiving." -Dale Carnegie
"Women and children knew deep in themselves that no misfortune was too great to bear if their men were whole." - John Steinbeck, The Grapes of Wrath
"It always seems impossible until it's done" - Nelson Mandela
"Sex is pointless without the potency." -Cleveland Brown
"Nolite te bastardes carborundorum."-RiRi, Cheers (Drink to That)
"I look at you and see the rest of my life in front of my eyes."
"The more people you know,the more people you don't know talk about you."
"A mind needs books as a sword needs a whetstone, if it is to keep its edge." - George R.R. Martin
"The goal isn"t to live forever, the goal is to create something that will."  Chuck Palahniuk
"I marvel at the complexities and unpredictability of human thought and behavior. Now, rather than being rattled by uncertainty, I realize that it is pure hubris to posit specificity. " -Dr. Irvin D. Yalom
"By all means, marry. If you get a good wife, you'll become happy; if you get a bad one, you'll become a philosopher." Socrates, 469399 B.C.
"I came into this world kicking and screaming while covered in someone else's blood and I have no problem with going out the same way" -Unknown Viking
"Your pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your understanding." - Khalil Gibran
"The good life is one inspired by love and guided by knowledge" - Bertrand Russell
"All things are poison and nothing is without poison; only the dose makes a thing not a poison." - Paracelsus
"Hillary Clinton and Barack Obama cannot destroy the conservative brand. Donald Trump can." - Matt Lewis
"Don't lose any sleep tonight, I'm sure everything will end up alright." - Chris Cornell
"They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety." -Benjamin Franklin
"Curiosity is the strongest force in the universe. Because it is able to silence the two strongest braking forces in the universe: fear and reason." - Walter Moers, German fiction writer
"Curiosity is the strongest force in the universe. Because it is able to silence the next two strongest forces: fear and reason."
"Sometimes you won't ever know the value of a moment until it becomes a memory." - Dr. Seuss
"Forgive yourself for not knowing what you didn"t know before you learned it."  Maya Angelou
"music shouldn't be ego-driven.When you go out on stage and play songs, it is.But when you're sitting in a room, writing songs,it's a completely different process.It's a completely different place. It's a creative place, a musical place. It has nothing to do with who likes what." Chris Cornell
"Food is a journey into the soul of the country." - Susy Massetti
"There's something about losing friends, particularly young people, where it's not something that you get over. I don't believe there's a healing process." -Chris Cornell
"Building the towers belongs to the sky. When the whole thing comes crashing down don't ask me why." - Soundgarden
"Put your whole self into it, and you will find your true voice. Hold back and you won't. It's that simple." - Hugh Macleod
"We learn by example and by direct experience because there are real limits to the adequacy of verbal instruction." - Malcolm Gladwell
"The good neighbor looks beyond the external accidents and discerns those inner qualities that make all men human and, therefore, brothers." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Whenever evil befalls us, we ought to ask ourselves, after the first suffering, how we can turn it into good. So shall we take occasion, from one bitter root, to raise perhaps many flowers." - Leigh Hunt
'Against Stupidity the Gods themselves contend in vain' - Frederic Von Schiller
"It's not the having, it's the getting." - Elizabeth Taylor
"It's not the having, it's the getting." - Elizabeth Taylor
"Art is nature speeded up and God slowed down." -Malcolm de Chazal
"Words have power to evoke the greatest feeling or wound. It just takes a sharp cluster of words to pierce through it" -Expressive Introvert(Instagram)
"Life will bring you pain all by itself. Your responsibility is to create joy."  Milton Erickson
"If you have been brutally broken, but still have the courage to be gentle to others then you deserve a love deeper then the ocean itself." - Nikita Grill
"Things turn out best for the people who make the best out of the way things turn out." - Titus Livius
"He that would make his own liberty secure must guard even his own enemy from repression; for if he violates this duty he establishes a precedent that will reach to himself." -Thomas Paine
"I asked a Burmese why women, after centuries of following their men, now walk ahead. He said there were many unexploded land mines since the war." - Robert Mueller
"Anybody can sympathise with the sufferings of a friend, but it requires a very fine nature to sympathise with a friend's success." -Oscar Wilde
"You have to die a few times before you can really live" - Charles Bukowski
"It seems to me that if you or I must choose between two courses of thought or action, we should remember our dying and try so to live that our death brings no pleasure to the world." - John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"Dogs are not our whole life, but they make our lives whole." Attribution question
"I don't fit in anywhere, man. I really don't agree with anything either. Not even with what I just said so I think you can see the fucking problem here." - Bill Hicks
"Spend more time smiling than frowning and more time praising than criticizing." - Richard Branson
"What is terrible is not death but the lives people live or don't live up until their death" -Charles Bukowski
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim . Accept no one"s definition of your life, but define yourself."  Harvey Fierstein
"Strong minds discuss ideas, average minds discuss events, weak minds discuss people."  Socrates
"Never give up on a dream just because of the time it will take to accomplish it. The time will pass anyway. " Earl Nightingale
"One of the hardest tasks of leadership is understanding that you are not what you are, but what you're perceived to be by others." - Edward L. Flom
"When you understand that what you're telling is just a story. It isn't happening anymore. When you realize the story you're telling is just words, when you can just crumble it up and throw your past in the trashcan, then we'll figure out who you're going to be." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Our lives teach us who we are." - Salman Rushdie
"Change is the constant, the signal for rebirth, the egg of the phoenix." - Christina Baldwin
"Emotional intelligence does not mean merely "being nice". At strategic moment it may demand not "being nice", but rather, for example, bluntly confronting someone with an uncomfortable but consequential truth they've been avoiding." - Daniel Goleman, Working with Emotional Intelligence
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"Boldness is a mask for fear, however great." - John Dryden
"Boldness is a mask for fear, however great." - John Dryden
"Hell is not a place you go if you're not a Christian, it's the failure of your life's greatest ambition" - Immortal Technique
"The man who must brag for himself knows that no one else will." - Robin Hobb
"He may have been your father, boy, but he wasn't your daddy." - Yondu
"I will love myself despite the ease with which I lean toward the opposite." -Shane Koyczan
"The liver is the only organ in the human body that does not regenerate." - My Father-in-law, self proclaimed medical expert.
"The successful man is the one who finds out what is the matter with his business before his competitors do."  Roy L. Smith
"Invent a flying machine, or invent nothing - that is your own affair. You are pursuing an idea - that is enough. " - Peter Kropotkin
"The closing years of life are like a masquerade party, when the masks are dropped." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful." - Albert Schweitzer
"Good Artists Copy, but Great Artists Steal" - Picasso and countless other 'winners'... Check this article for more quotes on creativity
"Everyone thinks I dodged a bullet, but I think I shot the gun" - Greg Laswell
"Time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." - John Lennon
"Boy, stop trying to be impressive. Be useful instead"
"Never attribute to malice that which is adequately explained by stupidity." -Jargon File
"You can tell the same lie a thousand times But it never gets any more true So close your eyes once more and once more believe That they all still believe in you." -Randy Blythe
"When dealing with people, remember you are not dealing with creatures of logic, but with creatures bristling with prejudice and motivated by pride and vanity." - Dale Carnegie
"To succeed in business, to reach the top, an individual must know all that is possible to know about that business."  J. Paul Getty
"Sometimes in life you don't always feel like a winner, but that doesn't mean you're not a winner." - Lady Gaga
"We have all a better guide in ourselves, if we would attend to it, than any other person can be." - Jane Austen
"Let us hope that we are all preceded in this world by a love story." - Don Snyder
"The way you define yourself as a writer is that you write every time you have a free minute. If you didn't behave that way you would never do anything." - John Irving
"It is amazing how fast people learn when they are not insulated from the consequences of their decisions" - Thomas Sowell
"The expression 'There is nothing like the good old days' does not mean that fewer bad things happened before, but fortunately, that people tend to forget about them" - ernesto sabato
"Don't criticize what you cannot understand." - Bob Dylan
"Victory favors neither the righteous nor the wicked; only the prepared."
"THESE are the times that try men's souls. The summer soldier and the sunshine patriot will, in this crisis, shrink from the service of their country; but he that stands by it now, deserves the love and thanks of man and woman."-Thomas Paine
"Everyone wants to shine bright like a diamond, but no one wants to get cut" -Eric Thomas
:)
"Too often we underestimate the power of a touch, a smile, a kind word, a listening ear, an honest compliment, or the smallest act of caring, all of which have the potential to turn a life around." - Leo Buscaglia
"Is it a fact - or have I dreamt it - that, by means of electricity, the world of matter has become a great nerve, vibrating thousands of miles in a breathless point of time?"
"The only thing standing between me and total happiness is reality". - Unknown
"Proximity to power deludes some into thinking they wield it." - Frank Underwood
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge" - Stephen Hawking
"If the only tool you have is a hammer, you tend to see every problem as a nail." -Abraham Maslow
"Do you remember when we first met? I thought I had wandered into a dream." -J.R.R. Tolkien
"Pessimists are the world's happiest people; 90% of the time they're right and the other 10% they're pleasantly surprised." - Anonymous
"The great issues of the day is not settled by politics but by the blood of our enemys and the iron of our industry." - Bismarck
"I didn't hit a woman, I hit a bitch", a pimp named slickback
" 'No man,' proclaimed Donne, 'is an island' and he was wrong.
"I started thinking of all the deep secrets I've heard over my half century of practice as a therapist and reflecting that, however much we crave to merge with another, there will always remain distance." -Irvin D. Yalom
"Vietnam was a war we should never have been in, just like in Iraq, pretty much the same. We invaded Iraq, even though we shouldn't be a country that invades. China doesn't do it, Russia doesn't do it. Only the United States wants to be a war monger." -my grandfather
"Experience is what you get when you didn't get what you wanted." Randy Pausch, professor and writer
"It's not a lie if you believe it"
"Eat your vegetables, have a positive outlook, be kind to people, and smile." - Dan Buettner
"Pain is temporary. Quitting lasts forever." - Lance Armstrong, Every Second Counts
"And if you choose to hold fast to what is right, do not be irked by difficult circumstances, but reflect on how many things have already happened to you in life in ways that you did not wish, and yet they have turned out for the best."  Gaius Musonius Rufus, Fragment 27
"Friendship is unnecessary, like philosophy, like art... It has no survival value; rather it is one of those things that give value to survival." -C.S. Lewis
"If there is no immortality, what use is God?" - unknown peasant (quoted by Miguel Unamuno)
"My biggest fear is that people will see me the way I see myself"- Anonymous
"Time will inevitably uncover dishonesty and lies; history has no place for them." -Norodom Sihanouk, King of Cambodia (1922 - 2012)
"There are two things in this world which you cannot hide. Sneezing... and Love." - Unknown Korean Drama
"Small opportunities are often the beginning of great enterprises."  Demosthenes
"The test of leadership is not to put greatness into humanity, but to elicit it, for the greatness is already there." - 15th President James Buchanan
"The reason I talk to myself is because I"m the only one whose answers I accept." - George Carlin
"We are told that people stay in love because of chemistry or because they remain intrigued with each other, because of many kindnesses, because of luck... But part of it has got to be forgiveness and gratefulness." - Ellen Goodman
"One's dignity may be assaulted, vandalized and cruelly mocked, but cannot be taken away unless it is surrendered." - Michael J. Fox
"It is a mistake to try to look too far ahead. The chain of destiny can only be grasped one link at a time." - Sir Winston Churchill
"Never be a cynic, even a gentle one. Never help out a sneer, even at the devil." - Vachel Lindsay
"If you can't even clean up your room, who the hell are you to give advice to the world?" - Jordan Peterson
"Necessity dispenseth with decorum." - Thomas Carlyle
"Necessity dispenseth with decorum." - Thomas Carlyle
"LOVE is a sweet poison. Either you die by drinking it Or you die craving for it" -Expressive Introvert(instagram)
"You see these marks on my skin as scars. I see them as stories, memories of a life lost to the marching of time" Unknown
"He consulted much, pondered much, resolved slowly, resolved surely."  Alexander Hamilton, describing George Washington
"Prince, what you are, you are by accident of birth; what I am, I am through my own efforts. There have been thousands of princes and will be thousands more; there is only one Beethoven!"
"Any kind of royalty, however modified, any kind of aristocracy, however pruned, is rightly an insult." --Mark Twain
"Violent crime is at one of the lowest rates in American history, while the Prison Population is at its highest in American history. And that should tell you all you need to know about the American Justice System."
"A poo in the hand is worth two in the sand."
"She's may be smiling but look into her eyes, she's breaking inside"
"Fear not - their wits are as slow as their blades" - The Mark of Zorro (1920)
"When I give food to the poor, they call me a saint. When I ask why they are poor, they call me a communist." - Archbishop Hlder Cmara
"I would rather have questions that can't be answered than answers that can't be questioned." --Dr. Richard Feynman
"Don"t wait until everything is just right. It will never be perfect. There will always be challenges, obstacles and less than perfect conditions." - Mark V. Hansen
"You know what they ought to have? Motherfucker's Day. The day after Mother's Day ought to be Motherfucker's Day. Actually, when you think about it, Father's Day is Motherfucker's Day." - George Carlin
"Every Mother is a Superhero."
"Life is either an incredible adventure or it's nothing at all." -GoPro Hero4 Trailer
"Everything happens for a reason, that reason is usually physics"
"One word; Frees us of all the weight and pain of life: That word is love." - Sophocles
"Only two things are infinite, the universe and human stupidity, and I'm not sure about the former." - Albert Einstein.
"Life isn't about winning the race it's about finishing the race and keep going"
"Of all sad words of tongue or pen, the saddest are these, "It might have been."" - John Greenleaf Whittier
"Tao. Some of us look for the Way in opium and some in God, some of us in whiskey and some in love. It is all the same Way and it leads nowhither." - W. Somerset Maugham
"Life is far too important a thing ever to talk seriously about." - Oscar Wilde
"Set all things in their own peculiar place, and know that order is the greatest grace." - John Dryden
"[Sleep is] the golden chain that ties health and our bodies together." - Thomas Dekker
"Experts devote their life to training. Masters devote their training to life." - Dan Millman,
"Being capable to succeed doesn't mean you've done it yet." -My Dad
"We are all gifted. That is our inheritance." - Ethel Waters
"Maybe there's a god above, but all I ever learned from love was how to shoot at someone who outdrew you" - Hallelujah, Leonard Cohen
"We are all gifted. That is our inheritance." - Ethel Waters
"People get built different. We don't need to figure it out, we just need to respect it." - Princess Bubblegum : Adventure Time S7
"Intelligence is the enemy of contentment."  William Dietrich (Ethan Gage)
"Trivial Pursuit could literally be the name of anything." -shut up, mike on Twitter
"It may be possible to gild pure gold, but who can make his mother more beautiful?" -Mahatma Gandhi
"A great, serene and peaceful future can slip from us as irrevocably by neglect, division and inaction, as by spectacular disaster." -President Harry Truman
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." -Mahatma Gandhi
"Life is like toilet paper, you're either on a roll or taking shit from some asshole."
5/12/2017
"Unexpressed emotions will never die. They are buried alive and will come forth later in uglier ways." -Sigmund Freud
"Pay attention to the signs. Stop making excuses for people. Stop defending their inconsiderate ways. Start taking care of you and your own needs"  Reyna Biddy
"Let me be clear. You are entitled to nothing. You are entitled to nothing. - Frank Underwood.
"Success is a lousy teacher. It seduces smart people into thinking they can't lose." - Bill Gates
"If the opportunity doesn't knock's, build a door"
"Your Relationship With Yourself Sets the Tone for Every Other Relationship You Have." - Robert Holden
"Life is a journey. When we stop, things don't go right" - Pope Francis
"The future rewards those who press on. I don't have time to feel sorry for myself. I don't have time to complain. I'm going to press on." - Barack Obama
"I"m not in this world to live up to your expectations and you"re not in this world to live up to mine." - Bruce Lee
"The universe often seems to have singled you out for unique abuse. In these moments, you gotta ask yourself: Would I rather be ignored?"
"Life is either a daring adventure or nothing at all." - Helen Keller
63 Heart Touching Quotes By Mother Teresa That You Should Know!!!! http://myblogclick.com/63-heart-touchinby-mother-teresa/
"We do not need magic to transform our world. We carry all of the power we need inside ourselves already." - J .K. Rowling
"Put your head down and work hard. Never wait for things to happen, make them happen for yourself through hard graft and not giving up." - Gordon Ramsay
"Blessed are the dumbfucks for they shall never be disappointed" -Christopher Moore
"Punctuality is the thief of time" Oscar Wilde, A Picture of Dorian Gray
"If you make people think they're thinking, they'll love you; but if you really make them think, they'll hate you."  Don Marquis
"Whoever travels without a guide needs two hundred years for a two-days journey" - Rumi
"If you love someone, set them free. If they come back they're yours; if they don't they never were."
"They can take your belongings, but never your education" -My Mom
"So the paradox is, that it's much easier to imagine the end of all life on earth than a much more modest radical change in capitalism." -Slavoj iek
"Some people search their whole lives to find what I found in you."
"The need for change bulldozed a road down the center of my mind." - Maya Angelou
"It's a shallow life that doesn't give a person a few scars." - Garrison Keillor
"The only limit to our realization of tomorrow will be our doubts of today." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"It takes a great man to be a good listener." - Calvin Coolidge
7th one was just awesome!! check it out and thank me later!! - 11 Quality Quotes to Remember When you feel Lost in life!
"I am going to make a name for myself. If I fail, you will never hear of me again." --Eadweard Muybridge
"God could not be everywhere, and therefore he made mothers." -Rudyard Kipling
"The man who invented the burger was smart. The man who invented the cheesburger. Now that's genius"-Matthew Mcconaughey in Gold(2017)
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim . Accept no one"s definition of your life, but define yourself."  Harvey Fierstein
"We are more often frightened than hurt; and we suffer more from imagination than in reality." -Lucius Seneca
"The duty of youth is to challenge corruption." - Kurt Cobain
"How does that make you feel?" "Dirty all over." "You get used to it." Can't remember where this is from, help!
"I don't question our existence, I just question our modern needs." -Edward Louis Severenson III
"Remember who you are."- Mufasa
"What you don't know can kill you."
'By all means marry; if you get a good wife, you"ll be happy. If you get a bad one, you"ll become a philosopher,' - Socrates
"We travel not to escape life, but for life not to escape us."
"People say that it was degrading for an Olympic champion to run against a horse, but what was I supposed to do? I had four gold medals, but you can't eat four gold medals. There was no television, no big advertising, no endorsements then. Not for a black man, anyway."  Jesse Owens
"Everybody has a plan until they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson.
"Leadership is not about a title or a designation. It's about impact, influence and inspiration. Impact involves getting results, influence is about spreading the passion you have for your work, and you have to inspire team-mates and customers." -Robin S. Sharma
"Theres something wonderful about entertaining people on vacation. Everyone is there to have a good time." - Jennifer Hudson
"You can either hold yourself up to the unrealistic standards of others, or ignore them and concentrate on being happy with yourself as you are." - Jeph Jacques
"Not wanting to die was another universal constant, it seemed." - Robert J. Sawyer
"The sweat of hard work is not to be displayed. It is much more graceful to appear favored by the gods." - Maxine Hong Kingston
"It is the soul's duty to be loyal to its own desires. It must abandon itself to its master passion." - Rebecca West
" Without the will, there will never be a way..."
"It sounded bad to me. Digital. They have digital. What is digital? And it"s very complicated, you have to be Albert Einstein to figure it out," -Donald Trump
"The great objects of our pursuit as a people are best to be attained by peace, and are entirely consistent with the tranquillity and interests of the rest of mankind." -14th President Franklin Pierce
"Look at those hands, are they small hands?" - Donald Trump
"I wish I was as fat as I thought I was last year" - My Conscious
"If you could only see how my hands shake when there's even a slight possibility that our paths may cross."
"In a moment of decision, the best thing you can do is the right thing to do, the next best thing is the wrong thing, and the worst thing you can do is nothing."  Theodore Roosevelt
"Successful people work hard even when they don't like it, if working hard was easy, than everyone would be a millionaire"
"The literal meaning of life is whatever you're doing that prevents you from killing yourself." - Albert Camus.
"My colleagues, every statement I make today is backed up by sources, solid sources. These are not assertions. What we're giving you are facts and conclusions based on solid intelligence" - Colin Powell to the United Nations Security Council
"There is always a well-known solution to every human problem  neat, plausible, and wrong". H. L. Mencken
"We owe our world war 2 veterans - And all our veterans - A debt we can never fully repay." - Doc Hastings
"My life needs editing."-Mort Sahl
"Sooner or later in life everyone discovers that perfect happiness is unrealizable, but there are few who pause to consider the antithesis: that perfect unhappiness is equally unattainable" -Primo Levi
"I admire some of the people on the screen today, but most of them look like everybody else. In our day we had individuality. Pictures were more sophisticated." --actress Myrna Loy, 'Queen of Film'
"Nobody has a monopoly on good ideas" -Kevin O'Leary (Shark Tank)
"Give a man a mask and he will show you his true self." - Oscar Wilde
"How odd I can have all this inside me and to you it"s just words." - David Foster Wallace
"Timing, perseverance, and ten years of trying will eventually make you look like an overnight success." - Biz Stone
"Ask me no questions, and I'll tell you no fibs." - Oliver Goldsmith, She Stoops to Conquer
"Act as if what you do makes a difference. It does. " - William James
"Fashion is what you"re offered four times a year by designers. And style is what you choose."  Lauren Hutton
"Tis safer to be that which we destroy Than by destruction dwell in doubtful joy." - William Shakespeare, Macbeth
"What makes you vulnerable, makes you beautiful." - Brene Brown
"No tears in the writer, no tears in the reader. No surprise in the writer, no surprise in the reader." - Robert Frost
"He knew that I love you also means I love you in a way that no one loves you, and also, I love you in a way that I love no one else, and never have loved anyone else, and never will love anyone else." -Jonathan Safran Foer
"Remove every barrier you can to fandom. A fan will be an evangelist for your work." - Dave Kellett
"Did I ever tell you about a nasty habit that flight attendants pick up on the job? We learn to always keep smiling, even when we're out of Bloody Mary Mix." - Eric Wald
"Nothing great was ever achieved without enthusiasm." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Only as you do know yourself can your brain serve you as a sharp and efficient tool. Know your own failings, passions, and prejudices so you can separate them from what you see." - Bernard M. Baruch
"May God save the country, for it is evident that the people will not." -13th President Millard Fillmore
"Church and state should be separate, not only in form, but fact - religion and politics should not be mingled." -13th President Millard Fillmore
"It is not the mountain we conquer but ourselves." - Edmund Hillary
"Writing is an exploration. You start from nothing and learn as you go."
"No man has a good enough memory to be a successful liar." Abraham Lincoln
"I'm too drunk to taste this chicken."
"If you want to make an easy job seem mighty hard, just keep putting off doing it."  Olin Miller
"Letting go. Everyone talks about it like it's the easiest thing. Unfurl your fingers one by one until your hand is open. But my hand has been clenched into a fist for years now; it's frozen shut." -Gayle Forman
"Everyone seeks grass, nobody plants trees." -Unknown
"Do not pray! If you pray, your hands will come close together. Then you won't be able to fight." - Guts, Kentaro Miura's Berserk
"I long to accomplish a great and noble task, but it is my chief duty to accomplish small tasks as if they were great and noble. "  Helen Keller
"The sad truth of the matter is that most evil is done by people who never made up their minds to be good or evil." -Hannah Arendt
"If you are a racist, I will attack you with the north"-Abraham Lincoln.
"Nothing in this wicked world is permanent. Not even our troubles." -Charlie Chaplin
"If you want to have more than you've got, be more than you are"
"This might have been your first love,but it won't be your last." - My Dad
"Food is our common ground, a universal experience." - James Beard
"Believe nothing against another but on good authority; and never report what may hurt another, unless it be a greater hurt to some other to conceal it." - William Penn
"One's first step in wisdom is to question everything - and one's last is to come to terms with everything." - Georg Christoph Lichtenberg
"It is no profit to have learned well, if you neglect to do well." - Publilius Syrus
"A strong reputation is like a good bonfire. When you have one kindled it's easy to keep the flame burning, even if someone comes along and tries to piss on it. But if you fall asleep and neglect it...You'll wake up with ashes." - 12th President Zachary Taylor
"I have no private purpose to accomplish, no party objectives to build up, no enemies to punishnothing to serve but my country." - 12th President Zachary Taylor
"All great achievements require time." - Maya Angelou
"Live life in its totality. And living in the world, don"t be of it. Live in the world like a lotus flower in water: it lives in water, but the water touches it not." - OSHO
"Isn't it funny that day by day, nothing changes but when you look back, everything is different...."- C.S. Lewis
"Only you can control your future."
"The art of communication is the language of leadership."
"Money is Money" -Unknown
"Men should be either treated generously or destroyed, because they take revenge for slight injuries - for heavy ones they cannot." Niccolo Machiavelli
"There is no such thing as absolute privacy in America."
"The trouble with political jokes is that they often get elected to office" - Tony Pettito
"Be miserable. Or motivate yourself. Whatever has to be done, it"s always your choice."  Wayne Dyer
"Where there is anger, there is always pain underneath." -Eckhart Tolle
"Sucking at something is the first step to becoming sorta good at something." -Jake the Dog (Adventure Time)
"The road goes ever on and on Down from the door where it began. Now far ahead the Road has gone, And now I must follow, if I can, Pursuing it with eager feet, Until it joins some larger way, Where many paths and errands meet, And whither then? I cannot say." -Bilbo beginning his final adventure.
"Live each day like it's your last, treat everyone else like it's theirs" - unknown.
"Love means to learn to look at yourself/ The way one looks at distant things/ For you are only one thing among many." - Czeslow Milosz
"To innovate you need more than rote knowledge. You need a trained imagination." -- Martha Nussbaum
"Writers are made  forged, really, in a kiln of their own madness and insecurities  over the course of many, many moons." -- Chuck Wendig
"If a lot of people love each other, the world would be a better place"- Tommy Wiseau
"Flirting with madness was one thing; when madness started flirting back, it was time to call the whole thing off." - Rohinton Mistry, A Fine Balance
"Lie to a liar, for lies are his coin; steal from a thief, for that is easy; lay a trap for the trickster and catch him at the first attempt, but beware of an honest man." - Louis L'Amour
""Almost invariably, far more telling of a mans true moral merit than his own observed statements and behaviors, are the mans reactions towards the actions and words of those whom he is surrounded.""
"Sometimes when I look at you, I feel I'm gazing at a distant star. It's dazzling, but the light is from tens of thousands of years ago. Maybe the star doesn't even exist any more. Yet sometimes that light seems more real to me than anything." -Haruki Murakami
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim . Accept no one"s definition of your life, but define yourself."  Harvey Fierstein
"Nature never did betray the heart that loved her" - William Wordsworth
"You can never make the same mistake twice because the second time you make it, it's not a mistake, it's a choice." - Steven Denn
'If you invite negativity in, you have to feed it and hang out with it. Best not to invite it in'. - Erykah Badu
"Success seems to be connected with action. Successful people keep moving. They make mistakes, but they don't quit." - Conrad Hilton
'I think people who vibrate at the same frequency, vibrate toward each other. They call it - in science - sympathetic vibrations.' - Erykah Badu
"Always believe in God but never put your faith in Him". -Labiib Ahmad
"Always believe in God but never trust Him". -Labiib Ahmad
"If you go on throwing responsibility on the other, remember that you will always remain a slave because nobody can change the other." - OSHO
" It is better to remain silent at the risk of being thought a fool, than to talk and remove all doubt of it. " Maurice Switzer
"Big jobs usually go to the men who prove their ability to outgrow small ones." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Irony, when you learn how to make the most of life most of it is gone"
"It's funny how when we receive a compliment, we always doubt it and usually don't believe in it. But when we receive criticism, we always accept it as truth."
"The man who says he can and the man who says he can't are both right. Which one are you?"- Harrison Ford
"Conservatism" in american politics means "lets keep the niggers in their place" liberalism means "lets keep the negros in their place, but tell them we'll treat them a little better" - Malcom X (1965)
"Success is like being pregnant, everyone says congratulations but nobody knows how many times you were fucked." - Harvey Specter
"Many of life's failures are people who did not realize how close they were to success when they gave up." - Thomas Edison
"Mom always said not to worry about love, but just to be sure to get married. But I always knew that I would never get married, because I don't want any children, I don't want them to have the same problems that I have. I don't think anybody deserves it." - Andy Warhol
"Be who you are and say what you mean. Because those who mind don't matter those who matter don't mind." - Dr. Seuss
"We become what we think about most of the time, and that"s the strangest secret."  Earl Nightingale
"Yes, I fell off the bandwagon. Did it occur that maybe some of us would rather walk the path rather than be carried there, that we wanted to see it with our own eyes and maybe even forge our own path. To hell with that old wagon, I'll walk it my own way." -me
"Cut the ending. Revise the script. The man of her dreams is a girl." - Julie Anne Peters, Keeping You a Secret
"Telling the truth is lying, telling a lie is telling the truth"
"Never be bullied into silence. Never allow yourself to be made a victim . Accept no one"s definition of your life, but define yourself."  Harvey Fierstein
"A man cannot be comfortable without his own approval."  Mark Twain
"First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win." Mahatma Gandhi
"The moments of happiness we enjoy take us by surprise. It is not that we seize them, but that they seize us." Ashley Montagu
"Happiness is the art of never holding in your mind the memory of any unpleasant thing that has passed." Unknown
"We're all afraid of the unknown. That's what makes us human."
"If you don't like where you are, change it. You're not a tree." - Jim Rohn
"Bigamy is having one wife too many, Monogamy is the same." - Oscar Wilde
"In a universe which is constantly moving forward, he who stands still moves backwards." - Robert Anton Wilson
"I don't think ignorance is necessarily a bad thing. The more you know the more problems you have."
"The trouble with not having a goal is that you can spend your life running up and down the field and never score." -Bill Copeland
"Anyone who lives within their means suffers from a lack of imagination." - Oscar Wilde
"It is true that some people, including politicians, have limited ability to concentrate and can only focus on one big issue at a time. But that is not true at all." -Nicholas Stern, A Blueprint For a Safer Planet
"One sure mark of a fool is to dismiss anything that falls outside his experience as being impossible." -Farengar Secret-Fire
"I cannot, whilst President of the United States, descend to enter into a newspaper controversy." -James K. Polk
"Thank God, under our Constitution there was no connection between church and state."- 11th US President James K. Polk
"If you expect the worst, you won't get hurt in the worst occasions."
"If you have nothing worth dying for, you have nothing worth living for."
"Personality is everything in art and poetry."
"Good health is not something we can buy. However, it can be an extremely valuable savings account." Anne Wilson Schaef
"Should you shield the canyons from the windstorms you would never see the true beauty of their carvings." - Elisabeth Kbler-Ross
"Success is not measured by what you accomplish, but by the opposition you have encountered, and the courage with which you have maintained the struggle against overwhelming odds."  Orison Swett Marden
"Peace does not mean an absence of conflicts; differences will always be there. Peace means solving these differences through peaceful means; through dialogue, education, knowledge; and through humane ways." - Dalai Lama XIV
"I am a free prince, and I have as much authority to make war on the whole world as he who has a hundred sail of ships at sea and an army of 100,000 men in the field; and this MY conscience tells me!" - "Black" Sam Bellamy, pirate
"Once you label me you negate me."
"Thinking of you is a poison I drink often." -Atticus
"She's smiling, but don't let that fool you. Look into her eyes, she's broken inside." -J.K. Rowling
"Losers make promises, winners keep commitments."
"How easy it is to invent a humanity, for anyone at all. What an available temptation." - The Handmaid's Tale, Margaret Atwood
"An awful realization that I have been fooling myself all my life thinking there was a next thing to do to keep the show going and actually I'm just a sick clown and so is everybody else..." - Jack Kerouac, Big Sur
"We have become a Nazi monster in the eyes of the whole worlda nation of bullies and bastards who would rather kill than live peacefully." Hunter S. Thompson
"When you want to succeed as bad as you want to breathe, then you'll be successful"--Eric Thomas.
"The more the pain, the more the gain." - Nietzsche
"For the two of us, home isn't a place. It is a person. And we are finally home." - Stephanie Perkins, Anna and the French Kiss
"I don't tell lies. I live them."
"When spider webs unite, they tie up a lion."
"Zoo Wee Mama" Diary of a Wimpy Kid
"Hope is independent of the apparatus of logic." - Norman Cousins
"It's important to acknowledge when we've failed."  Warren Warwick.
"Shake with your right hand, but hold a rock in the left." - Frank Underwood
"Strange how we decorate pain" - Margaret Atwood
"Some people are old at 18 and some are young at 90...time is a concept that humans created."  Yoko Ono
"Even the technology that promises to unite us, divides us. Each of us is now electronically connected to the globe, and yet we feel utterly alone." - Angels & Demons
"Ruin comes when the trader, whose heart is lifted up by wealth, becomes ruler" - Plato, The Republic.
"Some people are better as dreamers, but the great dreamers should be cautious not to dream that they'd be better as doers" -Anonymous
"Pay heed to the tales of old wives. It may well be that they alone keep in memory what it was once needful for the wise to know."-J.R.R. Tolkien
"If you're going through hell, keep going." -Winston Churchill
"It is better to light a candle than curse the darkness." -Eleanor Roosevelt
"If you laugh a lot, when you get older your wrinkles will be in the right places." -unknown
"Every great dream begins with a dreamer. Always remember, you have within you the strength, the patience, and the passion to reach for the stars to change the world."  Harriet Tubman
"As you grow older, you will discover that you have two hands: one for helping yourself, the other for helping others."  Audrey Hepburn
"My greatest pain in life is that I will never be able to see myself perform live" - Kanye West
"In a mad world, only the mad are sane." - Akira Kurosawa
"Some people feel the rain, others just get wet." -Bob Marley
"Everything has changed and yet, I am more me than I've ever been." -Ian Thomas
"When there is no enemy within, the enemies outside cannot hurt you" African Proverb
"If you can dream it, you can do it." - Walt Disney
"In moments of crisis one is never fighting against an external enemy, but always against one's own body" George Orwell, 1984.
"Not everyone thinks the way you think, knows what you know, believes what you believe, nor acts the way you would act. Remember this and you will go a long way in getting along with people." - Arthur Forman
"The only thing [Trump's] mouth is good for is being Vladimir Putin's cock holster." Stephen Colbert
"I prefer dangerous freedom over peaceful slavery." -Thomas Jefferson
"Who am I helping? What am I breaking? What am I giving? What am I taking?"
"You're a lovely woman, sure. But I can no longer enjoy solitude. Your absence has poisoned my first love."
"Courage is fear holding on a minute longer." - George S. Patton
"Just for kicks and giggles" - Jenny Demarco 2k17
"Almost always, the creative dedicated minority has made the world better."
"Man I'll tell you they don't like our kind so it starts with your fist but must end with your mind." - dropkick Murphy's
"You were mine just yesterday, now I have no idea who you are"
"people who think truth exists are bullies of the imagination"
"People who succeed have momentum. The more they succeed, the more they want to succeed, and the more they find a way to succeed. Similarly, when someone is failing, the tendency is to get on a downward spiral that can even become a self-fulfilling prophecy."  Tony Robbins
"The only people who support war are those who have never experienced it." - my uncle
"Don't try to be a great man. Just be a man." Z. Cochrane (2073)
"He stopped thinking and merely felt" - George Orwell (1984)
"There is no pain so great as the memory of joy in present grief."
"Don't ever let someone tell you that you can't do something not even me. You got a dream, you gotta protect it. When people can't do something themselves, they're gunna tell you that you can't do it. You want something you go get it, period." - Will Smith
"There's such a pleasant breeze tonight!" thought the dandelion as she pleasantly passed away.
"Excellence is an art won by training and habituation. We do not act rightly because we have virtue or excellence, but we rather have those because we have acted rightly. We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act but a habit." Aristotle
"Success is how high you bounce when you hit bottom."- George Smith Patton, Jr.
"If youth only knew, If age only could"
"Every normal man must be tempted, at times, to spit on his hands, hoist the black flag, and begin slitting throats." H. L. Mencken
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to and understanding of ourselves." - Carl Jung
"I am the punishment of God. If you had not committed great sins, God would not have sent a punishment like me upon you." - Genghis Khan
"Love is the foolishness of men, and the wisdom of God." - Victor Hugo, Les Misrables
"You must stay drunk on writing so reality cannot destroy you." - Ray Bradbury, Zen in the Art of Writing
"I never imagined that so many days would ultimately make such a small life."  Franz Kafka
"The purpose of life is a life of purpose."
"Thank you, God, for this good life and forgive us if we do not love it enough." - Garrison Keillor
"You can close your eyes to the things you don't want to see, but you can't close your heart to the things you don't want to feel" -Johnny Depp
"If I'd observed all the rules, I'd never have got anywhere" -Marilyn Monroe
"The whole world is an enigma, a harmless enigma that is made terrible by our own mad attempt to interpret it as though it had an underlying truth." - Umberto Eco
"An excuse is worse and more terrible than a lie, for an excuse is a lie guarded."  Pope John Paul II
"Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful."  Herman Cain
"You will not be punished for your anger, you will be punished by your anger."
"Listen to me, pain is temporary! It may last for a minute, or an hour, or a day, or even a year. But eventually it will subside and something else will take its place, if I quit however it will last forever." Eric Thomas
" Just sitting.... for hours, browsing your phone, hoping the people you live with won't interrupt your foggy solace, but deep down wishing you could just remove yourself from this stale nightmare of boredom and anxiety" - u/The_King_Hudson
"I don't care if people call me a bitch, just never call me mean."
"The sick in soul insist that it is humanity that is sick, and they are the surgeons to operate on it. They want to turn the world into a sickroom. And once they get humanity strapped to the operating table, they operate on it with an ax." Eric Hoffer
"A dragon does not always have to be slain. It can sometimes be befriended"
"Friendship is the hardest thing in the world to explain. It's not something you learn in school. But if you haven't learned the meaning of friendship, you really haven't learned anything."- Muhammed Ali
"When a thousand people believe some made-up story for one month -- that"s fake news. When a billion people believe it for a thousand years -- that"s a religion" Yuval Noah Harari
"Never have I had so strong a feeling that morality is a merry-go-round, a spinning top. I knew this before, of course; but I had always imagined its phases must be centuries or aeons  now they seemed to me to be minutes or seconds."
"There is no such thing as selflessness; virtue is a trait of the selfish. The virtuous simply can see that they are a member of a greater whole, and choose to act on behalf of that large whole; thus, those commonly called selfish simply bare a near-sighted perspective"
"We do not fight to make tomorrow better. We fight because today is lacking." -Mass Effect: Andromeda
"The laws of man may bind him in chains or may put him to death, but they never can make him wise, virtuous, or happy." -John Quincy Adams
"The thing about happiness is that you only know you had it when it's gone." -Kellogg
"Books are like mirrors: if a fool looks in, you cannot expect a genius to look out." by JK Rowling
"Your smile forces the roses to question their existence."
"Life has no remote. Get up and change it yourself"
"Life has no remote. Get up and change it yourself"
"his soul has left his feet"
"Being too careful is too dangerous."
"Love doesn't hurt, expectations do."
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently." - Maya Angelou
"America... goes not abroad, in search of monsters to destroy. She is the well-wisher to the freedom and independence of all." -John Quincy Adams
"So I believe in a universe that doesn't care and people who do." Night In The Woods
"Silence is argument carried out by other means."
"Writing is perhaps the greatest of human inventions, binding together people who never knew each other, citizens of distant epochs. Books break the shackles of time. A book is proof that humans are capable of working magic." Carl Sagan
"I praise loudly. I blame softly." - Catherine the Great
" If you ever have fixed an engine you know its never the whole thing thats bad. It's just certain parts" - My Mechanic
"Look deep into nature and you will understand everything better."
"Don't cry when the sun is gone because the tears won't let you see the stars."  Violeta Para
"Glow whips and naked people, that's my life right now" - the weed man.
"Conservatism" in american politics means "lets keep the niggers in their place" liberalism means "lets keep the negros in their place, but tell them we'll treat them a little better" - Malcom X (1965)
"You have power over your mind, not outside events. Realize this, and you will find strength." Marcus Aurelius
"Neither fire nor wind, birth nor death can erase our good deeds." - Siddhrtha Gautama { c. 563 BCE - 483 BCE }
"When deeds speak, words are nothing."
"If the brain were so simple we could understand it, we would be so simple we couldn't."
"The best years of your life are the ones in which you decide your problems are your own. You do not blame them on your mother, the ecology, or the president. You realize that you control your own destiny."  Albert Ellis
"Never forget what you are, for surely the world will not. Make it your strength. Then it can never be your weakness. Armor yourself in it, and it will never be used to hurt you." -Game of Thrones
"Fear God."
"In a socialist country, the workers pretend to be working while the government pretends to pay them." - Jaroslav Doleek, Czech movie director
"Most of the important things in life have been accomplished by people who have kept on trying." -Billy Alsbrooks
"To live an authentic life, take your wisdom from your own experience. Because in thinking, the majority is always wrong." - Joseph Campbell
"Love of beauty is taste. The creation of beauty is art."
"When you are scared, when you are hanging on, when life is hurting you, then you are going to see what you are really made of." - Sylvester Stallone
"If you don"t design your own life plan, chances are you"ll fall into someone else"s plan. And guess what they have planned for you? Not much." - Jim Rohn
'If you are patient in one moment of anger, you will escape a hundred days of sorrow'.
"I feel thin, sort of stretched, like butter scraped over too much bread." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"I am not trying to be anyone's saviour, I'm trying to think about the future and not be sad" - Elon Musk
"Never do anything against conscience even if the state demands it."  Albert Einstein.
"Those who deny freedom to others, deserve it not for themselves" - Abraham Lincoln
"I let him put it my butt and he's still leaving me."
"The unhappiest people in this world, are those who care the most about what other people think." - C. JoyBell C
"Better to die fighting for freedom then be a prisoner all the days of your life." - Bob Marley
"They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety." - Benjamin Franklin
"There is only one person who could ever make you happy, and that person is you." - David Burns
"A thousand scars make a man"
"Never get too attached to anyone unless they also feel the same for towards you, because one sided expectations can mentally destroy you."
'Being silly is important. It's the opposite of grief. It"s throwing yourself into a moment without care. You can"t always maintain status as a dignified person- it gives you blinders. When you always expect the world to fulfill your expectations, it wears you down. It closes you off.' -- S. Colbert
"The evils we experience flow from the excess of democracy. The people do not want virtue, but are the dupes of pretended patriots." -Founding Father and 5th VP Elbridge Gerry
98 percent of all culture is unavailable right now because of copyrights. So the reason they hold the copyrights isn't because they want to get paid, it's because they don't want all the old stuff competing with the media stream that they control now.
"When deeds speak, words are nothing." - Pierre-Joseph Proudhon
"Maturity is wanting to do what you have to do."
"Sometimes even two good people can't get along." -Anonymous
"May the wind under your wings bear you where the sun sails and the moon walks." -J.R.R. Tolkien
"You do not have to be fearless. Just don't let fear stop you." -Charlie Day
"In order to do good, you may have to engage in evil." - Robert McNamara
"They say everyone has a choice to make. To be loved or to be free" - Conor Oberst
"We shall fight on the beaches. We shall fight on the landing grounds. We shall fight in the fields, and in the streets, We shall never surrender. - Churchill.
"One day I will find the right words, and they will be simple." -Jack Kerouac
"Things may come to those who wait, but only the things left by those who hustle."  Abraham Lincoln
"Good things may come to those who wait, but only the things left over by those who hustle." Abe Lincoln
"The words and actions you share with others represent the idea of you, choose wisely"
"Let's go bomb the shit out of Switzerland" - No one ever
"As long as you're being a copycat, you will never be the best copycat." - Eric Thomas
"The cave you fear to enter holds the treasure that you seek." - Joseph Campbell
"Men marry women with the hope they will never change. Women marry men with the hope they will change. Invariably they are both disappointed." - H.M. Harwood
"The Key of Joy is disobedience." - Aleister Crowley
"The universe is a beautiful place, but it is even more beautiful to understand." - Professor Brian Cox
"Good company requires only birth, education, and manners, and with regard to education is not very nice. Birth and good manners are essential; but a little learning is by no means a dangerous thing in good company; on the contrary, it will do very well." - Jane Austen
"She makes me love her and I like people who make me love them. It saves me so much trouble in making myself love them." - L. M. Montgomery
"Loving yourself means caring enough to make the hard decisions in your life." - Jennifer Hudson
"Life itself is a quotation." - Jorge Luis Borges
"Desire makes slaves out of kings, while patience makes kings out of slaves." - Imam Al-Ghazali
"A little flattery will support a man through great fatigue." -James Monroe
"Maybe we'll meet again, when we are slightly older and our minds less hectic, and I'll be right for you and you'll be right for me. But right now I am chaos to your thoughts and you are poison to my heart."-unknown
"While we assert for ourselves a freedom to embrace, to profess, and to observe, the Religion which we believe to be of divine origin, we cannot deny an equal freedom to them whose minds have not yielded to the evidence which has convinced us." - 5th President James Monroe
"The envious man grows lean at the success of his neighbor." - Horace
"Once there was an ugly barnacle. He was so ugly that everyone died. The end" -Patrick Star
"Give a man a fish and you'll feed him for a day, kill a man and you'll have one less homeless person begging you for fish." -Kai D
"Give a man to fish and you'll feed him for a day, kill a man and you'll have one less homeless man begging you for fish." -Kai D
"Teach a man to fish and you'll feed him for a day, kill a man and you'll have one less homeless man begging you for fish." -Kai D
"I hope the inventor of zip ties is a rich, rich man. Nah, I take that back. I hope she was a woman." -FSO
"Never argue with stupid people, they will drag you down to their level and then beat you with experience." - Mark Twain
"Every single day in every walk of life ordinary people do extraordinary things!" - Jim Valvano
"You can judge a country by how it treats its prisoners." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"If you can light the spark of curiosity in a child, they will learn without any further assistance" - Sir Ken Robinson
"I'm not trying to be anyone's savior. I'm just trying to think about the future and not be sad." - Elon Musk
"Wolves don"t lose sleep over the opinion of sheep."
"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have."  Thomas Jefferson
"And youth was my excuse for that but that excuse is getting old" - Mansionz
"Be phenomenal or be forgotten." -Eric Thomas
"No matter where, whether its in another timeline, in a parallel universe, or another existential plane, there is a place where you achieve your goals" - Me
"Nothing is impossible. The word itself says I'm possible." - Audrey Hepburn
"I cordially invite you to come take a ride in my thoughts. Switch memory lanes while we dreamin', wanderin'. And in return I'll strip my inhibitions, and go skinny dippin' in your stream of consciousness." - Phonte
"Build, in us, a dream That's worth great suffering That a heart might come to grow And that that has some sort of meaning Make for us a journey That's worth crying for That a heart might come to know That it is valued and adored" - Static-P, A Reason For Suffering
"It is not our part to master all the tides of the world, but to do what is in us for the succour of those years wherein we are set, uprooting the evil in the fields that we know, so that those who live after may have clean earth to till. What weather they shall have is not ours to rule."
"All you need is one person to say yes to an idea." -Joy Mangano
"No matter what people tell you, words and ideas can change the world." - Robin Williams
"The people who give you their food give you their heart." - Cesar Chavez
"Higher mountains have higher achievements." By Ewan Beet.
"There comes a time when you look into the mirror and you realize that what you see is all that you will ever be. And then you accept it. Or you kill yourself. Or you stop looking in mirrors." - Tennessee Williams
"Your spiritual sense will make you either a winner or a loser." - Sylvester Stallone
"If I had a nickel for every woman who finds me unattractive, they would eventually find me attractive."
"There are three things all wise men fear: the sea in storm, a night with no moon, and the anger of a gentle man." by Patrick Rothfuss
"You either get married or you breakup, and 99.9% of the time, you breakup." -My old man, Michael Prince
"Nothing Matters because at the very end, the result will be the same."
"I put myself in the jail of envy and bitterness. And it constantly suffocates me. My future seems blurry. Did I achieve my dream? Or did I lose it? I don't know yet. Maybe I dropped my dream for success. Dream and reality... I became more indifferent but also more desperate."
"When we try to pick out anything by itself, we find it hitched to everything else in the Universe." - John Muir
"She knows what is the best purpose of education: not to be frightened by the best but to treat it as part of daily life." - John Mason Brown
"Have regard for your name, since it will remain for you longer than a great store of gold." - Ecclesiasticus
"That's the way things come clear. All of a sudden. And then you realize how obvious they've been all along." - Madeleine L'Engle
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy. Because they know what it feels like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone else to feel like that." -Robin Williams
"The real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new landscapes but in having new eyes" - Marcel Proust
"Just when the caterpillar thought the world was over, she became a butterfly."- Barbara Haines Howett
"Read in order to live." - Gustave Flaubert
"You can't lose what you never had."
"Be comforted in the fact that the ache in your heart and the confusion in your soul means that you are still alive, still human, and still open to the beauty of the world, even though you have done nothing to deserve it" - Paul Harding, Tinkers
"All that we suffer through leads to determination, the trials we all go through gives us the strength to carry on"-Jesse Leach
"It's an interesting time in the world when comedians become preachers and preachers become jokes."
"When you dare to step on once shadow, think again. You might be the one lossing your shadow"
"When is the best time to plant a tree? 20 years ago. When is the second best time? Now." --Business saying
"By essentially endorsing Duterte"s murderous war on drugs, Trump is now morally complicit in future killings,"
"The first revolution is when you change your mind about how you look at things, and see there might be another way to look at it that you have not been shown." - Gil Scott-Heron
"It often occurs to me that we love most what makes us miserable. In my opinion, the damned are damned because they enjoy being damned." -Patrick Kavanagh
"There are no spectator seats on the battlefield" - Griffith, Kentaro Miura's Berserk.
"The revolution has begun. Liberated forever! Domesticated never!"
"Every time I've failed, people had me out for the count, but I always come back". - Sylvester Stallone
"Every time I've failed, people had me out for the count, but I always come back".
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect." -Mark Twain
"The public sucks, fuck hope." George Carlin
"Every experience feeds an actor, and I've learned that depression is all around us." - Bryan Cranston
"When someone wrongs us, we want the maximum amount of punishment. But when we do wrong, we want the maximum amount of understanding and forgiveness."  someone on Humans of Newyork
"What you see and what you hear depends a great deal on where you are standing. It also depends on what sort of person you are." - C.S. Lewis, The Magician's Nephew
"I don"t know half of you half as well as I should like; and I like less than half of you half as well as you deserve." - Bilbo Baggins (J.R.R Tolkien)
"I stopped thinking the way other people think a long time ago, You gotta think like you think." - Sylvester Stallone
"All this has happened before, and all of it will happen again."
"Passion is seldom the end of any story, for it cannot long endure if it is not soon supplemented with true affection and mutual respect." - Kathryn L. Nelson
"Maybe it was only a second of your time, but you need to treasure life, every second." - Takayuki Ikkaku, Arisa Hosaka and Toshihiro Kawabata
"The best way to escape from a problem is to solve it." - Alan Saporta
"Never get angry. Never make a threat. Reason with people." - Mario Puzo
"I may be on the side of the angels. But don't think, for one second, that I am one of them." - Sherlock Holmes
"To be is to do." - Immanuel Kant
"Life...DREAMS...hope...where do they come from, and where do they go...NONE of that JUNK is enough to fulfill your HEARTS! DESTRUCTION! DESTRUCTION is what makes LIFE worth LIVING! Destroy, destroy, DESTROY! LET'S DESTROY EVERYTHING!" - Kefka Palazzo from Final Fantasy
"Just WATCH me, L! I'll solve equations with my RIGHT hand, and write names with my LEFT! I'll take a POTATO chip...AND! EAT IT!" - Light Yagami from Death Note
"When a man is denied the right to live the life he believes in, he has no choice but to become an outlaw." - Nelson Mandela
"Freedom is not worth having if it does not include the freedom to make mistakes." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The roots of education are bitter, but the fruit is sweet." - Aristotle
"So we beat on, boats against the current, borne back ceaselessly into the past." - F. Scott Fitzgerald, The Great Gatsby
"Fool me once, shame on me. Fool me - can't get fooled again" - George W. Bush
"As a child I never imagined that all of the real monsters would be humans." -Mobeen Hakeem
"Truth is everybody is going to hurt you: you just gotta find the ones worth suffering for." -Bob Marley
"I"m not trying to be anyone"s savior. I"m just trying to think about the future and not be sad." - Elon Musk
"Love is absolute loyalty. People fade, looks fade, but loyalty never fades." - Sylvester Stallone
"Inhale the memes, exhale the memes, inject the memes into my bloodstream; there are good memes, and there are bad memes; WHY HAS GOD ABANDONED US? HELP ME" - Filthy Frank (as Pink Guy)
"Sell your cleverness and buy bewilderment." A beautiful quote by Rumi
"Don"t criticize what you can"t understand." - Bob Dylan
"I am not a crook" -Richard M. Nixon
"No bastard ever won a war by dying for his country. He won it by making the other poor dumb bastard die for his country." - George Patton
"People don't care how much you know until they know how much you care." -John C. Maxwell
"Follow your stupid fucking dreams"- Leigh Daniel Avidan
"and if you accept Pepe into your heart then you will truly be saved and can dwell in the house of Kek." - Mailk ''Barack's half-brother'' Obama 2016.
"I loved her not for the way she danced with my angels, but for the way the sound of her name could silence my demons." -Christopher Poindexter
"Our soldiers never die they just fade away." - General Douglas MacArthur
"Your love was fake, but the pain it caused was very real."
, self teaching gets you a brain" albert einstein
"School teaching gets you a job, self teaching gets you a brain" albert einstein
"COURAGE - is being scared to death but saddling up anyway. - John Wayne (WW2)
"Power consists in one's capacity to link his will with the purpose of others, to lead by reason and a gift of cooperation." - Woodrow Wilson
"Rumor travels faster, but it don't stay put as long as truth." - Will Rogers
"A great preservative against angry and mutinous thoughts, and all impatience and quarreling, is to have some great business and interest in your mind, which, like a sponge shall suck up your attention and keep you from brooding over what displeases you." - Joseph Rickaby
"Never take the advice of someone who has not had your kind of trouble." - Sidney J. Harris
"Be the flame, not the moth." - Giacomo Casanova
"Like a sandcastle, all is temporary. Build it, tend it, enjoy it. And when the time comes, let it go." Jack Kornfield
"It surprises me how disinterested we are today about things like physics, space, the universe and philosophy of our existence, our purpose, our final destination. Its a crazy world out there. Be curious." - Stephen Hawking
"We the unwilling, led by the unqualified to kill the unfortunate, die for the ungrateful."  Unknown Soldier
"They say the best things in life are free. But so are the worst. Spend your money if you want to avoid getting hurt."
"When we are no longer able to change a situation, we are challenged to change ourselves." -Viktor E. Frankl
"It's a really fucked up thing to do, getting someone addicted to you then pulling them off their life support."
"The pen is mightier than the sword, but no match for a gun." (Mike Love)
"Nobody cares unless you're pretty or dying."
"For thousands of years now, human beings have survived because we have good genes and good memes; we could not survive without our memes." -Kenneth Pimple
"I have learned from experience that the more a given idea gets to be accepted as a self-evident truth by my fellow intellectuals, the more likely it is to be wrong." -- Norman Podhoretz ("Letters: The Bush Doctrine" - Commentary) (Dec., 2006)
"A dangerous ambition more often lurks behind the specious mask of zeal for the rights of the people, than under the forbidding appearance of zeal for the firmness and efficiency of government. ..." -- Alexander Hamilton
"I have learned from experience that the more a given idea gets to be accepted as a self-evident truth by my fellow intellectuals, the more likely it is to be wrong." Norman Podhoretz ("Letters: The Bush Doctrine" - Commentary) (Dec., 2006)
"A hero is no braver than an ordinary man, be he is braver for five minutes longer." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"If one door is closed ,find another and another till you don't find your Goal"
"A man who speaks out of both sides of his mouth deserves to have it permanently shut." - Boyd Crowder, Justified.
"If you are lucky enough to have lived in Paris as a young man, then wherever you go for the rest of your life, it stays with you, for Paris is a movable feast." Ernest Hemingway
"Something will master and something will serve. EITHER YOU RUN THE DAY OR THE DAY RUNS YOU; either you run the business or the business runs you." -Jim Rohn
"In order to write the book you want to write, in the end you have to become the person you need to become to write that book." - Junot Daz
"Cuius rei demonstrationem mirabilem sane detexi hanc marginis exiguitas non caperet." -Pierre de Fermat
"With all this blow here it looks like your parole officer hasn't even been born yet." -Elliot Stabler
"Somebody once said that beauty is the passport to success, but it's not a passport. It's a visa and it expires." - Michael J. Mosley and Nicholas Rossiter
"Being friendless taught me how to be a friend. Funny how that works." - Colleen Wainwright
"If you must love your neighbor as yourself, it is at least as fair to love yourself as your neighbor." - Sebastien-Roch Nicolas
"Creativity is a drug I cannot live without." - Cecil B. DeMille
"Every man is guilty of all the good he did not do."
"Use your smile change the world, don't let the world change your smile."
"There's a subtle light dying behind her eyes, and I avoid her gaze as it fades. I don't want to watch it happen, I just want to blame myself after it does."
"Go into the world and do well. But more importantly, go into the world and do good." -Minor Myers Jr.-
"Defeat is when you would rather accept failure than get up and try again."
"If you run into an asshole in the morning, you ran into an asshole. If you run into assholes all day, you're the asshole." Raylan Givens - Justified
"And when he gets to heaven, to saint peter he will tell: "Just another solider reporting, sir. I've served my time in hell." - Soliders quotes.
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." -Eleanor Roosevelt
'Rather than hoisting the white flag of surrender that the enemy expects, raise the old swastika banner of a wild and fanatic resistance'
"Humanity has a serious stupidity problem, and if you weren't aware of it, I have some bad news for you."
"Going that one more round when you don't think you can, that's what makes all the difference in your life". - Sylvester Stallone.
"Censorship is the tool of those who have the need to hide actualities from themselves and from others." -Charles Bukowski
"There are the laws of physics, and everything else is opinion" -Neil deGrasse Tyson
"The whole modern world has divided itself into Conservatives and Progressives. The business of Progressives is to go on making mistakes. The business of the Conservatives is to prevent the mistakes from being corrected." (C.K. Chesterton - -1920's)
"We happen to be the last generation that can end climate change." -Rachel Kyte
"An ounce of practice is worth a thousand words." Mahatma Gandhi
"Don't be a know-it-all; be a learn-it-all." --Satya Nadella
"Joy multiplies when it is shared among friends." - R. A. Salvatore
"Hiding in the woods in Bibb County is like having your afternoon tea in London" --John B. McLemore of Woodstock, Alabama
"I think we ought to read only the kind of books that wound and stab us. If the book we are reading doesn"t wake us up with a blow on the head, what are we reading it for?" - Franz Kafka
'"Ice Cube puts it all in perspective. My Grandmother died..I loved her. But, I didn't use an AK. Great Day!" -Kumail Nanjiani
[NSFW] "Responsibilty's cool,/But there's more things in life/Like getting your dick rode/All fucking night."-MC Ride
"Seek freedom and become captive of your desires. Seek discipline and find your liberty." - Frank Herbert
"The thought of suicide is a great consolation: by means of it one gets through many a dark night." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"The time is now, the place is here. Stay in the present. You can do nothing to change the past, and the future will never come exactly as you plan or hope for." - Dan Millman
"You have got to discover you, what you do, and trust it." - Barbra Streisand
"The best mirror is an old friend." - George Herbert
"To be mature means to face, and not evade, every fresh crisis that comes." - Fritz Kunkel
"Perfection itself is imperfection." - Vladimir Horowitz
"Someone once told me, don't be sad it's over, be glad it ever happened. Why can't I be glad it's over, and glad it ever happened?"
. "How wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world."  Anne Frank
"Homesick is just a state of mind for me, that I"m always missing someone or some place or something, I"m always trying to get back some imaginary somewhere. My life has been one long longing." -Elizabeth Wurtzel
"There are two things which cannot be attacked in front: ignorance and narrow-mindedness. They can only be shaken by the simple development of the contrary qualities. They will not bear discussion." -Lord Acton
"When you are scared, when you are hanging on, when life is hurting you, then you are going to see what you're really made of." - Sylvester Stallone
"To see the world, things dangerous to come to, to see behind walls, draw closer, to find each other, and to feel. That is the purpose of life." -*The Secret Life of Walter Mitty*
"Don't censor yourself to comfort their ignorance" - Jon Stewart
"There is no better time than now. The time to live is now. The time to dream is now. The time to imagine and forget the past is now. The time to shine is now. The time to bleed, sweat, and determine yourself for the things you want most is now." - Anonymous
"The ignorant are unaware of their ignorance; people are unaware of what they don't know; as if their eyes are closed, wandering through a lit world, reverberating in dense information, surrounded by all pervasive light, not knowing they have eyelids to reveal the world; strive to remain humble"
"Nolite te bastardes carborundorum." -Margaret Atwood, The Handmaid's Tale
"We don't know what we don't know"
"Nature builds no machines, no locomotives, railways, electric telegraphs, self-acting mules, etc.... They are organs of the human brain, created by the human hand; the power of knowledge, objectified." Karl Marx (Grundrisse) (1858)
"Moths in the night follow the light."
"A fish might can teach you how to catch a fish, but only a fisherman can teach you the best way."
"A grimy fly can soil the entire wall and a small, dirty little act can ruin the entire proceedings."
"We are not privy to the stories behind people"s actions, so we should be patient with others and suspend judgement of them, recognizing the limits of our understanding."  Epictetus
"Art is not a mirror to reflect reality, but a hammer with which to shape it"
"The enemy of my enemy is my friend" - James T Kirk
" Peace is the color of orange in the leaves, as I lay facing the sky. It's the cold ground my body rests on, the warm wind blowing past my face. No one around, only wildlife. " - Unknown
"Some people are like clouds, when they go away it's a brighter day". - Anonymous
"Don't hire anyone who isn't better than average. Once you compromise on the quality of your people, compromising becomes the norm..." -Jim Koch
"What you do today is important because you are exchanging a day of your life for it."
"Man, when you lose your laugh you lose your footing." -Ken Kesey
"There is a space in my heart I have named after you. I carry it with me everywhere that I gothe awful weight of what almost was." -Beau Taplin  W h a t A l m o s t W a s
"The sinister fact about literary censorship in England is that it is largely voluntary. Unpopular ideas can be silenced, and inconvenient facts kept dark, without the need for any official ban." - Orwell, preface to Animal Farm.
"Number one rule as a writer is to accept that sometimes it's just going to be bad." - Unidentified
"The Stones in '65 want total satisfaction, kid // but The Stones in '69 see grace in just getting what you need" -Jeffrey Lewis, from the song Williamsburg Will Oldham Horror
"Maybe coming clean is the ultimate selfish act. A way to absolve yourself by hurting someone who doesn't deserve to be hurt." - Cindy Chupack
"I'm going to a special place when I die, but I want to make sure my life is special while I'm here." - Payne Stewart
"Don't simply retire from something; have something to retire to." - Harry Emerson Fosdick
"You can't regret the life you didn't lead." - Junot Daz, The Brief Wondrous Life of Oscar Wao
"The purpose of separation of church and state is to keep forever from these shores the ceaseless strife that has soaked the soil of Europe with blood for centuries." -James Madison
"In no instance have... the churches been guardians of the liberties of the people." -James Madison
"You can be a King or a street sweeper, but everyone dances with the Grim Reaper"
"They always say time changes things, but you actually have to change them yourself." - Andy Warhol
"[He] devotes his days and nights to searching through thousands of pages to find the perfect quote, the one that will save him." - Pablo De Santis, The Paris Enigma
"It"s been a year. That bullshit people tell you about time healing your wounds is true. But then I hear your name and for a faint second, the memory of you beats through my veins as loud and clear as the silence between us now." -c0ntemplations
"Jesus had two dads and he turned out fine."
"Most people do not listen with the intent to understand; they listen with the intent to reply." - Stephen Covey
"The wicked band together against the righteous and condemn the innocent to death." -Psalm 94
"I deliberately planned to get as many as possible. A Lincoln Continental can do a lot of damage, can"t it?"- Priscilla Ford
"Once in ones life, for one mortal moment, one must make a grab for immortality; if not, one has not lived". - Sylvester Stallone
"People are strange: They are constantly angered by trivial things, but on a major matter like totally wasting their lives, they hardly seem to notice." -Charles Bukowski
"There is no heart so black as the black, black heart of the phony leper." - Adrian Monk
"We all make choices in life, but in the end our choices make us." - Andrew Ryan
"The doctors killed Garfield, I just shot him" -- Charles Guiteau, assassin of President James Garfield
"Success is usually the culmination of controlling failure". - Sylvester Stallone
"Being in love was like China: you knew it was there, and no doubt it was very interesting, and some people went there, but I never would. I'd spend all my life without ever going to China, but it wouldn't matter, because there was all the rest of the world to visit." -Philip Pullman
"I am opposing a social order in which it is possible for one man who does absolutely nothnig that is useful to amass a fourtune of hundreds of millions of dollars, while millions of men and women who work all the days of their lives secure barely enough for a wretched existence" - Eugene V. Debs
"I have no special talent. I am only passionately curious." - Albert Einstein
"In order to inspire people, that's going to have to come from somewhere deep inside of you." -Jeff Weiner (LinkedIn CEO)
"I'm very confident the truth will come out. And when it does, I don't know if you're going to be surprised, but you're going to be shaken, as I am." - Bill O'Reilly (04/24/17)
"No matter how many times you visit the past there's nothing new to see". - Anonymous
"To see 'outside' an existing system is like being a stagehand trying to force a dialogue with a character in a play. It breaches a convention that helps keep the system running."  James Davidson
"Sit down before fact as a little child, be prepared to give up every preconceived notion... or you shall learn nothing." - Thomas H. Huxley
"When we are unable to find tranquility within ourselves, it is useless to seek it elsewhere." - Francois de La Rochefoucauld
"When you wish to instruct, be brief; that men's minds take in quickly what you say, learn its lesson, and retain it faithfully. Every word that is unnecessary only pours over the side of a brimming mind." - Cicero
"Walking is man's best medicine." - Hippocrates
"To see 'outside' an existing system is like being a stagehand trying to force a dialogue with a character in a play. It breaches a convention that helps keep the system running."  James Dale Davidson et al. (p.55) "The Sovereign Individual"
"Never do today what you can put off till tomorrow. - Delay may give clearer light as to what is best to be done." - Aaron Burr 3rd VP
"Lord, help me be pure, but not yet." -Augestine
"Did perpetual happiness in the Garden of Eden maybe get so boring that eating the apple was justified?" -Emil Cioran
'Comics are like boobs. They look great on a computer, but I'd rather hold one in my hand' - Stan Lee
"He has achieved success who has worked well, laughed often, and loved much." - Elbert Hubbard
"End? No, the journey doesn't end here. Death is just another path, one that we all must take. The grey rain-curtain of this world rolls back, and all turns to silver glass, and then you see it." -Gandalf
"Sometimes it's a little better to travel than to arrive" - Robert M. Pirsig
"The first step to getting anywhere is deciding you are no longer willing to stay where you are". - Anonymous
"I am longing to be with you, and by the sea, where we can talk together freely and build our castles in the air." -Bram Stoker
"Too many laws are made, and too few examples given." Saint-Just
"To have a right to do a thing is not at all the same as to be right in doing it." G.K. Chesterton
"But who prays for Satan? Who, in eighteen centuries, has had the common humanity to pray for the one sinner that needed it most?" - Mark Twain
'They are waiting for a politics with the maturity to balance idealism and realism, to distinguish between what can and cannot be compromised, to admit the possibility that the other side might sometimes have a point.'
"The problem of our time is that men don't want to be useful but important." - Is this quote really from Winston Churchill?
"To convince yourself you don't need motivation to continue, that is perhaps the most motivating practice of all" - u/earthandspaceteacher
"The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common: they don't alter their views to fit the facts, they alter their facts to fit their views." - Doctor Who (1977)
"The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common: they don't alter their views to fit the facts, they alter their facts to fit their views." - Doctor Who
"The mystery of life is not a problem to be solved but a reality to be experienced." - Jacobus Johannes Leeuw
"Scientists say that human beings are made of atoms, but a little bird told me that we are also made of stories" - Eduardo Galeano
"The journey is the reward." - Steve Jobs
"I support anyone's right to be who they want to be. My question is: to what extent do I have to participate in your self-image?" -Dave Chappelle
"Entrepreneurs must be willing to be misunderstood for long periods of time." -Jeff Bezos
"Don't limit a child to your own learning, for he was born in another time." - Rabindranath Tagore
"Man will become better when you show him what he is like." - Anton Chekhov
"Let it be henceforth proclaimed to the world that man's conscience was created free; that he is no longer accountable to his fellow man for his religious opinions, being responsible therefore only to his God." -John Tyler 10th U.S. President
"Love, n. A temporary insanity curable by marriage." - Ambrose Bierce
"Life ain't about how hard of a hit you can give it's about how many you can take and still keep moving forward that's how winning is done." - Sylvester Stallone.
"Declining from the public ways, walk in unfrequented paths." --Pythagoras
"Despite knowing the journey and where it leads, I embrace it. And I welcome every moment of it." - Dr. Louise Banks, The Arrival
"I've grown certain that the root of all fear is that we've been forced to deny who we are." - Frances Moore Lappe
"To grow mature is to separate more distinctly, to connect more closely." - Hugo Von Hofmannsthal
"Make sure to be in with your equals if you're going to fall out with your superiors." - Jewish Proverb
"The minute you settle for less than you deserve, you get even less than you settled for." - Maureen Dowd
"Change. It's a wonderful thing..."
"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing" -Edmund Burke
"It is better to know some of the questions than all of the answers." - James Thurber
"Everything in moderation, including moderation." - Oscar Wilde
"There are so many things I would tell you if I thought that you would listen and so many more you would tell me if you believed I would understand." -Sarah Kay
"What is constant in history is greed and foolishness and a love of blood and this is a thing that Godwho knows all that can be knownseems powerless to change."- Cormac McCarthy, All The Pretty Horses
"You will not have a journey to enjoy without a destination" - Unknown
"On your last day on earth, the person you became will meet the person you could have become."  Anonymous
"Steps"
"Let me tell you something you already know, the world ain't all sunshine and rainbows. It is a very mean and nasty place and it will beat you to your knees and keep you there permanently if you let it." - Sylvester Stallone.
"To sail is necessary; to live is not" -Pompey
"As futile as trying to stare down a portrait" - A Friend [x/post from r/amateurquotes]
"They were the last refuge of a coward, of a man too afraid to fight you himself - and that was why they were so dangerous. They gave power to cowards." -Cassandra Rose Clarke, The Assassin's Curse
"The world today doesn't make sense, so why should I paint pictures that do?" -Picasso
"Quoting yourself on Reddit is the epitome of arrogance." -Chumgi
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain
"I am not the richest, smartest, or most talented person in the world, but I succeeded because i keep going and going and going." - Sylvester Stallone
"If god is the DJ, then life is the dance floor; Love is the rhythm, and you are the music". - Anonymous
"Man has to understand the world around him if he is to understand the world within him." -Anonymous
"The pain you feel today is the strength you feel tomorrow. For every challenge encountered, there is opportunity for growth."- Unknown
"One of the greatest challenges in life is being yourself in a world that's trying to make you like everyone else" - anonymous
"No great mind has ever existed without a touch of madness" - Aristotle
"Sylvester Stallone". "Nobody is gunna hit as hard as life, but it ain't how hard you can hit, it's how hard you can get hit and keep moving forward. It's how much you can take, and keep moving forward. That's how winning is done."
"I am lonely, yet not everybody will do. I don't know why, some people fill the gaps and others emphasize my loneliness."  Anas Nin
"Winston Churchill". "The best argument against democracy is a five minute conversation with the average voter"
"We should consider every day lost on which we have not danced at least once. And we should call every truth false which was not accompanied by at least one laugh." -- Friedrich Nietzsche
"Anonymous". "Ignorance is a crime. Some say ignorance is bliss but that's just being spoiled".
"The world is a dangerous place, not because of those who do evil, but because of those who look on and do nothing."
"Really listening and suspending one's own judgment is necessary in order to understand other people on their own terms... This is a process that requires trust and builds trust." - Mary Field Belenky
"Shared laughter creates a bond of friendships. When people laugh together, they cease to be young and old, teacher and pupils, worker and boss. They become a single group of human beings." - W. Lee Grant
"If you have knowledge, let others light their candles at it." - Margaret Fuller
"The people who are crazy enough to think they can change the world, are the ones who do."  Steve Jobs
"Just look at us. Everything is backwards, everything is upside down. Doctors destroy health, lawyers destroy justice, psychiatrists destroy minds, scientists destroy truth, major media destroys information, religions destroy spirituality and governments destroy freedom." -Michael Ellner
"You have probably come across 'mad' people in the street incessantly talking or muttering to themselves. Well, that's not much different from what you and all other 'normal' people do, except that you don't do it out loud."  Eckhart Tolle, The Power of Now
"From the view of an atom, the human body's a universe." -George Watsky
''Those who do not appreciate life do not deserve life.'' - John Kramer
"Earth provides enough to satisfy every man"s need, but not every man"s greed."-Gandhi
"How can I trust in love? How can I trust in anything that can be so present one moment and so absent the next?" -Beau Taplin  M i s t r u s t
"Anonymous". "True leaders don't create followers they create more leaders."
"We are doomed to choose, and every choice may entail an irreparable loss." -Isaiah Berlin
"Just hit a quad feed on Terminal" Henry VIII
"Frankly, I"m suspicious of anyone who has a strong opinion on a complicated issue." - Scott Adams
"One day there will be no borders, no boundaries, no flags and no countries and the only passport will be the heart" - Carlos Santana
"JFK". Efforts and courage are not enough without purpose and direction.
"You will never find happiness, as long as you look for it. If you still have hope, give happiness to the ones around you. Maybe one day someone will do the same for you."
"Everything has its wonders, even darkness and silence, and I learn whatever state I am in, therin to be content." - Helen Keller
"Don't be afraid to take a big step if one is indicated. You can't cross a chasm in two small jumps." - David Lloyd George
"It is better to be violent, if there is violence in our hearts, than to put on the cloak of nonviolence to cover impotence." - Mahatma Gandhi
"This is the most joyful day that ever I saw in my pilgrimage on earth." - Donald Cargill
"What lies behind us and what lies before us are tiny matters compared to what lies within us." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"You wouldn't worry so much about what others think of you, if you realized how seldom they do." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Just because something isn't a lie does not mean that it isn't deceptive. A liar knows that he is a liar, but one who speaks mere portions of truth in order to deceive is a craftsman of destruction." - Criss Jami
"The truly scary thing about undiscovered lies is that they have a greater capacity to diminish us than exposed ones." - Cheryl Hughes
"Miles and miles of shit coloured fuck-all" - John Manifold
'The things you own end up owning you.' Chuck Palahniuk in 'Fight Club'
"Obstacles cannot crush me. He who is fixed to a star does not change his mind." -Leonardo Da Vinci
"I am looking for the bones of your father, but cannot distinguish them from the bones of a slave." - Diogenes responding to Alexander the Great while looking at a pile of bones.
"Keep ya dreams real. Dream big, just don't dream too big"
'Every decade or so, dark clouds will fill the economic skies, and they will briefly rain gold' - Warren Buffet
"It is what it is" - Nordan Shat
"Men are moved by two levers only: fear and self-interest." (Napoleon)
"Keep your face always towards sunshine - and shadows will fall behind you"
"I think of myself as a good person because I tell people why I don't like them. So they can change." - Neil T Stacey
"Pablo Picasso" "every child is an artist, the problem is staying an artist when you grow up"
"Someone once told me not to bite off more than I could chew. I said I would rather choke on greatness then nibble on mediocrity."
"Opportunity is missed by most people because it is dressed in overalls and looks like work."
"Tolerance implies a respect for another person, not because he is wrong or even because he is right, but because he is human."  John Cogley Commonweal
"Winston Churchill"
"It"s no use going back to yesterday, because I was a different person then." -Lewis Carroll, Alice in Wonderland
"What lies behind us and what lies before us are tiny matters compared to what lies within us." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Winston Churchill"
"You're just clever enough to be stupider than if you weren't clever at all." - Neal Stephenson, "Reamde"
"Add life to your days, not days to your life" -Unknown
"Yeaaaaaaaahhhhhh!!!!" - Jim morrison
"It takes courage to grow up and become who you really are." E. E. Cummings
"I will ward off your enemies as felt cloth protects one from the wind." Subutai - Ghengis Khan"s General
"The wise man must remember that while he is a descendant of the past, he is a parent of the future." - Herbert Spencer
"Some people travel to find themselves. I travel to see if I'm still who I am."
"It is not the strongest of the species that survives, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." - Charles Darwin
"It is no use to blame the looking glass if your face is awry." - Nikolai Gogol
"Put yourself on view. This brings your talents to light." - Baltasar Gracian
"I think I should have no other mortal wants, if I could always have plenty of music. It seems to infuse strength into my limbs and ideas into my brain. Life seems to go on without effort, when I am filled with music." - George Eliot
"People who wonder whether the glass is half empty or half full miss the point. The glass is refillable." SIMON SINEK, SPEAKER AND AUTHOR
"History is the version of past events that people have decided to agree upon." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"All lifeforms strive to its max potential, except for human beings." - Jim Rohn
"Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself." -Rumi
"What you feared was not the dark; no, what you fear is, and always was what you can not see. It's why you hate change" - Justin E. Carrel
"[...]the only people for me are the mad ones..." - Jack Kerouac, On the Road
"No man ever steps in the same river twice, for it's not the same river and he's not the same man." - Heraclitus
"I have learned that only two things are necessary to keep one's wife happy. First, let her think she's having her own way. And second, let her have it." - Lyndon B. Johnson
"Intelligence without ambition is a bird without wings." -Salvador Dali
"I wasn"t insane until someone touched my heart." -Edgar Allan Poe
"I suggest we learn to love ourselves before it's made illegal..." - incubus
"Tomorrow is another day, today is a fulfilled day."- unknown
"You are not controlling the storm, and you are not lost in it. You are the storm." - Sam Harris
"Silence is a language that all are fluent, few can understand, and fewer still wish to hear." -Me
"Don't tell your daughter that when a boy is mean or rude to her it's because he has a crush on her. Don't teach her that abuse is a sign of love" - unknown
"What a liberation to realize that the "voice in my head" is not who I am. Who am I then? The one who sees that." - Eckhart Tolle
"Get your facts first, and then you can distort them as much as you please"-- Mark Twain
"It occurred to me, and I know this might sound strange, that I might be Jesus. And I prayed that God would let me know. I didn"t mind the idea of having to die for mankind; I was just sick and tired of not knowing (continued..)" - Kelsey Grammer
"Do not rely on flattery both, the man only caress the horse to ride." - Random Quote Generator 2016
"All Birds find shelter during a rain. But Eagle avoids rain by flying above the Clouds." - Dr. A.P.J Abdul Kalam
"Always be yourself, express yourself, have faith in yourself. Do not go out and look for a successful personality and duplicate it." - Bruce Lee
"Forgive yourself for not being the person that you thought you would be by now." - by some poet when during breakfast
"The World is my country, all mankind are my brethren, and to do good is my religion." - Thomas Paine
"Forgive yourself for not being the person that you would be by now." - by some poet when during breakfast
"The great mass of the people will fall victim more easily to a big lie than to a small one." -Adolf Hitler
"Before he saw her, he had been calm..."
'I abhor the principles that dominate Germany today. I want to see Hitlerism overpowered. But you cannot conquer it if you let it conquer you in the process." - Howard Beale at the Selective Service Act hearing in 1940
"I"m not a businessman. I"m a business, man." -Jay Z
"Not using paid advertisement in social media is like trying to get from Europe to China, on foot."
"You have to dream before your dreams can come true." - A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"A patriot must always be ready to defend his country against his government." - Edward Abbey
"The only motive that can keep politics pure is the motive of doing good for one's country and its people." - Henry Ford
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"Expose yourself to your deepest fear; after that, fear has no power, and the fear of freedom shrinks and vanishes. You are free". - Jim Morrison
"The world is the playing field, your heart is the safe house, your mind is the weapon." - Me.
"[Not smoking the cigarette is] a metaphor, see: You put the killing thing right between your teeth, but you dont give it the power to do its killing." - John Green
"We are most alive when we're in love." - John Updike
"Give not over thy soul to sorrow; and afflict not thyself in thy own counsel. Gladness of heart is the life of man and the joyfulness of man is length of days." - Ecclesiastes
"They tried to bury us. They didn"t know we were seeds." -Mexican Proverb
"Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable." -- JFK
"Inspiration arrives as a packet of material to be delivered." - John Updike
"A science is said to be useful if its development tends to accentuate the existing inequalities in the distribution of wealth, or more directly promotes the destruction of human life." -G H Hardy
"Drugs and a funeral is too expensive so here I am." - me
"Don't get so busy making a living that you forget to make a life." -Dolly Parton
"Hope is having walked down the same path your entire life, with no end in sight, and wanting to believe it isn't a dead end."
"Hope is having walked down the same path your entire life, with no end in sight, and believing it isn't a dead end."
"Men willingly believe what they wish." - Julius Caesar
"Whether you are sixteen or sixty, the rest of your life is ahead of you. You cannot change one moment of your past, but you can change your whole future. Now is your time."
"Even if others abandon you, you must never abandon yourself." -Terry Helwig
"If you don't have a competitive advantage, don't compete." -Jack Welch
"The truth is you don't know what is going to happen tomorrow. Life is a crazy ride." - Eminem
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect." - Mark Twain
''And if a ten-ton truck Kills the both of us. To die by your side, well, the pleasure, the privilege is mine'' - Morrissey
"Some people have lives; some people have music." - John Green
"No, I will solve your problem for you and you will pay me. If you want options go talk to other people." - Paul Rand
"I let a girl kill herself because I was afraid to love her." Clay Jenson, 13 Reasons Why, Episode 13
"There are no foreign lands. It is the traveler only who is foreign." -- Robert Louis Stevenson
"In order to arrive at what you are not You must go through the way in which you are not." T.S. Eliot
"And if I show you my dark side /Will you still hold me tonight?/And if I open my heart to you / And show you my weak side / What would you do?" - The Final Cut, Pink Floyd
"Government is like a baby. An alimentary canal with a big appetite at one end and no sense of responsibility at the other." - Ronald Reagen
"Folks, I don't trust children. They're here to replace us." - Stephen Colbert
"We awaken in others the same attitude of mind we hold toward them." - Elbert Hubbard
"We awaken in others the same attitude of mind we hold toward them." - Ebert Hubbard
"Doing something that is productive is a great way to alleviate emotional stress. Get your mind doing something that is productive."  Ziggy Marley
"Make every detail perfect and limit the number of details to perfect." -Jack Dorsey
"We should pity the human race. We seek approval from those around us, and yet we believe anyone who disagrees with our limited opinions deserves our hate and abuse." -Me
"The trouble is if you don"t spend your life yourself, other people spend it for you." - Peter Shaffer, Five Finger Exercise
"I never intend to adjust myself to economic conditions that take necessities from the many to give luxuries to the few." - Martin Luther King Jr
"If I had asked people what they wanted, they would have said faster horses." - Henry Ford
"No place is ever as bad as they tell you it"s going to be."  Chuck Thompson
"I'm as mad as hell, and I'm not going to take this anymore!"
"One of the most fashionable notions of our times is that social problems like poverty and oppression breed wars." - Thomas Sowell
"Failure will never overtake me if my determination to succeed is strong enough." - Og Mandino
"I like living. I have sometimes been wildly, despairingly, acutely miserable, racked with sorrow, but through it all I still know quite certainly that just to be alive is a grand thing." - Agatha Christie
"I have always regarded myself as the pillar of my life." - Meryl Streep
"Always remember others may hate you but those who hate you don't win unless you hate them. And then you destroy yourself." - Richard M. Nixon
"You develop an instant global consciousness, a people orientation, an intense dissatisfaction with the state of the world..."
"You didn't kill anyone, you just couldn't save them." -imgur user KMF3967
"Lend yourself to others, but give yourself to yourself." - Michel de Montaigne
"If you care about people's approval, you will always be their prisoner."
"love is watching someone die" - Death Cab for Cutie
'Hell is not a place you go if you are not a Christian, it's the failure of your life's greatest ambition.' - Immortal Technique - Leaving the Past
"I hate to break it to you but.. what people call love is just a chemical reaction that compels animals to breed. It hits hard, then it slowly fades, leaving you stranded in a failing marriage." -Rick And Morty
"Most people have just one dream, to wake up from this nightmare."
"It is discouraging how many people are shocked by honesty and how few by deceit."  Nol Coward
"Don't quote me boy cuz I ain't said shit" - Eazy-E
"Avoid the things you like, turn to unpleasant duties" -Tokugawa Leyasu
"Don't center on your anxieties, Obi-Wan. Keep your concentration here and now, where it belongs." - Qui-Gon Jinn
"Besides, I was 25, the age at which one doubts everything but oneself." -Camus
"No one climbs Mt. Everest by mistake." -Mike Frost
[Question] are there any good quotes on how from limitation comes greater art?
"It's not a crutch, dad. It's just something I've come to depend on to help me get through life."
"The only thing worse than ignorance is collective ignorance."
"Sometimes you need to distance yourself to see things clearly."
"Volunteers do not necessarily have the time; they just have the heart." - Elizabeth Andrew
"It takes 20 years to build a reputation and five minutes to ruin it." - Warren Buffett
[Tracy Morgan] "They say when opportunity knocks you should let it in and invite it to sit at your table. F*** that -- when opportunity knocks, you should take it captive......
"Everyone is entitled to his own opinion, but not to his own facts." - Daniel Patrick Moynihan
"I tell you, we are here on Earth to fart around, and don't let anybody tell you different." - Kurt Vonnegut
"What Orwell failed to predict was that we"d buy the cameras ourselves, and that our biggest fear would be that nobody was watching" - Keith Jensen
"It is far better to be alone, than to be in bad company" - George Washington
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society." -Jiddu Krishnamurti-
"While Plato tried to paint a picture of a humanity that was elevated above nature. Diogenes suggested that man live in harmony with nature."
"If you know what you're worth, then go out and get what you're worth!" -Rocky Balboa
"Monsters are real, and ghosts are real too. They live inside us, and sometimes, they win."  Stephen King
"I can't believe what you say, because I see what you do."  James Baldwin
"Try to learn something about everything and everything about something." - Thomas Huxley
"Attitude is a little thing that makes a big difference." - Winston Churchill
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"Our greatest weapon against stress is our ability to choose one thought over another." William James
[Help me find quote] A good trade is when both fell regret.
"When life gives you lemons, squirt someone in the eye." - Cathy Guisewite
"Life is either a daring adventure or nothing at all." - Helen Keller
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous
"Resistance is never the agent of change. You have to embrace the actions that are going to get you closer to your goal." - Ali Vincent
"The elevation of appearance over substance, of celebrity over character, of short term gains over lasting achievement displays a poverty of ambition. It distracts you from what's truly important." - Barack Obama
"If you really want to do something, you do it. You don't save it for a sound bite." - Liz Friedman
"Success is not the result of spontaneous combustion. You must set yourself on fire." - Reggie Leach
"Here's to it to do it, and do it again, Because if you never get to it, to do it, then you'll never get to it to do it again." Anyone know the origin?
"I did not attend his funeral, but I sent a nice letter saying I approved of it." - Mark Twain
"A man must not deny his manifest abilities, for that is to evade his obligations." - William Feather
"A smart person knows what to say. A wise person knows whether or not to say it."
"Improving who we are is a great deal more important than improving how we look." - Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi
"One cannot be exceptional and normal at the same time." - Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi
"One cannot be creative without learning what others know, but then one cannot be creative without becoming dissatisfied with that knowledge and rejecting it (or some of it) for a better way." - Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi
"Nothing will work unless you do" - Maya Angelou
"Don't buy into the false pretence that "I could be rich one day". It takes many days to be rich." - another redditor
"If you went back in time to fix all the mistakes you made you erase yourself-- there's no point to that." - Louis C.K.
"Trust is the glue of life. It's the foundational principle that holds all relationships" - Stephen R. Covey
"fuck love" -me.
"Sucess is not final, failiure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston Churchill
"If you're good at something, never do it for free." - Heath Ledger as the Joker in The Dark Knight (2008)
"What is better? To be born good or to overcome your evil nature through great effort?" - Paarthurnax
"Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our fears." -Les Brown
"They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety, deserve neither liberty nor safety." - Benjamin Franklin
"Nobody exists on purpose, nobody belongs anywhere, everybody's gonna die. Come watch TV." -Morty Smith
"In individuals, insanity is rare; but in groups, parties, nations and epochs, it is the rule." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"O bird, break your cage, come back from the foreign land, Come, for life is short, and there is food at your home as well." (Translated from Hindi:     ,          ,      )
"If you love a flower, don"t pick it up. Because if you pick it up it dies and it ceases to be what you love. So if you love a flower, let it be. Love is not about possession. Love is about appreciation." - Osho
"To my friends everything, to my enemies, the law." - Mikhail Khodorkovsky
"Everything will be alright in the end. If everything is not alright, then it's not yet the end!
"Whether you think you can or think you can't - you're right" -Henry Ford
"I believe that all the measures of the Government are directed to the purpose of making the rich richer and the poor poorer." -William Henry Harrison 9th President of the United States
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Let the human mind loose. It must be loose. It will be loose. Superstition and dogmatism cannot confine it."  John Adams, letter to John Quincy Adams, Nov. 13, 1816
"One"s opinion should only be as strong as one"s knowledge on the matter."
"Travel doesn't become adventure until you leave yourself behind" - Marty Rubin
"You can get help from teachers, but you are going to have to learn a lot by yourself, sitting alone in a room" - Dr. Seuss
"He pushed away the pain so hard, he disconnected himself from the person he loved the most"
"All of us failed to match our dreams of perfection. So I rate us on the basis of our splendid failure to do the impossible." - William Faulkner
"You might as well fall flat on your face as lean over too far backward." - James Thurber
"The charity that hastens to proclaim its good deeds, ceases to be charity, and is only pride and ostentation." - William Hutton
"'Taint't worthwhile to wear a day all out before it comes." - Sarah Orne Jewett
"We have a system that increasingly taxes work and subsidizes nonwork." - Milton Friedman
"War is where the young and stupid are tricked by the old and bitter into killing eachother." - Niko Belic
"Lets not be English, French or German any more. Let's be European. No, not European, lets be men, Lets be humanity. All we have to do is get rid of one last piece of Egocentricity - Patriotism." - Victor Hugo
"Are you sure that the apple fell on Newton's head by gravity...
"There is only one happiness in this life, to love and be loved." - George Sand
"Circumstances? I make my own circumstances."-Napoleon
"A man's work is nothing but this slow trek to rediscover, through the detours of art, those two or three great and simple images in whose presence his heart first opened." -Albert Camus
"The best preperation for tomorrow is doing your best today." - H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"Life is like a pinball machine, with billions of balls."
"The supreme art of war is to subdue the enemy without fighting." - Sun Tzu
"Wisdom comes from disillusionment,once we see our history from a new perspective, we are free to make more informed choices in the present moment and thereby realize our greatest potential"George Santayana
"If God didn't want us to eat meat he wouldn't have made it taste good" -me
"Great companies start because the founders want to change the world... not make a fast buck." -Guy Kawasaki
"He who has no faith in himself can never have faith in God." - Swami Vivekananda
"Leave the matter of religion to the family altar, the church, and the private school, supported entirely by private contributions. Keep the church and state forever separate." - Ulysses S. Grant
"The best way to teach your kids about taxes is by eating 30% of their ice cream" - Bill Murray
"Education is not preparation for life; education is life itself." - John Dewey
"An investment in knowledge pays the best interest." - Benjamin Franklin
"Accept what is, let go of what was and have faith in what could be."
"One day, in retrospect, the years of struggle will strike you as the most beautiful." -Sigmund Freud
"We ignore truths for temporary happiness."
"Perfect as the wing of a bird may be, it will never enable the bird to fly if unsupported by the air. Facts are the air of science. Without them a man of science can never rise." - Ivan Pavlov
"Nobody speaks the truth when there's something they must have." - Elizabeth Bowen
"Questions about quotes or requests seeking help with specific quotes are also welcome."?
"If you are not falling down, you will never stand taller."
"I would like to see every single soldier on every single side, just take off your helmet, unbuckle your kit, lay down your rifle, and set down at the side of some shady lane, and say, nope, I aint a gonna kill nobody. Plenty of rich folks wants to fight. Give them the guns." -Woodie Guthrie
"God proved His love on the Cross. When Christ hung, and bled, and died, it was God saying to the world, 'I love you.'" - Billy Graham
"You don't step on a person who's already down. No, help them out, give them a hand; do it to feel the satisfaction that you helped someone out."
"Nobody knows how to properly attribute quotes to me, but I appreciate them all the same." -Winston Churchill.
"Our generation's taken love out of sex" -Witt Lowry/Mark Richard Jr.
"Young people only learn enough about history to disdain it."
"Women remember the men who made them laugh; men the women who made them cry." - Henri de Regnier
"The real problem of humanity ... we have Palaeolithic emotions; medieval institutions; and godlike technology."  E. O. Wilson
"Since my uncles was institutionalized, my intuition has said that I was suited for family ties". Kendrick Lamar
"Don't ask for guarantees. And don't look to be saved in any one thing, person, machine, or library. Do your own bit of saving, and if you drown, at least die knowing you were heading for shore." - Ray Bradbury, Fahrenheit 451.
"Every day sees humanity more victorious in the struggle with space and time." -Guglielmo Marconi
"The whole purpose of education is to turn mirrors into windows." - Sydney Harris
"Ah yes, divorce, from the Latin word meaning to rip out a man's genitals through his wallet"  Robin Williams
"She was the answer to the question I couldn't ask."
"It's nice to be an important person but it's more important to be a nice person".- john Templeton
"Right now is the moment when you're the oldest you've ever been and the youngest you'll ever be."
"Double better ingredients, double better pizza" - Papa John
"Good stewardship of the environment is not just a personal responsibility, it is a public value... Our duty is to use the land well, and sometimes not to use it at all. This is our responsibility as citizens, but more than that, it is our calling as stewards of the earth." -George W. Bush
"people can only meet you, as deeply as they"ve met themselves" -Matt Kahn
"Faithless is he that says farewell when the road darkens." - J.R.R. Tolkien, The Fellowship of the Ring
"No one can win every battle, but no man should fall without a struggle" - Peter Parker/Spider-Man
"The most beautiful thing we can experience is the mysterious. It is the source of all true art and science. He to whom this emotion is a stranger, who can no longer pause wondering and stand rapt in awe is as good as dead. His eyes are closed. - Einstein
"Life contains but two tragedies. One is not to get your heart"s desire; the other is to get it." - Socrates
"We accept the love we think we deserve"
"Not every angel has wings, nor every demon horns. If you can't see past the skin, how will you ever survive?"
"I'm a fan of laundry: the smell of fabric softener, the warm clothes in your hands. It's so good." - Joss Whedon, Zack Whedon, Maurissa Tancharoen, and Jed Whedon
"Only the hand that erases can write the true thing." - Meister Eckhart
"You gain strength, courage and confidence by every experience in which you really stop to look fear in the face. You are able to say to yourself, 'I have lived through this horror. I can take the next thing that comes along.' You must do the thing you think you cannot do." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Preach not to others what they should eat, but eat as becomes you, and be silent." - Epictetus
"The true sign of intelligence is not knowledge but imagination." - Albert Einstein
"You grow up the day you have the first real laugh at yourself." - Ethel Barrymore
" Wherever you go, go with all your heart."- Confucius
"Do stupid things, you get stupid results."
"The search is what anyone would undertake if he were not sunk in the everydayness of his own life."  Walker Percy
"They say the world is a stage. But obviously the play is unrehearsed and everybody is ad-libbing his lines." - Calvin and Hobbes, by Bill Watterson.
"You fell in love with my flowers but not with my roots, so when autumn arrived you didn't know what to do."
"Find three hobbies you love: one to make you money, one to keep you in shape, and one to be creative."
"The invariable mark of wisdom is to see the miraculous in the common." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Every gun that is made, every warship launched, every rocket fired, signifies in the final sense a theft from those who hunger and are not fed, those who are cold and are not clothed." - Dwight D. Eisenhower
"Men who have made these discoveries before us are not our masters, but our guides."-Seneca "
"The world breaks everyone and afterward many are strong in the broken places. But those that will not break it kills. It kills the very good and the very gentle and the very brave impartially." - Ernest Hemingway
"May you live every day of your life." - Jonathan Swift
"What does not destroy me makes me stronger." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"There has never been a better time, in the history of time, than right now to start a business" -Gary Vaynerchuk
"Don't let the mistakes and disappointments of the past control and direct your future." - Zig Ziglar
"One cannot think well, love well, sleep well, if one has not dined well." - Charles M. Shulz
"One cannot think well, love well, sleep well, if one has not dines well." - Charles M. Shulz
"Don't quote me boy cuz i aint said shit" - Eazy-E
"Indifference and neglect often do much more damage than outright dislike." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix
"There is no such thing in anyone's life as an unimportant day." - Alexander Woollcott
"Its such a part of me, I assume Everyone can see it." - Hugh Elliott
"People don't have to like or support you, so you always have to say thank you." - Ruben Studdard
"Sometimes, if you stand on the bottom rail of a bridge and lean over to watch the river slipping slowly away beneath you, you will suddenly know everything there is to be known." - Pooh's Little Instruction Book
"Great minds are always feared by lesser minds." - Dan Brown, The Lost Symbol
"... I feel always, on a Saturday night, as though I also were released from some yoke of labour, had some wages to receive, and some luxury of repose to enjoy" - Thomas De Quincey
"I imagine that yes is the only living thing." - e. e. cummings
"I shut my eyes and all the world drops dead; I lift my eyes and all is born again." -Sylvia Plath
"I"ve always said that if my son thinks of me as one of his idiot friends, I"ve succeeded as a dad."  Phil Dunphy
"Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new." - Albert Einstein
"I believe in a future where the point of education is not to prepare you for another useless job, but for a life well lived."  Rutger Bregman
"It is never too late to become what you might have been" - George Eliot
"Don't tell me the sky's the limit when there are footprints on the moon." - Paul Brandt
"Don't break your arm while patting yourself on the back" (Mark my friend).
"You talk when you cease to be at peace with your thoughts." - Kahlil Gibran
"As long as the dark foundation of our nature, grim in its all-encompassing egoism, mad in its drive to make that egoism into reality..." Vladimir Solovyov (Full quote in body)
"Build your own dreams, or someone else will hire you to build theirs" -Farrah Gray
"Others imply that they know what it is like to be depressed because they have gone through a divorce, lost a job, or broken up with someone. But these experiences carry with them feelings. Depression, instead, is flat, hollow, and unendurable. It is also tiresome...
"I was hired to make United better and we've been doing that and that's what I'll continue to do." - Oscar Munoz, United Airlines CEO
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream" - C.S. Lewis
"What's wrong with being lazy? Imagine there's a war and nobody bothers showing up" - Astrid Lindgren
"If anyone is crazy enough to want to kill a president of the United States, he can do it. All he must be prepared to do is give his life for the president's." - John F. Kennedy
"My mother's wonderful. To me she's perfection." - Michael Jackson
"There is some good in the worst of us and some evil in the best of us." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"What is right is not always popular and what is popular is not always right." - Albert Einstein
"Better by far you should forget and smile than you should remember and be sad." - Christina Rossetti
"My religion consists of a humble admiration of the illimitable superior spirit who reveals himself in the slight details we are able to perceive with our frail and feeble mind." - Albert Einstein
"Go often to the house of thy friend; for weeds soon choke up the unused path." - Scandinavian Proverb
"Let every one be permitted to think as he pleases; but never let him be permitted to injure others for their manner of thinking."  Baron D'Holbach, 1772
"It is perfectly possible to be staunch and brave, heroic even, in pursuit of undesirable ends. ... [Will] intellectuals ever realize that the worth of a cause is not necessarily proportional to the length to which people will go to promote it?" -- Anthony Daniels ("Utopias Elsewhere")
"Travel far enough you meet Yourself " - Cloud Atlas
"The boisterous sea of liberty is never without a wave." - Thomas Jefferson
"I have undiluted admiration for those who have vision, show leadership, and do not hesitate to speak their mind." -- Mary Aiken (2016)
"There ain"t no instant replay in the football game of life." -- Mitch Greenhill
"There is something in the corporate manner of United Airlines that reminds me of the California Highway Patrol, the exaggerated politeness of people who would be a hell of a lot happier if all their customers were in jail -- and especially you, sir." - Hunter Thompson
"When men cease to believe in God, they will not believe in nothing, they will believe in anything." -- G.K. Chesterton
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." -- John F. Kennedy
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." -- John F. Kennedy
"An idiot will try anything. That is how you know he is an idiot." -- Michel Audiart
"There is a guarantee of freedom of speech, but there is no guarantee of freedom after speech" - Idi Amin
"If you have really studied something and really gone deep into how it works, then you should come away knowing how much you don't know. In a sense, that is the real definition of an expert  knowing the limits of one's own knowledge." -Adam Frank
"We know how to go to the moon, but the tragedy is that we still do not know how to live on planet earth". - Sadhguru
"When your happiness is dependent upon what is happening outside of you, constantly you live as a slave to the external situation". - Sadhguru
"Sometimes the world doesn't need another hero... sometimes what it needs is a monster".
"The first nucleotides likely came from space; meaning both our DNA and bodies originated from star dust, quite literally...
"Sometimes in war, you have to become war" - John Rambo
"If someone from the government tries to put his hands on your money... run away as fast as you can and tell the nearest conservative" - Andrew Klavan
"It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not." - Hikigaya Hachiman (Oregairu SNAFU)
"Try to imagine a life without timekeeping..." - Mitch Albom
"Never interrupt someone doing what you said couldn't be done." - Amelia Earhart
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving." - Albert Einstein
"Always keep your words soft and sweet, just in case you have to eat them". - Andy Rooney
"It's always about how we can evolve this and make this better" -Evan Spiegel, Snapchat CEO
"He is a bad prophet, who speaks to you about a meaning of life behind or after life, who interprets to you life as a punishment or as an unavoidable valley or woe through which one should hurry as quickly and as unmolested as possible..." - Matthes Ziegler
"God is a comedian with an audience that is afraid to laugh" - Voltaire
"Success consists of getting up just one more time than you fall" - Oliver Goldsmith
"Not all those who wander are lost". - J.R.R. Tolkien
"The planet is fine. The people are fucked." - George Carlin
"Once you get born you're never the same" - The Distillers, City of Angels
"We are always the same age inside." - Gertrude Stein
"The art of mothering is to teach the art of living to children." - Elain Heffner
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power." - Abraham Lincoln
"Do not pray for easy lives. Pray to be stronger men. Do not pray for tasks equal to your powers. Pray for powers equal to your tasks. Then the doing of your work shall be no miracle, but you shall be the miracle." - Phillips Brooks
"I have friends in overalls whose friendship I would not swap for the favor of the kings of the world." - Thomas A. Edison
"Sympathy constitutes friendship; but in love there is a sort of antipathy, or opposing passion. Each strives to be the other, and both together make up one whole." -Samuel Taylor Coleridge
"The most happy marriage I can picture or imagine to myself would be the union of a deaf man to a blind woman." -Samuel Taylor Coleridge
"We don"t even ask for happiness, just a little less pain."  Charles Bukowski
"One can't lay with dogs and then complain about the fleas"
"Wings are wings" -Joaquim Mabota (my friend)
"Time is like a fuse, short and burning fast" - Metallica (Fight Fire with Fire)
"A disciplined mind brings happiness." - Buddha - from the Dhammapada, verse 35
"To her I was but a word, a moment. To me she was the book, my life."
"We need a common enemy to unite us." -Condoleezza Rice
"My worry is not that we are losing the ability to make up our own minds, but that it"s becoming too easy to do so."  David Dunning
"What one person receives without working for, another person must work for without receiving" -- Dr Adrian Rogers
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all." - Oscar Wilde
"Great achievement is usually born of great sacrifice, and is never the result of selfishness." - Napoleon Hill
"All science is magic until we do it" - John F. Kennnedy
"When my love swears that she is made of truth, /I do believe her, though I know she lies." --Shakespeare
"I"m still growing. There"s still a lot I can learn."
"The greatest education in the world is watching the masters at work". - Michael Jackson
"Loving someone is healthy, relying on them isn't"
"Why join the navy if you can be a pirate?" - Steve Jobs
"I could either watch it happen or be part of it" -Elon Musk
"Knowing is not enough, we must apply. Willing is not enough, we must do." - Bruce Lee
"Tell your stories to me. Show your bruises. Let's see what humanity is capable of handling." - La Dispute, "all our bruised body and the whole heart shrinks"
"Reality has a well known liberal bias." -Stephen Colbert
"Don't limit a child to your own learning, for he was born in another time." - Rabbinical Saying
"If all the year were playing holidays; To sport would be as tedious as to work." - William Shakespeare
"Vigorous writing is concise." - William Strunk Jr.
"Laugh at yourself first, before anyone else can." - Elsa Maxwell
"To realize that everything in the universe is connected is to both accept our insignificance and understand our importance in it." -Jeffrey Fry
"May you dream of lovely things and wake to find them real." -JJ Heller
"Happiness is good health and a bad memory." - Ingrid Bergman
"It is better to remain silent at the risk of being thought a fool, than to talk and remove all doubt of it." - Maurice Switzer
"Things usually make sense in time, and even bad decisions have their own kind of correctness." -Miranda July
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days before you've actually left them." - Andy Bernard (The Office)
"You call it demons because you hear screaming, I call it life saving because I hear the meaning" - Mitch Lucker
"Personality is a mirage maintained by conceit and custom, without metaphysical foundation or visceral reality." -Jorge Luis Borges
"Future generations matter, but they can"t vote, they can"t buy things, and they can"t stand up for their interests."
"The best thing about the future is that it comes only one day at a time." - Abraham Lincoln
''The proliferation of smart phones, social media, and near-constant internet access [causes us to] become exhausted by the constant demands on our time and attention. Giving provides relief from the bombardment of information so ubiquitous in our modern culture.'' - Jean Shafiroff
"I"ve missed more than 9,000 shots in my career. lost almost 300 games. 26 times, trusted to take the game-winning shot and missed. I"ve failed over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed."  Michael Jordan
"We can't help everyone, but everyone can help someone." - Ronald Reagan
"The law is reason, free from passion." Aristotles
"In politics as in philosophy, my tenets are few and simple. The leading one of which, and indeed that which embraces most others, is to be honest and just ourselves and to exact it from others, meddling as little as possible in their affairs where our own are not involved.
'Follow your heart but take your brain with you' - Alfred Adler
"If my mind can conceive it, my heart can believe it, I know I can achieve it!" - Jesse Jackson
"The vision of the future is like staring at the sun" - Phil Bozeman
"Stop it! I do not want my name to be a slogan. You are not devotees, you are the ones who carry a program, it is called the Future in common! Heal yourself, in this mania of expecting a man a perfection that he can not have. Only count on your own strength." Jean-Luc Mlenchon
"A riot is the language of the unheard." - Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.
"The only true currency in this bankrupt world is what you share with someone else when you"re uncool." - Lester Bangs, Almost Famous
"Align yourself with the right people, forge the right relationships, and you'll set yourself up for the long run." -Daymond John
"People want to be loved; failing that, admired; failing that, feared; failing that, hated and despised. They want to evoke some sort of sentiment. The soul shudders before oblivion and seeks connection at any price." - Hjalmar Sderberg, Doctor Glas
"How are you to imagine anything if the images are always provided for you?" - Detachment (Movie)
"She said, "I"m so afraid." And I said, "Why?," and she said, "Because I"m so profoundly happy. Happiness like this is frightening." I asked her why and she said, "They only let you be this happy if they"re preparing to take something from you."" Khaled Hossein
"What I did was wrong, but I'd do it again. Not everything done in the dark is shameful." -Rafael Barba
"Not everything done in the dark is shameful." -Rafael Barba
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently." - Maya Angelou
"Happiness is not a station you arrive at, but a manner of traveling." - Margaret Lee Runbeck
"Adversity does teach who your real friends are." - Lois McMaster Bujold
"Let not thy will roar, when thy power can but whisper." - Dr. Thomas Fuller
"Many books require no thought from those who read them, and for a very simple reason; they made no such demand upon those who wrote them." - Charles Caleb Colton
"When you're taught to love everyone, to love your enemies, then what value does that place on love?" - Marilyn Manson
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones."
"The past is really almost as much a work of the imagination as the future." - Jessamyn West
"No, not rich. I am a poor man with money, which is not the same thing." Gabriel Garcia Marquez
"It is not uncommon for people to spend their whole life waiting to start living." Eckhart Tolle
"Rest is not idleness, and to lie sometimes on the grass under the trees on a summer"s day, listening to the murmur of water, or watching the clouds float across the sky, is by no means a waste of time."  John Lubboc
"I have learned now that while those who speak about one's miseries usually hurt, those who keep silence hurt more." - C.S. Lewis
"Peace comes from within. Do not seek it without." -Buddha
"Not all those who wander are lost." -J.R.R Tolkien
"I like life. You know how much I like life ? I have never killed myself. That's exactly how much I like it, with a razor thin margin. I like it precisely enough to not kill myself." Louis CK
"Like me or Hate me, both are in my favor, If you like me I am in your Heart, If you hate me I am in your mind" - Mahatma Gandhi
"I do not know with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones" - Albert Einstein
"The fear of appearances is the first symptom of impotence."
"If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you erase yourself" - Louis C.K.
"He was impregnably armored by his good intentions" - Graham Greene, The Quiet American
"I've found out why people laugh. They laugh because it hurts so much ... because it's the only thing that'll make it stop hurting." Robert A. Heinlein
"I do believe in the endless possibilities of an unknowable future."
"And you make jokes because you're afraid to take anything seriously. Because if you take things seriously, they matter." House M.D S01E05 Damned If You Do
"Believe you can and you're halfway there".-Theodore Roosevelt
"Weather changes moods" - Kurt Cobain
"Women and cats will do as they please, and men and dogs should relax and get used to the idea" - Robert A. Heinlein.
"Isn't it fascinating how long a few minutes seem when you are completely alone with not a familiar face in sight?" - Kirby Larson
"Clergymen have much the same in their breeches as other men." - Elizabeth Aston
"A bird does not sing because it has an answer. It sings because it has a song." - Chinese Proverb
"Friendship make prosperity more shining and lessens adversity by dividing and sharing it." - Cicero
"Money is a good servant but a bad master." French Proverb
"Eternity isn't some later time. Eternity isn't even a long time. Eternity has nothing to do with time. Eternity is that dimension of here and now that all thinking in temporal terms cuts off. And if you don't get it here, you won't get it anywhere." - Joseph Campbell
"Better to be in on the joke the world is afraid to admit, ashamed to confess, or, alternatively; eager to expose. How is it that I am all of the above?"
"The sun will rise whether or not you're awake to see it, and the sun will set even if you beg it not to."
"Every line of serious work that I have written since 1936 has been written, directly or indirectly, against totalitarianism and for democratic socialism, as I understand it". - George Orwell
'You have to be a light to yourself in a world that is utterly becoming dark.' - Krishnamurti
"Can"t bring back time. Like holding water in your hand." Ulysses by James Joyce
"They said we were mad to set up our dragon research program, but who's laughing now?"
"Success is making those who believed in you look brilliant." -Dharmesh Shah
"You have a heart of gold, don't let them take it from you." - Stockpile Thomas, Demon's Souls
"French is the language that turns dirt into romance." -Stephen King
"No one talked about hell more than Jesus Christ. The guy is supposed to love everyone, talked about hell  this eternal damnation for people who disobey. As Christopher Hitchens used to say, God is like a cosmic Saddam Hussein. But worse, because Saddam Hussein used to just torture his enemies..."
"Either man will abolish war, or war will abolish man."  Bertrand Russell
"The sun rises whether or not you're awake to see it, and the sun will set whether or not you beg it not to."
''There is only one god and his name is Death, don't anger him by giving him an early death.'' -SD
"The world is a book, and those who do not travel read only one page." - Augustine
"The world is a book, and those who do not travel read only a page." - Augustine
"The difference between literature and journalism is that journalism is unreadable, and literature is not read." - Oscar Wilde
"Look within. Within is the fountain of good, and it will ever bubble up, if thou wilt ever dig." - Marcus Aurelius
"It's not the size of the dog in the fight that matters, it's the size of the fight in the dog." -Mark Twain
"You cannot fly like an eagle with the wings of a wren." - William Henry Hudson
"Man does not live by words alone, despite the fact that sometimes he has to eat them." - Adlai E. Stevenson Jr.
"Trust men and they will be true to you; treat them greatly, and they will show themselves great." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Money is the opposite of the weather. Nobody talks about it, but everybody does something about it." - Rebecca Johnson
"We all fear death and question our place in the universe. The artist's job is not to succumb to despair, but to find an antidote for the emptiness of existence." - Woody Allen
"If you can't feed a hundred people, then feed just one." - Mother Teresa
"Life Is Tough, Pain Is Love." - Seeking First Light (Australian Band)
"You may not be her first, her last, or her only. She loved before she may love again. But if she loves you now, what else matters?
"Have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow know what you truly want to become." -Steve Jobs
"The worst crime you can commit is telling the audience something they already know"- screenwriter Alan Sorkin
"I will splinter the CIA into a thousand pieces and scatter it into the wind" - John F. Kennedy
"Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn't go away." -Philip K. Dick
"You're always you, and that don't change, and you're always changing, and there's nothing you can do about it." - Neil Gaiman, The Graveyard Book
"A genuinely creative accomplishment is almost never the result of a sudden insight, a lightbulb flashing on in the dark, but comes after years of hard work." - Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi (Creativity: Flow and the Psychology of Discovery and Invention)
"A silent majority isn't truely a majority at all, for what use is a majority without the ability to use that majority to affect positive change? If you stay silent, you give others the power to represent you, and you might not like the way they choose to do it." -TotalBiscuit-
"The most important things are the hardest to say, because words diminish them." -Stephen King
"Armaments, universal debt and planned obsolescence - those are the three pillars of Western prosperity."  Aldous Huxley
"Believe only half of what you see and nothing that you hear."  origin?
"Don't let others tell you what you want because you have to make that choices for them." -Serj Tankian, 2016
"Bombing for peace is like fucking for virginity" -Carlin
"I want to congratulate librarians, not famous for their physical strength or their powerful political connections or their great wealth, who, all over this country, have staunchly resisted anti-democratic bullies who have tried to remove certain books from their shelves"
"The object of life is to make sure you die a weird death. To make sure that, however it finds you, it finds you under very weird circumstances." - Thomas Pynchon, Gravity's Rainbow
"All that we are is the result of what we have thought" - Gautama Buddha
'You miss shit times as well as good times, because at the end of the day what you're really missing is just time itself.' Steve Toltz
"I'll be right by your side till 3005." -Donald Glover
"We make up horrors to help up cope with the real ones" -Stephen King
"...they cannot believe what they"re finding." - Donald Trump, six years ago today, on the investigators he sent to Hawaii to investigate Barack Obama's birth.
'I get bored so quickly, I have such severe ADHD that I just count the words and figure out how much i'm getting paid per word' - Dennis Leary on acting in Ice Age.
"War: a massacre of people who don't know each other for the profit of people who know each other but don't massacre each other." - Paul Valery
"You cannot change the political system, you can change your workplace culture"
"When I was young, I believed in three things: Marxism, the redemptive power of cinema, and dynamite. Now I just believe in dynamite." - Sergio Leone
"There is no hunting like the hunting of man, and those who have hunted armed men long enough and liked it, never care for anything else thereafter."  Ernest Hemingway
"When I give food to the poor, they call me a saint. When I ask why they are poor, they call me a communist." -Hlder Cmara
"The USA is nothing more than an Oil Company with an army" -George Carlin in the 70's
"Only by seeking challenges can we hope to find the best in ourselves." - Robert Rodriguez
"There ain't no free lunches in this country. And don't go spending your whole life commiserating that you got raw deals. You've got to say, 'I think that if I keep working at this and want it bad enough I can have it.'" - Lee Iacocca
"Strive for excellence, not perfection." - H. Jackson Brown Jr.
"Be neither too remote nor too familiar." - Prince Charles
" You don't need magic to disappear all you need is a destination." - Unknown
"Worry never robs tomorrow of its sorrow, it only saps today of its joy." - Leo Buscaglia
"If good things lasted forever, would we appreciate how precious they are?" - Bill Watterson
"To those devoid of imagination, a blank place on the map is a useless waste; to others, the most valuable part." - Aldo Leopold
"All children have to be deceived if they are to grow up without trauma." -Kazuo Ishiguro, Never Let Me Go
"The family is the cradle of the world"s misinformation." - Don DeLillo, White Noise
"Be careful who you make memories with. Those things can last a lifetime."  Ugo Eze
"Everybody should do in their lifetime, sometimes, 2 things..." - Alan Watts
"Which is the true nightmare, the horrific dream that you have in your sleep or the dissatisfied reality that awaits you when you awake?" - Justin Alcala
"Develop success from failure. Discouragement and failure are two of the surest stepping stones to success." -Dale Carnegie
"Whatever happens to you, you can either treat it as a curse and suffer it or see it as a blessing and make use of it". - Sadhguru
"Rogues are preferable to imbeciles because they sometimes take a rest."  Alexandre Dumas
"Don't stop when you are tired, stop when you are DONE"
"Silence is so accurate" -Mark Rothko (animation in comments)
"A committee is a group that keeps minutes and loses hours." -- Milton Berle
"The man who views the world at 50 the same as he did at 20 has wasted 30 years of his life." -- Muhammad Ali
"If your actions inspire others to dream more, learn more, do more, and become more, you"re a leader." -- John Quincy Adams
"Don"t let the same dog bite you twice." -- Chuck Berry
"A lot of parents will do anything for their kids, except let them be themselves" - Banksy
"All of humanity's problems stem from man's inability to sit quietly in a room alone" - Blaise Pascal, Penses
"Speak from your heart, and never compromise what you feel is real" -Donald Glover
"Having an iPhone at your disposal is like hanging a sack of doughnuts and chocolates around your neck. Yes, you can moderate your consumption to a healthy level. But there's a good chance you won't. - Daniel M. Haybron
"Difficult roads often lead to beautiful destinations" -Author Unknown-
"During times of universal deceit, telling the truth becomes a revolutionary act." - George Orwell
#1
"You got the keys but I'll never keep my door locked, you can always come right in. And if my arms are full you can bet your sweet ass I'll drop that shit right then. Cause I might be busy and I might be working but I'll do anything for you friend"
"Science without religion is lame, religion without science is blind." - Albert Einstein
"There's no such thing as quitting. Just sometimes there's a longer pause between relapses." - Alan Moore
"A good End cannot sanctifie evil Means; nor must we ever do Evil, that Good may come of it." - William Penn
"Never give a child a sword." - Latin Proverb
"People seldom refuse help, if one offers it in the right way." - A. C. Benson
"To me, home was never a place; it was a feeling. It was the way the people I loved said my name."  Unknown
" Not all girls are made of Sugar and Spice and everything nice. Some girls are made of adventure, fine beer, brains and no fear". - Anonymous
"You will never know if you do not go, and you will never shine if you do not glow" -Confucius
"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"Don"t walk in front of me I may not follow Don"t walk behind me I may not lead Walk beside me just be my friend" - Albert Camus
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on."  Robert Frost
"So many books, so little time." - Frank Zappa
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"In a world full of negativity a positive conversation is welcome" - Pat McAfee
"I wanted to let the world know that no one had a perfect life, that even the people who seemed to have it all had their secrets." - Jeannette Walls, The Glass Castle.
"As entrepreneurs, we must continue to ask ourselves What's Next? It takes humility to realize we don't know everything, not to rest on our laurels, and to know that we must keep learning and observing." -Cher Wang
"Ignorance more frequently begets confidence than does knowledge" Chuck D
"You," he said, "are a terribly real thing in a terribly false world, and that, I believe, is why you are in so much pain." - Emilie Autumn
"Always remember you're unique, just like everyone else". -Margaret Mead
"We can change our stories,but never the characters who were born and died in it" (William Ventura)
"If you want happiness for an hour  take a nap. If you want happiness for a day  go fishing. If you want happiness for a year  inherit a fortune. If you want happiness for a lifetime  help someone else." - Chinese Proverb
"Wow" - Owen Wilson
"Too many of us are not living our dreams because we are living our fears." -Les Brown
"Don"t walk in front of me I may not follow Don"t walk behind me I may not lead Walk beside me just be my friend" -Albert Camus
"Death is not the worst thing that can happen to man."
"If your opponent is of choleric temper, seek to irritate him." -- Sun-tzu
"When men in politics are together, testosterone poisoning makes them insane." -- Peggy Noonan
"He had one last light in his heart, one last hope. He gave it to her regardless, knowing she'd throw it away."
"If you are gonna do something, do it so good that it becomes an art" - Arsene Wenger
"Man is a creature who lives not upon bread alone, but principally upon catchwords." -- Robert Louis Stevenson
"Ask what makes you come alive and go do it. Because what the world needs is people who have come alive." - Howard Thurman
"There is only one inborn error... that we exist in order to be happy... So long as we persist in this inborn error... the world seems to us full of contradictions... We are bound to experience that the world and life are certainly not arranged for... maintaining a happy existence," - Schopenhauer
"Pressure makes diamonds for the therapist's wife"
"Not every body of water is an ocean" - u/bafta
''A relationship can give you a gut wrenching feeling sometimes. It's a real emotional ride.'' - Drake
"You think your pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world, but then you read. It was books that taught me that the things that tormented me most were the very things that connected me with all the people who were alive, or who had ever been alive." -James Baldwin
''War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength.'' - George Orwell
"...unrequited love does not die; it's only beaten down to a secret place where it hides, curled and wounded. For some unfortunates, it turns bitter and mean, and those who come after pay the price for the hurt done by the one who came before." - Elle Newmark
"Leadership comes in small acts as well as bold strokes." -Carly Fiorina
"A Room without books is like a body without a soul." -Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Education is what remains after one has forgotten what one has learned in school." - Albert Einstein
"Education is not the filling of a pail, but the lighting of a fire." - William Butler Yeats
"In learning you will teach, and in teaching you will learn." - Phil Collins
"Even a broken clock is right twice a day" Obi Wan Kenobi to Gandalf - Beauty and the Beast
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Even a broken clock is right twice a day" - Obi Wan Kenobi to Gandalf in Sleeping Beauty
"Ask a Scientist and you'll get answers; ask a Philosopher and you'll get perspectives"
"Just because this isn't in your life plan doesn't mean this isn't exactly where you're supposed to be." - Nahnatchka Khan
"Design is not just what it looks like and feels like. Design is how it works." - Steve Jobs
"We should every night call ourselves to an account; What infirmity have I mastered today? What passions opposed? What temptation resisted? What virtue acquired? Our vices will abort of themselves if they be brought every day to the shrift." - Seneca
"First keep the peace within yourself, then you can also bring peace to others." - Thomas a Kempis
"The journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step." - Lao Tzu
"There is nothing that can take the pain away. But eventually you will find a way to live with it. There will be nightmares. And every day when you wake up, it will be the first thing you think about. Until one day, it will be the second thing." - Raymond Reddington, The Blacklist
"I regret it but I wouldn't take it back. If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you erase yourself." - Louis CK.
"War educates the senses, calls into action the will, perfects the physical constitution and brings men into such swift and close collision, in critical moments, that man measures man." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I regret it, but i wouldn't take it back. If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you erase yourself" - Louie CK
"If you went back and fixed all the mistakes you've made, you'd erase yourself." -Louis C.K.
"Good can exist without evil, whereas evil cannot exist without good." -Thomas Aquinas
"To recognize you are the source of your own loneliness is not a cure for it. But it is a step toward seeing that it is not inevitable, and that such a choice is not irrevocable." - FitzChivalry Farseer
"Another flaw in the human character is that everybody wants to build and nobody wants to do maintenance." Kurt Vonnegut
"In life and business, there are two cardinal sins. The first is to act without thought and the second is to not act at all." -Carl Icahn
"Don"t be too timid and squeamish about your actions. All life is an experiment. The more experiments you make the better." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile, but is morally treasonable to the American public." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Evil stems from intellectual and emotional stuntedness and is the one form of poverty that should be shunned." -Wisawa Szymborska
"Those who can make you believe absurdities, can make you commit atrocities" - Voltaire
"One good thing about music, when it hits you, you feel no pain". - Bob Marley
"A broken clock is right twice a day but if you enjoy cantaloupe you are both wrong and a disgrace to anyone you've ever known" - me
"Your heart knows the way, run in that direction" - Rumi
"It was a bright cold day in April and the clocks were striking thirteen" - Winston Smith
"Champions aren't made in gyms. Champions are made from something they have deep inside them-a desire, a dream, a vision. They have to have the skill, and the will. But the will must be stronger than the skill." -Muhammad Ali
"Life is an amazing teacher, so rarely are people good learners"
"Think lightly of yourself and deeply of the world." - Miyamoto Musashi
"Happiness is your nature. It is not wrong to desire it. What is wrong is seeking it outside when it is inside." Ramana Maharshi
"In a relationship, you need somebody who"s going to call you out, not somebody who"s going to let everything slide. You need somebody who doesn"t want to live without you, but can. Not somebody that is dependent, but somebody who is stronger with you. A relationship is two people, not one"- Anon
"The hardest thing you will ever have to do is grieve for the loss of a person who is still alive." - Anon
"If you love someone, everything is negotiable. If you don't, everything is a door." - Carrie Fisher
"The saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy. Because they know what it feels like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone else to feel like that." - Robin Williams
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"No man has a good enough memory to be a successful liar."
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
''A man's true character comes out when he's drunk.'' -Charlie Chaplin
''A Women Can't Change a Man Because She Loves him,A man Changes Himself Because he loves Her''
"It is fairer to listen to the string that broke than to never strain a bow." -Verner von Heidenstam
"Women and cats will do as they please, and men and dogs should relax and get used to the idea." - Robert A. Heinlein
"The mind is what the brain does." - Marvin Minsky
"Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight." - Phyllis Diller
"When you kill a man, you steal a life. You steal his wife's right to a husband, rob his children of a father. When you tell a lie, you steal someone's right to the truth. When you cheat, you steal the right to fairness."  Khaled Hosseini
"I opened my mouth, almost said something. Almost. The rest of my life might have turned out differently if I had. But I didn"t." Khaled Hosseini
[Request] A quote that goes "Our problems are very much alike but mine happen to me, and yours only to you"
'Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that.' - Martin Luther King Jr
**Inspirational Quotes on life***with deep think**
"Censorship is telling a man he can't have a steak just because a baby can't chew it"- Mark Twain
"Charm and nothing but charm at last grows a little tiresome. It's a relief then to deal with a man who isn't quite so delightful but a little more sincere." - W. Somerset Maugham
"Good writing takes more than just time; it wants your best moments and the best of you." - Gordon Atkinson
"Truth, like surgery, may hurt, but it cures." - Han Suyin
"Cleanliness and order are not matters of instinct; they are matters of education, and like most great things, you must cultivate a taste for them." - Benjamin Disraeli
"Fear kills more dreams than failure ever will." - Suzy Kassem
"There is a price to be paid for division and isolation. Democracy cannot flourish amid hate. Justice cannot take root amid rage. We must dissent from the indifference. We must dissent from the apathy. We must dissent from the fear.
"There is a price to be paid for division and isolation. Democracy cannot flourish amid hate. (Jack walks in with some dishes). Justice cannot take root amid rage. We must dissent from the indifference. We must dissent from the apathy. We must dissent from the fear
"All the art of living lies in a fine mingling of letting go and holding on." - Havelock Ellis
"Science does have all the answers. The problem is we don't have all the science." -James morrow
"Scars show us where we have been. They do not dictate where we are going." - Harrison Scott, Criminal Minds
"Always Be yourself because everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde - Oscar Wilde
"The way I see it there's two types of people, those who spend their lives trying to build a future and those who spend their lives trying to rebuild the past."
"What I search for, I find. What we neglect escapes us." - Sophocles
"Hope is a what gets out of bed in the morning when it's the day of prom and you haven"t been asked..."- Meg Griffin
"It's quite difficult, some might even say impossible, to pick up where you left off if you never got on in the first place."
"If you want a quick answer to a question on the internet, post the wrong answer instead of asking. People are more eager to correct others than to simply answer a question." -Albert Einstein.
"Those who are very eager to leave footprints will never fly".- KK
"The Mind is a powerful instrument. Every thought, every emotion that you create changes the very chemistry of your body". -Sadhguru
"Art is the only serious thing in the world. And the artist is the only person which never becomes serious." - Oscar Wilde
"When we plant a rose seed in the earth, we notice that it is small, but we do not criticize it as "rootless and stemless." We treat it as a seed, giving it the water and nourishment required of a seed. ... at each moment, it is perfectly all right as it is." - W. Timothy Gallwey
"The burned hand teaches best. After that advice about fire goes to the heart."
"Love without esteem can not reach far, nor rise very high: it is an angel with but one wing." - Alexandre Dumas, fils
"Criticism without suggestion is like trying to stop flood with flood and put out fire with fire. It will surely be without worth." Mozi, philosopher
"What separates good content from great content is a willingness to take risks and push the envelope" -Brian Halligan
"There is no passion to be found playing small, in settling for a life that is less than the one you are capable of living." - Nelson Mandela
"And this, our life, exempt from public haunt, finds tongues in trees, books in the running brooks, sermons in stones, and good in everything."
"I wish I could show you when you are lonely or in darkness the astonishing light if your own being." - Hafez of Shiraz
"You have enemies? Good. That means you've stood up for something, sometime in your life"
"When you"re a manager, you work for your company. When you"re a leader, your company works for you." "Stan Slap"
"I want to believe in intelligent design, and hence I am suspicious of anything that seems to confirm my desire to believe." - James Lileks
"With the gift of listening comes the gift of healing." - Catherine de Hueck
"Each painting has its own way of evolving...When the painting is finished, the subject reaveals itself." - William Baziotes
"I am doomed to an eternity of compulsive work. No set goal achieved satisfies. Success only breeds a new goal. The golden apple devoured has seeds. It is endless." - Bette Davis
'Where they have burned books, they will end in burning human beings' - Heinrich Heine, 1823
"Immature love says: 'I love you because I need you.' Mature love says 'I need you because I love you.'" - Erich Fromm
"Only the educated are free." - Epictetus
"I've been quoted as saying that the cruelest thing you can do to an artist is tell them their work is perfect when it isn't. It's a policy that has gotten me thrown out of a lot of finger-painting classes." - Ben "Yahtzee" Croshaw
"Glenn made the decision, Rick. I was just following his lead."
"The funny thing about advice is, we always tell others the things we can't really do ourselves." -r.m. drake
"You get use to someonestart to like them, evenand they leave. In the end, everyone leaves." - Rachel Ward
"He is a man so unpredictable, so reckless, so petulant, so full of blind self-regard, so untethered to reality that it is impossible ..." - L.A. Times
''this body isn't mine anymore you took the key and locked the door''. What does this mean?
"the end, has no end." - julian casablancas
"Let me live so when it's time to die, even the reaper cries. Let me die so when it's time to leave another sun will rise."-Brendan's Death Song by the Red Hot Chili Peppers
"There are two types of people in this world, those who generalize everybody into two types of people, and those who accept everyone as unique combinations"
"A good book is the precious lifeblood of a mastered spirit, embalmed and treasured up on purpose to a life beyond life." (John Milton)
"Do you know what the most beautiful thing in life is ? Desire, my friend." Mesa Selimovic (2)
"If you see a castle under fog, you must walk there to meet the extraordinary dreams."  Mehmet Murat Ildan
"Success seems to be connected to action. Successful people keep moving. They make mistakes, but they don't quit". - Conrad Hilton
"The riskiest thing we can do is maintain the status quo" -Bob Iger
'When you talk, you are only repeating what you already know. But if you listen, you may learn something new.' - Dalai Lama
"Throw me to the wolves, and I will return leading the pack" - Anonymous.
"Make new friends, but keep the old. One is silver, the other is gold." - Traditional girl scout song
'''A day without laughter is a day wasted.''' - Charlie Chaplin
''Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage.'' -Laozi
"The worst way to end anythinga war, a conflict, a relationshipis slowly and painfully."
"My mission is to create a world where we can live in harmony with nature." - Jane Goodall
"You only live once - but if you work it right, once is enough." - Joe E. Lewis
"Laughing is the sensation of feeling good all over and showing it principally in one spot." - Josh Billings
"Nobody can be exactly like me. Sometimes even I have trouble doing it." - Tallulah Bankhead
"The mind is everything. What you think you become". Buddha
"Be nice to nerds. Chances are you'll end up working for one"-Bill Gates
"We are no longer happy so soon as we wish to be happier." - Walter Savage Landor
"Not knowing when the dawn will come, I open every door." -Emily Dickinson
"There are no substances as poisonous as hope"
"All get what they want; they do not always like it." - C.S. Lewis
"Study without desire spoils the memory, and it retains nothing that it takes in." - Leonardo da Vinci
"The task of the modern educator is not to cut down jungles, but to irrigate deserts." - C.S. Lewis
"Intelligence plus character-that is the goal of true education." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Though nobody can go back and make a new beginning Anyone can start over and make a new ending." Chico Xavier
" You can live despite what pain you"re going through, but you can"t let the fear of pain stop you from opening up to someone you care about. " - Henry Morgan
"We live in a representative democracy where elected officials are accountable to the people. APRIL FOOLS!" - Conan O'Brien
"Slavery was never abolished, it was only extended to include all the colors."  Charles Bukowski, Reach for the sun Vol. 3
"To be or not to be. That's not really a question." -- Jean-Luc Godard
"With the truth so dull and depressing, the only working alternative is wild bursts of madness and filigree." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Yes, everything will pass. But, is that our consolation? Love will pass, happiness will pass, life will pass. Is our only hope that everything will pass?" - Mesa Selimovic
"Men look at women. Women watch themselves being looked at." -John Berger
"It's your turn to listen, and ours to talk. Peace just may be women's business after all." -Aristophanes (excerpt from Lysistrata, a comedy)
"He never understood that it's possible to miss what you've never had, to mourn for it."
5 rules of a relationship:
"If you tremble with indignation at every injustice, then you are a comrade of mine" -Che Guevara
"Suffering is wanting reality to be something other than it is."  u/Altostratus
"In a curious way, age is simpler than youth, for it has so many fewer options." -Stanley Kunitz, former US poet laureate
"Be nice to nerds. Chances are you'll end up working for one" -Bill Gates
"Fake news"- Donald Trump
"The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy". - Martin Luther king
"If opportunity doesn't knock, build a door." - Milton Berle
"The earth laughs in flowers" - Ralph Aldo Emerson
"It's nice to say thing, but they need to be true." - My brother when disagrees about something I say
"Admiration and familiarity are strangers." -Amantine-Lucile-Aurore Dupin
"Admiration and familiarity are strangers." -Amantine-Lucile-Aurore Dupin (George Sand)
"Admiration and familiarity are strangers." -George Sand
"A decent human being is ashamed at being somebody's boss." -Arno Schmidt
"Art for the people?! I leave that slogan to the Nazis and Communists: it"s just the opposite: the people (everyman!) are obligated to struggle their way to art!" -Arno Schmidt Arno Schmidt
"I don't think success is harmful, as so many people say. Rather, I believe it indispensable to talent, if for nothing else than to increase the talent." - Jeanne Moreau
"When a dog runs at you, whistle for him." - Henry David Thoreau
"Seek ye first the good things of the mind, and the rest will either be supplied or its loss will not be felt." - Sir Francis Bacon
"I'm not a bully, I'm a jerk." -My Husband
'when i leave the house you're the smartest one here.' - my mom
"Here cometh April again, and as far as I can see the world hath more fools in it than ever." - Charles Lamb
"Beauty is when you can appreciate yourself. When you love yourself, that"s when you"re most beautiful." - Zoe Kravitz
"There are billions of people in the world, and not one of those people is an extra; they're all leads in their own stories." - Synecdoche, New York
"Power corrupts. PowerPoint corrupts absolutely". -- Anonymous
"Love yourself. It is important to stay positive because beauty comes from the inside out." - Jenn Proske
"All little girls should be told they are pretty, even if they aren"t." - Marilyn Monroe
"There are billions of people in the world, and not one of those people is an extra, they're all leads in their own stories." - Synecdoche, New York
"I tried to drown my sorrows, but the bastards learned how to swim." Frida Kahlo
"A snake knows more about what is happening around than any other creature because it has no ears to listen to gossip  only direct perception".- Sadhguru
"Perseverance is the first and most important condition of success." -- Hitler, 'My Struggle', 1935
"The true purpose of education is to harness the power of our natural curiosity."  John Dewey
"That's a matter of taste: You either have taste or you don't." - Howard Arman, Professor of Conducting, Lucerne, Switzerland
"We should be too big to take offense and too noble to give it." - Abraham Lincoln
"If you focus on what you left behind, then how Dan you see what lies ahead." - Chef Gusteau from the movie Ratatouille
"If you focus on what you left behind, then how Dan you see what lies ahead." - Chef Guesteau from the movie Ratatouille
"Finding opportunity is a matter of believing it's there." -Barbara Corcoran
"People haven't always been there for me but music always has".- Taylor Swift
"We evolve, beyond the person that we were a minute before. Little by little, we advance with each turn. That's how a drill works!" -Simon The Digger
"I hate quotations. Tell me what you know." - Ralph Waldo Emerson, The Essays of Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I've been called ugly, pug ugly, fugly, pug fugly, but never ugly ugly". - Moe Szyslak
"Success is a function of persistence and doggedness and the willingness to work hard for twenty-two minutes to make sense of something that most people would give up on after thirty seconds."- Malcolm Gladwell, Outliers
"Birds born in a cage think flying is an illness."
"When you are given immunity, that means you have probably committed a crime" - Michael Flynn
[question] I'm looking for an ancient Greek quote.
"It's all very well to read about sorrows and imagine yourself living through them heroically, but it's not so nice when you really come to have them, is it?" - L. M. Montgomery
"You can't rest on your laurels. Your own body of work is yet to come." - Barack Obama
"Think enthusiastically about everything; but especially about your job. If you do, you'll put a touch of glory in your life. If you love your job with enthusiasm, you'll shake it to pieces. You'll love it into greatness." - Norman Vincent Peale
"Personally I have struggled massively with the dilemma of talent vs desire. Choosing desire may not always be the easiest thing to do. It may seem a waste to leave those natural talents behind and strike out in a new direction. But at least youll feel alive." - Meri Williams
"Scratch a conservative and you find someone who prefers the past over any future. Scratch a liberal and find a closet aristocrat." - God Emperor Leto Atreides II
"The soul's joy lies in doing." - Percy Bysshe Shelley
"There are two ways to be fooled. One is to believe what isn't true; the other is to refuse to believe what is true." - Sren Kierkegaard
"I do not know" is not negative. Every discovery has come from there. - Sadhguru
"I am not, nor ever have been, in favor of bringing about in any way the social and political equality of the white and black races," - President Abraham Lincoln
"It's the nicest birthday I've ever had. You've made a happy man very old." - Morrissey
"Don't make a mystery out of bullshit." - My calculus teacher 15 years ago.
"When you are given immunity that means you've probably committed a crime." - Former National Security Advisor Michael Flynn
"It is the peculiar quality of a fool to perceive the faults of others and to forget his own. "  Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Have I played the part well? Then applaud as I exit..."
"We think, mistakenly, that success is the result of the amount of time we put in at work, instead of the quality of time we put in." -Arianna Huffington
"The space between the idea of something and its reality is wide and deep and dark"
"The space between the idea of something and is reality is wide and deep and dark"
"There are only two kinds of men who have mustaches, cops and gay cops." -Kenny Blankenship
"Trust people, not because they deserve to be trusted but because you deserve to trust." Neil T Stacey
"Freedom for some is liberating for all."-Jordan Morse
(HELP) Need help finding a quote I vaguely remember
"Entertainment is really about forgetting your life, and art is about remembering your life." - Father John Misty
"To a person finding himself at the beginning of an era, its simple fundamental structures may become visible like a distant landscape in the flash of a single stroke of lightning. But the path toward them in the dark is long and confusing." -Carl Friedrich von Weizsacker
"Suppose you were an idiot, and suppose you were a member of Congress. But I repeat myself." - Mark Twain
"The purpose of a storyteller is not to tell you how to think, but to give you questions to think upon." - Brandon Sanderson, The Way of Kings
"When the whole world turning left, it"s when I"m going right. I need someone to let me be, just who I am inside".- Rihanna
"Without a border a nation cannot exist." -Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke, Wednesday
"You can drive snakes out of Eden, but you can't keep them out." - Elenore Smith Bowen
"Truth needs no law to support it. Truth is self-evident to all. Truth withstands re-examination. Truth survives questions. Throughout history, from Galileo to Zundel, only lies and liars have resorted to the courts to enforce adherence to dogma."-Michael Rivero.
"If it ain't fun, don't do it." - Jack Canfield
"If you lament a dead son, his crime belongs to the hour in which he was born. A death sentence was passed on him then." - Seneca
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live." - Norman Cousins
"Everybody is a genius, but if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree it will live its whole life believing that it is stupid." - Albert Einstein
"Clarity comes from engagement, not thought." -Marie Forleo
"Showing off is the fool's idea of glory" - Bruce Lee
"I hold that while man exists, it is his duty to improve not only his own condition, but to assist in ameliorating mankind" - Abraham Lincoln
"...Only god and the dead can seem perfect with impunity."
"Improving daily work is even more important than doing daily work." -Gene Kim
"There is no end to the adventures that we can have if only we seek them with our eyes open." - Jawaharlal Nehru
"May your service of love a beautiful thing; want nothing else, fear nothing else and let love be free to become what love truly is." - Hadewijch of Antwerp
"I can think of nothing less pleasurable than a life devoted to pleasure." - John D. Rockefeller
"By all means use some time to be alone." - Edward Young
"Because one believes in oneself, one doesn't try to convince others. Because one is content with oneself, one doesn't need others' approval. Because one accepts oneself, the whole world accepts him or her." - Lao Tzu
"The question isn't who is going to let me; it's who is going to stop me." - Ayn Rand
"Either you run the day, or the day runs you." -Jim Rohn
"...and by that course and of course, those who like the idea of "eye for an eye" usually have either both eyes or no eyes." - Scary Pratchett; 'The Handmaiden's Handmaiden"
"Life is a dream for the wise, a game for the fool, a comedy for the rich, a tragedy for the poor." -Sholom Aleichem
"And I can fight only for something that I love, love only what I respect, and respect only what I at least know." - Adolf Hitler
"John, on your deathbed you will never wish you spent more time at the office." - The Monk Who Sold His Ferrari, Sharma
"If Opportunity Doesn't Knock, Build A Door." - Milton Berle
'Life is no brief candle for me. It is a sort of splendid torch which I have got hold of for the moment, and I want to make it burn as brightly as possible before handing it on to future generations.' - George Shaw
"Don't be afraid of looking into the dark, be afraid of what it might be looking at you from the dark."
"A man who acquires the ability to take full possessions of his own mind may take possession of anything else to which he is justly entitled." -Andrew Cargnegie
"Today's compromises are the future's standards" -A fed up teacher
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"My friend, hope is a prison"
"Believe those who are seeking the truth. Doubt those who find it." - Andre Gide
"Know well what leads you forward and what holds you back, and chose the part that leads you to wisdom." - Buddha
"To be aware of a single shortcoming within oneself is more useful than to be aware of a thousand in someone else." - Dalai Lama
"If you know what you're worth, then go out and get what you're worth!" -Rocky Balboa
"Some say hell is a place, but to most it's a feeling, which we experience every day."
"They create a desolation and call it peace."  The Caledonian chief Calgacus, speaking about the Romans toward the end of the first century A.D.
"Our Father, who art in heaven, stay there and we'll stay here on Earth, which is sometimes so pretty" - Jacques Prvert - Pater Noster
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none" - William Shakespeare, All's Well That Ends Well
"When plunder becomes a way of life for a group of men living together in society, they create for themselves in the course of time a legal system that authorizes it and a moral code that glorifies it."  Frederic Bastiat
"Everything that I understand, I understand only because I love." - Leo Tolstoy
"Sleep after toil, port after stormy seas, ease after war, death after life does greatly please." - Edmund Spenser
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to an understanding of ourselves." - Carl Jung
"He who labors diligently need never despair; for all things are accomplished by diligence and labor." - Menander
"It is so hard to leave - until you leave. And then it is the easiest goddamned thing in the world." - John Green, Paper Towns
"I'm not afraid of death; I just don't want to be there when it happens." - Woody Allen
"Service to others is the rent you pay for your room here on Earth." - Muhammad Ali
"It is impossible to persuade a man who does not disagree, but smiles." - Muriel Spark
"I never wanted to be the next Bruce Lee. I just wanted to be the first Jackie Chan". - Jackie Chan
"Love recognizes no barriers. It jumps hurdles, leaps fences, penetrates walls to arrive at its destination full of hope." - Maya Angelou
"Until you're successful in what you preach you can't preach it" -Chris Wagner (me)
...As a nation we began by declaring that "all men are created equal...
"His age was indeterminate. But in cynicism and general world weariness, which is a sort of carbon dating of the personality, he was about seven thousand years old."
"On particularly rough days when I'm sure I can't possibly endure, I like to remind myself that my track record for getting through bad days so far is 100% and that's pretty good."
"It's the insides that count" /Hanibal Lecter
"She stood by my side until her time's end, but I never saw her until she left."
"I stood by her side until time's end, but she never saw me until I left."
"Life is a balance" (This is a long quote, the remainder is inside.)
"Success is a lousy teacher. It seduces smart people into thinking they can't lose." - Bill Gates
"Sometimes when I'm talking, my words can't keep up with my thoughts. I wonder why we think faster than we speak. Probably so we can think twice." - Bill Watterson
"Monsters are real, and ghosts are real too. They live inside us, and sometimes, they win." - Stephen King
"Let your joy be in your journey - not in some distant goal." - Tim Cook
"We will always love with hearts that can never be quite obtained by the simple understanding that nothing is ever what it should be"
"In order to find a meaning for being born and living, don't I have to find something more important than that" - Koon Aguero Agnis
"We will never be able to change the negative things that happen in the world,but definitely can change the world of ourselves as a person" (William Ventura)
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow man; true nobility is being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"If you can't take care of your sick in the country, forget it, it's all over...I believe in universal healthcare" - Donald J Trump
"Some people are frustrated by... ambiguity; they want a cookbook. For such people, I'd suggest culinary school... though I think you'll find that even the temperature at which water boils depends on the altitude." - Thomas King
"If I prayed God that all people should approve of my conduct, I should find myself a penitent at the door of each one, but I shall rather pray that my heart may be pure toward all." -Amma Sarah
"The best way to cheer yourself is to cheer somebody else up." - Albert Einstein
"Life isn"t about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself."  George Bernard Shaw
"If I have seen further it is by standing on the shoulders of giants." - Isaac Newton [50 Lessons from 50 Giants of History - Link in text]
"People don't care how much you know until they know how much you care." - John C. Maxwell
'There are accomplishments, and then there are astonishments.' - Kendrick Lamar
"Be a good listener. Your ears will never get you in trouble." -Frank Tyger
"The electric light did not come from the continuous improvement of candles." -Oren Harari
"There are victories of the soul and spirit. Sometimes, even if you lose, you win."  Elie Wiesel
"There are three kinds of lies: lies, damned lies and statistics." Leonard H. Courtney (not Mark Twain)
"The person who risks nothing, does nothing, has nothing, is nothing. He may avoid suffering and sorrow, but he cannot learn, feel, change, grow or live. Chained by his servitude he is a slave who has forfeited all freedom. Only a person who risks is free." - William Arthur Ward
"The trouble is you think you have time" - Buddha
"Progress lies not in enhancing what is, but in advancing toward what will be." - Khalil Gibran
"Home is not a place, it's a state of mind."
"Failure has to be an option. ... No important endeavor that required innovation was done without risk." - James Cameron
"Common sense is nothing more than a deposit of prejudices laid down in the mind before you reach eighteen." Albert Einstein
"Read as much as you can. Nothing will help you as much as reading."  J.K. Rowling
"Read as much as you can. Nothing will help you as much as reading."  J.K. Rowling
"Most great people have attained their greatest success just one step beyond their greatest failure." - Napoleon Hill
"The worst kind of suffering is the kind you must endure in silence."
"You never know how long you have with someone, so don"t forget to say I love you while you can."- Michael Jackson
"Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new." Albert Einstein
"If you don't like what's being said, change the conversation." - Don Draper
"The fate of a battle is the result of a single instant  a thought The decisive moment comes, a moral spark is lit, and the smallest reserve accomplishes victory."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"If you can't explain it to a six year old, you don't understand it yourself." - Albert Einstein
'The mind is like tofu. It tastes like whatever you marinate it in.' - Sylvia Boorstein
'If an elderly but distinguished scientist says that something is possible, he is almost certainly right; but if he says that it is impossible, he is very probably wrong.' - Arthur C. Clarke
"There are so many things we don't understand until we lose our chance to do them" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Life is too short to waste your time on people who don"t respect, appreciate, and value you"
"I've failed over and over and over again in my life and that is why I succeed." - Michael Jordan
"Maybe one day we will look back in the past and realize the best thing for us wasn't our education or our success but each other"- By Me
"The human brain is unique in that it is the only container of which it can be said that the more you put into it, the more it will hold." - Glenn Doman
"The thing to remember is that that the future comes one day at a time." - Dean Acheson
"Be not ashamed of mistakes and thus make them crimes." - Confucius
"Never despair; but if you do, work on in despair." - Edmund Burke
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"All problems are boring 'till they're your own." - Red, Orange is the New Black
"The art of life is to know how to enjoy a little and to endure very much." - William Hazlitt
"Weekends don't count unless you spend them doing something completely pointless" Bill Watterson
"The worst kind of suffering is the kind you must endure in silence."
"[Think] of an experience from your childhood...
[Request]A quote from Malcolm X who's message basically was whites and blacks should debate without worrying about hurt feelings.
"Whatever the mind can conceive and believe, it can achieve." - Napoleon Hill
"Anything worth doing is worth doing slowly." - Mae West
"A picture may be worth a thousand words, but a selfie is only worth one: me"
"The riskiest thing we can do is just maintain the status quo" - Bob Iger
"Dear future generations: Please accept our apologies. We were rolling drunk on petroleum." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Politics is the art of looking for trouble, finding it everywhere, diagnosing it incorrectly and applying the wrong remedies." - Groucho Marx
"Men are obsessed with facial hair. It's like the new dick." -My Wife
"Stay Hungry, Stay Foolish" - Steve Jobs
"Be the type of person you want to meet." - Unknown
"The job of the restricted press is to tell their readers that everything is fine. The job of the free press is to tell everyone that it is not." -Unknown
"If the enemy opens the door, you must race in."  Sun-tzu, "Art of War"
"If your heart is broken, make art with the pieces." -Shane Koyczan
"Love is a currency that functions in reverse because the only way to be wealthy with it is to give more of it away." -Shane Koyczan
"Incredible things can be done simply if we are committed to making them happen." - Sadhguru
"Love is a canvas furnished by Nature and embroidered by imagination"
"Music for entertainment seems to complement the reduction of people to silence, the dying out of speech as expression, the inability to communicate at all. It inhabits the pockets of silence that develop between people molded by anxiety, work and undemanding docility."  Theodor Adorno
"Two roads diverged in a wood, and I - I took the one less travelled by, And that has made all the difference." - Robert Frost
"A happily married man giving advice on how to deal with a divorce is like a virgin giving tips on childbirth." -Me
"I go to movies expecting to have a whole experience. If I want a movie that doesn't end, I'll go to a French movie. A movie has to be complete within itself; it can't just build off the first one or play variations." - Joss Whedon
"If our early lessons of acceptance were as successful as our early lessons of anger, how much happier we would all be." - Peter McWilliams
"In order to be irreplaceable one must always be different." - Coco Chanel
"Slight not what's near, while aiming at what's far." - Euripides
"An empty container makes a lot of noise." - A Filipino proverb
"You do care," said Dumbledore. "You care so much you feel as though you will bleed to death with the pin of it."- Harry Potter and The Order of the Phoenix
"Seize the day or die regretting the time you lost" -M. Shadows
"Christian rock is there for you who lack courage and intellect." - Henry Rollins
"I want to say what I mean and mean what I say. I just need something to mean anything" - Stroke 9
"Nothing great has ever been achieved except by those who dared to believe that something inside them was superior to circumstance." - Bruce Barton
"Nothing great has ever been achieved except by those who dare to believe that something inside them is superior to circumstance." - Bruce Barton
"NOT ALL MONEY IS GOOD MONEY"
"I'm not fit for this office and should never have been here" -Warren G. Harding, 29th president of the USA
"I cannot give you the formula for success, but I can give you the formula for failure which is: Try to please everybody."  Herbert B. Swope
"The best teacher teach from the heart, not from the book" -- Anonymous
"You must never give into dispair. Allow yourself to slip down that road and you surrender to your lowest instincts. In the darkest times, hope is something you give yourself. That is the meaning of inner strength." -Uncle Iroh, Avatar the Last Airbender
"Being prepared to die is one of the great secrets of living." - George Lincoln Rockwell
'Everybody is a genius. But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will live its whole life believing that it's stupid.' - Albert Einstein
"Time is a sort of river of passing events, and strong is its current; no sooner is a thing brought to sight than it is swept by and another takes its place, and this too will be swept away." - Marcus Aurelius
"You know, Prince Zuko, destiny is a funny thing. You never know how things are going to work out. But if you keep an open mind and an open heart, I promise you will find your own destiny someday." -Uncle Iroh, Avatar the Last Airbender
"You know, Prince Zuko, destiny is a funny thing. You never know how things are going to work out. But if you keep an open mind and an open heart, I promise you will find your own destiny someday." - Uncle Iroh, Avatar the Last Airbender
"Her eyes were windows to a perfect reality. One which I'd never know."
"I have opinions of my own  strong opinions  but I don"t always agree with them."  George H.W. Bush
"Respect is love in action." Bangambiki Habyarimana
"Maybe everyone is born with all the puzzle pieces on how to live the best life, but we're so desperate for a completed picture that we put the pieces where they don't belong." - Unknown
"You never really understand a person until you consider things from his point of view [] until you climb into his skin and walk around in it." - Harper Lee, To Kill a Mockingbird
"If we had no winter, the spring would not be so pleasant; if we did not sometimes taste of adversity, prosperity would not be so welcome." Anne Bradstreet
"Education is the most powerful weapon which you can use to change the world." Nelson Mandela
"Education is the most powerful weapon which you can use to change the world." Nelson Mandela
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says, 'I'm possible'!" Audrey Hepburn
"It's not about the writing. It's about the feelings behind the words." - Takayuki Ikkaku, Arisa Hosaka and Toshihiro Kawabata
"In the end, you'll know which people really love you. They're the ones who see you for who you are and, no matter what, always find a way to be at your side." - Randy K. Milholland
"Maybe I wanted to hear it so badly that my ears betrayed my mind in order to secure my heart." - Margaret Cho
"Enjoy all you have while pursuing all you want." Jim Rohn
"Fear less, hope more; Eat less, chew more; Whine less, breathe more; Talk less, say more; Love more, and all good things will be yours!" Swedish Proverb
"To thrive in life you need three bones. A wishbone. A backbone. And a funny bone." Reba McEntire
"Everything has been figured out, except how to live." - Jean-Paul Sartre
"The second I start thinking about something, I don"t do it. I don"t want to corrupt the process." -Greg Puciato
"In the US, 100 years is a long time, but in Europe, 100 miles is a long way" -Guy from Newark Bar
"What one man can invent another can discover." - Arthur Conan Doyle
"Not being heard is no reason for silence." Les Misrables by Victor Hugo
"As to the better centuries that are coming..." - The House of Seven Gables by Nathaniel Hawthorne
'You can plan a pretty picnic but you can't predict the weather.' - Andre 3000, Ms. Jackson, Stankonia!
"If there isn't some absurdly deep context behind this it is simply stupid" - Anonymous
"You are not your job, you're not how much money you have in the bank. You are not the car you drive. You're not the contents of your wallet. You are not your fucking khakis. You are all singing, all dancing crap of the world." -Chuck Palahniuk
"All you need is love." Paul McCartney & John Lennon
"It's faith that will take you through, and determination that will drive you." Jonathan Anthony Burkett
"The heart that gives, gathers." Marianne Moore
"Live your life as though your every act were to become a universal law." Immanuel Kant
"There is a voice that doesn"t use words. Listen." Jalal ad-Din Rumi
"One machine can do the work of fifty ordinary men. No machine can do the work of one extraordinary man." -Elbert Hubbard
"A blessing is a circle of light drawn around a person to protect, heal and strengthen." John O'Donohua
"punctuality is the virtue of the board." Evelyn Waugh
"Fortitude is the guard and support of the other virtues." John Locke
"Progress lies not in enhancing what is, but in advancing toward what will be." Khalil Jibran
"Progress lies not in enhancing what is, but in advancing toward what will be." Khalil Jibran
"No man has the right to be an amateur in the matter of physical training. It is a shame for a man to grow old without seeing the beauty and strength of which his body is capable." - Socrates
"An army can pass always, and at all seasons, wherever two men can set their feet."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"The House of Commons starts its proceedings with a prayer. The chaplain looks at the assembled members with their varied intelligence and then prays for the country." - Lord Denning
#QOTD > "Weather changes moods" - Kurt Cobain
"It goes without saying that all of the people, living, dead, and otherwise in this story are fictional or used in a fictional context. Only the gods are real." - Foreword of "American Gods" by Neil Gaiman
"The most merciful thing in the world, I think, is the inability of the human mind to correlate all its contents. We live on a placid island of ignorance in the midst of black seas of infinity, and it was not meant that we should voyage far...." - Call of the Cthulhu
"Dreams and dedication are a powerful combination." William Longgood
"Motivation is when your dreams put on work clothes." Benjamin Franklin
"Listen to your heart. It knows all things." Paulo Coelho
"Life is 10% what happens to us and 90% how we react to it."  Dennis P. Kimbro
"If we do not hang together, we will all hang separately." - Benjamin Franklin
"Not everyone is an artist but everyone is a fucking critic" - Marcel Duchamp
"There is no shortage of wonderful writers. What we lack is a dependable mass of readers." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Listen to your heart. It knows all things." - Paulo Coelho
"Success usually comes to those who are too busy to be looking for it." -- Henry David Thoreau
"Fear does not have any special power unless you empower it by submitting to it." - Les Brown
"Good food ends with good talk." - Geoffrey Neighor
"Ask about your neighbors, then buy the house." - Jewish Proverb
"We are indeed much more than what we eat, but what we eat can nevertheless help us to be much more than what we are." - Adelle Davis
"If you can't stand the heat, get out of the kitchen." - Harry S Truman
"What is it when you cant smile but cant cry. When humanity leaves bit and piece and all we are left with is uncertainty and apathy. What is life when fear rules under anger and silence. Answers lay upon you."
[Request]Help find the quote and who said it?
"A party without cake is just a meeting." - Julia Child
"Love is what we were born with. Fear is what we learned here" -- Marianne Williamson
"I don't believe in failing. I have dignity" -- Alejandro Jodorowsky
"We are going to be living with Obamacare for the forseeable future," Paul Ryan March 24, 2017
"We are going to be living with Obamacare for the forseeable future," he said. Paul Ryan March 24, 2017
"Time is moving forward. What about you?" - Unknown
"You have to begin to lose your memory, if only in bits and pieces, to realize that memory is what makes our lives. Life without memory is not life at all... Our memory is our coherence, our reason, our feeling, even our action. Without it, we are nothing."  Luis Buuel
"Love yourself first and everything else falls into line. You really have to love yourself to get anything done in this world."  Lucille Ball
"Victory is sweetest when you"ve known defeat."  Malcolm S. Forbes
"Tomorrow hopes we have learned something from yesterday" - John Wayne
"The person who says it cannot be done should not interrupt the person who is doing it."  Chinese Proverb
" It will be more glorious to fight against ignorance than to die on the field of battle. The discovery of a new scientific truth will be more important than the squabbles of diplomats." - Nikola Tesla -1937 on news in the future
"The haft of the arrow had been feathered with one of the eagle's own plumes. We often give our enemies the means of our own destruction." - Aesop
"Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it." - George Santayana
"In any given moment we have two options: to step forward into growth or back into safety." - Abraham Maslow
"Your name a night without sleep." - Frank Stanford
"Birds born in a cage think flying is an illness." - Alejandro Jodorowsky
"You can safely assume you've created God in your own image when it turns out that God hates all the same people you do." - Anne Lamott
"The safest road to hell is the gradual one - the gentle slope, soft underfoot, without sudden turnings, without milestones, without signposts."  C. S. Lewis
"You can discover what your enemy fears most by observing the means he uses to frighten you." - Eric Hoffer
"Being unconquerable lies with yourself, being conquerable lies with the enemy."  Sun-tzu, "Art of War"
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"First Law of Thermodynamics: You can't win, you can only break even. Second Law of Thermodynamics: You can't break even."
"If there is any one secret of success," said Henry Ford, "it lies in the ability to get the other person's point of view and see things from that person's angle as well as from your own."
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"It is awfully easy to be hard-boiled about everything in the daytime, but at night it is another thing." - Ernest Hemingway, The Sun Also Rises.
"Better to light a single candle than to curse the darkness"-Often claimed to be a Chinese proverb.
"A team aligned behind a vision will move mountains." - Kevin Rose
"Train yourself to let go of the things you fear to lose." - George Lucas
"You never know how a horse will pull until you hook him up to a heavy load." - Paul "Bear" Bryant
"No bird soars too high, if he soars with his own wings." - William Blake
"The love of learning, the sequestered nooks,/ And all the sweet serenity of books." - Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Progress lies not in enhancing what is, but in advancing toward what will be." - Khalil Gibran
"Not until we are lost do we begin to understand ourselves" - Henry David Thoreau, 1854
"We'd get sick on too many cookies, but ever so much sicker on no cookies at all." - Sinclair Lewis
"Is it fair to have given us the memory of what was and the desire of what could be, when we must suffer what is?" - Neil Jordan
"I think the world needs to wake up from its long nightmare of religious belief; and anything that we scientists can do to weaken the hold of religion should be done, and may in fact be our greatest contribution to civilization."
"And so we beat on, boats against the current ... borne back ceaselessly into the past" F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that." -Martin Luther King Jr.
"Excellence in any department can be attained only by the labor of a lifetime; it is not to be purchased at a lesser price. "  Samuel Johnson
"Be content with what you have; rejoice in the way things are. When you realize there is nothing lacking, the whole world belongs to you". Lao Tzu
"Quality is not an act, it is a habit" -- Aristotle
"Nah." - Rosa Parks
"You're always you, and that don't change, and you're always changing, and there's nothing you can do about it." The Graveyard Book by Neil Gaiman
"You have to love what you do to want to do it everyday" -- Aaliyah
"Be not afraid of life. Believe that life is worth living, and your belief will help create the fact."  William James
"Never trust a computer you can't throw out a window." - Steve Wozniak
"One doesn't discover new lands without losing sight of the shore." - Andre Gide
"A designer knows he has achieved perfection not when there is nothing left to add, but when there is nothing left to take away." - Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"Some books are to be tasted, others to be swallowed, and some to be chewed and digested." - Sir Francis Bacon
"Nature herself has imprinted on the minds of all the idea of God." - Cicero
"It's not only the most difficult thing to know one's self, but the most inconvenient. "  Josh Billings
"The path of the righteous man is beset on all sides by the inequities of the selfish and the tyranny of evil men." - Ezekiel 25:17 (supposedly)
"A dwarf on a giant's shoulders sees the farthest of the two." - Ray Bradbury
"I would rather be a servant for a smart boss than be a boss of a dumb servant"
"When the eagles are silent, the parrots begin to jabber." - Winston Churchill
"Faithful heart may have forward tongue." -Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers, J.R.R. Tolkien
"Everyone has a part of themselves they hide. Even from the people they love most."
"I think it's important to realize you can miss something. But not want it back."
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Knowing others is intelligence; knowing yourself is wisdom. Mastering others is strength; mastering yourself is true power." () - Laozi, 604-531 BC
#QOTD > "You're not supposed to be so blinded with patriotism that you can't face reality. Wrong is wrong, no matter who said it." - Malcolm X
"A single spark can start a prairie fire; a great dam can be destroyed by ants" (, ; ) - Confucius, 551-479 BC
"If you don"t know where you"re going, any road will do. If you don"t know where you are, a map won"t help." - Watts Humphrey
"Really, we are all fake heroes."  President Theodore Roosevelt, 1898
"Power corrupts. Absolute power corrupts absolutely." - Lord Acton, 19th Century
"A leader is one who knows the way, goes the way and shows the way."  John C. Maxwell
"Maturity is achieved when a person postpones immediate pleasures for long-term values." -Joshua L. Liabman
"I'd heard it all the time, 'Live in the moment.' But if I did that, I'd weigh more than a dump truck. Losing weight wasn't about the moment at all; it was about having faith in the future. It was about knowing there would be another meal in a few hours." - Stephanie Klein
"Part of being a hero is knowing when you don't need to be one anymore." - Alan Moore
"I am an old man, but in many senses a very young man. And this is what I want you to be, young, young all your life." - Pablo Casals
"There is nothing in which the birds differ more from man than the way in which they can build and yet leave a landscape as it was before." - Robert Lynd
"My father was fond of saying you need three things in life. A good doctor, a forgiving priest, and a clever accountant. The first two, I've never had much use for them. But the third..." -Schindler's List
"Nic Cage used to be one of the greats. Now he's made a habit of only starring in trashy movies" - My Film Professor
"The happiest people seem to be those who have no particular cause for being happy except that they are so." - William Ralph Inge
"You don't need people's opinion on a fact. You might as well have a poll asking: Which number is bigger, 15 or 5? Or do owls exist? Or are there hats?" - John Oliver
"News channels often see two points and draw a line, and wonder why the rest of the points don't fall on it." - Benjamin Haverford
"Alexander the Great found the philosopher looking attentively at a pile of human bones. Diogenes explained, "I am searching for the bones of your father but cannot distinguish them from those of a slave."
"One way or another, you're always hungry" -moi
"People don't really want to be free. Take my birds, they roam around free all day, but at night, they fly home to their cages." -Into the Badlands
"MY GUT LED ME THE WRONG WAY," said no one ever!
"It's funny how the words we never say, can turn into the only thoughts we know." -Andrew McMahon
"A little key may open a box, where lies a bunch of keys." -Roger Williams
"I feel sorry for the people watching the other movie  the one in which President Trump is essentially Hitler. In my movie, he"s having a bumpy transition ride but generally doing the people"s work. My movie is more of a comedy." - Scott Adams
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts" - Bertrand Russell
"The basic trouble, you see, is that people think that "right" and "wrong" are absolute; that everything that isn't perfectly and completely right is totally and equally wrong." - Issac Asimov
"A critic was like a eunuch in a harem. He could observe, study, and analyze - but he couldn't do it himself." - Issac Asimov
"I'm surrounded by people, but I've never felt so lonely."
"When I am feeling dreary, annoyed, and generally unimpressed by life, I imagine what it would be like to come back to this world for just a day after having been dead. I imagine how sentimental I would feel about the very things I once found stupid, hateful, or mundane. " -Amy Krouse Rosenthal
"The least productive people are usually the ones who are most in favor of holding meetings."  Thomas Sowell
"To think too long about doing a thing often becomes its undoing."  Eva Young
"When we try to observe the world and ourselves, the mind generates stories and fictions and explanations and imposes them on reality, and we cannot see what is really happening because we are blinded by the fictions that we create or that other people create and we believe." - Yuval Noah Harari
"Love is the only force capable of transforming an enemy into a friend." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"The most beautiful makeup of a woman is passion. But cosmetics are easier to buy." - Yves Saint-Laurent
"90% of everything is crap." - Sturgeon's law
"Never attribute to conspiracy that which can be explained through stupidity." - Hanlon's Razor
"He uses statistics as a drunken man uses lamp posts; for support rather than illumination." - Andrew Lang
"Poor Faulkner. Does he really think big emotions come from big words?" - Ernest Hemingway
"One is not better than the other. It is just a different technique, a differrent taste, a different look." - Jacques Pepin on French and American omelettes
"Instead of wondering when your next vacation is, you ought to set up a life you don"t need to escape from."  Seth Godin, author
"When all has been tried, yet Justice is not in sight, It is then right to pick up the sword, It is then right to fight." - Guru Gobind Singh, founder of the Khalsa, the Sikh Warrior Iniates.
"The greater part of our happiness or misery depends upon our dispositions, and not upon our circumstances." Martha Washington
"If people aren't laughing at your dreams, your dreams aren't big enough." - Grayson Marshall
"When a sun explodes, it's iron core scatters across the universe, to form new stars, and seed new planets. New life. The iron in our blood is made of stars, and we are simply another turn in the cycle of it all." -Unknown
"By all means marry; if you get a good wife, you"ll be happy. If you get a bad one, you"ll become a philosopher"  Socrates
"Detached reflection cannot be expected in the face of an uplifted knife." - Judgement from Brown v US
"Where they burn books, they will in the end also burn people." - Heinrich Heine
"We did not win because destiny created us better than all other peoples. I hope that in victory we are more grateful than we are proud. I hope we can rejoice in victory - but humbly. The dead men would not want us to gloat." - Ernie Pyle, On World War II Victory
"We buy things we don't need with money we don't have to impress people we don't like." - Dave Ramsey
"The only normal people are the ones you don't know very well." - Alfred Adler
"One falsehood leads easily to another" - Cicero
"We know that from time to time there arise among human beings people who seem to exude love as naturally as the sun gives out heat." - Alan Watts
"The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances: if there is any reaction, both are transformed." - C.G. Jung
"...But I hope I never forget that they are people. The way of life that we defend with their deaths is built on that principle..." /u/bloodfist on ISIS
"Battle not with monsters, lest ye become a monster, and if you gaze into the abyss, the abyss gazes also into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I am interested in the homeless, but they're a symptom. You're treating a symptom and the disease rages on and consumes the human race. I'm talking about an overhaul of the system: putting power in different hands." - Joss Whedon, Zack Whedon, Maurissa Tancharoen, and Jed Whedon
"It's a sign of mediocrity when you demonstrate gratitude with moderation." - Roberto Benigni
"If you wish your merit to be known, acknowledge that of other people." - Oriental Proverb
"You may think your only choices are to swallow your anger or throw it in someone's face, but there's a third option: You can just let it go, and only when you do that is it really gone and you can move forward." - Ted Mosby, How I Met Your Mother.
"Dream no small dreams for they have no power to move the hearts of men." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"Politics is the skilled use of blunt objects" - Lester B. Pearson
"Love is the only force capable of transforming an enemy into a friend." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"The good times must mean the stress coming soon" Joey B
"You don't want to look back and know you could've done better."
"Cause it matters where you"re going Not where you been" - One Way Ticket by Carrie Underwood
"A lot of truth is said in jest" - Say What You Say, Eminem
"The problem is, god gave man a brain and a penis, but only enough blood to run one at a time." - Robin Williams.
" Can you remember who you were, before the world told you who you should be?" -Charles Bukowski
"If in hell I could hold one curl of your hair, I'd think the saints of heaven in torment." -Rumi
"Pseudo morals work real well on your talk shows for the weak, but your selective judgments and good guy badges don't mean a fuck to me." -Marilyn Manson
"The best contraceptive in the world is an educated woman." - unknown
"The cure for poverty has a name. It's called the 'empowerment of women'. Now, name me a religion that stands, or has ever stood, for that." - Christopher Hitchens
"Success consist of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm." -Winston Churchill
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths." - Arnold Schwarzenegger
"so what are you suppose to be when you can't be"
"To take decisions, at the very least you need an uneven number of people. And three is already too many." - unknown.
"Better keep yourself clean and bright; you are the window through which you must see the world."
"Every gun that is made, every warship launched, every rocket fired signifies in the final sense, a theft from those who hunger and are not fed, those who are cold and are not clothed...."
"as if familiar paths traced in summer skies could lead as easily to prison as to the sleep of the innocent" - Albert Camus (The Stranger)
"Most people die at twenty-five and aren't buried until they're seventy-five" -Benjamin Franklin
"Advise me when I'm alone, not in crowded place with many witnesses. For advices given in front of audiences felt like an insult that made my heart sore and torn; So, I apologize if my heart revolt" - Al-Shafi'i
"To a worm in horseradish, the world is a horseradish" - Yiddish Proverb
"No matter how noble the objectives of a government, if it blurs decency and kindness, cheapens human life, and breeds ill will and suspicion  it is an evil government." - Eric Hoffer
"Only a virtuous people are capable of freedom. As nations become corrupt and vicious, they have more need of masters." - Benjamin Franklin
"The further a society drifts from truth, the more it will hate those who speak it." - George Orwell
"It's not worth doing something unless you were doing something that someone, somewhere, would much rather you weren't doing." - Terry Pratchett
"The need to be right is the sign of a vulgar mind." - Albert Camus
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars." - Oscar Wilde
"By definition, life is a tragedy. For each man is his own main character, in which his final arc is his own inevitable death."
"Caesar was right to cite his good fortune and to appear to believe in it. That is a means of acting on the imagination of others without offending anyone"s self-love."  Napoleon Bonaparte, writing in "Caesar"s Wars"
"Not every religion has to have St. Augustine's attitude to sex. Why even in our culture marriages are celebrated in a church, everyone present knows what is going to happen that night, but that doesn't prevent it being a religious ceremony." -Ludwig Wittgenstein
"Think of all the beauty still left around you and be happy." -Anne Frank
"When a voice echoes through the halls of our heart, it is never ending as if there were no start."
"Never confuse the truth with the opinion of the masses." - Laurence Fishburne
"Wise men speak because they have something to say; fools because they have to say something."  Plato
"Evil knows of the good, but good does not know of evil." - Franz Kafka
"I live in the present due to the constraints of the Space-Time Continuum." - Hank Green
"Most people see themselves a certain way their entire lives. When they go through a massive change, such as losing weight, they have to learn to see themselves in a new way. It is one of the biggest struggles her members deal with on their journey." - Jennifer Hudson
"Science may have found a cure for most evils; but it has found no remedy for the worst of them all - the apathy of human beings." - Helen Keller
"I reached for sleep and drew it round me like a blanket muffling pain and thought together in the merciful dark." - Mary Stewart
"There are no shortcuts to any place worth going." Beverly Sills
"The simple act of caring is heroic." Edward Albert
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing." - Socrates
"He who is brave is free." - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"We are all mistaken sometimes; sometimes we do wrong things, things that have bad consequences. But it does not mean that we are evil, or that we cannot be trusted ever afterward." - Alison Croggon
"Our most basic common link is that we all inhabit this planet. We all breathe the same air. We all cherish our children's future. And we are all mortal." --- John Fitzgerald Kennedy
"Our realities are our own to create. The sooner you realize, the sooner you can change."
"Our realities are own to create. The sooner you realize, the sooner you can change."
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky
"I've only been in love with a beer bottle and a mirror." -Sid Vicious (John Simon Ritchie-Beverly)
"Much unhappiness has come into the world because of bewilderment and things left unsaid." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky (Need help locating the source of this quote.)
"the worst distance between two people is misunderstanding"
"There is no such thing as society. There are individual men and women, and there are families. And no government can do anything except through people, and people must look to themselves first. It's our duty to look after ourselves and then, also to look after our neighbour."
"One cannot think well, love well, sleep well, if one has not dined well."- Virginia Woolf
"The story so far: In the beginning the Universe was created. This has made a lot of people very angry and been widely regarded as a bad move." - Douglas Adams, The Restaurant at the End of the Universe
"Directly after copulation, the devil's laughter is heard." -Arthur Schopenhauer
"Break a vase, and the love that reassembles the fragments is stronger than that love which took its symmetry for granted when it was whole."  Derek Walcott
[FindThisQuote!] 12 People sit in a room. Opportunity walks in..
"I dream of a world where the truth is what shapes people"s politics, rather than politics shaping what people think is true." -Neil deGrasse Tyson
"The first sign of immaturity is calling yourself mature" - Jubril 2017
"To harvest a good heart,it's necessary to sow love" (William Ventura)
"I used to try to get things done by saying 'please.' That didn't work and now I'm a dynamiter. I dynamite 'em out of my path." - Huey Long, 40th Governor of Louisiana, 1929.
"Did is a word of achievement. Won't is a word of defeat. Might is a word of bereavement. Can't is a word of defeat. Ought is a word of duty."  Gerard Hargraves
"We all fall, we all rise, we alright. With the bumps and bruises proving to em' we all tried." E-Dubble
"Everything's a waste of time unless it's fulfilling for you. Otherwise, you're just forcing yourself."
"You don"t have to see the whole staircase, just take the first step."  Martin Luther King, Jr.
"The ability to believe in fiction is what make the human race superior"
"Powerful avalanches begin with small shifts." - Pamela McFarland Walsh
"Bravery is the solutions to regret." - Robin Sharma
"Old Entish... is a lovely language, but it takes a very long time to say anything in it, because we do not say anything in it, unless it is worth taking a long time to say, and to listen to." -Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers, J.R.R. Tolkien
"Beauty is being the best possible version of yourself." Audrey Hepburn
"Perfect is the worst enemy of good" - Voltaire
"We are ready to die for an opinion but not for a fact: indeed, it is by our readiness to die that we try to prove the factualness of our opinion." -Eric Hoffer
"In the end, it's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years." - Dr. Edward Stieglitz
"Watch your thoughts. Thoughts become words. Watch your words. Words become actions. Watch your actions. Actions become habits. Watch your habits. Habits become your character. Watch your character. Your character becomes your destiny." - 8Ball
"Things didn't turn out the way they're supposed to, but what can you do? You must take life the way it comes at you and make the best of it." Life of Pi by Yann Martel
"I am too full of life to be half-loved."  Ijeoma Umebinyuo
"To understand the heart and mind of a person, look not at what he has already achieved, but at what he aspires to." Kahlil Gibran
"I"m just here for the drugs."  First Lady Nancy Reagan at a "Just Say No" rally
"It is never too late to become what you might've been"  George Eliot
'If you're going through hell, keep going' - Winston Churchill
"Plant your garden and decorate your own soul, instead of waiting for someone to bring you flowers." -Jose Luis Borges
"A good listener is not only popular everywhere, but after a while he gets to know something." - Wilson Mizner
"Sitting at the table doesn't make you a diner, unless you eat some of what's on that plate. Being here in America doesn't make you an American. Being born here in America doesn't make you an American." - Malcolm X
"Cheese - milk's leap toward immortality." - Clifton Fadiman
[Regina Spektor - Samson] "Beneath the stars came fallin' on our heads; But they're just old light, they're just old light"
"In school, we learn that mistakes are bad, and we are punished for making them. Yet, if you look at the way humans are designed to learn, we learn by making mistakes. We learn to walk by falling down. If we never fell down, we would never walk." - Robert Kiyosaki
"A good laugh is sunshine in the house." - William Makepeace Thackeray
"The more pity that fools may not speak wisely what wise men do foolishly." Touchstone in As You Like It
"When you do the common things in life in an uncommon way, you will command the attention of the world." - Dr. George Washington Carver
"Where there is love there is life" - Mahatma Gandhi
"How can the rich survive without the poor? If that question is fully answered we will truly have a dystopian world."
"The three most harmful addictions are heroin, carbohydrates, and a monthly salary."  Nassim Taleb
"Every man over forty is a scoundrel." - George Bernard Shaw
"Its fucked up how people get judged for being real, and how people get loved for being fake." - Tupac
"People ask, "Why do you fight? Why do you kill? Why do you destroy?" They will die with these questions unanswered. That is humanity's bliss." -Unknown
"If you want to test your memory, try to recall what you were worrying about one year ago today." E. Joseph Cossman
"The limits of the possible can only be defined by going beyond them into the impossible." - Arthur C. Clarke
"How soon "not now" becomes "never.'"  Martin Luther
"Nothing so contributes to tranquillity as screams of fiscal anguish from the affluent. The screams persuade the poor that the rich are suffering too" - John Kenneth Galbraith
"They laugh at me because I'm different. I laugh at them because they are all the same." -- Kurt Cobain
"You don't have to be smart to laugh at farts, but you'd have to be stupid no to." -Louie C.K.
"Once you know the rules you can break them. Once you master them you can make them." - me
'Look up at the stars and not down at your feet. Try to make sense of what you see and wonder about what makes the universe exist. Be curious.' Stephen Hawking
"Questions are a danger to you, and a burden to others." -Mr. Krabs
"If you see something beautiful in someone, speak it!" Ruthie Lindsey
"He who knows how to speak, knows also when." - Archidamidas
"Obstacles are those frightful things you see when you take your eyes off your goal." -- Henry Ford
'Fair is foul and foul is fair' - Mcabeth Act 1 Scene 1, The Wicked Witches, William Shakespeare
'If you can dream it, you can do it'- Nelson Mandela
"Happiness, when ill timed, can maim a life just as thoroughly as sorrow."  Hans Abendroth
"The real voyage of discovery consists not in seeking new lands but seeing with new eyes." - Marcel Proust
"There are times when you must admit failure, and times when you must accept success. Sometimes that's harder."
"If we didn"t have two parties, we would all settle on the best men in the country and things would run fine. But as it is, we settle on the worst ones and then fight over "em."  Will Rogers
'Someone is sitting in the shade today because someone planted a tree a long time ago.'- Warren Buffet
'An investment in knowledge pays the best interest'- Benjamin Franklin
'Nothing is as terrible to see as ignorance in action'- Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"The goal is absolutely secondary: it is the functioning toward the goal which is important" - Hunter S. Thompson
"My idea of good company is the company of clever, well-informed people, who have a great deal of conversation; that is what I call good company." - Jane Austen
"At the end of the day, whether or not those people are comfortable with how you're living your life doesn't matter. What matters is whether you're comfortable with it." - Phillip C. McGraw
"Anything that is of value in life only multiplies when it is given." - Deepak Chopra
"There is one piece of advice, in a life of study, which I think no one will object to; and that is, every now and then to be completely idle - to do nothing at all." - Sydney Smith
"There are times where you must admit failure, and there are times where you must accept success. Sometimes that's harder."
"Never let the same dog bite you twice." - Chuck Berry
"The human race has one really effective weapon, and that is laughter." - Mark Twain
"Silence is the best reply to a fool." - Imam Ali
"Humor is almost always anger with its make-up on." - Stephen King
"[A hangover is] just your brain trying to comprehend its own stupidity" - Red Forman
"History will be kind to me, for I intend to write it."- Winston Churchill
"There will come a time when we will be nostalgic for the future, that is, for how we used to think the future would look."  Hans Abendroth
"If you tried to give rock and roll another name, you might call it "Chuck Berry"." - John Lennon
"If you do what you need, you"re surviving. If you do what you want, you"re living." - Unknown
"Every man dies. Not every man really lives." -- William Wallace
"Take your life in your own hands, and what happens? A terrible thing: no one to blame." -- Erica Jong
"If and when you ever say anything brave, you will know it by this signyou will not be met with applause."
'Stars, hide your fires. Let not light see my black and deep desires'- Macbeth Act 1 Scene 4, William Shakespeare
"Work like you don't need money, love like you've never been hurt, and dance like no one's watching." -Unknown
"A woman is a creature that"s always shopping."  Ovid (43 B.C.  A.D. 18)
"Why do they say I hate my country? And what does that even mean? Am I supposed to hate my town, am I supposed to hate all English people, or my government? And if I do hate my government, does that mean I hate my country? It's a democratic duty to criticize the government." - Ken Loach
"You take your life in your own hands, and what happens? A terrible thing, no one to blame." Erica Jong
"You didn't kill me. My expectations did."
"True love cannot be found where it does not exist, nor can it be denied where it does" - Torquato Tasso
"Life changes and we all move on. Here's to not letting the past define who we are, and instead using it to shape who we will become."
"It"s not hard to make decisions once you know what your values are."  Roy E. Disney
"Beauty is about being comfortable in your own skin. It's about knowing and accepting who you are." - Ellen DeGeneres
"Nothing is so awesomely unfamiliar as the familiar that discloses itself at the end of a journey." - Cynthia Ozick
"Be courteous to all, but intimate with few; and let those few be well tried before you give them your confidence." - George Washington
"Use, do not abuse; neither abstinence nor excess ever renders man happy." - Voltaire
"No one can build his security upon the nobleness of another person." - Willa Cather
"You realize that our mistrust of the future makes it hard to give up the past." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Sesame Street? Is that the Tv show where all the puppets live in the barrio? I love that show." - Dwight Schrute
"Listening, not imitation, may be the sincerest form of flattery." - Joyce Brothers
"If you wish to see the truth, then hold no opinions." - Danny Rand, Zen Saying
"Every night is a tree to hang from."
"The very basic core of a man's living spirit is his passion for adventure. The joy of life comes from our encounters with new experiences, and hence there is no greater joy than to have an endlessly changing horizon, for each day to have a new and different sun." -Christopher Johnson McCandless
"Just do good things and good things will happen to ya, mate."
"Had to be me. Someone else might have gotten it wrong" Mordin Solus (Mass effect 3)
"We have created a Star Wars civilization, with Stone Age emotions, medieval institutions, and godlike technology. We thrash about. We are terribly confused by the mere fact of our existence, and a danger to ourselves and to the rest of life." - Edward O. Wilson
"Innocent words got dirty in his mouth." - Terry Pratchett
"The devil can cite scripture for his purpose." - William Shakespeare
"You can always put something noble in a sneering fashion if you try." - Issac Asimov
"Oh how the turntables" -Michael Scott
"No matter how many times love goes away,because the heart will always remain in the same place" (William Ventura)
"Sometimes, the books you didn't read, the movies you didn't watch and the places you didn't visit are the reason for your happiness because they give you the feeling of having a lot of things left for you to do and try."
"The sun came out the next day, which it had no right to do." - Maggie Hall, The Conspiracy of Us
"It helps if you remember that everyone is doing their best from their level of consciousness." - Deepak Chopra
"There is no death, daughter. People die only when we forget them," my mother explained shortly before she left me. "If you can remember me, I will be with you always." by Isabel Allende in Eva Luna
"I forgot to shake hands and be friendly. It was an important lesson about leadership." -Lee Iacocca
"Yet you, LORD, are our Father. We are the clay, you are the potter; we are all the work of your hand." - Isaiah 64:8
"The most intriguing thing about the universe is the fact that it exists." - A.R.
"The most intriguing things about the universe is the fact that it exists." - A.R.
"Experience is a good teacher, but she sends in terrific bills." - Minna Thomas Antrim
"12 You will live in joy and peace. The mountains and hills will burst into song, and the trees of the field will clap their hands!" -Isaiah 55:12
"I can normally tell how intelligent a man is by how stupid he thinks I am."
"Living is a form of not being sure, not knowing what next, or how.The moment you know how, you begin to die a little." - Agnes De Mille
"If you have a dream, don't just sit there. Gather courage to believe that you can succeed and leave no stone unturned to make it a reality." - Dr. Roopleen
"A nation is always what you have the wit to make it The triumphs of faction, parties, divisions, is the fault of those in authority only No people are bad under a good government, just as no troops are bad under good generals."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"You just can't beat the person who never gives up." Babe Ruth
"You're amazing just the way you are." Bruno Mars
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently." - Maya Angelou
"Because it"s worse to wish for something that"s never going to happen and be disappointed than to never wish for anything at all," - Maggie Hall
"If you work for a living, why do you kill yourself working?" - Tuco from the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly
"Choose people who choose you."
"No matter how busy someone is, if they want to make time for you they will."
"If you can't see anything beautiful about yourself, get a better mirror, look a little closer, stare a little longer, because there's something inside you that made you keep trying despite everyone who told you to quit." - Shane Koyczan
"I don't think there is a proper way to celebrate something which makes you happy." - Matthew Oliphant
"Laughter is inner jogging." - Norman Cousins
"A friend is a gift you give yourself." - Robert Louis Stevenson
"As men, we are all equal in the presence of death." - Publilius Syrus
"Give a man a gun and he can rob a bank but give a man a bank and he can rob the world." - Tyler Wellick (Mr. Robot S01E02)
"Sometimes the answer you get is the one you least expect. But more often than not, the answers people have been looking for have been inside them all along. The important thing is to never stop searching." - JD, Scrubs
"Think where man's glory most begins and ends, and say my glory was I had such friends." - William Butler Yeats
"We come to love not by finding a perfect person, but by learning to see an imperfect person perfectly" - Sam Keen
"There's a cost to this movement, and the cost is, 'how much do I value my blood?" -- Tarn Adams
"Don"t think money does everything, or you are going to end up doing everything for money."  Voltaire
"In theory, theory and practice are the same. In practice, they are not." -- Anonymous
"Pain is temporary. Quitting lasts forever." - Lance Armstrong
"Art  the one achievement of man which has made the long trip up from all fours seem well advised" - James Thurber
"Instead of wondering when your next vacation is, maybe you should set up a life you don't need to escape from." Seth Godin
" I myself am made entirely of flaws, stitched together with good intentions" -Augusten Burroughs
"You miss 100% of the shots you don't take." - Wayne Gretzky
"As Abraham Lincoln once said, 'If you are a racist, I will attack you with the north.' " -Michael Scott
"Never confuse wanting a person with needing them. You may really want a person, but you never really need them."
"Never confuse wanting someone with needing then. You may want them so much, but I can assure you that you don't need them."
"Have faith :). Be like a kid and have an imagination to explore this world. Your dreams and creations will foster thoughts, expressions and ideas for other people to enjoy." - Me
"at his expense we loved him"
"Running around, catching a lot of light". "In moonlight, black boys look blue"
"The thing is, being lonely is like walking in the cold without a coat. It's uncomfortable, but eventually you go numb." - Maggie Hall
"God gives sunlight to everyone :)" - Me
31 Get rid of all bitterness, rage and anger, brawling and slander, along with every form of malice. "Be kind and compassionate to one another, forgiving each other, just as in Christ God forgave you." Ephesians 4:31-32
"The road to success is always under construction" - Arnold Palmer
"Every saint has a past. Every sinner has a future." -Warren Buffet
"Work like there is someone working twenty-four hours a day to take it away from you." -Mark Cuban
'Why not ask the living source of being in you? You are the only holy scripture in the world.' - Osho
[Is this a real quote?] "If they laugh, it's funny" - George Burns
"I made you my only priority and now all I'm left with are options."
"Everyone has a plan 'till they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson
"There is only one choice in life: Conquer fear or be conquered by fear" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The harder I work, the luckier I get." - Samuel Goldwyn
"The menu is not the meal."  Alan Watts
"No country has ever profited from protracted warfare."  Sun-tzu, "Art of War"
"What's meant to be will always find a way" - Trisha Yearwood
"A true friend never gets in your way unless you happen to be going down." - Arnold H. Glasow
"Never give up, for that is just the place and time that the tide will turn." Harriet Beecher Stowe
"I'd rather look ridiculous when everybody else does than plain and sensible all by myself." - L. M. Montgomery
"You cant love a crowd the same way you can love a person./ And a crowd cant love you the way a single person can love you./ Intimacy doesnt scale. Not really. Intimacy is a one-on-one phenomenon." - Hugh Macleod
"When you helped somebody, right away you were responsible for that person. And things always followed for which you were never prepared." - Martha Brooks
"Give every man thy ear, but few thy voice." - William Shakespeare
"Demetrius Phalereus persuaded King Ptolemy to get and study such books as treated of government and conduct; for those things are written in books which the friends of kings dare not advise."  Plutarch
"We suffer so we may obtain"
"Be weird. Your strangeness is your magic." Parker Lewis
"The harder I work, the luckier I get." - Samuel Goldwyn
"People like being lied to. They just don't like finding out they've been lied to." - Barney Stinson, How I Met Your Mother
"Desperation can make a person do surprising things." - Veronica Roth, Allegiant
"There must, whether the gods see it or not, be something great in the mortal soul. For suffering, it seems, is infinite, and our capacity without limit."
"The noblest pleasure is the joy of understanding." - Leonardo da Vinci
"Do you want to live life, or do you want to escape life?" - Macklemore
"Why regret? Why regret, why regret? Because yesterday and yesterday and yesterday." Unknown source.
"Words Build Bridges into Unexplored Regions"
"When you have the cash the luck will come." - Gregg Bagni
"The purpose of life is not to be happy - but to matter, to be productive, to be useful, to have it make some difference that you have lived at all."  Leo Rosten
"The less you bet, the more you lose when you win."  Wyatt Earp
"The less you bet, the more you lose when you win."  Wyatt Earp
"All in all, she is as meaningless as I am. Yet I value her over myself."
"When everything seems to be going against you, remember that the airplane takes off against the wind, not with it." -Henry Ford
"When you wake up in the morning you have two choices: go back to sleep, or wake up and chase those dreams." - Unknown
"It is, and has been, and will forever be, this world of ours, a fucking joke." - Bill Hicks
"Most people do not listen with the intent to understand; they listen with the intent to reply." Stephen Covey, educator, writer and speaker
"Good and ill have not changed since yesteryear; nor are they one thing among Elves and Dwarves and another among Men. It is a man's part to discern them, as much in the Golden Wood as in his own house." -Lord of the Rings, J.R.R. Tolkien
"Trust yourself. Create the kind of self that you will be happy to live with all your life." Golda Meir
"As a rule, men worry more about what they can't see than about what they can."  Julius Caesar
"When one door closes, another door opens; but we often look so long and regretfully upon the closed door, that we do not see the ones which open for us." - Alexander Graham Bell
"Letting go was the hardest thing I've ever done. But not as hard as watching you not wanting me for all that time."
"Donald Trump will not be President in my lifetime." - Janet Reno RIP November 7, 2016
"Everybody needs beauty as well as bread, places to play in and pray in, where nature may heal and give strength to body and soul alike." - John Muir
"My evil genius Procrastination has whispered me to tarry 'til a more convenient season." - Mary Todd Lincoln
"Be honorable yourself if you wish to associate with honorable people." - Welsh Proverb
"Let us so live that when we come to die even the undertaker will be sorry." - Mark Twain
[Meaning] "We are too late for the gods, and too early for being." - Martin Heidegger.
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, but wiser people so full of doubts." - Bertrand Russell
"Do the things you know, and you shall learn the truth you need to know." - Louisa May Alcott
"Those in worry live in the future, while those in longing live in the past."
"One cannot be equal if he constantly plays victim" -anonymous
"A man is but a product of his thoughts; what he thinks, he becomes."  Mohandas K. Gandhi
"I learned that a brand of clothing doesn't make a difference,if we know how to exibit an elegant personality" (William Ventura)
"Did you ever hear the tragedy of Darth Plagueis the Wise?" -The Senate
" People will kill you over time, and how they'll kill you is with tiny, harmless phrases like: Be Realistic." -Dylan Moran
"And Love is just a camouflage for what resembles rage again" - lyrics from Snuff by Slipknot
"Often it is the most deserving people who cannot help loving those who destroy them."  Hermann Hesse (Gertrud, 2010)
"Political activity ... is a special kind of behaviour, characterised by its complete unscrupulousness, and occurring only among small groups of the population, especially among dissatisfied groups whose talents do not get free play under the existing form of society." George Orwell
"Listen to people when they are angry, because that is when the real truth comes out." -- Anonymous
"Luck occurs when preparation meets opportunity" - Vince Lombardi
"Democracy is like a train: when you reach your destination, you get off" - Recep Tayyip Erdogan, current President of Turkey
"My work has shown me that spiritual geniuses of the everyday are everywhere. They are in the margins and do not have publicists." - Krista Tippet
"The men who have changed the world never succeeded by winning over the powerful, but always by stirring the masses. The first method is a resort to intrigue and only brings limited results. The latter is the course of genius and changes the face of the world."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"We all secretly believe we are right about everything and, by extension, we are all wrong," - Will Storr
"Human rights and wrongs are not determined by Justice, but by Might. Disguise it as you may, the naked sword is still king-maker and king-breaker, as of yore. All other theories are lies and lures." - Ragnar Redbeard
-HG Wells "Tewler Americanus in particular was irritated by a harsh logic that overrode his dearest belief in his practical isolation, whenever he chose to withdraw himself, from the affairs of the rest of the world.....
"It's wrinkly... like your loyalty." -Unknown
"I'm not in this world to live up to your expectations and you're not in this world to live up to mine." - Bruce Lee
'The man who can say hello to a stranger can also say hello to a flower, can also say hello to a tree, can sing a song to the birds. They sing every day and you have not bothered at all that some day you should return the call.' - Osho
"You spend your life waiting, For a moment that just don't come, Well, don't waste your time waiting," - Bruce Springsteen, 1978 (Badlands)
"The only way out of the labyrinth of suffering is to forgive." - John Green, Looking for Alaska
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"Risk comes from not knowing what you"re doing"  Warren Buffett
"Give a man a gun, he'll rob a bank. Give a man a bank, he'll rob the world." -Tyrell Wellick (Mr. Robot)
"In order to be truly happy, you must live along with, and you must stand for something larger than yourself." - Oprah Winfrey
"Whatever you do, do it to the purpose; do it thoroughly, not superficially. Go to the bottom of things. Any thing half done, or half known, is in my mind, neither done nor known at all. Nay, worse, for it often misleads." - Lord Chesterfield
"But the body is deeper than the soul and its secrets inscrutable." - E. M. Forster
"It is easier to get forgiveness than permission." - Stuart's Law of Retroaction
"Hope is such a bait, it covers any hook." - Oliver Goldsmith
"Happiness is like a butterfly; the more you chase it, the more it eludes you. But if you turn your attention to other things, it will come and sit softly on your shoulder." - Henry David Thoreau
"I think the most beautiful people are the the ones who went through the toughest situations in life, but still somehow managed to keep a smile on their face. Especially if they have a bright personality to go along with that smile." - Bob Marley 
"The more a person knows, the more he feels how insignificant he is in this world. So when you see someone who boast how great he is, he is dumb as fuck."
"If you take shortcuts and cheat through life, you just miss out on the full experience!" - Shannon Noakes
"I died as a mineral and became a plant, I died as plant and rose to animal, I died as animal and I was Man. Why should I fear? When was I less by dying?" - Jalal ed-Din Rumi, 13th-century
"There could be a freeman with the spirit of the slave, and there could be a slave with a spirit full of freedom; whoever is faithful to himself  he is a freeman, and whoever fills his life only with what is good and beautiful in the eyes of others  he is a slave." -Rabbi Abraham Isaac Kook
"Do not feed the Trolls"
"Your body is the church where Nature asks to be reverenced." -Marquis de Sade
"Letting go isn't what hurts most, moving on is."
"A fool who knows his foolishness is wise at least to that extent, but a fool who thinks himself wise is a fool indeed" - The Buddha in The Dhammapada
"We all live under the same sky, but we don't all have the same horizon." - Konrad Adenauer
'That's why i don't eat friggin' lobster or anything like that. Because they're alive when you kill it - Snooki (Jersey Shore)
"You painted a naked woman..."
"Prepare to be emancipated from your own inferior genes" -Abradolph Lincler
"The most successful ideological efforts are those which have no need for words and ask no more than complicitous silence." Pierre Bourdieu
"We do not see things the way they are, we see them as we are." Anais Nin
"The good life is one inspired by love and guided by knowledge." - Bertrand Russell
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." Albert Einstein
"The best way to get approval is not to need it."  Hugh MacLeod
"You will never change your life until you change something you do daily." - Mike Murdoch
"I"m not in the job of having evidence" - Kellyanne Conway, Special Advisor to President Trump
"A whipped horse will run. A loved horse will jump"
"Stop crying over things you can't change and start changing things you find worth crying for."
"Every man is a king so long as he has someone to look down on." - Sinclair Lewis, It Can't Happen Here
"The only war I would like to start is with myself" -me
"If your physical appearance depended on your personality, would you find yourself attractive?" - Shannon Noakes
"Tragedy excites the soul, lifts the heart, can and ought to create heroes."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"A man wants to be a woman's first love; a woman wants to be his last" - Oscar Wilde
"Count your age by friends, not years. Count your life by smiles, not tears." - John Lennon
"Whoever said you can"t fool an honest man wasn"t one." - Terry Pratchett
"We'll be friends forever, won't we Pooh?" asked Piglet "Even longer" Pooh answered
"When something that honest is said it usually needs a few minutes of silence to dissipate." - Pamela Ribon
"True happiness... arises, in the first place, from the enjoyment of one's self." - Joseph Addison
"Revolution is not a onetime event." - Audre Lorde
"Arranging a bowl of flowers in the morning can give a sense of quiet in a crowded day - like writing a poem, or saying a prayer." - Anne Morrow Lindbergh
"Good times must mean the stress coming soon"
"If you're contemplating suicide, my advice is go ahead and kill yourself. But don't do it with a rope or a gun or a knife or a handful of pills. Don't do it by destroying your body. Do it by cutting off your former life and going in a completely new direction." - Brad Warner
"I have never made but one prayer to God, a very short one: 'O Lord make my enemies ridiculous.' And God granted it" Voltaire
"Heroes aren't supposed to do bad things. That's what villains are for. So either the good supersedes the bad, or the bad makes it impossible to remember the good. We don't like it when such duality exists in one person. We don't want to know our heroes are human" - LZ Granderson
"The present time has one advantage over every other - it is our own." - Charles Caleb Colton
"I used to think the worst thing in life was to end up all alone, it"s not. The worst thing in life is to end up with people that make you feel all alone."Robin Williams
"I don't have low self esteem. I have low esteem for everyone else." - Daria Morgendorfer
"Blind hope is the most potent poison" - unknown
[Quote Question] Sex is the art of the common man
"Miners. Not minors!" - Galaxy Quest.
"One day i will find the right words, and they will be simple." Jack Kerouac, The Dharma Bums
"Loving you wasn't my mistake. Relying on you was."
"Defeat doesn't finish a man, quit does. A man is not finished when he's defeated. He's finished when he quits." -Richard Nixion
"The most important process underlying strokes of creative genius is cognitive disinhibitionthe tendency to pay attention to things that normally should be ignored or filtered out by attention because they appear irrelevant." -S.H. Carson
"The Way Get Started Is To Quit Talking And Begin Doing." -Walt Disney
"We sure liberated the hell out of this place."  An American soldier in the ruins of a French village in 1944
"You don"t forget the face of the person who was your last hope." - Suzanne Collins
"I never considered a difference of opinion in politics, in religion, in philosophy, as cause for withdrawing from a friend ."- Thomas Jefferson
"Focus on who you are, not how you appear, and you will appear as you are."
"Watching your daughter being collected by her date feels like handing over a million dollar Stradivarius to a gorilla."-Jim Bishop
"Focus on who you are, not how you appear, and you will appear as you are." - Me
"Anxiety is the dizziness of freedom" - Sren Kierkegaard, The Concept of Anxiety
"Anxiety is the dizziness of freedom" Sren Kierkegaard, *The Concept of Anxiety*
"I am not lucky, I am blessed."  Unknown
"In modern politics, even the leader of the free world needs help from the sultan of Facebookistan."  Rebecca Mackinnon
"The fact there is a highway to hell and a stairway to heaven says a lot about expected traffic numbers..."
"When I do good I feel good, when I do bad I feel bad, and that"s my religion." Unknown
"I wish you sunshine on your path and storms to season your journey. I wish you peace in the world in which you live... More I cannot wish you except perhaps love to make all the rest worthwhile." - Robert A. Ward
"Let tears flow of their own accord: their flowing is not inconsistent with inward peace and harmony." - Seneca
"Don't fall before you're pushed." - English Proverb
"Turbulence is life force. It is opportunity. Let's love turbulence and use it for change." - Ramsay Clark
"It's more satisfying to hear single thank-you than a lot of "sorry's."
"Plodding wins the race." - Aesop
"The reason we struggle with insecurity is because we compare our behind-the-scenes with everyone else"s highlight reel." - Steven Furtick
"In modern politics, even the leader of the free world needs help from the sultan of Facebookistan."  Rebecca Mackinnon
"The Way Get Started Is To Quit Talking And Begin Doing." -Walt Disney
0 Move my heart to yours, and you will feel how cold my world is. - Syafiq
"Trying to justify things it's like trying to justify the existence of the Universe itself..." - The Universe
"there is not a liberal America and a conservative America, there is the United States of America." -Barack Obama
"A life oriented to leisure is in the end a life oriented to death--the greatest leisure of all." --Anne Lamott
"We have grasped the mystery of the atom and rejected the Sermon and the Mount."  General Omar Bradley, 1948
"To me ignorance is such a gift. Like it just gives you an opportunity learn some shit if you're humble enough." -Arian Foster
"Love yourself first and everything else falls into line. You really have to love yourself to get anything done in this world."  Lucille Ball
"When people don't know what's going on in your life they speculate, when they think they know they fabricate, and when they do know they just hate."
"There are three kinds of fools in this world, fools proper, educated fools and rich fools. The world persists because of the folly of these fools." -Swami Narayanananda
"As for me, I am tormented by an everlasting itch for things remote. I love to sail forbidden seas, and land on barbarous coasts." - Herman Melville, Moby Dick.
"A way to a man's heart is through his stomach, that shit true as gold. You put some love in your food and a fool can taste it." - Raelle Tucker
"People only worry about the uncanny for about a week; that's the end of their attention span. After that, suspicions turn into shtick." - Scott Westerfeld
"I have made my world and it is a much better world than I ever saw outside." - Louise Nevelson
"It is wise to apply the oil of refined politeness to the mechanisms of friendship." - Colette
"Laughter is the fireworks of the soul." Josh Billings
"We all have two fates- one is the result of whatever mess you were born into and the other is the result of deciding that's just not fucking good enough"
"Wise men speak because they have something to say; fools because they have to say something." - Plato
"Anytime you're willing to provide an opinion, be ready to defend it..." - reaidstar
"First appearance deceives many." - Ovid
"Nothing worth having in this world comes easy."- Dr. Robert "Bob" Kelso of Scrubs
"Resistance is useless." - Doctor Who
[SAW IV] " You see things aren't sequential. Good doesn't lead to good nor bad to bad. People steal, don't get caught. Live the good life. Others lie, cheat and get elected."
"In our quest for the answers of life we tend to make order out of chaos, and chaos out of order." - Jeffrey Fry
"Love all trust a few do wrong to none" - William-Shakespeare
"People are all over the world telling their one dramatic story and how their life has turned into getting over this one event. Now their lives are more about the past than their future." - Chuck Palahniuk
"To pretend as human being to be a good actor,doesn't guarantee an Oscar in heaven" (William Ventura)
"Never let a corrupt lover to rule your heart" (Willian Ventura)
"The problem is not having bad times in life,the problem is having a bad person that makes you waste time" (William Ventura)
"Make your life a masterpiece; imagine no limitations on what you can be, have or do." - Brian Tracy
- New York Mayor Fiorello La Guardia on alcohol prohibition.
"What you don't do can be a destructive force." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"As a woman, I have no country. As a woman, I want no country. As a woman, my country is the whole world!" -Virginia Woolf
"Patience is not an absence of action; rather, it is timing; it waits on the right time to act, for the right principles and in the right way." -Fulton J. Sheen
"Money may be Mankind's greatest invention, but it could lead to its downfall"
"There is a strong humanitarian argument for making life multiplanetary in order to safeguard the existence of humanity." - Elon musk
"While riddles remain for me to ponder, I find I'm content to simply wander."
"If you're bored with life, if you don't get up every morning with a burning desire to do things - you don't have enough goals." -Lou Holtz
"If you search everywhere, yet cannot find what you are seeking, it is because what you seek is already in your possession." -Lao Tzu
"I do not agree with you that England and America are the two great humanitarian powers [They are] materialistic first and humanitarian only a century after." - Sir Roger Casement CMG, to E. D. Morel
"Death had to take Roosevelt sleeping, for if he had been awake, there would of been a fight." - Thomas R. Marshall
"Sometimes good things fall apart so better hints can fall together." - Marilyn Monroe
"You can't get much done in life if you only work on the days you feel good." -Jerry West
"I destroy my enemies when I make them my friends."  Abraham Lincoln
"You yourself, as much as anybody in the entire universe, deserve your love and affection"  Buddha
"Never memorize something that you can look up." - Einstein
'What Happens when you pour Dettol into a Yakukt?' - Dara O'Briain
..and even if all we'll ever be is "just friends" ..I'll still take that.
"We know truth, not only by reason, but also by the heart." - Blaise Pascal
"He harms himself who does harm to another, and the evil plan is most harmful to the planner." - Hesiod
"You are going to let the fear of poverty govern your life and your reward will be that you will eat, but you will not live." - George Bernard Shaw
"Prosperity tries the fortunate, adversity the great." - Rose Kennedy
"Trying to be cool is the easiest path to mediocrity." - Terry Crews
"Optimism is a strategy for making a better future. Because unless you believe that the future can be better, you are unlikely to step up and take responsibility for making it so." - Noam Chomsky
"The Artist is no other than he who unlearns what he has learned, in order to know himself." - E.E. Cummings
"You never know how strong you are, until being strong is your only choice." - Bob Marley
"No journalist in American history, I think, has ever had to worry about the President putting his children's lives in jeopardy." - Adam Davidson, New Yorker Journalist, Reddit AMA
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Adolf Hitler
"When we are tired, we are attacked by ideas we conquered long ago." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"If you truly love nature, you will find beauty everywhere." Vincent Van Gogh
"We only become what we are by the radical and deep-seated refusal of that which others have made of us." -Jean-Paul Sartre
"The tragedy of life is what dies in the hearts and souls of people while they live. "  Albert Einstein
"Rightful liberty is unobstructed action according to our will, within the limits drawn around us by the equal rights of others." -Thomas Jefferson
"Every time you smile at someone, it is an action of love, a gift to that person, a beautiful thing." Mother Teresa
"You really can change the world if you care enough." Marian Wright Edelman
"Peace does not mean an absence of conflicts; differences will always be there. Peace means solving these differences through peaceful means; through dialogue, education, knowledge; and through humane ways." - Dalai Lama XIV
"Just think how happy you would be if you lost everything you have right now, and then got it back again." - *Frances Rodman*
"Our destiny rules over us, even when we are not yet aware of it - it is the future that makes laws for us today."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Women hold up half the sky" - Mao Zedong
"Everything we see is a perspective, not a fact. Everything we hear is an opinion, not the truth." - Marcus Aurelius
"The true conquests, the only ones that cause no regret, are those made over ignorance."  Napoleon Bonaparte, writing to Armand-Gaston Camus.
"All we know so far is what doesn't work", Richard Feynman
"Neither fear nor courage saves us." - T.S. Eliot (Gerontion)
"My worst mistake wasn't falling for you. It was believing that you'd fallen for me too."
"I think women are foolish to pretend they are equal to men, they are far superior and always have been." - William Golding
"All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence, and then success is sure." - Mark Twain
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
1
"I can do more damage with a laptop and Wi-Fi connection than you can do with a gun and a bullet." -Me
"If you want to know what a man's like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals." - J.K. Rowling (Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire)
"What is the use of a house if you haven't got a tolerable planet to put it on?" - Henry David Thoreau (Familiar Letters)
"If we can connect in some tiny way with a human that doesn't agree with us, then maybe we won't blow up the planet." - Nancy White
"To become aware of the possibility of the search is to be onto something." - Walker Percy
"I ran the wrong kind of business, but I did it with integrity." - Sydney Biddle Barrows
"You need to breathe, and you need to be" Albert Camus
"The planet is fine. The people are fucked." - George Carlin
"Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight." - Phyllis Diller
"You need to breath, and you need to *be*
"The sick in soul insist that it is humanity that is sick, and they are the surgeons to operate on it. They want to turn the world into a sickroom. And once they get humanity strapped to the operating table, they operate on it with an ax." - Eric Hoffer
"Under an unjust rulera nation must necessarily be depraved. Will this ruler wish to have about his person, honest, enlightened, and virtuous men? No. He wants none but flatterers, approvers, imitators, slaves, base and servile souls, who conform themselves to his inclinations." - Baron D'Holbach,
"I tore myself away from the safe comfort of certainties through my love for truth - and truth rewarded me." - Simone de Beauvoir
"I've got a theory that if you give 100% all of the time, somehow things will work out in the end." - Larry Bird
"Weakness in attitude becomes Weakness in character" -Albert Einstein
"We are what we repeatedly do. Greatness then, is not an act, but a habit." - Aristotle.
"This administration intends to be candid about its errors. Without debate, without criticism, no administration and no country can succeed--and no republic can survive." -JFK
"We could ignore the existence of love,but never ignore that God exists" (William Ventura)
"Maturity is learned over the years,humility,everyday" (William Ventura)
"A drop of love is able to form oceans in a desert heart" (William Ventura)
"Like you humans say, I can feel it in my gut!" - A Mass Effect Character
"Anything that gets your blood racing is probably worth doing." - Hunter S. Thompson
"She says that selling is a sin, well so is telling young men that selling is a sin, without offering a new way to win" - Andre 3000
"They say that fools learn from their experiences while the wise learn from history. I hope you're not a fool." Ginoza Nobuchika from Psycho Pass
"We are all sleeping avatars of God, with amnesia - Philip K. Dick (The Exegesis)
"If life seems jolly rotten, there's something you've forgotten, and that's to laugh and smile and dance and sing" -Eric Idle
"Even the genius asks questions" - Tupac Shakur
"All my life, my heart has sought a thing I cannot name." - Hunter S. Thompson
"It's hard to beat a person who never gives up." - Babe Ruth
"It's so hard to forget pain, but it's even harder to remember sweetness. We have no scar to show for happiness. We learn so little from peace." - Chuck Palahniuk
"I feel like the moments that are silent, they speak volumes." - Joi McMillon
"Women hold up the other half of the sky" Thomas Sankara
"What would men be without women? Scarce, sir...mighty scarce." - Mark Twain
"A life without dreams is a journey without destination" - mine
"Talk less, smile more; Don't let them know what you're against and what you're for" - Aaron Burr
"It is impossible to learn that which one thinks one already knows." - Epictetus
"Our greatest weakness lies in giving up. The most certain way to succeed is always to try just one more time." Thomas A. Edison
'Since we have learned to die, no one can dominate us.' - Rallying call for Bangla independence against oppressive Pakistani regime, Mujibur Rahman
"When the mob gains the day, it ceases to be any longer the mob. It is then called the nation."  Napoleon to Dr. Barry O"Meara on St. Helena
"Its a fact cannot be denied: the wickedness of others becomes our own wickedness because it kindles something evil in our own hearts." -- C.G Jung
"It may be the warriors who get the glory, but it's the engineers who build societies." -B'Elanna Torres, Star Trek Voyager
"It may be the warriors who get the glory, but it's the engineers that build societies." - B'Elanna Torres, Star Trek Voyager
"Focus on the past and forget the future, focus on the future and forget the past.", Unknown
"There are people who have money and people who are rich." - Coco Chanel
"If your dreams do not scare you, they are not big enough." - Ellen Johnson Sirleaf
"When the mind has once begun to yield to the weakness of superstition, trifles impress it with the force of conviction." - Ann Radcliffe
"What helps luck is a habit of watching for opportunities, of having a patient, but restless mind, of sacrificing one's ease or vanity, of uniting a love of detail to foresight, and of passing through hard times bravely and cheerfully." - Charles Victor Cherbuliez
"Shut out all of your past except that which will help you weather your tomorrows." - Sir William Osler
"Waste not fresh tears over old griefs." - Euripides
"Today is cruel, tommorow is crueler.And the day after tommorow is beautiful."
"Today is cruel, tommorow is crueler.And the day after tommorow is beautiful."
"Success isn"t overnight. It"s when everyday you get a little better than the day before. It all adds up."  Dwayne Johnson
"I have the illusion of free will, and I am happy to live in that illusion than in the knowledge that I don't" -Neil D Tyson, 2017
"Give me your tired, your poor, your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, the wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tossed to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!"- "The New Colossus"
"You can't get much done in life if you only work on the days you feel good." -Jerry West
"Of all sad words of mouth or pen, the saddest are these: it might have been."  John Greenleaf Whittier
"Sometimes is not enough to have wings to fly,if we don't know the distance or the final destination" (William Ventura )
"A few lovers, in battle side by side, would conquer all the world." - Plato
"Treat these remains with care; some of them are fragile and all of them are irreplaceable." - The Human Bone Manual, Tim D. White
"The need to be right is the sign of a vulgar mind." - Albert Camus
"Poor Silas, so concerned for other folk, And nothing to look backward to with pride, And nothing to look forward to with hope, So now and never any different." - The Death of the Hired Man, Robert Frost
"A person often meets his destiny on the road he took to avoid it." - Unknown
"Today is always here. Tomorrow, never." - Beloved, Toni Morrison
"He filled the air with words, terrified of silence, as one often is who is smart enough to recognise his many personal failings, but unwilling or unable to take the steps required to fix them."  One Trick Pony
"I"m just I know what it"s like, to be on a single track, to feel compelled to keep going forward. It isn"t easy, to disappoint the people you care about, but sometimes it comes down to doing that or doing what they want and being unhappy." - Parahumans
"Everyone likes the manipulative assholes after they"ve had a chance to do their manipulating." - Rachel (Parahumans)
"When you have an established church nobody takes religion as seriously as we do here. We have a free market in religion. The religious groups are competing with each other. Maybe our Founding Fathers made a big mistake. Maybe we should have had an established church." - Eric Foner
"They hate you if you're clever and they despise a fool." - John Lennon
"Because there's a big difference between living and surviving."
"A life spent making mistakes is not only more honorable, but more useful than a life spent doing nothing." -- George Bernard Shaw
'Life, like a child, laughs, shaking its rattle of death as it runs.'- Rabindranath Tagore
"The world is indeed full of peril, and in it there are many dark places; but still there is much that is fair, and though in all lands love is now mingled with grief, it grows perhaps the greater." -Lord of the Rings, J.R.R. Tolkien
"I'm not a bath man myself. More of a cologne man." -Homer Simpson
'Life, like a child' laughs, shaking its rattle of death as it runs.' - Rabindranath Tagore
"Evil masquerading as dumb is the form of evil that gets furthest" - Rudolf P Belmar
"The way you tell your story to yourself matters." - Amy Cuddy
"Two things define you. Your patience when you have nothing, and your attitude when you have everything". - Unknown
"Whatever one of us blames in another, each one will find in his own heart." - Seneca
"Discrimination is similar to saying the fruit from the south side is sweeter than the north side of the same tree."
"There can be no progress without head-on confrontation." -Christopher Hitchens
"I think part of the reason why we hold on so tight is because we fear something great won't happen twice."
"I gave you my everything and you couldn't even give me your time."
"Never lose yourself in the process of loving someone else."
"Life is not measured by the number of breaths we take, but by the moments that take our breath away." - Anonymous
"It had only been my repeated experience that when you said to life calmly and firmly... 'I trust you; do what you must,' life had an uncanny way of responding to your need." - Olga Ilyin
"You don't have to die in order to make a living." - Lynn Johnston
"Poetry often enters through the window of irrelevance." - M. C. Richards
"If people only knew how powerful their thoughts were, they'd never think a negative thought again" -CAVM
"It is well to think well; it is divine to act well." - Horace Mann
"Stop your nonsense and drink your whiskey." - President Zachary Taylor
"One thing my pops always told me is you never count another man's money. It's what you've got and how you take care of it. And if I'm complaining about $44 million over four years, then I've got other issues in my life." - Steph Curry
"There's no happiness so heavy that you would be crushed by it." - Koyomi Araragi
[Q] Origin of quote?
"Both optimists and pessimists contribute to society. The optimist invents the aeroplane, the pessimist the parachute." - George Bernard Shaw
"If you try to imitate someone else, you'll be, at best, second best"--Coach K
"Facts are lonely things." -- Don DeLillo
"Following through leads to conviction. Conviction leads to strength and strength leads to grace" - Davy C Watkins
'If you don't like what's being said, change the conversation.' - Don Draper
"They put their trust in popular bards and take the mob for their teacher, unaware that most people are bad, and few are good." -Heraclitus of Ephesus
"There used to be days that I thought I was okay, or at least that I was going to be. We'd be hanging out somewhere and everything would just fit right and I would think 'it will be okay if it can just be like this forever' but of course nothing can ever stay just how it is forever."-Nina LaCour
"Know God, No Fear. No God, Know Fear." - Dead Space
'Verily, whoever possesses little is that much less possessed: praised be a moderate poverty!' Thus Spoke Zarathustra, Nietzsche
"It is most certain young bodies may die, but old ones must out of necessity."  James VI of Scotland.
"Only I can change my life.No one can do it for me " Carol Burnett
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"The secret of getting ahead is getting started."-Mark Twain
"It is better to remain silent at the risk of being thought of as a fool, than to speak and remove all doubt of it." - Maurice Switzer
"We don't become a monster to get rid of a monster."
"Absence is to love what wind is to fire; it extinguishes the small, it inflames the great." - Roger de Rabutin de Bussy
"I don't want to wait till it gets better. I just dont want anything at all."
"It is better to light a candle than curse the darkness." -- Eleanor Roosevelt
"Success is going from failure to failure without losing your enthusiasm." -Winston Churchill
"Everything that exists is in a manner the seed of that which will be." -Marcus Aurelius
"Setting goals is the first step in turning the invisible into the visible." Tony Robbins
" Past behaviour is the best predictor of future behaviour ". - mark twain
"If I have learnt anything, it is that life forms no logical patterns. It is haphazard and full of beauties which I try to catch as they fly by, for who knows whether any of them will ever return?" - Margot Fonteyn
"It seems to me that people have vast potential. Most people can do extraordinary things if they have the confidence or take the risks. Yet most people don't. They sit in front of the telly and treat life as if it goes on forever." - Philip Adams
"Be ashamed to die until you have won some victory for humanity." - Horace Mann
"Eat breakfast like a king, lunch like a prince, and dinner like a pauper." - Adelle Davis
"The devil doesn't come dressed in a red cape and pointy horns... he comes as everything you've ever wished for."
"Trusting is hard. Knowing who to trust, even harder" - Maria V. Snyder
"The secret of happiness is something to do." - John Burroughs
"The trouble is, you think you have time."  Buddha
"America is the land of the free. Unless you are non-white, a woman, gay, an immigrant, or of the lower class."
"Time is the enemy of the privileged few. Cost is the enemy of the masses." - Wendover Productions
"It might take a day, it might take a year. But what's meant to be will always find its way."  Unknown
"Do What Thou WIlt Right Now"
"Fake it until you make it! Act as if you had all the confidence you require until it becomes your reality." - Brain Tracy
"Dear Americans, Stop making your military so damn huge and give people medicine and education because you're sick and stupid. Thanks, God"
"Nostalgia is a product of dissatisfaction and rage. It's a settling of grievances between the present and the past." - Don DeLillo
"A true master is an eternal student." -Master Yi, The Wuju swordsman.
"You will eventually have a deep security when you begin to do what you want." -- Natalie Goldberg
"Reality is that which, when you stop believing in it, doesn't go away." - Philip K. Dick
"Great minds discuss ideas; average minds discuss events; small minds discuss people." -- Eleanor Roosevelt
"Those who have least to do are generally the most busy people in the world." -Samuel Richardson
"Those who have the least to do are generally the most busy people in the world." -Samuel Richardson
"In the first place, God made idiots. That was for practice. Then he made school boards." - Mark Twain
"Be ashamed to die until you have won some victory for humanity" -Horace Mann
"Beauty is power; a smile is its sword." - John Ray
"Faith. In faith there is light enough to see, but darkness enough to blind." -Blackbeard (from Pirates of the Caribbean)
"We should not give up and we should not allow the problem to defeat us." - anonymous
"The secret of getting ahead is getting started" - anonymous
"In order to succeed, we must first believe that we can."
'This world, eternally imperfect, image of an eternal contradiction and the imperfect image - a drunken image for its imperfect creator.' - Thus Spoke Zarathustra, Nietzsche
"Life moves pretty fast. You don"t stop and look around once in a while, you could miss it." -Ferris Bueller
"I've been pretending my whole life. Pretending I don't mind, pretending I belong. My life's built on it. And it's a good life; it's the life I've always wanted. But then I came here, and I get a glimpse for a second of a life in which I don't have to pretend..."
"I doubt you've ever dared to love anybody that much" - Sean Maguire; Good Will Hunting
"And that's when I know it's over. As soon as you start thinking about the beginning, it's the end." - Junot Daz, This Is How You Lose Her
"A true lover always feels in debt to the one he loves." - Ralph W. Sockman
"Where there is love there is life." Mahatma Gandhi
"Too many people overvalue what they are not and undervalue what they are." - Malcolm S. Forbes
"When weight loss becomes a goal in your life, eating right and exercising are just two pieces of the puzzle. Figuring out why you've put on the extra weight is the hardest part." - Ali Vincent
"On a long enough timeline. The survival rate for everyone drops to zero." - Chuck Palahniuk
"Take the attitude of a student, never be too big to ask questions, never know too much to learn something new." - Og Mandino
"When you drink the water, remember the spring." - Chinese Proverb
"We"re here for such a short period of time. Live like you"re already dead, man. Have a good time. Do your best. Let it all come ripping right through you." - Jeff Bridges
"Never interrupt someone doing what you said couldn't be done." - Amelia Earhart
"So many books, so little time." Frank Zappa
"Rules are for the guidance of wise men and the obedience of fools." -Sir Douglas Bader
"So next time someone complains that you have made a mistake, tell him that may be a good thing. Because without imperfection, neither you nor I would exist"- Stephen Hawking.
"It does not depend on what kind of paper you drop into the ballot-box once a year, but on what kind of man you drop from your chamber into the street every morning." Henry David Thoreau
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind."-Bernard M. Baruch
"What you're going through isn't seen as an obstacle until they go through it themselves."
"Perfection will alway be imperfect, for things can always be better, and only once one has come to this realization can one truly reach their highest potential." -Me (as far as I know I came up with this myself)
"these homos were high as kites"-the miseducation of cameron post,Emily M. Danforth
"Two roads diverged in a wood, and I I took the one less traveled by, And that has made all the difference." - Robert Frost
"People create the reality they need in order to discover themselves." - Ernest Becker
"They will bow to my Scandinavian greatness. For the power of the norse is truly immense."
"It's not worth doing something unless you were doing something that someone, somewhere, would much rather you weren't doing." - Terry Pratchett
"I care not what others think of what I do, but I care very much about what I think of what I do!" -Theodore Roosevelt
"When the suffering of another creature causes you to feel pain, do not submit to the initial desire to flee from the suffering one; on the contrary, come closer, as close as you can to him who suffers, and try to help."  Leo Tolstoy
"LSD burst over the dreary domain of the constipated bourgeoisie like the angelic herald of a new psychedelic millennium. We have never been the same since, nor will we ever be, for LSD demonstrated, even to skeptics..." Terence McKenna
"LSD burst over the dreary domain of the constipated bourgeoisie like the angelic herald of a new psychedelic millennium. We have never been the same since, nor will we ever be, for LSD demonstrated, even to skeptics..." Terence McKenna
"Do not pity the dead, Harry. Pity the living, and above all, those who live without love." -Albus Dumbldore
"Do not pity the dead, Harry. Pity the living, and above all, those who love without love." - Albus Dumbledore
"Put your heart, mind, and soul into even your smallest acts. This is the secret of success."-Swami Sivananda
``The presence of those seeking the truth is infinitely to be preferred to the presence of those who think they've found it'' - Terry Pratchett.
"During the daily peak viewing periods, television in the main insulates us from the realities of the world in which we live. If this state of affairs continues, we may alter an advertising slogan to read: Look now, pay later." - Edward R. Murrow, 1958
"Every burden is a blessing."-Walt Kelly
"I feel so much sometimes to the point of feeling nothing at all." - Christopher Poindexter
"You don't look out there for God, something in the sky, you look in you." - Alan Watts
"The mistake is thinking that there can be an antidote to the uncertainty." -David Levithan
"And sometimes you just want to escape reality. Not because you hate people, but because you're tired."
"Being weird is essential to success; I'd rather be strangely wealthy than commonly poor."
"Like anyone else, there are days I feel beautiful and days I don't, and when I don't, I do something about it." - Cheryl Tiegs
"The whole life of man is but a point of time; let us enjoy it." - Plutarch
"If we have the opportunity to be generous with our hearts, ourselves, we have no idea of the depth and breadth of love's reach." - Margaret Cho
"The art of war is simple enough. Find out where your enemy is. Get at him as soon as you can. Strike him as hard as you can, and keep moving on." - Ulysses S. Grant
"Let it come, let it be, let it go."  Kalidasa
"Let it come, let it be, let it go."  Kuladasa
"Then from on high, somewhere in the distance, there's a voice that calls, "Remember who you are." - Bryan Adams, from "Sound the Bugle"
"How easy to be amiable in the midst of happiness and success." - William Ellery Channing
"People should fall in love with their eyes closed."  Andy Warhol
"Gossip! Gossip! All these people are capable of nothing but gossip!" Francisco de Miranda, colonel of Spain's army, Marshal of the French, colonel of the Russian army (granted by Catherine the Great), Generalsimo of Venezuela
"The purpose of life is to discover your gift. The work of life is to develop it. The meaning of life is to give your gift away." - David S. Viscott
"The fact is that any of us could die today. Right now. So everything after this moment is a gift."  Joshua F. Millburn
"If there's one thing I know about women, it's that they have vaginas." - J. Richard Singleton
"A man who procrastinates his choosing will inevitably have his choice made for him by circumstance" - Hunter S. Thompson
"If you have come here to help me, you are wasting your time. But if you have come because your liberation is bound up with mine, then let us work together." - Lilla Watson
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." -Dr. Seuss
"The only bad thing about being faster than light is that you always live in the dark" - Sanic
"I think that no more absurd scheme could be invented for settling national difficulties than the one we are engaged in - killing each other to find out who is in the right." - Robert Anderson
"Life isn't a support system for art. It's the other way around." - Stephen King
"What doesn't kill you ... makes you wish it had"
"The soul would have no rainbow had the eyes no tears." - John Vance Cheney
'Just remember, the moment you disrespect a motorbike you're riding, it will f'kin kill you for it'. My motorbike instructor's final words on my last lesson.
"That men do not learn very much from the lessons of history is the most important of all the lessons of history." - Aldous Huxley
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Putting yourself before others doesn't make you selfish, it makes you wise."
"No matter how hard the past, you can always begin again." - Buddha
'Life is like a coin. You can spend it any way you wish, but you only spend it once' - Lillian Dickson
"The secret ingredient of my secret ingredient soup is... NOTHING" - Mr. Ping
"He"s the angriest man you"ll ever meet. He"s like a man with a fork in a world of soup." - Noel Gallagher.
"Live in the present. Focus on the here and now, and let tomorrow take care of itself." about Peter Sagan
"I would suggest to you that I think it"s interesting that a lot of these guys -- this continues to seem to be much more of a partisan thing that we"ve seen over and over again. As I think I"ve mentioned from the -- this continues to be a question of there"s no there there." - Sean Spicer
"Everything that irritates us about others can lead us to a better understanding of ourselves." - Carl Jung
"For me, it's that I contributed, ... That I'm on this planet doing some good and making people happy. That's to me the most important thing, that my hour of television is positive and upbeat and an antidote for all the negative stuff going on in life." - Ellen DeGeneres
"Success is liking yourself, liking what you do, and liking how you do it." - Maya Angelou
"He who every morning plans the transaction of the day and follows out that plan, carries a thread that will guide him through the maze of the most busy life. But where no plan is laid, where the disposal of time is surrendered merely to the chance of incidence, chaos will soon reign." - Victor Hugo
"Every burden is a blessing." - Walt Kelly
"You're never as good as everyone tells you when you win, and you're never as bad as they say when you lose." - Lou Holtz
"We are alive in amazing times. Delicate hearts. Diabolical minds. Revelations. Hatred. Love. and War. More and more and more and more. And more of less than ever before. It's just too much more for your mind to absorb." Mos Def
"I was angry with my friend, I told my wrath: my wrath did end. I was angry with my foe, I told it not: my wrath did grow." (full poem inside)
"No one with power likes democracy and that is why every generation must struggle to win it and keep it. Including you and me. Here and Now." Tony Benn (April 3, 1925 - March 14, 2014) British writer, orator, and politician
"The thing's you own, end up owning you"
"For me, poop has been a lifelong work in progress!" - Sir Patrick Stewart
"I have now decided to recuse myself," he said, adding: "I should not be involved in investigating a campaign I had a role in."
"The problem with freedom is that it entails responsibility" - Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Sometimes we have thoughts that even we don"t understand. Thoughts that aren"t even true; that aren"t really how we feel, but they"re running through our heads anyway because they"re interesting to think about."  Jay Asher, "Thirteen Reasons Why", (2007)
"Sometimes we have thoughts that even we don"t understand. Thoughts that aren"t even truethat aren"t really how we feelbut they"re running through our heads anyway because they"re interesting to think about."  Jay Asher, "Thirteen Reasons Why", (2007)
"Real knowledge is to know the extent of one's ignorance." -Confucius
"For if the stars desert you, the enormous measure of your long cock will make no difference." Juvenal (c.55 - 127 AD) Satire 9.33-34
"Fifty years from now everything you put on my resume will be sand. The joy comes from the doing of it. On my deathbed, I would say ... I've been wonderfully successful in discovering today what will matter in the future tomorrow."--Ron Shaich, (Founder Au Bon Pain and Panera Bread)
"A formidable sinister interest may always obtain the complete command of a dominant assembly by some chance and for a moment, and it is therefore of great use to have a second chamber of an opposite sort, differently composed, in which that interest in all likelihood will not rule." Walter Bagehot,
"Universe is 14 billion years old. Seems silly to celebrate one year. Be like having a parade every time I take a piss."  Sam Halpern
"Your work is not what gives you your food, it's what gives you your hunger." Lucien Zell
"Dig till you find the root of your problem. Then you know what to ignore." Discordian Quotes
"Taking steps is easy. Standing still is hard." - Regina Spektor
"I never actually hated you, I just hated myself for thinking you'd love me back, for thinking you'd love me the way I loved you."
"Look at us. Look at what they make you give." - Jason Bourne
``Which is it, is man one of God's blunders or is God one of man's?'' -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Life is a shit sandwich. But if you"ve got enough bread, you don"t taste the shit." Jonathan Winters
"I never thought I'd find an answer at the bottom of a pint glass" - Robert Angier
"It is better to play than do nothing" Confucius
"I am fond of pigs. Dogs look up to us. Cats look down on us. Pigs treat us as equals." - Winston Churchill
"What's that word again? They call it life, oh yes, that a human feels so deep So if this is life then why don't we cry when anguish is tearing all our hearts out" - Jubyphonic, English translation of Jitter Doll
"Travel is fatal to prejudice, bigotry, and narrow-mindedness, and many of our people need it sorely on these accounts. Broad, wholesome, charitable views of men and things cannot be acquired by vegetating in one little corner of the earth all one's lifetime." -Mark Twain
"People never lie so much as after a hunt, during a war or before an election." - Otto von Bismarck
"The man who does not read good books has no advantage over the man who cannot read them." - Mark Twain
"Men can only be highly civilised whilst other men, inevitably less civilised, are there to guard and feed them." - George Orwell
"The ability to quote is a serviceable substitute for wit." - W. Somerset Maugham
"The wise man does at once what the fool does finally" - Niccolo Machiavelli
"Nothing in this world can take the place of persistence. Talent will not... Genius will not... Education will not... Persistence and determination alone are omnipotent." - Calvin Coolidge
" What the little girl watching those commercials didn"t know is that you don"t have to be rich to be a humanitarian. You don"t have to be rich to help somebody." - Rihanna
"The general root of superstition: namely, that men observe when things hit, and not when they miss; and commit to memory the one, and forget and pass over the other." - Sir Francis Bacon
"When you sit with a nice girl for two hours, you think it's only a minute. But when you sit on a hot stove for a minute, you think it's two hours. That's relativity." - Albert Einstein
"The most beautiful thing we can experience is the mysterious. It is the source of all true art and all science. He to whom this emotion is a stranger, who can no longer pause to wonder and stand rapt in awe, is as good as dead: his eyes are closed." - Albert Einstein
"Be ashamed to die"
"Man cannot discover new oceans unless he has the courage to lose sight of the shore." - Andre Gide
"Suppressing the fear of death makes it all the stronger. The point is only to...
"Another well-known Paris landmark is the Arc de Triomphe, a moving monument to the many brave women and men who have died trying to visit it." Dave Barry
"When I make up my mind to do a thing it stays made up." - L. M. Montgomery
"Isn't everyone a part of everyone else?" - Budd Schulberg
"The only gift is a portion of thyself." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Believe in yourself! Have faith in your abilities! Without a humble but reasonable confidence in your own powers you cannot be successful or happy" - Norman Vincent Peale
"Man that is born of a woman hath but a short time to live, and is full of misery. He cometh up, and is cut down, like a flower; he fleeth as it were a shadow, and ne'er continueth in one stay." The Book of Common Prayer, 1622
"War is young men dying and old men talking" - Odysseus
"Nothing endures but change." - Heraclitus
"You need to take two slices of bread and stick them on your ears. Now you've got an idiot sandwich" - Gordon Ramsey
"This is the story of a society on its way down. And as it falls, it keeps telling itself: "So far so good. So far so good. So far so good." How you fall doesn't matter. It's how you land." La Haine
"The happiness of one's life depends upon the quality of one's thoughts" - Marcus Aurelius
"Life goes on"
"Never let your sense of morals prevent you from doing what is right." - Issac Asimov
"When you start seeing your worth, you will find it harder to stay around people who don't."  Unknown
"Reading, after a certain age, diverts the mind too much from its creative pursuits. Any man who read too much and uses his own brain too little falls into lazy habits of thinking." - Albert Einstein
"Long you live and high you fly / And smiles you'll give and tears you'll cry / And all you touch and all you see / Is all your life will ever be." - Pink Floyd
"Sometimes you just need a car ride to clear out your head" -John F. Kennedy
"So do all who live to see such times but that is not for them to decide. All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given to us." -Gandalf
``It is better to be violent, if there is violence in our hearts, than to put on the cloak of nonviolence to cover impotence. '' Mahatma Gandhi
"How lucky am I to have something that makes saying goodbye hard."  Winnie the Pooh
"The bird who dares to fall is the bird who learns to fly"
"Only I can change my life. No one can do it for me." Carol Burnett
"We must never touch our idols: the gilt comes off on our hands" - Flaubert, Madame Bovary
"'Cumberbatch.' It sounds like a fart in a bath, doesn't it? What a fluffy old name." -Benedict Cumberbatch
"A band trying to make music that everyone in the world likes is a shitty band." -Damian Kulash (OKGo)
"It's the blessing of having a weird face- somewhere between an otter and something people find vaguely attractive." -Benedict Cumberbatch
"The woman who follows the crowd will usually go no further than the crowd. The woman who walks alone is likely to find herself in places no one has ever been before." - Albert Einstein
'Linux is not freeWARE, Linux is like freedom, Freedom has no price.'
"When people take themselves too seriously and believe too much in their own bullshit, they usually get in trouble" - Rick Danko (The Band)
"In the councils of government we must guard against the acquisition of unwarranted influence, whether sought or unsought, of the military-industrial complex." Dwight Eisenhower
"There are some who've forgotten why we have a military. It's not to promote war, it's to be prepared for peace." - Ronald Reagan
"Plant a garden in which strange plants grow and mysteries bloom!" Ken Kesey
"Write a book so god that they make a movie out of it, But don't write it too good that the movie flops!"
"Write a Book so good that they make a Movie out of it, but dont write it too good that tge Movie Flops"
"You either smile, you cry, you live, or you die." - Unknown
" Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent. Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent. Is he both able and willing? Then whence cometh evil? Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God? " Epicurus
"Heartache is a bitch. But you know what's worse? Catching fire while BBQ'ing drunk. It's no contest." Ron Burgandy, Anchorman Soundtrack
"You know you love a person when you feel homesick for them."
"As an empty ship without ballast is tossed and tumbled on the sea with the least blast of wind, even so is it with a light wandering mind, not kept steady and poised with the ballast of reason."  Justus Lipsius, On Constancy
"I look forward to an america in which commands respect throughout the world, not only for its strength, but for its civilization as well. And I look forward to a world in which we will be safe not only for democracy and diversity but also for personal distinction." - John F. Kennedy
"Failure meant a stripping away of the inessential. I stopped pretending to myself that I was anything other than I was and began diverting all my energy into finishing the only work that mattered to me." - J. K. Rowling
"If you would thoroughly know anything, teach it to others." - Tryon Edwards
"Climb the mountains and get their good tidings. Nature's peace will flow into you as sunshine flows into trees. The winds will blow their own freshness into you, and the storms their energy, while cares will drop away from you like the leaves of Autumn." - John Muir
"Never give advice in a crowd." - Pope Paul VI
"If you never get rid of the wrong friends, you will never meet the right friends" -Joel Olsteen
"Go as far as you can see; when you get there you'll be able to see farther." - Thomas Carlyle
"There is only one thing that makes a dream impossible to achieve: the fear of failure." - Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"No man has a good enough memory to be a successful liar." - Abraham Lincoln
"The hardest thing about psychotherapy is that the psychologist offers instruments for the patient to sterilizes his wounds by himself ."
"The further a society drifts from the truth, the more it will hate those who speak it." -George Orwell
"The bad guys need to get lucky every time. The good guys just need to get lucky once." Steve Murphy (Narcos)
"Wisdom is the reward for a lifetime of listening ... when you'd have preferred to talk."  D.J. Kaufman
"Those who make peaceful revolution impossible will make violent revolution inevitable." -John F. Kennedy
"What to do with a mistake: Recognize it. Admit it. Learn from it. Forget it." - Dean Smith
"The fascists of the future will call themselves the anti-fascists" - Michael Scott
"We march to victory, or we march to defeat. But we go forward. Only forward."--Stannis Baratheon, *Game of Thrones*
"It's not enough to be busy, so are the ants. The question is: What are we busy about?" Henry David Thoreau
"The more powerful and original a mind, the more it will incline towards the religion of solitude." Aldous Huxley
"My philosophy is worrying means you suffer twice." -Newt Scamander
"Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities." - Voltaire
"He lives below the senseless stars and writes his meanings in them." - Thomas Wolfe
"In order to be irreplaceable one must always be different." -Coco Chanel
"You must never give into despair. Allow yourself to slip down that road and you surrender yourself to your lowest instincts." - Uncle Iroh, ATOL
"You are young and life is long and there is time to kill today" -Pink Floyd
"The absence of failure is not equivalent to success, but the absence of success is not equivalent to failure. It is our purpose to strike the right balance." - My football Coach
"Yet such is oft the course of deeds that move the wheels of the world: small hands do them because they must, while the eyes of the great are elsewhere." -Lord of the Rings, J.R.R. Tolkien
"Don't put your finger where you wouldn't put your willy."-Unknown
"Don't put your finger where you wouldn't put your silly"-Unknown
"Those who deny freedom to others deserve it not for themselves" Abraham Lincoln
"A man's ethical behavior should be based effectually on sympathy, education, and social ties; no religious basis is necessary. Man would indeed be in a poor way if he had to be restrained by fear of punishment and hope of reward after death." - Albert Einstein
"I even rush to meet the needs of my enemy" - Imam Sadiq
"One day, you will wake up and there won't be any more time to do the things you've always wanted. Do It Now." -Paulo Coelho
"And one day you realize, everybody loves you, but no body likes you"
"The right time is any time that one is still so lucky as to have." Henry James
"You will need to find your passion. Don't give up on finding it because then all you're doing is waiting for the Reaper." - Randy Pausch
"To live a creative life, we must lose our fear of being wrong." - Joseph Chilton Pearce
"One kernel is felt in a hogshead; one drop of water helps to swell the ocean; a spark of fire helps to give light to the world. None are too small, too feeble, too poor to be of service. Think of this and act." - Hannah More
"Music has charms to soothe the savage breast / To soften rocks, or bend a knotted oak." - William Congreve
"Sometimes you win, and sometimes you learn." -Robert Kiyosaki
"In my moments of doubt, I've told myself firmly: If not me, who? If not now, when?" Emma Watson
"It's what you learn after you know it all that counts." - John Wooden
"We are just an advanced breed of monkeys on a minor planet of a very average star. But we can understand the Universe. That makes us something very special." - Stephen Hawking
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"And if I asked you to name all of the things you love, how long would it take for you to name yourself?"
"It is not the strongest of the species that survive, nor the most intelligent, but the one most responsive to change." Charles Darwin
"How fortunate for leaders that men do not think" Adolf Hitler
"Stop thinking about what you should do and start thinking about what you can do because what should be done usually requires more resources than you have at your disposal." - Annonymous
"We LOVED with a LOVE that was more than LOVE." - Edgar Allan Poe.
"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal." - Albert Camus
''Show me a good loser and I'll show you a loser'' - Alan Johnson
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man"s character, give him power." -- Abraham Lincoln
"It's one for all and all for me." -Stingy from LazyTown
"Being an idiot is okay sometimes." -Shane Kippel
"People will show you who they are, but we ignore it because we want them to be who we want them to be."  Don Draper
"I would rather have questions that can't be answered, than answers that can't be questioned." - Richard Feynman
"I learned that every mortal will taste death, but only some will taste life." -Rumi
"You are remembered for the rules you break."-- Douglas MacArthur
"When a person tells you that you hurt them, you don't get to decide that you didn't." -Louis C.K.
"We live in a country where if you want to go bomb somebody, there"s remarkably little discussion about how much it might cost. But when you have a discussion about whether or not we can assist people who are suffering, then suddenly we become very cost-conscious." - Prof. Andrew Bacevich
"Most people, when directly confronted with proof that they are wrong, do not change their point of view or course of action but justify it even more tenaciously. Politicians, of course, offer the most visible, and often tragic, examples of this practice." -Carol Travis and Elliot Aronson
"I"m not upset that you lied to me, I"m upset that from now on I can"t believe you."  Friedrich Nietzsche
"Do the thing you think you cannot do." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Reality Is That Which, When You Stop Believing In It, Doesn"t Go Away" --Phililp K. Dick
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." George Bernard Shaw
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate only love can do that" - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Who then is invincible? The one who cannot be upset by anything outside their reasoned choice."  Epictetus
"The easiest way in the world to alienate me is to tell me not to do something, or tell me I can't do something. I'll rip you to shreds." - Patrick Deuel
"Try not to become a person of success, but rather try to become a person of value." --Albert Einstein
"The quality of American life is an insult to the possibilities of human growth." - Susan Sontag
"Its not feeling alone that hurts me, its expecting you to be with me that does."
"Marriage is the first payment on a divorce" -Big Mike
"Yes" and "No" are one of the shortest words but require the most time to think
"Observe Everything. / Communicate Well. / Draw, Draw, Draw." - Frank Thomas
"How do you define God? Like this. A God I could understand, at least potentially, was infinitely more interesting and relevant than one that defied comprehension." - Robert J. Sawyer
"Count not him among your friends who will retail your privacies to the world." - Publilius Syrus
"Out of the strain of the Doing, / Into the peace of the Done." - Julia Louise Woodruff
"Education is our passport to the future, for tomorrow belongs to the people who prepare for it today."
"The play seems out for an almost infinite run. Don't mind a little thing like the actors fighting. The only I worry about is the sun. We'll be all right if nothing goes wrong with the lighting." - Robert Frost
"No matter how safe you think you are, anything can happen to you and that's interesting..." - Sir Arthur William Victoria
"At times I think and at times I am." - Paul Valery
"I brought you into this world and I can take you out." -Mom *jokingly waving her fist at me*
"Through readiness and discipline, we are the masters of our fate."  Bill Paxton
"One, remember to look up at the stars and not down at your feet. Two, never give up work. Work gives you meaning and purpose and life is empty without it. Three, if you are lucky enough to find love, remember it is there and don't throw it away." - Stephen Hawking
"The real world is where the monsters are." - Rick Riordan, The Lightning Thief
"What strange phenomena we find in a great city, all we need do is stroll about with our eyes open. Life swarms with innocent monsters." - Charles Baudelaire
"Survival Can Be Summed Up In Three Words - Never Give Up. That's The Heart of It Really. Just Keep Trying." - Bear Grylls
"I could pick up the telephone, and in 25 minutes, 70 million people would be dead." - Richard Nixon, alluding to his newfound power to nuke the USSR
"I want to be alone with someone else who wants to be alone."  Dimitri Zaik
"What's your greatest ambition?" "To become immortal, and then die." Jean-Luc Godard, Breathless, 1960
"Time is a river which sweeps me along, but I am the river; it is a tiger which destroys me, but I am the tiger; it is a fire which consumes me, but I am the fire." -Borges
"The great only appear great because we are on our knees" - Jim Larkin
" To see the world, things dangerous to come to, to see behind walls, draw closer, to find each other, and to feel. That is the purpose of life." - The Secret Life of Walter Mitty.
" To see the world, things dangerous to come to, to see behind walls, draw closer, to find each other, and to feel. That is the purpose of life." - The Secret Life of Walter Mitty.
"I was so tired of speaking so I stayed quiet."
"Fire tests gold, suffering tests brave men." - Seneca
"Only after disaster can we be resurrected ." - Tyler Durden
"You may delay, but time will not." Benjamin Franklin
"Those who deny freedom to others deserve it not for themselves" -- Abraham Lincoln
"Its not always you're fault. Others actions are a reflection of them, not you."
"You can hurt me and I'll understand. You can tear me apart and I'll understand. I can leave you'll understand."
"Name me an Emperor who was ever struck by a cannonball?" - Charles V Emperor of Spain, Holy Roman Empire, Hamburg of the Netherlands, basically ruled all Europe.
"A joyful life is an individual creation that cannot be copied from a recipe." - Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi
"Science arose from poetry--when times change the two can meet again on a higher level as friends." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"What we truly and earnestly aspire to be, that in some sense, we are. The mere aspiration, by changing the frame of the mind, for the moment realizes itself." - Anna Jameson
"Americans are overreachers; overreaching is the most admirable of the many American excesses." - George F. Will
"You must be the change you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Give the gift of your absence to those who don't appreciate your presence."
"The world breaks everyone, and afterward, some are strong at the broken places." - Ernest Hemingway
"If there"s one thing I"ve learned from dealing with politicians over the years, it"s that the ONLY thing guaranteed to force them into action is the press  or, more specifically, fear of the press." ---Donald J.Trump/Art of the Deal
"Comfort is a trick your mind plays to keep you from progressing. Branch out and grow, try new things, fail and learn from your mistakes. You'll thank me when you die happy." - James Harvey
"The saddest thing about betrayal is that it never comes from your enemies."
"Comfort is a trick your mind plays to keep you from progressing. Branch out and grow, try new things, fail and learn from your mistakes. You'll thank me when you die happy instead of wondering what if." - James Harvey
"Comfort is a trick your mind plays to keep you from progressing. Branch out and grow, try new things, fail and learn from your mistakes. You'll thank me when you die happy." - James Harvey
"Comfort is a trick your mind plays to keep you from progressing. Branch out and grow, try new things, fail and learn. You'll thank me when you die happy." - James Harvey
"the press can take care of itself quite nicely, and a president should be able to take care of himself as well" - President Ronald Reagan at his final White House Correspondence Dinner
"The greatest pleasure in life is doing what people say you cannot do."  Walter Bagehot
"I am a great believer in luck, and I find the harder I work the more I have of it" - Stephen Leacock
"I don't hate you. I hate myself from expecting too much from you. I hate myself for relying on you."
"Over the past century the expert has dethroned the educated generalist to become the sole model of intellectual accomplishment." - Liz Coleman TED Talk: A call to reinvent liberal arts education
"Don't make someone your priority if you're just their option."
"True evil are those who use the weak for their own gain, then crush them underfoot when they're through." - Jotaro Kujo
"States rights are like bible verses - you only use the ones you like and ignore the rest." - anon
"America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves." - Abraham Lincoln
"Those who would urge you to live fully before you've decided what living fully would actually entail are your enemy." - Dissin' Franchised Youth
"Prepare to be emancipated from your own inferior genes!" - Abradolf Lincler
"It is a curious subject of observation and inquiry, whether hatred and love be not the same thing at bottom." -Nathanial Hawthorne
"The fact that you are not yet where you want to be should be enough motivation."
"Your 'I can' is more important than your IQ"- Robin Sharma
"In nations composed of both cultured and uncultured elements, the uncultured will govern because it is their habit to attack and resolve doubts with their fists in cases where the cultured have failed in the art of governing." -Jos Mart
"Do not forget that, together with the Chinese, Albanians make up one quarter of the world's population" -Enver Hoxha (former leader of Albania)
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." Mahatma Gandhi
"Man needs difficulties in life because they are necessary to enjoy the success."
"Don"t read success stories, you will only get a message. Read failure stories, you will get some ideas to get success".A.J.Kalam
"Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false, and by the rulers as useful." -Seneca
"All of us do not have equal talent. But , all of us have an equal opportunity to develop our talents." - A.P.J.K
"What is defeat? Nothing but education; nothing but the first step to something better" - Bruce Lee
"To double your net worth, double your self-worth. Because you will never exceed the height of your self-image."  Robin Sharma
"I do not believe in talking the right decision , I take a decision and make it right " M Ali Jinnah
"I am by calling a dealer in words. And words are by far the most powerful drug in the world".- Rudyard Kipling
"I didn't become heartless, I just became smarter. My happiness will not depend on someone else. Not anymore."
"It's impossible," said pride. "It's risky," said experience. "It's pointless," said reason. "Give it a try," whispered the heart.
"The best index to a person's character is/ (a) how he treats people who can't do him any good, and/ (b) how he treats people who can't fight back." - Abigail van Buren
"You cannot escape the responsibility of tomorrow by evading it today." - Abraham Lincoln
"Be a craftsman in speech that thou mayest be strong, for the strength of one is the tongue, and speech is mightier than all fighting." - Maxims of Ptahhotep
"For one human being to love another; that is perhaps the most difficult of all our tasks, the ultimate, the last test and proof, the work for which all other work is but preparation." - Rainer Maria Rilke
"Be the person you needed when you were younger."
"Foolishness is often just wisdom applied to the wrong situation."
'Now I am become Death, the destroyer of worlds.' - Bhagavad Gita
"When you betray somebody else, you also betray yourself." - Isaac Bashevis Singer
"Journalism is printing what someone else does not want printed; everything else is public relations." -- George Orwell
"A life spent making mistakes is not only more honorable but more useful than a life spent doing nothing" - George Bernard Shaw
"People can think what they want, but you know what you know"
"Do the things today, that others won't do. To have the things tomorrow, that others won't have." - Les Brown
"The purpose of life is a life with a purpose, so I'd rather die for a cause than live a life that is worthless" - Immortal Technique
"Stars aren't that important. Street lights are important! Why? Because there's so few of them. And they were made by monkeys.", Terry Pratchett.
"That's the great thing about art. Everyone can have their own opinion on why it sucks" - Homer Simpson
"Stories of imagination tend to upset those without one", Terry Pratchett
"Networks at work, keeping people calm; you know they went after King when he spoke out on Vietnam; he turned the power to the 'have nots' and then came the shot" -RATM
" vaincre sans pril, on triomphe sans gloire." (To conquer without risk is to triumph without glory.) - said by Don Goms, act II, scene ii, in the play "Le Cid", widely regarded as Pierre Corneille's finest work.
"if the only tool you have is Hammer , then you tend to see every problem as a nail " - Unknown
"Don"t take rest after your first victory because if you fail in second, more lips are waiting to say that your first victory was just luck." - A.P.J.K
"When a question has no correct answer, there is only one honest response. The gray area between yes and no. Silence." -Dan Brown
"Cynicism is laziness masquerading as wisdom."
"Fashion is a form of ugliness so intolerable that we have to alter it every six months" - Oscar Wilde
"Mister, when I see my first lady angel, if God ever sees fit to show me one, it'll be her wings and not her face that'll make my mouth fall open. I've already seen the prettiest face that ever could be." - Cat's Cradle, Vonnegut
"Until you cross the bridge of your insecurities, you can't begin to explore your possibilities." - Tim Fargo
"Our envy always lasts longer than the happiness of those we envy." - Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"Maps and compasses show us where things are, we have to make our own ways"
"Don"t worry about failures, worry about the chances you miss when you don"t even try." - Jack Canfield
"So what if it limps. Its purpose is to get you into the next stage of the story and you take off from there. ... For all you know, the material that you will write much later in the novel will make it plain to you exactly how the transition ought to have been. ..." Isaac Asimov
"There is no royal road to anything. One thing at a time, all things in succession. That which grows fast, withers as rapidly. That which grows slowly, endures."  Josiah Gilbert Holland
"To laugh often and much; to win the respect of intelligent people and the affection of children to leave the world a better place to know even one life has breathed easier because you have lived. This is to have succeeded." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I don't believe in taking the right decision , I take a decision and make it right"-Mohammad Ali Jinnah
"Everything we hear is an opinion, not a fact. Everything we see is a perspective, not the truth." - Marcus Aurelius
"Count your age by friends, not years. Count your life by smiles, not tears." - John Lennon
"Body Language speaks the Loudest" By Sandeep Maheshwari
"I don't have to try to be perfect at everything." - Cindy Crawford
"I do things like get in a taxi and say, 'The library, and step on it.'" - David Foster Wallace (Infinite Jest)
"Only the curious will learn and only the resolute overcome the obstacles to learning. The quest quotient has always excited me more than the intelligence quotient." - Eugene S. Wilson
"If you limit your choices only to what seems possible or reasonable, you disconnect yourself from what you truly want, and all that is left is a compromise." - Robert Fritz
"The heart has its reasons which reason knows nothing of." - Blaise Pascal
"You can't just make me different and leave."  John Green
"If he can't handle you at your worst then he does not deserve you at your best. Real love means seeing beyond the words spoken out of pain, and instead seeing a persons soul." Shannon Alder
"A good plan isn't one where someone wins, it's where nobody thinks they've lost." -Terry Pratchett
"I don't go around regretting things that don't happen." - Virgil Thomson
" There are people in every time and every land who want to stop history in its tracks. They fear the future, mistrust the present, and invoke the security of a comfortable past which, in fact, never existed." rfk 1964
"We are not enemies, but friends. We must not be enemies. Though passion may have strained, it must not break our bonds of affection. The mystic chords of memory will swell when again touched, as surely they will be, by the better angels of our nature." - Abraham Lincoln
"Success comes in cans; failure in can"ts"  Wilfred Peterson
"Children have never been very good at listening to their elders, but they have never failed to imitate- them." James Baldwin
"Money sometimes makes fools of important persons, but it may also make important persons of fools." - Walter Winchell
"I like kids for the same reason their parents grow weary of them, they have an inscrutable curiosity with asking questions. A quality that is often lost come adulthood". - James Harvey
"Focus on the journey, not the destination. Joy is found not in finishing an activity but in doing it." - Greg Anderson
"Give without remembering and always receive without forgetting" - Unknown
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time." - Mark Twain
"Accept Chanege" -Microsoft Word
"Always remember, a friendly face can be your enemies mask"
"I cried over who I thought you were. But don't be foolish. Not a single tear was shed over who you really are."  Kimmy Ann
"If you've got them by the balls, their hearts and minds will follow." - Theodore Roosevelt
"If aliens ever visit us, I think the outcome would be much as when Christopher Columbus first landed in America, which didn't turn out very well for the Native Americans." - Stephen Hawking,
"The perceiver desires like mad to perceive and the perceived tries desperately to hide. Then, in the end, one wins." - Samuel Beckett
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Poets do not go mad; but chess-players do. Mathematicians go mad, and cashiers; but creative artists very seldom. I am not, as will be seen, in any sense attacking logic: I only say that this danger does lie in logic, not in imagination." G.K. Chesterton, Orthodoxy
"Like Christianity in the past, the modern cult of science lives on the hope of miracles. But to think that science can transform the human lot is to believe in magic. " - John Gray
"Like religion at its worst, contemporary atheism feeds the fantasy that human life can be remade by a conversion experience  in this case, conversion to unbelief." - John Gray
"Man, when you lose your laugh you lose your footing" - Ken Kesey
"He knows nothing; and he thinks he knows everything. That points clearly to a political career." George Bernard Shaw
"If you are still looking for that one person who will change your life, take a look in the mirror." Roman Price
"Everything has beauty, but not everyone can see." By Confucius
"Maurice opened his hand. Luminous petals appeared in it..."
"Washington is a city of southern efficiency and Northern charm." -JFK
"You are the product of 4 billion years of evolutionary success. Act like it." - Unknown
"The years teach much which the days never know." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"What I lack in talent, I exacerbate with enthusiasm." - Neil T Stacey
"If you want to make peace with your enemy, you have to work with your enemy. Then he becomes your partner." - Nelson Mandela
"If you can Dream it , You can Do it "-unknown
"Whenever you are confronted with an opponent, conquer him with love." - Mahatma Gandhi
"But man is not made for defeat. A man can be destroyed but not defeated."-Ernest Hemingway
"We can do anything we want to if we stick to it long enough." -Helen Keller
"No, I regret nothing, all I regret is having been born, dying is such a long tiresome business I always found." - Samuel Beckett
"Even in my darkest moods I still pull out the dankest memes" - Caleb
"America did not invent human rights. In a very real sense ... human rights invented America." - Jimmy Carter
"At the touch of love everyone becomes a poet."  Plato
"Love yourself first and everything else falls into line. You really have to love yourself to get anything done in this world."  Lucille Ball
"And if you choose to hold fast to what is right, do not be irked by difficult circumstances, but reflect on how many things have already happened to you in life in ways that you did not wish, and yet they have turned out for the best."  Musonius Rufus, Fragment XXVII
"The loneliest moment in someone's life is when they are watching their whole world fall apart, and all they can do is stare blankly." F. Scott Fitzgerald
" Excellence is a continuous process and not an accident "- Abdul kalam
"You cannot be lonely if you like the person you're lonely with."  Unknown
"Look at the sky we are not alone. The whole universe is friendly to us and conspires only to give the best to those who dream and work" - Abdul Kalam
"Wish for others what you wish for yourself" - Prophet Muhammad
"All walls are great; if the roof doesn't fall" Selma from Dancer in the Dark
"In Ethiopia during the famine, I saw stuff there that reorganized how I saw the world. I didn't quite know what to do about it. At a certain point, I felt God is not looking for alms. God is looking for action." - Bono
"If courage wasn't a standard result of aging, it meant that the young could somehow acquire it as well." - Lawana Blackwell
"Wheresoever you go, go with all your heart." - Confucius
"I'm glad I don't have to explain to a man from Mars why each day I set fire to dozens of little pieces of paper, and then put them in my mouth." - Mignon McLaughlin
"One thing you can't hide - is when you're crippled inside." - John Lennon
"True friendship comes when the silence between two people is comfortable."  David Tyson
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Whenever I hear, 'It can't be done,' I know I'm close to success." - Michael Flatley
"A pure hand needs no glove to cover it." - Nathaniel Hawthorne
"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot paint', then by all means paint, and that voice will be silenced." - Vincent Van Gogh
"If you are still looking for that one person who will change your life, take a look in the mirror." Roman Price
"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot pain', then by all means paint and that voice will be silenced." - Vincent Van Gogh
"It doesn't matter how beautiful the guess is, or how smart the guesser is, or how famous the guesser is; if the experiment disagrees with the guess, then the guess is wrong. That's all there is to it." -Richard Feynman
"Preservation provokes change; in turn, change provokes preservation."
...if you"re very wise and very strong, fear doesn"t have to make you cruel or cowardly. Fear can make you kind. -The Doctor
"May not the complaint, that common people are above their station, often take its rise in the fact of uncommon people being below theirs?" - Charles Dickens
"Death is always less painful and easier than life! You speak true. And yet we do not, day to day, choose death. Because ultimately, death is not the opposite of life, but the opposite of choice. Death is what you get when there are no more choices left to make. Am I right?" - The Fool
"Don't gain the world and lose your soul . Wisdom is better than silver and gold " -Bob Marley
". . . life is like a box of chocolates; ya never know when you'll accidentally eat the coffee flavoured one and feel actually physically ill to the centre of your stomach." -Chris Lovasz (AKA Sips)
"The pursuit of "fairness" has become a particularly unlovely and unedifying frenzy. Perfect fairness is a will-o"-the-wisp, the pursuit of which produces short tempers, long arguments, intense litigiousness, bad law, abused institutions and diminished social comity." George Will ("Suddenly") (1990)
"The pursuit of "fairness" has become a particularly unlovely and unedifying frenzy. Perfect fairness is a will-o"-the-wisp, the pursuit of which produces short tempers, long arguments, intense litigiousness, bad law, abused institutions and diminished social comity." George Will (*Suddenly*) (1990)
"One has to belong to the intelligentsia to believe something like that. No ordinary man could be such a fool." George Orwell (on a left-wing rumor that America had entered World War II to crush a budding English socialist revolution.) ("Notes on Nationalism" [Polemic magazine]) (1945)
"We are God, 'cause only we can create the idea of His existence in our holy brains." - Dieter Meier
"You can do anything, but not everything" David Allen
"There is nothing Permanent except change" Heraclitus
"If you fell down yesterday, stand up today."-H. G. Wells
...I also know how important it is in life not necessarily to be strong but to feel strong. To measure yourself at least once. To find yourself at least once in the most ancient of human conditions. Facing the blind deaf stone alone, with nothing to help you but your hands and your own head.
"Of all tyrannies a tyranny sincerely exercised for the good of its victims may be the most oppressive . . . those who torment us for our own good will torment us without end for they do so with the approval of their own conscience. - C.S. Lewis
"Your dreams don't work unless you do." - John C. Maxwell
"Peace comes from being able to contribute the best that we have, and all that we are, toward creating a world that supports everyone. But it is also securing the space for others to contribute the best that they have and all that they are." - Hafsat Abiola
"Love is respect." - Unknown
"Fear is a friend who's misunderstood" - John Mayer
"Make every mistake count" - Alex Malley, The Naked CEO
"If you don't get what you want, you suffer; if you get what you don't want, you suffer; even when you get exactly what you want, you still suffer because you can't hold on to it forever." - Dan Millman
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"The Pessimist Sees Difficulty In Every Opportunity. The Optimist Sees The Opportunity In Every Difficulty." -Winston Churchill
"A wife who loses a husband is called a widow. A husband who loses a wife is called a widower. A child who loses his parents is called an orphan. There is no word for a parent who loses a child. That"s how awful the loss is."  Jay Neugeboren
"He who is unable to live in society, or who has no need because he is sufficient for himself, must be either a beast or a god"  Aristotle
"Happiness is the highest good"  Aristotle
"Philosophy is at once the most sublime and the most trivial of human pursuits"  William James
"Evil is unspectacular and always human, And shares our bed and eats at our own table ...." W.H. Auden
"We should treat personal electronic data with the same care and respect as weapons-grade plutonium - it is dangerous, long-lasting and once it has leaked there"s no getting it back." - Cory Doctorow
"It Ain"t How Hard You HitIt"s How Hard You Can Get Hit and Keep Moving Forward" - Rocky Balboa
"There is only one real deprivation, I decided this morning, and that is not to be able to give one's gifts to those one loves most." - May Sarton
"Stubbornness is also determination. It's simply a matter of shifting from "won't power" to "will power."" - Peter McWilliams
"Turn your midlife crisis to your own advantage by making it a time for renewal of your body and mind, rather than stand by helplessly and watch them decline." - Jane E. Brody
"Never seem more learned than the people you are with. Wear your learning like a pocket watch and keep it hidden. Do not pull it out to count the hours, but give the time when you are asked." - Lord Chesterfield
"Let the clay of your perspective of the universe never dry. Stand aside and let every being and event you experience touch it. For how else can it be a reflection of reality if it's safely guarded from it?" -yamother69
"Time is but the stream I go a-fishing in." - Henry David Thoreau
"You fear us at your own peril" -Unknown
"If you are willing to let go of the unrealistic notion that your concepts of truth, justice, and fairness are shared by everyone, much of your resentment and frustration will vanish." -David D. Burns
"The world is a book and those who do not travel read only one page." - Augustine of Hippo
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it."- Aristotle
"Life has become immeasurably better since I have been forced to stop taking it seriously." - Hunter S. Thompson
"These are the days that must happen to you "- UNKOWN
"It's all so meaningless, we may as well be extraordinary." - Francis Bacon
"Put your heart, mind, and soul into even your smallest acts. This is the secret of success." - Swami Sivananda
"It's all meaningless, we may as well be extraordinary." - Francis Bacon
"There is a method to my madness... i just haven't figured it out yet" Me
"There are women who are not beautiful but only look that way."  Karl Kraus
"Doubt kills more dreams than failure ever will." Suzy Kassem in Rise Up And Salute The Sun (2010)
"I finally swallowed all those knotted lumps of fibrous syllables..."
"You don"t really need someone to complete you. You only need someone to accept you completely."
"Fake news have been around for a long time, just look at the Bible" - Yuval Harari (writer of Homo Sapiens)
"The temple of art is built in words" Josiah Gilbert Holland
"Sometimes you tell someone to never speak to you again and then the phone rings and you hope its them. it"s the most twisted logic of all time." -John Mayer
"I consider the headscarf a symbol of a woman's submission, I will not put on the veil." -La Pen
"YOU"LL NEVER BE ABLE TO FULLY CHERISH THE PEOPLE IN YOUR LIFE IF YOU KEEP HOPING FOR THE ONES WHO LEFT TO COME BACK."
"Teaching is the one profession that creates all other professions." - Unknown
"The question is not what you look at, but what you see." Henry David Thoreau
"If you like your coffee hot, let me be your coffee pot"
"Some people never go crazy. What truly horrible lives they must live." - Charles Bukowski
"A weak core creates weak fruit, but a strong core creates everlasting!" -Neriyahu
"Bad relationships change good people" - Unknown
"The best love is the kind that awakens the soul; that makes us reach for more, that plants the fire in our hearts and brings peace to our minds. That"s what I hope to give you forever."
"What gets measured gets managed." - Peter Drucker
"Strength does not come from physical capacity. It comes from an indomitable will." -Mahatma Gandhi
"We live only to discover beauty. All else is a form of waiting." - Kahlil Gibran
"Am i a bad person for wishing you the best but still hoping that you would be sad without me?"
"If you really want to do something, you'll find a way. If you don't, you'll find an excuse."  Jim Rohn
"If you really wanna do something, you'll find a way, if you don't, you'll find an excuse"
"Tough times never last, but tough people do." By Robert H. Schuller
"In times of change, learners inherit the earth, while the learned find themselves beautifully equipped to deal with a world that no longer exists." - Eric Hoffer
"Generality is the enemy of all art." - Konstantin Stanislavski
"My country is the world, and my religion is to do good." - Thomas Paine
"Spend more time acting on inspiration, and less time looking for it from shitty posts on reddit" - Me, 2017
"You stick your head above the crowd and attract attention and sometimes somebody will throw a rock at you. That's the territory. You buy the land, you get the Indians."  David Lee Roth
"Money can't buy you happiness, but it can buy you a yacht big enough to pull up right alongside it."  David Lee Roth
"Real happiness is cheap enough, yet how dearly we pay for its counterfeit." - Hosea Ballou
"The best moments in life, are the ones without words."
"If you take any phrase, put it in quotes, and say it's by 'Unknown', it's technically true and sounds super credible."  Unknown
"Whoa" -Keanu Reeves
"There are two types of people who will tell you that you cannot make a difference in this world: those who are afraid to try and those who are afraid you will succeed." - Ray Goforth
"Let us not seek the Republican answer or the Democratic answer, but the right answer. Let us not seek to fix the blame for the past. Let us accept our own responsibility for the future." -JFK
"I say I love writing but really it is thinking I love  the rush of thoughts  new connections in the brain being made. And it comes out of the blue. In such moments: I feel such love of the world, love of thinking" -Oliver Sacks
"The hardest thing in life is to learn which bridge to cross and which to burn"
"Nothing is more beautiful than the smile that has struggled through the tears." Demi Lovato
"Difficulties are meant to rouse, not discourage. The human spirit is to grow strong by conflict." William Ellery Channing
"Strength and growth come only through continuous effort and struggle." Napoleon Hill
"A truly strong person does not need the approval of others any more than a lion needs the approval of sheep." Vernon Howard
"Do you know what they call alternative medicine that's been proved to work? - Medicine." - Tim Minchin
"Don't be afraid to give up the good to go for the great." --John D. Rockefeller
"Opportunities don't happen. You create them." -- Chris Grosser
"Success usually comes to those who are too busy to be looking for it." -- Henry David Thoreau
"The road to success and the road to failure are almost exactly the same." -- Colin R. Davis
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." -- Herman Melville
"Success is not final; failure is not fatal: It is the courage to continue that counts." -- Winston S. Churchill
"Sex without love is as hollow and ridiculous as love without sex." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Buy the ticket, take the ride." - Hunter S. Thompson
"It's a strange world. Some people get rich and others eat shit and die." - Hunter S. Thompson
'We all die. The goal isn't to live forever, the goal is to create something that will.' -Chuck Palahniuk
"Greeting cards routinely tell us everybody deserves love. No. Everybody deserves clean water. Not everybody deserves love all the time." -- Zadie Smith
"Whether You Think You Can, Or Think You Can't. You're Right." - Henry Ford
"For success,attitude is equally as important as ability" Anonymous
"I'm just an honest man Provide for me and mine I give a check to tax deductible charity organizations Two weeks paid vacation, won't heal the damage done I need another one" Cold War Kids | We Used to Vacation
"The man who says his wife can"t take a joke forgets that she took him." -- Oscar Wilde
"Greeting cards routinely tell us everybody deserves love. No. Everybody deserves clean eater. Not everybody deserves love all the time." -- Zadie Smith
"Greeting cards routinely tell us everybody deserves love. No. Everybody deserves clean eater. Not everybody deserves love all the time." Zadie Smith
"When you want to succeed as bad as you want to breathe, then you'll be successful." - Eric Thomas
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths. When you go through hardships and decide not to surrender, that is strength." Arnold Schwarzenegger
"There are no Constraints on the human mind, no walls around the human spirit, no barriers to our progress except those we erect ourselves" - Ronald Reagan
"The most beautiful people are those who have known defeat, known suffering, known struggle, known loss, and have found their way out of the depths. These persons have an appreciation, an understanding of life that fills them with compassions, gentleness. Beautiful people do not just happen."
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"There is nothing permanent except change.":Heraclitus
"Open your eyes, look within. Are you satisfied with the life you're living?" Bob Marley #QuoteNow
"It is compassion, the most gracious of virtues, Which moves the world" - Tirukkural
"If you do something new, it will always look a little bit strange" -Peter Thiel
"Music at its best...is the grand archeology into and transfiguration of our guttural cry, the great human effort to grasp in time our deepest passions and yearnings as prisoners of time ... to the dark roots of our scream and the celestial heights of our silence." Cornel West
"The good thing about finding out that you're wrong is that you're not wrong anymore."  Matt Dillahunty
"A journey of a thousand miles begins with a single step" Lao-Tzu
"There is only one thing that makes a dream impossible to achieve: the fear of failure." -Paulo Coelho
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"As long as you're going to be thinking anyway, think big." - Donald Trump
"I do not care if the guy is yellow or black, or if he has stripes like a fuckin' zebra. I'm the manager of this team, and I say he plays. What's more, I say he can make us all rich. And if any of you cannot use the money, I will see that you are all traded."  Leo Durocher
"Imperfection is beauty, madness is genius and it's better to be absolutely ridiculous than absolutely boring." - Marilyn Monroe
"After a good dinner one can forgive anybody, even one's own relations." - Oscar Wilde
"Liberty without learning is always in peril, and learning without liberty is always in vain." - John F. Kennedy
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough."  Mae West
"Of all the words of mice and men, the saddest are, "It might have been." - Kurt Vonnegut
"I find my greatest pleasure, and so my reward, in the work that precedes what the world calls success." - Thomas A. Edison
"You don't have to be great to start, but you have to start to be great." - Zig Ziglar
"When a person is down in the world, an ounce of help is better than a pound of preaching."- Edward G. Bulwer-Lytton
"Mankind must put an end to war or war will put an end to mankind." - John F. Kennedy
"The whole secret of life is to be interested in one thing profoundly and in a thousand things well." - Horace Walpole
"The human foot is a masterpiece of engineering and a work of art." - Leonardo Di Vinci
"Freedom is the transition from one life task to another. A chance to choose a new task." - Scott Nearing
"Sanity and Happiness are an impossible combination." - Mark Twain
"There are no morals in politics; there is only expedience. A scoundrel may be of use to us just because he is a scoundrel." - Vladimir Lenin
"The ignorant always imagine, that he, who speaks to them of things they do not understand, is a learned man. Such is the true principle of the credulity of the people, and of the authority of those, who pretend to guide nations." Paul Thyry, Baron D'Holbach (1772)
"One of the problems with the world is that too often people focus on what's happening rather than what should be happening." - Jim E. Rustle
"War is sweet to those who have no experience of it, but the experienced man trembles exceedingly at heart on its approach." - Pindar
"It is better to live your own destiny imperfectly than to live an imitation of somebody else's life with perfection."
"If it smells like shit everywhere you go, you should probably check your shoes." -Unknown
"If you love deeply, you"re going to get hurt badly. But it"s still worth it." - C.S. Lewis
"The meaning of life is to find your gift. The purpose of life is to give it away." by Pablo Picasso
"The Best Preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today" H.Jackson Brown,Jr.
"You Learn More From Failure Than From Success. Don"t Let It Stop You. Failure Builds Character" - Unknown
"I do not 'get' ideas; ideas get me." - Robertson Davies
"Your talent is God's gift to you. What you do with it is your gift back to God." - Leo Buscaglia
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." -George Bernard Shaw
"Great achievement always requires great sacrifice" - Robin Sharma
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks others have thrown at him." --David Brinkley
"Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Go confidently in the direction of your dreams. Live the life you have imagined." Henry David Thoreau
"Here's to alcohol: the cause of, and answer to, all of life's problems." -Matt Groening
"Love is that condition in which the happiness of another person is essential to your own." - Robert A. Heinlein, Stranger in a Strange Land
"Anyone who lives within their means suffers from a lack of imagination" - Oscar Wilde
"I think that the genes for being an artist and mentally ill aren"t just related, they are the same gene, but try telling that to a bill collector." - Neil Hilborn
"I know nothing except the fact of my ignorance."-Socrates
"People fascinated by the idea of progress never suspect that every step forward is also a step on the way to the end and that behind all the joyous "onward and upward" slogans lurks the lascivious voice of death urging us to make haste." - Milan Kundera
"The most common way people give up their power is by thinking they don"t have any." Alice Walker
"The immediate objectives are the total destruction and devastation of their settlements and the capture of as many prisoners of every age and sex as possible." - George Washington
"If I get to be president, what can I do anyway? With Congress and the press, what chance do I have to make basic changes?" Robert Kennedy
"Progress is a nice word. But change is its motivator. And change has its enemies." - Robert Kennedy
"Difficult times often bring out the best in people." - Bernie Sanders
"Nothing great was ever achieved without enthusiasm." By Ralph Waldo Emerson
"A fool and his money are soon parted." - Thomas Tusser
"You have not lived today until you"ve done something for someone who can never repay you."John Bunyan
"Fighting for peace is like screwing for virginity." - George Carlin
"An eye for an eye only ends up making the whole world blind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Millennial" or "Second-wave" libertarianism is not going away and there seems to be irreconcilable differences between these new libertarians and the old guard.
"I have opinions of my own, strong opinions; but I don't always agree with them." - George W. Bush
"Today I didn't have to use my AK... I gotta say, it was a good day" -Ice Cube
"Children are educated by what the grown-up is and not by his talk." - C.G. Jung
"Why, look at me. I've worked my way up from nothing to a state of extreme poverty." - Groucho Marx
"That's why we can't fight them." "That's why we HAVE to fight them!" -Steven Universe
"The greatest of faults, I should say, is to be conscious of none." -Thomas Carlyle
"Nothing can now be believed which is seen in a newspaper. Truth itself becomes suspicious by being put into that polluted vehicle."  Thomas Jefferson
"It's so hard to forget pain, but it's even harder to remember sweetness. We have no scar to show for happiness. We learn so little from peace." - Chuck Palahniuk
" The most important things in life, aren't things." - Anthony J. D'Angelo
"They say that nobody is perfect. Then they tell you that practice makes perfect. I wish they"d make up their minds."  Wilt Chamberlain
"The only time you should look down on a man is when you're helping him up."
"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, but wiser people so full of doubts" - Bertrand Russell
"Presidents typically land in office thinking they know better than their predecessors;..." - Michael Duffy, The Presidents Club: Inside the World's Most Exclusive Fraternity
"A nation will not survive morally or economically when so few have so much, while so many have so little." - Bernie Sanders
"It is absurd to divide people into good and bad. People are either charming or tedious" - Oscar Wilde
"Love can't conquer anything. Love can't make a scholar into a warrior. Loving her can't make her love me." -Orson Scott Card
"There"s no story so fantastic that I cannot imagine myself the hero. And there"s no story so evil that I cannot imagine myself the villain."  Leonard Cohen
[Question] Where does the quote 'this is not goodbye, it's see you later' originate from?
["Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche](http://www.goodreads.com/quotes/tag/monsters)
"Even from the beginning, that was the problem. People liked pretty things. People even liked pretty things that wanted to kill and eat them." - Holly Black, The Coldest Girl in Coldtown
"You cannot find peace by avoiding life" - Virginia Woolf
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy. Because they know what it feels like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone else to feel like that." -Robin Williams
"Make each day your masterpiece." -John Wooden
"Too bad she's just eating off your dreams."  Rihanna, Woo(ANTI)
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it." -Charles R. Swindoll
"Basically, when you get to my age, you'll really measure your success in life by how many of the people you want to have love you actually do love you." Warren Buffett
"If you have only one smile in you give it to the people you love." - Maya Angelou
"You know that place between sleep and awake, the place where you can still remember dreaming? That"s where I"ll always love you, Peter Pan. That"s where I"ll be waiting." J.M. Barrie
"For NASA, space is still a high priority." -Dan Quayle
"It is never too late to be what you might have been." - George Eliot
"Stories are wild creatures. When you let them loose, who knows what havoc they might wreck?"
"As the age of television progresses, the Reagans will be the rule, not the exception. To be perfect for television is all a President has to be these days." --Gore Vidal
"Calm mind brings inner strength and self-confidence, so that's very important for good health." - Dalai Lama
"My anxious recollections, my sympathetic feeling, and my best wishes are irresistibly excited whensoever, in any country, I see an oppressed nation unfurl the banners of freedom." - George Washington
"My candle burns at both ends; It will not last the night; But ah, my foes, and oh, my friends It gives a lovely light!" - Edna St. Vincent Millay
"Good judgment comes from experience. Experience comes from bad judgment." -Mulla Nasrudin
"If you're meeting someone for the first time after three hours of hair, makeup, and styling, you've already set the bar too high." - Lauren Graham
"If you're walking down the right path and you're willing to keep walking, eventually you'll make progress" - Barack Obama
"You have a finite amount of YESes and an infinite amount of NOs" - LM
"If I have seen further, it is by standing on the shoulders of giants."- Isaac newton
"Never trust what you can only see , even salt looks like sugar"
"If you want to make the world a better place, take a look at yourself and make a change. Wooo." - Batman
"Choose a job you love, and you will never have to work a day in your life"
"You only live once, but if you do it right ONCE IS ENOUGH"
"Directing our future when we can only see the past is like driving a car using only the rearview mirror." -- Terence Mckenna
"Home isn't where you're from, it's where you find light when all grows dark." - Pierce Brown, Golden Son
"That"s what it was like to be Einstein in 1905: You publish a groundbreaking paper that helps lay the foundations of quantum mechanics, and for which you later win the Nobel Prize, but it"s only the second-most important paper that you publish in that issue of the journal." -Sean Carroll
"What you think of yourself matters much more than what others think of you" -- Sandeep Maheshwari
"No matter what you're going through, there's a light at the end of the tunnel and it may seem hard to get to it but you can do it and just keep working towards it and you'll find the positive side of things." - Demi Lovato
"The cosmos is the only higher power you should concern yourself with, for it created you and you will return to it when you die". - Looking for the author!
"The wind tells us that genuine kindness exists. That itchy spot on your back you can't quite reach tells us that the gawds are inept or malign and should be addressed accordingly." - Stephen Ping
100 Reassuring Courage & Bravery Quotes
"People like Coldplay and voted for nazis, don't trust people." -Super Hans (Peep Show)
""The leaks are absolutely real; the news is fake." - Donald Trump
[Hunter Thompson is mentioned often recently, so here, from 2004:] "Nixon looks like a flaming liberal today. He was a crook and a bungler, but what the hell? I despised everything he stood for--but if he were running this year against the evil Bush-Cheney gang, I would happily vote for him."
"You've got guys from M.I.T. Then you've got guys who can't spell M.I.T." - Sylvester Stallone
"Understood why they fell in love with you. After all, so did I." -A Gordon Bowsher in WW2
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 21, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." -Mark Twain
"Religion is regarded by the common people as true, by the wise as false, and by the rulers as useful."-Seneca
"Your big opportunity may be right where you are now." - Napoleon Hill
"The art of knowing is knowing what to ignore." -Rumi
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched - they must be felt with the heart." -Helen Keller
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." Oscar Wilde
"The saddest aspect of life right now is that science gathers knowledge faster than society gathers wisdom" - Isaac Asimov
"You are part of the world's most feared and trusted force. Engage your brain before you engage your weapon." - Lt. Gen. James Mattis
"The meeting of two personalities is like the contact of two chemical substances: if there is any reaction, both are transformed." - C.G. Jung
"I, for one, am not so immensely impressed by the success we are making of our civilization here that I am prepared to think we are the only spot in this immense universe which contains living, thinking creatures." - Winston Churchill on the possibility of alien life
"Man is the only creature who refuses to be what he is." - Albert Camus
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain
"Hitler massacred 3,000,000 Jews. Now, there are 3,000,000 drug addicts. I'd be happy to slaughter them."- Philippines President Rodrigo Duterte
"Don't talk about just art do it, and let it speak" - Patrick Mimran
"I will promise you this, that if we have not gotten, our troops out by the time I am President, it is the first thing I will do. I will get our troops home. We will bring an end to this war. You can take that to the bank." - Obama
"Did you hear about the rose that grew from a crack in the concrete? Proving nature's laws wrong, it learned to walk without having feet. Funny, it seems to by keeping it's dreams; it learned to breathe fresh air. Long live the rose that grew from concrete when no one else even cared."
"You never know how strong you can be until being strong is the only choice you have left." - Tupac Shakur
"The meaning of life is just to be alive. It is so plain and so obvious and so simple. And yet, everybody rushes around in a great panic as if it were necessary to achieve something beyond themselves." - Alan W. Watts
"You thought we could be decent man in an indecent time. But you were wrong. The world is cruel, and the only morality in a cruel world is chance."- Harvey Dent (Two Face)
"I want to know what you ache for  and if you dare to dream of meeting your heart"s longing. It doesn"t interest me how old you are. I want to know if you will risk looking like a fool  for love  for your dreams  for the adventure of being alive." -Oriah Mountain Dreamer
"You thought we could be decent men in an indecent time. But you were wrong. The only morality in a cruel world is chance."
"For Success,Attitude is equally as important as ability" Anonymous
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." Dr. Seuss
"Man needs difficulties in life because they are necessary to enjoy the success." By A. P. J. ABDUL KALAM
"I have a habit of falling in love with souls who have yet to be at peace with their bodies, their minds, their weaknesses. I try to build them, to find the parts of them that are missing in me. I end up with holes in my chest." -Farah Gabdon
"If you're not careful, the newspapers will have you hating the people who are being oppressed, and loving the people who are doing the oppressing." (Malcolm X)
"Be great in act, as you have been in thought." - Jean Paul
"They end up taking up a hospital bedit costs, when, if you, they just gave, you gave, them treatment earlyand they got some treatment and uh, a breathalyzer, or uh, uh inhalatornot a breathalyzer." - Barack Obama, verbatim.
"If voting made any difference they wouldn't let us do it." - Mark Twain
"NBC's Pete Williams reports (as we have all along) that investigators have found no collusion between Trump campaign and contacts in Russia."- Tom Winter, NBC investigative reporter.
"Hitler did not have to destroy democracy; he merely took advantage of the decay of democracy and at the critical moment obtained the support of many to whom, though they detested Hitler, he yet seemed the only man strong enough to get things done."  Friedrich Hayek
"We accept the love we think we deserve." - Stephen Chbosky, The Perks Of Being A Wallflower
"The problem is not the problem. The problem is your attitude about the problem." - Capt. Jack Sparrow
"It"s dark because you are trying too hard...
"It"s dark because you are trying too hard...
"..To doubt the bravery of a savage is at once to put him on his mettle" -Meriwether Lewis
"Your relationship with yourself sets the tone for every other relationship you have." Robert Holden
"Wherever you go, go with all your heart." - Confucius
"Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence" -Carl Sagan
"As for me, I am tormented with an everlasting itch for things remote. I love to sail forbidden seas, and land on barbarous coasts." -Herman Melville
"You know what uranium is, right? It"s this thing called nuclear weapons. And other things. Like lots of things are done with uranium. Including some bad things." - Donald Trump
"The leaks are real. The leaks are absolutely real. The news is fake because so much of the news is fake"--Donald J. Trump
"You can ignore me, but you can't ignore the impact I make on your society." -B! Davis
"When you want to succeed as bad as you want to breathe, then you"ll be successful." - Eric Thomas
"You don't save a pitcher for tomorrow. Tomorrow it may rain" -Leo Durocher, American baseball player, manager, and coach
"Americans are so black and white, we Russians are grey" - Nina Sergeevna in The Americans
"Happiness only real when shared." -Alexander Supertramp
"The only source of knowledge is experience" -- Albert Einstein
"Birth is nothing but Death begun, so hear my prayer" - Roland Deschain
"Peace cannot be kept by force; it can only be achieved by understanding" - Albert Einstein
"Education is what remains after one has forgotten what one has learned in school." -- Albert Einstein
"The most beautiful thing we can experience is the mysterious. It is the source of all true art and science." - Albert Einstein
"When I was 5 years old, my mother always told me that happiness was the key to life. When I went to school, they asked me what I wanted to be when I grew up. I wrote down 'happy.' They told me I didn't understand the assignment, and I told them they didn't understand life." -John Lennon
"First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win" -Adolf Hitler
"death is only the beginning"
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"He who takes offense when no offense is intended is a fool, and he who takes offense when offense is intended is a greater fool." - Brigham Young
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." Elbert Hubbard
"I"m reminding myself: What I do every day matters more than what I do once in a while."  Gretchen Rubin
"Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance you must keep moving" - Albert Einstein
"You are human with one life and it is up to you to make it the best life you can." - Dan Howell
"You are human with one life and it up to you to make it the best life you can." - Dan Howell
"I don't sugarcoat shit, I'm not Willy Wonka."
"Greatness after all, in spite of its name, appears to be not so much a certain size as a certain quality in human lives. It may be present in lives whose range is very small." - Phillips Brooks
"Wether it be a clear river or a river of mud, it is the fish who swim forward who will turn out the finest"
"Love means that you accept a person with all their failures stupidities, ugly points and nonetheless, you see perfection in imperfection itself."
"A career is wonderful, but you can't curl up with it on a cold night." Marilyn Monroe
"Success consists of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm"
"Darkness can not drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate can drvive out hate; only love can do that." -Martin Luther King Jr.
"It's the imperfections that make things beautiful" - Jenny Han
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W.P. Kinsella
"Art washes away from the soul the dust of everyday life." - Pablo Picasso
"When the doctors cut into a patient, and it's cold, the way it is now today...steam rises from the body...and the doctor will warm his hands over the open wound. How could anybody look upon that and not feel changed?" - Father Mulcahy, MASH, 'The Interview' (S4E25, 1976)
"All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given us." - J.R.R. Tolkien, The Fellowship of the Ring
[Request] Quote about conflict resolution
"Wisdom is knowing when you can't be wise." - Paul Engle
"The smart way to keep people passive and obedient is to strictly limit the spectrum of acceptable opinion, but allow very lively debate within that spectrum...." - Noam Chomsky, The Common Good
"He"s a chaos candidate and he"d be a chaos president." -Jeb Bush
"Desire is a contract you make with yourself to be unhappy until you get what you want."  Naval Ravikant
"When you love someone and they love you, your never alone"
"We are all capable of believing things which we know to be untrue... [rest in comments]
"What I mainly live for is contemplating the misfortunes of other people. The second thing I live for is, if not exactly passing on my genes, taking part in activities that might allow those genes to be passed on." -- Christopher Hitchens
"I....a universe of atoms, an atom in the universe" -Richard Feynman
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"It"s hard to stay mad when there"s so much beauty in the world... I can"t feel anything but gratitudefor every single moment of my stupid, little life." - Lester Burnham
"We can ignore reality, but we cannot ignore the consequences of ignoring reality." - Ayn Rand
"Faith is the only reason why we all anticipate future to happen." Me
"No pain, no gain."
"You either die a hero or live long enough to see yourself become the villain"
"We all know Light travels faster than Sound. That's why some people look brilliant... Until they open their mouth." - Albert Einstein.
"The greatest trick tbe Devil ever pulled was convincing the world he didn't exist." - Keyser Soze.
"The highest result of education is tolerance". - Helen Keller
"If you ever make an amazing first impression, let that be your last impression, for that will be a lasting impression." - B&S Wisdom
"You always said people don't do what they believe in, they just do what's most convenient, then they repent." - Bob Dylan
"Love is the only force capable of transforming an enemy into a friend." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Competence is your confidence"
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
. "We can easily manage if we will only take, each day, the burden appointed to it. But the load will be too heavy for us if we carry yesterday"s burden over again today, and then add the burden of the morrow before we are required to bear it."  John Newton
"But better to get hurt by the truth than comforted with a lie." Khaled Hosseini
"Money gets a task done quick, patience gets a task done right, creativity gets me 500 unfinished tasks."- Me
"One of the most beautiful qualities of true friendship is to understand and to be understood"- senneca
"Argue for your limitations, and surely they're yours." - Richard Bach
"If they want you, they'll try to keep you, if they need you, they'd never risk losing you."
"I don't regret meeting you, I regret expecting id never lose you."
"Its pretty simple actually, if you don't want others to have the power to break you and take your happiness, try not putting in their hands in the first place."
"Imperfection is beauty, madness is genius and it's better to be absolutely ridiculous than absolutely boring." -Marilyn Monroe
"Learning is a gift, even when pain is your teacher." - Maya Watson
"A river cut through rock, not because of its power, but because of its persistence" - Jim Watkins
"Anything worth doing, is worth doing right." - Hunter S. Thompson
"The reason I talk to myself is because I"m the only one whose answers I accept."
"Faster, Faster, until the thrill of speed overcomes the fear of death." - Hunter S. Thompson
"You can spend minutes, hours, days, weeks, or even months over-analyzing a situation; trying to put the pieces together, justifying what could've, would've happened... or you can just leave the pieces on the floor and move the fuck on." - Tupac Shakur
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside while still alive. Never surrender." - Tupac Shakur
"If you want it, you can fly, you just have to trust you a lot." - Steve Jobs
"When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable." - Jess C. Scott, The Intern
"A man cannot build a reputation on what he is going to do." - Henry Ford
"Mistakes are always forgivable, if one has the courage to admit them" -- Bruce Lee
"The scientist does not study nature because it is useful; he studies it because he delights in it, and he delights in it because it is beautiful. If nature were not beautiful, it would not be worth knowing". -Henri Poincare
"Money is not the only answer, but it makes a difference." - Barak Obama
"There is nothing either good or bad, but thinking makes it so." Hamlet in Hamlet
"We are a product of our environment, we don't have to be the product our environment in known for producing." -Jub_Dub
"If you can change your mind, you can change your life." -William James
"Liberty, when it begins to take root, is a plant of rapid growth." - George Washington
"Never in my life have I needed something so much, and never known until I received it. " - Vegeta (TFS dbz abridged)
"The point of modern propaganda isn't only to misinform or push an agenda. It is to exhaust your critical thinking, to annihilate truth." - Garry Kasparov
"I took nine months to form your heart. Do not let anyone break it in a matter of seconds."
"Random thoughts for Valentine's Day 2004. Today is a holiday invented by greeting card companies to make people feel like crap." - Joel Barish (Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind)
"By the time you get the feedback, the real work"s already done." -Jeff Olson
" I'll Do Things Today, So That I Can Do Things You Can't Tomorrow"
" I'll Do Things Today, So That I Can Things You Can't Tomorrow"
"Far better to live your own path imperfectly than to live another's perfectly" - Bhagavad Gita
"Even if you can't cut the mustard, you can still lick the jar!" - The Color of Money
"He who fails to plan is planning to fail" -- Sir Winston Churchill
"Now we are all sons of bitches" - Kenneth Bainbridge, July 16 1945
[QUOTE IDENTIFICATION REQUEST] -'If we are all men of god, then what sense does it make to kill one another?'
"So many books, so little time."Frank Zappa
"When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us." -- Helen Keller
"Sharing your work is essential to improving it." -Katie Schultz
"The wide world is about you: you can fence yourselves in, but you cannot for ever fence it out." -Lord of the Rings, J.R.R. Tolkien
"Rules for happiness: something to do, someone to love, something to hope for." - Immanuel Kant
"Happiness is as contagious as gloom. It should be the duty of those who are happy to let others know of their gladness."  Maurice Maeterlinck
"[The difference between a man and a monster is one bad day.]"
"Love is like the wind, you can't see it, but you can feel it." - Nicholas Sparks
"If you don't read the newspaper, you're uninformed. If you read the newspaper, you're misinformed" - Denzel Washington
"Those teenagers who sit in their rooms at night and cry themselves to sleep were once children with light in their eyes and hope in their heart."
"It"s impossible" said pride "It"s risky" said experience "It"s pointless" said reason "Give it a try" whispered the heart
"No act of kindness, no matter how small, is ever wasted." Aesop
"They say a lie can run around the world before the truth has got its boots on.... Well, the truth has got its boots on, and it's going to start kicking" -Terry Pratchett, The Truth
"I never lose. I either win or learn" - Nelson Mandela
"All you need is love. But a little chocolate now and then doesn't hurt." - Charles M. Schulz
"Accept the challenges so that you can feel the exhilaration of victory." George S. Patton
"Friendship is Love without his wings!" - Lord Byron
"The most dangerous heart disease: strong memory" - Nizar Qabbani
"Happiness is strange; it comes when you are not seeking it. When you are not making an effort to be happy, then unexpectedly, mysteriously, happiness is there, born of purity, of a loveliness of being." - Jiddu Krishnamurti
"The Questions You Have Of The World Determines The Success You Will Have" - Leroy Milton
"If you want a symbolic gesture, don't burn the flag; wash it." - Norman Thomas
"I am not afraid of an army of lions led by a sheep; I am afraid of an army of sheep led by a lion." - Alexander the Great
"I'm not afraid to die, I'm afraid to be free I'm not afraid to doubt, I'm afraid to believe Don't believe the lies of what you see Elevate your mind above these animal dreams". - Switchfoot "Skin and Bones"
"No longer to be poisoned by civilization he flees, and walks alone upon the land to become lost in the wild." -Christopher McCandless (Alexander Supertramp)
"At some point, you have to choose between life and fiction. The two are very close, but they never actually touch." - The Words
"No longer to be poisoned by civilization he flees, and walks alone upon the land to become lost in the wild." -Christopher McCandless
"Education is the most powerful weapon which you can use to change the world." - Nelson Mandela
"Patty cake, Patty cake, Microwave" Young Jeezy
"Believe that life is worth living and your belief will help create the fact." - William James
"The greatest tragedy is not death, but life without purpose"
"Forget what hurt you but never forget what it taught you"
"Try not to take things personally. Often what people say is a reflection of them, not you."
"...It's all too much and not enough at the same time."
"That's the problem with putting others first; you've taught them you come second."
"It is always easier to fight for one's principles than to live up to them." -Alfred Adler
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." Mae West
"A genuine leader is not a searcher for consensus, but a molder of consensus." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"I am in favor of animal rights as well as human rights. That is the way of a whole human being." - Abraham Lincoln
"Throw me to the wolves and I will return teading the pack"- Seneca
"The hardest thing in the world to understand is the income tax." - Albert Einstein
"As a well-spent day brings happy sleep, so a life well spent brings happy death." - Leonardo da Vinci
"If you limit your choice only to what seems possible or reasonable, you disconnect yourself from what you truly want, and all that is left is a compromise." - Robert Fritz, The Path of Least Resistance
"Being shy and intentionally not wanting to talk to people are two very different things"
"Empty your cup so that it may be filled; become devoid to gain totality." - Bruce Lee
"It's like coming home after a long trip. That's what love is like." - Piper Chapman
"The way to become human is to learn to recognize the lineaments of God in all of the wonderful modulations of the face of man" -Joseph Campbell
"To be inspired is great, to inspire is incredible"
"We should not give up and we should not allow the problem to defeat us." - A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"Perfection of means and confusion of ends seem to characterize our age." - Albert Einstein
"He is most powerful who has power over himself"- Seneca
"A man is already halfway in love with any woman who listens to him." - Brendan Francis
"Love is transcendent: it transcends language and material possessions, and can be shown only by our thoughts, actions, and intentions."  Ryan Nicodemus
"Knowing is not enough; we must apply. Willing is not enough; we must do." Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"One person with passion is better than forty people merely interested." - E. M. Forster
"A man's ethical behavior should be based effectually on sympathy, education, and social ties; no religious basis is necessary. Man would indeed be in a poor way if he had to be restrained by fear of punishment and hope of reward after death." - Albert Einstein
"Relationships are harder now because conversations becomes texting, arguments becomes phone calls, and feelings becomes statuses and tweet"
"You can't get so hung up on where you'd rather be that you forget to make the most of where you are. Gotta take a break from worrying about what you can't control. You just gotta live a little." - From the movie Passengers
"Take a picture not a Trophy. " This is how real man shoot animals - Ricky Gervais .
"In the beginning, God created man, but seeing him so feeble, He gave him the cat" - Warren Eckstein
"Love the giver more than the gift." - Brigham Young
"Love one another but make not a bond of love: let it rather be a moving sea between the shores of your souls." -Khalil Gibran
"I hear the drumbeats of war, and they sound like lies and the love of power" - ??? (Help me!)
"A dog is the only thing on earth that will love you more than you love yourself." - Josh Billings
"Hating hatred is not a proper substitute for love."
"STREETS FULL OF WATER. PLEASE ADVISE."  Robert Benchley, telegram from Venice
"Optimism is the faith that leads to achievement. Nothing can be done without hope and confidence." - Helen Keller
"This country, with its institutions, belongs to the people who inhabit it. whenever they shall grow weary of the existing government, they can exercise their constitutional right of amending it, or exercise their revolutionary right to overthrow it"-Abraham Lincoln
"I think hell is something you carry around with you, not somewhere you go."  Neil Gaiman
"Most people are other people. Their thoughts are someone else's opinions, their lives a mimicry, their passions a quotation." - Oscar Wilde
"One of the hardest things you will ever have to do my dear is grieve the loss of a person who is still alive." - Jeannette Walls, The Glass Castle.
"Don"t do anything just because you can. Don"t do anything you don"t love. And don"t do anything because other people think you should. Oh, don"t do anything because you"re afraid to do something else." - "You Me Her" script ep 10, season 1- Netflix series
"Pardon me while I burst into flames, I've had enough of the world and its people's mindless games. So, pardon me while I burn and rise above the flames." - Incubus
"As peaceful as possible, as violent as necessary."
"A big heart is full with very little"
"Don't fuck with someone's feelings because you're unsure about yours"
"Of all the lies I heard, 'I love you' was my favorite"
"I gave up on you. Not because I don't care anymore, but because I realized you don't"
"We see with the eyes, but we see with the brain as well. And seeing with the brain is often called imagination." - Oliver Sacks
"The instant I jumped, I saw clearly that every one of my problems had a simple and obvious solutionexcept the fact that I had just jumped" - one of the golden gate suicide survivors .
"Aim for a Grammy if you want your BRIT" -Avelino
"A house is not a home without a pet."
"The sign of a beautiful person is that They always see beauty in others."  BK Shivani
"I was born to die" - ManOwaR
"They say that life flashes before your eyes before die. This is true - it called living." - Sir Terry Pratchett
"They say that life flashes before you die. This is true - it called living." - Sir Terry Pratchett
"I think I could turn and live with animals, they are so placid and self-contained, I stand and look at them long and long." - Walt Whitman
"Lets enjoy life and forget about death for awhile and welcome it when it stares us in the face."
"We can judge the heart of a man by his treatment of animals." - Immanual Kant
"In nature there are neither rewards nor punishment; there are only consequences."  Robert B. Ingersoll
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything" Mark Twain
"Saying that it takes faith to believe in science is like saying it takes booze to be sober.  Thomas Westbrook
"I am a winner. And winners WIN THINGS"
"It doesn't matter who a man's father is. Your parents made a child, but it's up to you to make the man you'll be." - Tom Badgerlock
"But if in your fear you would seek only love"s peace and love"s pleasure, then it is better for you that you cover your nakedness and pass out of love"s threshing-floor, into the seasonless world where you shall laugh, but not with all of your laughter, and weep, but not all of your tears."
"Look carefully around you and recognize the luminosity of souls. Sit beside those who draw you to that." -Rumi
"Opportunities don't happen. You create them." Chris Grosser
"Being happy doesn"t mean everything is perfect. It means you"ve decided to look beyond the imperfections." Unknown
"I defy the stars; I defy Heaven and Hell. The laws of the universe say that the man I love is lost to me. I say: Watch me save him."
"Tact is the ability to describe others as they see themselves." - Abraham Lincoln
"If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude." - Maya Angelou
"I hope you fall in love with someone who always texts back and never lets you fall asleep thinking you're unwanted"
'I miss how you wanted me'
"Do yourself a favor, walk way and don't look back. Nobody has power over you unless you let them. If they keep bringing you heartache and pain, you're better off alone. Cut off all ties once and for all."
"Remember, if it doesn't open it's not your door."  Unknown
"In light of heaven, the worst suffering on earth will be seen to be no more serious than one night in an inconvenient hotel." -Teresa of vila
"If Jesus came back and saw what was being done in his name, he'd never stop throwing up." - Woody Allen, Hannah and Her Sisters
"Friendship is born at that moment when one person says to another, "What! You too? I thought I was the only one."
"People believe that hate is the opposite of love. It is not the opposite of love. Hate is a strong emotion much like love. The opposite of love is indifference...
"The greatest pain that comes from love is loving someone you can never have." - Robert D.
"Don't leave for tomorrow what can be done today." -GP5
"In a minute there is time for decisions and revisions which a minute will reverse." - T.S. Eliot, "The Lovesong of J. Alfred Prufrock"
"I didn't hear no bell. Get up you son of a bitch.....Mickey loves ya." - Mickey
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." Marcus Tullius Cicero
"Nothing in life is to be feared, it is only to be understood. Now is the time to understand more, so that we may fear less." - Curie
"Silence is sometimes the best answer" - Dalai Lama
"Only things that are measured can be changed" - Leroy Milton
"Do not go where the path may lead, go instead where there is no path and leave a trail."
"It's better to come from a broken home than to live in one." - Dana Wynter, Airport
"If you ask me why I publish what few or none will care to read, it is that the spirits I have raised haunt me until they are sent to the devil of a printer." --Percy Shelley
"To see what you want to see, not what is true. That is the greatest danger."
"Two things define your fate, your patience when you have nothing and your attitude when you have everything". -Tony robbins
"Don't stay with the one you can live with; stay with the one you can't live without."
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it." - Charles R. Swindoll
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." Martin Luther King Jr.
"The truth is like poetry. And a lot of people fucking hate poetry." -Anonymous overheard at a Washington D.C. Bar
"Opportunities come infrequently. When it rains gold, put out the bucket, not the thimble." Warren Buffett
"Times have not become more violent. They have just become more televised." - Marilyn Manson
"Hitch your wagon to a star." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Make up your mind that no matter what comes your way, no matter how difficult, no matter how unfair, you will do more than simply survive. You will thrive in spite of it." Joel Osteen
"There are better starters than me but I"m a strong finisher." Usain Bolt
"All the adversity I"ve had in my life, all my troubles and obstacles, have strengthened me.... You may not realize it when it happens, but a kick in the teeth may be the best thing in the world for you." Walt Disney
"The world breaks everyone, and afterward, some are strong at the broken places." Ernest Hemingway
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths. When you go through hardships and decide not to surrender, that is strength." Arnold Schwarzenegger
"but through it all i kept my eyes on you..."
"One should never forget that Christianity has exploited the weakness of the dying for a rape of the conscience." --Nietzsche
"The loneliest people are the kindest, The saddest people smile the brightest. The most damaged people are the wisest. All because they do not wish to see anyone else suffer the way they do."
"Only I can change my life. No one can do it for me." - Carol Burnett
"Stop being hard on yourself for being hard on yourself." - Leroy Milton
"My only regret in life is that I did not drink more wine."  Ernest Hemingway
"Deep in the human unconscious is a pervasive need for a logical universe that makes sense. But the real universe is always one step beyond logic." - Frank Herbert
"My attitude has always been, if you fall flat on your face, at least you're moving forward." - Richard Branson
"She played with my soul, she knew my mind and sang an empty song to my heart"
"To know one's self, one must go all the way to horror." - Jacques Bossuet
"Marriage is like sharing a root beer float or agreeing to be the back end of a horse costume." -Lemony Snicket
"The betrayal of a friend differs from the treachery of a lover only in the degree of pain, not the kind." - Tom Badgerlock
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths." Arnold Schwarzenegger
"Without conversation, nothing is possible" - Leroy Milton
"My Penis is bigger than everyone else - if everyone else were girls" - Summit 1g
"Freedom cannot be given.it can only be taken away" David Allan Coe
"Men who have made these discoveries before us are not our masters, but our guides."-Seneca
"Look in the mirror... That's your competition" Anonymous
"Social media, it's just the market's answer to a generation that demanded to perform." - Make Happy, Bo Burnham
"Time has taught me patience. But basking in new freedom, I will know all that I possess!"
"How you do something, is how you do everything" - Leroy Milton
"Film has dream, film has music. No form of art goes beyond ordinary consciousness as film does, straight to our emotions, deep into the twilight room of the soul." - Ingmar Bergman
"I am thankful for all of those who said NO to me. It"s because of them I"m doing it myself." -Albert Einstein
"Just because we have a past doesn't mean we have a future."
"If you want to live a happy life, tie it to a goal, not to people or things." - Albert Einstein
"In a perfect world, there would be no mornings" -HMJ
"Sanity and happiness are an impossible combination."  Mark Twain
"It's a helluva start, being able to recognize what makes you happy." - Lucille Ball
"May your trails be crooked, winding, lonesome, dangerous, leading to the most amazing view."  Edward Abbey
"People don't listen, they just wait for their turn to talk"
"I am a Museum full of Art but you had your eyes shut" - Rupi Kaur
"A poor man is like a foreigner in his own country." -Ali ibn Abi Talib
"Music expresses that which cannot be put into words and that which cannot remain silent" - Victor Hugo
"All our dreams can come true, if we have the courage to pursue them" - Walt Disney
"The reason we keep on failing... is we would rather master disappointment, than seek fulfillment." -John Assaraf on Brain-A-Thon
"Happiness only real when shared" -Christopher McCandless
"Experience is one thing you can't get for nothing." - Oscar Wilde
"Some times i open the uber app to see cars around" -loner1337
"I've failed over and over again in my life and that is why I succeed" - Michael Jordan
"Re-examine all you have been told. Dismiss what insults your soul." - Walt Whitman
"It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not."
"Never argue with stupid people, they will drag you down to their level and then beat you with experience." - Mark Twain
"There is nothing in human nature or human history to support the idea that we are morally advancing as a species or that we will overcome the flaws of human nature. We progressed technologically and scientifically, but not morally." - Chris Hedges
"Everybody comes to a point in their life when they want to quit, but it's what you do at that moment that determines who you are." - David Goggins
"Fascism comes along whenever the rich people get the generals to do what they want." - Woody Guthrie
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough."
"We live in the 21st century;in which we see a bright display, decorated with eyes of joy and colors of the sky, turn black and we cant help but break"
"In the depth of winter I finally learned that there was in me an invincible summer." - Albert Camus
"The world is a book, and those who do not travel read only a page." - Saint Augustine
"The world is a pair of ill-fitting pants." -Lemony Snicket
"Humans were made to suffer so God didn't have to."
"Evil men could be destroyed, but nothing could be done with good men who were deluded." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Fear is a mile high, a mile wide, and paper thin."
"One should not build too hard an edifice of conclusion on too soft a foundation of evidence" - Gary from Draftscience
"Life is fucking boring without problems" - A Rock Star
"God breaks the heart again and again and again until it stays open."
"Low self esteem is like driving through life with your hand-break on." - Maxwell Maltz
"Don't waste sunsets with people who will bo gone by sunrise"
"Your Time is limited, So don"t waste it living Someone Else"s Life ." By Steve Jobs
"Sometimes life hits you in the head with a brick. Don't lose faith. "--- Steve Jobs
"It is a most wonderful comfort to sit alone beneath a lamp, book spread before you, and commune with someone from the past whom you have never met." - Kenko
"I"m not interrupting you, I"m putting our conversation in full-duplex mode."  Antone Roundy
"We both fell. Wind blown life in my direction. My hand would extend to you, so we may pick each other up. Courage would be our course through the years. We can both be the Potter of plants." -me
"Have the courage to follow your heart and intuition. They somehow already know what you truly want to become" - Steve Jobs
"The key to strengthening one's intellect is to make up one's mind about nothing; to let the mind be a thoroughfare for all thoughts." -John Keats
"Leadership is the art of getting someone else to do something you want done because he wants to do it."  Dwight Eisenhower
"By the time a man realizes that maybe his father was right, he usually has a son who thinks he"s wrong."- Charles Wadsworth
[OC] Have pity towards none, yet empathy towards all.
"Who are we, if not measured by the impact we have on others" - neil degrasse tyson
"After I'm dead I'd rather have people ask why I have no monument than why I have one." - Cato the Elder (234-149 BC, AKA Marcus Porcius Cato)
"You do what you think is right and let the law catch up" - Thurgood Marshal
"Love is a temporary madness.."
"An eye for an eye only ends up making the whole world blind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The world doesn't always love you, But you never let that define you." -Lajon Witherspoon, Sevendust
"I know it seems hard sometimes but remember one thing. Through every dark night, there's a bright day after that. So no matter how hard it get, stick your chest out, keep ya head up.... and handle it." - Tupac Shakur
"Death is the solution to all problems. No man - no problem." -Joseph Stalin
"If you say that getting the money is the most important thing, you'll spend your life completely wasting your time. You'll be doing things you don't like doing in order to go on living, that is to go on doing thing you don't like doing, which is stupid." -Alan Watts
"My favorite things in life don"t cost any money. It"s really clear that the most precious resource we all have is time" -Steve Jobs
"Fairy tales are more than true: not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten." - Neil Gaiman, Coraline
''They're beautiful'' Random Rebel in Robot Chicken Star Wars Special. What is the origin of this?
"I don't play basketball and my name is not Dennis, but I'm as tall as him and I got a better penis" - 6'11" professional tennis player Ivo Karlovic
[OC] "Behind every beautiful woman, theres someone tired of fucking her."
"In politics stupidity is not a handicap." Napoleon Bonaparte
"To live is the rarest thing in the world. Most people exist, that is all" - Oscar Wilde
"I hate losing. I hate losing more than I want to win....and there's a difference." - Billy Beane
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the Universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying." - Arthur C. Clarke
"If plan A doesn"t work, the alphabet has 25 more letters  204 if you"re in Japan." By Claire Cook
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream." - C.S. Lewis
"Never give in except to convictions of honor and good sense." - Winston Churchill
"Always do you're best. What you plant now, you will harvest later" - Og Mandino
"If you don't read the newspaper, you are uninformed. If you do read the newspaper, you are misinformed." - Mark Twain
"A young man who wishes to remain a sound Atheist cannot be too careful of his reading. There are traps everywhere" - C.S Lewis
[OC] Have sympathy towards no one, but have empathy towards all.
"Only small minds want always to be right" - Louis XIV
"Do one thing every day that scares you." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"If you can dream it, you can do it" Walt Disney
"We are men of action; lies do not become us." - William Goldman, from The Princess Bride
"The freedom of the press has disadvantages but less than the lack of freedom" - Franois Mitterand
"The stupider the regime the more intelligent people get and the more humorous." - Christopher Hitchens
"Maybe love isn't something that comes in full circle. It just ebbs and flows, in and out, just like the people in our lives." - Colleen Hoover, It Ends With Us (2016)
"The richer you get, the more expensive happiness becomes." - Unknown
"We are all broken. We are all pieces and fractures. Our hope is to find others broken in those ways that fit and let us pretend at being whole." -C.E. Lane
"I accept that people are going to call me awful things every day, and I will always defend their right to do so." - Barack Obama
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names." - JFK
"Small things such as this have saved me: how much I love my mothereven after all these years. How powerfully I carry her within me. My grief is tremendous but my love is bigger. So is yours." - Cheryl Strayed
"There's a plot in this country to enslave every man, woman and child. Before I leave this high and noble office, I intend to expose this plot."  President John F. Kennedy 7 days before his assassination
"Some may never live, but the crazy never die." - Hunter S. Thompson
"So we shall let the reader answer this question for himself: who is the happier man, he who has braved the storm of life and lived or he who has stayed securely on shore and merely existed?" - Hunter S. Thompson
"The last thing you ever want to do is give an opponent the moral high ground." - Ryan Holiday
'Only death consistently excites your emotions, whether contemplating it when life is safe and stale, or fleeing it when life is threatened and precious.' - Life of Pi, Martel
"The chief told me to do this by the book - but I'm illiterate!!" - Assy McGee
"I'm looking for the silver lining in Trump's victory and I can't find one." --- Bob Lefsetz
"Dressing well is a form of good manners" -Tom Ford
"The best way to live a full life is to be a child, no matter your age"
"Sometimes it is the people no one imagines anything of who do the things that no one can imagine" - Alan Turing
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas Edison
"Journalism is printing what someone else does not want printed: everything else is public relations." - George Orwell
"It is better to be hated for what you are than to be loved for what you are not." - Andr Gide
"A man is but a product of his thoughts; what he thinks, he becomes."  Mohandas K. Gandhi
"Everybody's a genius, but if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will live it's whole life believing that it's stupid." - Albert Einstein
"Art is not what you see, but what you make others see" - Edgar Degas
"The investor of today does not profit from yesterday's growth." Warren Buffet
"You know you're in love when you can't fall asleep because reality is finally better than your dreams." Dr. Seuss
"The difference between fiction and reality is that fiction must be plausible."
"Time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time." - Marthe Troly-Curtin, Phrynette Married
"One doesn"t just need to be prepared to participate in the economy; one needs to be prepared to be a citizen." - Dan Kaufman
"Our lives are not our own. We are bound to others, past and present, and by each crime and every kindness, we birth our future." - David Mitchell, Cloud Atlas
"We need men with moral courage to speak and write their real thoughts, and to stand by their convictions, even to the very death. We need have no fear of being too radical. The future will verify all grand and brave predictions." Robert Green Ingersoll
"When one door of happiness closes, another opens; but often we look so long at the closed door that we do not see the one which has been opened for us." -Helen Keller
"Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend." -Albert Camus
"Life has no remote.get up and change it yourself!"  Mark A. Cooper
"So all of you people out there who hold these words at such high esteem, you are giving it the power that you so desperately want it to not have" -Idubbbz
"That is the saving grace of humor: If you fail no one is laughing at you." -A. Whitney Brown
"wubba lubba dub dub" - Rick Sanchez
"Hola means hello." - unknown
"You cant handle the truth! Son we live in a world that has walls, and those have to be guarded by men with guns...." (Lieutenant J.G. Daniel Kaffe, screenplay by Aaron Sorkin)
"This country has everything that it always had before except the leadership in Washington that this country requires" -Ronald Reagan
"Don't wish for things to be easier, wish for yourself to get better" - Jim around
"This very moment you are the oldest you've ever been, and the youngest you'll ever be again." - My High school Economics Teacher?
"You know you are doing well when you lose the interest of looking back."  Unknown
"Until you cross the bridge of your insecurities, you can't begin to explore your possibilities." -Tim Fargo
"Heaven has the better climate, but Hell has the better company."  Benjamin Wade, 1885
"No one is more himself than the moment when he's laughing at a joke." - George Carlin
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work" - Thomas A. Edison
"Dick Cheney. Darth Vader. Satan. That's power." --- Steve Bannon
"Nothing is impossible, the word itself says 'I'm possible" Audery Hepburn
"Let us sacrifice our today so that our children can have a better tomorrow." A. P. J. Abdul Kalam
"Make sure that today and every yesterday from now on are the 'good old days...."
"It's amazing how a little tomorrow can make up for a whole lot of yesterday." - John Guare
'One of the penalties for refusing to participate in politics is that you end up being governed by your inferiors.' - Plato
"She was the kind of girlfriend God gives you young, so you'll know loss the rest of your life." - Junot Daz
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on" - Robert Frost
'A friend is a second self." Self-collected
"Talent hits a target no one else can hit, genius hits a target no one else can see" - Arthur Schopenhauer
"There is no greater heaven than the heart of a loving mother." - Bangambiki Habyarimana
"You can't cross the sea merely by standing and staring at the water." Rabindranath Tagore
"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing." - Edmund Burke
"There are two types of people in this world, those who get things done because people tell them they can do it, and those who get things done because people tell them they can't" - Rudolf P Belmar
"Success is walking from failure to failure with no loss of enthusiasm" - Winston Churchill
"Real Eyes, Realize, Real Lies" -Tupac
"Poor men want to be rich, rich men want to be king, and a king ain't satisfied 'til he rules everything." - Bruce Springsteen
"I"m not a person who defends myself very often. I kind of let my actions speak for me."  Tom Brady
"Chill aight?" -me
"It's the bally ballyness of it all that makes it all seem so bally bally." - Bertie Wooster (P.G. Wodehouse)
"Human history becomes more and more a race between education and catastrophe." - H. G. Wells
"In the end, it's not the years in your life that count. It's the life in your years." - Abraham Lincoln
"Women are like donkeys. When you ignore them, they want to spend time with you, but when you try to woo them, they run away." - A Turkish war hero, Abdul Ossel
"If you're not comfortable being alone, you need better company."
"Life is like a rollercoaster, it has it's ups and down, twists and turns, sudden stops & sudden drops, but most importantly, it has a beginning and end. It's up to you if you fear the rollercoaster, or if you brave the rollercoaster"
"A good story, just like a good sentence, does more than one job at once. That's what literature is: a story that does more than tell a story, a story that manages to reflect in some way the multilayered texture of life itself. "Karen Thompson Walker
"Sometimes people are beautiful. Not in looks. Not in what they say. Just in what they are." - Markus Zusak
"The past holds mistakes, the future holds forgiveness.. But in the present, you're fucked."
"You yourself, as much as anybody in the entire universe, deserve your love and affection."-Buddha
"Of course there is no formula for success, except perhaps an unconditional acceptance of life, and what it brings"---Arthur Rubinstein
"Doing the day's work day by day, doing a little, adding a little, broadening our bases wanting not only for ourselves but for others also, a fairer chance for all people everywhere......(comments)" - John Gilbert Winant
"The best way to pay for a lovely moment is to enjoy it" Richard Bach
"You cannot find peace by avoiding life." - Virginia Woolf
"This life"s hard, but it"s harder if you"re stupid." - George V. Higgins
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself" - George Bernard Shaw
"Do what you love and try not to look at what other people occupy themselves with. Most people seem restless and bounce around too much to focus or even pay attention enough to themselves to figure out exactly what they really do love, as opposed to what the people that surround them are doing."
"Find out what you are afraid of and go live there" - Chuck Palahniuk
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." -William Shakespeare, All's Well That Ends Well
"When the senses are shaken, and the soul is driven to madness, who can stand?"  William Blake
"The only source of knowledge is experience. " Albert Einstein
"The greatest gift that you can give to others is the gift of unconditional love and acceptance." -Brian Tracy
"If you pay attention - what I sing, the guitar sings too, and what the guitar says, I say." -Fred Mcdowell
"When I think about my relationship with America, I feel like a battered wife: Yeah, he knocks me around a lot, but boy, he sure can dance." - Sarah Vowell
'Almost everything that is great has been done by youth' -Benjamin Disraeli
"The run I was on made Jagger and Richards look like droopy-eyed armless children." -- Charlie Sheen
"Sister is probably the most competitive relationship within the family, but once the sisters are grown, it becomes the strongest relationship." Margaret Mead
"Value is determined by sacrifice."
"A single act of kindness throws out roots in all directions, and the roots spring up and make new trees." - Amelia Earhart
"If you hear the dogs, keep going. If you see the torches in the woods, keep going. If you hear shouting behind you, don't ever stop. If you want a taste of freedom, keep going."
"My formula for human greatness is amor fati: that one wants nothing to be different, not in the future, not in the past, not for all eternity. Not only to endure what is necessary, still less to conceal it  all idealism is falseness in the face of necessity  , but to love it..." - Nietzsche
"The man who asks a question is a fool for a minute, the man who does not ask is a fool for life." - Confucius
"Clap your hands everybody, now everybody clap your hands. We're lambda lambda lambda and omega mu. We came here on stage tonight to do our show for you." - Revenge of the Nerds
"Far better it seems to me, in our vulnerability, is to look death in the eye and to be grateful every day for the brief but magnificent opportunity that life provides" -Carl Sagan
"Don't let everything wrong that's happened to you destroy the chances of everything that could go right for you."
"Should the nation's wealth be redistributed? It has been and continues to be redistributed to a few people in a manner strikingly unhelpful." -- Kurt Vonnegut
"If you can't achieve greatness, you can always aspire to be a warning to others." --- /u/feor1300
"Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tossed to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!" Emma Lazarus. Statue of Liberty Plaque.
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." -Bernard M. Baruch
"I like the night. Without the dark, we'd never see the stars' - Stephenie Meyer
"Find out what you like doing best, and get someone to pay you for it." Katharine Whitehorn
"Hodor" - Hodor
'Don't sweep the itching powder off of the stable floor.' - I came up with this quote the other day and would really like to hear some of your opinions/interpretations, Thanks.
"Artists do not need dealers; they just need walls" - Patrick Mimran
"It takes 20 years to build a reputation and five minutes to ruin it. If you think about that, you'll do things differently." Warren Buffett
"Not even LSD prepared me for Trump." - Lewis Black
"Fact: Every pic of a rearview mirror taken in New Jersey is a Sopranos reference."
"No man has a good enough memory to be a successful liar."-Abraham Lincoln
"If we don"t believe in freedom of expression for people we despise, we don"t believe in it at all."  Noam Chomsky
"Be obscure clearly."- E. B. White
"People generally see what they look for, and hear what they listen for." Harper Lee
"hustler's of the world, there is one mark you can not beat: the mark inside." - william s. burroughs
"Management is doing things right; leadership is doing the right things" - Peter F. Drucker
"The baby boomers are the most spoiled, most self-centered, most narcissistic generation the country"s ever produced," Bernie Sanders
"I'm a street walking cheetah, with a heart full of napalm. I am the runaway son of the nuclear A-bomb." - Iggy Pop
"You must make a decision that you are going to move on. It wont happen automatically. You will have to rise up and say, "I don"t care how hard this is, I don"t care how disappointed I am, I"m not going to let this get the best of me. I"m moving on with my life." - Joel Osteen
"I am a railing by the torrent: let those who can, grasp me. A crutch, however, I am not!" -Thus Spoke Zarathustra, Nietszche
"Where the hell do you put the bayonet?" - Chesty Puller, after seeing a flamethrower for the first time.
"America... just a nation of two hundred million used car salesmen with all the money we need to buy guns and no qualms about killing anybody else in the world who tries to make us uncomfortable." - Hunter S Thompson
"He who has the courage to laugh is almost as much a master of the world as he who is ready to die." - Giacomo Leopardi
"Youth is the gift of nature, but age is a work of art." - Stanislaw Jerzy Lec
'You Miss 100% Of The Shots You Don't Take.' You Need To Start Shooting At Your Goals
"The EU tackles growing aviation emissions"
"Remember, democracy never lasts long. It soon wastes, exhausts, and murders itself. There never was a democracy yet that did not commit suicide" - John Adams
"The problem with learning the truth about things is that you lose the confidence that comes from being dumb." - D.B.C. Pierre, Vernon God Little
"I own several Bibles that I'd gladly bean you in the head with because Lord knows you need some Jesus"
"The ones that call everyone else for idiots are usually idiots themselves" - Me
"The only failure is not trying." By Robin Sharma
"And then I felt sad because I realized that once people are broken in certain ways..."
"... all debate about the truth or falsity of a totalitarian dictator"s prediction is as weird as arguing with a potential murderer about whether his future victim is dead or alive..." - Hannah Arendt
"My philosophy is that worrying means you suffer twice." - Newt Scamander
"All men dream: but not equally. Those who dream by night in the dusty recesses of their minds wake in the day to find that it was vanity: but the dreamers of the day are dangerous men, for they may act their dreams with open eyes, to make it possible."  T.E. Lawrence
"Nothing in the world can take the place of perseverance. Talent will not; nothing is more common than unsuccessful people with talent. Genius will not; unrewarded genius is almost legendary. Education will not; the world is full of educated derelicts."  Calvin Coolidge
"We can complain because rose bushes have thorns, or rejoice because thorn bushes have roses." -Abraham Lincoln
"No one ever told me that falling in love feels so much like fear." - Me
"Art washes away from the soul the dust of every day life." - Pablo Picasso
"The mind is everything. What you think you become." By Buddha SUGGESTION: Always think positive.
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"If we don't believe in freedom of expression for people we despise, we don't believe in it at all." - Noam Chomsky
"You have your way. I have my way. As for the right way, the correct way, and the only way, it does not exist." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Those who do not move, do not notice their chains" - Rosa Luxemburg
"For most of us the problem isn"t that we aim too high and fail - it"s just the opposite - we aim too low and succeed." -Ken Robinson, The Element: How Finding Your Passion Changes Everything
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile but is morally treasonable to the American public." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Life's under no obligation to give us what we expect." - Margaret Mitchell
"In order to succeed, we must first believe that we can" Nikos Kazantzakis
"The liberty of a democracy is not safe if the people tolerate the growth of private power to a point where it becomes stronger than their democratic state itself. That, in its essence, is fascism." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"Bringing back the past is just like revisiting what you already learned. Attempting the future just gets you ahead."
"...that the monstrous collection of platitudes which they call a Constitution, which is worse than useless because it can be twisted to mean anything you please by crooked lawyers and grafting politicos, is the ultimate human wisdom. Well, it ain't..." -- Sir Harry Flashman
"Don't tell people how to do things, tell them what to do and let them surprise you with their results" - George S. Patton Jr.
"Whatever your life's work is, do it well. A man should do his job so well that the living, the dead, and the unborn could do it no better." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Don't give up on your dreams. Keep sleeping." - Laziness
"The pendulum of the mind alternates between sense and nonsense, not between right and wrong." - Carl Jung
"Critics are our friends, they show us our faults." - Benjamin Franklin
"It was so much easier to blame it on Them." Terry Pratchett, Jingo
"KEEP GOING, Your hardest times often lead to the greatest moments of your life. KEEP GOING, Tough situations build strong people in the end" -- Roy T. Bennett
"Life's tragedy is that we get old TOO SOON and wise TOO LATE" -- Benjamin Franklin
"Sometimes you have to kind of die inside in order to rise from your own ashes and believe in yourself and love yourself to become a new person." - Gerard Way
"I was interested in everything and committed to nothing." - Gregory David Roberts
"When we die, our bodies become grass, and antelopes eat the grass. That way, we are all connected in the great circle of life." - Mufasa (The Lion King)
"When the enemy is at the door, it is not the time to make tea." -Proverb
"Together, we can build an island, create a community, change the world...and even tip an iceberg. waddle on" -Club Penguin 2017
"Isn't it ironic, Richard Parker? We're in hell yet we're afraid of immortality." - Martel, Life of Pi
"Remember, no man is a failure who has friends."- It's a Wonderful Life
"Freedom in capitalist society always remains about the same as it was in the ancient Greek republics: freedom for the slave-owners" - Vladimir Lenin
"I"m a Leninist, Lenin wanted to destroy the state, and that"s my goal, too. I want to bring everything crashing down, and destroy all of today"s establishment." - Steve Bannon
"The further a society drifts from truth, the more it will hate those who speak it." - George Orwell
"It is only when we truly know and understand that we have a limited time on earth  and that we have no way of knowing when our time is up  that we will begin to live each day to the fullest, as if it was the only one we had."  Elizabeth Kubler-Ross
"Like success, failure is many things to many people. With positive mental attitude, failure is a learning experience, a rung on the ladder, and a plateau at which to get your thoughts in order to prepare to try again."  W. Clement Stone
"Life is full of beauty. Notice it. Notice the bumble bee, the small child, and the smiling faces. Smell the rain, and feel the wind. Live your life to the fullest potential, and fight for your dreams."  Ashley Smith
"You see things; and you say, "Why?" But I dream things that never were; and I say, "Why not?""  George Bernard Shaw
"Only one man in a thousand is a leader of men - the other 999 follow women" - Groucho Marx
"Strong minds discuss Ideas,Average minds discuss events,Weak minds discuss people." By Socrates
"Do something today that your future self will thank you for." - Unknown
"The first casualty when war comes is truth." -Senator Hiram Warren Johnson, 1918
"Only put off until tomorrow what you are willing to die having left undone." -Pablo Picasso
"Win if you can, lose if you must, but never quit" - Cameron Trammell
"If a man looks at the world when he is 50 the same way he looked at it when he was 20 and it hasn"t changed, then be has wasted 30 years of his life." - Muhammed Ali
"Positive anything is better than negative nothing." Elbert Hubbard
"Any man in my position, the last place that he would go is Africa and Egypt. The first stop would have been Paris, London, France like the rest of them." - Muhammad Ali, Harlem, NY 1964
"Be happy for this moment. This moment is your life" Omer Khayyam
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life."- Charles Darwin
"Hard work beats talent when talent doesn't work hard" -- Tim Notke
"Love all, trust a few, do wrong to none." - William Shakespeare
"Everything in the world is about sex except sex. Sex is about power." - Oscar Wilde
"I want to play in Spain or in Europe"- alon mizrahi, former israeli football player and idiot.
"Victory is changing the hearts of your opponents by gentleness and kindness". - Saladin -
"What's great about this country is that America started the tradition where the richest consumers buy essentially the same things as the poorest. You can be watching TV and see Coca-Cola, and you know that the President drinks Coke..." Andy Warhol
"Some people would rather live with reassuring lies than inconvenient truths" -- ??
"I've found that those who most often cite 'human nature' are often those who least comprehend human nature." - George Gnarlin'
"You have had your chance to correct America"s course, and you have failed." Vince Flynn, Term Limits
'The wise man doth think he is wise / The wise man knows himself to be a fool.' - Shakespeare
"I am no longer accepting the things I cannot change. I am changing the things I cannot accept" - Angela Davis
"Relationships are like electric currents, wrong connections will give you shocks throughout your life, but the right ones will lighten up your life". - Leonardo Dicaprio
"People say, "My phone sucks." No, it doesn"t! The shittiest cellphone in the world is a miracle. Your life sucks. Around the phone."- Bill Hicks
"Talent will get you in the door, but character will keep you in the room"
"Often, people work long hard hours at jobs they hate, to earn money to buy things they don't need, to impress people they don't like." - Nigel Marsh
"A thought, even a possibility, can shatter and transform us." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Choose to be optimistic, it feels better."  Dalai Lama XIV
"We would accomplish many more things if we did not think of them as impossible."  Vince Lombardi
"Everyday above ground is a great day" - Pitbull
"Those who can make you believe absurdities can make you commit atrocities." -- Voltaire
"It don't matter whether you win by an inch or a mile, winning is winning." Vin Diesel, The Fast and The Furious
:)
"Whether you think you can or you think you can't, you're right." - Henry Ford
"One life is all we have and we live it as we believe in living it. But to sacrifice what you are and to live without belief, that is a fate more terrible than dying." -Joan of Arc
"If your actions create a legacy that inspires others to dream more, learn more, do more and become more, then, you are an excellent leader" - Dolly Parton
"If something burns your soul with purpose and desire, it is your duty to be reduced to ashes by it. Any other form of existence will be yet another dull book in the library of life." - Charles Bukowski
"the truth will set you free, but first it will make you miserable." -james a. garfield-
"There is nothing either good or bad, but thinking makes it so." - William Shakespeare, Hamlet
"Judging yourself and others is foolishness. Correcting yourself and believing in yourself is Maturity." - Tata Litta
"Never make permanent decision on temporary feelings"
"We think too much and feel too little." - Charlie Chaplin
'Life is half spent before we know what it is.' - George Herbert
"We live in a time when our world is changing at an unprecedented rate. While the changes are largely of our own making, they cannot be ignored. We must adjust and adapt and control, or we perish." -Carl Sagan, The Dragons of Eden, 1977
"The Presidency is Supposed to Age the President, not the Public" - Jon Stewart
"The party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command."
"America the brave still fears what we don't know" - Macklemore
"A diamond is merely a lump of coal that did well under pressure."-Unknown Author
"War does not determine who is right  only who is left."- Mahatma Gandhi
"War does not determine who is right  only who is left." -"War does not determine who is right  only who is left." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The wound is the place where the light enters you" -Rumi
"The Present is the Gift" -Xdexter23
"Promise me you'll always remember: You're braver than you believe, and stronger than you seem, and smarter than you think." - A.A Milne
"The key to success is playing the hand you were dealt like it was the hand you wanted." - Kaitlyn Walsh
"Tolerance is also one kind of patience."
"We either make ourselves miserable, or we make ourselves strong. The amount of work is the same."  Carlos Castaneda
"Keep love in your heart. A life without it is like a sunless garden when the flowers are dead."  Oscar Wilde
"A judge that likes every outcome he reaches is likely a bad judge." - Neil Gorsuch
"It"s the idea held by generations of citizens who believed that America is a constant work in progress..."
"For me, it is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring." -Carl Sagan
"The loneliest people are the kindest. The saddest people smile the brightest. The most damaged people are the wisest. All because they do not wish to see anyone else suffer the way they do.'' -Anonymous
"A child-like man is not a man whose development has been arrested; on the contrary, he is a man who has given himself a chance of continuing to develop long after most adults have muffled themselves in the cocoon of middle-aged habit and convention." -Aldous Huxley
"Christianity does not start with an understanding of God. But with a choice that defines the World." -Anonymous
"Sometimes I can feel my bones straining under the weight of all the lives I'm not living."  Jonathan Safran Foer
"Success is a journey, not a destination"
"If you would stress kindness, first and foremost your goal is to ensure people actually can be kind. Secondly, learn how to fight. The second goal is so you can handle folks who pay no heed to the first goal." - Jon Stew Art
"We don't develop courage by being happy every day. We develop it by surviving difficult times and challenging adversity." Barbara De Angelis
"Judge of a man by his questions rather than by his answers." -- Voltaire
"It is clear that the individual who persecutes a man, his brother, because he is not of the same opinion, is a monster." The Philosophical Dictionary, Voltaire
"If one's different, one's bound to be lonely."
"The flame of religious belief is fueled inexhaustibly by the fears of death, oblivion, and meaninglessness." -Irvin D. Yalom, "When Nietzsche Wept"
'The best way to find out how it is like to be eaten alive, is to turn worrying into a hobby'
"We have now sunk to a depth at which restatement of the obvious is the first duty of intelligent men" -George Orwell
"Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tossed to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!" - Statue of Liberty poem
"Soon is not as good as now." - Seth Godin
"Soon is bit as good as now." - Seth Godin
"Regret is to refuse reality"- Jim Eckert
"It is better to have a short life that is full of what you like doing than a long life spent in a miserable way." -Alan Watts
"Victims make excuses. Leaders deliver results." By Robin Sharma, -- ASK ME FOR ANY SUGGESTION
"Well, you did ask for sign" - God
'Every man dies, not every man really lives.' - William Wallace
"The pain of parting is nothing to the joy of meeting again." - Charles Dickens
"Home is the place where, when you have to go there, they have to take you in." - Robert Frost
"When you are in love you can"t fall asleep because reality is better than your dreams." Dr Seuss
"An eye for an eye leaves us all blind."
"Age is something that doesn't matter, unless you are a cheese."-Luis Bunue
"Those who can make you believe absurdities, can make you commit atrocities." - Voltaire
"Q: Why was six scared of seven? A: Because seven "ate" nine." self-collected
"May you live in interesting times" -the Chinese curse
"Pressure makes diomonds"
"Racial discrimination in any form and in any degree has no justifiable part whatever in our democratic way of life." -Justice Murphy, dissenting, Korematsu v United States 323 U.S. 214 (1944)
"Man invented language to satisfy his deep need to complain." Lily Tomlin
"Tears are running down the cheeks of the Statue of Liberty tonight as a grand tradition of America, welcoming immigrants, that has existed since America was founded, has been stomped upon" - Chuck Schumer
"The quickest way to make someone an enemy is to treat them like an enemy." - unknamed
"First they came for the Socialists, and I did not speak out Because I was not a Socialist. Then they came for..."
"Don't look back, that's not where you're going" - Inga Copeland
"Nothing makes the earth seem so spacious as to have friends at a distance; they make the latitudes and longitudes." Henry David Thoreau
"To forgive is to set a prisoner free and discover that the prisoner was you." - Lewis B. Smedes
[Request] Quote such as "Hello, is there anyone out there"
"A gente vai contra a corrente at no poder resistir (We will fight the current until we can no longer resist)!" -Chico Buarque de Hollanda, 1967, Brazilian Military Dictatorship
"When a society comes together and makes decisions in harmony, when it respects its most noble traditions, cares for its most vulnerable members, treats its forests and lands with respect, then it will prosper and not decline."  Buddha
"To be hopeful in bad times..."
"Sometimes giving someone a second chance is like giving them an extra bullets for their gun because they missed you the first time."
"They who can give up essential liberty to obtain a little temporary safety deserve neither liberty nor safety." -Benjamin Franklin
"The problems that exist in the world today cannot be solved by the level of thinking that created them."  Albert Einstein
"Sometimes (especially in times of protest) we need a gentle about the importance of choosing what we say and how we say it wisely." -Bulldog Drummond
"With shortness of breath, you explained the infinite, How rare and beautiful it is to even exist"  Sleeping at Last
"America is the only country that went from barbarism to decadence without civilisation in between." Oscar Wilde
"Where justice is denied, where poverty is enforced, where ignorance prevails, and where any one class is made to feel that society is an organized conspiracy to oppress, rob and degrade them, neither persons nor property will be safe." Frederick Douglass
"There may be times when we are powerless to prevent injustice, but there must never be a time when we fail to protest."Elie Wiesel
" Stop criticizing yourself for your failures. Start Appreciating yourself for your Achievements." By Sandeep Maheshwari Tip: Do Focus on Positivity.
"Progress is impossible without change, and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything." - George Bernard Shaw
"You miss 100% of the shots you don't take. -Wayne Gretzky" -Michael Scott
"Dont wish for it, work for it"
"We are more in love with desire than with the desired." -Irvin D. Yalom, "When Nietzsche Wept"
"A hungry stomach , an empty pocket and a broken heart can teach you the best lessons of life. "
"A hungry stomach , an empty pocket and a broken heart can teach you the best lessons of life. "
"A hungry stomach , an empty pocket and a broken heart can teach you the best lessons of life. "
'You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough.' - Mae West
"An empty wallet , an empty stomach and a broken heart can teach you some of the best lessons of life."
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing." - Socrates
"An eye for an eye only ends up making the whole world blind." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The journey of a thousand miles begins with one step." By Lao Tzu , Ask me for Any Suggestion (Tip).
"Why do cows wear bells? Their horns don"t work." self-collected
"You had to deal every day with people who were foolish and lazy and untruthful and downright unpleasant, and you could certainly end up thinking that the world would be considerably improved if you gave them a slap. But you didn't because, as Miss Tick had once explained: (quote too long)
"It is difficult to get a man to understand something, when his salary depends on his not understanding it." -- I think is pretty relevant to what is happening in USA right now
"Life is like a very long TV show, without a remote control."- Author Unknown
"You don"t have to be great to start, but you have to start to be great" By Zig Ziglar , Ask me for any Suggestion :)
"To be happy, we must not be too concerned with others." Albert Camus
"Competition brings out the best in products and the worst in people." David Sarnoff
"If you want to know what a man's like, take a good look at how he treats his inferiors, not his equals." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire
"There's something about an underdog that really inspires the unexceptional." -- Robert California
"Being against evil doesn't make you good. Tonight I was against it and then I was evil myself. I could feel it coming just like a tide. I just want to destroy them. But when you start taking pleasure in it you are awfully close to the thing you're fighting." -Ernest Hemingway, Islands in the Stream
"We are united, in that we are all human beings and we are all together on this horrible, painful, joyous, exciting and mysterious ride that is being alive." - David Harbour
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it."-Charles R. Swindoll
"Today I choose life. Every morning when I wake up I can choose joy, happiness, negativity, pain... To feel the freedom that comes from being able to continue to make mistakes and choices - today I choose to feel life, not to deny my humanity but embrace it. " Kevyn Aucoin
"Good, better, best. Never let it rest. Till your good is better and your better is best."-St.Jerome
"The individual is content with the hypocrisy that is civilization until the word beats a path to their front lawn" - unkown
"...and when one of them meets the other half, the actual half, whether he be a lover of youth or a lover of another sort, the pair are lost in an amazement of love and friendship and intimacy and one will not be out of the other's sight, as I may say, even for a moment..." - Plato
"We must take sides Silence encourages the tormentor, never the tormented."  Elie Wiesel
"Sometimes it's the very people who no one imagines anything of who do the things no one can imagine." - Christopher Morcom (The Imitation Game)
"Someone else's success does not preclude your own ability to achieve." --Tommy Kail
"Nobody loves this country like the people who leave everything behind to earn their place in this country. To come to this country to work hard, nobody loves America like those people. There is no victim more ill-suited than the people he has singled out this week." -Cyrus Habib, Lt. Gov WA State
"when a child gives you a gift, even if it is a rock they just picked up, exude gratitude. it may be the only thing they have to give, and they have chosen to give it to you" Dean Jackson
"Be kind to those you love and be kind to those you don't..." -Andrew Jackson Jihad
"You haven't won the race, if in winning the race you have lost the respect of your competitors." - Paul Elvstrm
"The strength of civil disobedience, the vigor of love overcomes the violence of dictatorship; Give us our men back; Women were standing here, defeating death; Jewish men were free."
"Nobody owes you nothing. Life is what you make it to be!"- ?
"Your attitude, not your aptitude, will determine your altitude." - Zig Ziglar
"Every master was once a beginner. Every pro was once an amateur." - Robin Sharma
"How in the hell could a man enjoy being awakened at 6:30 a.m. by an alarm clock, leap out of bed, dress, force-feed, piss, brush teeth, and fight traffic to get to a place where essentially you made lots of money for somebody else and were asked to be grateful for the opportunity to do so?"
"Success is achieved twice. Once in the mind and the second time in the real world." By Azim Premji , Tip : Do the Creative Visualization daily.
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"Freedom has many difficulties and democracy is not perfect, but we have never had to put a wall up..." - JFK
"I really only love God as much as I love the person I love the least.", Dorothy Day
"Life is really simply, but we insist on making it complicated" Confucius
"We don't lock our doors before bed because we hate people outside. We lock them because we love the people inside." - Malik Obama
" The greatest gift of life is friendship, and I have received it." Hubert H. Humphrey
"Strength does not come from physical capacity. It comes from an indomitable will." -- Mahatma Gandhi
"nowadays people know the price of everything and the value of nothing." -Lord Henry in 'The Picture Of Dorian Gray' by Oscar Wilde.
"Death is not the greatest loss in life. The greatest loss is what dies inside us while we live." - Norman Cousins
"Fists hurts but guns kills."
"Problems are only opportunities in work clothes."  Henry J. Kaiser
"A day without laughter is a day wasted."-Charlie Chaplin
"Beauty is power and elegance, right action, form fitting function, intelligence, and reasonability. And very often expressed in curves." - Kim Stanley Robinson, Red Mars
"Scratch the surface of every American celebrity of Chinese heritage and you will find that, no matter how stellar their achievements, no matter how great their contribution to U.S. society, virtually all of them have had their identities questioned at one point or another." --- Iris Chang
"Flowers are so inconsistent! But I was too young to know how to love her . . ." - The Little Prince, Antoine de Saint-Exupry
"A real man loves his wife, and places his family as the most important thing in life. Nothing has brought me more peace and content in life than simply being a good husband and father." Frank Abagnale
"The most important thing to do in your life is to not interfere with somebody else"s life."  Frank Zappa
"life teaches you how to live it"--Tony Bennet
" Smile more than you cry, give more than you take and love more than you hate."-Author Unknown
"The face of terror is not the true faith of Islam. That's not what Islam is all about. Islam is peace. These terrorists don't represent peace. They represent evil and war." - George W Bush (September 17, 2001)
"You think that a wall as solid as the earth separates civilisation from barbarism. I tell you the division is a thread, a sheet of glass. A touch here, a push there, and you bring back the reign of Saturn."  John Buchan (1875-1940) "The Power-House," Blackwood's Magazine (December 1913)
"One machine can do the work of fifty ordinary men. No machine can do the work of one extraordinary man." - Elbert Hubbard
"The mind, once stretched by a new idea, never returns to its original dimensions."- Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Time makes more converts than reason." - Thomas Paine
"Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tost to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!" - Emma Lazarus, "The New Colossus"
"If the wind of change blows, some will build sailing ships and others will build walls."
"I spent 9 months shaping your heart, don't let anyone crush it within a second" Anonymous
"If every night is legendary, no night is legendary." -Ted Mosby on How I Met Your Mother
"I think we all grapple with the paradox of knowing tomorrow's not promised, but making plans anyway." - Lin-Manuel Miranda
"It's too early to start day drinking. Maybe tonight." - Anonymous
"Why don"t you fuck off and die, why don"t you fuck off and die  and not in that order." - British foreign secretary Boris Johnson
"When men fight with one another, and the wife of the one draws near to rescue her husband from the hand of him who is beating him, and puts out her hand and seizes him by the private parts, then you shall cut off her hand."  Deuteronomy 25:11-12
"Questions are like guns: Things get interesting when they're loaded."
"There are no secrets to success. It is the result of preparation, hard work, and learning from failure."  Colin Powell
" If I knew where the good songs came from, I'd go there more often." - Leonard Cohen
"Time doesn't exist, clocks exist"
"Good,better,best.Never let it rest.Till your good is better and your better is best" St.Jerome
"Let us remember we are all part of one American family. We are united in common values, and that includes belief in equality under the law, basic respect for public order, and the right of peaceful protest." Barack Obama
"Just as a candle cannot burn without fire, men cannot live without a spiritual life." - Buddha
"Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful, committed, citizens can change the world. Indeed, it is the only thing that ever has." --Margaret Mead
"There ain't no answer. There ain't gonna be any answer. There never has been an answer. That's the answer." -Gertrude Stein
"You never know how strong you are, until being strong is your only choice."  Bob Marley
""We build too many walls and not enough bridges." - Isaac Newton" - Donald J. Trump
'When two locusts fight, it is always the crow who feasts.' - Obama
"When I said I would die a bachelor, I did not think I should live till I were married." - William Shakespeare, Much Ado About Nothing
"Most people think happiness is about gaining something, but it"s not. It"s all about getting rid of the darkness you accumulate."  Unknown
"Communism builds walls to keep people in. Capitalism builds wall to keep people out. In any case it is a pathetic state that the people cannot go where they want to, or don't want to be where they are." - Marc-Uwe Kling
"Communism built walls to keep people in. Capitalism builds walls to keep people out. In any case it's a pathetic state, that the people either want to be were they aren't, or are where they don't want to be" - Marc-Uwe Kling
"i love her so much that I will do anything for her I will destroy my life for her I will kill someone for her I will always make love to her even if it means me dying of aids ... I can't do anything but I will do you everything for you "
"There are two ways of spreading light: to be the candle or the mirror that reflects it."- Edith Wharton
"Earn money until you are tired of earning"
"That's libertarians for you  anarchists who want police protection from their slaves." - Kim Stanley Robinson, Green Mars
"Earn money you are tired earning"- selfquote
"They wrote in the old days that it is sweet and fitting to die for one"s country. But in modern war there is nothing sweet nor fitting in your dying. You will die like a dog for no good reason." - Ernest Hemmingway
"Family is not an important thing. It's everything". Michael J. Fox
"Ships in harbor are safe, but thats not what ships are built for." - John Shedd
"[The Presidency] can't be something that you pursue on the basis of vanity and ambition," he said. "I think there's a certain soberness and seriousness required when you think about that office that is unique." - Barack Obama, 2006 (Washington Post interview)
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"I'd rather my death give a weary person some respite than mandate that they stand and consider me." - u/MiscellaneousShrub on memorial benches
"I think it's funny that people who treat you like shit get offended when you finally do the same to them." -Will Ferrell
"If you can't solve a problem, it's because you're playing by the rules." - Paul Arden
"Give a man a little bit of power and he falls in all kinds of love with himself." - Booker DeWitt
"When you come out of the storm, you won"t be the same person who walked in. That"s what this storm"s all about." - Haruki Murakami
"If you don't know where you are going, any road will take you there." - Lewis Carroll
"Those who can make you believe absurdities, can make you commit atrocities." - Voltaire
"What a country chooses to save is what a country chooses to say about itself."  Mollie Beattie
"I'm a street-walking cheetah with a heart full of napalm." - Iggy Pop
"The man who works and is never bored is never old. Work and interest in worthwhile things are the best remedy for age." -Pau Casals
"Nothing really worth having comes quickly and easily. If it did, I doubt that we would ever grow."  Eknath Easwaran
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow; learn as if you were to live forever." -- Mahatma Gandhi
"The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of the strong." -- Mahatma Gandhi
"Obstacles are those frightful things you see when you take your eyes off your goal."  Henry Ford
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened."
"success is not the property of brilliants it belongs to those who believes in hard work"
"If you want to increase your success rate, double your failure rate." - Thomas J. Watson
"If we were to select the most intelligent, imaginative, energetic, and emotionally stable third of mankind, all races would be present." - Franz Boas
"People inspire you or they drain you - pick them wisely." -- Hans F. Hansen
"The best books, he perceived, are those that tell you what you know already." - George Orwell
"Society is a fraud so complete and venal that it demands to be destroyed beyond the power of memory to recall its existence." - Richard Linklater's Waking Life [2001]
"YEAHHHH" - Lil Jon
"Some of us think holding on makes us strong, but sometimes it is letting go." - Herman Hesse
"A person who never made a mistake never tried anything new" Albert Einstein
"It is easier to build strong children than to repair broken men." Frederick Douglass
"My life isn't perfect. I woke up with stresses, aches, and pains. I have desires that are unfulfilled. But, I woke up today and I have everything I need to get me to a better tomorrow. Those are two colossal blessings that always slip under the radar. Be grateful. Be conscious."
"A house with 5 bathrooms is nice, but I found out that no matter how hard I try I can only sit on one toilet at a time." Oliver Brandhouse
"The road to nowhere is paved with excuses" - Mark Bell
"There is only one happiness in this life,to love and be loved" George Sand
"A tree requires stormy weather if it is to attain a proud height. And creativity and discovery are begotten in pain." -Irvin D. Yalom, "When Nietzsche Wept"
"If the injustice is part of the necessary friction of the machine of government..."
"There is only one thing that makes a dream impossible to achieve: the fear of failure." -Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
"If the human brain were so simple that we could understand it, we would be so simple that we couldn"t." - Emerson Pugh
"When patterns are broken, new worlds emerge." - Tuli Kupferberg
"90% of all jazz is half improvisation. So if you play the wrong part, its right. If you play the right part, it might be right if you play it wrong enough. But if you play it too right, it's wrong." -Yogi Berra
"My grandfather once told me that there were two kinds of people: those who do the work and those who take the credit. He told me to try to be in the first group; there was much less competition."  Indira Gandhi
"You never fail until you stop trying." - Albert Einstein
"A man may imagine things that are false, but he can only understand things that are true, for if the things be false, the apprehension of them is not understanding." -- Isaac Newton
"A concept is a brick. It can be used to build a courthouse of reason. Or it can be thrown through the window." -- Gilles Deleuze
"Nobody with a middle eastern guy gets diarrhea"
"Sometimes your best investments are the ones you don't make." - Donald Trump
"Fiction is the truth inside the lie." - Stephen King
"Set your goals high, and your achievements higher."
"Set your goals high, and you're achievements higher."
"I refused to take no for an answer" - Bessie Coleman
"The most brilliant propagandist technique will yield no success unless one fundamental principle is borne in mind constantly - it must confine itself to a few points and repeat them over and over." - Joseph Goebbles
"[David Lee Roth] said I go home to Pasadena now and then and some of my old high school buddies see me and say, well Dave, must be nice, you know, being David Lee Roth. And he said, you know what, on graduation day in high school, we all were on the same starting blocks." [cont.]
"The man who views the world at 50 the same as he did at 20, has wasted 30 years of his life."  Muhammad Ali
"The weight of the world is in words unspoken." -Anonymous
"Believe that life is worth living and your belief will help create the fact."  William James
"Your speed doesn't matters, forward is forward"
"Fight with a happy heart and strong spirit" - General Mad Dog Mattis
"Lenin wanted to destroy the state, and that"s my goal too. I want to bring everything crashing down, and destroy all of today"s establishment." --- White House Chief Strategist Bannon
"Alone we can do so little, together we can do so much." - Helen Keller
.
"From out there on the moon, international politics look so petty. You want to grab a politician by the scruff of the neck and drag him a quarter of a million miles out and say, "Look at that, you son of a bitch.'" - Edgar Mitchell, Apollo 14 Astronaut
"Don't tell me what you think I shouldn't do unless you're also going to tell me what you'd do in my circumstances. If you can't provide an intellectually honest answer you shouldn't be involved." - Elder Wisdom
"Genius is one percent inspiration and ninety-nine percent perspiration." -- (Thomas Edison)
"Our past does not define us. Our future cannot confine us. Our present is where we define us."
"We must believe in free willwe have no other choice." - Isaac Bashevis Singer
"Silence is what did the harm." - Kurt Messerschmidt, holocaust survivor
"Unthinking respect for authority is the greatest enemy of truth." -Albert Einstein
"There is only one thing in the long run more expensive than education: no education." John F. Kennedy
"Americans spend an average of four hours a day watching TV, an hour of that enduring ads. That adds up to an astounding 10% of total leisure time; at current rates, a typical viewer fritters away three years of his life getting bombarded with commercials." - Scott Woolley, Forbes
"Dealing with failure is easy: Work hard to improve. Success is also easy to handle: You've solved the wrong problem. Work hard to improve." - Alan Perlis
"But the audience is right. They're always, always right. You hear directors complain that the advertising was lousy, the distribution is no good, the date was wrong to open the film. I don't believe that. The audience is never wrong. Never." - William Friedkin,
"Don't worry about what anybody else is going to do. The best way to predict the future is to invent it." - Alan Kay
"Those who denounce government interference most loudly depend on it every day." -Cass Sunstein
"Hold my hand; guide my actions and my words. Find me out of this forest. My turns stand true; path guided with light. Fire ignites darkness into oblivion. Wings kept me sheltered...Floating...Hold my hand." -Me
"Unmeasured vituperation, employed on the side of prevailing opinion, really does deter people from expressing contrary opinions, and from listening to those who express them."
"The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Stories make sense when so much around us is senseless, and perhaps what makes them most comforting is that while life goes on and pain goes on, stories do us the favor of ending." - John Hodgman
"Maybe when people longed for a thing that bad the longing made them trust in anything that might give it to them." - Carson McCullers
"The virtue of man ought to be measured, not by his extraordinary exertions, but by his everyday conduct." - Blaise Pascal
"Keep your eyes on the stars, and your feet on the ground." - Theodore Roosevelt
"Pedant" is what somebody who is wrong calls somebody who is correct - Anon
"I can resist everything, except temptation." - Oscar Wilde **Lists in comments**
"Grunt work begets glory." - Jeff Fox
"Who is the happiest of men? He who values the merits of others, and in their pleasure takes joy."  Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
"One man does not make a planet." Me
"A book must be the axe for the frozen sea within us." - Franz Kafka
"Leadership is not about titles, positions or flowcharts. It is about one life influencing another" - John C. Maxwell
" You're Dying One 'What if' At A Time " -Unknown
"... there has never been another day just like today, and there will never be another just like it again ...
"Nobody can hear you. Nobody cares about you. Nothing will come of this." -House of Cards (US; S1 E2)
"Some Fall In Love, Some Just Fall" -Unknown
"Carpe That Fucking Diem" -Unknown
"Carpe That Fucking Diem"  -Unknown
"Try not to become a man of success, but rather try to become a man of value." - Albert Einstein
"I just don"t believe that violence is ever the answer. It is a question. The real answer is far more terrifying." - Welcome to Nightvale, epsiode 19. Written by Joseph Fink and Jeffery Cranor.
"In contradiction and paradox, you can find truth." - Denis Villeneuve
"but, if the world has absolutely no sense, who's stopping us from inventing one?" - Lewis Carroll, Alice in Wonderland
"A Mistake Repeated More Than Once is a Decision"
"The wide world is all about you: you can fence yourselves in, but you cannot for ever fence it out."
"How can we be alive and not wonder about the stories we use to knit together this place we call the world? Without stories, our universe is merely rocks and clouds and lava and blackness." Douglas Coupland
"Never forget what you are. The rest of the world will not. Wear it like armor, and it can never be used to hurt you"
"Credit goes to those who execute ideas, not to those who thought of them. Creative people are doers, they recognize a good idea and execute with their own personalized touch" - Jeffrey Fox
"They have been affected by the skepticism of a skeptical age"- Henry Thoreau
"If you"re in the luckiest 1 percent of humanity, you owe it to the rest of humanity to think about the other 99 percent." - Warren Buffett
"The Gross National Product does not include the beauty of our poetry or the intelligence of our public debate. [...] It measures everything, in short, except that which makes life worthwhile." - Robert F. Kennedy
"When I was a boy I was told that anybody could become President. Now I"m beginning to believe it" Clarence Darrow
"Dance above the surface of the world. Let your thoughts lift you into creativity that is not hampered by opinion." - Red Haircrow
"Opportunity is missed by most people because it is dressed in overalls and looks like work." -- Thomas Edison
"Even if it seems certain that you will lose, retaliate. Neither wisdom nor technique has a place in this. A real man does not think of victory or defeat. He plunges recklessly towards an irrational death. By doing this, you will awaken from your dreams." - Tsunetomo Yamamoto, Hagakure
"So I was sitting in my cubicle today, and I realized, ever since I started working, every single day of my life has been worse than the day before it. So that means that every single day that you see me, that's on the worst day of my life." - Office Space (Peter Gibbons)
"Whether a thought is spoken or not, it is a real thing and has powers of reality." - Frank Herbert
"Suffering has been stronger than all other teaching, and has taught me to understand what your heart used to be. I have been bent and broken, but - I hope - into a better shape." - Charles Dickens, Great Expectations
"But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh They can all get fucked. Just stay true to you" - Eminem
"The most basic and powerful way to connect to another person is to listen. Just listen. Perhaps the most important thing we ever give each other is our attentionA loving silence often has far more power to heal and to connect than the most well-intentioned words." - Rachel Naomi Remen
"The only normal people are the ones you don't know very well"  Alfred Adler
"You're never given a dream without also being given the power to make it true." - Richard Bach
"Tough times never last, but tough people do." - Robert H. Schuller
"Success isn't owned, it's leased. And rent is due every day" - JJ Watt
"At the end of the day, you can either focus on what's tearing you apart or what's holding you together."  Unknown
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"The more he does for others, the happier he is. The more he gives to others, the wealthier he is" - Lao Tzu
"Show me a thoroughly satisfied man and I will show you a failure." -- Thomas Edison
"The significant problems we have cannot be solved at the same level of thinking with which we created them." -- Albert Einstein
"Why is it that when one man builds a wall, the next man immediately needs to know what's on the other side?" - George R.R. Martin, A Game of Thrones
"There are two kinds of people in the world; people that pee in the shower, and fucking liars." - random YouTube kid
"There are two kinds of people in the world. People that pee in the shower and fucking liars." - random kid on youtube
"There's two kinds of people in the world; People that per in the shower, and fucking liars." - random kid on youtube
"You are just as bad as me and you used to be better and that makes you the worse " homer simpson
"Stop worrying about what you have to lose & start focussing on what you have to gain." - Unknown
"If money is your hope for independence, you will never have it. The only real security that a man can have in this world is a reserve of knowledge, experience and ability." - Henry Ford
"If I had asked people what they wanted, they would have said faster horses." - Henry Ford
"If you tell the truth, you don't have to remember anything." - Mark Twain
"When it gets darkest, the stars come out"
"I came here with my dick in my hand." - Mystikal
"It must suck to wake up and be your self everyday!" -Coworker to my boss
"I dream of a world where the truth is what shapes people's politics, rather than politics shaping what people think is true." -Neil Degrasse Tyson
"As to methods, there may be a million and then some. But principles are few. The man who grasps principles can successfully select his own methods" Ralph Waldo Emerson
"You must be shapeless, formless, like water. When you pour water in a cup, it becomes the cup. When you pour water in a bottle, it becomes the bottle. When you pour water in a teapot, it becomes the teapot. Water can drip and it can crash. Become like water my friend." - Bruce Lee
"Poetry searches for music amidst the tumult of the dictionary." -- Boris Pasternak.
"It's so much darker when a light goes out than it would have been if it had never shone." - John Steinbeck
"Stop hating yourself for you everything aren't and start loving yourself for what you already are."
"Hurt people hurt people." - Andrew Garfield
"A patriot must always be ready to defend his country against his government." - Edward Abbey
"Obvious lies serve a purpose for an administration. They watch who challenges them and who loyally repeats them. The people must watch, too." - Garry Kasparov
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." -- Albert Einstein
"To succeed in following your dreams, you must have the courage to be hated."  Paulo Coelho
"I was the least popular at my school. The less popular you are, the more time you have to do your own thing as opposed to trying to fit into everyone else"s thing." - Joel Zimmerman, aka deadmau5
"There are a thousand hacking at the branches of evil to one who is striking at the root." - Henry David Thoreau
"To not to have entirely wasted one"s life seems to be a worthy accomplishment, if only for myself." -Charles Bukowski
"There are eyes everywhere. No blind spot left. What shall we dream of when everything becomes visible? We'll dream of being blind." -Paul Virilio
"Carpe Diem. Seize the day, boys. Make your lives extraordinary" -John Keating (Robin Williams)
"For every minute you are angry, You lose sixty seconds of Happiness." By BK Shivani
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don"t matter and those who matter don"t mind"-- (Dr. Seuss)
"You don't learn to walk by following rules. You learn by doing, and by falling over" -- (Sir Richard Branson)
"I think life's an irrational obsession." - Sean Penn
"Education is the most powerful weapon which you can use to change the world" -- (Nelson Mandela)
"Take the stones people throw at you, and use them to build a monument." By Ratan Tata
"Certainty about the next life is incompatible with tolerance in this one." - Sam Harris
"Imagination is more important than knowledge. Knowledge is limited. Imagination encircles the world." - Albert Einstein
"People to whom nothing has ever happened cannot understand the unimportance of events." - T. S. Eliot
"True love comes quietly, without banners or flashing lights. If you hear bells, get your ears checked." - Erich Segal
"There is nothing quite so useless, as doing with great efficiency, something that should not be done at all." - Peter F. Drucker
"Love is the voice under all silences, the hope which has no opposite in fear; the strength so strong mere force is feebleness: the truth more first than sun, more last than star." - E.E. Cummings 50 love quotes based on different relationships we have.
"Let the world tremble as it senses all you are about to accomplish" - Lus de Cames
"Business isn't about wearing suits or pleasing stakeholders." Sir Richard Branson.
"No matter how you feel today, get up, dress up & show up." Paulo Coelho
"She's a woman, you're a dude. You're not supposed to understand her. That's not what she's after.... She doesn't want you to understand her. She knows that's impossible. She just wants you to understand yourself. Everything else is negotiable." - snow crash
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"More then ever before we can see that humankind in all its diversity has a single planet to live on (a message that too sadly, is still ignored by many)"-Physics textbook
'A penny saved is a penny earned.'- Benjamin Franklin
"Look up like a rain drop to fall. A seed of life to grow. Roots stem to the heart and body. Blossom with beauty and gracefulness." -Me
"Who has never killed an hour? Not casually or without thought, but carefully: a premeditated murder of minutes. " - Mark Z. Danielewski, House of Leaves
"The past has no power over the present moment." - Eckhart Tolle
"'Cause hurt people, hurt people and that's a well known fact."- unknown
"There's only two types of people who are against drugs: the people who have never done drugs and the people who really sucked at doing drugs." - Doug Stnahope
"With all the horrible, horrible shit that your priest is pumping into your kid's head, his dick should be the least of your worries, honestly. That's just a little mouthwash and a few years of therapy'll get rid of that. That Jesus shit will torture you for a lifetime." - Doug Stanhope
"Complaining that a comic is drunk is like going to a titty bar and complaining because your lapdancer is a communist." - Doug Stnahope
"There's no such thing as addiction, there's only things that you enjoy doing more than life." - Doug Stnahope
"I"m smart enough to be aware of everything I don"t know" -Arm Chair Reddit Philospher
"The bird which was made so that it might rove over half of the world, he shuts up into the space of a cubic foot, there to die a slow death in longing and crying for freedom; for in a cage it does not sing for the pleasure of it."
"I traded all of my common sense for a sense of adventure" (Unknown)
"Fear is not real. The only place that fear can exist is in our thoughts of the future. It is a product of our imagination, causing us to fear things that do not at present and may not ever exist. That is near insanity. Do not misunderstand me danger is very real but fear is a choice."
"I wrote a companion piece to The Vagina Monologues called The Penis Apologies." - Andy Bernard
"I wrote a companion to The Vagina Monologues called The Penis Apologies." - Andy Bernard
"You know, the very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common. They don"t alter their views to fit the facts. They alter the facts to fit their views." - Doctor Who.
"Violence is the last refuge of the incompetent" - Isaac Asimov
"Education is what survives when what has been learned has been forgotten." - B. F. Skinner
"My expectations are low and my results are mediocre" -Grace Helbig
"Its better to watch what you can't fuck than to fuck what you can't watch." - Old proverb
"shariah law is reasonable and once u read into the details it makes a lot of sense. People just know the basics" -Linda Sarsour (one of the main organizers of the women's March)
"One becomes one's own parent or remains the eternal child." - Irvin Yalom
"There is no spoon." - Spoon boy, The Matrix
"Nature never deceives us; it is always we who deceive ourselves." -- Jean-Jacques Rousseau
"People were created to be loved. Objects were created to be used. The reason the world is in chaos is because objects are being loved and people are being used."
"Strangers are just family you have yet to come to know."  Mitch Albom (from his film, The Five People You Meet in Heaven)
#cindyism redneck granny quotes
"The American fascists are most easily recognized by their deliberate perversion of truth and fact." - Vice President Henry A. Wallace
"The search for one's own truth! Can there be a more sacred act than self-inquiry?" -Irvin D. Yalom, "When Nietszche Wept"
"Let every child of the Republic learn to live for his God, his land and the Union." - George Washington's Vision
"The most authentic thing about us is our capacity to create, to overcome, to endure, to transform, to love and to be greater than our suffering." - Ben Okri
"How can I travel when my heart must stay lapped here in blood? And on that weary way, how many empty valleys lie ahead, how many horrors wait for us?
"As long as poverty injustice and gross inequality persist in our world none of us can truly rest" -Nelson Mandela
"It is more noble to give yourself completely to one individual than to labor diligently for the salvation of the masses." - Dag Hammarskjold
"There is some good in this world, and it's worth fighting for." - J.R.R. Tolkien, The Two Towers
"I've learned that fear limits you and your vision. It serves as blinders to what may be just a few steps down the road for you. The journey is valuable, but believing in your talents, your abilities, and your self-worth can empower you to walk down an even brighter path..." -Soledad O'Brien
"Be yourself; everyone else is already taken." - Oscar Wilde
"Being unconscious is the ultimate disability" - Jessa Gamble
"I showed my masterpiece to the grown-ups, and asked them whether the drawing frightened them. But they answered: "Frighten? Why should any one be frightened by a hat?" My drawing was not a picture of a hat. It was a picture of a boa constrictor digesting an elephant." [The Little Prince]
"There are some who never would have loved if they never had heard it spoken of." Franois de La Rochefoucauld
"Ah! it is so easy to convert others. It is so difficult to convert oneself. To arrive at what one really believes, one must speak through lips different from one's own. To know the truth one must imagine myriads of falsehoods." - Oscar Wilde
"I'm a rebel to my own agenda" -Erik Espedal
"For he to whom the present is the only thing that is present, knows nothing of the age in which he lives. To realise the nineteenth century one must realise every century that has preceded it and that has contributed to its making. To know anything about oneself one must know all about others."
"The greatest leader is not necessarily the one who does the greatest things. He is the one that gets the people to do the greatest things" - Ronald Reagan
"Cheap editions of great books may be delightful, but cheap editions of great men are absolutely detestable." - Oscar Wilde
"Do not fall in love with people like me..."
"There is no cosmetic for beauty like happiness." - Maria Mitchell
"Always remember that the future comes one day at a time." Dean Acheson
"You know, hope is a mistake. If you can't fix what's broken, you'll go insane" - Mad Max
"If life is predetermined, then you can never be proud of your accomplishments" - Me
"Respect existence, or expect resistance." - Unknown
"I have become death destroyer of worlds" - J. Donald Trumpenheimer
"Attempted murder," now honestly, did they ever give anyone a Nobel prize for "attempted chemistry?" - Sideshow Bob
"She took his hand, squeezed it, held it, and then, all at once, she let it drop..."
"He's more myself than I am. Whatever our souls are made of, his and mine are the same." - Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
"Fighting a war tests a soldier's skills, defending his home tests a soldier's heart." --- Star Wars: The Clone Wars S03E02
"It's tempting to want to live in the past. It's familiar. It's comfortable. But it's where fossils come from." - Steve Rogers
"From now on, ending a sentence with a preposition is something up with which I will not put." - Winston Churchill
"Work while they sleep, so you can live like they dream"
"Strength does not come from winning. Your struggles develop your strengths. When you go through hardships and decide not to surrender, that is strength." - Arnold Schwarzenegger
"Be thankful for what you have; you'll end up having more. If you concentrate on what you don't have, you will never, ever have enough." - Oprah Winfrey
"They don't realize that we are bringing them the plague." - Sigmund Freud to Carl Jung as their ship was arriving in New York
"Stuff in your past is like a carving on the bark of a sapling. Over time, the scar, the carving, won"t go away. Because of the way trees grow, it won"t go up or down much either, it will just stay right where it began. It might even get darker. But it won"t get bigger...
"Stuff in your past is like a carving on the bark of a sapling. Over time, the scar, the carving, won"t go away. Because of the way trees grow, it won"t go up or down much either, it will just stay right where it began. It might even get darker. But it won"t get bigger." - Michael Stevens
"The unity of government which constitutes you one people is also now dear to you...
"To Find Peace, You Have to be Willing to lose your Connection with People, Places and things that Create all the Noise"
"We have the same job we always had; to say as thinking people and as humans, that there are no final solutions, there is no absolute truth, there is no supreme leader, there is no totalitarian solution" - Christopher Hitchens
"The Law of Gravity is nonsense. No such law exists. If I think I float, and you think I float, then it happens."-1984 George Orwell.
"The gene pool needs chlorine" - my bumper sticker
"He is not so mighty yet that he is above fear; nay, doubt ever gnaws him." -Aragorn
"If everything happens for a reason that means you made the right choice even when it"s the wrong choice." - Treyco
'You are free, and that is why you are lost.' - Franz Kafka
"Maybe that's what we look for in the people we love, the spark of unhappiness we think we know how to extinguish." - Tom Perrotta
"A really great man is known by three signs: generosity in the design, humanity in the execution, moderation in success."  Otto von Bismarck
"Earth provides enough to satisfy every man"s needs, but not every man"s greed."  Mahatma Gandhi
"Always remember that you are absolutely unique. Just like everyone else." -Margaret Mead
"Our memory is a more perfect world than the universe: it gives back life to those who no longer exist." - Guy de Maupassant
"No one in this world, so far as I know  and I have researched the records for years, and employed agents to help me  has ever lost money by underestimating the intelligence of the great masses of the plain people. Nor has anyone ever lost public office thereby."  H. L. Mencken
"I hope the time will come when neither men or women are tyrannized by each other's frailties." -Irvin D. Yalom, "When Nietszche Wept"
"A wise man gets more use from his enemies than a fool from his friends" Baltasar Gracian
"A wise man gets more use from his enemies than a fool from his friends" Baltasar Gracian
"No one in this world, so far as I know  and I have researched the records for years, and employed agents to help me  has ever lost money by underestimating the intelligence of the great masses of the plain people. Nor has anyone ever lost public office thereby."  H. L. Mencken,
"I loved her against reason, against promise, against peace, against hope, against happiness, against all discouragement that could be." - Charles Dickens
"If you love something set it free, but don't be surprised if it comes back with herpes." - Chuck Palahniuk
"All my feelings have colours You desire to paint." - Rumi
"Isn't what we mean by 'falling in love' a kind of sickness and craziness, an illusion, a blindness to what the loved person is really like." - Freud
"One constant among the elements of 1914as of any erawas the disposition of everyone on all sides not to prepare for the harder alternative, not to act upon what they suspected to be true." - Barbara W. Tuchman, The Guns of August
"To announce that there must be no criticism of the President, or that we are to stand by the President, right or wrong, is not only unpatriotic and servile, but is morally treasonable to the American public." -Theodore Roosevelt
"If the Plan doesn't works, change the Plan not the Goal."
"The party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command."
"Thinking hurts. However, stupidities come to world without birth pains." - Bielaszewski
"Positive thinking will let you do everything better than negative thinking will." By Zig Ziglar
"If you don"t build your dream, someone else will hire you to help them build theirs." By Dhirubhai Ambani
"Deceiving others,that is what the world calls a romance." - Oscar Wilde
"As for me, I am tormented with an everlasting itch for things remote. I love to sail forbidden seas, and land on barbarous coasts." - Herman Melville
"I crave a dangerous kind of love. One that breaks hearts and bed springs." - Michael Faudet
"Since we all came from a women, got our name from a women, and our game from a women. I wonder why we take from women, why we rape our women, do we hate our women? I think its time we killed for our women, be real to our women, try to heal our women..." -2pac
"There was so much goodness in my life. So much happiness. I wondered whether I deserved any of it."
"The most effective way to destroy people is to deny and obliterate their own understanding of their history." George Orwell
"The party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command... and if all others accepted the lie, which the party imposed, if all records told the same tale, then the lie passed into history and became truth" 1984 - George Orwell
"Compassion is the basis of morality." - Arthur Schopenhauer
"Of all the preposterous assumptions made by humanity over humanity, nothing exceeds most of the criticisms made on the poor by the well-housed, well-fed, and well-warmed." - Herman Melville
"You can tell how smart people are by what they laugh at." - Tina Fey
"Once I saw a bee drown in honey, then I understood." - Nikos Kazantzakis
"Once you label me, you negate me." - Kierkegaard
[Question] Can't remember/find Kubrick quote
"If the Plan doesn't work, change the Plan, Not the Goals" Pagzos.com
"Respect existence, or expect resistance." - Nashville Protest Sign
"If you're going through hell, keep going." - Winston Churchill
'Leadership was all that stood between democracy and the mob'
"All you need is love. But a little chocolate now and then doesn't hurt."  Charles Schulz
"Issa knife" -21 Savage
"Everyone has a plan until they get punched in the mouth." - Mike Tyson
"The road to success is dotted with many tempting parking places."  Author Unknown
"I am not fit for this office and never should have been here." - Warren G Harding
"There are many who dare not kill themselves for fear of what the neighbors will say".Cyril Connolly
'The lion may be a mighty beast, but pride always lifts his gaze to the horizon, never seeing in the grass the viper' - Oberyn Martell
"No act of kindness, no matter how small, is ever wasted." - Aesop
"Some people who affect asceticism and self-denial are uneasy and embarrassed when cunt, cock, and fucking are mentioned, but most men you find like that are without knowledge, honour, nobility, or dignity." - al-Jahiz
"You can do anything, but not everything"David Allen
"The Quality of a leader is reflected in the standards they set for themselves." -Ray Kroc (Forbes quote of the day)
"A house divided against itself cannot stand." - Abraham Lincoln
"Keep your fears to yourself, but share your courage with others" - Robert Louis Stevenson
"America First!" - President Donald J. Trump
"We cannot choose our external circumstances, but we can always choose how we respond to them." - Epictetus
"It's interesting how often people confuse 'evil sounding' music with true evil. By its very nature, music is benevolent. Music means well." - Andrew W.K.
"True love cannot be found where it does not exist, nor can it be denied where it does." - Torquato Tasso
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop."  Confucius
"An investment in knowledge pays the best interest." - Benjamin Franklin
"It was only a sunny smile, and little it cost in the giving, but like morning light it scattered the night and made the day worth living." F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Anyone can find the dirt in everyone. Be the one that find gold"
"What many people do, that they call "trust," is actually.. giving up on trying to understand others." -Akiyama Shinichi
"Nationalism is an infantile disease. It is the measles of mankind." - Albert Einstein
"Incredible change happens in your life when you decide to take control of what you do have power over instead of craving control over what you don't." Steve Maraboli, "Life, the Truth, and Being Free"
"It is the same in all wars; the soldiers do the fighting, the journalists do the shouting, and no true patriot ever gets near a front-line trench, except in the briefest of propaganda-tours." -George Orwell
"Knowing what it feels to be in pain, is exactly why we try to be kind to others." -Jiraiya (Naruto)
"In a democracy people get the leaders they deserve." - Joseph de Maistre
"As a result of my philosophy, I wasn't even upset about Hitler. I was willing to go to work to knock him off, but I didn't hate him. I hated what he was doing." - Albert Ellis (X-post /r/albertellis)
"Everything is for sale but the price isn't always money." -Mike Tyson.
"Art is a bullshit concept invented by French faggots around 394 BC because they were so fucking bored with sitting around brushing their handlebar mustaches all day"
"The mediocre teacher tells. The good teacher explains. The superior teacher demonstrates. The great teacher inspires." - William Arthur Ward
"If you're walking down the right path and you're willing to keep walking, eventually you'll make progress." -Barack Obama
"The secret to getting ahead, is getting started." -Mark Twain
"Leave your gifts in this universe...take with you your spirit to the next." -Me
"If you can't outplay them, outwork them." Ben Hogan
"The feeling of being alone, separated from the rest of the world, is an illusion. Sure, it"s an illusion that feels very very real. But it"s not true."
"Two people in love, alone, isolated from the world, that's beautiful." Milan Kundera
"It's just some jerk getting into office so he can get out for the payday... I see it every year, I mean some clown runs for office, drops out of the race, and gets a big chunk of dough. I mean, you have to be a real low-life piece of shit to get involved in politics" -Frank Reynolds
"A people that values its privileges above its principles soon loses both." -Dwight D. Eisenhower
"Gratitude is the single most important ingredient to living a successful and fulfilled life" - Jack Canfield
"It's time to remember that old wisdom our soldiers will never forget, that whether we are black or brown or white, we all bleed the same red blood of patriots." - Donald J. Trump
"Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see."  Mark Twain
"And the most beautiful words I wanted to tell you: I haven't said yet..." Nazim Hikmet Ran
" And the most beautiful words I wanted to tell you: I haven't said yet." Nazim Hikmet
"The greatest discovery of any generation is that human beings can alter their lives by altering the attitudes of their minds." - Albert Schweitzer
"It's easy to make a buck. It's a lot tougher to make a difference." -- Tom Brokaw
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness; only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate; only love can do that."
"I am deaf to the word "No"." By Dhirubhai Ambani , :          .
"I did try and f*ck her. She was married I moved on her like a bitch, but I couldn't get there...."
"Ups and downs in life are very important to keep us going, because a straight line even in an ECG means we are not alive." By Ratan Tata
"The dream begins with a teacher who believes in you, who tugs and pushes and leads you to the next plateau, sometimes poking you with a sharp stick called 'truth'." -- Dan Rather
"If you're lonely when you're alone, you're in bad company." Jean Paul Sartre
"You only live once, and usually not even then."  Michael O'Donoghue
"...one never possesses a metaphysical belief but is possessed by it."  C. G. Jung
"You can't hold hands with god if you masturbate" - anonymous
"They're all liars here...and every one better than you." -A Clash of Kings
"Comparison is the thief of Joy" - Laet from Aphos
"To live a creative life, we must lose our fear of being wrong." --Anonymous
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." Eleanor Roosevelt
"Security is mostly a superstition. It does not exist in nature. Life is either a daring adventure or nothing." Helen Keller
"When I started counting my blessings, my whole life turned around." -- Willie Nelson
"Don"t wait. The time will never be just right" -Napoleon Hill
"Certainty you crave! Life gives you none!"-help find origin of this quote
"Don't do crack... Don't poop your pants... Save the environment!" -Flea (RHCP)
"I may say it was your fault because I know you could had done more" The Kooks
"Defeat is not defeat unless accepted as a reality-in your own mind." -Bruce Lee
"Try to live up to the person you pretend to be." Young the Giant
"A real friend is one who walks in when the rest of the world walks out."  Walter Winchell
"All morons hate it when you call them a moron." -- Holden Caulfield
"The public must be put in its place, so that it may exercise its own powers, but no less and perhaps even more, so that each of us may live free of the trampling and the roar of a bewildered herd." - Walter Lippmann
"The only place you find free cheese is in a mousetrap." -Unknown
"The philosophers have only interpreted the world, in various ways; the point is to change it." -- Karl Marx
"If you ignore the past, you jeopardize your future." - Star Wars, The Clone Wars
"You admire the ones in suits until you discover they work for the one in shorts"
"Success consists of going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm" - Winston Churchill
"Not making a decision is a big decision" -Negan
"Don't do crack, don't poop your pants... Save the environment!" -Flea
"Impossible is not Something that can"t be Done. It"s just something that has not been Done Before." Pagzos Team
"Not making a decision is a big decision" Negan
"When you discover something that nourishes your soul, care enough about yourself to make room for it in your life."  Jean Bolen
"If you don't stand for something, you'll fall for anything."
"Invest in yourself. Your career is the engine of your wealth." - Paul Clitheroe
"We are rich only through what we give, and poor only through what we refuse." - Anne- Sophie Swetchine
"One bad relationship could make you never fall in love again"
"To handle yourself, use your head; to handle others, use your heart." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"You must be ready to burn yourself in your own flame: how could you become new, if you had not first become ashes?" -Thus Spake Zarathustra
"What didn't you do to bury me? But you forgot that I was a seed." -Dino Christianopoulos
"If you spend your whole life waiting for the storm, you"ll never enjoy the sunshine." Morris West
"We must go fishing and have luck  then we have our fish, our opinions. I speak here of live opinions, of live fish. Others are intent to possess a cabinet of fossils  and, in their head, "convictions". - Nietzsche
""My dear daughter, I welcome you into this world. I'll be beside you"
"There's a big difference between Nazca lines and Nascar lines. One is symbolic of a distinctly primitive culture. The other is Peruvian." Discordian Quotes
"Worrying is fantasizing the wrong way" #ZwitsalZacht
"To a great mind, nothing is little." - Arthur Conan Doyle
"Everyone is entitled to their own sorrow, for the heart has no metrics or form of measure. And all of it... Irreplaceable" - Monty Oum
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched - they must be felt with the heart." - Helen Keller
"In my opinion, the existence of life is a highly overrated phenomenon."
"You can fail at what you don"t want, so you might as well take a chance on doing what you love."  Jim Carrey
"Friends show their love in times of trouble, not in happiness." - Euripides
"Happiness isn't in money, but in good company."
"The future belongs to the curious" -Gemma O'Brien
"Never let a bad day make you feel like you have a bad life." - Uknown
"Where the light shines on, there are always shadows" #ZwitsalZacht
"Love isn't perfect. That's the perfect thing about love." - Unknown
"Is Illuminati real or it is our way of undermining each others success?"
"The world breaks everyone and afterward many are strong in the broken places. But those that will not break it kills. It kills the very good and the very gentle and the very brave impartially. If you are none of these you can be sure it will kill you too but there will be no special hurry."
*"A man who suffers before it is necessary, suffers more than is necessary"*. -Seneca
"To the world you may be one person but to one person you may be the world." - Bill Wilson
"The more a man knows, the more he forgives"  Catherine the Great
"A little rebellion now and then... is a medicine necessary for the sound health of government. "  Thomas Jefferson
"The simplest acts of kindness are by far more powerful then a thousand heads bowing in prayer" - Mahatma Gandhi
"Be careful what you practice because if you practice it enough it becomes the default you."  Jordan Peterson
"Every man has his secret sorrows which the world knows not; and often times we call a man cold when he is only sad." Henry Wadsworth Longfellow
"Everyone wants to live on top of the mountain, but all the happiness and growth occurs while you"re climbing it." Andy Rooney
"If you want to be original Be ready to be copied" - Aphos
5 Motivational Quotes
'The trouble with being punctual is that nobody"s there to appreciate it.'- Franklin P. Jones
"But there's no happy endings, not here and not now. This tale is all sorrows and woes. You might dream that justice and peace win the day, but that's not how the story goes..." -A Netflix Original Series: A Series of Unfortunate Events
"You'll stay with me?' Until the very end,' said James." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows
"It's better to risk starving to death than surrender. If you give up on your dreams, what's left?"
"Happiness is a journey, not a destination." - Ben Sweetland
"When I have money, I shall become a highly original man. What's most low and hateful about money is that even talent can be bought with it, and will be, till the end of the world." Gavril "Ganya" Ardalyonovich Ivolgin, The Idiot (Dostoevsky, Fyodor)
"I find hope in the darkest of days, and focus in the brightest. I do not judge the universe."  Dalai Lama
"I never considered a difference of opinion in politics, in religion, in philosophy, as cause for withdrawing from a friend" - Thomas Jefferson
"Perfection isn't always the best. At the same time, the best isn't always perfect"
"Be humble within seeking the balance between the scales of justice. Goals should be sought after for your own personal development. Find your own truth and others will see the final outcome. Once you have become stronger than others around you will be stronger." -me
"We"re going to be living with Trump for a very long time. It sounds like a pharmaceutical commercial: "I"m living with Trump, but I don"t let Trump control my life." I think that"s going to be the attitude of most liberals." Bill Maher
"There is a time to take counsel of your fears, and there is a time to never listen to your fear. "  George S. Patton
"Until the lion learns how to write, every story will glorify the hunter" - African proverb
"Some liars go to prison, others create TV shows"
"When I was a boy of 14, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to 21 I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." - Mark Twain
"Some liars go to prison, others create TV shows" - Rod Serling
"Linux is only free if your time has no value" -Jamie Zawinski
"One never goes so far as when one doesn't know where one is going." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe in a letter to Carl Friedrich Zelter (1812)
"You've gotta die of something. You'd look pretty stupid dying of nothing." Does anyone know who's this is?
"If you've come to a certain age and don't realise that you're mainly surrounded by idiots, you might be one yourself.", Curt Goetz, german actor and author
"Good artists create.Great artists steal" - Unknown
"Good artists create.Great artists steal" - Unknown
"Good artists create.Great artists steal" - Unknown
"Who is in a certain age and doesn't understand that he is mainly surrounded by idiots, doesn't understand it because of a certain cause", Curt Goetz, german actor and author
"The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy" -MLK
"I'ts okay to make mistakes. Learn from them and move on." - Uknown
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you." - Maya Angelou
"Stop stressing over shitty people. They certainly aren't stressing over you." - Uknown
"Wherever life plants you, bloom with grace."
"If you're not doing what you love, you're wasting your time." - Unknown
"Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending."  Maria Robinson
"An optimist is the human personification of spring."  Susan J. Bissonette
'The Person Who Says It Cannot Be Done Should Not Interrupt The Person Doing It'
"My price is one hundred thirty million dollars. If, when you are ready to pay, I happen to be out of town, you may hand it over to my friend, the Treasurer of the United States" - Ambrose Bierce 1896
"Eternity is a child playing, playing checkers; the kingdom belongs to a child." - Heraclitus
"Those who don't believe in magic will never find it." -Roald Dahl
"Failure is the foundation of success, and the means by which it is achieved." - Lao Tzu
"I do wish we could chat longer, but--I'm having an old friend for dinner." --Hannibal Lector
'Don't resist what already is'
"Learning to choose is hard. Learning to choose well is harder. And learning to choose well in a world of unlimited possibilities is harder still, perhaps too hard."
"Life boils down to a series of jump shots. Some you make, some you miss, some you wish you'd taken, some you wish you hadn't. Great players move on, looking forward to the next possession." - Idan Ravin
"When the power of love is greater than the love of power, the world will know peace."  Uknown
"And now that you don't have to be perfect, you can be good." -John Steinbeck, East of Eden
"Don"t hold on to someone who"s leaving, otherwise you won"t meet the one who"s coming."
"A private life is a happy life"
"You"re important to me. I think if there"s anything that will last forever, it"s that. Whether we separate, stay in touch or rarely speak again, you will always be that little someone I really do care for, that I would sacrifice everything for to protect and keep safe." - Beau Taplin, "The Promise"
"No matter how fool-proof your plan is, there will be an asshole who fucks it up." If everything,by default, is to follow its rule, life would be so predictable. It"s the mistakes that make life beautiful.
[req]Quote about being yourself to reach your potential
"I was terrified when my doctor told me that I had a unique and interesting personality trait, but then he told me about new Zoloft or Prozac and now I just take three pills a day and I blend right into this horrible inbred corporate landscape." - Doug Stanhope
"The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy." -- (Martin Luther King Jr.)
"The man who does not read good books has no advantage over the man who cannot read them." -- (Mark Twain)
"We feel free when we escape - even if it be but from the frying pan to the fire." - Eric Hoffer
"If you can"t fly then run, if you can"t run then walk, if you can"t walk then crawl, but whatever you do you have to keep moving forward." -Martin Luther King Jr.
"Men are not against you; they are merely for themselves." -Gene Fowler
'Women are one half of society which gives birth to the other half. So it is as if women are the whole of society.' - Ibn Qayyim
"A few men have sighed because their women were abducted; most, because no one wanted to abduct them." - Nietzsche
"I can't fucking escape my thoughts. Do you know what is like to be tortured by your own mind?" - Unknown
"And one day we must ask the question, 'Why are there forty million poor people in America?' And when you begin to ask that question, you are raising questions about the economic system, about a broader distribution of wealth." - MLK Jr.
"In necessary things, unity; in doubtful things, liberty; in all things, charity."
"I have decided to stick with love. Hate is too great a burden to bear." - Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.
"Never look down on anybody unless you're helping them up" - Jesse Jackson
"Let America have their guns, just take away their Ammo" -Ali G
"Our lives begin to end the day we become silent about things that matter" - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Stop taking pride in your ability to destroy yourself." - Michelle K., What Keeps Me Up At Night
"You can get bitter or you can get busy." - Neil Patel
-"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect."  Mark Twain
"If you get tired, learn to rest, not to quit." - Banksy
"Anyone who tells you they are happy are trying to sell you something- or most likely they already have been sold themselves."
"When a government is dependent upon bankers for money, they and not the leaders of the government control the situation, since the hand that gives is above the hand that takes. Money has no motherland; financiers are without patriotism and without decency; their sole object is gain." - Napolon
"Doubt thou the stars are fire; Doubt that the sun doth move; Doubt truth to be a liar; But never doubt I love."
"The early bird gets the worm but the second mouse gets the cheese" - Steven Wright
"The smallest act of kindness is worth more than the greatest intention" - Kahlil Gibran
"The Universe wrote fiction in us; it's called Fear." - Christopher Poindexter
"For every minute you are angry you lose sixty seconds of happiness." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I'm sorry, but your hypercock is apparently malformed. The tickle spot is too big and it started screaming at me when I asked what it was doing. This ain't a glory hole anyway so you should be happy I'm being so polite about things. I'll direct you to a doctor if that will help." - Dank Uixote
"The aim is to balance the terror of being alive with the wonder of being alive." - Carlos Castaneda
"Everybody seeks happiness! Not me though! That"s the difference between me and the rest of the world: Happiness isn"t good enough for me! I demand euphoria!" - Bill Waterson
"No new horror can be more terrible than the daily torture of the commonplace." - H.P. Lovecraft
"It's hard to give unlimited power to limited minds."
"Democracy is a way of life and not a formula to be 'preserved' like jelly..."
"Only real way to disarm your enemy is to listen to them." - Amaryllis Fox, Ex CIA Clandestine Service.
"Divide the people into hostile groups by constantly harping on controversial matters of no importance." --Vladimir Lenin
"To learn who rules over you, find out whom you are not allowed to criticize." Voltaire
"No brains, no headaches."
"I'm tough when I have to be, tender when I should be. When you find a really tough guy, he's not a predator. He doesn't have to prove himself. Guys who have to pretend to be tough, they ain't. I'm tough." - Mr. T
"The V2 worked perfectly except for landing on the wrong planet." -Wernher Von Braun when the 1st rocket hit London
"You have to recognize that there are 24 hours a day, we sleep 6 hours a day, and I know that some of you did say 'wait a minute, I take more time to sleep,' I say just sleep faster, okay?" - Arnold Schwarzenegger
'If you walk away from God you should probably try to stay in the good books of Luck' - Salman Rushdie
"We were together. I forget the rest." - Walt Whitman
"Life is not measured by the number of breaths we take, but by the moments that take our breath away."
"Maybe it's not in the perfection of life that things make sense, but in the chaos."
"I myself am Heaven and Hell." - Omar Khayyam in (The Rubaiyat, 1120)
"Sometimes you gotta leap and grow your wings on the way down".
"What's left? What's left for me? A sullen walk to the steeple top to look over the city. I carve my name in that old brass bell, So when it rings I can hear it in hell." -Derek Archambalt
"Loneliness is dangerous. it"s addicting. Once you see how peaceful it is, you don"t want to deal with people".
"Earth is no more than a momentary incident in the unending cyclical chaos of the universe."
"Great story's aren't written, they're rewritten."
*Being illiterate in the eighteenth century was like having a dial-up connection in the twenty first. You're awash with information, but little reaches you, and what does takes a long time to download" - Eric Weiner
*Being illiterate in the eighteenth century was like having a dial-up connection in the twenty first. You're awash with information, but little reaches you, and what does takes a long time to download" - Eric Weiner
"There is no such thing as "away" when we throw anything away it must go somewhere." -Annie Leonard
"From this hour I ordain myself loos'd of limits and imaginary lines." -Walt Whitman
"The year 1916 was cursed; 1917 will surely be better!" - Tsar Nicholas II, the year of the October Revolution.
"If you spend your life to be good at everything. You will never be great at anything"
"It's all fun and games until someone loses an eye, then it's just fun you can't see"- James Hetfield
"Man should not be in the service of society. Society should be in the service of man" - Joseph Campbell
"I am guilty of a dreadful, selfish crime. I have robbed myself of all my precious time." -Robert Earl Keene (Dreadful Selfish Crime)
"Kindness in words creates confidence Kindness in thinking creates profoundness Kindness in giving creates love" - Lao Tzu
"How wonderful it is that nobody need wait a single moment before starting to improve the world."  Anne Frank
"It's not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters" - Epictetus
"The only people who don't make mistakes are the people who don't do anything." - Joyce Brothers
'Forgiveness liberates the soul. It removes fear. That is why it is such a powerful weapon' - Nelson Mandela (Invictus movie)
"All beings tremble before violence. All fear death. All love life. See yourself in others. Then whom can you hurt?" Buddha
"Seven blunders of the world that lead to violence: wealth without work, pleasure without conscience, knowledge without character, commerce without morality, science without humanity, worship without sacrifice, politics without principle". - Mahatma Gandhi
"In eternity there is no time, only an instant long enough for a joke." -Hermann Hesse, Steppenwolf
"It is better to light one small candle than to curse the darkness." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"Time is how you spend your love." Zadie Smith
"It doesn't matter whether we made the right choice. What matters is what happens." - Violet Baudelaire, A Series of Unfortunate Events (2017), S1E6
'Don't kill doves in the garden. // You kill one and the others won't come.' - Pashtun Proverb
"If I am wrong, educate me, don't belittle me."
"I wanted to ride off the edge of the world, but it kept curving on me" -
"Chaos was the law of nature; Order was the dream of man." - Henry Adams.
"Because the key to getting smart, is learning how to play dumb; And the key to getting old, is learning how to stay young." - Cassidy
"When there is no enemy within, the enemies outside cannot hurt you" - African proverb
"Don't fall in love with the moment and think you're in love with the girl" -The 1975 "Shes American"
"Girl, I'm Kendrick Lamar" -Kendrick Lamar
"Well begun is half done." -Aristotle
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment."Ralph Waldo Emerson
"And it ain't a strip club if they ain't showing pussy." - Juicy J
"To try to be like another is to shrivel our soul" - Louise Hay
"Make your faith larger than your fears and your dreams larger than your doubts." - Robin Sharma
"Your body is somerhing soecial, not someone's canvas of judgment" - Carlos J Peraza
"Always remember, you are much more bigger than your problems." By Sandeep Maheshwari
"I'm convinced that about half of what separates the successful entrepreneurs from the nonsuccessful ones is pure perseverance. It is so hard." - Steve Jobs, entrepreneur
"If you have the option to add cheese on somthing, do it" - Thought Of The Week
"A Positive Thought a Day Keeps Negativity Away" Are you agree with this ??
"I am a cage, in search of a bird." - Franz Kafka in the Blue Octavio Notebooks (1919)
"Always forgive your enemies. Nothing annoys them so much." - Oscar Wilde
"As soon as the fear approaches near, attack and destroy it." - Chanakya
"Military intelligence is a contradiction in terms." - Groucho Marx
"We accept the reality of the world with which we are presented." -The Truman Show
"When tyranny is law, revolution is order" -Ren Prez Joglar
" typically the best ways of telling someone to fuck off typically doesn't involve saying the words"
"Just when I discovered the meaning of life, they changed it." - George Carlin
"There are two reasons why we don't trust people. One, we don't know them. Two, we know them."
"I refuse to join any club that would have me as a member." - Groucho Marx
"... you oughta sit back sometime and listen to the war. It sounds as bad as it looks." -Hawkeye(M*A*S*H 4077)
"We know no spectacle so ridiculous as the British public in one of its periodical fits of morality." Lord Macaulay 1800-59 English historian
"All great men were simple." - Eric Ambler
"Worry is a misuse of the imagination." - Dan Zadra
"The best way to predict the future is to create it." -Abraham Lincoln
"If you can not measure it, you can not improve it."  Sir William Thomson
How much better life must have been for jealous drunks before emails and texts and mobile phones, before all this electronica and the traces it leaves.
"Accept everything about yourself - I mean everything, You are you and that is the beginning and the end - no apologies, no regrets. " - Henry A. Kissinger
"Every libertarian was born on third base and thinks he hit a triple." --Lip Gallagher, Shameless
"You won"t allow me to go to school. I won"t become a doctor. Remember this: One day you will be sick." Lima Niazi, Afghan poet to the Taliban
"Should I kill myself, or have a cup of coffee?" - Albert Camus
"Do not fear to be eccentric in opinion, for every opinion now accepted was once eccentric." - Bertrand Russell
"People are like stained-glass windows. They sparkle and shine when the sun is out, but when the darkness sets in, their true beauty is revealed only if there is a light from within." - Elisabeth Kubler-Ross
"...you can think about political beliefs as heuristics, and heuristics are unconscious rulesthey"re really algorithms that people use to address large sets of data to simplify them so that they"re not drowning in complexity."  Jordan Peterson
"If you have to ask the price, you can't afford it" jp morgan
"No act of kindness no matter how small is ever wasted" - Aesop
'One child, one teacher, one book and one pen can change the world.' - Malala Yousafzai
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas A. Edison
"The best years of your life are the ones in which you decide your problems are your own. You do not blame them on your mother, the ecology, or the president. You realize that you control your own destiny." Albert Ellis
"Without music, life would be a mistake." - Friedrich Nietzsche, Twilight of the Idols
"Happiness is a myth we seek, If manifested surely irks; Like river speeding to the plain, On its arrival slows and murks. For man is happy only in His aspiration to the heights; When he attains his goal, he cools And longs for other distant flights." Kahlil Gibran
'Others can stop you temporarily. You are the only one who can do it permanently.'-Zig Ziglar
"This was what made life: a moment of quiet, the water falling in the fountain, the girl"s voicea moment of captured beauty. He who is truly wise will never permit such moments to escape."  Louis L"Amour
"If you wanna tell someone to get fucked, that's the best way to tell them." - Frank Zappa
"The way to get started is to quit talking and begin doing." - Walt Disney
"A day without laughter is a day wasted." - Nicolas Chamfort
"To improve is to change. To perfect is to change often." Winston Churchill
"Obsessed with each other's death until death is all we can see, and death is all we deserve." Kosh, Babylon 5
"Isn"t it nice to think that tomorrow is a new day with no mistakes in it yet?"  L.M. Montgomery
"Maturity is not when we start speaking big things. It is when we start understanding small things"
"Having money is a way of being free of money." - Albert Camus in A Happy Death (1938)
"A pessimist sees the difficulty in every opportunity; an optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty." - Winston Churchill
"Once you replace negative thoughts with positive ones, you"ll start having positive results." -Willie Nelson
"We want the facts to fit the preconceptions. When they don't, it is easier to ignore the facts than to change the preconceptions."  Jessamyn West
"Because a strong man, who has known power all his life, will lose respect for that power. But a weak man knows the value of strength, and knows compassion." - Dr Erskine
[Meaning] The mind is not a vessel to be filled but a fire to be kindled. - Plutarch
"I found out that there weren't too many limitations if I did it my way." -Johnny Cash
"What weakens us is feeling offended by the deeds and misdeeds of our fellow men. Our self-importance requires that we spend most of our lives offended by someone." - Carlos Castaneda
"I am sufficiently proud of my knowing something to be modest about my not knowing all." - Vladimir Nabokov
"Do everything you do in live withe love and patience." - Mum
"People of mediocre ability sometimes achieve outstanding success because they don't know when to quit. Most men succeed because they are determined to."  George Herbert Allen
"If You Can Dream It, You Can Do It"
"Playing things too safe is the most popular way to fail..." -- Elliott Smith
"Playing it too safe is the most popular way to fail..." - Elliott Smith
"We don"t care about the nameless gray faces we"re playing right now. This is man versus himself." - Mike Tomlin
"Sometimes, there's no closure; you just need to close the door." -Emily Yoffe
[broke-up] When I see a ocean, I feel it like they are waves of tears, increasing its altitude step by step...
"Never ruin an apology with an excuse."- Benjamin Franklin
" our existence is but a brief crack of light between two eternities of darkness." - Vladimir Nabokov
"Coming back to where you started is not the same as never leaving."  Terry Pratchett
"A day wasted on others is not wasted on one's self." - Charles Dickens, A Tale of Two Cities
"The truth will set you free. But not until it is finished with you."  David Foster Wallace
"There are two different types of people in the world, those who want to know, and those who want to believe." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Sometimes people don't want to hear the truth because they don't want their illusions destroyed." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"When reading, we don't fall in love with the characters' appearance. We fall in love with their words, their thoughts, and their hearts. We fall in love with their souls."  Unknown
"I was waiting for something extraordinary to happen, but as the years wasted on nothing ever did unless I caused it"  Charles Bukowski
"There is no friend as loyal as a book." - Ernest Hemingway
"They say time heals all wounds, but then why the fuck I still got all these scars?" - Self
"Inspiration is a guest that does not willingly visit the lazy." - Pyotr Tchaikovsky
[REQUEST] A quote to put on a family heirloom
"He was a man, take him for all in all, I shall not look upon his like again" - Hamlet
"If not us, then who? If not now, then when?" - John Lewis
"If not us, then who? If not now, then when?" - John E. Lewis
"If I knew then what I know now, well, it probably wouldn't have changed very much. And it probably wouldn't have changed very much because sometimes, it doesn't matter what you know. What you feel... just takes over."
"If you're tired of arguing with strangers on the internet, try talking to one in real life." -President Barack Obama
"The most important things are the hardest to say, because words diminish them." - Stephen King
"No." -Rosa Parks
"Things work out best for those who make the best of how things work out." John Wooden
"it is much safer to be feared than loved because ...love is preserved by the link of obligation which, owing to the baseness of men, is broken at every opportunity for their advantage; but fear preserves you by a dread of punishment which never fails" - Niccol Machiavelli
"Life is a self-fulfilling prophecy... In the long run you usually get what you expect" - Denis Waitley
"Good people are like candles. They burn themselves out trying to give others light."
"We are captives of our own identities, living in prisons of our own creation." -Theodore "T-Bag" Bagwell (Prison Break)
"I had the blues because I had no shoes, until I met a man who had no feet." - Persian proverb
"You can do anything, but not everything." David Allen
"Shine boldly so that all may find you when the night falls."- Emperor Izaro
"Shine boldly so that all may find you when the night falls." - Emperor Izaro- Path of Exie
"I'll take you to lunch and spend $1,000 on you, but, in business, I'll fight you over a dime." - Grandpa
"When you care for no one, no one cares for you"
"Peace is always 'over there'" - Graham McNeill
"Knowledge alone is flat and lifeless; it becomes meaningful through the accumulation of experience over time." -Joshua Rothman
"The current 'isms' are the most serious threat...because they are nothing but dangerous identifications of the subjective with the collective consciousness. Such an identity infallibly produces a mass psyche with its irresistible urge to catastrophe."  Carl Jung
"There is no medium for psychology to reflect itself in: it can only portray itself in itself, and describe itself."  Carl Jung
"Everything you do now is for your future.Think about that"
"If you believe in yourself and have dedication and pride - and never quit, you'll be a winner. The price of victory is high but so are the rewards." - Paul Bryant
"Only the weak are cruel. Gentleness can only be expected from the strong." -Leo Buscaglia
"Success is when you beat your fear of failure"
"The sea is not less beautiful in our eyes because we know that sometimes ships are wrecked by it." - Simone Weil
"Remember, reality is an illusion, the universe is a hologram, buy gold! Byeeee!" - Bill cypher's exit, gravity falls.
"If you really want to do something, you"ll find a way. If you don"t, you"ll find an excuse."  Jim Rohn
"Never tell the truth to people who are not worthy of it." - Mark Twain
"I guided my fate. I fashioned the course of my life and my death. Me. Not you. Not the gods. Me." - Ragnar Lothbrok, Vikings
"Stay Away From Negative People They Have a Problem For Every Solution"
"For many men, the acquisition of wealth does not end their troubles, it only changes them." Seneca
"It"s been my experience that you can nearly always enjoy things if you make up your mind firmly that you will." L.M. Montgomery
"You did not do as I asked. You have never treated Harry as a son. He has known nothing but neglect and often cruelty at your hands. The best that can be said is that he has at least escaped the appalling damage you have inflicted upon the unfortunate boy sitting between you." -Dumbledore
""It's the friends you can call up at 4 a.m. that matter." - Marlene Dietrich"
"In this moment, I am euphoric. Not because of any phony god's blessing. But because, I am enlightened by my own intelligence." -/u/aalewis
'Yesterday I was clever, so I wanted to change the world. Today I am wise, so I am changing myself.'- Rumi
"We rise by lifting others." - Robert Ingersoll
"Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it." George Santayana
"What did you do as a child that made the hours pass like minutes? Herein lies the key to your earthly pursuits - Carl Jung"
"A man paints with his brains and not with his hands." - Michelangelo
"Don't listen to the cynics. They were wrong about my generation and they were wrong about yours." - Joe Biden
"In truth,there was only one christian and he died on the cross." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"If it weren"t for second chances, we"d all be alone."  Gregory Alan Isakov
"It is not because things are difficult that we do not dare; it is because we do not dare that things are difficult."  Seneca
"Only those who dare to fail greatly can ever achieve greatly." -Robert Kennedy
"Americans are getting stronger. 20 years ago it took 2 people to carry 10 dollars worth of groceries. Today a five-year old can do it." - Henny Youngman.
"I've met some pricks in my time...
"Life's a bitch, so you might as well make it your bitch."
"Politics should bore people, because the work of government is boring", David Masciotra, Salon
"Souls cross ages like clouds cross skies, an' tho' a cloud's shape nor hue nor size don't stay the same, it's still a cloud an' so is a soul. Who can say where the cloud's blowed from or who the soul'll be 'morrow?" - David Mitchell
"Love The Journey and Cherish Destination" - Eddymation
"Silence is deafening for those used to the roar"
"Your hands on my skin are like heroin to my heart. I swear I will get my fill of you, even if it kills me first." - Beau Taplin
"To remain static is to lose ground."  David Packard
"All this extravaganza will never saturate your greed. You will always want more money, sex, drugs, bigger, faster and better. The threshold to true happiness is having food on your plate every day, a healthy body and someone to talk to." -ThePozatoOne
"We have the marvelous gift of making everything insignificant" - Nikolai Gogol
"..A comet comes out of the void for no reason, returning to the void for no reason. They call it unpredictable because they cannot predict it. From the comet"s own point of view, nothing could be simpler. It starts in the darkness, aims directly at the sun, and never stops till it gets there..-"
"It"s So Strange That Autumn Is So Beautiful Yet Everything is Dying."
"Taking your own life. Interesting expression, taking it from who? Once it's over, it's not you who'll miss it. Your own death is something that happens to everyone else. Your life is not your own, keep your hands off it." - Sherlock BBC
"If a man has his eyes bound, you can encourage him as much as you like to stare through the bandage, but he'll never see anything." - Franz Kafka
"The only way to keep something endlessly is losing it." - Even Bech Nsheim
"Take your broken heart and make it into art." - Carrie Fisher
"In ancient times, cats were worshiped as gods; they have not forgotten this." -- Terry Pratchett (?)
"Now I've seen looky looky don't eat the cookie, but this is ridiculous!" - Bojack Horseman
"Pessimism is a luxury of good times. In difficult times, it is a self-fulfilling, self-inflicted death sentence."  Evelin Lindner
"I suck dick" - Andy
""You can never be overdressed or overeducated." - Oscar Wilde"
"If men would consider not so much wherein they differ, as wherein they agree, there would be far less of uncharitableness and angry feeling in the world." Joseph Addison
"Success is not the key to happiness. Happiness is the key to success. If you love what you are doing, you will be successful." Herman Cain
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." Mahatma Gandhi
"I would rather walk with a friend in the dark, than alone in the light." - Helen Keller
'Knowledge speaks, but wisdom listens.'- Jimi Hendrix
'We will never forget them, nor the last time we saw them, this morning, as they prepared for their journey and waved goodbye and slipped the surly bonds of earth to touch the face of God' - Ronald Reagan, following the Challenger Shuttle Disaster
"The best way to predict the future is to create it.  Unknown"
"The best way out is always through.  Robert Frost"
"While I chased the extraordinary all over this chaotic world, your ordinariness brought calm in to my life." Written by me.
"You can't just eat good food. You've got to talk about it too." - Kurt Vonnegut
'The Taliban could take our pens and books, but they couldn't stop our minds from thinking.' - Malala Yousafzai
"Whether you think you can or think you can"t, you"re right.  Henry Ford"
"When you know you"re meant to birth an idea into existence: feeling like a failure often means you"re moments away from your biggest success"
"Man  determines himself whether he gives in to conditions or stands up to them." -- Victor Frankl
"Man  determines himself whether he gives in to conditions or stands up to them.." -- Victor Frankl
"Faith which does not doubt is dead faith." Miguel de Unamuno
"Doubt isn"t the opposite of faith; it is an element of faith." Paul Tillich
"Do you wanna keep playing, or do you want to win?" - Tracy from How I Met Your Mother
"Take your broken heart, make it into art." - Carrie Fisher
"The best way to find yourself is to lose yourself in the service of others." Mahatma Gandhi
"Attention is the rarest and purest form of generosity." -Simone Weil
""I do not know what I may appear to the world, but to myself I seem to have been only like a boy playing on the seashore, and diverting myself in now and then finding a smoother pebble or a prettier shell than ordinary, whilst the great ocean of truth lay all undiscovered before me." -Isaac Newton
"I do not measure a man's success by how high he climbs but how high he bounces when he hits bottom." - George S Patton
"May you live in interesting times!" - traditional Chinese curse
"I do not measure a man's success by how high he climbs but how high he bounces when he hits bottom." - George S. Patton
"There are plenty of good reasons for fighting, but no good reason ever to hate without reservation, to imagine that God Almighty Himself hates with you, too. Where's evil? It's that large part of every man that wants to hate without limit, that wants to hate with God on its side." Kurt Vonnegut
[Question] Quotes from George Orwell's 1984 and Animal Farm about Inequality, Abuse of Power, and Oppression
"Watching political commercials is hazerdous to the political health of the community."  Neil Postman
"Stress can ruin every day of your life, dying can only ruin one." Sherlock Holmes
"Keep your face to the sun and you will never see the shadows." - Helen Keller
"It is not the mountains ahead to climb that wear you out; it is the pebble in your shoe." - Muhammad Ali
"Entertainment is the only thing that distracts people from how much they don't like each other." -- Peggy Hill
"Live Fast, Die Young"
"Sir Thomas More had his tongue in his cheek when he wrote about Utopia...
"A man who never wanted to be a god is less than a man" (I don't know the author, please help me)
"The only person who is educated is the one who has learned how to learn and change." - Carl Rogers
"Progress is impossible without change, and those who cannot change their minds cannot change anything."  George Bernard Shaw
'For a country to have a great writer is like having a second government. That is why no regime has ever loved great writers.' -Solzhenitsyn
"The reputation of a thousand years may be determined by the conduct of one hour." -Japanese proverb
"...That you are here - that life exists and identity. That the powerful play goes on, and you may contribute a verse."- Walt Whitman, *O Me! O Life!*
"Forget about TGIF. It's all about TGIE- Thank God Its Everyday" -Eddymation
'The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, but wiser men so full of doubts.' - B.Russell
[Request] Something along the lines of "(this person) is helpful on the first day of the revolution, but on the second day he should be shot."
"It is no measure of health to be well adjusted to a profoundly sick society."-J. Krishnamurti
"Talent is a pursued interest. Anything that you're willing to practice, you can do." - Bob Ross
"Don"t doubt the creator, because it is inconceivable that accidents alone could be the controller of this universe." -Newton.
"Watch your thoughts; they become words. Watch your words; they become actions. Watch your actions; they become habits. Watch your habits; they become character. Watch your character; it becomes your destiny." - Lao Tzu
"Do you fall in love often?" Yes often. With a view, with a book, with a dog, a cat, with numbers, with friends, with complete strangers, with nothing at all." - Jeanette Winterson, Gut Symmetries
"You can't change the world. But you can let the world change you until your death, in which it kills you."
''Discipline is the ability to do things you don't want to do in order to better yourself''
"I love Humanity but I hate humans.'' Albert Einstein
"If it scares you it might be a good thing to try"
"Each moment is a place you"ve never been."  Mark Strand
"A Goal without a Plan is Just a Wish"
"Once when I was a kid, I cried because I didn't have shoes to play football with my friends. Then, one day, I saw a man who had no feet, and I realised how rich I was" -- Zinedine Zidane
" It's important to remember at the end of the day, every living creature produces its own form of shit."
"Sometimes your joy is the source of your smile, but sometimes your smile can be the source of your joy." Thich Nhat Hanh
. "We tend to forget that happiness doesn"t come as a result of getting something we don"t have, but rather of recognizing and appreciating what we do have." Frederick Keonig
"It isn"t what you have, or who you are, or where you are, or what you are doing that makes you happy or unhappy. It is what you think about." Dale Carnegie
"The moments of happiness we enjoy take us by surprise. It is not that we seize them, but that they seize us." Ashley Montagu
"Happiness is the art of never holding in your mind the memory of any unpleasant thing that has passed." Unknown
"Thousands of candles can be lit from a single candle, and the life of the candle will not be shortened. Happiness never decreases by being shared." Buddha
"We must have perseverance and above all confidence in ourselves. We must believe that we are gifted for something and that this thing must be attained."  Marie Curie
"There is nothing noble in being superior to your fellow man. True nobility lies in being superior to your former self." - Ernest Hemingway
"If through one man's life there is a little more love and kindness, a little more light and truth in the world, then he will not have lived in vain." - Alfred Delp
"I am, somehow, less interested in the weight and convolutions of Einstein's brain than in the near certainty that people of equal talent have lived and died in cotton fields and sweatshops." -Stephen Jay Gould
"Nobody wants to fall into a safety net, because it means the structure in which they've been living is in a state of collapse and they have no choice but to tumble downwards. However, it beats the alternative." -Lemony Snicket
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the Universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying." - Arthur C. Clarke
'Loving brother, please do not harbour ill thoughts; I was starving, that which I found, I ate.' - Neamat Imam
"Forgive your enemies but never forget their names." John F Kennedy
"Someone's opinion of you doesn't determine your success"
"We are all dying, every moment that passes of every day. That is the inescapable truth of this existence....
"It's not what you can say, it's what you can prove" -My cousin when he eat's my food.
"I am so clever that sometimes I don't understand a single word of what I am saying." - Oscar Wilde
"I consider it like a stay in a monastery" -- Varg Vikernes, discussing life in (Norwegian) prison
"May you live in interesting times!" - traditional Chinese curse
"Nothing takes the heart out of a man more than the expectation of failure." - FitzChivalry Farseer
"If it's moving and it's not supposed to, duct tape. If it's not moving and it's supposed to, WD-40" - My mechanic
"If there are no stupid questions, then what kind of questions do stupid people ask? Do they get smart just in time to ask questions?" - Scott Adams
"My milkshake brings all the boys to the yard" -Kelis
"Success means we go to sleep at night knowing that our talents and abilities were used in a way that served others."  Marianne Williamson
"Knowledge is power, & I know a lot"
''No one ever notices I use two apostrophes in place of quotation marks'' - Me
'You never know what is enough unless you know what is more than enough.'  William Blake
"Miracles happen not in opposition to nature, but in opposition to what we know of nature."  St. Augustine
"We make a living by what we get, but we make a life by what we give" - Winston Churchill
"An intelligent man cannot become anything seriously, and it is only the fool who becomes anything." - Dostoyevsky
"An intelligent man cannot become anything seriously, and it is only the fool who becomes anything." - Dostoyesky
"Look, all I know is what they taught me at command school. There are certain rules about a war and rule number one is young men die. And rule number two is doctors can't change rule number one." Henry Blake (M*A*S*H 4077)
"Kindness is a language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see" - Mark Twain
"Men will always be mad, and those who think they can cure them are the maddest of all." - Voltaire
"I am part of a lost generation" -Jonathan Reed
"Well the rain ain't fussy 'bout where it lands. It'll find you hiding no matter where you stand." -Rory Gallagher
"A strong argument for the religion of Christ is this  that offences against Charity are about the only ones which men on their death-beds can be made, not to understand, but to feel, as crime." - Edgar Allen Poe
'What is a hero, other than an everyday guy who refuses to let anything beat him?'
"There are three kinds of men. The one that learns by reading. The few who learn by observation. The rest of them have to pee on the electric fence for themselves."  Will Rogers
"If you're still sighing for missed last nights moon, so you'll also loss todays sunrise. Live in the moment! "
"You want me to show you tough, I'll show you tough."
"Oh, ye seekers after perpetual motion, how many vain chimeras have you pursued? Go and take your place with the alchemists!" - Leonardo Da Vinci
"A man can never have too much red wine, too many books, or too much ammunition." - Rudyard Kipling
"Marriage is a state where two people can't stand living together and can't stand living apart." - Marie von Ebner-Eschenbach
"Siamo tutti fratelli" (We are all brothers) -Jean Henri Dunant
"The most powerful weapon on Earth is the human soul on fire" -Ferdinand Foch
"You only hang out with people of the opposite gender that you would consider sleeping with"
"When Sophie died, I learned the strongest force in life is guilt. The hardest thing to overcome is shame. You have to look yourself in the mirror every single day and account for everything you"ve done wrong. You can"t take it back."
"A hero need not speak, when he is gone, the world will speak for him." -unknown
"If Jesus can walk on water, can he swim in land?" -Bo Burnham
"Anything, I"m convinced, is possible. There is nothing human beings are incapable of." -- Amos Oz
"Not all opportunities are to be taken! Some are traps"
"Be so Good they Can't Ignore You
"I always knew [Vladimir Putin] was smart!" - Donald Trump
"Be kind for everyone you meet is fighting a harder battle" - Plato
"Opportunities can be limited by your willingness to try. Try, fail, learn, try and repeat until you succeed"
"A winner is just a loser who tried one more time"
"Madness in Great Ones Must Not Unwatched Go" - Shakespeare
"See the comments of this post for a list of my favorite quotes that I've collected throughout 2016" - abc127
"The devil reminded me of my past, so I had to remind him of my future."
"An idealist is a person who helps other people to be prosperous." - Henry Ford
"If you always give, you will always have." - Chinese proverb
"The wise man does not lay up his own treasures. The more he gives to others, the more he has for his own."  Lao Tzu
"Unfortunately there was one thing that the white South feared more than Negro dishonesty, ignorance, and incompetency, and that was Negro honesty, knowledge, and efficiency." - W.E.B. Du Bois
"The fire that warms us can also consume us; it is not the fault of the fire." - Swami Vivekananda
"You know what the chain of command is? It's the chain I go get and beat you with until you understand who's in ruttin' charge here." - Jayne Cobb
"There is nothing good or bad, but thinking makes it so." -William Shakespeare
"When a man loves cats, I am his friend and comrade without further introduction."  Mark Twain
"Smile a while and while you smile, smile another smile and soon there will be miles and miles of smile just because you smiled"
"The good thing about science is that it's true whether or not you believe in it." - Neil deGrasse Tyson
"When it comes to pursuing your dreams, you should at least try, even if it's a near impossible field to compete in. At least that way, there will be no lingering doubts regarding whether you would have succeeded or not."
"No one's gonna drag you up to get into the light where you belong" -Ace of Base
"Swerve me? The path to my fixed purpose is laid with iron rails, whereon my soul is grooved to run." Herman Melville, Moby-Dick
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing " Socrates repost
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you nothing " Socrates
'If parents learn to love their kids more than their ideologies, the world would be a better place.'
[Request] Quotes about passion and interest?
"All you need in this life is ignorance and confidence; then success is sure." - Mark Twain
"As is a tale, so is life: not how long it is but how good it is, is what matters" - Lucius Annaeus Seneca
"Failure is simply an opportunity to begin again, this time more intelligently." - Henry Ford
"If we are grateful for what we have, then we are in a peaceful state of mind and INVULNERABLE to pain" - David R. Hawkins
"Love someone who is going to love you back as much as you love them, because the worst part of loving someone, is being loved in half when you love them with everything"
'Old age is not a battle. Old age is a massacre.' - Philip Roth
"There is no greater danger than playing it safe." - Nike
"When I became a man I put away childish things, including the fear of childishness and the desire to be very grown up." -C.S. Lewis
"One man's revolution is another man's terrorist "
"We all know we're no good pieces of shit from the time we could breathe.. after a while you just kind of become bad." -Mickey Knox
"The greatest test of courage on earth is to bear defeat without losing heart" - Robert G. Ingersoll
"The more that a nation knows about the mode of conducting is business, the better chance has that business of being properly conducted "- James Callender
"Yeah"- James Hetfield of Metallica
"If it's meant to be, it will be"
"Life is most difficult exam. Many people fail because they try to copy others, not realizing that everyone has a different exam"
"You were born to do more than just go to work, pay bills and die"
"I listened to an almost forgotten sound within myself as if my heart, long stopped, were calmly beginning to beat again." - Albert Camus
"her insolence is outrageous, but the gentleman in me allows for no retaliation." -hisao nakai
"Raise your words, not your voice. It is rain that grows flowers, not thunder"
"It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might as well not have lived at all, in which case you have failed by default." J.K. Rowling
"No man ever achieved worth-while success who did not, at one time or other, find himself with at least one foot hanging well over the brink of failure." Napoleon Hill
"Rule number one is, don"t sweat the small stuff. Rule number two is, it"s all small stuff."  Robert Eliot
"Do not anticipate trouble or worry about what may never happen. Keep in the sunlight."  Benjamin Franklin
"If you ask what is the single most important key to longevity, I would have to say it is avoiding worry, stress and tension. And if you didn"t ask me, I"d still have to say it."  George Burns
"There are thousands of causes for stress, and one antidote to stress is self-expression. That"s what happens to me every day. My thoughts get off my chest, down my sleeves and onto my pad."  Garson Kanin
"The source of your happiness is solely within you. Peacefulness has to be a decision that you make. It can exist in the middle of war, devastation, and catastrophe." - David R. Hawkins
"Without realizing it, the individual composes his life according to the laws of beauty even in times of greatest distress" ---Milan Kundera (from The Unbearable Lightness of Being)
"Earthlings may have been hopelessly misguided on every possible level, but at least it was by choice."
"There is nothing impossible to him who will try." - Alexander the Great
"This is so American, man: either make something your God and cosmos and then worship it, or else kill it." - David Foster Wallace
"There can be no liberty for a community which lacks the means by which to detect lies." -- Walter Lippman, 1920
"Sometimes I think the surest sign that intelligent life exists elsewhere in the universe is that none of it has tried to contact us." - Calvin ( & Hobbes )
"Go ahead, judge a book by its cover. Just remember that the person who designed it probably didn't write the book."
"No tyrant could thrive where every subject said no. The tyrant thrives when the first fucking fool salutes." - Steven Erikson
"We are all lone souls. It pays to know humility, lest the delusion of control, of mastery, overwhelms. And, indeed, we seem a species prone to that delusion, again and ever again." - Fiddler
The power to destroy a thing is the absolute control over it." Paul Muad'Dib
"You know time is long, and life is short. Begin to live while you still can." -Ed Vedder
"The poverty of our century is unlike that of any other. It is not, as poverty was before, the result of natural scarcity, but of a set of priorities imposed upon the rest of the world by the rich." -John Berger
"Happiness exists when you don't know a thing" - The Weeknd
"Get your head in the right place before somebody puts it in the wrong place."
"I got my heart's desire, and there my troubles began." - Lev Grossman, The Magicians
"A great fire burns within me, but no one stops to warm themselves at it, and passers-by only see a wisp of smoke" - Vincent Van Gogh
"Agnotology: the study of deliberate propagation of ignorance." (definition and word created by researcher Robert Proctor)
"If you can't feed a hundred people, feed just one" Mother Teresa
"The camera relieves us of the burden of memory. It surveys us like God, and it surveys for us. Yet no other god has been so cynical, for the camera records in order to forget." - John Berger
"A creative man is motivated by the desire to achieve, not by the desire to beat others" -- (Ayn Rand)
"What you get by achieving your goals is not as important as what you become by achieving your goals" -- (Zig Ziglar)
"The quieter you become the more you're able to hear"
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." - Herman Melville
"Success is going from failure to failure without loss of enthusiasm." - Winston Churchill
"Never make someone a priority when all you are to them is an option." - Maya Angelou
"Kind words are short and easy to speak, but their echoes are truly endless."
'When we are not sure, we are alive.' - Graham Greene
"I don't do drugs. I am drugs." - Salvador Dal
"May the New Year bring you courage to break your resolutions early! My own plan is to swear off every kind of virtue, so that I triumph even when I fall!"  Aleister Crowley
"There is a great joy in the realization that one does not actually need anything at all to be happy" - David R. Hawkins
"Within you is a stillness and a sanctuary to which you can retreat at any time and be yourself." -Hermann Hesse
"If you don't build your dream someone will hire you to help build theirs." - Tony A. Gaskins Jr.
"No one heals himself by wounding another." - St. Ambrose
"Can we stop deriding bread and circuses as if they're some sort of dastardly plot? If government is working as intended, bread and circuses (or their contemporary equivalents) are presicely the sorts of things that should be happening, correct?" - Brendolyn Bran Brenannen, Apt. of Funland Security
"The worst customer is the most satisfied customer - for he shall never need to return."
"We're all a day closer to death every day"
'The roots below the earth claim no rewards for making the branches fruitful.' - Rabindranath Tagore
"There's nothing I find more boring than arguing with someone because they want to use their idea instead of the right idea." -Adam Savage
"Anxiety is the dizziness of freedom"
[HELP] "...Of fire there are two kinds, the fire that kindles and the fire that destroys..."
"The idea of comedy, really, is not everybody should be laughing. It should be about 50 people laughing, and 50 people horrified." - Patrice O'Neal
"Do not correct a fool or he will hate you. Correct a wise man and he will appreciate you." - Proverbs 9:8
"Authors write books for one, and only one, reason: because we like to torture people." Brandon Sanderson
"you break your own heart to make it bigger, so why not crack your skull when the mind swells."
"If you give me six lines written by the hand of the most honest of men, I will find something in them which will hang him." -Cardinal Richelieu
"History doesn't repeat itself, but it does rhyme."- Mark Twain
"If I could be anything, I'd be a bird with wooden wings. I wouldn't fly but I wouldn't break." - Alynda Lee Segarra(Hurray for the Riff Raff)
"Let go of attachment and pursue happiness."
"To hell with circumstances; I create opportunities" -- (Bruce Lee)
"Love is when the other person's happiness is more important than your own" -- (H. Jackson Brown, Jr.)
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts" -- (Winston Churchill)
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston S. Churchill
"The internet is a great thing, because it reminds you that you are quite sane."
"you know things, without knowing how you know, but you know it is true" - Avis J. Williams
"Chop your own wood and it will warm you twice." - Henry Ford
[REQUEST] A Feel Good Quote for Someone Who Will Soon Loose a Beloved Elder in the Family?
"Revolutions swing back and forth between puritanism and debauchery, without touching civilized ground." - Nicols Gmez Dvila
"Explore Everything, Exploit None"
"The goal of abolishing the White race is, on its face, so desirable that some may find it hard to believe that it could incur any opposition other than from committed White supremacists." Noel Ignatiev, 2002
"A gold mine is a hole in the ground with a liar standing on top of it." - Anonymous
"The things that make you feel weird are the things that make you grow."
"We have to do more than just elect a new President if we truly want to change this country." -Dan Quayle
"All of your questions have answers."
"Pussy is like a rock. If they throw it at you too hard and give it to you easy = dodge it" -Facebook comment
"Life will let you fall as hard, as low, and as far as you care to let it."
"He who controls the past controls the future. He who controls the present controls the past." - George Orwell
"You are the universe expressing itself as a human for a little while." - Eckhart Tolle
"The universe was exploding, each particle away from the next, hurtling us into dark and lonely space, eternally tearing us away from each other- child out of the womb, friend away from friend, moving from each other, each through his own pathway toward the goal-box of solitary death."
"In my mind I am eloquent; I can climb intricate scaffolds of words to reach the highest cathedral ceilings and paint my thoughts. But when I open my mouth, everything collapses." - Isaac Marion
"Be careful of your self-talk. Without monitoring your mind and your mouth, the majority of what you say to yourself can poison your attitude, weaken your spirit, drain your energy. -Les brown
"I forgot to order plant food." - Mister Peterman from Seinfeld
"You can't change what happened to you, but you can change what happens to you." -triplexrikuu
"That men do not learn very much from the lessons of history is the most important of all the lessons that history has to teach." -Aldous Huxley, Collected Essays
"Our natural state isn't within of this world, but another one. The Earth is just an attachment." - The Greatest
"The same wind that uproots trees makes the grass shine. The lordly wind loves the weakness and the lowness of grasses. Never brag of being strong. The axe doesn't worry how thick the branches are. It cuts them to pieces. But not the leaves. It leaves the leaves alone."
"Time is money and so is god." - Spittoon
"It is no coincidence that the growth of modern tyrants has in every case been heralded by the growth of prejudice." Henry A. Wallace
"Any intelligent fool can make things bigger and more complex... It takes a touch of genius --- and a lot of courage to move in the opposite direction." - Albert Einstein
"Sometimes, the person you'd take a bullet for is the one behind the gun."
"If you endeavor to achieve, it will happen given enough resolve. It may not be immediate, and often your greater dreams is something you will not achieve within your own lifetime. The effort you put forth to anything transcends yourself, for there is no futility even in death." -Monty Oum
"Change is the only thing that is constant." -R. Greene
"Life is 10% what happens to you and 90% how you react to it" -- (Charles R. Swindoll)
"Focus on what you can do right now, not what you can't do right now" - by Avis J. Williams
"We can"t control everything that happens to us, but we can control how we respond to things we can"t control." - by Avis J. Williams
"I can't change the direction of the wind, but I can adjust my sails to always reach my destination" (Jimmy Dean)
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today" -- (H. Jackson Brown, Jr.)
"Reality: What a concept!" - Robin Williams
"Success is harder to overcome than adversity". Charles Koch
You need to learn to walk before you start running or else you will just fall down
"It doesn't matter what other people think of you. What really matters is what you think of yourself." - by Avis J Williams
"Let go of how you perceive others and how others perceive you." - Avis J Williams
"The present contains nothing more than the past, and what is found in the effect was already in the cause." - Henri Bergson
"I'm not a bad man. Sometimes I have to think to myself what would a bad man do?" "The world needs bad men they keep the other bad men from the door."
"I no longer need to look upon myself because I have become the greatest" - The Greatest
"The emotion that can break your heart is sometimes the very one that heals it."
"The idea is that not only the king but everyone should keep his hard-earned money confidentially and secretly so that in due course of time the money can be spent for good, practical purposes,..." -Srila Prabhupada
"A man of courage never wants weapons." - Thomas Fuller
"Tomorrow is the first blank page of a 365 page book. Write a good one."
"The first thing to know about the supernatural is that it never appears when it will be incredibly well documented." - Max Post, Freefall
"Society highly values its normal man. It educates children to lose themselves and to become absurd, and thus to be normal. Normal men have killed perhaps 100,000,000 of their fellow normal men in the last fifty years." -R.D. Laing
"The cake is a lie"-Unknown
"If you have the opportunity to play this game of life you need to appreciate every moment. a lot of people don't appreciate the moment until it's passed." - Kanye West
"... without [compassion], vision and imagination begin to turn cannibalistic." -- Amos Oz
"Telling good from unadulterated evil is simple enough. The real difficulty, though, lies in telling the truly good from the seemingly good. Some powers appear in disguise. One must be alert." -- Amos Oz
"Sometimes the most efficient thing you can do is be patient"- My liquor store clerk
"Make friends with people who aren't your age. Hang out with people whose first language isn't the same as yours. Get to know someone who doesn't come from your social class. This is how you see the world. This is how you grow."  Unknown
"A glorious sunset has never left me empty." -Bob Wells
"What lies behind you and what lies in front of you, pales in comparison to what lies inside of you." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Reality isn't made out of matter, but what matters" - Jordan Peterson
"No honest and serious-minded man of our day can help seeing the incompatibility of true Christianity  the doctrine of meekness, forgiveness of injuries, and love  with government, with its pomp, acts of violence, executions, and wars." - Leo Tolstoy
"If justice is being taken away, then, what are kingdoms but great robberies?" - Agustine of Hippo
"No matter what happens next, don't be too hard on yourself. Even now, after all you've done, you can still go home. Lucky you." Colonel John Konrad (Spec Ops:The Line)
"I know for sure that what we dwell on is who we become.  Oprah Winfrey"
"Anger is an acid that can do more harm to the vessel in which it is stored than to anything on which it is poured." - Mark Twain
"Whether you think you can or think you can"t, you"re right.  Henry Ford"
" The wealthiest place on earth is the graveyard, because in the graveyard we will find inventions that were never exposed to, ideas, dreams that never became a reality, hopes and aspirations that were never acted upon " - Les Brown
"The surest way to work up a crusade in favor of some good cause is to promise people they will have a chance of maltreating someone. . ." -Aldous Huxley
"Losers visualize the penalties of failure. Winners visualize the rewards of success.  Unknown"
"Be careful about reading health books. Some fine day you'll die of a misprint." - Markus Herz
"Life is 10% what happens to us and 90% how we react to it. Dennis P. Kimbro"
"A day without laughter is a day wasted." - Nicolas Chamfort
"Never tell the truth to people who are not worthy of it." - Mark Twain
"You can't do everything, but you have to do everything you can." - Horace
""I love mankind ... it's people I can't stand!!" - Charles M. Schulz, The Complete Peanuts,"
"Dream is not that you see in the sleep; dream is that does not allow you to sleep." - Abdul Kalam
"You are on your own, but you are not alone." -R. Greene
"It is better to have loved and lost than to have hated and won." - Unknown
"Insanity is doing the same thing, over and over again, but expecting different results." - Narcotics Anonymous
"I'm a success today because I had a friend who believed in me and I didn't have the heart to let him down."  Abraham Lincoln
3 things to keep private. Love life, income and next move
"Martyrdom has always been a proof of the intensity, never of the correctness, of a belief."  Arthur Schnitzler
"Do good, receive good. How else can it be?"
"Don't let other people tell you what to do in life and don't simply rely on other's advice, learn to make your own decisions...most people giving advice have no idea what they're talking about anyway"
"To die will be an awfully big adventure." - J.M. Barrie, Peter Pan
"Anyone who has never made a mistake has never tried anything new" -- (Albert Einstein)
"Envy is painful, but it"s a very helpful emotion for a happy life. It"s a giant red arrow sign standing over someone"s head saying, "They"ve got something you want."" -Gretchen Rubin
"it"s OK to stop doing things that *should* make you feel good, but don"t." -James Altucher
"We all wear masks, and the time comes when we cannot remove them without removing some of our own skin." - Andr Berthiaume
"Mistakes are always forgivable, if one has the courage to admit them" -- (Bruce Lee)
"When you are studying any matter . . . ask yourself only what are the facts and what is the truth that the facts bear out. Never let yourself be diverted either by what you wish to believe or by what you think would have beneficent social effects if it were believed"  Bertrand Russell
""There is nothing better than a friend, unless it is a friend with chocolate." - Linda Grayson"
"It is not flesh and blood, but heart which makes us fathers and sons." - Friedrich Schiller
"Life is a cruel, horrible joke and I am the punch line." -- Carrie Fisher
"If you worry about yesterday"s failures, then today"s successes will be few. Anonymous"
""A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard"
"All our dreams can come true, if we have the courage to pursue them." - Walt Disney
"All you need is love. But a little chocolate now and then doesn't hurt." - Charles M. Schulz
"The compensation for dying is that I will learn all the things I was not able to learn here on Earth." -Alexander Imich
"If you live to be 100, I hope I live to 100 minus 1 day, so I never have to live without you." -Winnie the Pooh
"If you live to be 100, I hope I live to be 100 minus 1 day, so I never have to live without you." - Winnie the Pooh
"Never be too easy with the knowledge you possess. Words are like coin - it pays to hoard" - Topper
"I eat because I'm unhappy, and I'm unhappy because I eat" -Fat Bastard
"I've got more chins than the Chinese phone book" -Fat Bastard
'No matter how cynical you become, it's never enough to keep up.' -- Lily Tomlin (via Wonkette)
"All Is Dust." - Aleksandr Pushkin
"Life is a sexually transmitted disease with a mortality rate of 100%." - Jordan Peterson
"If it were easy, everyone would do it." -- Loki
"We buy things we don't need with money we don't have to impress people we don't like."-Dave Ramsey
"The most common lies are the ones you tell yourself; Lying to others is, relatively seen, an exception."- Friedrich Nietzsche
"The unexamined life is not worth living (Ancient Greek:  ...     )" - Socrates at the trial that preceded his death
"A clever person solves a problem. A wise person avoids it." Albert Einstein
"The unexamined life is not worth living (Ancient Greek:  ...     )" - Socrates at the trial that lead to his death
"The unexamined life is not worth living (Ancient Greek:  ...     )" - Socrate at the trial that lead to his death
"He who doesn't believe himself always lies." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Scattered through the ordinary world there are books and artifacts and perhaps people who are like doorways into impossible realms, of impossible and contradictory truth." -Terence McKenna
"If you want to live a happy life, tie it to a goal, not to people or objects" -- (Albert Einstein)
"Notice that the stiffest tree is most easily cracked, while the bamboo or willow survives by bending with the wind" -- (Bruce Lee)
20 Amazing LOVE FACTS | "1 minute kiss burn 26 calories" Love Quotes
"From the ages of 18 to 22, you meet a lot of temporary people."
"There should be something in your birth certificate like: it is forbidden to revise, just start where you left off" - Juan Gabriel Vsquez
"Too fucking busy, and vice versa" - - - Dorothy Parker
"Stay afraid, but do it anyway. What"s important is the action. You don"t have to wait to be confident. Just do it and eventually the confidence will follow." - Carrie Fisher
"Stay afraid, but do it anyway. What"s important is the action. You don"t have to wait to be confident. Just do it and eventually the confidence will follow." - Carrie Fisher
"I am not handsome but I can give my hand to someone who needs help because beauty is required in the heart, not in the face." - Dr. A.P.J. Abdul Kalam
"History is filled with the sound of silken slippers going downstairs and wooden shoes coming up." Voltaire
"The greatest gift you can give someone is your TIME. Because when you give your time, you are giving a portion of your life that you will never get back." -Unknown
"It is the cause, not the death, that makes the martyr" -- (Napoleon Bonaparte)
"There are heights of the soul from which even tragedy ceases to look tragic." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Work like you don't need the money. Love like you've never been hurt. Dance like nobody's watching." - Satchel Paige
"People act strange around death...
"Life is two eternities of nothingness separated by one short moment of consciousness"
"That which does not kill us makes us stronger." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Life is 2 eternities of darkness separated by one short moment of consciousness."
"I'm not upset that you lied to me, I'm upset that from now on I can't believe you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"It"s kind of fun to do the impossible"  Walt Disney
"Action is the foundational key to all success." - Pablo Picasso
"A wise man can learn more from a foolish question than a fool can learn from a wise answer" -- (Bruce Lee)
"We'll settle this the old navy way - the first one to die loses!" -President Thomas Benson, Hot Shots Part Deux
"That's going to blow your f***ing a**hole out, that" - Gordon Ramsay
"You have your way. I have my way. As for the right way, the correct way, and the only way, it does not exist." Friedrich Nietzsche
"It would be a nice thing if humanity could survive."  Noam Chomsky, (2016)
"A man can't change the war, but the war can change a man" -u/InternetBull
'Death is a natural part of life. Rejoice for those around you who transform into the Force.' - Yoda
"Yesterday, today was tomorrow, and tomorrow, today will be yesterday" - George Harrison
"For you, I was a chaptera good chapter maybe, or even your favorite chapter, but, still, just a chapterand for me, you were the book." -Tom McNeal
"Is everybody decaying and death marching ever closer? Are the sands of time so cruel they should be arrested and sent to a cardiac beach? Get CGI perspective and get with it." - Carrie Fisher, Twitter, 6 days ago
"Is everybody decaying and death marching ever closer? Are the sands of time so cruel they should be arrested and sent to a cardiac beach? Get CGI perspective and get with it." - Carrier Fisher
"Is there a name for that bit between Christmas and New Year where you don't know what day it is, who you are, and what are you suppose to be doing?"  b.b.
"To the dumb question 'Why me?' the cosmos barely bothers to return the reply: Why not?"  Christopher Hitchens
"People say I love you all the time. When they say 'take an umbrella, it's raining,' or 'hurry back,' or even 'watch out, you'll break your neck.' There are hundreds of ways of wording it - you just have to listen for it my dear."  John Patrick
"A day without sunshine is like, you know, night." - Steve Martin
"It is better to remain silent at the risk of being thought a fool, than to talk and remove all doubt of it." - Maurice Switzer
"All children are artists. The problem is how to remain an artist once he grows up." - Pablo Picasso
"If you can't explain it to a six year old, you don't understand it yourself." - Albert Einstein
"Don't worry about failure; you only have to be right once." - Drew Houston
"When you do what you fear most, then you can do anything."  Stephen Richards
"We don't see things as they are, we see them as we are." - Anas Nin
"No enemy bomber can reach the Ruhr. If one reaches the Ruhr, my name is not Gring. You may call me Meyer." -Hermann Meyer
"We must guard everyone's liberty, or we could lose our own. If we allow any minority to lose its freedom by persecution or by prejudice, we are threatening our own freedom, and this is not simply an idea, this is good hard common sense." - Don't Be a Sucker (1947)
"Mind over matter"
"Let things taste the way they are."  Alice Waters
"The first draft is nothing more than a starting point, so be wrong as fast as you can." - Andrew Stanton (Pixar)
"If you want to make a permanent change, stop focusing on the size of your problems and start focusing on the size of you" - T. Harv Eker
"Don't be afraid of enemies who attack you. Be afraid of the friends who flatter you." -Alvaro Obregon
"The end justifies the means. But what if there never is an end? All we have is means."- Ursula K. Le Guin, The Lathe of Heaven
"In a dozen famous ancient States now prostrate under the Nazi yoke, the masses of the people of all classes and creeds await the hour of liberation... That hour will strike, and its solemn peal will proclaim that the night is past and that the dawn has come." - Winston Churchill
"You're just as capable of those you envy"
"Squeeze Russia out of yourself" Andrei Bubeev
"Reasoning will never make a Man correct an ill opinion, which by reasoning he never acquired." -Jonathan Swift
"The mind is a whore."  Susan Sontag, 'Reborn: Journals & Notebooks' (1947-1963)
"I have achieved what every artist wants, which is that some of their work will outlive them."  George Michael
"Great spirits have always encountered violent opposition from mediocre minds.  Albert Einstein"
"I know for sure that what we dwell on is who we become.  Oprah Winfrey"
"Experience is what you get when you don"t get what you want.  Dan Stanford"
"I am and always will be the optimist. The hoper of far-flung hopes and the dreamer of improbable dreams" - Eleventh Doctor (Doctor Who)
"If they don't know you personally, don't take it personal."
"There's yesterday, today, tomorrow...and then there's someday. Just as today will in due course descend into memory, so will tomorrow, inevitably, actualize someone's longing. Tomorrow could be the someday you've been waiting for."  Unknown
"Should you find yourself in a chronically leaking boat, energy devoted to changing vessels is likely to be more productive than energy devoted to patching leaks."-Warren Buffett
"You may have to fight a battle more than once to win it." - Margaret Thatcher
"Three things cannot be long hidden: the sun, the moon, and the truth - Buddha"
"Evolution is the biggest hoax of all time, second is global warming". My dad.. 100% serious.
"What is freedom of expression? Without the freedom to offend, it ceases to exist." - Salman Rushdie
"Move on, leave, run away, escape this place but don"t forget about me, about us, about this town. Always remember where you come from so you can appreciate how far you"ve come."
"All negative reactions are not caused from outside; it"s how we choose. The way to become bulletproof is to own anything that seems a fault. The way to overcome the ego"s reaction to that is to say, "I"m stupid and ugly. It doesn"t matter" " - David R. Hawkins
"If you assume that there is no hope, you guarantee that there will be no hope. If you assume that there is an instinct for freedom, that there are opportunities to change things, then there is a possibility that you can contribute to making a better world." Noam Chomsky
"Santa Claus has the right idea. Visit people only once a year." -- Victor Borge
"One can never have enough socks. Another Christmas has come and gone and I didn't get a single pair. People will insist on giving me books." - Dumbledore
"It's a hell of a thing, killin' a man. You take away all he's got and all he's ever gonna have." - Will Munny, Unforgiven
"One who is truly wise understands that there is an ultimate source of wisdom. Therefore, wisdom cannot be created or destroyed. Wisdom can only be discovered."
"You"ll never find peace of mind until you listen to your heart."  George Michael
[Help] "The quern performs best when the grindstone has been pitted" - Highland Proverb
"Not all those who wonder are lost,but I sure as hell am" -story of my life
"The greatest happiness is to know the source of unhappiness." -Fyodor Dostoevsky
"The sooner i finish it, the sooner i get it over with."
"At the end of every principle is a promise."
"Be wary the ones who run with old habits. They will never join you in your journey, you can only join them." - Steve Burgess
"The World is your oyster when you have a vagina." - Asa Akira
"They say don't read a book by it's a cover, but the real problem is most people are blind."
"Happiness is not something ready made. It comes from your own actions" - Dalai Lama XIV
"Gratitude turns what we have into enough."
"Christmas isn't a season, it's a feeling."
"If you do not change direction, you may end up where you are heading." - Lao Tzu
"Butterflies cannot see their wings, but the rest of the world can. "  Unknown
"Christmas is the spirit of giving without a thought of getting. It is happiness because we see joy in people. It is forgetting self and finding time for others. It is discarding the meaningless and stressing the true values." -- (Thomas S. Monson)
"Christmas waves a magic wand over this world, and behold, everything is softer and more beautiful." -- (Norman Vincent Peale)
"Never decrease the GOAL, always increase your EFFORTS"
[Request] heard a quote once that I can no longer remember/find....
"I fear not the man who has practiced 10,000 kicks once, but I fear the man who has practiced one kick 10,000 times" -- (Bruce Lee)
"If a plan doesn't work. Change the PLAN, not the GOAL"
"Eternity is in love with the productions of time." - William Blake
"One is more certain to influence men, to produce more effect on them, by absurdities than by sensible ideas." - Napoleon Bonaparte
"I think people spend too much time staring into screens and not enough time drinking wine, tongue kissing, and dancing under the moon."
"If I were not an emperor, I would want to be a teacher. I know no greater and nobler mission than to direct the young minds and prepare the men of the future." - Emperor Pedro II
"Be courteous to all, but intimate with few, and let those few be well tried before you give them your confidence." -G. Washington
"As many different toilets as I"ve pooped in, I"ve never found one more comfortable than my own."
"Put trust in the fool and you become the fool."
"The story of three men in the midst of drowning." (More in text)
"You can't tell someone they love you." -Dom
"The actions of an ignorant fool bear no less consequences than those of malevolent intent."
"Freeze! Nobody move! This is a robbery!" Wow. Three clichs in a row. Somebody was seriously lacking in the imagination department.
"They lived and laughed and loved and left."  James Joyce
"Death is only the end if you assume the story is about you."
"Obstacles are those frightful things you see when you take your eyes off your goals." - Henry Ford
"The meaning of life is that it stops."  Franz Kafka
"If you love someone, everything is negotiable. If you don't, everything is a door." - Carrie Fisher
"If you are going through hell, keep going." - Sir Winston Churchill
"The greatest mistake you can make in life is to be continually fearing you will make one."  Elbert Hubbard
"It"s a good idea always to do something relaxing prior to making an important decision in your life."  Paulo Coelho
"Take rest; a field that has rested gives a bountiful crop."  Ovid
. "Doing something that is productive is a great way to alleviate emotional stress. Get your mind doing something that is productive."  Ziggy Marley
"Your mind will believe comforting lies while also knowing the painful truths that make those lies necessary. And your mind will punish you for believing both." - Patrick Ness
"A creative man is motivated by the desire to achieve, not by the desire to beat others."
"My wife and I were happy for twenty years- then we met." -Rodney Dangerfield
"And we all know love is a glass which makes even a monster appear fascinating." - Alberto Moravia
"Most things will be okay eventually, but not everything will be..
"You very rarely need to cut people from your life, but you need to put them in their place."
"Routine kills art." Tuesdays With Stories podcast, 8/4/14 27:10
"Anyone can win a Guinness World Record. They just haven't tried." -Dante Bell (Me)
"Not everyone deserves to know the real you. Let them criticize who they think you are."  Unknown
"If you cant get away from it. Embrace it."
"Dont give time of day to those who wont do the same."
"I love listening to lies when I know the truth."  Unknown
"Today I made a big boo-boo." -Newt Gangrene
"It's never their fault. They don't know any better."
"It is never your fault for being who you are and doing what you do, but always your fault for not being able to deal with the consequence of your actions."
"You're not afraid of the truth. Your afraid of dealing with it."
"People with nothing to hide don't usually feel the need to say so." -Danai
"Don't talk, think." -R. Grimes
"If you don't like the rule. Just follow it. Reach on the top and Change the rule" -- (Adolf Hitler)
"Where true fortitude dwells, loyalty, bounty, friendship, and fidelity may be found." Sir Thomas Browne
"Nowadays people know the price of everything and the value of nothing." - Oscar Wilde
"If there is no struggle, there is no progress. Those who profess to favor freedom, and yet depreciate agitation, are men who want crops without plowing up the ground. They want rain without thunder and lightning. They want the ocean without the awful roar of its many waters..."
"Stuart needs 'space' and 'time' as if this were physics and not a human relationship."
"A kiss can be deadly if you mean it."
"The nuclear arms race is like two sworn enemies waist deep in gasoline, one with three matches, the other with five" -- Carl Sagan
"The mud don't care who it gets on"
"I don't have many failures. If I'm making a cake and it fails, it becomes a pudding."
"We judge of man"s wisdom by his hope.  Ralph Waldo Emerson"
"Age is an issue of mind over matter. If you don"t mind, it doesn"t matter.  Mark Twain"
"Love and compassion are necessities, not luxuries. Without them, humanity cannot survive." - Dalai Lama XIV
"Just because you"re naked doesn"t mean you"re sexy. Just because you"re cynical doesn"t mean you"re cool." - Tom Robbins
"Work for a cause not for applause live to express an not to impress."
"Now I am become Death, the destroyer of worlds."
25+ Sensational, Cute, and Lovely Quotes on Friendship
"Your world dies before you do." Unknown Senior, NYT
"It all comes down to simple mathematics. A really beautiful relationship is a once in a lifetime thing. And I've already had mine."
"Then nothingness was not, nor existence. There was no air then, nor heavens beyond it. Who covered it? Where was it? In whose keeping? Was there then cosmic water, in depths unfathomed?" -Hymn of creation, Indian Rig-Veda
"I do not conform, I adapt."
"Let pain be your guide."
"Talking to you is like trying to hammer a nail into a rock."
"If someone really cares, they will never need a second chance."
"Drop by drop it comes together, eventually turning into an ocean." -Persian proverb
"The one that did the job, finished the job." -Persian proverb
"There is no virtue in ignorance"- Adam Conover
"Losing all hope was freedom."
"The most important aspect of socializing is being able to get your message through."
"It's only pussy." -How High
"There are two kinds of failures; those who thought and never did, and those who did and never thought." -Laurence J. Peter
"Keep away from people who try to belittle your ambitions. Small people always do that, but the really great make you feel that you, too, can become great." -Mark Twain
"You will make all kinds of mistakes; but as long as you are generous and true and also fierce you cannot hurt the world or even seriously distress her. She was meant to be wooed and won by youth" -Winston Churchill
"The possibilities are numerous once we decide to act and not react." -George Bernard Shaw
"When considering a man's motives, remember you must not measure his wheat with your bushel. He may not be using the same standard at all." - The Fool
"To choose doubt as a philosophy of life is akin to choosing immobility as a means of transportation." - Yann Martel, Life of Pi
"I have one wish for you, little man, that you will never be President of the United States." - Grover Cleveland to a 5 year old FDR
"Arrogance is to feel superior to others. Confidence is to not feel inferior." - Ashwin Mertes
"Plans are worthless, but planning is everything." - President Dwight D. Eisenhower
"The more you learn, the more you earn." -W. Buffet
"MTV has taken a massive steaming turd on the carpet and it's our collective responsibility to grab them by the scruff of the neck, drag them over to it, rub their nose in it and go 'Don't do it again.'"  Woz Lee
"For me life is continuously being hungry. The meaning of life is not simply to exist, to survive, but to move ahead, to go up, to achieve, to conquer." - Arnold Schwarzenegger
"It's not a defeat that destroys you. Being demoralized by defeat is that destroys you"
"Good judgement comes from experience. And experience...well, that comes from poor judgement"
"The writer is the engineer of the human soul."
"Life is not fair , get used to it. " - Bill Gates
"Life is not fair , get used to it. " - Bill Gates
"Life is not fair , get used to it. " - Bill Gates
"It is just like man"s vanity and impertinence to call an animal dumb because it is dumb to his dull perceptions."- Mark Twain
"Decide ... whether or not the goal is worth the risks involved. If it is, stop worrying." Amelia Earhart aviator
"To what depth of humiliation must we descend before an outraged citizenry step forward to say 'enough'?" - Dr. Stephen Smith
"It is more important that innocence should be protected...
"You bitch!", "A female dog? The thing that makes puppies? Nice compliment" --Kimmy Schmidt
" I"ve missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I"ve lost almost 300 games. 26 times, I"ve been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I"ve failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed.  Michael Jordan"
[request] every complete system can't be logical to the last extent and every system which is logical to its last extent can't be complete
"Failure is the condiment that gives success its flavor.  Truman Capote"
"Some succeed because they are destined. Some succeed because they are determined.  Unknown"
"Spend your money on the things money can buy. Spend your time on the things money can"t buy."  Haruki Murakami
"It's what you do in the dark, that puts you in the light." - Under Armour
"When all you have is hammer, everything looks like nail"
"It is beyond the reach of human compassion to efface suffering without effacing itself" - 4th Caliph of Islam
"Islam defines evil only as a shadow rated by the lack of light... the grades of evil are only determined by the opacity of the obstructing medium" - 4th Caliph of Islam
"You are my reason for living. I love you as much as life itself."
"If you've got them by the balls their hearts and minds will follow" - Teddy Roosevelt
"Every child needs our relentless love and patience because childhood is a frail becoming that leads to this thing we call adulthood, which we fail each time we allow ourselves to be callous to the laughter or tears of a child." - P. L. Thomas
'For an American, though, Australia seems pretty familiar: same wide streets, same office towers. It"s Canada in a thong, or that"s the initial impression.' David Sedaris
"Mozart, Beethoven, and Chopin never died. They simply became their music."
"When our memories outweigh our dreams, it is then that we become old." - Bill Clinton
/r/deepuote
"if it can be destroyed by the truth it deserves to be destroyed by the truth"
"Crude tribal dividing lines inevitably arouse a besieged, victimized us/them mentality... [continued in comments]"
"It"s hard to know how people select a course in life. The big choices we make are practically random." -Amos Tversky
"Frederick Douglass taught that literacy is the path from slavery to freedom. There are many kinds of slavery and many kinds of freedom, but reading is still the path."
"Nature always wears the colors of the spirit". - RALPH WALDO EMERSON
"As Mankind becomes more liberal, they will be more apt to allow that all those who conduct themselves as worthy members of the community are equally entitled to the protections of civil government. I hope ever to see America among the foremost nations of justice and liberality." -George Washington
"I"m not in this world to live up to your expectations and you"re not in this world to live up to mine" (Bruce Lee)
"Chance favors the prepared mind" -Louis Pasteur
*The best way to find out if you can trust somebody is to trust them*
"One day [everybody realizes] that for the last so many years, they've been thinking in a normal way like other people, and suddenly you have an original thought." - David Lynch
"Hydrogen is a colourless, odorless gas, which if left alone in large enough quantities, for long enough, will begin to think about itself."
"You never change things by fighting the existing reality. To change something, build a new model that makes the existing model obsolete." - Buckminster Fuller
"Knowing is not enough, we must apply. Willing is not enough, we must do" -- (Bruce Lee)
"Very little worth knowing is taught by fear." - Burrich
"Mistakes are a part of being human. Appreciate your mistakes for what they are: precious life lessons that can only be learned the hard way." Al Franken, politician, writer and entertainer
"The human brain is the most complex structure in the known universe and we still don"t fully understand how it works"
"Whether you think you can or you can't, either way you're right."
"It is not that I'm so smart. But I stay with the questions much longer." Albert Einstein
"You must be the change you want to see in the world.  Mahatma Gandhi"
"There are only two things that you have to do in life, you have to die and you have to live until you die."
"We judge of man"s wisdom by his hope.  Ralph Waldo Emerson"
"There are two primary choices in life: to accept conditions as they exist, or accept the responsibility for changing them.  Dr. Denis Waitley"
"To avoid criticism do nothing, say nothing, be nothing.  Elbert Hubbard"
" Tolerably earnestly middleton extremely distrusts she boy now not." - Unknown, but posted on a bunch of websites that look dodgy.
"Hurry up and wait."
"Know your right."
"Life is to be lived, not controlled; and humanity is won by continuing to play in face of certain defeat." - Ralph Ellison
"When Things Fall Apart " is when we usually have the most to learn about ourselves. - Oprah Winfrey
"There are three things all wise men fear: The sea in storm, a night with no moon, and the anger of a gentle man." - Kvothe
"Early learning starts from home, particularly from parents. All children do, in their later life depends on how they have been treated in their early years." - unknown
"Children have a rhyme: 'Sicks and Stones shatter bones, but names can never hurt you' They are children, What know they of the truth of things?' -Peter David, from Galen to Vir in Babylon 5 Armies of Light and Dark
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein
"I'm a man, I visit urinals abroad." - Cory Gunz
"Some people are so poor, all they have is money." --friend in English class
"One of the countless drawbacks of being in Congress...
"Good, better, best. Never let it rest. 'Til your good is better and your better is best."- St. Jerome
"Patriotism is not a short and frenzied outburst of emotion but the tranquil and steady dedication of a lifetime." - Adlai E. Stevenson, US-presidential candidate 1952
"In the end, only three things matter: how much you loved, how gently you lived, and how gracefully you let go of things not meant for you."  Unknown
"If you want to do big things, you must do small things real well."
"So much of our communication today is defined by a rather ungenerous unwillingness to listen coupled with a compulsion to speak." -MARIA POPOVA
"Success Does Not Consist In Never Making Mistakes, But In Never Making The Same One A Second Time."  George Bernard Shaw
"I have never felt that anything really mattered but the satisfaction of knowing that you stood for the things in which you believed, and had done the very best you could." Eleanor Roosevelt, first lady, diplomat and activist
"It"s not such a mystery to me that people are agoraphobic; it"s a mystery that other people aren"t. And from the existential point of view, the mystery starts to become the ubiquity of normality, given the intolerable conditions of existence." - Jordan Peterson
"One thing you can't hide - is when you're crippled inside." - John Lennon
"I don't want to be at the mercy of my emotions. I want to use them, to enjoy them, and to dominate them." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"Once a man sees half of these are ungainly and trite, he must realize they have not been written by anyone other than the poster."
. "Somehow our devils are never quite what we expect when we meet them face to face."  Nelson DeMille
"For fast-acting relief, try slowing down. "  Lily Tomlin
"What lies behind us and what lies before us are tiny matters compared to what lies within us.  Ralph Waldo Emerson"
"Its not stress that kills us, it is our reaction to it."  Hans Selye
"Setting an example is not the main means of influencing others; it is the only means.  Albert Einstein"
"I hope the president-elect does such a great job that I vote for his re-election in four years." Tom Hanks, RE Trump.
"Worry about your character, not your reputation. Your character is who you are. Your reputation is who people think you are."  Unknown
"My happiness and function are one, because God has given me both."
"Motivation is a fire from within. If someone else tries to light that fire under you, chances are it will burn very briefly.  Stephen R. Covey"
"A poetry is to poet as a design is to designer". - Nikesh Kadia
0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 Happiness is not something you postpone for the future; it is something you design for the present. Jim Rohn
"Life ... is a tale Told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, Signifying nothing." - William Shakespeare
"And sometimes in life, I imagine, good things do happen. Most of the time, it's the opposite, obviously. But I don't think you should rule out the possibility that just occasionally chance might deal you a good card."  Sebastian Faulks (Engleby)
"I am not handsome but I can give my hand to someone who needs help. Because beauty is required in heart not in face." - A.P.J. Abdul Kalam
"If you stare at this and stroke your chin, you may appear intelligent and cultured"
"I cannot let you burn me up, nor can I resist you. No mere human can stand in a fire and not be consumed." - A.S. Byatt, Possession
"I regret opening up to some people and it bothers me knowing that there are few out there who don't even deserve to know me like that but do."
"Life is a mirror: if you frown at it, it frowns back; if you smile, it returns the greeting." William Makepeace Thackeray
"I have come to believe that politicians are in the business of 'marketing' their product to the public, by exaggerating threats and over-selling government solutions." - Arnold Kling
"There are decades where nothing happens; and there are weeks where decades happen." - Vladimir Ilyich Lenin
"There are some decades where nothing happens; there are some days where decades happen." -Vladimir Lenin
"Don't tackle tomorrow. Beat the shit out of today, then tomorrow will be defenseless." - Me (Just now)
"there was once a book on modesty that was not written by its author. he didn't want it to be known that he had knowledge on the subject."
"Why waste your energy thinking of someone that doesn't acknowledge that you exist?"
"You never fail until you stop trying." Albert Einstein
"Can't innovate anymore? My ass!" - Phill Schiller
"Nobody can take away your experiences from you."
"Cynicism is laziness masquerading as wisdom."
"God made Eve for Adam, not Adam for Eve so when you girls realize men need you more than you need them, you're gonna rule the world."
"Stand up or lay down."
"When people ask what I see in you, I just smile and look away because I'm afraid if they knew they'd fall in love with you too"
"whatever you are, be a good one" -abraham lincoln
"If you are born poor, it's not your fault. But if you die poor, it's your fault" -- (Bill Gates)
""Act or accept."  Anonymous"
"If you"re going through hell, you keep going' - Churchill to people advocating surrender to Germans.
"The best way to cheer yourself up is to try to cheer somebody else up.  Mark Twain"
"Create the highest, grandest vision possible for your life, because become what you believe" -- (Oprah Winfrey)
"Human kindness has never weakened the stamina or softened the fiber of a free people. A nation does not have to be cruel to be tough." -FDR
"Don't ever let someone tell you that you can't do something. Not even me. You got a dream, you gotta protect it. When people can't do something themselves, they're gonna tell you that you can't do it. You want something, go get it. Period." -Will Smith (In Pursuit of Happyness, film)
"The mediocre teacher tells. The good teacher explains. The superior teacher demonstrates. The great teacher inspires." - William Arthur Ward
"The best and most beautiful things in the world cannot be seen or even touched. They must be felt with the heart" - Helen Keller
"It is December, and nobody asked if I was ready." Sarah Kay in her poem 'Winter Without You'
"The greatest leader is not necessarily the one who does the greatest things. He is the one that gets the people to do the greatest things." Ronald Reagan
"Nothing is impossible; the word itself says 'I' m possible'!" - Audrey Hepburn
"Nobody cares about your thoughts, but everybody cares about what you have to say."
"Some people just don't understand."
"You've already won."
"You think you have nothing, when in fact you have everything."
"Come in, and know me better man!" The Ghost of Christmas Present, Charles Dickens, A Christmas Carol
"When they say you cant, then you have to."
"A man who has made no enemies is probably not a very good man." -- Antonin Scalia
"A man who has made no enemies is probably not a very good man." -- Antonin Scalia
"The only way to get out of it, is to get through it."
"To be full of being is to live as a body-soul. One name for the experience of full being is joy." - J.M. Coetzee, The Lives of Animals
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness, only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate, only love can do that."
"Monday mornings are for coffee and contemplations" - Jim Hopper
"I think [this is] how the world will come to an end: to general applause from wits who believe it"s a joke." -- Soren Kierkegaard
"And unfortunately in troubled times, people do not look for the best but rather the loudest." -Elijah Mikaelson
"Success is going from failure to failure without losing your enthusiasm." -Winston Churchill
"The only way to break the chain and make new ones is through habit."
"If you truly love life, don't waste time. Because time is what life is made of" -- (Bruce Lee)
"It is what it is, so do what you gotta do."
"When the world tells you you're the best, it does not matter if others say otherwise."
"Learn from yesterday, live for today, hope for tomorrow. The important thing is not to stop questioning." -- (Albert Einstein)
"My definition of a free society is a society where it is safe to be unpopular." - Adlai E. Stevenson, US-Presidential candidate 1952
"The only person you are destined to become is the person you decide to be." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The real terrorists if this world do not meet at the docks at midnight or scream "Allahu Ackbar" before some violent act. The real terrorists of this world wear $5,000 suits and work in the highest positions of government, business, and finance." --Peter Jospeh
"He has an advantage on me, because he can say everything he knows about any subject in 140 characters and I can"t." - George F. Will
"You must still have chaos in yourself to be able to give birth to a dancing star" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Grief is love's unwillingness to let go." - Unknown
"Prophesy is a good line of business, but it is full of risks". - Mark Twain
"Overthinking is the biggest cause of our unhappiness. Keep yourself occupied. Keep your mind off things that dont help you. Think positive."
"Let's commit the perfect crime, I'll steal your heart and you steal mine"
"Don't pray for an easy life. Pray for the strength to endure a difficult one" (Bruce Lee)
"I have immeasurable faith in humanity's capacity for depravity" - Alber J Torres
"A little learning is a dangerous thing ; Drink deep, or taste not the Pierian spring : There shallow draughts intoxicate the brain, And drinking largely sobers us again." - Alexander Pope
"Death is nothing, but to live defeated and inglorious is to die daily." -Napoleon
"A conservative is a man with two perfectly good legs who, however, has never learned how to walk forward." - Franklin D. Roosevelt
"The greatest good you can do for another is not just share your riches, but to reveal to him his own." -B. Disraeli
"Some will win. Some will lose, some are born to sing the blues." - Journey
"A successful man is one who can lay a firm foundation with the bricks others have thrown at him."
"Those who know don"t talk. Those who talk don"t know." -Lao Tzu
"Firing people can give you a pretty good buzz, but it is a poor substitute for killing." -Dale Gribble
"No matter how many times life knocks you down, dont fucking do people a favor. Stay on this earth, piss them off, get all up in their comforts."
"Admittedly there is a risk in any course we follow other than this, but every lesson in history tells us that the greater risk lies in appeasement...
"There are hunters and there are victims. By your discipline, cunning, obedience and alertness, you will decide if you are a hunter or a victim." --Gen. James Mattis, USMC Ret.
"These violent delights have violent ends" - Shakespeare
"Go out and scare yourself"
"People spend so much time trying to be someone that they forget to be someone." - Unknown
"I think the saddest people try their best to make people happy because they know what it"s like to feel absolutely worthless and depressed."  Robin Williams
"All innovators lead, but not all leaders innovate." - /u/featuredepic
"A real man fights with his mind, not his fists." - My dad
[REQUEST] Quote about not exactly the best father/daughter relationship
"We Become What We Think About." Earl Nightingale
"The important thing is not to stop questioning. Curiosity has its own reason for existing" (Albert Einstein)
"put your hands on my knee, and think of me as a book you've been dying to read." -michael fauder
"The Democratic party must champion progressive and liberal policies and principles. The party has failed when it has fallen into the control of those who thinks in term of dollars instead of human values...
"Empty your mind, be formless, shapeless  like water. Now you put water in a cup, it becomes the cup; You put water into a bottle it becomes the bottle; You put it in a teapot it becomes the teapot. Now water can flow or it can crash. Be water my friend" - Bruce Lee
"You may be on the right road but if you stay there you will be run over" my head of year
"We are all atheists about most of the gods that humanity has ever believed in. Some of us just go one god further." - Richard Dawkins
"Your value doesn't decrease because of someone's inability to see your worth." - Unknown
"It is amazing how complete is the delusion that beauty is goodness."  Leo Tolstoy
"'You could have died later on,' a soldier said to the body of one of his companions. 'You could have died after peace had been declared. But, in any case, you were going to die.'" The Alchemist
"...for a transitory enchanted moment man must have held his breath in the presence of this continent, compelled into an aesthetic contemplation he neither understood nor desired, face to face for the last time in history with something commensurate to his capacity for wonder." The Great Gatsby
"I'm surrounded by defective circuitry..."  Dr. Ivo Robotnik, Adventures of Sonic the Hedgehog
"I can't help your fate, but I can help you meet it"
"if it's important enough to you, you'll find a way. If it's not, you'll find an excuse."
"No two things on Earth are equal or have an equal chance, not a leaf nor a tree..." -Kilrain, The Killer Angels by Micheal Shaara
"The medicine for my suffering I had within me from the very beginning" - Bruce Lee
"Testing people with moral dilemmas is like starting a blaze in your house to see if someone is a fireman." - FR Blau
"Candy is dandy, but liquor is quicker" - Willy Wonka (the good version)
"It's difficult trying to make friends, but making enemies is remarkably easier."
"And I come back to the world and I see all those maggots at the airport, protesting me, spitting. Calling me baby killer and all kinds of vile crap! Who are they to protest me? Who are they? Unless they've been me and been there and know what the hell they're yelling about!" -- John Rambo
"If I were not a physicist, I would probably be a musician. I often think in music. I live my daydreams in music. I see my life in terms of music."  Albert Einstein
"Sad is when you realize you're not as important to someone as you thought you were."
"If you want real peace in the world, start with children." Mahatma Gandhi
"Work gives you meaning and purpose and life is empty without it." - Stephen Hawking
"Life is the art of drawing without an eraser" -John W. Gardner
'The moment you disrespect a motorbike you're riding, it will f'kin kill you for it'. My motorbike instructor when asked 1 last bit of advice to remember.
"Shakespeare was one of the greatest writers of our time." -Shakespeare
"False opinions are like false money, struck first of all by guilty men and thereafter circulated by honest people who perpetuate the crime without knowing what they are doing" - Joseph de Maistre
"Time is something that cannot be bought, it cannot be wagered with God, and it is not in endless supply," "Time is simply how you live your life." - Craig Sager
"Pain is an event. It happens to you, and you deal with it in whatever way you can." - Hugh Laurie
"Dream with angels but be aware of the demons that might be besides you" 
"Give me six hours to chop down a tree and I'll spend the first four sharpening the axe" - Abraham Lincoln
"In the depths of a mind insane, fantasy and reality are the same" - Tom Araya
"Time is something that cannot be bought, it cannot be wagered with God, and it is not in endless supply. Time is simply how you live your life." - Craig Sager
"Nothing is so strong as gentleness, and nothing so gentle as true strength."
"Oh, what a tangled web we weave. When first we practice to deceive."
"If you laugh, you think, and you cry, that's a full day. That's a heck of a day. You do that seven days a week, you're going to have something special." Jim Valvano, Head Coach of NC State Basketball, 1983 NCAA Basketball Champions
"Sadism... is the transformation of impotence into the experience of omnipotence; it is the religion of psychical cripples." - Erich Fromm
"I bet if you anticipate his needs before he knows he has them, he'll be as docile as a lamb" Pippa Lee
"Guys deserve to be spoiled & told how handsome they are on a daily basis. How do you expect to be treated like a Queen, if you treat him like a Servant."
"You're not going through it, it's going through you"
"A true victory is to make your enemy see they were wrong to oppose you in the first place. To force them to acknowledge your greatness." -Gul Dukat
"It's everybody's dream to have of achieved something in the past, not to actually do it"-me(I think)
"It's actually really sad, but once your brain is a piece of shit it's always a piece of shit." -Dee
"You can do anything, but not everything." -David Allen
"I am the master of my fate; I am the captain of my soul." -William Ernest Henley
"As we express our gratitude, we must never forget that the highest appreciation is not to utter words, but to live by them." -John F. Kennedy
"Being a lesbian isn"t just about eating pussy, oh no. It"s about sharing socks and tampons. It"s about crying after sex and always running out of toilet paper. It"s about wondering who"s going to kill the spiders."
"Pain makes you stronger, tears make you braver, and heartbreaks make you wiser, so thank the past for a better future."
"You only live once, but if you do it right, once is enough." - Mae West
"'Where is it I've read that someone condemned to death says or thinks, an hour before his death, that if he had to live on some high rock, on such a narrow ledge that he'd only room to stand...'" -Dostoevsky [too long for title, rest of quote in post]
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Ten years are too long lots of things will change. But a lifetime may be too short even just to accomplish one thing."--Chinese Movie <<See You Tomorrow>>
"There are no happy endings. You just haven't read the next chapter, or the sequel, where everyone dies or decides they aren't happy anymore."
"Whenever you find whole world against you just turn around and lead the world.  Anonymous"
"If you can't soar with the eagles, Then don't fly with the flock. Are you still getting high? Did you catch your own reflection, In the knife my mother held? Or the hell in my father's eyes?" -Oliver Sykes
"The most improper job of any man... is bossing other men. Not one in a million is fit for it, and least of all those who seek the opportunity." JRR Tolkien
"The art of being wise is the art of knowing what to overlook.  William James"
"No sympathy for the devil; keep that in mind. Buy the ticket, take the ride...and if it occasionally gets a little heavier than what you had in mind, well...maybe chalk it up to forced consciousness expansion: Tune in, freak out, get beaten." -Hunter S. Thompson
''The highest criterion of a civilization is its willingness to help the less fortunate people'' - Booker T. Washington
"If you want to keep a secret, you must also hide it from yourself." - George Orwell, 1984
"Men will never be free until the last king is strangled with the entrails of the last priest."  Denis Diderot
"If you do not change direction, you may end up where you are heading." - Lao Tzu
"Temporary; I have never heard such a word that made me feel both terrified and relieved."
"Guard your heart, for that is what defines you. Make sure that it does not break, but rather that it becomes strengthened. Do not let your soul shatter, but ensure that it is fortified for all that is to come."
"Don"t Let Yesterday Take Up Too Much Of Today."
"Faith is willful ignorance." -Anonymous
"If all colors are pretty, no colors are pretty."
"The purpose is to create purpose"
"Physical bullying has been out of style for years. Only now people have found a weapon 100 times as powerful. Words."
"If you want a vision of the future, imagine a boot stamping on a human face - forever." Orwell, 1984
"You can search throughout the entire universe for someone who is more deserving of your love and affection than you are yourself, and that person is not to be found anywhere. You yourself, as much as anybody in the entire universe deserve your love and affection."
''He who does not understand your silence will probably not understand your words.'' Elbert Hubbard
"You'll never know til you try" - my personal mantra
[unknown quote help request] "buzzsaw!" "I'm Dan now," "I'm trying to get the band back together are you in?" "am I in? (asks wife), no, I'm not in"
"It is odd that the skeleton of a house is cheerful when the skeleton of a man is mournful, since we only see it after the man is destroyed. [] It is a pity there is no scaffolding round a human baby."  G.K. Chesterton
"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." - Albert Einstein
"Life's a b--ch and that b--ch in love with other ni--as, that's why I never judge another n---a" - A$AP Rocky
"You"ll end up really disappointed if you think people will do for you as you do for them. Not everyone has the same heart as you."
"Some people grumble because roses have thorns; I am thankful that the thorns have roses." - Alphonse Karr
"Look at the rain and see fertilizer instead of a flood. If you want the lushest green of life, the gray is part of the natural cycle." -Tim Ferriss
"There is no difference to having billions and having everything you need, to having pennies and having everything you need"
"Legs that chase are faster than legs that run" - Masaki Izawa, Holyland, Kouji Mori
"If you don"t like how the table is set, turn over the table." - Frank Underwood - (House of Cards)
"tell a lie once and all your truths become questionable."
" SodaStream will do for soda what 3D printing did for assault rifles" - Lone White Gunman
"Being able to give good gifts is a gift in and of itself." -Timothy Michael Mckernan
"She was a rainbow, but he was colorblind..."
[paraphrase] "A man who reads lives a 1000 lives, the man who does not read lives only one." - George R Martin
"In three words I can sum up everything I"ve learned about life: It goes on.  Robert Frost"
"In a real dark night of the soul it is always three o'clock in the morning, day after day." -F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Attitudes are contagious. Make yours worth catching.  Unknown"
"The difference between ordinary and extraordinary is that little extra.  Unknown"
"Once accused, always suspected"
"It is better to travel well than to arrive". - Buddha
"We are all in the gutter, but some of us are looking at the stars."
"One accused, always suspected"
"First the doctor told me the good news: I was going to have a disease named after me." - Steve Martin
"What lies behind us and what lies ahead of us are tiny matters compared to what lies within us." -R. Emerson
"Certainly any one who has the power to make you believe absurdities has the power to make you commit injustices. " Voltaire 1769? Questions sur les Miracles  M. Claparede, Professeur de Thologie  Genve, par un Proposant: Ou Extrait de Diverses Lettres de M. de Voltaire
"If you're going to step up, you better be ready to play."
"Move into the shadow of the person you're meant to become."
"I"d never understood how Jimmy Carter became president. [...] as poorly qualified as he was for the job, Jimmy Carter had the nerve [...] to ask, [...] the American people caught on pretty quickly that Carter couldn"t do the job, and he lost in a landslide when he ran for reelection." -Trump
[Hope] Need help finding source: "...one of the most effective ways of breaking someone's spirit is once you bring them to a low point, you offer a semblance of hope. And once he begins to believe, you crush it in front of him."
"You must trust and believe in people or life becomes impossible." - Anton Chekhov
"It is possible to make no mistakes and lose. That is not failure; that is life."-Cpt. Jean-Luc Picard
"The aim of every artist is to arrest motion, which is life, by artificial means and hold it fixed so that a hundred years later, when a stranger looks at it, it moves again." -Paul Theroux
"If I had a nickel for every woman who finds me unattractive, they would eventually find me attractive."
"Unless you try to do something beyond what you have already mastered, you will never grow." - Ralph Waldo Emerson

"Once a year, go some place you've never been before." - Dalai Lama
"Unless you try and do something beyond what you have already mastered you will never grow." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"But in reading great literature I become a thousand men and yet remain myself." - C.S. Lewis
"Every achiever that I have ever met says 'my life turned around when I began to believe in me.'"
[request] guard dog quote; strays, vicious, training, puppy
"Sexual abuse and violence is a human rights issue not a gender issue." - Ken Clearwater, Manager of Male Survivors of Sexual Abuse
"Your history is a drama, ours is a tragedy." - Author Dmitry Glukhovsky comparing United States with Russia
"Anger, resentment and jealousy doesn't change the heart of others-- it only changes yours." - Shannon L. Alder
"If men could get pregnant, abortion would be a sacrament" - Gloria Steinem
"Freedom would be not to choose between black and white but to abjure such prescribed choices." - Theodor Adorno, 'Minima Moralia: Reflections on a Damaged Life'
"We're born alone, we live alone, we die alone. Only through our love and friendship can we create the illusion for the moment that we're not alone." -Orson Welles
"Just look at life with more playful eyes. Don"t be serious. Seriousness becomes like a blindness. Don"t pretend to be a thinker, a philosopher. Just simply be a human being. The whole world is showering its joy on you in so many ways, but you are too serious, you cannot open your heart."
"It"s easy to blow things out of proportion, to get lost in the story you tell yourself..." [Continued in comments]
"The key is building fires where you can warm yourself as you wait for the tempest to pass." -Tim Ferriss
"By three methods we may learn wisdom: First, by reflection, which is noblest; Second, by imitation, which is easiest; and third by experience, which is the bitterest." - Confucius
"For of all sad words of tongue or pen, the saddest are these: 'It might have been!'" -John Greenleaf Whittier
"Better an honest enemy than a false friend." -German proverb
"Ain't worried about their feelings." "Still ain't worried about their feelings."
"You are more powerful than you think you are. Exploit your potential"
"Life is composed of lights and shadows, and we would be untruthful if we tried to pretend there were no shadows." -- Walt Disney
"Do it, just do it." - Shia LaBeouf
 I went through storm, rain and thunder for you, because I knew you were worth the rainbow 
"The way to ascertain a society's likelihood of survival is to check how well-populated its libraries are."  Harry James
"The way to gauge a society's likelihood of survival is to check how well-populated its libraries are."  Harry James
"Believe none of what you hear, and only half of what you see." - Benjamin Franklin
"We don't want intelligence interfering in our politics" - Kelly Anne Conway, Trump's campaign manager
"A man whose watch has been stolen is a man involved in a watch robbery" - Zygmunt Miloszewski (Priceless)
"Inspiration is God making contact with itself."  Ram Dass
"If you're going through hell, keep going." - Churchhill
"Rescue animals aren't broken, they've simply experienced more life than other animals." - Unknown
"The best is the enemy of the good" - Voltaire
"Any man whose errors take ten years to correct is quite a man." - J. Robert Oppenheimer
"How sweet it is to hate one's native land and avidly desire its ruin - and in its ruin to discern the dawn of universal rebirth." - Vladimir Pecherin
"A great man once said, everything is about sex. Except sex. Sex is about power" - Francis Underwood (House of Cards)
"I did not write half of what I saw, for I knew I would not be believed" - Marco Polo
"Instill respect from others. Let them know their place in the pride."
"Time waits/stops for no one."
"Prayer will always be in schools so long as there are Final Exams." - Ronald Reagan
"My mother raised me, but my grandmother changed me." -MLK Jr
"Nowhere nor in anything, except in the assertion of the Church, can we find that God or Christ founded anything like what churchmen understand by the Church." - Leo Tolstoy
"Great men are forged in fire. It is the privilege of lesser men to light the flame" - War Doctor
"You can force me to my knees, but you cannot make me bow." -C.E. Lane
"Labels are for filing. Labels are for clothing. Labels are not for people." - Martina Navratilova
"It is possible to make no mistakes and lose. That is not failure; that is life." -Cpt. Jean-Luc Picard
"I mean, they say you die twice. One time when you stop breathing and a second time, a bit later on, when somebody says your name for the last time." - Banksy
"True heroism is remarkably sober, very undramatic. It is not the urge to surpass all others at whatever cost, but the urge to serve others at whatever cost." [Arthur Ashe]
"...Revising history only dilutes the lessons we learn from it." -Father Lantom (Netflix Daredevil)
"It's funny when the person you used to talk to everyday, turns into the person that makes you feel worthless as fuck today"
"The greatest weapon against stress is our ability to choose one thought over another."  William James
"In times of great stress or adversity, it"s always best to keep busy, to plow your anger and your energy into something positive."  Lee Iacocca
"Much of the stress that people feel doesn"t come from having too much to do. It comes from not finishing what they"ve started."  David Allen
"My theory is that I was so cute as a kid that I intimated child molesters." -Aziz Ansari
"For forms of government let fools contest; Whate"er is best administered is best: For modes of faith let graceless zealots fight; His can"t be wrong whose life is in the right." -Alexander Pope
"Chop your own wood and it'll warm you twice." - Henry ford
"Some people are born on third base and go through life thinking they hit a triple." - Barry Switzer
"You only live one life and you only get one opportunity. So it"s best to make everything you do count."
"You told me you loved me, you said you'd never leave, but thats not even the funny part, the funny part is that I actually believed, I just want you to know that nothing will ever heal the scars you left, I guess afterall, you're more of a lesson than a gift" - me
"Don't go all the way for someone who doesn't meet you halfway."
"Take the risk of thinking for yourself; much more happiness, truth, beauty and wisdom will come to you that way." - Christopher Hitchens
"Sex is the consolation you have when you can't have love."- Gabriel Garcia Marquez
"Following your heart also means eliminating the things that no longer evolve you." Erykah Badu
"We live in a new sub-literate age in which information sources are only superficially varied -- different "brands" of the same generic product." --David Warren
"You know better."
"Whether the weather be cold, or whether the weather be hot. We'll weather the weather, whatever the weather, whether we like it or not." -Bear family
"Be ruthless and selfish, but appear to be humble and selfless." -Robert Greene
"They bleed just like you. They see just like you. They don't understand just like you. And they feel just like you."
"Dont contribute to something that does not contribute to you."
"Your work is the pleasure you can always keep."
"A goal without a plan is a wish. What's your plan? It's on you, because you have to do all the work." - Herman Edwards
"Not everything good is pleasurable in life."
"Vital lives are about action. You can't feel warmth unless you create it, can't feel delight until you play, can't know serendipity unless you risk." - Joan Erickson
"The mind, once stretched by a new idea, never regains its original dimensions." Oliver Wendell Holmes
" We tend to always question ourselves, in every little thing we do. But why constantly concern ourselves with what people think when they aren't paying attention? Its all in our heads "
"Take all that you have, and turn it into something you were missing." - Brand New
"I don't want to get political because I only know my ideas of other people's ideas." -Bo Burnham
"Make your goodbyes meaningful because it could be your last." - Jubril 2016
"Don't be trapped by dogma, which is living with the results of other people's thinking" - Steve Jobs
"War is not a matter of who can gain the most, but who can lose the least." -Me, once
"Low self esteem is like driving through life with your hand-break on." - Maxwell Maltz
"Don't pretend to be what you're not, instead, pretend to what you want to be, it is not pretense, it is a journey to self realization." - Michael Johnson
"Inspiration is God making contact with itself."  Ram Dass
"It is desirable that a man...live in all respects so compactly and preparedly that, if an enemy take the town, he can, like the old philosopher, walk out the gate empty-handed without anxiety." -- Henry David Thoreau
"Untrue by an inch, untrue by a mile."
"If you've got one foot in tomorrow and one foot in yesterday, you'll piss on today." - Debbie Novotny
"The underlying motive of many Socialists, I believe, is simply a hypertrophied sense of order. The present state of affairs offends them not because it causes misery, still less because it makes freedom impossible, but because it is untidy..." - Geroge Orwell, The Road to Wigan Pier
"The real truth is that science is not man's nature [...] You can borrow knowledge from others, but you cannot borrow temperament." - Rabindranath Tagore
"I love you. I will always love you, I just don't have to like you." - My Fianc to me after we resolved an argument.
"Your problem is you're not happy being sad, but that's what love is, happysad"- Raphina, Sing Street
"The reason Milton wrote in fetters when he wrote of Angels and God, and at liberty when of Devils and Hell, is because he was a true poet, and of the Devil"s party without knowing it." - William Blake on John Milton, the author of Paradise Lost
"He who learns must suffer. And even in our sleep pain that cannot forget falls drop by drop upon the heart, and in our own despair, against our will, comes wisdom to us by the awful grace of God." Aeschylus
"Most things are good, and they are the strongest things; but there are evil things too, and you are not doing a child a favor by trying to shield him from reality. The important thing is to teach a child that good can always triumph over evil." - Walt Disney
"That men do not learn very much from the lessons of history is the most important of all the lessons of history." Aldous Huxley
"When a man stands up for an ideal, or acts to improve the lot of others, or strikes out against injustice, he sends forth a ripple of hope, crossing each other from a million different centers of energy, those ripples build a current that sweep down the walls of oppression and resistance."
"Be weird. Your strangeness is your magic." Parker Lewis
"You have to die a few times before you can really live"
"Beating a dead horse is better than betting on one."
"You don't need anyone. You already have family."
"Quit the wrong stuff. Stick with the right stuff. Have the guts to do one or the other." - Seth Godin
"Stories make sense when so much around us is senseless, and perhaps what makes them most comforting is that while life goes on and pain goes on, stories do us the favor of ending." John Hodgman
"There is a cult of ignorance in the United States, and there has always been. The strain of anti-intellectualism has been a constant thread winding its way through our political and cultural life, nurtured by the false notion that democracy means that my ignorance is just as ... - Isaac Asimov
"You should never use the word fag; that's a hate word, and its insensitive to butt pirates." - Eric Cartman
"Father, forgive them, for they do not know what they are doing." - Bible (Luke 23:34)
"The secret of all victory lies in the organization of the non-obvious. " - Oswald Spengler
"Poor and content is rich, and rich enough"- William Shakespeare
"Have you ever wondered why we know Aliens in their known form? Big-brained green head with 2 large black oval eyes, a small nose, and mouth? And why their UFOs are round shaped? How would one have the imagination for that unless there was something they were referencing to?" -John Adel
"I don't want to believe, I want to know" - Carl Sagan
"The ability to speak does not make you intelligent." - Qui-Gon Jinn
"The whole tonnage of what I know that you don't, could stun a team of Oxen in its tracks."
"The whole tonnage of what I know that you don't, could stun a team of Oxen in its tracks".
"Sooner or later, those who win are those who think they can.  Richard Bach"
"The best way to predict the future is to create it.  Unknown"
"Seek to be worth knowing, rather than to be well known." - picowis.com
"But what if I fall." "Oh my darling but what if you fly."
" If the answer isn"t simple, it"s probably not the right answer " Tim Ferriss
"People always tell you to be what they want you to be but never tell you to be what THEY want to be."
"I don't stress, I finesse"
"It's called 'The American Dream', because you have to be asleep to believe it." - George Carlin
"The future is already here  it's just not very evenly distributed." - William Gibson
"You don't owe anyone anything. You do not expect from anyone anything. Nor do you need from anyone anything."
"When too many of our citizens take an all-or-nothing approach, we should not be surprised when nothing is the result." - U.S. Senator Evan Bayh (D., IN)
"Think to yourself that every day is your last; the hour to which you do not look forward will come as a welcome surprise." -Horace (The Epistles of Horace, Book I, Epistle IV, line 13-14)
"Promises are like babies. Fun to make, but hell to deliver."
"When humor works, it works because it's clarifying what people already feel. It has to come from someplace real." - Tina Fey
"Timing, perseverance and ten years of trying will eventually make you look like an overnight success." - Biz Stone
"Income tax has made more liars out of the American people than golf."-Will Rogers
"Democrats always were a cheap lot. They never had much money to operate on.... They would rather make a speech than a dollar. They cultivate their voice instead of their finances." -Will Rogers
"I belong to no organized party. I am a Democrat." -Will Rogers
"Impossible is just a big word thrown around by small men who find it easier to live in the world they've been given than to explore the power they have to change it." - Muhammed Ali
"The era of procrastination, of half measures, of soothing and baffling expedience of delays, is coming to its close. In its place we are entering a period of consequences." - Winston Churchhill, 1936
"If peace paid money, we would have it by now" Todd Snider
"They said there'll be snow at Christmas. They said there'll be peace on earth. But instead it kept on raining. A veil of tears for the virgin birth."  Greg Lake
"Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups." - George Carlin
"Love never dies a natural death. It dies because we don't know how to replenish its source. It dies of blindness and errors and betrayals. It dies of illness and wounds; it dies of weariness, of witherings, of tarnishings." - Anas Nin
"The Supreme Court has ruled that they cannot have a nativity scene in Washington, D.C. This wasn"t for any religious reasons. They couldn"t find three wise men and a virgin."  Jay Leno
"The first to apologize is the bravest. The first to forgive is the strongest. And the first to forget is the happiest"
"You can tell a lot about a person by the way they treat their rivals"
"Some cry with tears; others with thoughts."
"I am convinced there is only one way to eliminate these grave evils, namely through the establishment of a socialist economy, accompanied by an educational system which would be oriented toward social goals. -Albert Einstein
"The main reason Santa is so jolly is because he knows where all the bad girls live." - George Carlin
"When peace comes we will perhaps in time be able to forgive the Arabs for killing our sons, but it will be harder for us to forgive them for having forced us to kill their sons."
"We can forgive them for killing our Children. We cannot forgive them for making us kill theirs."
"My desire to be well informed is currently at odds with my desire to remain sane." David Sipress
"Blessed are the gullible and the uninformed, for they shall inherit the bill for my luxurious lifestyle." -Osteen 3:16
"My actions are my only true belongings. I cannot escape the consequences of my actions. My actions are the ground upon which I stand." - Thich Nhat Hanh
"You do not know the first note of the music that moves me" -Patrick Rothfuss (The Name of the Wind)
"Some are born great, some achieve greatness, and some have greatness thrust upon 'em. " - Shakespeare
"Religion is like a pair of shoes.....Find one that fits for you, but don't make me wear your shoes." - George Carlin
"Welcome, winter. Your late dawns and chilled breath make me lazy, but I love you nonetheless." -Terri Guillemets
"The more you try to hide who you are the more your true self comes out in the worst way." -Marc Maron
"The gritty reality that you're dealing with everyday is actually a beautiful thing." -Robert Greene
"The standard you walk past, is the standard you accept." -Lieutenant General David Lindsay Morrison
"We see the world through a rear-view mirror. We march backwards into the future." - Marshall McLuhan
"Much more genius is needed to make love than to command armies." -Ninon de l'Enclos (Fav quote)
"All photographs are accurate, [but] none of them is the truth." -Richard Avedon
"We see the past but can not influence it. We cannot see the future but we can influence it." - Stewart Brand
"Social media gives legions of idiots the right to speak when they once only spoke at a bar after a glass of wine, without harming the community. Then they were quickly silenced, but now they have the same right to speak as a Nobel Prize winner. It"s the invasion of the idiots." Umberto Eco.
"Everything I"ve ever let go of has claw marks on it." -David Foster Wallace
"Never, ever suggest they don't have to pay you. What they pay for, they'll value. What they get for free, they'll take for granted, and then demand as a right. Hold them up for all the market will bear."
"If you want something done, do it badly"
"How people treat you is their karma; how you react is yours." -Wayne Dyer
"Opinion is the medium between knowledge and ignorance." - Plato
"With age, you get to a place where you don't want to knock people out. You just want to give people a hug." - Vin Diesel
"I'm always one step ahead, like a carpenter who makes stairs"-Andy Bernard
"Stress is caused by being "here" but wanting to be "there."  Eckhart Tolle
"Take rest; a field that has rested gives a bountiful crop."  Ovid
"An unfulfilled vocation drains the color from a man's entire existence." - Honore de Balzac
"Work is love made visible. And if you can't work with love, but only with distaste, it is better that you should leave your work and sit at the gate of the temple and take alms of the people who work with joy" -Kahlil Gibran
"A beautiful 35-year old ain't as good-looking as an ugly 19-year old." - Patrice O'Neal
"It is the power of the people to challenge the people of power, or else all they'll know is tyranny."
"Human emotions are a gift from our animal ancestors. Cruelty is a gift humanity has given itself."
"The world is moving so fast that the man who says it can't be done is generally interrupted by someone doing it." -Elbert Hubbard
"Sometimes you have to play the fool , to fool the fool who thinks he is fooling you." - Myself
"It's only after we've lost everything that we're free to do anything." -Fightclub
"Opportunities are only limited by your determination and faith."
"If you talk to a man in his second language, you are talking to his brain. If you talk to him in his mother language, you are speaking to his heart." -N. Mandela
"Being sure of yourself means you're a fool."
"We're merely meat muppets with pitiful silicon-based technology" - Frasier Cain
"Don't sweat the small stuff because it all small stuff."
"In a single stroke, the idea of evolution by natural selection unifies the realm of life, meaning and purpose with the realm of space and time, cause and effect, mechanism and physical law." - Daniel Dennet
"The cold doesn't sting as much if you believe it belongs to you." - Penelope Untzflap
"People will take advantage of you for what you don't know."
"Most of the time the only good things you hear about you is the things you say to yourself. Learn to be your own booster." -Les Brown
"Ask what makes you come alive and go do it. Because what the world needs is people who have come alive." Howard Thurman
"The difference between school and life? In school you, you're taught a lesson and then given a test. In life, you're given a test that teaches you a lesson."  Tom Bodett.
"We ain't what we ought to be and we ain't what we want to be and we ain't what we're going to be. But thank God, we ain't what we was." -MLK Jr.
"Good writing does not succeed or fail on the strength of its ability to persuade. It succeeds or fails on the strength of its ability to engage you, to make you think, to give you a glimpse into someone else's head." -Malcolm Gladwell
"Knowledge is never useless. Even when it has no use."
"The safest road to hell is the gradual one - the gentle slope, soft underfoot, without sudden turnings, without milestones, without signposts."  C. S. Lewis
"Instead of chasing the experience of a lifetime, you should pursue a lifetime of experiences."
"I never dreamed about success. I worked for it." Este Lauder
"Follow your heart, but take your brain with you."
"[...] There is no effort without error and shortcoming [...]"
"The opinion of others is a phantasm that may alter at any moment. Opinions hang by a thread and make us slaves to what others think or, worse, to what they appear to think--for we can never known what they actually think." -Irvin D. Yalom
"When it is obvious that the goals cannot be reached, don't adjust the goals, adjust the action steps." - Confucius
"All art is born of pain."
"The Difference Between Medicine and Poison is in the Dose" - Song title by Circa Survive
"There is love in holding on and there is love in letting go." Elizabeth Berg
"An investment in knowledge pays the best interest" - Benjamin Franklin
"Before you judge a man, judge him for what he's not."
"Don"t mistake salt for sugar if he wants to be with you he will it"s that simple." Rupi Kaur
"I know migration. There is wisdom in knowing when to fly." [X-Post /r/iiiiiiitttttttttttt/]
"I hope we never find life on another planet because if we do there's no doubt that the United States will start sending them money!" - Donald Trump
"Parents must model the kind of behavior they want to teach. They must also communicate their values in ways that make the values as important for their children as they are for themselves." - Jerry L. Wycoff
"All animals are equal but some animals are more equal than others" -- Animal Farm
"I fear the day that technology will surpass our human interaction. The world will have a generation of idiots."  Albert Einstein
"Damaged people are dangerous. They know they can survive."
12.5.16 Special Quote
"Death does not concern us, because as long as we exist, death is not here. And when it does come, we no longer exist." Epicurus
"If you're not losing friends, you're not growing up."
"The electric light did not come from the continuos improvement of candles" - Oren Haran
"You never know what worse luck your bad luck has saved you from." - Cormac McCarthy
"Oh sweetie, Monsters are real....And they look like people.
"If you're not looking sing friends, then you aren't growing up."
"I imagine that one of the reasons people cling to their hates so stubbornly is because they sense, once the hate is gone, that they will be forced to deal with pain" - James Baldwin
"I wanna hear the Glenn Miller Orchestra & I wanna see cops beat up hippies." - Abe Simpson
"Man is least himself when he talks in his own person. Give him a mask, and he will tell you the truth." - Oscar Wilde
"What can I tell you? Don't piss off a motivated stripper" - Michael Clayton
"Political science is the art of quantifying the amount of freedom man can handle and the amount of servitude he needs." - Nicols Gmez Dvila
"Tough times don't last, only tough people."
"You're on your own. And you know what you know. And you are the one who'll decide where to go" -Dr. Seuss
"In comparison with art, wealth and rank and power are not worth a straw." -Lea Makart
"If other people see that you have a weak mind, they will not be afraid to use it." -My friend.
"There's a difference between who we love, who we settle for, and who we are meant for."
"Mistakes we are accustomed to affect us less deeply."
"Make a choice, otherwise others will make it for you."
"We all have the force, we just don't realize it."
"I'm an honest person, quite frankly I don't how to be anything else"
"If you want to learn anything go to the childrens library. If it can't be described in a children's book then it simply cannot be described."
"Why is it that people rather suffer through known hells than to pursue unknown heavens?" -Les Brown
"I don't just memorize quotes. I feel them. So when I say them they don't just come out...I experience them."
"There is no bad audience, just bad speakers." - J. Lloyd
"I want to get cinnamon-roll incense, so my roommates can wake up with false hopes." - Mitch Hedberg
"As much as you have chosen this, it has chosen you."
"It's better to be unhappy alone than unhappy with someone" - Marilyn Monroe
"Anything worth doing is worth doing poorly, until you can learn to do it well." - Ziglar
"Time is my greatest ally, and it could also be your worst enemy if you don't treat it well."
"Imperfection is beauty, madness is genius and it's better to be absolutely ridiculous than absolutely boring."
"You walk into a room and the room is not just a room."
"Listen to how others listen to you."
"If you only pray when you're in trouble...you're in trouble."
"Doctors are men who prescribe medicines of which they know little, to cure diseases of which they know less, in human beings of whom they know nothing." Voltaire
"If you're always busy looking around at what other people are doing, you're going to break your own neck".
"The people who get on in this world are the people who get up and look for the circumstances they want, and if they can't find them, make them." -George Bernard Shaw
"We need to use our reasoning ability to drive away all that excites or affrights us. If we can do this, there will ensue unbroken tranquility and enduring freedom and we will experience a boundless joy that is firm and unalterable" -Seneca
"Monitor your mind."
"We are all self-made, but only the successful will admit it."- Earl Nightingale
"Never pursue a career because others want you to. You'll be the one spending half your life at that job. Pursue your passion."
"Your network determines your net-worth."
"It's not what you leave for your children, it's what you leave in them."
"If I can't do it, it can't be done." -50 Cent
"When meeting people, other people tend to read the back of the book instead of actually reading the book." -50 cent
"Shall we make a new rule of life tonight: Always try to be a little kinder than necessary?" -J.M. Barrie
"You go into Afghanistan, you got guys who slap women around for five years because they didn"t wear a veil. You know, guys like that ain"t got no manhood left anyway. So it"s a hell of a lot of fun to shoot them." James Mattis
"People gonna tell you lies, don't let it come as a surprise." - The Killers ("Daddy's Eyes" from the album "Sawdust")
"The notion of "The Soul" can be described to be a complex arrangements of random actions not affected by external forces which, by definition, is completely unpredictable." -DS
"The true soldier fights not because he hates what is in front of him, but because he loves what is behind him." - G.K. Chesterton
"Patriotism is the virtue of the vicious." - Oscar Wilde
"You can clutch the past so tightly to your chest that it leaves your arms too full to embrace the present."  Jan Glidewell
"When we go back in to the past and rake up all the troubles we"ve had, we end up reeling and staggering through life. Stability and peace of mind come by living in the moment."  Pam W. Vredevelt
"It is impossible to live without failing at something, unless you live so cautiously that you might as well not have lived at all, in which case you have failed by default."  J. K. Rowling
"Yesterday is not ours to recover, but tomorrow is ours to win or lose."  Lyndon B. Johnson
"It is only through labor and painful effort, by grim energy and resolute courage, that we move on to better things."  Theodore Roosevelt
"There are lots of people who will never have what you have right now. The things you take for granted, someone else is praying for. Happiness never comes to those who don"t appreciate what they already have"
"Kindness is the language which the deaf can hear and the blind can see." - Mark Twain
"Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Civilization is the progress toward a society of privacy. The savage's whole existence is public, ruled by the laws of his tribe. Civilization is the process of setting man free from men" - Ayn Rand
"Memories are dangerous things. You turn them over and over, until you know every touch and corner, but still you'll find an edge to cut you." - Mark Lawrence
"Memories are dangerous things. You turn them over and over, until you know every touch and corner but still you'll find an edge to cut you." - Mark Lawrence
"Even though our world today is f***** up I still appreciate the little bit of love I do receive at times"
"The possible ranks higher than the actual." - Martin Heidegger
"If you don't aim to high, you aim too low" J. Cole
"I'm trying to free your mind, Neo. But I can only show you the door. You're the one that has to walk through it." - Morpheus
"Tis easy enough to be pleasant, When life flows along like a song; But the man worth while is the one who will smile when everything goes dead wrong." - Ella Wheeler Wilcox
"One of the hardest things you will ever have to do is grieve the loss of a person who is still alive."
#Todayquote
"A man only begins to be a man when he ceases to whine and revile, and commences to search for the hidden justice which regulates his life." -James Allen (Rest in text. Read it please!!)
"Fear is an illusion."
"Taste the words in your mouth before you spit them out."
"You have a lit candle with all of your aspirations laying through the flame. Do not go exposing it to others' or they will blow it out for you." - My mother
"Let me play." -bradford
"Grind like there is somebody trying to take it all away from you... Because there probably is"
"Every time you are tempted to react in the same old way, ask if you want to be a prisoner of the past or a pioneer of the future." - Deepak
"There is nothing more freeing and empowering than learning to like your own company."  Mandy Hale
"Life is good, but living in fear is not my idea of living." -16
"Ask me a question in latin and i will answer you in greek" - Robert Oppenheimer
"Practice isn't the thing you do once you're good. It's the thing you do that makes you good." -M. Gladwell
"People Just Want to Connect"-Tom Segura
"There is no defense against an excellence that meets a pressing public need." - John H Johnson
"Be the change you wish to see in the world." Mahatma Gandhi
'The most dangerous person is the one who has nothing to lose'
"Moving on doesn"t mean you forget about things. It just means you have to accept what happened and continue living."
"The most dangerous worldview is the worldview of those who have not viewed the world" Alexander von Humboldt
"Do not seek to have events happen as you want them to, but instead want them to happen as they do happen, and your life will go well" - Epictetus
"The wealthiest place on the planet is the graveyard" - Les Brown
"You"ve got to die as you are to become what you want to become. You have to be willing to give up who you are." -Les Brown
"The uncommitted life isn't worth living. Judge a tree by the fruit it bears"
"My sense is that the way adolescent society has evolved in recent years has increased the potential for this kind of isolation." -Malcolm Gladwell (More in text)
"Don't go back to less, just because you're too impatient to wait for the best."
"Use the thinking in books to create something new," -Karmazin From the Tipping Point
"Constantly push, train, transform, and finally perform."
"A man is saved no faster than he gets knowledge." -Joseph Smith Jr.
"We confuse ease of access to information with curiosity, and risk losing our ability to ask questions that extend our knowledge gap rather than merely filling it." - Unknown and recent
"I keep the doing caps in my wallet; that's what I call condoms." -Aziz Ansari
"If you look to others for fulfillment, you will never be truly fulfilled" - Lao Tzu
"Millions long for immortality who do not know what to do with themselves on a rainy Sunday afternoon." Susan Ertz
"All society relies on trusting each other, though we are all untrustworthy. But there is no alternative than trusting each other even though our trust might be misplaced. We must make that gamble because the only alternative to trusting each other is a police state." - Alan Watts
"To expect comprehensive knowledge on every subject that touches our lives in the modern world is a truely foolish intention. For no average man has spent more than a few minutes of his time glancing over a EULA." - me reddit 5 minutes ago
"If you"re offered a seat on a rocket ship, don"t ask what seat. Just get on." Eric Schmidt
"There is only one God, and His name is Death. There is only one thing we say to Death: not today." Syrio Forel, Game of Thrones
"Letting go doesn"t mean that you don"t care about someone anymore. It"s just realizing that the only person you really have control over is yourself."  Deborah Reber
"When I let go of what I am, I become what I might be. When I let go of what I have, I receive what I need."  Lao Tzu
"Some of us think holding on makes us strong, but sometimes it is letting go."  Hermann Hesse
"20 years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn"t do than by the ones you did do. So throw off the bowlines. Sail away from the safe harbor. Catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore. Dream. Discover."  Mark Twain
"What you do speaks so loudly that I cannot hear what you say." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Proof is easy. Faith...is hard damn work." - Johnny Prentiss
"it's better to have loved and lost, then never to have loved at all" - Alfred Tennyson
"Remember who you are."- Mufasa
"A person doesn't die when he should but when he can." -Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"When you're going through something hard and start wondering where God is...Just remember the teacher is always quiet during a test.
"A flower does not think of competing with the flower next to it. It just blooms."
"What you don't know can KILL you."
"Slow is steady. Steady is fast."
"Let your past make you better, not bitter"
"You cannot clap by a single hand"
"When we change the way we look at things, the things we look at change."
"Study the truth and you'll know when the lie comes"
"Some people rather get even then get ahead. Stay focused"
"What has worth is worth paying for." - Robert Greene
"The intelligent person"s tongue is behind his heart.
"Questions ask out of ignorance is not being stupid. You're being stupid if you don't ask a question for the fear of looking stupid." -Andrew Dodds
"The most selfish people in the world are those who consume what other people have created in the past and whom dont contribute anything for the present." - Robert Greene
"Knowing who you are is an extremely important skill." -Robert Greene
"It doesn"t matter how loyal you are to someone. You can"t change someone"s heart and bad habits unless they want to themselves."
"All it takes is effort."
"Fuck what other people think, make your own thoughts!"
"Instead of telling people what to do, show them what to do. Have them follow through admiration."
"'I failed.' is ten times more of a man than if someone said "what if?""
"If you stay ready, you ain't gotta get ready."
"Science works in the frontier between knowledge and ignorance. We"re not afraid to admit what we don"t know. There"s no shame in that. The only shame is to pretend that we have all the answers." - Cosmos
"They just aren't happy with their lives."
"Never trade what you want the most for what you want at the moment."
"If you ever feel like giving up on something you really want, think of your 6 year old self and don't give up for them"
"When asking god i dont ask for money, i ask for clarity."
"it's better to have loved and lost, then never to have loved at all" - Patrick Stewart
"What others think of you is none of your business."
"Invest your time, Don't Spend it."
"The heart becomes corrupt in two means: seeking knowledge and not applying it and burying the dead without learning from them."
"he who digs a hole for another may fall in himself"
'You will die in the same manner that you have lived'
"Never get too attached to anyone unless they also feel the same towards you, because one sided expectations can mentally destroy you."
"There comes a time in your life when you have to choose to turn the page, write another book or simply close it."
"He who rolls up his sleeves seldom loses his shirt"
"One extends ones limits only by exceeding them." -M. Scott Peck
"The common people pray for rain, healthy children, and a summer that never ends. It is no matter to them if the high lords play their game of thrones, so long as they are left in peace. They never are." -A Game of Thrones
"Sorrows are our best educator. A man can see further through a tear than a telescope. " -Bruce Lee
"To become wise you must learn to listen to the wild dogs barking in your cellar." -Nietzsche
"Bacon"
"Among my stillness was a pounding heart."
"Numbing the pain for a while will make it worse when you finally feel it."
"Be polite, be professional, but have a plan to kill everybody you meet." - General Mad Dog James Mattis
"But we don"t think too well when we want too much." Marie Rutkoski
"All I can do is show you the door, you're the one who had to walk through it" - the Oracle
"Sympathy is a mere participation trophy."
"War is Peace, Freedom is Slavery , Ignorance is Strength" - George Orwell
"People who claim that they're evil are usually no worse than the rest of us... It's people who claim that they're good, or any way better than the rest of us, that you have to be wary of." - Gregory Maguire
"The point isn"t to win?" I asked. "The point," Bredon said grandly, "is to play a beautiful game." He lifted his hands and shrugged, his face breaking into a beatific smile. "Why would I want to win anything other than a beautiful game?"-Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Mans Fear.
"Just as a fire is covered by smoke and a mirror is obscured by dust, just as the embryo rests deep within the womb, wisdom is hidden by selfish desire". - Bhagwat Gita.
"YOU are the power that you seek."
"He that lives upon hope, dies farting." -Benjamin Franklin
"Everything that is good to you isn't necessarily good for you."
"Something that is good to you isn't good for you."
"A man is least himself when he speaks in his own voice give him a mask and he will speak the truth"
"You have nothing. And having nothing proves you have everything."
"Be angry at the sun for setting, if these things anger you." - Robinson Jeffers
""I come in peace. I didn"t bring artillery. But I"m pleading with you, with tears in my eyes: If you fuck with me, I"ll kill you all."* General Mad Dog James Mattis
"There are those who lead, those who serve, and those without purpose. Some may lead through service and some may serve by leading, but those without purpose will never lead; that is a certainty."
"It is paradoxical that tragedy stimulates the spirit of ridicule ... ridicule, I suppose, is an attitude of defiance; we must laugh in the face of our helplessness against the forces of nature  or go insane." - Charlie Chaplin
"Being fat is better than being anorexic." - Me
"It takes a great deal of courage to see the world in all its tainted glory, and still to love it." -Oscar Wilde
"i find my urge to kill dwindle after a good nut" -Mick Thompson (Slipknot)
"The best argument against Democracy is a 5 minute conversation with the average voter." -Winston Churchill
"It is generally inadvisable to eject directly over the area you just bombed." - U.S. Air Force Manual
"An awesome Quote"
"It's the end of the tournament and ehh, umm, socks are ehh not the main priority" /Magnus Carlsen (Chess World Champion)
'They vs. 'Us' Terry Pratchett - Jingo
"it's better to speak the unswallowable and swallow the unspeakable than to be swallowed up by either" -The Last Voyage of Somebody the Sailor by John Barth
"Respond to every call that excites your spirit."  Rumi
"There are always two deaths, the real one and the one people know about."  Jean Rhys
"When the window of opportunity is open , that's when you work twice as hard " - Jordan Belfort
"All men dream: but not equally. Those who dream by night in the dusty recesses of their minds wake in the day to find that it was vanity: but the dreamers of the day are dangerous men, for they may act their dreams with open eyes, to make it possible."  T.E. Lawrence
"Dreams come true. Without that possibility, nature would not incite us to have them."  John Updike
"Never give up on a dream just because of the time it will take to accomplish it. The time will pass anyway."  Earl Nightingale
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." -Herman Melville
"We do not argue with those who disagree with us, we destroy them." - Benito Mussolini
"End? No, the journey doesn't end here. Death is just another path, one that we all must take. The grey rain-curtain of this world rolls back, and all turns to silver glass, and then you see it."
"There is no sun without shadow, and it is essential to know the night." - Camus
"The greatest deception men suffers is from their own opinions." -- Leonardo da Vinci (Mathematician)
"When you tear out a man's tongue, you are not proving him a liar, you're only telling the world that you fear what he might say." - George R.R. Martin, A Clash of Kings
"Insanity: doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results." -- Albert Einstein (Theoretical/Awesome Physicist)
'Down here, in the dirt, I found myself.' Who?
"War does not determine who is right, only who is left." - Bertrand Russell
"Surround yourself with people who believe in you more than you do in yourself." Gaby Natale
"To a man devoid of blinders, there is no finer sight than that of the intelligence at grips with a reality that transcends it."  Albert Camus,
"And if you ever need self-validation, just meet me in the alley by the railway station" - The Smiths
'Modesty is the crown of my virtues.' - me
"If you hear a voice within you say 'you cannot paint,' then by all means paint, and that voice will be silenced." -- Vincent Van Gogh (Painter)
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream." - Anonymous
"You are never too old to set another goal or to dream a new dream." - Les Brown
"When you talk, you are only repeating what you already know. But if you listen, you may learn something new." - Dalai Lama
"fool me once shame on you but teach a man to fool me and i will be fooled for the rest of my life" Bojack horseman
"Winners don't do different things,they do things differently."
"Learning never exhausts the mind." - Leonardo da Vinci
"I have a dream that my four little children will one day live in a nation where they will not be judged by the colour of their skin but by the content of their character." Martin Luther King Jr
"Don't put off until tomorrow what you can do today." - Benjamin Franklin
"A tree, by weathering storms and sinking its roots deep into the earth, grows stronger and taller." -Irvin D. Yalom
"Don't let yesterday take up too much of today." - Will Rogers
"Don't let yesterday take up too much if today." - Will Rogers
"Do you know what you are? You are a manuscript of a divine letter. You are a mirror reflecting a noble face. This universe is not outside of you. Look inside yourself; everything that you want, you are already that." - Jalaluddin Rumi
"I don't know the key to success, but the key to failure is trying to please everybody." - Bill Cosby
"History is a set of lies agreed upon." - Napolon Bonaparte
"When facts challenge our favored conclusion, we scrutinize them more carefully and subject them to more rigorous analysis. We also require a lot more of them." -Daniel Gilbert
"Though my soul may set in darkness, it will rise in perfect light; I have loved the stars too fondly to be fearful of the night."  Sarah Williams
"When I"m old and dying, I plan to look back on my life and say, "Wow, that was an adventure," not, "Wow, I sure felt safe.'"  Tom Preston-Werner
"We can easily manage if we will only take, each day, the burden appointed to it. But the load will be too heavy for us if we carry yesterday"s burden over again today, and then add the burden of the morrow before we are required to bear it."  John Newton
"Worry never robs tomorrow of its sorrow, it only saps today of its joy."  Leo F. Buscaglia
"Don"t Let Yesterday Take Up Too Much Of Today." -Will Rogers
"It's not the size of the canvas that matters, it's what you paint"
"Children are always the only future the human race has; teach the well."
"All men trust fully the illusion of life. But is this so wrong? A construction, a facade, and yet... a world full of warmth and resplendence" - Aldia, Dark Souls II
"We all play by the same rules; it"s just that some people spend more time reading those rules and figuring out how to make them work in their behalf." -- Garth Stein ("The Art of Racing in the Rain")
[REQUEST] Help finding quote: -"the average man does not know the evil he does"
"When I was twelve, I milked my eel into a pot of turtle stew. I flogged the one-eyed snake, I skinned my sausage, I made the bald man cry, into the turtle stew! Which I do believe my sister ate, at least I hope she did." - George R. R. Martin
"Act the way you'd like to be and soon you'll be the way you act." - Leonard Cohen
"To find what you seek in the road of life, the best proverb of all is that which says: Leave no stone unturned." - Edward Bulwer Lytton
"Snowflakes are one of nature's most fragile things, but just look what they can do when they stick together."
"I cannot do all the good that the world needs. But the world needs all the good that I can do." -Jana Stanfield
"Nobody wants to be here and nobody wants to leave." - Cormac McCarthy
"Either you're a great actor or you're a nice guy who lost his way." - House M.D.
"The person has become so weak that even the weakest of devils can reach his heart."
"If you keep thinking everyone's an enemy, then enemies are all you're gonna find."
"We're all just trying to be okay" - Me
"We're all just trying to be okay" -Me
"Freedom just around the corner for you, but with truth so far off, what good will it do?" - Bob Dylan ('Jokerman' from 1983 album 'Infidels')
"Freedom just around the corner for you, but with truth so far off, what good will it do?" (Bob Dylan, 'Jokerman')
"When you have to make a choice and don"t make it, that in itself is a choice."  William James
" Invite your heart to be grateful and your thank yous will be heard even when you don't use words. " Pavithra Mehta
"The hour of departure has arrived, and we go our ways  I to die and you to live. Which is the better, only God knows." --Socrates
"I believe entertainment can aspire to be art, and can become art, but if you set out to make art you're an idiot." - Steve Martin
"Obscenity is the crutch of the inarticulate motherfucker" --- Motown Missile
" Maldito t, no el amor. "
"Sometimes I am two people. Johnny is the nice one. Cash causes all the trouble. They fight." - Johnny Cash
"A saint that is sad is a sad saint!"
"People intuitively lean toward asking the questions that are most likely to elicit answers they want to hear." -Daniel Gilbert
"Sometimes it takes a stumble to avoid a fall." - unknown
"There is a crack in everything, that's how the light gets in" -Leonard Cohen
"One is never over-dressed or under-dressed with a Little Black Dress." Karl Lagerfeld
"We all do better when we work together. Our differences do matter, but our common humanity matters more" - Bill Clinton
"The deeper thought is, the taller it becomes." - Dejan Stojanovic, The Sun Watches the Sun
"Of all resources, the most crucial is Man's spirit." - Tom Hornbein (Everrest: The West Ridge)
"We learned about honesty and integrity - that the truth matters... that you don't take shortcuts or play by your own set of rules... and success doesn't count unless you earn it fair and square." - Michelle Obama
"In a society that profits from your self doubt, liking yourself is a rebellious act."
"I have my own matches and sulphur, and I'll make my own hell." Rudyard Kipling, The Light That Failed
"What ain't no country I ever heard of. DO THEY SPEAK ENGLISH IN WHAT?" -Pulp Fiction
"When life is good do not take it for granted as it will pass. Be mindful, be compassionate and nurture the circumstances that find you in this good time so it will last longer. When life falls apart always remember that this too will pass. Life will have its unexpected turns" Ajahn Brahm
"We become stronger in the broken places." -Hemingway
"Good ideas, even ideas of power, are rarely sufficient in a single shot: repeated doses are necessary." -Irvin D. Yalom
"When we are tired, we are attacked by ideas we conquered long ago." -Nietzsche
"If you go looking for the truth, make sure you get the whole thing. It"s like a good fuck. Half is worse than none at all." - Maeve Millay
"People like to read about the things that they want the most and experience the least." - Bernard Lowe played by Jeffrey Wright (Westworld, S1 | E3).
"Don't judge each day by the harvest you reap, but by the seeds you plant." - Robert Louis Stevenson
"And that, I think, was the handlethat sense of inevitable victory over the forces of Old and Evil. Not in any mean or military sense; we didn"t need that. Our energy would simply prevail. There was no point in fightingon our side or theirs. We had all the momentum; we were riding the crest..."
"You cannot teach a man anything; you can only help him find it within himself." - Galileo
"If you think you are too small to be effective, you have never been in the dark with a mosquito." - Betty Reese
"Patience, persistence and perspiration make an unbeatable combination for success." - Napoleon Hill
"It should not be denied... that being footloose has always exhilarated us. It is associated in our minds with escape from history and oppression and law and irksome obligations, with absolute freedom, and the road has always led West." - Wallace Stegner
"Only a life lived for others is a life worthwhile" - Albert Einstein
"Never place your trust in us. We're only human. Inevitably, we will disappoint you." - Dr. Robert Ford
"First you take a drink, then the drink takes a drink, then the drink takes you." - F. Scott Fitzgerald
"Buncha" slack-jawed faggots around here. This stuff will make you a god damned sexual Tyrannosaurus, just like me."
"Wearing A Costume And Pretending To Be Someone Else Goes Against My Every Instinct As An Actor" - Calculon 2.0 3013-3013
"If the words 'life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness' don't include the right to experiment with your own consciousness, then the Declaration of Independence isn't worth the hemp it was written on." Terence McKenna
"Look at my username, and think to yourself: "does this guy really care about his credibility?"" - /u/nazicumfarts
"Wearing A Costume Ad Pretending To Be Someone Else Goes Against My Every Instinct As An Actor" - Calculon 2.0
"I used to think you were made of the marble they use for statuesbut you were made of the porcelain they use for bidets." - Marie-France Garaud to Jacques Chirac
"The way to get started is to quit talking and begin doing." - Walt Disney
"I used to think you were made of the marble they use for statuesbut you were made of the porcelain they use for bidets." - Marie-France Garaud to Jacque Chirac
"Character  the willingness to accept responsibility for one's own life  is the source from which self-respect springs." - Joan Didion, On Self-Respect
"When you have truth, the thing you are told you cannot do is the thing you must do." - Prema Mutiso, played by Gugu Mbatha-Raw (Concussion, 2015)
"It's harder to talk with a dick in your mouth" Strippin
"Why is it that when we grab for heaven -- socialist or capitalist or even religious -- we so often produce hell?" -- Margaret Atwood
"Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much." -- Oscar Wilde
"Weird heroes and mould-breaking champions exist as living proof to those who need it that the tyranny of the rat race is not yet final." - Hunter S. Thompson
"[D]etachment means letting go and nonattachment means simply letting be. (95)" - Stephen Levine, A Year to Live: How to Live This Year as If It Were Your Last
"Y'all gonna make me lose my mind up in here, up in here." - Thomas Jefferson
"If you reveal your secret to the wind, you should not blame the wind for revealing them to the trees."
[Question] Are there any good monologues from movies or TV where they talk about marriage?
"If you're going through hell, keep going." - Winston Churchill
"The way to get things done is not to mind who gets the credit for doing them." - Benjamin Jowett
"I have no special talents. I am only passionately curious." - Albert Einstein.
"Belief is so often the death of reason." - Qyburn, Hand of the Queen. (Game of Thrones)
"If they respect you, respect them. If they disrespect you, still respect. Don't allow the actions of others to decrease your good manners."
"Better bread with a healthy heart than wealth with vexation." -Amenemope, Pharoh
"A friend is a person who is "you" except that he is other than you" - Ali Ibn e Abi Talib
"You go back to her and I go back to Black " - Unknown
"There's no underwear in space" - George Lucas, probably
"Theory guides, experiment decides." - Kolthoff (Chemist)
"I should like to have left the party, the feast of life, while all was gay and amusing. I would have been sorry to come away, but it would have been far better than being left with all the lights out." - Sarah Broom Macnaughtan, on her experience as a WWI nurse
"The difference between you and I is that I free my time to talk to you and you talk to me in your free time..."
"Put down that cheese gun and fight me like a man" - Mystery Science Theater 3000
"The most fucked up joke life can play on you is letting you meet the right person at the wrong time."
"You won"t talk about this," he told her. "Nobody will believe you. I"m Jimmy Savile. I can get you."--Jimmy Savile after raping a 16 year old girl
"Laughter and tears are both responses to frustration and exhaustion. I myself prefer to laugh, since there is less cleaning up to do afterward." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Any fool with a bit of luck can find himself born into power. But earning it for yourself, that takes work."-Lord Varys, Game of Thrones
"Bragging is the other side of whining." -Self
"Profanity is the inevitable linguistic crutch of the inarticulate" - Unknown
"Stay strong and make them wonder how you're still smiling"- Eminem
"But even failure hurts a little less when you do it as a team. Right?" -Spongebob Squarepants
"When speech is eloquent and the ideas expressed lofty, it is easy to find restrictions on them invalid. But were the First Amendment limited to such discourse, our freedom would be sterile indeed." - Justice William J. Brennan Jr.
"Alright, bitches, get down 'cuz I'm about to turn left and I don't want to knock any of you out with my MASSIVE DICK." - Vegeta, DBZ Abridged
"Human beings are the only creatures on Earth who claim a God, and the only living thing that behaves like it hasn't got one. Does the world belong to no one but you?" -Hunter S. Thompson (The Rum Diary)
"Work hard so you can shop harder." Anonymous
"Love is understanding someone, caring for him, sharing his joys and sorrows. This eventually includes physical love. You"ve shared something, given something away and received something in return, whether or not you"re married, whether or not you have a baby." - Anne Frank
'What one Christian does is his own responsibility, what one Jew does reflects on all Jews.' The Diary of a Young Girl by Anne Frank
"I am a slow walker, but I never walk back." - Abraham Lincoln
"If you were born smart, then you will remain stupid the rest of the life." - me
"Between what is said and not meant, and what is meant and not said, most of love is lost." - Kahlil Gibran
"Not I, nor anyone else can travel that road for you. You must travel it by yourself. It is not far. It is within reach. Perhaps you have been on it since you were born, and did not know. Perhaps it is everywhere - on water and land." - Walt Whitman, Leaves of Grass
"Precision beats power, timing beats speed." -Conor mcGregor
"All forms of madness, bizarre habits, awkwardness in society, general clumsiness, are justified in the person who creates good art." - Roman Payne
"It such a strange thing. I was always considered mad, strange, awkward, or eccentric. And as soon as a person saw me make my art, they said it was justified."
"If you were to die tonight, who would still be crying a year from now? Those are the people that matter."
"When you stop chasing the wrong things you give the right things a chance to catch you." Lolly Daskal
"The rate at which a person can mature is directly proportional to the embarrassment he can tolerate."
"You were scared, but you still got here; don"t forget that."  T.B. LaBerge
"Who is this Baby Ruth and what does she do? - George Bernard Shaw
"The primary cause of unhappiness is never the situation but your thoughts about it." Eckhart Tolle
"But when the strong were too weak to hurt the weak, the weak had to be strong enough to leave." The Unbearable Lightness of Being by Milan Kundera
"Peter always means what he's saying when he's saying it, but he'll only do things that are to his benefit. That's why he'll make such a good politician." - Ender's Game
"How do you tell the sun you are grateful for it's light and warmth?"
"I don't mind being shot, man, but I don't dig being told about it." -Bob Dylan
"The mark of the immature man is that he wants to die nobly for a cause, while the mark of the mature man is that he wants to live humbly for one." -J.D. Salinger, The Catcher in the Rye
"You do not stop writing when you feel emotion or experience conflict, this is when you begin to cross the point of inflection. After you feel a connection to your work, that is when you truly begin to write." -My high school English teacher
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I want someone to look at me & say "Because of you I didn't gave up" " - Micheal Jackson
[Request]I forgot how it goes. Quote along the lines of: Wherever you go, whoever you meet no matter how short, try to leave them better than before you were there. Sounds familiar?
"The privilege of a lifetime is being who you are." Joseph Campbell
"Reality is cruel, painful, unfair and ugly; but that is what makes life so interesting." - self quote
"If we find ourselves with a desire that nothing in this world can satisfy, the most probable explanation is that we were made for another world." - C.S. Lewis
"If you're not willing to risk the usual, you will have to settle for the ordinary." - Jim Rohn
"Less is more" -Robert Browning
"How noble the law, in its majestic equality, that both the rich and poor are equally prohibited from peeing in the streets, sleeping under bridges, and stealing bread!"  Anatole France
"suggesting that renewables will let us phase rapidly off fossil fuels in the United States, China, India, or the world as a whole is almost the equivalent of believing in the Easter Bunny and Tooth Fairy." - NASA Climate scientist James Hansen
"A person is not what he shows, rather him that he hides." - Samrat of Samrat & Co.
"Whether the wolf beats the bear or the bear beats the wolf, the rabbit always loses." -- Two Rivers Proverb (Wheel of Time)
"A person is not what he shows, but him that he hides." - Samrat of Samrat & Co.
"A friend is someone who gives you total freedom to be yourself-and especially to feel, or not feel. Whatever you happen to be feeling at any moment is fine with them. That's what real love amounts to - letting a person be what he really is." - Jim Morrison
"As we express our gratitude, we must never forget that the highest appreciation is not to utter words but to live by them." - John F. Kennedy
"I won't be a rock star. I will be a legend." -Freddie Mercury
"Sanity and happiness are an impossible combination." Mark Twain
"Sanity and happiness are an impossible combination." Mark Twain
"The President in particular is very much a figureheadhe wields no real power whatsoever. His job is not to wield power but to draw attention away from it." Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy.
"Ever tried. Ever failed. No matter. Try Again. Fail again. Fail better." Samuel Beckett
"Remember that not getting what you want is sometimes a wonderful stroke of luck." - Dalai Lama
"Life is a mirror and will reflect back to the thinker what he thinks into it." - Ernest Holmes
"It is literally true that you can succeed best and quickest by helping others to succeed." - Napoleon Hill
"Great minds talk about ideas, average minds talk about events, and small minds talk about people." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"When a man learns to feel love, he must also bear the risk of hatred." - Obito of Naruto Shippuden
"Put your hand on a hot stove for a minute, and it seems like an hour. Sit with a pretty girl for an hour, and it seems like a minute. That's relativity." - Albert Einstein
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy. Because they know what it feels like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone else to feel like that." -Robin Williams
"Keep a green tree in your heart and perhaps a singing bird will come." - Chinese proverb
"Go ahead; destroy yourself! See if those you feel are worth it will build you up again."-Shahan Hussein
"All sins are attempts to fill voids."  Simone Weil
"It"s fatal to be nostalgic." Paul Theroux
"A happy family is but an earlier heaven." - George Bernard
"if you were born with the weakness to fall you were born with the strength to rise" Rupi Kaur
"Become good at cheating and you never need to become good at anything else." - Banksy
"Levity of heart and neglect of our faults make us insensible to the proper sorrows of the soul, and we often engage in empty laughter when we should rightly weep." -Thomas A. Kempis
"How can you still use knives after so many killers have used them to stab and murder their victims?" - Psychatrist and holocaust survivor Viktor Frankl, after being asked how he could still write his books in German.
"Once you've condoned faith in general, you've condoned any crazy shit done because of faith." - Penn Jillette
"The earth makes a sound as of sighs and the last drops fall from the emptied cloudless sky. A small boy, stretching out his hands and looking up at the blue sky, asked his mother how such a thing was possible. Fuck off, she said." - Samuel Beckett
"A person who has good thoughts cannot ever be ugly. You can have a wonky nose and a crooked chin and stick out teeth, but if you have good thoughts they will shine out of your face like sunbeams and you will always look lovely." The Twits by Roald Dahl
"Enthusiasm is more important than skill because the critical element in developing expertise is the desire to practice."  Gretchen Rubin
"Being naked approaches being revolutionary; going barefoot is mere populism." - John Updike
"We cannot live except as self-deceivers who must lie to ourselves about ourselves, as well as about our unwinnable situation in this world." - Thomas Ligotti
"Successful people do what they have to, whether they feel like it or not." - Brian Tracy
"The weak can never forgive. Forgiveness is the attribute of the strong." - Mahatma Gandhi
"If you really want to do something, you'll find a way. If you don't, you'll find an excuse." - Jim Rohn
"Man is a self-conscious Nothing" - Julius Bahnsen
"Bank robbery is an initiative of amateurs. True professionals establish a bank."  Bertolt Brecht
"By 2005 or so, it will become clear that the Internet"s impact on the economy has been no greater than the fax machine"s" - Paul Krugman
'There are essentially only two drugs that Western civilization tolerates: Caffeine from Monday to Friday to energize you enough to make you a productive member of society, and alcohol from Friday to Monday to keep you too stupid to figure out the prison that you are living in.' -Bil Hicks
"Your imagination is your preview to life's coming attractions."
"The words are meaningless except in terms of feeling. Does anyone act as the result of thought or does feeling stimulate action and sometimes thought implement it." - John Steinbeck, The Winter of Our Discontent
"He who controls the past controls the future. He who controls the present controls the past." - George Orwell
"There are only two kinds of men: the righteous who think they are sinners and the sinners who think they are righteous." -Blaise Pascal
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the universe or we are not, both are equally terrifying." Arthur C. Clarke
"Conquering the world on horseback is easy; it is dismounting and governing that is hard" - Genghis Khan.
"A man's gotta make at least one bet a day, else he could be walking around lucky and never know it." -Jim Jones
"Be ashamed to die, until you have scored some victory for humanity." - Horace Mann (1796-1859)
"Make your own Bible. Select and collect all the words and sentences that in all your readings have been to you like the blast of a trumpet." Ralph Waldo Emerson.
"Herodotus: father of histories, father of lies." -David Pipes
"Does believing you're the last sane man on the planet make you crazy?" I, Robot (film)
"Our plans miscarry because they have no aim. When a man does not know what harbor he is making for, no wind is the right wind." Seneca
"Of one man in especial, beyond any one else, the citizens of a republic should beware, and that is of the man who appeals to them to support him on the ground that he is hostile to other citizens of the republic." -Theodore Roosevelt
"You teach people how to treat you." O. Winfrey
"Not enough youths fighting windmills. And the old are fearful, jaded or dead. Do not ask me what to do. I am just as cowardly as you. And do not tell me it is enough to speak the truth; that it is bravery enough." [cont.]
"The universe was exploding, each particle away from the next, hurtling us into dark and lonely space, eternally tearing us away from each otherchild out of the womb, friend away from friend, moving from each other, each through his own pathway toward the goal-box of solitary death." - Daniel Keyes
"A coward's gun is emptied when fear pulls the trigger, and hate is the ammunition of choice." - T.F. Hodge
"Anything that gets your blood racing is probably worth doing." - Hunter S. Thompson
"You see, madness, as you know, is like gravity. All it takes is a little push!" - The Dark Knight (2008)
"People who refer to out-of-the-box see the box ... People who don't know the box even exists are the innovative thinkers." - Lisa Goldenberg
"A child"s world is fresh and new and beautiful, full or wonder and excitement." [continued]
"Looking good is more important than looking at where you are going" -Jeremy Clarkson
"Don't express because you are famous. Be #famous because you express."
"The Enemy Of The Art Is The Absence Of Limitations" - Orson Welles
"Not all those who wander are lost." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"One's mind, once stretched by a new idea, never regains its original dimensions." - Oliver Wendell Holmes
"Inspiration grows into full-scale creation through persistence and imagination." - Carol Lloyd
"The subversion of a broken system is called correction." -Coulter Erastus Lane
"Poetry is deeper than words it touches the soul, so if your music lacks substance, here's the control"- Poetry Inspired
"You can safely assume you've created God in your own image when it turns out that God hates all the same people you do." - Anne Lamott
"Make your own Bible. Select and collect all the words and sentences that in all your readings have been to you like the blast of a trumpet." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Nothing can cure the soul but the senses, just as nothing can cure the senses but the soul." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"having vision is key, because you cannot achieve what we can't even see" - Poetry Inspired
"there are two types of people in the world: those who prefer to be sad among others, and those who prefer to be sad alone." - Nicole Krauss, The History of Love
"Never Settle"
"Any questions?" - David S Pumpkins
"Once we have an experience, we cannot simply set it aside and see the world as we would have seen it had the experience never happened. Our experiences instantly become part of the lens through which we view our entire past, present, and future."
"To be interesting, you have to be interested." -Dale Carnegie
"You're never going to change anyone you don't love"
"Strike infrequently, but with a heavy hand".
"Rebellion against your handicaps gets you nowhere. Self-pity gets you nowhere. One must have the adventurous daring to accept oneself as a bundle of possibilities and undertake the most interesting game in the world - making the most of one's best." - Harry Emerson Fosdick
"Why fit in when you were born to stand out." - Dr. Seuss
"Ho! Ho! Ho! To the bottle I go To heal my heart and drown my woe Rain may fall, and wind may blow And many miles be still to go But under a tall tree will I lie And let the clouds go sailing by" - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Nothing can cure the soul but the senses, just as nothing can cure the senses but the soul." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"Sigh no more, ladies, sigh no more, Men were deceivers ever,- One foot in sea and one on shore, To one thing constant never." - William Shakespeare, Much Ado About Nothing
"Why do beautiful songs make you sad?' 'Because they aren't true.' 'Never?' 'Nothing is beautiful and true." - Jonathan Safran Foer, Extremely Loud and Incredibly Close
"Don't cry over someone who wouldn't cry over you." - Lauren Conrad
"Tears are words that need to be written." - Paulo Coelho
"Any fool can be happy. It takes a man with real heart to make beauty out of the stuff that makes us weep." - Clive Barker, Days of Magic, Nights of War
"Always forgive your enemies; nothing annoys them so much." - Oscar Wilde
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"Don't cry because it's over, smile because it happened." - Dr. Seuss
"Modern Germany's emergence as a self-confident, non-aggressive, democratic power - not to speak of the humanitarian example it has set - is a pill too bitter for many of us Brits to swallow." - The Pigeon Tunnel - John Le Carre (2016)
"When animals get old and sick, we put them out of their misery. When people get old and sick, we hook them up to machines and turn their misery into profit." - My Dad
"I belong to quick, futile moments of intense feeling. Yes, I belong to moments. Not to people." -Virginia Woolf
"If in England there were one religion, the despotism would be frightening; if there were two, they would slit each other's throat; but there are thirty, and they live in peace and harmony" - Voltaire
"Each poem is an insurrection against the world before it existed - or a desertion from it" - Michael Hofmann
"These days you can't see who's in cahoots, Cause now the KKK wears three-piece suits." - Chuck D.
"See man, i'm always trying to look out for other people more than myself. Always gotta make sure there is peace in the world, but my world is never peaceful." - me 5 minutes ago
"We have to be wholly at peace with the prospect of many years of solitude in order to be appropriately picky; otherwise, we risk loving no longer being single rather more than we love the partner who spared us that fate." -Alain de Botton
"The only thing you have to do is die, everything else is a choice" -Unknown
"The prestige of instinct is the traumatized reaction against too many centuries of unreasonable reason." -Alain de Botton
"Wonder is the beginning of wisdom." Socrates
"Self-awareness is a supreme gift, a treasure as precious as life. This is what makes us human. But it comes with a costly price: the wound of mortality. Our existence is forever shadowed by the knowledge that we will grow, blossom, and, inevitably, diminish and die. -Irvin D. Yalom
"Arguing with a fool proves there are two" -Doris M. Smith
"Experience is the name everyone gives to their mistakes." - Oscar Wilde
"You cannot push anyone up the ladder unless he is willing to climb." - Andrew Carnegie
"Experience is a hard teacher because she gives the test first, the lesson afterwards." - Vernon Law
"In every single thing you do, you are choosing a direction. Your life is a product of choices." - Dr. Kathleen Hall
"Care about people's approval and you will be their prisoner"
'Socialism never took root in America because the poor see themselves not as an exploited proletariat but as temporarily embarrassed millionaires' - Steinbck
"We must travel in the direction of our fear." - John Berryman
"Circumstances do not make the man, they reveal him." - James Allen
"Take away the right to say "fuck" and you take away the right to say "fuck the government." - Lenny Bruce
"Dude, you don"t want to be dead. Take it from me. No-pussy is bad. But dead is like no-pussy times ten." - The Brief Wondrous Life of Oscar Wao - Junot Daz
"I go to seek a Great Perhaps." (on his deathbed) - Franois Rabelais
"Long books are usually overpraised, because the reader wishes to convince others and himself that he has not wasted his time" - E. M. Forster.
"I do not pray for a lighter load, but for a stronger back" - Phillips Brooks
"Go beyond reason to love. For it's the only safety there is."
"What a frightening thing is the human-- a mass of gauges, dials and registers. And we can read only a few. And those, perhaps, not accurately"
"It's inevitable that she'll be on your mind all the time now. So I guess you've gotta decide whether or not life is gonna go on hold in the meantime." - My friend Chris
"Two people in love, alone, isolated from the world... that's beautiful." -Milan Kundera
"I think magic ... is pretty simple. It's practice, it's training and it's experimenting while pushing through the pain to be the best that I can be." - David Blaine
"One cannot think well, love well, sleep well if one has not dined well." - Viriginia Woolf
"There is not always a good guy. Nor is there always a bad one. Most people are somewhere in between." - Patrick Ness, A Monster Calls
"When you're sworn into office, your main goal is to kill mosquitoes and to protect the residents and the county." -Commissioner Jill Cranney-Gage
"It is better to be young in your failures than old in your successes." -- Flannery O'Connor
"Tiger got to hunt, bird got to fly; Man got to sit and wonder, "Why, why, why?" Tiger got to sleep, bird got to land; Man got to tell himself he understand." - Kurt Vonnegut
"Children are smarter than any of us. Know how I know that? I don't know one child with a full time job and children." - Bill Hicks
"I believe that children are our future. Unless we stop them now." - Homer Simpson
"I got punched in the face a few times, but that's part of life, isn't it?" - George Harrison
"Once you've crawled into what's commonly thought of as the sordid underbelly of life, you realize it's all just different versions of normal." - Josh Kilmer-Purcell
"Sometimes when things are out of whack it freaks us out a little... and sometimes we hold on a little too hard." -Gilmore Girls
"Take wisdom from the one who brings it to you, and look at what he is said and do not look at who said it" - Ali Ibn e Abi Talib
"Books have to be heavy because the whole world's inside them." -Cornelia Funke, Inkheart
"God gave us our relatives; thank God we can choose our friends." -Ethel Watts Mumford
"Life is the most difficult exam. Many people fail because they try to copy others - not realising that everyone has a different question paper."
"I do not have priorities, whatever I am doing at that very moment is my priority." - Me
"A genuine leader is not a searcher for consensus, but a molder of consensus." Martin Luther King Jr.
"I thank Thee first because I was never robbed before; second, because although they took my purse they did not take my life; third, because although they took my all, it was not much; and fourth because it was I who was robbed, and not I who robbed." -Matthew Henry, minister (1662-1714)
"My philosophy is worrying means you suffer twice." -Newt Scamander
"Do you remember the Shire, Mr. Frodo? It'll be spring soon. [continued]
"The plain fact is that the planet does not need more 'successful people'. But it does desperately needs more peacemakers, healers, restorers, storytellers, and lovers of every kind.
"The plain fact is that the planet does not need more 'successful people'. But it does desperately need more peacemakers, healers, restorers, storytellers, and lovers of every kind.
"Every heart sings a song, incomplete, until another heart whispers back. Those who wish to sing always find a song. At the touch of a lover, everyone becomes a poet."  Plato
"There are two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle." - Einstein
"Without a sense of urgency, desire loses its value." - Jim Rohn
"Never give in, never give in, never, never, never, neverin nothing, great or small, large or pettynever give in except to convictions of honor and good sense." -Winston Churchill
"You can pick your friends, and you can pick your nose...
'Man is the most insane species. He worships an invisible God and destroys a visible Nature. Unaware that this Nature he's destroying is this God he's worshiping' -Hubert Reves
"Some lose all mind and become soul,insane. some lose all soul and become mind, intellectual. some lose both and become accepted" - Charles Bukowski
"Look, we're talking football. If we were talking baseball we'd be talking about a whole nother ball game" - Anonymous back in high school
"Enjoy the little things in life because one day you`ll look back and realize they were the big things." - Kurt Vonnegut
"One day you will wake up and there won"t be any more time to do the things you"ve always wanted. Do it now." - Paulo Coelho
"One day you will wake up & there won"t be any more time to do the things you"ve always wanted. Do it now." - Paulo Coelho
"Beginnings are usually scary and endings are usually sad, but it's everything in between that makes it all worth living." - Sandra Bullock in "Hope Floats"
"If you can't figure out your purpose, figure out your passion. For your passion will lead you right into your purpose." - T.D. Jakes
"Let's get back into bed. I feel fine in bed."
"Only once you give up everything, can you find a way to be happy." - Mr. Cuddly Whiskers (Bojack Horseman)
"I can resist everything except temptation."-Oscar Wilde
"One of the keys to happiness is a bad memory." - Rita Mae Brown
"Instinct is a marvelous thing. It can neither be explained nor ignored."  Agatha Christie
"If we don"t surrender, we die. But if we surrender, we will never see each other again," - Russian teens before committing suicide during police standoff
"If I ever feel like my enjoyment is coming from something other than warmth or food I know that I"m being tricked. If I can keep myself from being attached to anything, then there will be nothing to guard against." - Humans of New York
"In this day and age, ignorance is a choice, and people are still choosing ignorance" - Francis of the Filth
"How I found Goddess and what I did to her when I found her" --Principia Discordia, a bizarre religion of chaos
"Every saint has a past, and every sinner has a future." - Oscar Wilde
"Radiate boundless love towards the entire world  above, below, and across  unhindered, without ill will, without enmity."  The Buddha
"I must achieve internal consistency." -Edmund Husserl
"Here is the test to find whether your mission on earth is finished. If you're alive, it isn't." - Richard Bach
"If you deliberately plan on being less than you are capable of being, then I warn you that you'll be unhappy for the rest of your life."  Abraham Maslow
"be brave, think like a warrior, live like a monk"
"Anger is an acid that can do more harm to the vessel in which it is stored than to anything on which it is poured."  Mark Twain
"When life has to be a certain way in order to be good enough for us, we close ourselves off from all the real and present opportunities available." -- MarcandAngel
"Without liberty all other virtues serve to make you slaves, and to disgrace your origin."
"Arguing that you don't care about the right to privacy because you have nothing to hide is no different than saying you don't care about free speech because you have nothing to say." -Edward Snowden
'Man is the most insane species. He worships an invisible God and destroys a visible Nature. Unaware that this Nature he's destroying is this God he's worshiping' -Hubert Reves
"Sometimes, your only available transportation is a leap of faith." Margaret Shepard
"A loud teacher will make you hear, a good teacher will make you listen."
"If you talk to God you're religious. If God talks to you, you're psychotic."
"What is hell? I maintain that it is the suffering of being unable to love."
"The loneliest moment in someone"s life is when they are watching their whole world fall apart, and all they can do is stare blankly."  F. Scott Fitzgerald.
"You will never reach your destination if you stop and throw stones at every dog that barks." - Winston S. Churchill
"There is a crack, a crack in everything. That's how the light gets in. " - Leonard Cohen, Anthem
"The press should be not only a collective propagandist and a collective agitator, but also a collective organizer of the masses." - V. I. Lenin
"Sometimes you wake up. Sometimes the fall kills you. And sometimes, when you fall, you fly." - Neil Gaiman
"Remember back in the day when we all would argue who's better, Michael Jackson or Prince...well, Prince won!" - Chris Rock
[Request/Question] "And the weak shall feel fear, when the strong begin to cry" - is it an actual quote, or maybe is there a similiar quote to this one?
"If there is any one secret of success it lies in the ability to get the other person"s point of view and see things from their angle as well as your own." - Henry Ford
"If you wish to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first invent the universe." -Carl Sagan
"When solving a problem of interest, do not solve a more general problem as an intermediate step." Vladimir Vapnik
"These days, I may not be so happy after all. After all that I have gained, I still feel sad when I'm all alone." -Matt Sharp
"You are not rich until you have something that money cannot buy"
"BEING A LITTLE WEIRD IS JUST NATURAL SIDE-EFFECT OF BEING AWESOME"- Sue Fitzmaurice
"You cannot judge what should bring others joy, and others cannot judge what should bring you joy." Alan Cohen
"The Enemy Of Art Is The Absence Of Limitations" - Orson Walles
"Great things are not done by impulse, but by a series of small things brought together." - Vincent
"Dear Clara, I am throwing my wedding ring into the Rhine. You do the same. Then both rings will be united." - Schumann
"As a boy, I was scared of the monsters under my bed. As a man, I am scared of the monsters within."
"I'm not interested in rebirth. I'm still recovering from being birthed the first time." - BoJack Horseman
"Anyone who chooses death doesn't deserve to talk about love!" - Yato
"'Perfect' is unattainable. 'Better' is possible." - Barack Obama
"Perfect is unattainable, better is possible." - Barack Obama
"If you tell a big enough lie and tell it frequently enough, it will be believed." - Adolf Hitler
"If we could get rid of religion, there would be no war, except for the ones fought over power, land, money, politics, women, resources, and pride." -Rambo_Me_Nudes
"When you're at the end of your rope, tie a knot and hold on"- Theodore Roosevelt
"Do you know what it means to come home at night to a woman who'll give you a little love, a little affection, a little tenderness? It means you're in the wrong house, that's what it means." - Henny Youngman
"The dumb say too much, the intelligent say too little, but the brilliant don't say anything at all"
"Some get angry because God put thorns on roses. Others praise Him for putting roses among thorns." - Paulo Coelho
'What Orwell failed to predict was that we"d buy the cameras ourselves, and that our biggest fear would be that nobody was watching' Keith Jnsen
"Genius is one of the many forms of insanity." -Cesare Lombroso
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W.P. Kinsella
"8 out of 10 cats prefer Whiskas" -My TV
"A man who procrastinates in his CHOOSING will inevitably have his choice made for him by circumstance." - Hunter S. Thompson
"I'm not an activist, I'm a citizen. It's redundant to say I'm an activist. We all should be active." - Michael Moore
"If you cannot do great things, do small things in a great way." - Napoleon Hill
"Once we believe in ourselves, we can risk curiosity, wonder, spontaneous delight, or any experience that reveals the human spirit" - E.E. Cummings
"A person will be just about as happy as they make up their minds to be." - Abraham Lincoln
"...just as the television commercial empties itself of authentic product information so that it can do its psychological work, image politics empties itself of authentic political substance for the same reason." - Neil Postman, Amusing Ourselves to Death
"Stories never really end...even if the books like to pretend they do. Stories always go on. They don't end on the last page, any more than they begin on the first page." - Cornelia Funke, Inkspell
"In America, when reality is distasteful we ignore it." - Chris Hedges,
"The more I read, the more I acquire, the more certain I am that I know nothing"  Voltaire.
"I"m not ready to accept that the future alone holds my happiness. Happiness never leaves more of itself in the echoes of its passing, but sadness can be found in the present, the future, the past, and most poignantly in the wake of happiness."
'Funny that all of Nixon's crimes - anonymous campaign cash, wiretapping, undeclared wars - are all legal now. Discuss.' -Bil Mahr
"If more of us valued food and cheer and song above hoarded gold, it would be a merrier world." -J.R.R. Tolkien, The Hobbit
"If you ain't clashin you ain't smashing." -Ghandi
"A habit is not planned, it's built"
"Never look back unless you are planning to go that way."- Henry David Thoreau
"The present is theirs; the future, for which I really worked, is mine." Nikola Tesla
"We called for workforce and people came." - Max Frisch, Swiss author on migration
"Happiness is a choice. Like tardiness. Or interrupting. Many people today resent the suggestion that they"re in charge of the way they feel. But trust me, those people are mistaken"
"You can feel sore tomorrow or you can feel sorry tomorrow. You choose." - Unknown
"If you gave someone your heart and they died, did they take it with them? Did you spend the rest of forever with a hole inside you that couldn't be filled?" - Jodi Picoult, Nineteen Minutes
- Hunter S. Thompson, The Proud Highway: Saga of a Desperate Southern Gentleman, 1955-1967
"The white man's happiness cannot be purchased by the black man's misery." - Frederick Douglass
"I go to seek a Great Perhaps." - Franois Rabelais
"Life is for the living. Death is for the dead. Let life be like music. And death a note unsaid." - Langston Hughes, The Collected Poems
"A thing is not necessarily true because a man dies for it." - Oscar Wilde
"Death ends a life, not a relationship." - Mitch Albom, Tuesdays with Morrie
"I had to deny knowledge in order to make room for faith." - Immanuel Kant, Critique of Pure Reason
"Sorrow looks back, Worry looks around, Faith looks up" - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Doubt isn't the opposite of faith; it is an element of faith." - Paul Tillich
"A casual stroll through the lunatic asylum shows that faith does not prove anything." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"I know now, Lord, why you utter no answer. You are yourself the answer. Before your face questions die away. What other answer would suffice?" - C.S. Lewis
"Sometimes God allows what he hates to accomplish what he loves." - Joni Eareckson Tada, The God I Love
"You must not lose faith in humanity. Humanity is like an ocean; if a few drops of the ocean are dirty, the ocean does not become dirty." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Faith is not the belief that God will do what you want. It is the belief that God will do what is right." - Max Lucado, He Still Moves Stones
"Never be afraid to trust an unknown future to a known God." - Corrie ten Boom
"People shouldn't be afraid of their government. Governments should be afraid of their people." -Alan Moore, *V For Vendetta*
"To truly laugh, you must be able to take your pain, and play with it!"  Charlie Chaplin
"beyond all ideas of right and wrong there is a field, i will be meeting you there" -Rumi
" Life is like music for its own sake. We are living in an eternal now, and when we listen to music we are not listening to the past, we are not listening to the future, we are listening to an expanded present." Alan W. Watts
" Things are as they are. Looking out into the universe at night, we make no comparisons between right and wrong stars, nor between well and badly arranged constellations." Alan W. Watts
" You are a function of what the whole universe is doing in the same way that a wave is a function of what the whole ocean is doing." Alan W. Watts
"he who laughs louder, cries hardest" -i-
"When the missionaries came to Africa they had the Bible and we had the land. They said "Let us pray." We closed our eyes. When we opened them, we had the Bible and they had the land." -Desmond Tutu
"There is no royal road to science, and only those who do not dread the fatiguing climb of its steep paths have a chance of gaining its luminous summits." - Karl Marx
"In war there are no winners, only widows" -- Dr Louise Banks (Arrival) [2016]
"Did you just fart, or is that your breath?" -a wise and selfless man
"Typically, if a book has one passage, one idea with the power to change a person's life, that alone justifies reading it, rereading it, and finding room for it on one's shelves." -Harold S. Kushner
"[The memes]...They left us their great "ism"s!...Nationalism!,Unilateraslim!,Materialism...Welcome maxims for thoses with no faith -- without guiding principle of their own..Give yourself to the whole.No need to better yourself -- You're American! You're number one! " Senator Armstrong (video game)
"Some say love is blind. I would argue at the very least it's deaf, mentally deficient, unbalanced, and completely and utterly beautiful despite being without reason or form."
"the point is not only does time fly and do we die, but that in these reckless conditions we live at all, and are vouchsafed, for the duration of certain inexplicable moments, to know it." -Annie Dillard
"I'm not laughing at you, I'm laughing about you" - my friend, to me.
"Those who are concerned for their stomach do not pour any food into it indiscriminately; so too, the reader who wishes to preserve the integrity of the mind will not permit himself to read everything indiscriminately."
"It is highly advantageous for the business world to foster hatred for pointy-headed government bureaucrats and to drive out of people's minds the subversive idea that the government might become an instrument of popular will, a government of, by and for the people." -- Noam Chomsky
"Ad astra per aspera" (a rough road leads to the stars) - Apollo 1 memorial plaque & NASA motto.
" If it is true that there are infinite parallel universes, then I do concur that all relative states are helpless and irrelevant." -Devin Mochrie
"I have noticed even people who claim everything is predestined, and that we can do nothing to change it, look before they cross the road"- Stephen Hawking
'When you're 18 you care what everyone thinks, when you're 40 you stop caring what everyone thinks, when you're 60 you realize no one was ever thinking about you in the first place' -Unknown
"Elections are highly-publicized puppet shows. Many puppets in the show are handled by the same owner, and regardless of their different costumes and voices, their agenda is one and the same. The man with the most puppets in the show usually wins the audience."- Suzy Kassem
4 MOST SIGNIFICANT QUOTES FROM EINSTEIN AND NEWTON ABOUT GOD
"I'd rather betray the world than let the world betray me." - Cao Cao
"A man only holds a car's door open for a woman if either the car is new or the woman." Uschi Glas, German actress
"Every solution to every problem is simple. It's the distance between them wherein the mystery lies"
"When I was a boy and I would see scary things in the news, my mother would say to me, 'Look for the helpers. You will always find people who are helping.'" -Mr. Rogers
"Man only has 3 forms of currency; Time, Purpose and Well-being." - Anonymous
"You never notice the ones backstage until the show comes crashing down" - Anonymous
"The average man does not want to be free. He simply wants to be safe" H.G. Mencken
....and you don't care about anything but making money, there will be a giant sucking sound going south. Ross Perot arguing against NAFTA 1992
"The way people treat you is a statement about who they are as a human being. It is not a statement about you." -Anonymous
"I realized that these were the snapshots which our children would look at someday with wonder, thinking their parents had lived smooth, well-ordered lives..." - Jack Kerouac
" If it's not genetic, you have nobody to blame but yourself."
"In the confrontation between the stream and the rock, the stream always wins - not by strength but by perseverance."
"Faith without doubt is addiction"  Salman Rushdie
"behold the turtle.... he makes progress only when he sticks his neck out." - unknown
"Real friends stab you in the front." - Jonathan Davis
"Ask and you shall receive is the rule, but you must learn how to ask and how to receive" - Gary Zukav
"I've always considered writing the most hateful kind of work. I suspect it's a bit like fucking, which is only fun for amateurs. Old whores don't do much giggling." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Saudi crimes are the worst type of terrorism":- Khamenei
"For the first time in my life, I understood how someone could consciously decide to commit suicide. Not because they were deranged, not because they were nuts, because they had been to the top of the mountain, and they just knew in their heart they would never get there again." - Joe Biden
"In any moment of decision, the best thing you can do is the right thing, the next best thing is the wrong thing, and the worst thing you can do is nothing."- Theodore Roosevelt
"Being aware of a single shortcoming within yourself is far more useful than being aware of a thousand in someone else." Dalai Lama
"Less talk, more do. No one cares about your elegantly expressed intentions. Only your brilliantly executed results." - Robin Sharma
"We go about our daily lives understanding almost nothing of the world....
"Home is where the heart is, home is where the fart is" -Ernest Hemingway
"Before I got married I had six theories about raising children; now, I have six children and no theories." - John Wilmot
"The only new thing in this world is the history you don"t know" - Harry S. Truman
"I'm not a fucking role model" - Tyler, the Creator
"I don"t know what your destiny will be, but one thing I know: the only ones among you who will be really happy are those who have sought and found how to serve." -Albert Schweitzer
"Shortcuts are for people who know the long cuts." - My Chemistry Teacher
"Many a friendship or marriage has failed because, instead of relating to, and caring for, one another, one person uses another as a shield against isolation." -Irvin D. Yalom
"Do you remember Sooma? The drug that everyone was on, in Aldous Huxley's Brave New World? The one that if you spoke your mind or got angry at the situation everyone else just drugged you till you were a garbled mess." - Continued in link
"If you're going to be crazy, you have to get paid for it or else you're going to be locked up" - Hunter S.Thompson
"Your beliefs become your thoughts, Your thoughts become your words, Your words become your actions, Your actions become your habits, Your habits become your values, Your values become your destiny." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The trouble with most of us is that we would rather be ruined by praise than saved by criticism". - Norman Vincent Peale
"I'm a preacher's kid, and we were always told, Act right all the time, because someone's always watching." - Gwen Ifill
"I'm tired of getting my hopes up for things that I know will never happen"
'Airports see more sincere kisses than wedding halls. The walls of hospitals have heard more prayers than the walls of churches' -Anonymous
"'Kindly let me help you or you will drown"', said the monkey, putting the fish safely up a tree."
"There is no longer a consensus on what a fact is. Trust in Mainstream Media outlets has been falling and people can choose to get their news from echo chambers that validate their views." - John Oliver
"Nothing hurts more than being disappointed by the person you thought would never hurt you"
"The smell of your skin, a wall in the road. Piano sustains, all of your notes. You are enticing, I'm not embracing" -Marcus Burch (from the song 'destination [your eyes]')
"The urge to save humanity is almost always a false front for the urge to rule." --H. L. Mencken
"Only the king of all narcissists would be proud of his title." -Nick Manna
"Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power." - Abraham Lincoln
"Until they become conscious they will never rebel, and until after they have rebelled they cannot become conscious."
"You cannot start the next chapter of your life if you keep re-reading the last one." - Michael McMillan
(No regrets)
"life is like riding a bicycle, in order to keep balance, you must keep moving." albert einstein
"We were born in your world but you will die in ours." Unknown Source
"People say that the pen is mightier than the sword, but in reality, the pen and sword are equals" - Unknown
"Why should I be sad? I have lost someone who did not love me. But they have lost someone who loved them." - C.J. Hooker
"You can attract only that which you mentally become and feel yourself to be in reality." Ernest Holmes
"Beware of the man who works hard to learn something, learns it, and finds himself no wiser than before. He is full of murderous resentment of people who are ignorant without having come by their ignorance the hard way." -Kurt Vonnegut, Cat's Cradle
"It only takes 20 years for a liberal to become a conservative without changing a single idea." - Robert Anton Wilson
"He leaves work, he's on his way home. WHAM, his capa is detated from his head!" - Michael Scott
"To make one's creations known is to make their life eternal".
"The ultimate measure of a man is not where he stands in moments of comfort and convenience, but where he stands at times of challenge and controversy." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"It is a habit of mankind to entrust to careless hope what they long for, and to use sovereign reason to thrust aside what they do not desire." -Thuycidides of Athens
"All that is solid melts into air, all that is holy is profaned, and man is at last compelled to face with sober senses his real conditions of life, and his relations with his kind." - Karl Marx
"You could spend a thousand lifetimes staring at water and sand, thinking as hard as you could, and you'd never guess the world had things like this in it." -- Randall Munroe, XKCD
"Remember when I moved in you and the holy dove was moving too, and every breath we drew was, "Hallelujah." - Leonard Cohen
"Lost time can never be found"
"Always be fearless. Walk like lion, talk like pigeons, live like elephants and love like an infant child." - Santosh Kalwar, Quote Me Everyday
"Only a burning patience will lead to the attainment of a splendid happiness." - Martha Medeiros
"I always prefer to believe the best of everybody; it saves so much trouble" - Rudyard Kipling
"Friends are the family you choose (- Nin/Ithilnin, Elven rogue)." - Jess C. Scott, The Other Side of Life
"It is not despair, for despair is only for those who see the end beyond all doubt. We do not." - J.R.R. Tolkien, The Fellowship of the Ring
"Oft hope is born when all is forlorn." - J.R.R. Tolkien, The Return of the King
"Books are finite, sexual encounters are finite, but the desire to read and to fuck is infinite; it surpasses our own deaths, our fears, our hopes for peace." - Roberto Bolao
"The first duty of a man is to think for himself" - Jos Mart
"We must accept finite disappointment, but never lose infinite hope." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"It's amazing how a little tomorrow can make up for a whole lot of yesterday." - John Guare, Landscape of the Body
"The very least you can do in your life is figure out what you hope for. And the most you can do is live inside that hope. Not admire it from a distance but live right in it, under its roof." - Barbara Kingsolver, Animal Dreams
"If you're going through hell, keep going." -Winston Churchill
"Humanity is OK, but 99 % of people are boring idiots." - Slavoj iek
"Everyone is a martyr for something. You just don't know what it'll be until you're long gone." -Nick Manna
"The shepherd drives the wolf from the sheep for which the sheep thanks the shepherd as his liberator, while the wolf denounces him for the same act as the destroyer of liberty." - Abraham Lincoln
"Being US President is like being captain of a large ship with a small rudderthere"s a limit to how much damage they can do."  Elon Musk
"Hegel remarks somewhere that all great, world-historical facts and personages occur, as it were, twice. He has forgotten to add: the first time as tragedy, the second as farce." - Karl Marx
"Hegel remarks somewhere that all great, world-historical facts and personages occur, as it were, twice. He has forgotten to add: the first time as tragedy, the second as farce." - Karl Marx
"...One may safely say, that it would be no sin, if statesmen learned enough of history to realize that no system which implies control of society by privilege seekers has ever ended in any other way than collapse." - William Dodd, American Ambassador to Germany, Oct. 12, 1933
" Finish each day and be done with it. You have done what you could. Some blunders and absurdities no doubt crept in; forget them as soon as you can. Tomorrow is a new day. You shall begin it serenely and with too high a spirit to be encumbered with your old nonsense. Ralph Waldo Emerson
" Life is like riding a bicycle. To keep your balance, you must keep moving. Albert Einstein
" Today you are You, that is truer than true. There is no one alive who is Youer than You. Dr. Seuss
"Come on, you sons of bitches, do you want to live forever?" - Daniel Daly
"Democracy is the worst form of government, except for all the others." - Winston S. Churchill
"There're two types of people in this world, those who fear the unknown and those who fear not knowing the unknown" -Elijah Rowden
"There're two types of people, those who fear something new and those who fear both doing something new" Elijah Rowden
"Fall into the smear of my gaze and scrape out my demons...
"If you're going to fail, fail so hard that you get more recognition than the ones who succeeded." -Nick Manna.
"The reading of all good books is like a conversation with the finest minds of past centuries."  Rene Descartes
"Do you want the dead to grab us by the sleeve every single day and prevent us from moving forward?" - Vladimir Putin
"Because puppets never grow. They are born puppets, live puppets, and die puppets." - Pinocchio
"It is as if we live in a beautiful painting, a really colorful one, and every day we're ruining it by spreading more black; If we ever stopped coloring it, the black would still leave a mark." -John Adel
"I have faith in humanity. In about a hundred or so years, every single person living right now will be dead. In their place will be all new ones, filling in the roles. We've done it hundreds, if not thousands of times flawlessly. There will be a future, because there has been a past." -Nick Manna.
"I was dead, then alive. Weeping, then laughing. The power of love came into me, and I became fierce like a lion, then tender like the evening star." - Jalaluddin Rumi
"All things change in a dynamic environment. Your effort to remain what you are is what limits you." -Ghost in the Shell
"Sucking at something is the first step to being sorta good at something" -Jake the Dog
"Just as, out of habit, one consults a run-down clock as though it were still going, so too one may look at the face of a beautiful woman as though she were still in love." --Goethe
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Never do something you don't enjoy, you could be dead before taking the profits" - Somebody
"There's a feeling I get when I look to the west, And my spirit is crying for leaving. In my thoughts I have seen rings of smoke through the trees, And the voices of those who standing looking. Ooh, it makes me wonder, Ooh, it really makes me wonder." - Led Zeppelin
"Young sloths are so inept that they frequently grab their own arms and legs instead of tree limbs, and fall out of trees." - Douglas Adams
"If you can't make yourself understood by your friends, you'll be in trouble when your enemies come for you." -Hunter S. Thompson
"Whoever wants music instead of noise, joy instead of pleasure, soul instead of gold, creative work instead of business, passion instead of foolery, finds no home in this trivial world of ours." -Hermann Hesse
"Sometimes,we never realize the value of a moment until it becomes a memory."
"One can evade a danger that one recognizes, but a police working in the dark becomes uncanny. Nowhere does one feel safe from it. While not omnipresent, it *could* appear, search, arrest. The worried citizen no longer knows whom he ought to trust." - Friedrich Zipfel
"Procrastinate now! Don't put it off!"  Ellen Degeneres
"if you can't fix yourself, fuck it. destroy yourself." anonymous
"Listen, I don"t want to add to your misery here, but the coffeemaker is broken." - Cameron, Halt and Catch Fire
'In the EU we have two kinds of memberstates: small ones and those who still don't realize that they are small. This is the big world we live in. It's good to accept this reality.' Federica Mogherini, High Representative of the European Union for Foreign Affairs and Security Policy
"I did not have sexual relations with that women...Ms. Lewinsky". Bill Clinton
"I want to die on Mars, just not on impact." -- Elon Musk
"Believe you can and you're halfway there" - Theodore Roosevelt
"I met a woman, the kind that makes me want to go back in time before you met her. Whatever the hell life was like then is not as bad as the hell now, knowing she's out there and you can't have her." -Doctor Pincus
"I met a woman, the kind that makes me want to go back in time before you met her. Whatever the hell life was like then is not as bad as the hell now knowing she's out there and you can't have her." -Doctor Pincus
"Never inquire into a person's past. Take the measure of a man for what he is today."
'i was sad because i had no shoes, until i saw a man who had no feet. and then i laughed. really really hard.' - jerry blank
"Suicide is the Triumph of Reason over Instinct" - Me
"I hope to arrive to my death, late, in love, and a little drunk." - Atticus
"You may have my cooperation, but you will not have my compliance." -My coworker
"Within the next 5-10 years radios are gonna be not as much music as it used to be" -Keytar Bear
"When I was a boy of 15, my father was so ignorant I could hardly stand to have the old man around. But when I got to be 22, I was astonished at how much the old man had learned in seven years." - Mark
"You played butthole roulette, and you lost the draw!" - Frank Sinatra (Epic Rap Battles of History)
"Men are anxious to improve their circumstances, but are unwilling to improve themselves; they therefore remain bound." JAMES ALLEN
"Most of the clean faces, be the most dirty."  Kid Cudi
"Far I see high time man quit" - MC Ride, On GP
" The curse of me and my nation is that we always think things can be bettered by immediate action of some sort, any sort rather than no sort." -Plato
"Pessimism on the basis of the most alarming of today"s trends is jolly good fun, I know. But since 1800 it has been a poor predictor" - Deirdre McCloskey in Bourgeois Equality
"Depressing, bad, unforgiving, gut wrenching and shit. All the qualities of life"-Jimmy Burney from Manchester
" measuring a river, is like measuring a dream"- Jasper Bass
"Children must be taught how to think, not what to think." - Margaret Mead
"A deception that elevates us is dearer than a host of low truths." -Alexander Pushkin
"Make sure the outside of you is a good reflection of the inside of you." - Jim Rohn
[Request] A literary quote about breathing life into written words. I believe it started with short, bland sentences and evolved into living, colorful text.
"Don't Give Up, Give Back. No matter how difficult our personal lives may seem at times, we all have something to give back. It can be as simple as a smile or providing a caring, listening ear. When we all make an effort to give back, I wholeheartedly believe that as a people, we move forward."
"Show me the person praising you and I will tell you where your mistake lies." - Lenin
"When your at the bottom of the well you can only go up. Even if your still falling sometimes the wind will catch you."
"That men do not learn very much from the lessons of history is the most important of all the lessons of history" - Aldous Huxley
"You are beyond mad," said Locke after several moments of silent, furious thought. "Full-on barking madness is a state of rational bliss to which you may not aspire. Men living in gutters and drinking their own piss would shun your company. You are a prancing lunatic." Scott Lynch
"Any man can fart in a closed room and say that he commands the wind" Scott Lynch
"It is possible to commit no mistakes and still lose. That is not a weakness, that is life." -Jean-Luc Picard
"One beautiful heart is better than thousand beautiful faces.so choose people having beautiful hearts rather than faces." ----jootorasky
"I know this is the tiniest thing; I know it's the teeniest, tiniest, smallest, little thing but You Are Welcome Here, whoever you are." - Daniel Hardcastle, 2016
"One small fact: you are going to die. Despite every effort, no one lives forever. Sorry to be such a spoiler. My advice is when the time comes, don't panic. It doesn't seem to help." - The Book Thief
"If they come out and say we're building a wall around America, we are not doing that in Boston, Massachusetts." -Boston Mayor Marty Walsh
"Success is not built on success. It's built on failure. It's built on frustration. Sometimes its built on catastrophe." - Sumner Redstone
"It is in vain to say that enlightened statesmen will be able to adjust these clashing interests, and render them all subservient to the public good. Enlightened statesmen will not always be at the helm." - James Madison
"If you don't stick to your values when they're being tested, they're not values: they're hobbies." - Jon Stewart
"Stop thinking inside and think outside" -Me
"I'm done being there for others. They have their pain and so do I" Jonathan Davis
"Eternal peace is a dream - and not even a beautiful one. War is part of God's world order. Within it unfold the noblest virtues of men, courage and renunciation, loyalty to duty and readiness for sacrifice--at the hazard of one's life. Without war, the world would sink into a swamp of materialism."
"Well, here at last, dear friends, on the shores of the Sea comes the end of our fellowship in Middle-earth. Go in peace! I will not say: do not weep; for not all tears are an evil." - J.R.R. Tolkien, The Return of the King
"Love is the only engine of survival" Leonard Cohen
"yes, I have feelings and no, I"m not afraid of them not even the shadowy ones that you"d rather ignore i gather them in welcome them home give them space to breathe and light them on glorious fire just to see what might be illuminated while they burn" - Jeanette LeBlanc
"Tolerance can"t include hating people you think are intolerant. It"s about how your beliefs lead you to treat those people."  Tim Keller
"Ah, you loved me as a loser, but now you're worried that I just might win." -Leonard Cohen
"We may encounter many defeats, but we must not be defeated." Maya Angelou
10 Cool Quotes
10 cool quotes
" I do not need a bunch of people walking around saying we are lost at a time when we ought to be fighting" -Eleanor Holmes Norton
"Dude by the time they build that thing we're gonna be the ones going over it" - Bill Burr on Conan yesterday talking about Trump's Wall
"What's the n-never-fail universal apology?" "'I was badly misinformed, I deeply regret the error, go fuck yourself with this bag of money." Scott Lynch, The Republic of Thieves (Gentleman Bastard, #3)
"Of all forms of caution, caution in love is perhaps the most fatal to true happiness." - Bertrand Russell
"Why is it that when we talk to God we're said to be praying but when God talks to us we're schizophrenic?" -- Lily Tomlin
"We may not treat life as well as we could, but whatever this darned life thing is, keeping it around might very well be up to us" Vsause Michael
"First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win"  Mahatma Gandhi
"Not to spoil the ending for you, but everything is going to be okay."
"The bourgeoisie, when it was struggling against the nobility sustained by the clergy, hoisted the flag of free thought and atheism; but once triumphant, it changed its tone and manner and today it uses religion to support its economic and political supremacy." - Paul Lafargue
"Monon labe!" -Leonidas I
"If you're standing before a big, scary problem, you should take a closer look at it. Break it apart to small problems. You'll have a lot of problems, but they aren't as scary as the one before." -my Mom
"They call 'em 'fingers', but I've never seen 'em fing." - Otto Mann
"Ascertain what is genuinely mutually ideal and demand it. If they tell you no you'll have all the information you need to gauge their true motives and how they should be handled." - Talcum X
"I found God clutching a razor blade. He said "Look at the fucking mess they've made. They'd trade their hearts if they were made of gold but they're as worthless as the souls they sold."...
"To move from the old, to what is about to come, is the only tradition worth keeping" - Marcus Wallenberg
"There is no ending. There is only the ending you see."  Will Carruthers
"History is a lie. Money is a hoax. Debt is a fiction. Media is manipulation. Government is corrupt. The system is a lie."  Anonymous
"It is better to fail in originality than to succeed in imitation." Herman Melville
"Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear not absence of fear." Mark Twain
"Adults are always asking little kids what they want to be when they grow up cause theyre looking for ideas. " - Paula Poundstone
"What do we live for, if it is not to make life less difficult for each other?" - George Eliot
"To be is to do"- Socrates; "To do is to be"- Sartre; "Do Be Do Be Do"- Sinatra.  Unknown
"To vote for Trump as a protest against Clinton"s faults would be like cutting one"s throat to lower one"s blood pressure" The Atlantic
"It's a dirty, rotten business. It's the dirtiest business in America. And believe me. I've been in pro wrestling and I've been in rock and roll, and politics is worse than both." - Jesse Ventura
"We're very much like the Roman Empire now. The thing that's important to us today is entertainment. And we're willing to pay any price for that entertainment." -jesse ventura
"I tried to talk to Toby and be his friend, but that is like trying to be friends with an evil snail." - Michael Scott
"Each tear is a poet, a healer, a teacher." - Rune Lazuli
"My friends, love is better than anger. Hope is better than fear. Optimism is better than despair. So let us be loving, hopeful and optimistic. And we"ll change the world." -Jack Layton (1950-2011)
"You furnish the pictures, and I'll furnish the war." - William Randolph Hearst
"The objective prerequisites for the proletarian revolution have not only "ripened"; they have begun to get somewhat rotten. Without a socialist revolution, in the next historical period at that, a catastrophe threatens the whole culture of mankind." - Leon Trotsky
"The oldest, shortest words 'yes' and 'no' are those which require the most thought." Pythagoras
"It ain't all about the dollar bill - you can be dead broke and be a scholar still" - Hot Guacamole (MF DOOM)
"Good dreams are nature's Prozac." - Marla Painter, 'Channel Zero'
"Conventional wisdom would have one believe that it is insane to resist this, the mightiest of empires, but what history really shows is that today's empire is tomorrow's ashes; that nothing lasts forever, and that to not resist is to acquiesce in your own oppression." Mumia Abu-Jamal
"Wild things have restless wings that too often need to fly." - Michael Xavier
"Donald, you're not gonna be able to insult your way to The Presidency, that's not gonna happen." -John Ellis "Jeb" Bush Sr.
"You have to be odd to be number one." - Dr. Seuss
"I didn't vote for him but he's my president, and I hope he does a good job." - John Wayne
"A little less complaint and whining, and a little more dogged work and manly striving, would do us more credit than a thousand civil rights bills." - W. E. B. DuBois
"All doubt, despair and fear become insignificant once the intention of life becomes love." Rumi
"When I despair, I remember that all through history the way of truth and love have always won. There have been tyrants and murderers, and for a time, they can seem invincible, but in the end, they always fall. Think of it--always." -Gandhi
"If we can't live together, we're gonna die alone" -Jack Shephard, Lost
"When did the future switch from being a promise to a threat?" - Chuck Palahniuk, 'Invisible Monsters'
"May you live in interesting times" -Unknown
"Not all Trump voters are bigots: but all the bigots voted for Trump" - Tom Scott
"We learn from history that we learn nothing from history." - George Bernard Shaw
"People should not be afraid of their governments. Governments should be afraid of their people." - V for Vendetta
"Comparison is the thief of joy" - Theodore Roosevelt
"The surest way to corrupt a youth is to instruct him to hold in higher esteem those who think alike than those who think differently." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"There should be more sincerity and heart in human relations, more silence and simplicity in our interactions. Be rude when you"re angry, laugh when something is funny, and answer when you"re asked." -Anton Chekhov
"When fascism comes to America, it will be wrapped in the flag and carrying a cross." - Sinclair Lewis
"For me, it is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring." - Carl Sagan
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the Universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Two possibilities exist: either we are alone in the Universe or we are not. Both are equally terrifying."
"It's never too late to give up on our prejudices" -Henry D. Thoreau
"You people know a lot about trucks. Bing Bing, Bong" -The U.S. President
"In a society where dirt sells, for every good story told as it is, you will hear the whole of that day's 10 bad stories sensationalized; although in reality, it could be that 100 good deeds happened that day which went unsung." -Criss Jami
"I live in a rather special world. I only know one person who voted for Nixon. Where they are I don"t know. They"re outside my ken. But sometimes when I"m in a theater I can feel them." - Pauline Kael
"Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups." -George Carlin
"I have always considered it as treason against the great republic of human nature, to make any man's virtues the means of deceiving him. "  Samuel Johnson
"Democracy is only because everyone wants others to share the blame." -NYC taxi driver
"As the age of television progresses the Reagans will be the rule, not the exception. To be perfect for television is all a President has to be these days. " - Gore Vidal
"I wish none of this had happened." "So do all who live to see such times, but that is not for them to decide. All we have to decide is what to do with the time that is given to us." Frodo and Gandalf
"If voting made any difference, they wouldn't let us do it." - Mark Twain
"However [political parties] may now and then answer popular ends, they are likely in the course of time and things, to become potent engines, by which cunning, ambitious, and unprincipled men will be enabled to subvert the power of the people..." -George Washington
"The things that will destroy America are prosperity-at-any-price, peace-at-any-price, safety-first instead of duty-first, the love of soft living and the get-rich-quick theory of life." Theodore Roosevelt
"...But if I'm to choose between one evil and another, then I prefer not to choose at all." - Andrzej Sapkowski, The Last Wish
"Don't believe in kings, believe in the Kingdom" - Chance The Rapper
"Who does vote for these dishonest shitheads? . . . They speak for all that is cruel and stupid and vicious in the American character. They are the racists and hate mongers among us; they are the Ku Klux Klan. . . . Fuck them." - Hunter S. Thompson, Kingdom of Fear (2004)
"The best lack all conviction, while the worst Are full of passionate intensity." - W.B. Yeats, Second Coming
"This aggression will not stand man." Big Lebowski
"You don"t reward failure by promoting those responsible for it, because all you get is more failure." - Donald J. Trump
"I love America, but politicians make me sick. If I ever run for president, then please shoot me. Let's hope these socialists haven't taken our guns by that point." - Donald Trump
"Character, like a photograph, develops in darkness." - Yousuf Karsh
"Life is either a daring adventure or nothing at all." - Helen Keller
"And so tyranny naturally arises out of democracy, and the most aggravated form of tyranny and slavery out of the most extreme form of liberty" - Plato, The Republic, 380BC
"Don"t hold on to someone who"s leaving, otherwise you won"t meet the one who"s coming." - Carl Jung
"You are free to choose, but you are not free to alter the consequences of your decisions." - Ezra Taft Benson
"The most loving parents and relatives commit murder with smiles on their faces. They force us to destroy the person we really are; a subtle kind of murder." - Jim Morrison
"Social problems overstep frontiers. The sores of the human race, those great sores which cover the globe, do not halt at the red or blue lines traced upon the map." - Victor Hugo
"The tree of liberty must be refreshed from time to time with the blood of patriots and tyrants." Thomas Jefferson, 1787.
"We are not enemies, but friends. We must not be enemies. Though passion may have strained, it must not break our bonds of affection. The mystic chords of memory will swell when again touched, as surely they will be, by the better angels of our nature." -Abraham Lincoln
"Anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job." -Douglas Adams
"There is a luxury in self-reproach. When we blame ourselves we feel that no one else has a right to blame us." -Oscar Wilde
"If ever a time should come, when vain and aspiring men shall possess the highest seats in Government, our country will stand in need of its experienced patriots to prevent its ruin." - Samuel Adams
"Chill. America isn't great because of The President; America is great because of Americans. Be good to one another and we'll be just fine." - CWJ522 (Twitter handle)
"You crossed the line first, sir. You squeezed them, you hammered them to the point of desperation. And in their desperation, they turned to a man they didn't fully understand." -The Dark Knight
"Indeed I tremble for my country when I reflect that God is just; that his justice cannot sleep forever." - Thomas Jefferson
"So how did our politics get so poisonous? I think it's cause we overdosed, especially this year. We drank too much of the poison."
"Things have to get worse before they can get better"  anonymous
"As democracy is perfected, the office represents, more and more closely, the inner soul of the people." (see comments)
"Every nation gets the government it deserves." (Joseph de Maistre, 1811)
"There is a cult of ignorance in the United States, and there has always been." -Isaac Asimov
"Do not worry, my sweet one. Just as night is followed by day, so too your dark times will be followed by brighter days ahead." - Karen Salmansohn
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"Darkness cannot drive out darkness: only light can do that. Hate cannot drive out hate: only love can do that." - Martin Luther King Jr.,
"A lot of people don't like to win. They actually don't know how to win, and they don't like to win because down deep inside they don't want to win." Donald Trump
"We don't see things as they are, we see them as we are."  Anais Nin
"What's right isn't always popular. What's popular isn't always right." - Howard Cosell
"This election is rigged." -Donald Trump
"Nuclear weapons and TV have simply intensified the consequences of our tendencies, upped the stakes." David Foster Wallace
"The more that I learn about people, the more I love my dog." - Mark Twain
"I admit that I see little hope for democracy as an effective form of government, but I admire the poetry of how it makes its victims complicit in their own destruction." -Eliezer Yudowsky
"If you're going to bite at a gang, make sure you have your own gang to back you up" - My year 6 teacher
"When the whole world doesn't believe in God, it'll be a great place." Philip Roth
"Democracy represents the disbelief in all great men and in all elite societies. It claims everybody is everybody's equal." -Nietzsche
"The world is my country, all mankind are my brethren, and to do good is my religion." - Thomas Paine
"It is not the consciousness of men that determines their being, but, on the contrary, their social being that determines their consciousness." - Karl Marx
"The larger the group, the more toxic, the more of your beauty as an individual you have to surrender for the sake of group thought." - George Carlin
"And now these three remain: faith, hope and love. But the greatest of these is love."
"Love doesn't just sit there, like a stone, it has to be made, like bread; remade all the time, made new." - Ursula K. Le Guin, The Lathe of Heaven
"As long as you hate, there will be people to hate." - George Harrison
"Now this is not the end. It is not even the beginning of the end. But it is, perhaps, the end of the beginning." - Winston Churchill Nov. 10, 1942
"The fate of the country... does not depend on what kind of paper you drop into the ballot-box once a year, but on what kind of man you drop from your chamber into the street every morning." - Henry David Thoreau, Slavery in Massachusetts
"The Bowery station on the J line is what happens to a neighborhood once politicians realize the people who live there don"t vote." - Andrew Vachss, Terminal
"If voting changed anything... I'd still laugh!" - Matt Paradise, Bearing the Devil's Mark
"...they say if you don't vote, you get the government you deserve, and if you do, you never get the results you expected." - E.A. Bucchianeri, Brushstrokes of a Gadfly
"You can always count on Americans to do the right thing-after they've tried everything else." - Winston Churchill
"Every election is determined by the people who show up." - Larry J. Sabato, Pendulum Swing
"Democracy is not freedom. Democracy is two wolves and a lamb voting on what to eat for lunch. Freedom comes from the recognition of certain rights which may not be taken, not even by a 99% vote." - Marvin Simkin
"Always vote for principle, though you may vote alone." - John Quincy Adams
"Stories may well be lies, but they are good lies that say true things, and which can sometimes pay the rent." - Neil Gaiman
"After nourishment, shelter and companionship, stories are the thing we need most in the world." - Philip Pullman
"Fiction is the truth inside the lie." - Stephen King
"You never have to change anything you got up in the middle of the night to write." - Saul Bellow
"Fantasy is hardly an escape from reality. It's a way of understanding it." - Lloyd Alexander
"If you don't have time to read, you don't have the time (or the tools) to write. Simple as that." - Stephen King
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you." - Maya Angelou, I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings
"It's a little bit like, is the Albanian army going to take over the world? I don't think so." - Time Warner CEO Jeffrey Bewkes on the expansion of Netflix (2011)
"...there are the stubborn stumps of shame, grief that remains unsolvable after all the years, a bag of stones that goes with one wherever one goes" -Mary Oliver
"Forgive the intrusion, but I was under the impression that I was digging towards the outer wall." - Alexandre Dumas
"On some great and glorious day the plain folks of the land will reach their heart's desire at last, and the White House will be adorned by a downright moron." - H. L. Mencken
"Labeling yourself is not only self-defeating, it is irrational. Your 'self' cannot be equated to any one thing you do. Your life is a complex and ever-changing flow of thoughts, emotions, and actions." -Dr. David D. Burns
"And she's got brains enough for two, which is the exact quantity the girl who marries you will need." - P.G. Wodehouse, Mostly Sally
"If you genuinely want something, don't wait for it - teach yourself to be impatient." - Gurbaksh Chahal
"The trouble is not that I am single and likely to stay single, but that I am lonely and likely to stay lonely." - Charlotte Bront
"If we don"t win, this will be the single greatest waste of time, energy and money in my life." -Donald Trump
"I am not afraid of an army of lions led by a sheep; I am afraid of an army of sheep led by a lion." -Alexander the great
"Voting provides an illusion of participation while masking the true structures of decision-making." - Emma Goldman
"I've missed more than 9000 shots in my career. I've lost almost 300 games. 26 times, I've been trusted to take the game winning shot and missed. I've failed over and over and over again in my life. And that is why I succeed." - Michael Jordan
"A man's wife has more power over him than the state has." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I keep falling, cos falling's easy...but it only brings you down" -Eden
"I would far rather have two or three lilies of the valley gathered for me by a person I like, than the most expensive bouquet that could be bought!" - Elizabeth Gaskell, Wives and Daughters
"He's more myself than I am. Whatever our souls are made of, his and mine are the same." - Emily Bront, Wuthering Heights
"It takes being really sick to truly appreciate how it feels to be well." -Self
"We can never judge the lives of others, because each person knows only their own pain and renunciation. It's one thing to feel that you are on the right path, but it's another to think that yours is the only path." - Paulo Coelho
"We mock the thing we are to be." - Mel Brooks
"The attitude of great poets is to cheer up slaves and horrify despots." - Walt Whitman
"Who's the more foolish, the fool or the fool who follows him?" -Jesus H. Christ
"Forgive, O Lord, my little jokes on Thee And I'll forgive Thy great big one on me." - Robert Frost
"Deep in my heart I'm concealing things that I'm longing to say. Scared to confess what I'm feeling - frightened you'll slip away." - Madonna
"Ultimate horror often paralyses memory in a merciful way." - H.P. Lovecraft, The Rats in the Walls
"An adult is a child who has more ethics and morals, that's all." - Shigeru Miyamoto
"She slept with wolves without fear, for the wolves knew a lion was among them." - R.M. Drake
"I am terrified by this dark thing That sleeps in me; All day I feel its soft, feathery turnings, its malignity." - Sylvia Plath, Ariel
"Do not be afraid; our fate Cannot be taken from us; it is a gift." - Dante Alighieri, Inferno
"It's the questions we can't answer that teach us the most. They teach us how to think. If you give a man an answer, all he gains is a little fact. But give him a question and he'll look for his own answers." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
"Men go to far greater lengths to avoid what they fear than to obtain what they desire." - Dan Brown, The Da Vinci Code
"Expose yourself to your deepest fear; after that, fear has no power, and the fear of freedom shrinks and vanishes. You are free." - Jim Morrison
"An I for an eye will make the whole world blind" - Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi
"We are not educated well enough to perform the necessary act of intelligently selecting our leaders." - Walter Cronkite
"Every man is born as many men and dies as a single one." - Martin Heidegger
"There are perhaps no days of our childhood that we lived as fully as the days we think we left behind without living at all: the days we spent with a favourite book." -Marcel Proust
"Just because i told you my story does not invite you to be a part of it." from the film "The Bucket List"
"Never start something you're not willing to finish. And if you're getting fucked either way, go with the lucrative version." - Maeve Millay
"Ahhh. Bed, book, kitten, sandwich. All one needed in life, really." - Jacqueline Kelly, The Evolution of Calpurnia Tate
"Do you love tragedies and everything that breaks the heart?" Friedrich Nietzsche
"Happiness depends on being free, and freedom depends on being courageous." - Marie Rutkoski, The Winner's Curse
"The true man wants two things: danger and play. For that reason he wants woman, as the most dangerous plaything." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"And I didn't choose it, Kat. I chose you." - Ally Carter, Heist Society
"The advantage of a bad memory is that one enjoys several times the same good things for the first time." - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Cry. Forgive. Learn. Move on. Let your tears water the seeds of your future happiness." - Steve Maraboli
"Learn to value yourself, which means: fight for your happiness." - Ayn Rand
"The worst part of success is trying to find someone who is happy for you." - Bette Midler
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W.P. Kinsella
"Hope Smiles from the threshold of the year to come, Whispering 'it will be happier'..." - Alfred Tennyson
"Sanity and happiness are an impossible combination." - Mark Twain
"They say a person needs just three things to be truly happy in this world: someone to love, something to do, and something to hope for." - Tom Bodett
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." - Mahatma Gandhi
"The greatest thing in this world is not so much where we stand as in what direction we are moving." - Johann Wolfgang von Goethe
[Help] Origin of the phrase: "Eyes are the windows to the soul?"
"If fate doesn"t make you laugh, then you just don"t get the joke."  Gregory David Roberts
"If fate doesn"t make you laugh, then you just don"t get the joke."  *Shantaram*
"An author is a fool who, not content with boring those he lives with, insists on boring future generations." - Montesquieu
"Accustom yourself to the belief that death is of no concern to us, since all good and evil lie in sensation and sensation ends with death." --Epicurus
"A people that elect corrupt politicians are not victims but accomplices."  George Orwell
"I swear to you gentlemen, that to be overly conscious is a sickness, a real, thorough sickness." - Fyodor Dostoyevsky | "People tell me it's a sin/To know and feel too much within" -- Bob Dylan
"I consider this to be like a game of chess. Because I'm never going to lose."-Me (11/06/2016)
'Those who are too smart to engage in politics are punished by being governed by those who are dumber' -Plato
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you." - Maya Angelou -
"Write drunk, edit sober."  Ernest Hemingway.
'Those who are too smart to engage in politics are punished by being governed by those who are dumber' -Plato
"The human mind is capable of things you can't even imagine. Which is a bit of a design flaw really." Discordian Quotes
"The surest way of concealing from others the boundaries of one's own knowledge is not to overstep them." - Giacomo Leopardi
"There is nothing which I dread so much as a division of the republic into two great parties, each arranged under its leader, and concerting measures in opposition to each other. This, in my humble apprehension, is to be dreaded as the greatest political evil under our Constitution" - John Adams
"What has always made the state of hell on earth has been precisely that man has tried to make it his heaven." - Friedrich Hlderlin
"Knowledge is power. Power to do evil...or power to do good. Power itself is not evil. So knowledge itself is not evil." - Veronica Roth, Allegiant
"The surest way of concealing from others the boundaries of one's own knowledge is not to overstep them." - Giacomo Leopardi
"The possession of knowledge does not kill the sense of wonder and mystery. There is always more mystery." - Anas Nin
"Never forget that justice is what love looks like in public." - Cornel West
"You will not be punished for your anger; you will be punished by your anger." - Gautama Buddha
"The art of being wise is knowing what to overlook." - William James
"If opportunity doesn't knock, build a door" - Milton Berle
"Take it moment by moment, and you will find that we are all, as I"ve said before, bugs in amber." - Kurt Vonnegut
"You cannot control what happens to you, but you can control your attitude toward what happens to you, and in that, you will be mastering change rather than allowing it to master you." - Brian Tracy
"Life would be tragic if it weren't funny." - Stephen Hawking
"The stupid neither forgive nor forget; the naive forgive and forget; the wise forgive but do not forget." - Thomas Szasz
"Recognizing power in another does not diminish your own." - Joss Whedon
"It takes a very long time to become young." - Pablo Picasso
"Wisdom is not a product of schooling but of the lifelong attempt to acquire it." - Albert Einstein
"A fit, healthy bodythat is the best fashion statement" - Jess C. Scott
"Don't take financial advice from broke people" -Dave Ramsey
"But what are kings when regiment is gone but perfect shadows in a sunshine day" Christopher Marlowe
"It's good to have money, and the things that money can buy, but it's good, too, to check up once in a while and make sure that you haven't lost the things that money can't buy." - George H. Lorimer
"Time is an illusion, lunchtime doubly so" -Ford Prefect
"One could do worse than being a swinger of birches." - Robert Frost
"Don't be pushed by your problems. Be led by your dreams." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"In prosperity our friends know us; in adversity we know our friends." - John Churton
"Creativity is a natural extension of our enthusiasm." - Earl Nightingale
"Normal is getting dressed in clothes that you buy for work and driving through traffic in a car that you are still paying for - in order to get to the job you need to pay for the clothes and the car, and the house you leave vacant all day so you can afford to live in it." - Ellen Goodman.
"There"s no need to sharpen your pencils any more. Even the dull ones can make a mark." -ZeFrank
"A risk is a chance you take; if it fails you can recover. A gamble is a chance taken; if it fails, recovery is impossible." - Erwin Rommel
"Remember remember the 5th of November" - V for Vendetta
'As far as foreign policies go, I trust Hillary as far as I can throw Trump' - Viggo Mortensen
"Don't fight a battle if you don't gain anything by winning. " - Erwin Rommel
"For truth is a matter that can withstand mockery, that is freshened by any ironic gesture directed at it. Whatever cannot withstand satire is false." - Peter Sloterdijk, Critique of Cynical Reason
"We never lose our demons, we only learn to live above them." - Doctor Strange
"Sensual and spiritual are not easy words to use; that there are, perhaps, not two Aphrodites, but one Aphrodite with a Janus face." - E.M. Forster, The Longest Journey
`If you are neutral in situations of injustice, you have chosen the side of the oppressor` -- Desmond Tutu
"All I wanted in the world was just to live to see it all." - The Decembrists
"Beneath this mask there is more than flesh. Beneath this mask there is an idea, and ideas are bulletproof." - V for Vendetta
"I wonder who defined man as a rational animal. It was the most premature definition ever given." -Oscar Wilde
"Alcohol may be man's worst enemy, but the bible says love your enemies." - Frank Sinatra
"Once you become a pickle you can never go back to being a cucumber" - Unknown
"When you feel 'bad', it is because in that moment you think 'bad' is the best way to feel"
"The value of an idea has nothing to do with the sincerity of the man who expresses it. Indeed, the probabilities are that the more insincere the man is, the more purely intellectual will the idea be, as in that case it will not be colored by his wants, his desires, or his prejudices." -Oscar Wilde
"Talk to yourself at least once in a Day.. Otherwise you may miss a meeting with an EXCELLENT person in this World " - Swami Vivekanand
"Talk to yourself at least once in a Day.. Otherwise you may miss a meeting with an EXCELLENT person in this World " - Swami Vivekanand
'The only way you learn a lesson is the hard way.' - Me
"STOP saying needle teedle!" -my wife
"The heart has its reasons which reason knows nothing of." -Blaise Pascal
"Democracy is being allowed to vote for the candidate you dislike least." - Robert Byrne
"Ever bedded in the herbage, quilted by a heavenly vast, unconcerned about the future, and forgetful about the past?" Gibran Khalil Gibran
"Remember, remember the fifth of November of gunpowder treason and plot. I know of no reason why the gunpowder treason should ever be forgot." - V for Vendetta
"Your smile will give you a positive countenance that will make people feel comfortable around you."  Les Brown
[Help] Looking for "Best Way to Run a University" Quote
"I never met a man I diden't like" -Will Rogers
"There is one common flow, one common breathing, all things are in sympathy." - Hippocrates
"I never make the mistake of arguing with people for whose opinions I have no respect."  Edward Gibbon
"The unexamined life is not worth living." - Socrates
"Any fool can know. The point is to understand." - Albert Einstein
"The simple things are also the most extraordinary things, and only the wise can see them." - Paulo Coelho, The Alchemist
"Angry people are not always wise." - Jane Austen, Pride and Prejudice
"Let no man pull you so low as to hate him." - Martin Luther King Jr., A Knock at Midnight: Inspiration from the Great Sermons of Reverend Martin Luther King, Jr.
"God will not look you over for medals, degrees or diplomas but for scars." - Elbert Hubbard
"It is amazing how complete is the delusion that beauty is goodness." - Leo Tolstoy, The Kreutzer Sonata
"Everybody in this family needs to calm down and eat some fruit or something."
"I know not with what weapons World War III will be fought, but World War IV will be fought with sticks and stones." - Albert Einstein
"God will not look you over for medals, degrees or diplomas but for scars." - Elbert Hubbard
"It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it." - Aristotle, Metaphysics
"Count your age by friends, not years. Count your life by smiles, not tears." - John Lennon
"Knowing yourself is the beginning of all wisdom." - Aristotle
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." - Eleanor Roosevelt, This is My Story
"Where does a lie go when it needs to die? Upwards or down below? Follows us wherever we go?" - Mike Vennart
"If the ocean was composed of liquid metal, GE would design a water cooled reactor" -Admiral Hyman G. Rickover
. Courage is not the absence of fear, but rather the judgement that something else is more important than fear. Ambrose Redmoon
" Appreciate the moment of a first kiss; it may be the last time you own your heart. "  Robert M. Drake
" The fact that someone else loves you doesn"t rescue you from the project of loving yourself. "  Sahaj Kohl
"Perhaps, the problem it's not the intensity of your love, but the quality of the people you are loving." Warsan Shire
"Death must be so beautiful. To lie in the soft brown earth, with the grasses waving above one's head, and listen to silence. To have no yesterday, and no to-morrow. To forget time, to forget life, to be at peace." -Oscar Wilde
"Thunderbolt and lightning very very frightening me" - Galileo*
"Let justice be done though the heavens fall."
"Those who are heartless once cared too much" - Unknown
"Any man who has a head and arms and legs, was born with hope in his heart." -Go Set a Watchman
"Someday, someone will best me. But it won't be today, and it won't be you." -Last Word
"unless the sun inside you is burning your gut, don't do it" -Charles Bukowski
"The tongue may hide the truth but the eyesnever!"  Mikhail Bulgakov
"This life is yours. Take the power to choose what you want to do and do it well. Take the power to love what you want in life and love it honestly. [continued]
"It's not always necessary to be strong, but to feel strong."  Jon Krakauer
"The very basic core of a man"s living spirit is his passion for adventure. The joy of life comes from our encounters with new experiences, and hence there is no greater joy than to have an endlessly changing horizon, for each day to have a new and different sun."  Jon Krakauer (Into the Wild)
"We can be quiet together and pretend that we have all the time in the world. And every day we shall have less. And then none. Would you rather, therefore, have had nothing at all?" -Time Traveler's Wife
"If You"re Searching For That One Person Who Will Change Your LifeTake A Look In The Mirror" - Unknown
"The tiger got to hunt, the bird got to fly, the man got to sit and wonder why...the tiger got to sleep, the bird got to land, man's gotta tell himself someday he'll understand" -MC Devlin of Mad Conductor, in the song 'Member's Only'
"The sun and the moon and the stars would have disappeared long ago... had they happened to be in the reach of predatory human hands." - Havelock Ellis
"Ankh-Morpork had dallied with many forms of government and had ended up with that form of democracy known as One Man, One Vote. The Patrician was the Man; he had the Vote." Sir Terry Pratchett "Mort"
"Whenever I'm caught between two evils, I take the one I've never tried." Mae West
"You may see me struggle but you will never see me quit " - Jordan Belfort
"I've known Jeff for fifteen years. Terrific guy,'' .......
"We only think about the future with the one we love" -greenangst
"I have struck a city - a real city - and they call it Chicago... I urgently desire never to see it again. It is inhabited by savages." Rudyard Kipling
"It is not in our custom to annexe countries" - Queen Victoria
"Formula for success: under promise and over deliver." - Tom Peters
"Jason Derulo" - Jason Derulo
"there's a difference between a bad person and a good person who's done bad things." -ZeFrank
"Remember this: some talk to you in their free time, and some free their time to talk to you."  Unknown
"Don't forget you're alive. 'Cause sometimes when you walk around the city and you're in a bad mood, you can think, hey, wait a minute, we're alive! We don't know what the next second will bring and what a fantastic thing this is. This can get easily forgotten in the routine of life." - Joe Strummer
"I am about to watch the Cubbies in the World Series in a game 7"
"Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend." -Albert Camus
"Jumping from failure to failure with undiminished enthusiasm is the big secret to success." Savas Dimopoulos
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain
"In three words I can sum up everything I've learned about life: it goes on." - Robert Frost
"Husbands are chiefly good as lovers when they are betraying their wives." - Marilyn Monroe
"Being single doesn't mean you're weak, it means that you're strong enough to wait for the right person." - Niall Horan
"You like every one; that is to say, you are indifferent to every one." - Oscar Wilde, The Picture of Dorian Gray
"Do you want to know who you are? Don"t ask. Act! Action will delineate and define you."  Thomas Jefferson
"Everyone seems to have a clear idea of how other people should lead their lives, but none about his or her own."  Paulo Coelho
"As long as you look for someone else to validate who you are by seeking their approval, you are setting yourself up for disaster. You have to be whole and complete in yourself. No one can give you that. You have to know who you are - what others say is irrelevant." - Nic Sheff
"To be fully seen by somebody, then, and be loved anyhow - this is a human offering that can border on miraculous." - Elizabeth Gilbert, Committed: A Skeptic Makes Peace with Marriage
"I suffer from girlnextdooritis where the guy is friends with you and that's it." - Taylor Swift
"Owning pets is like having sex slaves you don't want to fuck." - Norm Mcdonalds
"Man may have discovered fire, but women discovered how to play with it." - Candace Bushnell, Sex and the City
"When someone loves you, the way they talk about you is different. You feel safe and comfortable." - Jess C. Scott, The Intern
"Accept who you are. Unless you're a serial killer." - Ellen DeGeneres, Seriously... I'm Kidding
"Well, don't expect us to be too impressed. We just saw Finnick Odair in his underwear." - Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
"Never memorize something that you can look up." - Albert Einstein
"A room without books is like a body without a soul." - Marcus Tullius Cicero
"I see it all perfectly; there are two possible situations - one can either do this or that. My honest opinion and my friendly advice is this: do it or do not do it - you will regret both." -Sren Kierkegaard
"So many books, so little time." - Frank Zappa
"I like the night. Without the dark, we'd never see the stars." - Stephenie Meyer, Twilight
"You may say I'm a dreamer, but I'm not the only one. I hope someday you'll join us. And the world will live as one." - John Lennon
"Yesterday is history, tomorrow is a mystery, today is a gift of God, which is why we call it the present." - Bil Keane
"Youth is the most precious thing in life; it is too bad it has to be wasted on young folks" -George Bernard Shaw
"There is no common sense answer to a philosophical problem. One can defend common sense against the attacks of philosophers only by solving their puzzles; i.e., by curing them of the temptation to attack common sense; not by restating the views of common sense." - Ludwig Wittgenstein
"The important work of moving the world forward does not wait to be done by perfect men." Mary Ann Evans
"We live in a country where if you want to go bomb somebody, there"s remarkably little discussion about how much it might cost. But when you have a discussion about whether or not we can assist people who are suffering, then suddenly we become very cost-conscious." - Prof. Andrew Bacevich
"What I know about this jungle son, is because I'm here." -Gunnery Sergeant Thomas Beckett
"I can resist everything except temptation." Oscar Wilde
"You'll never know if you don't go. You'll never shine if you don't glow."- Smash Mouth, All Star (1999)
"Remember that people break down, too, not just machinery." - Gregory Benford
"Siting here resting my bones and this loneliness won't leave me alone." -Sitting on the Dock of the Bay, Otis Redding
"Here you will tread upon a spark, but here, and there, and behind you and in front of you, and everywhere, flames will blaze up." -August Spies, Martyr of the Haymarket Riot
"Listen, are you breathing just a little, and calling it a life?" -- Mary Oliver
"The male is by nature superior and the female inferior, the male ruler and the female subject" -Aristotle
"Wise men talk because they have something to say; fools, because they have to say something."  Plato
"When there's a red light somewhere, there's a green light in a different direction"-Me
"The bravest thing I ever did was continuing my life when I wanted to die."
"Criticism is like medicine, it sucks to take, but it makes you better." - Me
"Being aware of a single shortcoming within yourself is far more useful than being aware of a thousand in someone else." - Dalai Lama
"Be in this world like a stranger or one who is passing through"-Muhammad saw
"Is a dream a lie if it doesn't come true, or is it something worse?" - Bruce Springsteen, The River
"There is no greater agony than bearing an untold story inside you." - Maya Angelou, I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings
"If you gave someone your heart and they died, did they take it with them? Did you spend the rest of forever with a hole inside you that couldn't be filled?" - Jodi Picoult, Nineteen Minutes
"It kills me sometimes, how people die." - Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
"I don't want to die without any scars." - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"The moment you doubt whether you can fly, you cease for ever to be able to do it."  J.M. Barrie
"Sometimes you"ll be afraid. Sometimes you"ll think you"re out of your league. But you"ll keep showing up every day, putting in the work...
"I am at heart a gentleman. "-Marlene Dietrich
"An entire sea of water can"t sink a ship unless it gets inside the ship. Similarly, the negativity of the world can"t put you down unless you allow it to get inside you." - Goi Nasu
"All I want is a gentleman. I'm sick to bloody death of bastards."- Katie Price
"You're never wrong to do the right thing" -Mark Twain
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"A purpose of human life, no matter who is controlling it, is to love whoever is around to be loved." - Kurt Vonnegut, The Sirens of Titan
"To be free is not merely to cast off one's chains, but to live in a way that respects and enhances the freedom of others." Nelson Mandela
"Gallantry is gentleman's quality." - Toba Beta, Betelgeuse Incident: Insiden Bait Al-Jauza
"Do me a favor? Be a gentleman tomorrow?" - Cora Carmack
"A gentleman is someone who does not what he wants to do, but what he should do." - Haruki Murakami, Norwegian Wood
"Every Hungarian wishes to die an elegant gentleman" - Igor Janke
"Being male is a matter of birth. Being a man is a matter of age. But being a gentleman is a matter of choice." - Vin Diesel
"You are trying to kidnap what I have rightfully stolen, and I think it quite ungentlemanly." - William Goldman, The Princess Bride
"Be well, do good work, and keep in touch." Garrison Keillor, every day on The Writer's Almanac
"Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal" - Albert Camus
"Man is the only creature that refuses to be what he is" - Albert Camus
"Life"s a bitch and then you die. That"s why we get high, 'cause you never know when you"re gonna go."  AZ
"The greatest obstacle to being heroic is the doubt whether one may not be going to prove one's self a fool; the truest heroism is to resist the doubt; and the profoundest wisdom, to know when it ought to be resisted, and when it be obeyed." Nathaniel Hawthorne
"One of the greatest discoveries a man makes, one of his great surprises, is to find he can do what he was afraid he couldn't do." Henry Ford
"When a man begs you for your help, his pride is hurt. Don't deal another blow to his pride by letting him down."
"who are you?!" "I've been asking myself the same thing" - Po, Kung Fu Panda 3
"Data is not information, information is not knowledge, knowledge is not understanding, understanding is not wisdom." - Tim Berners-Lee
"if you hold an idea close enough it feels like love doesn't it?"
"Fear is the irrational shackles we use to bound ourselves to a limited life, those who have overcome their fears, are free, in the whole sense of the word"-Diego Robles
"There's 3 types of truth for any given incident on life: Your truth, My truth, and What really happened"-Diego Robles
"Don't ask stupid questions, and you'll not get stupid answers "-Diego Robles
"if you hold an idea close enough it feels like love doesn't it?"
"I think when people get stuck in situations that go against their soul, they can"t be happy. That"s all."  Martine Murray
"The loneliest moment in someone"s life is when they are watching their whole world fall apart, and all they can do is stare blankly."
"When people don"t express themselves, they die one piece at a time."  Laurie Halse Anderson, Speak
"There is peace even in the storm."  Vincent van Gogh
"I was staring at you and you were staring at me and right then it was sort of like love, wasn"t it?"  Junot Daz
"They say hell is a place, but it would seem as if it's a feeling- and most experience it every day."
"Success comes from standing out, not fitting in" - Don Draper
"White folks was in caves while we were building empires. We taught philosophy and astrology [sic] and mathematics before Socrates and those Greek homos ever got around to it." -- Al Sharpton
"If you are backed up against a wall, then break the goddamned thing down." Harvey Spector
"He who feared that he would not succeed sat still." --Horace
"Care about what other people think and you will always be their prisoner." - Lao Tzu
" Normal is an illusion. What is the normal for the spider is chaos for the fly"
"Appreciation is a wonderful thing. It makes what is excellent in others belong to us as well."-Voltaire
"It is the privilege of youth to believe in hope, but old men see death more clearly." Alexandre Dumas
"Each day of our lives we make deposits in the memory banks of our children." Charles R. Swindoll,
"The graveyards are full of indispensable men." -- Charles DeGaulle
"I'm a big personality. I walk into a room, big and tall and loud."-Adele
"If I don't have red, I use blue" Picasso
"Caring doesn"t sometimes lead to misery. It always does."  John Green
"Research is what I'm doing when I don't know what I'm doing." - Wernher Von Braun (1912-1977)
"At the touch of love everyone becomes a poet."-Plato
"A stupid man's report of what a clever man says can never be accurate, because he unconsciously translates what he hears into something he can understand." -- Bertrand Russell
"Eat healthily, sleep well, breathe deeply, move harmoniously."-Jean-Pierre Barral
"To live a creative life, we must lose our fear of being wrong."-Joseph Chilton Pearce
"Where the battle rages, there the loyalty of the soldier is proved."-Martin Luther
"If you can't do great things, do small things in a great way."- Napoleon Hill
"We don't need to share the same opinions as others, but we need to be respectful."-Taylor Swift
"Time you enjoy wasting, was not wasted." - John Lennon
"A single rose can be my garden... a single friend, my world."- Leo Buscaglia
"Every month that we do not have an economic recovery package 500 million Americans lose their jobs."-Nancy Pelosi
"A month before the season I stop putting ketchup on my french fries." -Mario Lemieux
"If you could kick the person in the pants responsible for most of your trouble, you wouldn't sit for a month." -Theodore Roosevelt
"Times have not become more violent. They have just become more televised." Marilyn Manson
"Behind every smile, there's two frowns".
"you are who you are, dont let others say the other way" - unknown
"The pessimist looks down and hits his head. The optimist looks up and loses his footing. The realist looks forward and adjusts his path accordingly." - King Ezekiel
"[Those jealous ones who would guard their knowledge from the world] Let them be grateful that their halting efforts are aided by amateurs who love life enough to let it humanize their teaching." -Will Durant
"The miracle of children is that we just don"t know how they will change or who they will become."
"Courage is resistance to fear, mastery of fear - not absence of fear." - Mark Twain
"Every tomorrow has two handles. We can take hold of it with the handle of anxiety or the handle of faith."  Henry Ward Beecher
"When I look back on all these worries, I remember the story of the old man who said on his deathbed that he had had a lot of trouble in his life, most of which had never happened."  Winston Churchill
"The cream will rise to the top" - Randy Savage
"It's never to late to take charge of your fate, you know." -Ralof
"My ancestors are smiling at me Imperials, can you say the same?" -Stormcloak soldier
"In my nothing, you were everything to me."  Trent Reznor
"A Nord's last thoughts should be of home." -Ralof
"Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year. No man has learned anything rightly, until he knows that every day is Doomsday." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"I"d put my money on the sun and solar energy. What a source of power! I hope we don"t have to wait till oil and coal run out before we tackle that."- Thomas A. Edison, 1931
"The price of anything is the amount of life you exchange for it." -Henry David Thoreau
"Nature bears long with those who wrong her. She is patient under abuse. But when abuse has gone too far, when the time of reckoning finally comes, she is equally slow to be appeased and to turn away her wrath."  Nathaniel H. Egleston
"Never waste a minute thinking about people you don't like." Dwight D. Eisenhower
"If you create environments in which you can't ask questions, extremists step in with solutions."  Peter Boghossian,
"I see walking bombs on the street. Hearts not beating, but ticking."
"The mirror is my best friend because when i cry it never laughs"-charlie chaplin
"In a gentle way, you can shake the world." -Mahatma Gandhi
"Today you are you. That's truer than true. There is no one who is youer than you." Dr. Seuss
"A day without sunshine is like, you know, night..." Steve Martin
"The mind, like the dyer's hand, is colored by what it holds. "  Unattributed
"It"s only in drugs or death we"ll see anything new, and death is just too controlling."  Chuck Palahniuk
"government is the entertainment division of the military-industrial complex" Frank Zappa
"One's destination is never a place but rather a new way of looking at things." Henry Miller
"If you only do what you can do, then you will never be better than what you are." - Master Shifu, Kung Fu Panda.
" do you Howconvince the upcoming generation that eduction is the key to success when we are surrounded by poor graduates and rich criminals" -Robert Mugabe
"I never learned anything while I was talking." - Larry King
"How do you convince the upcoming generation that education is the key to success when we are surrounded by poor graduates and rich criminals "
"The most heroic word in all languages is revolution." - Eugene V. Debs
"Marriage, all in all, is a cowardly method that tries to subdue love through torture." - Kyoka Izumi
"I was born with two buttholes, one for poop and one for cherry slushies." -MARTIN LUTHER KING JR
"His own image; no longer a dark, gray bird, ugly and disagreeable to look at, but a graceful and beautiful swan. To be born in a duck's nest, in a farmyard, is of no consequence to a bird, if it is hatched from a swan's egg." - Hans Christian Andersen, The Ugly Duckling
"If life hits you over the head with a brick, build a life out of them bricks"
"After my head has been chopped off, will I still be able to hear, at least for a moment , the sound of my own blood gushing from my neck? That would be the best pleasure to end all pleasure." - Peter Kurten (The Vampire of Dusseldorf)
"I'll be forgiven more than that when I'm forgotten" Samuel Beckett
"The problem with the world is that the intelligent people are full of doubts. While the stupid ones are full of confidence."  Charles Bukowski
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to pause and reflect." - Mark Twain
"Freethinkers are those who are willing to use their minds without prejudice and without fearing to understand things that clash with their own customs, privileges, or beliefs. This state of mind is not common, but it is essential for right thinking..." - Leo Tolstoy
"If you wait to do everything until you"re sure it"s right, you"ll probably never do much of anything." - Win Borden
"Do you have any idea how many lives we must have gone through before we even got the first idea that there is more to life than eating, or fighting, or power in the Flock? A thousand lives, Jon, ten thousand!" - Richard Bach, Jonathan Livingston Seagull
"The most painful thing is losing yourself in the process of loving someone too much, and forgetting that you are special too." - Ernest Hemingway
"Autumn is a second Spring when every leaf is a flower" - Albert Camus
"Don"t ask what the world needs. Ask what makes you come alive, and go do it. Because what the world needs is people who have come alive." - Howard Thurman
"I am half child, half ancient." - Bjrk
"Trying to live without friends is like milking a bear to get cream for your morning coffee. It is a whole lot of trouble, and then not worth much after you get it." - Zora Neale Hurston
"Gods always behave like the people who make them." -Zora Neale Hurston
""Agriculture is now a motorized food industry, the same thing in its essence as the production of corpses in the gas chambers and the extermination camps, the same thing as blockades and the reduction of countries to famine, the same thing as the manufacture of hydrogen bombs." - Martin Heidegger
"I"ve learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel."- Maya Angelou
"Does justice ever find you? Do the wicked never lose? Is there any honest song to sing besides the blues?" - Jon Foreman
[Question] I heard a quote recently about race relations and how they differed in the American North vs South. I'm desperately trying to remember it!
"I used to say, 'I wanna die before I'm old,' But because of you I might think twice."
"I'm kind of over getting told to throw my hands up in the air... so there" -Lourde
"it is irrational to be politically well-informed because the low returns from data simply do not justify their cost in time and other resources" - Gordon Tullock
"Every life comes with a death sentence." - Walter White
"If you've got a closed mind, keep your mouth closed." - Me
"In sorrow we must go, but not in despair. Behold! we are not bound for ever to the circles of the world, and beyond them is more than memory." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Nothing in the world can take the place of persistence. Talent will not; nothing is more common than unsuccessful men with talent... Persistence and determination alone are omnipotent."  Calvin Coolidge
"All man's miseries derive from not being able to sit quietly in a room alone. "  Blaise Pascal
"I like living. I have sometimes been wildly, despairingly, acutely miserable, racked with sorrow, but through it all I still know quite certainly that just to be alive is a grand thing."  Agatha Christie
"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work." - Thomas Edison
"You"ve gotta dance like there"s nobody watching, Love like you"ll never be hurt, Sing like there"s nobody listening, And live like it"s heaven on earth."  William W. Purkey
"The reason grandparents and grandchildren get along so well is that they have a common enemy." - Sam Levenson
'The other night I ate at a real nice family restaurant. Every table had an argument going." - George Carlin
"People are always blaming their circumstances for what they are. I don't believe in circumstances. The people who get on in this world are the people who get up and look for circumstances they want, and, if they can't find them, make them." - George Bernard Shaw
"When you get into a tight place, and everything goes against you till it seems as if you couldn't hold on a minute longer, never give up then, for that's just the place and time that the tide'll turn." Harriet Beecher Stowe, abolitionist and writer
"In any given moment we have two options: to step forward into growth or to step back into safety." - Abraham Maslow
"It is my ambition to say in ten sentences what others say in a whole book." Friedrich Nietzsche
"The most beautiful people we have known are those who have known defeat, known suffering, known struggle, known loss, and have found their way out of the depths. [continued]
"Don"t let the pressure exceed the pleasure." - Joe Maddon
"Speak when spoken to, and even then, keep it short." - Unknown
"Everything leads to Transmutation and Death, so let's live the Present and stop fearing our well known future." - Me
"I'm enough of an artist to draw freely on my imagination. Imagination is more important than knowledge. Knowledge is limited. Imagination encircles the world." - Albert Einstein, 1929
"If my life is the whim of a dreamer, let them awake and remember the grand idea that I am." -Shane Koyczan
"The suspense is terrible. I hope it will last." - Oscar Wilde
"Have you ever watched at somebody and thought to yourself: 'The wheel is still turning, but the hamster is dead'"?
"The media's the most powerful entity on earth. They have the power to make the innocent guilty and to make the guilty innocent, and that's power. Because they control the minds of the masses"-Malcolm X
"Fear plays an interesting role in our lives. How dare we let it motivate us? How dare we let it into our decision-making, into our livelihoods, into our relationships? It's funny, isn't it, we take a day a year to dress up in costume and celebrate fear?" - Robert California
"Come out of the masses. Stand alone like a Lion and live your life according to your own light."  Osho
"The Holocaust was an obscene period in our nation's history. I mean in this century's history. But we all lived in this century. I didn't live in this century." -Dan Quayle
"No man really knows about other human beings. The best he can do is to suppose that they are like himself." John Steinbeck, The Winter of Our Discontent
" All fungi are edible. Some fungi are only edible once." - Terry Pratchett.
"Desire is good, or should be. People who want things can be reasoned with. Go plant some crabapples." - Michelob Donatelloween
"When you really pay attention, everything is your teacher" - Ezra Bayda
"A ship in harbor is safe, but that is not what ships are built for." - John A. Shedd.
"My goal is to build a life I don't need a vacation from." - Rob Hill Sr.
"I was in a hurry, for despite everything I couldn"t rid myself of the feeling that I was mortal." -Isaac Asimov
"The true meaning of life is to plant trees, under whose shade you do not expect to sit."  Nelson Henderson
"Men, like bullets, go farthest when they are smoothest" - Jean Paul
"People will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel." - Maya Angelou
"I will not let anyone walk through my mind with their dirty feet." -Mahatma Gandhi
'When you really listen to another person from their point of view, and reflect back to them that understanding, it's like giving them emotional oxygen." Stephen Covey
"If we keep doing what we're doing, we're going to keep getting what we're getting." Stephen Covey
"Remember, we are not human beings having a spiritual experience. We are spiritual beings having a human experience." Stephen Covey
"Creativity is just connecting things. When you ask creative people how they did something, they feel a little guilty because they didn't really do it. That's because they were able to connect experiences they've had and synthesize new things." Steve Jobs
"The way to get started is to quit talking and begin doing." Walt Disney, Disney founder
"My favorite things in life don't cost any money. It's really clear that the most precious resource we all have is time." Steve Jobs
"The 'Billionaire' song is what my kids tease me with. They sing it to me. It's funny." Bill Gates
"...while we seem to understand the things that exist, we don"t seem to understand the manner in which we understand."  Ashish Dalela
"Any community that gets its laughs by pretending to be idiots will eventually be flooded by actual idiots who mistakenly believe that they're in good company."  /u/DarkShikari
"There is no place for purely human boasts of grandeur, or for forgetting that men build their cultures my huddling together, nervously loquacious, at the edge of an abyss." -Kenneth Burke, found in 'The Presence of Self' by R.S. Perinbanayagam
"Those who aren't ken to fire cannot paint a world. Those absorbed by fire, must not paint a world." - Dark Souls III DLC1, Painter
" Those who aren't ken to fire cannot paint a world. Those absorbed by fire, must not paint a world. " - Sister Friede, Dark Souls III
"Live to the point of tears." - Albert Camus
"The moral of this story, the moral of this song" - Dylan
"Surround yourself with the dreamers and the doers, the believers and thinkers, but most of all, surround yourself with those who see the greatness within you, even when you don"t see it yourself." -Edmund Lee
"Faith is taking the first step even when you don't see the whole staircase." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Don"t fear failure so much that you refuse to try new things. The saddest summary of a life contains three descriptions: could have, might have, and should have. "  Louis E. Boone
"The fear of death follows from the fear of life. A man who lives fully is prepared to die at any time."  Mark Twain
"I don't want to die, I sometimes wish I'd never been born at all" - Freddie Mercury
"I don't wan't to die, sometimes I wish I'd never been born at all" - Freddie Mercury
"Experience demands that man is the only animal which devours his own kind, for I can apply no milder term to the general prey of the rich on the poor. "  Thomas Jefferson
"People that complete other people`s vision are understated" Bjrk
"Depression is more seductive, Its tool is: "Wouldn"t it be way more comfortable to stay inside and not deal with people?" Grief is an attack on life. It"s not a seducer. It"s an ambush or worse. It stands right out there and says: "The minute you try something, I"m waiting for you."" -Patton Oswalt
"If voting changed anything, they'd make it illegal" - Emma Goldman
"The less my hope, the hotter my love" - Terence
"You can fool some of the people all of the time, and all of the people some of the time, but you cannot fool all of the people all of the time".  Abraham Lincoln
"the present always dies in future memories, and king me is killing me, cut wide open, and bleeding to death for all to see." randy blythe
"The number of deaths around the world from cigarette consumption is five-and-a-half million, according to latest testaments. Annually, a cigarette's killed as many people as were killed in the Germans' anti-Jewish genocidal campaign. So we have a holocaust. Annually..." - Dr. Gabor Mat
"The number of deaths around the world from cigarette consumption is five-and-a-half million, according to latest testaments..." - Dr. Gabor Mat
"Two roads diverged in a wood and I - I took the one less traveled by, and that has made all the difference." Robert Frost
"Inspirational quote for un-inspirational people" -Some knucklehead
"A woman stopped me on the sidewalk and asked me if I had the time. I said, 'I used to,' and walked away."  Raymond Carver
"I believe that imagination is stronger than knowledge. That myth is more potent than history. That dreams are more powerful than facts. That hope always triumphs over experience. That laughter is the only cure for grief. And I believe that love is stronger than death." - Robert Fulghum
"Do What Thou Wilt" - Aleister Crowley
"Don't run from trouble, you ain't never going to get that far." -Brer Fox
"We only accept the love we think we deserve."  Stephen Chbosky
"You tell her you'd love to sit with her today and everyday, because life is short and no one deserves to ride the bus alone" Paul Dano - Swiss army man
"Each person you meet is an aspect of yourself, clamoring for love." - Eric Micha'el Leventhal
"To live was to be a fragment of the cosmere that was experiencing itself." - Brandon Sanderson, Words of Radiance
"The only time you fail is when you fall down and stay down." - Stephen Richards, Cosmic Ordering: You can be successful
"No one can make you feel inferior without your consent." Eleanor Roosevelt
"The best argument against democracy is a five-minute conversation with the average voter."
"The only way down from the gallows is to swing" - Tom Waits
"Knowing how to be solitary is central to the art of loving. When we can be alone, we can be with others without using them as a means of escape." - bell hooks
'When you get into a tight place and everything goes against you, till it seems as though you could not hang on a minute longer, never give up then, for that is just the place and time that the tide will turn." Harriet Beecher Stowe
"I believe that laughing is the best calorie burner. I believe in kissing, kissing a lot. I believe in being strong when everything seems to be going wrong. I believe that happy girls are the prettiest girls. I believe that tomorrow is another day and I believe in miracles." Audrey Hepburn
"If you believe in yourself and have dedication and pride - and never quit, you'll be a winner. The price of victory is high but so are the rewards." Paul Bryant
"Your work is going to fill a large part of your life, and the only way to be truly satisfied is to do what you believe is great work... Steve Jobs
"The secret of change is to focus all of your energy, not on fighting the old but on building the new." Unknown
"The most common form of despair is not being who you are." - Sren Kierkegaard (seattleanxiety.com)
"An optimist is a person who starts a new diet on Thanksgiving Day." Irv Kupcinet
"It is perilous to study too deeply the arts of the Enemy, for good or for ill." -Elrond (Tolkien) The Fellowship of the Ring
"Your right to swing your arms ends just where the other man"s nose begins."
"It is perilous to study too deeply the arts of the Enemy, for good or for ill." -Elrond (Tolkien) The Fellowship of the Ring Read more at http://www.notable-quotes.com/t/tolkien_j_r_r.html#ykQ0vlmTj7q0bwYP.99
"As somebody once said there's a difference between a failure and a fiasco. A failure is simply the non- presence of success. Any fool can accomplish failure. But a fiasco...A fiasco is a disaster of mythic proportions" Elizabethtown
"Anything worth doing is worth overdoing."-Mick Jagger
"If trees could scream, would we be so cavalier about cutting them down? We might, if they screamed all the time, for no good reason." -Jack Handey
"Gratitude is the rosemary of the heart." Minna Thomas Antrim
"And he said his life was over and that's why things were just starting to get interesting." -Irmgard Keun
"No man has the right to be an amateur in the matter of physical training. It is a shame for a man to grow old without seeing the beauty and strength of which his body is capable" - Socrates
"Life opens up opportunities to you, and you either take them or you stay afraid of taking them."  Jim Carrey
"I learned many great lessons from my father, not the least of which, was that you can fail at what you don"t want so you might as well take a chance on doing what you love"  Jim Carrey
"So please ask yourself: What would I do if I weren"t afraid? And then go do it."  Sheryl Sandberg
"Am I walking toward something I should be running away from?" -Shirley Jackson, The Haunting of Hill House
"Speak every time you stand so you do not forget yourself." -Anis Mojgani, "Shake the Dust"
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful about what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut
"We search for the truth we seek justice. The court Requires it. The victims cry for it. And God demands it!" - Team 5
"Dedicate yourself to one quote a week, and you have forever changed your life."
"If you focus on what you left behind, then how can you see what lies ahead?" Chef Gusteau, "Ratatouille"
"Anybody can sympathise with the sufferings of a friend, but it requires a very fine nature to sympathise with a friend's success." - Oscar Wilde
"A single day is enough to make us a little larger or, another time, a little smaller." - Paul Klee
"Unspoken feelings are unforgettable."  Andrei Tarkovsky
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire."  Charles Bukowski
"This is my doctrine: Give every other human being every right you claim for yourself."  The Liberty of Man, Woman and Child
"Gun control is not a solution to inner city violence. It's a political placebo designed to give the appearance of sympathy, when in their hearts, there's only apathy." -Colion Noir
"I like to reinvent myself  it"s part of my job." - Karl Lagerfeld
"No woman wants to be in submission to a man who isn't in submission to God!" - T.D. Jakes
"The most wasted of all days is one without laughter." - Nicolas Chamfort
"Your inner strength is your outer foundation" - Allan Rufus
"In quoting others, we cite ourselves." - Julio Cortzar, Around the Day in Eighty Worlds
"I hate quotations. Tell me what you know." - Ralph Waldo Emerson, The Essays of Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The words "I Love You" kill, and resurrect millions, in less than a second." - Aberjhani, Elemental: The Power of Illuminated Love
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently." - Maya Angelou
"The problem is never how to get new, innovative thoughts into your mind, but how to get the old ones out."  Dee Hock
"Now and then we had a hope that if we lived and were good, God would permit us to be pirates." - Mark Twain
"People will talk behind your back, Make sure to give them an interesting topic" -Anonymous
"People will talk behind your back. Make sure to give them an interesting topic" -Anonymous
"Between what is said and not meant, and what is meant and not said, most of love is lost." - Khalil Gibran
"If you have to convince someone to stay with you then they have already left." - Shannon L. Alder
"Things turn out best for the people who make the best of the way things turn out." - John Wooden
"Can honour set to a leg? No. Or an arm? No. Or take away the grief of a wound? No. Honour hath no skill in surgery, then? No. What is honour? A Word. What is in that word honour? What is that honour? Air. A trim reckoning!" - Falstaff, Henry IV Part 1 by William Shakespeare
"Fill it up so it doesnt overflow"
"That which is not good for the beehive cannot be good for the bees" Marcus Aurelius
"We Spaniards know a sickness of the heart that only gold can cure." by Hernan Cortes
"When lost in utter darkness, there is nothing left but forward"Nautilus, League of Legends
"Quit caring about your label. No one reads them anyways." - u/420B1scu1ts
"If you repeat something over and over again it loses its meaning; You watch the sunset too often it just becomes 6 pm, you make the same mistake over and over you stop calling it a mistake. If you just wake up wake up wake up wake up wake up wake up one day you"ll forget why." -Phil Kaye
"Even the worst person in the world is number 1 at something" - my friend
"Life is a storm, my young friend. You will bask in the sunlight one moment, be shattered on the rocks the next. What makes you a man is what you do when that storm comes." - Alexandre Dumas
"Most [...] think that their military is a defensive instrument; but that is not the way it looks when you are at the other end of the rifle barrel." John Mearsheimer, Political Scientist
"Sometimes pain is so unmanageable that the idea of spending another day with it seems impossible. Other times pain acts as a compass to help you through the messier tunnels of growing up. But pain can only help you find happiness if you remember it." - Adam Silvera
"Depression is like a heaviness that you can"t ever escape. It crushes down on you, making even the smallest things like tying your shoes or chewing on toast seem like a twenty-mile hike uphill. Depression is a part of you; it"s in your bones and your blood." - Jasmine Warga
"Sometimes I can hear my bones straining under the weight of all the lives I'm not living." - Jonathan Safran Foer
[About the US election] "They're both trying to convince me that one is worse than the other, and they're both succeeding." -The Amazing Atheist
"When someone you love dies, and you"re not expecting it, you don"t lose her all at once; you lose her in pieces over a long time  the way the mail stops coming, and her scent fades from the pillows and even from the clothes in her closet and drawers." - John Irving, A Prayer for Owen Meany
"Run, rabbit run. Dig that hole, forget the sun. And when at last the work is done, don't sit down, it's time to dig another one" -Pink Floyd, Breathe
"What can be asserted without evidence can be dismissed without evidence." Hitchen's Razor
"The best thing for being sad [...] is to learn something..."
"The tiger and the lion may be more powerful, but the wolf doesn"t perform in the circus."  Unknown
"I'm the Steve Jobs of sitting on a sitting on couch for three days" - Gene Belcher
"You're under no obligation to be the same person you were 5 minutes ago" - Alan Watts
"It"s a funny thing coming home. Nothing changes. Everything looks the same, feels the same, even smells the same. You realize what"s changed, is YOU." -Curious Case Of Benjamin Button
"To a drinker the sensation is real and pure and akin to something spiritual: you seek; in the bottle, you find." - Caroline Knapp, Drinking: A Love Story
"My father was a deeply sentimental man. And like all sentimental men, he was also very cruel." - Ernest Hemingway
"Your work is discover your world and then with all your heart give yourself to it." Buddha
"Sometimes we can't find the thing that will make us happy, because we can't let go of the thing that was supposed to." - Robert Brault
"Only Dead Fish Go With The Flow." - Unknown(?)
"I hope you live a life you"re proud of. If you find that you"re not, I hope you have the strength to start all over again." - Eric Roth
"Sometimes what you"re most afraid of doing is the very thing that will set you free." - Robert Tew
"There is a profound difference between 'I did everything I could' and 'I did everything that could be done.' If you can't look their family in the eyes and say 'I did everything that could be done' you didn't do enough." - Fire Academy Instructor
"Grades don't measure intelligence and Age doesn't define maturity" -Uknown
'Those without dignity can survive if they have food to eat' 'Those without food can endure their hunger as long as they have diginity' 'But those who have lost both stop caring and deseperately cling to anything' - oda nobunaga
"The most important thing in life is to learn how to give out love, and to let it come in." Unknown
"If you're not careful, the newspapers will have you hating the people who are being oppressed, and loving the people who are doing the oppressing."
"People who vote for corrupt politicians, impostors, thieves, and traitors, are not victims, but accomplices." - George Orwell
[Envy] "Envy is the biggest tribute that the shadows do to the man." Jose Mourinho
"we can't solve problems by using the same kind of thinking we used when we created them." albert einstein
"It's irresponsible to let a belief think for you or a chemical dream for you" -- Ursula K. Le Guin.
"There are two kinds of people: Those that start out as an amateur and those that stay as an amateur." - white sombrero.
"It is possible to commit no errors and still lose. That is not a weakness, that is life." -Captain Jean-Luc Picard
"The truth is, we know so little about life, we don't really know what the good news is and what the bad news is."  Kurt Vonnegut
"The dead of midnight is the noon of thought." - Anna Letitia Barbauld
"Self-trust is the first secret of success." Ralph Waldo Emerson, poet and essayist
"Humans, if nothing else, have the good sense to die." -Markus Zusak
"Anything important is never left to the vote of the people. We only get to vote on some man; we never get to vote on what he is to do." -Will Rogers
"An ignorant person is one who doesn't know what you have just found out." -Will Rogers
"I belong to no organized party. I am a Democrat." -Will Rogers
"Change is neither good nor bad, it simply is. It can be greeted with terror or joy, a tantrum that says "I want it the way it was," or a dance that says, Look, something new!" - Don Draper
"Fairy tales are more than true: not because they tell us that dragons exist, but because they tell us that dragons can be beaten." - Neil Gaiman
"Turn your scars into stars." - Robert H. Schuller
"It'll be all right, my fine fellow," said the Otter. "I'm coming along with you, and I know every path blindfold; and if there's a head that needs to be punched, you can confidently rely upon me to punch it." - Kenneth Grahame, The Wind in the Willows
"The way to get started is to quit talking and begin doing." Walt Disney
"I have nothing to say and I'm saying it." - John Cage
"Whether you think you can or think you can't, you're right." - Henry Ford
"Nothing is as obnoxious as other people's luck." -F. Scott Fitzgerald
"The law often allows what honor forbids." Bernard Joseph Saurin
"Anger and intolerance are the enemies of correct understanding." -- Mahatma Gandhi
"You don't get harmony when everyone sings the same note."- Doug Floyd
"Will I lose my dignity; will someone care?" - Will I, Rent
"Crying that it's an application bug is like crying over the speed of light: you should deal with reality, not what you wish reality was." - Linus Torvalds, creator of Linux
"I offered them Utopia, but they fought for the right to live in Hell." - Mark Millar, Superman: Red Son
"America will never be destroyed from the outside. If we falter and lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves" - Abraham Lincoln
"America will neverbe destroyed from the outside. If we falter ad lose our freedoms, it will be because we destroyed ourselves" - Abraham Lincoln
"Ya know, parents are just kids having kids..." - Morty (Rick and Morty)
"Positive or negative, there will be change. And that gamble of nature is thrilling." - Macbook (Filthy Frank)
"Part of living is acknowledging people"s pain and grief, but not letting it take over your heart. Though it"s always nighttime in the depths, the waves still reflect the day." -Patrick Bowers in "The Rook"
"Only Adore can Substitute Abhor" -ElusiveUsama
"Perhaps there are iron laws of the universe. After all, it does seem ordered. But so does iron, until it melts." Zach Weiner, SMBC
"Hipness is not a state of mind, it's a fact of life." - Cannonball Adderley, Does anyone know when he said this, I mean what year
"Do I not destroy my enemies when I make them my friends?" - Abraham Lincoln
"Fuck you and the horse you rode in on, you fucking alien motherfucker."- Rick Yancey, & "Go make love to a tube sock."- Nenia Campbell [that felt good]
"Men are haunted by the vastness of eternity. And so we ask ourselves: will our actions echo across the centuries? Will strangers hear our names long after we are gone, and wonder who we were, how bravely we fought, how fiercely we loved?" - Odysseus in Troy
"You can get much farther with a kind word and a gun than you can with a kind word alone." -- Al Capone
"The heart asks pleasure first, And then, excuse from pain" -Emily Dickinson
"It is better to keep your mouth closed and let people think you are a fool than to open it and remove all doubt." - Mark Twain
"I feel most alone in crowded rooms." - a character / player from my DnD group
"What are the most powerful words in the universe? The ones you use to talk to yourself." Karen Salmansohn
"A flower does not think of competing to the flower next to it. It just blooms." Zen Shin
"I always say -- but in private -- that the Greeks and the Bible are all that is serious in humanity. Everything else is dancing." -- Emmanuel Levinas
"everything we know is only some kind of approximation, because we know that we do not know all the laws yet." richard feynman
"I shouldn't precisely have chosen madness if there had been any choice, but once such a thing has taken hold of you, you can't very well get out of it" - Van Gogh
"In order for the light to shine so brightly, the darkness must be present." - Francis Bacon
"All boundaries are conventions, national ones too. One may transcend any convention, if only one can first conceive of doing so" -Robert Frobisher, David Mitchell's *Cloud Atlas*
"America is great because America is good." Hillary Clinton... Let that quote soak in for a minute.
"There are rules. The cunning live around them, the inspired live outside them, and the obedient don't live at all" - Bao
"A lot of what we experience as strength comes from knowing what to do with weakness." -Barbara Ehrenreich, Nickel and Dimed: On (Not) Getting By in America
"There are rules. The cunning live around them, the inspired live outside them, and the obedient don't live." - Bao
"When someone works for less pay than she can live on  when, for example, she goes hungry so that you can eat more cheaply and conveniently  then she has made a great sacrifice for you..." -Barbara Ehrenreich, Nickel and Dimed: On (Not) Getting By in America
"Happiness is not having what you want, but wanting what you have"
"I hate and I love. Perhaps you ask why I do so. I do not know, but I feel it and am in agony." - Catullus
"...to read the Bible without horror, we must undo every thing that is tender, sympathising, and benevolent in the heart of man." - Thomas Paine
"War does not determine who is right  only who is left." - Anonymous
"Appear weak when you are strong, and strong when you are weak." - Sun Tzu, The Art of War
"Remember that sometimes not getting what you want is a wonderful stroke of luck." - Dalai Lama
"When dealing with people, let us remember we are not dealing with creatures of logic. We are dealing with creatures of emotion, creatures bristling with prejudices and motivated by pride and vanity." - Dale
"If you're not careful, the newspapers will have you hating the people who are being oppressed, and loving the people who are doing the oppressing." - Malcolm X
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music." -Friedrich Nietzsche
"Do not compare yourself to others. If you do so you are insulting yourself." - Adolf Hitler
"...give up temporary comfort for something greater" - Ten Thousand Hours (A 'Your World Within' motivational video)
"The boy knew that escaping school was the surest sign of his election." - Flannery O'Connor, The Violent Bear It Away
"Every four years we go through the same cycle of hope and disillusionment." - Sheri Holman, The Mammoth Cheese
"If you can't archieve today things that you've planned, do things, that you haven't planned, to the full." -T. Parkkinen
"If there is a God, He will have to beg my forgiveness."  A phrase carved on the walls of a concentration camp cell by a Jewish prisoner.
"The biggest room in the world is room for improvement." - Unknown
"Big beats are the best, get high all the time" -Superhans & Jez
"I still love the people I"ve loved, even if I cross the street to avoid them." -Uma Thurman
"I don't want to be a tree; I want to be its meaning." - Orhan Pamuk, "My Name is Red"
"If wealth was the inevitable result of hard work and enterprise...
"it pays to keep an open mind, but not so open your brain falls out." - Carl Sagan
"it pays to have an open mind, but not so open your brain falls out." - Carl Sagan
"My desire to live is as intense as ever, and though my heart is broken, hearts are made to be broken: that is why God sends sorrow into the world." - Oscar Wilde
"People call these imperfections, but they're not, that's the good stuff. And we get to choose who we let in to our weird little worlds. You're not perfect, sport...and she's not perfect either. But the question is: whether or not you're perfect for each other..." - Good Will Hunting
"One bad chapter doesn't mean your story is over." - Unknown
"Terror is only justice prompt, severe and inflexible; it is then an emanation of virtue; it is less a distinct principle than a natural consequence of the general principle of democracy, applied to the most pressing wants of the country." -Maximilien Robespierre
"You must not fight too often with one enemy or you will teach him all your art of war."  Napoleon
"Like all young men, you greatly exaggerate the difference between one young woman and another." -G.B. Shaw
"Made a hoe eat a hoe 'cause she a broke hoe." -Future
"Which is the true nightmare, the horrific dream that you have in your sleep or the dissatisfied reality that awaits you when you awake?" - Justin Alcala
"I won't be a rock star. I will be a legend" - Freddie mercury
"I never lose sight of the fact that just being is fun." Katherine Hepburn
"The power of the American people, when we rise up and stand for liberty, knows no bounds." -Ted Cruz
"Every boulder can be moved away." - John D. Rockefaller, an american magnate
"But then, an impulsean awful impulse came over you, and for no other reason than that you are trapped by the freedom to do anything in this life, you took one of the crates, and put it in your trunk." Welcome To Nightvale Ep. 13
"If you assume that there is no hope, you guarantee that there will be no hope. If you assume that there is an instinct for freedom, that there are opportunities to change things, then there is a possibility that you can contribute to making a better world." - Noam Chomsky
"if there is one thing you can say about mankind, there's nothing kind about man, you can drive out nature with a pitchfork but it always comes roaring back" tom waits
"Crisis is what suppressed pain looks like; it always comes to the surface. It shakes you into reflection and healing." - Bryant McGill
"I wish there was a way to know you're in the good old days before you've actually left them" -Andy Bernard
"A patriot loves their country for what it does; a nationalist loves their country for whatever it does."
"A leader is one who knows the way, goes the way, and shows the way."- John C. Maxwell
"If you're not careful, the newspapers will have you hating the people who are being oppressed, and loving the people who are doing the oppressing." - Malcolm X
"Sometimes when you win you lose" - Robin Williams (What Dreams May Come, 1998)
"You only die if no one remembers you." - Sergeij Smirnov (A Youtube commenter)
"You only die if know one remembers you."
"Twilight is the border between day and night, and the shore is the border between sea and land. The border is longing: when both have fallen in love but still haven't said anything. The border is to be on the way. It is the way that is the most important thing." - Tove Jansson
"The great virtue of man lies in his ability to correct his mistakes and continually to make a new man of himself." -Wang Yang-ming
"Doubt is the foundation of all justice" -Coulter Erastus Lane
"I have never been an atheist in the sense of denying the existence of a God.  I think that generally ... an agnostic would be the most correct description of my state of mind" - Charles Darwin
"Your optimism strikes me like junk mail addressed to the dead" - Half Man Half Biscuit
"It's better to live one day as a lion, than one hundred years as a sheep." -Benito Mussolini
"A process which led from the amoeba to man appeared to the philosophers to be obviously a progressthough whether the amoeba would agree with this opinion is not known."  Bertrand Russell
"God created sexual desire in ten parts; then he gave nine parts to women and one to men" -- Ali ibn Abu Taleb (the fourth leader of the Islamic world after Mohammed)
"The woods are never solitary--they are full of whispering, beckoning, friendly life. But the sea is a mighty soul, forever moaning of some great, unshareable sorrow, which shuts it up into itself for all eternity." - L.M. Montgomery, Kilmeny of the Orchard
"Anything of quality and durability is constructed carefully, patiently and lovingly to ensure excellence." - GARY RYAN BLAIR
"A process which led from amoeba to man appeared to the philosophers to be obviously progressthough whether the amoeba would agree with this opinion is not known."  Bertrand Russell
"I got the money bro"  Mirsat
"The formula "two and two make five" is not without its attractions."  Fyodor Dostoevsky
"Ordinary people have big tv"s. Extraordinary people have big libraries."  Robin Sharma
"Solving intelligence to solve everything else." - DeepMind (Google)
"Every day People straighten up the hair, why not the heart" -Che Guevara
"It is neither wealth nor splendor; but tranquility and occupation that give you happiness."  Thomas Jefferson
"Your opinion of police officers is only a reflection of how you would act if you were one." - Kainxjm
"our world's mirror is our history" -unknown
"It gets easier. But you got to do it every day, thats the hard part." Running monkey from Bojack Horseman
"Even if you're on the right track, you'll get run over if you just sit there." - Will Rogers
"Try not to become a man of success, but rather try to become a man of value" -Albert Einstein
"One of the penalties for refusing to participate in politics is that you end up being governed by your inferiors" -Plato
"Writing about music is like dancing about architecture" - Frank Zappa
"To acquire knowledge, one must study; but to acquire wisdom, one must observe." - Marilyn Vos Savant
"Everyone sees what you appear to be, few experience what you really are." - Niccol Machiavelli, The Prince
"You have to die a few times before you can really live" CHARLES BUKOWSKI
"Only In America Can You Be Pro-Death Penalty, Pro-Torture... And Still Call Yourself Pro-Life." - John Fugelsang
"An apology means nothing if you don't change your behavior." - Me
"Liberty's too precious a thing to be buried in books" -Jefferson Smith (Mr. Smith Goes to Washington)
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." - Winston S. Churchill
"It"s always darkest before it"s completely black." Mao zedong
"A woman is the only thing I am afraid of that I know will not hurt me."  Abraham Lincoln
"Education is not preparation for life; education is life itself."  John Dewey
"We cannot simultaneously fight terrorism, we and our allies, while with the other hand we fund terrorism, arm terrorism and train terrorism." --Jill Stein
"Always go too far, because that's where you'll find the truth." - Albert Camus
"Knowing is not enough, we must apply. Willing is not enough, we must do." Bruce Lee
"If people are good only because they fear punishment, and hope for reward, then we are a sorry lot indeed." - Albert Einstein.
"Don't teach your children to read... teach them to also question what they read. Teach them to question everything." - George Carlin
"Is God willing to prevent evil, but not able? Then he is not omnipotent. Is he able, but not willing? Then he is malevolent. Is he both able and willing? Then whence cometh evil? Is he neither able nor willing? Then why call him God?" - Epicurus
"There's some good in this world, Mr. Frodo and it's worth fightin for." - Samwise Gamgee
"There are only two tragedies in life: one is not getting what one wants, and the other is getting it." - Oscar Wilde.
"I'm Bigger, and Bolder, and Rougher and Tougher, in other words Sucker, there is no other. I'm the one and only dominator." Dominator - Human Recource
"I am I and my circumstance" - Jos Ortega y Gasset
"If You accept your victories, you get motivated. If you accept your failures, you get to learn. If you deny those events, you deny yourself." -anonymous
"If your absence doesn't affect them, your presence never mattered."  Unknown
"The most dangerous men are those who have nothing to lose"
"May your Coffee be Strong, and your Monday be Short!" - Unknown
"The woods are lovely, dark and deep. But I have promises to keep, and miles to go before I sleep." -Robert Frost
"If a lot of people loved each other, the world would be a better place to live." - Tommy Wiseau
[Request] What's the quote that involves two men left on earth and one killing the other?
"Today is the first day of the rest of your life." Charles Dederich
"Female freedom always means sexual freedom, even whenespecially whenit is seen through the prism of economic freedom." Toni Morrison
"Now and then it's good to pause in our pursuit of happiness and just be happy" -Guillaume Apollinaire
..learning to forgive ourselves and others because we have not chosen wisely is what makes us most human. We make horrible mistakes. It"s how we learn. We breathe love. It"s how we learn. And it is inevitable.  N. Waheed
"I ought to call myself an agnostic; but, for all practical purposes, I am an atheist. I do not think the existence of the Christian God any more probable than the existence of the Gods of Olympus or Valhalla...
"Many orthodox people speak as though it were the business of sceptics to disprove received dogmas rather than of dogmatists to prove them...
"And those who were seen dancing were thought to be insane by those who could not hear the music." Friedrich Nietzsche
"I can hire one half of the working class to kill the other half" Jay Gould
"Forgive others, not because they deserve forgiveness, but because you deserve peace." -Jonathan Lockwood Huie
"If you don't like where you are, change it. You're not a tree." Jim Rohn
"It is necessary to fall in love... if only to provide an alibi for all the random despair you are going to feel anyway."  Camus
"Doubt kills more dreams than failure ever will." Suzy Kassem
"Free speech carries with it some freedom to listen." - Bob Marley
"To argue with a person who has renounced the use of reason is like administering medicine to the dead."  Thomas Paine
"In a world where diseases are cured; egos and fear spread like a plague"
"I'm not interested in competing with anyone. I hope we all make it." - Unknown
"Although the world is full of suffering, it is full also of the overcoming of it." - Helen Keller
"Art is the lie that enables us to realize the truth." - Pablo Picasso
"The unexamined life is not worth living." - Socrates
"Perhaps one did not want to be loved so much as to be understood." - George Orwell, 1984
"A friend is one that knows you as you are, understands where you have been, accepts what you have become, and still, gently allows you to grow." - William Shakespeare
"Education is our passport to the future, for tomorrow belongs to the people who prepare for it today." - Malcolm X
"You can never be overdressed or overeducated." - Oscar Wilde
"Each human being is bred with a unique set of potentials that yearn to be fulfilled as surely as the acorn yearns to become the oak within it." - Aristotle
"Hip cynical transcendence of sentiment is really some kind of fear of being really human, since to be really human [...] is probably to be unavoidably sentimental and nave and goo-prone and generally pathetic." - David Foster Wallace, Infinite Jest
"A man who dares to waste one hour of time has not discovered the value of life." - Charles Darwin, The Life & Letters of Charles Darwin
"I'm sure the universe is full of intelligent life. It's just been too intelligent to come here." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Time is a drug. Too much of it kills you." - Terry Pratchett, Small Gods
"Two things are infinite: the universe and human stupidity; and I'm not sure about the universe." - Albert Einstein
"Reading furnishes the mind only with materials of knowledge; it is thinking that makes what we read ours." - John Locke
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing." - Socrates
"A friend is someone who knows all about you and still loves you." - Elbert Hubbard
"Suffering is necessary until you realize it is unnecessary". -Eckhart Tolle
"All my life, my heart has yearned for a thing I cannot name." Andr Breton
"Worrying is carrying tomorrow's load with today's strength- carrying two days at once. It is moving into tomorrow ahead of time. Worrying doesn't empty tomorrow of its sorrow, it empties today of its strength." - Corrie ten Boom
"Fake tits are like nazis; they don't laugh, they don't dance, it's just HU-YEAH! I'M WALKING HERE!" Robin Williams.
"Success is the progressive realization of a worthy goal"- Earl Nightingale
"Some people are born on third base and go through life thinking they hit a triple." - Barry Switzer
"You cannot expect to find a sound core in a rotten fruit" - Jacob Riis
"God: -1 = -1."
"There can never be more rational people in one space than at an atheist convention."
"Atheists are backed by rationality."
"I think I'm a lot more humble than you would understand." -Donald Trump
"With one eye on the past, I walk backwards into the future" - Yohji Yamamoto
"Never. Argue. With the data." -Sheen Estevez
"Thinking something does not make it true. Wanting something does not make it real." - Michelle Hodkin, The Unbecoming of Mara Dyer
"Life isn't about finding yourself. Life is about creating yourself." - George Bernard Shaw
"The two most important days of your life are the day you were born and the day you finally find out why" - Mark Twaine
"If you are drawn into controversy, use very hard arguments and very soft words. Frequently you cannot convince a man by tugging at his reason, but you can persuade him by winning his affections." Charles Spurgeon
"If I"m going to have that kind of influence, I want to be sure it"s because of something I"ve actually said or written."  Marilyn Monroe
"We believe in ordinary acts of bravery, in the courage that drives one person to stand up for another." - Veronica Roth, Divergent
"Sometimes I feel lonely, sometimes you feel lonely. Does that mean we should be friends? Probably not." - Stanford library desk graffiti
"A democracy cannot exist as a permanent form of government. It can only exist until the voters discover that they can vote themselves largesse from the public treasury." - Lord Woodhouselee
"Education is what remains after one has forgotten what one has learned in school." - Albert Einstein
"The function of education is to teach one to think intensively and to think critically. Intelligence plus character - that is the goal of true education." Martin Luther King, Jr.
"I would rather entertain and hope that people learned something than educate people and hope they were entertained." - Walt Disney
"If you're looking for sympathy you'll find it between shit and syphilis in the dictionary." - David Sedaris, Barrel Fever: Stories and Essays
"A ship in harbor is safe  but that is not what ships are built for."  John A. Shedd
"If you can't make yourself understood by your friends, you'll be in trouble when your enemies come for you." - Hunter S. Thompson
"Success is falling nine times and getting up ten." Jon Bon Jovi
"Success is nothing more than a few simple disciplines, practiced every day." Jim Rohn
"Success is not final, failure is not fatal: it is the courage to continue that counts." Winston Churchill
"Never trust anyone who has not brought a book with them." - Lemony Snicket, Horseradish
"Never underestimate the determination of a kid who is time-rich and cash-poor." - Cory Doctorow, Little Brother
"May you never make it to hell, but always be on your way."
"The only way you can invent tomorrow is if you break out of the enclosure that the school system has provided for you by the exams written by people who are trained in another generation. "-Neil deGrasse Tyson
"When dealing with people, let us remember we are not dealing with creatures of logic. We are dealing with creatures of emotion, creatures bristling with prejudices and motivated by pride and vanity." - Dale Carnegie
"Study without desire spoils the memory, and it retains nothing that it takes in." - Leonardo da Vinci
"I can picture in my mind a world without war, a world without hate. And I can picture us attacking that world, because they'd never expect it." - Jack Handey
"If I kill a midget, will I only serve half the sentence?" - Homeless man asking me for money outside of Arco
"One man's garbage is another man's ungarbage." - Ricky from Trailer Park Boys
"Dumb people are always blissfully unaware of how dumb they really are" - Patrick Star
"The things that seem the most put-together seem to need the most glue to stop it from shattering completely." -Unknown
"i tell you all my secrets, but i lie about my past." tom waits
"A great man shows his greatness by the way he treats little men." - Thomas Carlyle
"If you let a person talk long enough you"ll hear their true intentions! Listen twice, speak once."  Tupac Shakur
"I am not a teacher, but an awakener." - Robert Frost
"Intelligence plus character-that is the goal of true education." - Martin Luther King Jr.
"The Clinton machine is at the center of a corrupt power structure. We've seen it first hand in WikiLeaks; HRC meets in secret with international banks to plot the destruction of U.S. sovereignty to enrich global financial powers, special interests and her donors." -Donald J. Trump
"Some people feel the rain. Others just get wet."  Bob Dylan
"Study without desire spoils the memory, and it retains nothing that it takes in." - Leonardo da Vinci
"The key element of social control is the strategy of distraction that is to divert public attention from important issues and changes decided by political and economic elites, through the technique of flood or flooding continuous distractions and insignificant information." -Noam Chomsky
"The task of the modern educator is not to cut down jungles, but to irrigate deserts." - C.S. Lewis
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"How we spend our days is, of course, how we spend our lives." Annie Dillard
"Believe in yourself. Under-confidence leads to a self-fulfilling prophecy that you are not good enough for your work." Dr Roopleen
"You need to learn how to select your thoughts just the same way you select your clothes every day. This is a power you can cultivate. If you want to control things in your life so bad, work on the mind. That's the only thing you should be trying to control." - Elizabeth Gilbert, Eat, Pray, Love
"Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence." - Carl Sagan
"Pain is temporary. Quitting lasts forever." - Lance Armstrong, Every Second Counts
"Fail in the way and the place where you would want to fail." - Charlie Day
"Reason is always a kind of brute force; those who appeal to the head rather than the heart, however pallid and polite, are necessarily men of violence. We speak of 'touching' a man's heart, but we can do nothing to his head but hit it."  G.K. Chesterton
- Charlie Day
"People who brag about their IQ are losers." - Stephen Hawking
"In the most nourishing kind of love, the communion of togetherness coexists with an integrity of individuality, the two aspects always in dynamic and fluid dialogue. " -Maria Popova
"With malice toward none, with charity for all..." -Abraham Lincoln
"You educate a man; you educate a man. You educate a woman; you educate a generation." - Brigham Young
"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education." - Mark Twain
"Live as if you were to die tomorrow. Learn as if you were to live forever." - Mahatma Gandhi
"Love is the absence of judgment." - Dalai Lama XIV
"When you choose to shoot a person, you are /always/ shooting to kill." - /u/jimbozinoh
"Courage is the most important of all the virtues because without courage, you can't practice any other virtue consistently." - Maya Angelou
"You cannot have a positive life and a negative mind." Joyce Meyer
"does your god come in a capsule to sedate you?" -chad gray-
"does your god come in a capsule to sedate you?" -chas gray-
"king me is killing me!" -randy blythe-
"Anyone who stops learning is old." Henry Ford
"If your burn a bridge, you gotta learn to swim" -jessica jones
"Never waste food, water, money or anything else for that matter because many people around us don"t have what you have today, and neither did I have it in my childhood and we are not sure if your kids will have it or not. So always be grateful and never waste". - My Mother
"I'm just trying to find a mountain I can climb" -The Strokes, Machu Picchu
"I believe if you keep your faith, you keep your trust, you keep the right attitude, if you're grateful, you'll see God open up new doors." Joel Osteen
"All I ever really want to know is how other people are making it through life - where do they put their body, hour by hour, and how do they cope inside of it." -Miranda July
"And the rest is rust and stardust." -Vladimir Nabokov, Lolita
"Do not try to paint the grandiose thing, paint the commonplace so that it will be distinguished" -William Merritt Chase
"You've got to get obsessed and stay obsessed." - John Irving, The Hotel New Hampshire
"Souls reconstructed with faith transform agony into peace." - Aberjhani, The River of Winged Dreams
"Happiness is not the absence of problems, it's the ability to deal with them." - Steve Maraboli, Life, the Truth, and Being Free
"Only the dead have seen the end of war." - Plato
"Though nobody can go back and make a new beginning... Anyone can start over and make a new ending." - Chico Xavier
"Never regret thy Fall O Icarus of the fearless flight, for the greatest tragedy of them all is never to feel the burning light" - Oscar Wilde
"The very essence of romance is uncertainty." - Oscar Wilde, The Importance of Being Earnest and Other Plays
"There were never monsters in the water, just my reflection" -From a short story
"He's like a drug for you, Bella." - Stephenie Meyer, Eclipse
"It does not do to dwell on dreams and forget to live." - J.K. Rowling, Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone
"My sun sets to rise again." - Robert Browning
"Sometimes you have to kind of die inside in order to rise from your own ashes and believe in yourself and love yourself to become a new person." - Gerard Way
"Write what you know. That should leave you with a lot of free time." - Howard Nemerov
"A heaven has yet to be created." - Me
"You have to keep breaking your heart until it opens."
"A story doesnt have to appeal to the heart, it can also appeal to the spine" - Orson Welles
"Somebody told me I'm a failure! I'll prove them wrong!" -Naruto (Anime)
"It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it... anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job." - Douglas Adams
"You must not fight too often with one enemy or you will teach him all your art of war."  Napoleon Bonaparte
"Since you're not picking up what I'm putting down"- Whats the quote from??
"When people say 'surreal' they mean 'real', it's just most of your life is not very real, just repetition and routine." -Norm Macdonald
"The greatest enemy of knowledge is not ignorance, it is the illusion of knowledge." - Daniel J. Boorstin
"there are more awkward sentences than awkward silences" eddie vollmer
"You are worth about 3 dollars worth in chemicals." -Carl Sagan, Cosmos
"A claim without proof can reasonably by dismissed without proof." - Me
"The only true wisdom is in knowing you know nothing." - Socrates
"To be yourself in a world that is constantly trying to make you something else is the greatest accomplishment." - Ralph Waldo Emerson
"We are all alone...
"If the truth shall kill them, let them die." - Immanuel Kant
"believe me when i tell you, life will not break your heart, it will crush it" henry rollins
"When the rich fight the rich, it is the poor who die. " - Jean-Paul Sartre, The Devil and the Good Lord
"If You Voted For Donald Trump, Fuck You."
"A pain stabbed my heart, as it did every time I saw a girl I loved who was going the opposite direction in this too-big world." -Sal Paradise, On the Road by Jack Kerouac
"All the stirrings of old instincts which at stated periods drives men out from the sounding cities to forest and plain to kill things by chemically propelled leaden pellets, the blood lust, the joy to kill - all this was Buck's, only it was infinitely more intimate.
"Bitch doesn't take what's given to her" -- U-Turn, Weeds
"Sex without love is as hollow and ridiculous as love without sex." - Hunter S. Thompson
"There's a difference between hot women and beautiful women. Hot women are everywhere; they abound. They are beautified, not beautiful. Beautiful women, on the other hand, are rare and a real mystery. Hotness speaks to our impulses. Beauty speaks to our imagination." - Zan Perrion
"Keep it trumpin" - Me
"On some days you get what you want, and on others, you get what you need." Hunter S Thompson
"Learn what is to be taken seriously and laugh at the rest." - Herman Hesse
"Science is not only compatible with spirituality; it is a profound source of spirituality." - Carl Sagan, The Demon-Haunted World: Science as a Candle in the Dark
"Today I will do what others won't, so tomorrow I can do what others can't." - Jerry Rove
"My friends tell me that I have a tendency to point out problems without offering solutions, but they never tell me what I should do about it." -Dan Gilbert
"Knock, And He'll open the door Vanish, And He'll make you shine like the sun Fall, And He'll raise you to the heavens Become nothing, And He'll turn you into everything." - Jalaluddin Rumi
"I'll have more to say when I'm happy; 'course, then I'll have less to sing" - Ani DiFranco
"For decades people have always speculated whether the government is corrupt or just incompetent. In 2016 we've been given the choice between the two." - /u/Trinitykill
"I am so often accused of gloominess and melancholy. And I think I'm probably the most cheerful man around. I don't consider myself a pessimist at all. I think of a pessimist as someone who is waiting for it to rain. And I feel completely soaked to the skin."  Leonard Cohen
"I don't consider myself a pessimist at all. I think of a pessimist as someone who is waiting for it to rain. And I feel completely soaked to the skin."  Leonard Cohen
"Happiness consists of living each day as if it were the first day of your honeymoon and the last day of your vacation." Leo Tolstoy
"97% of people who quit too soon are employed by the 3% who never give up"  Author Unknown
"The most wasted of all days is one without laughter." - Nicolas Chamfort
"Hurt me with the truth, but never comfort me with a lie."  Author Unknown
"Instead of worrying about what people say of you, why not spend time trying to accomplish something they will admire." Dale Carnegie
"Forgiveness means giving up all hope for a better past." - Lily Tomlin
"Our fatigue is often caused not by work, but by worry, frustration and resentment." Dale Carnegie
"Inaction breeds doubt and fear. Action breeds confidence and courage. If you want to conquer fear, do not sit home and think about it. Go out and get busy." Dale Carnegie
"You can't live someone else's expectations in life. It's a recipe for disaster." Bear Grylls
"Survival can be summed up in three words - never give up. That's the heart of it really. Just keep trying." Bear Grylls
"No act of kindness, no matter how small, is ever wasted." Aesop
"Beware of false knowledge; it is more dangerous then ignorance" - George Bernard Shaw
"I guess humans like to watch a little destruction. Sand castles, houses of cards, that"s where they begin. Their great skill is their capacity to escalate." -Markus Zusak, The Book Thief
"If it ain't fun, you're doing the wrong thing." - Bob Ross
"The only thing standing between you and your goal is the story you keep telling yourself as to why you can't achieve it." Jordan Belfort
"Society grows great when old men plant trees whose shade they know they shall never sit in." Greek Proverb
"It's not my fault all women like motorcycles. They're basically huge vibrators with wheels." - Harry Dresden
"Mistakes" is the word you're too embarrassed to use. You ought not to be. You're a product of a trillion of them. Evolution forged the entirety of sentient life on this planet using only one tool: the mistake. - Westworld 2016
"Our forefathers had civilization inside themselves, the wild outside. We live in the civilization they created, but within us the wilderness still lingers. What they dreamed, we live, and what they lived, we dream." - T.K. Whipple
"Tell me every terrible thing you ever did, and let me love you anyway."
"Tell me every terrible thing you ever did, and let me love you anyway.'
"He had decided to live forever or die in the attempt." - Joseph Heller
"Perhaps all the dragons in our lives are princesses who are only waiting to see us act, just once, with beauty and courage. Perhaps everything that frightens us is, in its deepest essence, something helpless that wants our love." -Rainer Maria Rilke
"Every person must choose how much truth he can stand." - Irvin D. Yalom
"Logic is the beginning of wisdom, not the end." - Leonard Nimoy
"Man may have discovered fire, but women discovered how to play with it." - Candace Bushnell, Sex and the City
"I never really understood the word "loneliness". As far as I was concerned, I was in an orgy with the sky and the ocean, and with nature." - Bjrk 
"I crave a love so deep the ocean would be jealous."
"We all have people in our lives, some of them good, some of them bad but they shape us." -(criminal minds)
"I wonder how many people I've looked at all my life and never seen." -John Steinbeck
"I talk to God but the sky is empty." - Sylvia Plath
"Women and cats will do as they please, and men and dogs should relax and get used to the idea." - Robert A. Heinlein
"The wars of kings were over. The wars of people had begun." R. R. Palmer, Historian
"Those who cry the loudest are not always the ones who are hurt the most" - Aesop
"It is a mistake to think you can solve any major problems just with potatoes." - Douglas Adams
"Sitting quietly, doing nothing, Spring comes, and the grass grows by itself." Matsuo Basho
"Love is a serious mental disease." Plato
"Earth is not of man; man is of Earth" - TBK
"The bible has a humble and noble way of life and good morals, but upwards of a thousand lies."
"What can be asserted without evidence can be dismissed without evidence." - Christopher Hitchens
"Anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job." - Douglas Adams
"Knowing your own darkness is the best method for dealing with the darkness of other people."  Carl Jung
"Never miss a good chance to shut up"  The sign in my kitchen.
"Telling someone they can't be sad because others have it worse is like saying someone can't be happy because others have it better" - Anon
"I think the saddest people always try their hardest to make people happy. Because they know what it feels like to feel absolutely worthless and they don't want anyone else to feel like that." -Robin Williams
"Carnies built this country...the carnival part of it, anyway...and though they may be ratlike in appearance, they are truly kings among men." Homer Simpson
"Nothing haunts us like the things we don't say." - Mitch Albom
"Success is most often achieved by those who don't know that failure is inevitable." - Coco Chanel, Believing in Ourselves: The Wisdom of Women
"I Perciev'd that to be with those I like is enough." -Walt Whitman 'I sing the body Electric' v.4
"Don't spend time beating on a wall, hoping to transform it into a door. " - Coco Chanel
"Success is getting what you want, happiness is wanting what you get" - W.P. Kinsella
"The trick in creating art is not to be good at it, but to convince others that you are."
"I'm not afraid of death; I just don't want to be there when it happens." - Woody Allen
"Things are as they are. Looking out into it the universe at night, we make no comparisons between right and wrong stars, nor between well and badly arranged constellations." Alan Watts
"If you think you can do a thing or think you can't do a thing, you're right." -Henry Ford Quotes
"Friends are just different forms of enemy"  Bruce Lee
"I may not have gone where I intended to go, but I think I have ended up where I needed to be." - Douglas Adams, The Long Dark Tea-Time of the Soul
"Everything you can imagine is real." - Pablo Picasso
"Good friends, good books, and a sleepy conscience: this is the ideal life." - Mark Twain
"Life is all about- New Understandings, Making Beautiful Earthlings & Respecting Self (NUMBERS)." -Milton James
"Perfect the mental slide-tackle. It works wonders." Anon
"We are what we pretend to be, so we must be careful about what we pretend to be." - Kurt Vonnegut, Mother Night
"It is hard enough to remember my opinions, without also remembering my reasons for them!" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"It is hard enough to remember my opinions, without also remembering my reasons for them!" - Friedrich Nietzsche
"Man is the only creature who refuses to be what he is." - Albert Camus
"Have you ever noticed how "What the hell" is always the right decision to make?" - Terry Johnson, Insignificance
"Hold fast to dreams, For if dreams die Life is a broken-winged bird, That cannot fly." - Langston Hughes
"The fool doth think he is wise, but the wise man knows himself to be a fool." - William Shakespeare
"The fool doth think he is wise, but the wise man knows himself to be a fool." - William Shakespeare
"Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it is time to reform (or pause and reflect)." - Mark Twain
"If I had to get a tattoo on my face, I would get quote marks around my mouth." - Demetri Martin
"You have to be odd to be number one" - Dr. Seuss
"Don't piss in the wind." -English Proverb
"God gave us the gift of life; it is up to us to give ourselves the gift of living well." Voltaire
"The path to paradise begins in hell." - Dante Alighieri
"Tic Tac respects all women. We find the recent statements and behavior completely inappropriate and unacceptable." -Tic Tac USA
"You"re going to want to have as much data as possible to fuel your time machine."  Luc Sante
"The more you are like yourself, the less you are like anyone else which makes you unique. The problem with most people is that they spend their lives trying to emulate others and so we have lots of copies but few originals." Walt Disney
"Love yourself first, because that's who you'll be spending the rest of your life with" - Unknown.
"I'm beginning to think that adulthood is an entirely fictional concept that we attribute to people significantly older than we are." /u/heptode
"There is no small act of kindness. Every compassionate act makes large the world." Mary Anne Radmacher
"traditional ideas of private, isolated thoughts...are very seriously threatened by...the electrically computerized dossier bank - that one big gossip column that is unforgiving, unforgetful and from which there is no redemption, no erasure of early mistakes." Marshall Mcluhan (1967)
"Right actions in the future are the best apologies for bad actions in the past." - Tryon Edwards
"Sometimes I think, I need a spare heart to feel all the things I feel." - Sanober Khan, A Thousand Flamingos
"The worst thing about some men is that when they are not drunk they are sober." - W.B. Yeats
"To be kind to all, to like many and love a few, to be needed and wanted by those we love, is certainly the nearest we can come to happiness." Mary Stuart
"They push, we push..." (Full Quote inside) - Battlefield 1 Singleplayer Gameplay Trailer
"Pain is just weakness leaving your body" - Anonymous
"The true test of a man"s character is what he does when no one is watching." -John Wooden
"Never go to bed mad. Stay up and fight." - Phyllis Diller
"Everyone is allowed to do whatever they want. But when karma hits, it hits." Yashvi Kshitja, who murdered her husband after she found out he has been cheating on her.
"But the attitude of faith is to let go, and become open to truth, whatever it might turn out to be." Alan Watts
"To have faith is to trust yourself to the water. When you swim you don't grab hold of the water, because if you do you will sink and drown. Instead you relax, and float." Alan Watts
"If you want to take the island, burn your boats and you will take the island, people who are willing to die to succeed, tend to succeed. Most of us give ourselves outs, that's why we don't have what we want" -Tony Robbins
"Well, don't expect us to be too impressed. We just saw Finnick Odair in his underwear." - Suzanne Collins, Mockingjay
"I can, therefore I am." Simone Weil
"Beer is nice" -Me
"Quality is the continuing stimulus which our environment puts upon us to create the world in which we live," - Robert M. Pirsig
"Be the change that you wish to see in the world." - Mahatma Gandhi
"I tried to discover, in the rumor of forests and waves, words that other men could not hear, and I pricked up my ears to listen to the revelation of their harmony." - Gustave Flaubert, November
"It is good to love many things, for therein lies the true strength, and whosoever loves much performs much, and can accomplish much, and what is done in love is well done." Vincent van Gogh
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"For the two of us, home isn't a place. It is a person. And we are finally home."- Stephanie Perkins, Anna And The French Kiss
"One day you will kiss a man you can't breathe without and find that breath is of little consequence." - Karen Marie Moning, Bloodfever
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire." - Charles Bukowski
"Those who make the worst use of their time are the first to complain of its shortness." Jean de la Bruyere
"The only way to deal with an unfree world is to become so absolutely free that your very existence is an act of rebellion." Albert Camus
"Don't walk behind me; I may not lead. Don't walk in front of me; I may not follow. Just walk beside me and be my friend." Albert Camus
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire" - Charles Bukowski
"Give sorrow words; the grief that does not speak knits up the o-er wrought heart and bids it break." William Shakespeare
"The future is already here  it's just not evenly distributed."
"Home isn't where you're from, it's where you find light when all grows dark." -Pierce Brown, "The Golden Son"
"If everything is an emergency, than nothing is" - My boss
"It was necessary at once, right on the spot, to invent ordinary explanations for extraordinary phenomena."
"Life has no meaning. Each of us has meaning and we bring it to life. It is a waste to be asking the question when you are the answer."- Joseph Campbell
"Sex is the consolation you have when you can't have love." - Gabriel Garca Mrquez
"It is neither wealth nor splendor, but tranquility and occupation which give happiness." -Thomas Jefferson
"Life isn"t as serious as the mind makes it out to be."  Eckhart Tolle
"It may take little time to get where you want to be, but if you pause and think for a moment, you will notice that you are no longer where you were. Do not stopkeep going." - Rodolfo Costa, Advice My Parents Gave Me: and Other Lessons I Learned from My Mistakes
"Study has been for me, the sovereign remedy against all the disappointments of life. I have never known any trouble that an hour's reading would not dissipate." -Montesquieu
"It's the questions we can't answer that teach us the most. They teach us how to think. If you give a man an answer, all he gains is a little fact. But give him a question and he'll look for his own answers." - Patrick Rothfuss, The Wise Man's Fear
"If you are silent about your pain, they'll kill you and say you enjoyed it."
"Have no fear of perfection - you'll never reach it." - Salvador Dal
"Don't be afraid of your fears. They're not there to scare you. They're there to let you know that something is worth it." - C. JoyBell C.
"Do one thing every day that scares you." - Eleanor Roosevelt
"My great hope is to laugh as much as I cry; to get my work done and try to love somebody and have the courage to accept the love in return. "-Maya Angelou
"Never deprive someone of hope; it might be all they have." H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"Nobody can go back and start a new beginning, but anyone can start today and make a new ending." Maria Robinson, writer
"I can't seem to get away I feel I'm here so you can play With my head"
"Hope is being able to see that there is light despite all of the darkness."-Desmond Tutu
"Even death is not to be feared by one who has lived wisely".-Buddha
"Of all that is written, I love only what a person has written with his blood. Write with blood, and you will find that blood is spirit." -Nietzsche 'Thus Spoke Zarathustra'
"It is better to be feared than loved, if you cannot be both."- Niccolo Machiavelli
"You can't climb the ladder of success with your hands in your pockets." - Arnold Schwarzenegger
"There are only two tragedies in life: one is not getting what one wants, and the other is getting it." - Oscar Wilde
"It"s Not Whether You Get Knocked Down, It"s Whether You Get Up."- Vince Lombardi
"You Learn More From Failure Than From Success. Don"t Let It Stop You. Failure Builds Character."- Unknown
"The difference between ordinary and extraordinary is that little extra." - Jimmy Johnson
"Variety may be the spice of life, but consistency is one of the keys to the achievement of any goal." - Gary Ryan Blair
"It is a kind of spiritual snobbery that makes people think they can be happy without money." Albert Camus
"Courage is knowing what not to fear." Plato
"We are twice armed if we fight with faith." Plato
"Take time to deliberate; but when the time for action arrives, stop thinking and go in." Napoleon Bonaparte
"Virtual reality is a fake world that feels absolutely authentic." Kevin Kelley
"Silence is one great art of conversation." William Hazlitt
"Not until we are lost do we begin to find ourselves." -Henry David Thoreau
"Resistance brings evolution." Aniekee Tochukwu Ezekiel
"If the brain were so simple we could understand it, we would be so simple we couldn't." - Lyall Watson
"eating \-tn\ (n.) When there is nothing else to do."  Unknown
"growing \gr-i\ (n.) When you are transitioning to a new season of life, the people and situations that no longer fit your life will fall away. Don't fight the process."  Unknown
**growing** *noun* \gr-i\ When you are transitioning to a new season of life, the people and situations that no longer fit you will fall away. Don't fight the process. *Unknown*
"An organism is chemistry abducted into hyperspace." - Terence Mckenna
"The more you are thankful for what you have, the more you will have to be thankful for." =Zig Ziglar
"It's easy to be wise. Just think of many stupid things and don't say it" - Homer Simpson
"FROM A DISPUTE. A. Friend, you have talked yourself hoarse. B. Then I am refuted, so let's drop the subject." - Nietzsche
"Sometimes I think we are alone in the universe, and sometimes I think we are not. In either case the idea is quite staggering." - Arthur C. Clarke
"Tell me what you pay attention to and I will tell you who you are." - Jos Ortega y Gasset
"Overthinking is the biggest cause of our unhappiness. Keep your mind off things that don't help you be positive." -Unknown
"Something I'll always remember - when I was a kid, I shook hands with Orville Wright. Forty years later, I shook hands with Neil Armstrong. The guy that invented the airplane and the guy that walked on the moon. In a lifetime, that's kinda wild when you think about it." - Jonathan Winters
"Everything should be made as simple as possible, but not simpler." -Albert Einstein
"Everyone said it couldn't be done, then someone who hadn't heard that turned up, tried it, and saw that it really couldn't be done." - Nico Semsrott
"Optimism is the faith that leads to achievement; nothing can be done without hope." Helen Keller, writer and political activist
[Fear] If your dreams don't scare you, they aren't big enough." - Muhammad Ali
'Thank you.' the old man said. He was too simple to wonder when he had attained humility. But he knew he had attained it and he knew it was not disgraceful and it carried no loss of true pride.
"Let us be of good cheer, remembering that the misfortunes hardest to bear are those which never happen." -James Russell Lowell
"With freedom, books, flowers, and the moon, who could not be happy?" -Oscar Wilde
"Insist on yourself; never imitate. Your own gift you can present every moment with the cumulative force of a whole life's cultivation: but of the adopted talent of another, you gave only an extemporaneous, half possession." -Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Don't get too comfortable with who you are at any given time... you may miss the opportunity to become who you want to be"
"Don't gain the world and lose your soul, wisdom is better than silver and gold." - Bob Marley
"The truth is, everyone is going to hurt you. You just got to find the ones worth suffering for." - Bob Marley
"Try everything you can think of. Take credit for what works." - Neil Stacey
"The greater danger lies not in setting our aim too high and falling short; but in setting our aim too low, and achieving our mark."  Michelangelo
"Wise men speak because they have something to say; Fools because they have to say something" Plato
"Be careful whose toes you step on today. They may be attached to the ass you have to kiss tomorrow." -unknown
"Do not fear to be eccentric in opinion, for every opinion now accepted was once eccentric." - Bertrand Russell
3C - Character, Courage, Competence - Anonymous
"To live an extraordinary life of greatness... you must accept the idea that some bridges need to be burned." - Gary Ryan Blair
"Maybe life isn't about avoiding the bruises. May be it's about collecting the scars to prove we showed up for it."  Unknown
"When I have a thousand options, I actually have none at all."  Michael Haneke
"If I am walking with two other men, each of them will serve as my teacher. I will pick out the good points of the one and imitate them, and the bad points of the other and correct them in myself." Confucius
"I hear and I forget. I see and I remember. I do and I understand." Confucius
"Our greatest glory is not in never falling, but in rising every time we fall." Confucius
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." Confucius
"Don"t be intimidated by what you don"t know. That can be your greatest strength and ensure that you do things differently from everyone else." Sara Blakely
"What matters most is how well you walk through the fire." -Charles Bukowski
"Life doesn't revolve around one clusterfuck of a person" - My friend Simon
"The wound is the place where the Light enters you." -Rumi
"to learn who rules over you, simply find out who you are not allowed to criticize." - Voltaire
"Not everyone who is single is lonely. Not everyone who is taken is in love."  Unknown
"Genuine tragedies in the world are not conflicts between right and wrong. They are conflicts between two rights." - Georg Hegel
"I think that God, in creating man, somewhat overestimated his ability." - Oscar Wilde
"All, everything that I understand, I only understand because I love." Leo Tolstoy
'The enemy of art is the absence of limitations.' - Orson Wells
"People say life is short, but life is of course very long." Carl Rudnick
"Excellence is an art won by training and habituation. We do not act rightly because we have virtue or excellence, but we rather have those because we have acted rightly. We are what we repeatedly do. Excellence, then, is not an act but a habit." Aristotle
"Remembering that you are going to die is the best way I know to avoid the trap of thinking you have something to lose." Steve Jobs
"Both optimists and pessimists contribute to society. The optimist invents the aeroplane; the pessimist invents the parachute." - George Bernard Shaw
2 actual quotes from girls i graduated with(brace yourselves, they were serious)
"I don't ask why people lie. I just assume they do."
"Ready must you be to burn yourself in your own flame; how could you become new if you have not first become ashes!" -Nietzsche 'Thus Spoke Zarathustra'
"Nothing loses my interest faster than someone lying to me." Unknown
"By all means, marry. If you get a good wife, you'll become happy; if you get a bad one, you'll become a philosopher." Socrates
"Wisdom begins in wonder." Socrates
"Never turn your back on fear. It should always be in front of you, like a thing that might have to be killed." Hunter S Thompson
"Dear is my sleep, but more to be mere stone, so long as ruin and dishonor reign. To see not, to feel not is my great gain. Then wake me not, speak in an undertone." -Michelangelo Buonarroti
"Whenever you see a successful business, someone once made a courageous decision." - Peter Drucker
"Love is a smoke and is made with the fume of sighs." William Shakespeare
"Bad company corrupts good character." - 1 Corinthians 15:33
"Birds born in a cage think flying is an illness." Alejandro Jodorowsky
"If you are busy focusing on the falling bricks, you will never realize that they are truly stepping stones you need to cross over to the next phase of your life." Kemi Sogunle
"Never let your fear decide your future" - unknown
"It was just the urban jungles that we traversed, rather than the jungles that our ancestors moved through" -myself.
"Experiment is the only means of knowledge at our disposal. Everything else is poetry, imagination." -Max Planck
"You step into the road, and if you don't keep your feet, there is no knowing where you might be swept off to." - J.R.R. Tolkien
"Your life will become better by making other lives better."  Will Smith
"Years, lovers and glasses of wine. These are things that shouldn't be counted" The Broken Eye by Brent Weeks
"What a shame it is to be all at once the shore and the raging sea." --myself
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter, and those who matter don't mind." - Bernard M. Baruch
"I was younger then, I had nothing to spend, but time on you." -Sharon Van Etten
"Each day wake up and ask yourself what will make you feel most alive that day" - Unknown
"... his position as Emperor compelled him to oppose all that was politically liberal. He failed inevitably, but of all the failures in history he remains one of the most interesting." - Bertrand Russell on Frederick II, Holy Roman Emperor.
"In an internal There are many things I do not know why a spin in my mind, but the only thing that I know why is found is you, I love you from my heart" Unknown
"The difference between a successful person and others is not a lack of strength, not a lack of knowledge, but rather in a lack of will."
"Anger makes you smaller, while forgiveness forces you to grow beyond what you were." -Cherie Carter-Scott
"Genius is not the answer to all questions. It's the question to all answers." - Tablo
"To care for those who once cared for us is one of the highest honors." - Tia Walker
"The only way to learn it is to do it." Archimedes, "Sword in the Stone"
"The greatest evil is not now done in those sordid "dens of crime" that Dickens loved to paint. It is not done even in concentration camps and labour camps. In those we see its final result. But it is conceived and ordered (moved, seconded, carried, and minuted) in...
"Is there anything more dangerous than sympathetic understanding?" -Pablo Picasso
"Happiness is like a kiss. You must share it to enjoy it." Bernard Meltzer
"Happiness is when what you think, what you say, and what you do are in harmony." Mahatma Gandhi
"Even if I knew that tomorrow the world would go to pieces, I would still plant my apple tree." Martin Luther
"He who seeks rest finds boredom. He who seeks work finds rest." - Dylan Thomas
"Religion is for people who are afraid of going to hell. Spirituality is for those who have already been there."  Miguel Connor
"He who seeks rest finds boredom. He who seeks work finds rest." - unknown
"A great fire burns within me, but no one stops to warm themselves at it, and passers-by only see a wisp of smoke" - Vincent Van Gogh
"Little strokes fell great oaks." - Benjamin Franklin
"In time we hate that which we often fear." William Shakespeare
"Joking about it is the only way of opening my mouth without screaming." - Hawkeye (M*A*S*H), on why he makes jokes during wartime.
"We make up horrors to help us cope with the real ones." -Stephen King
"If you don"t love America why don"t you get out?" ..... "Because I don"t want to be a victim of its foreign policy!" - Barry Crimmins
"The conscience is more wise than science." John Kaspar Lavater
"Roll with the punches. Tomorrow is another day." -Dicky Fox
"Jesus Christ knew he was God. So wake up and find out eventually who you really are." -Alan Watts
"The man on top of the mountain didn't fall there."  Vince Lombardi
"You know how they always say that women like guys with senses of humor? Turns out they just laugh at handsome guys." - Norm MacDonald
"People say that life is short, but life is of course very life."  Carl Rudnick
"Listen! The wind is rising, and the air is wild with leaves, / We have had our summer evenings, now for October eves!" - Humbert Wolfe
"Thousand of candles can be lighted from a single candle, and the life of the candle will not be shortened. Happiness never decreases by being shared." Buddha
"Put your heart, mind, and soul into even your smallest acts. This is the secret of success." Swami Sivananda
"It"s not about what it is, it"s about what it can become." - Dr Seuss
"If opportunity doesn't knock, build a door." Milton Berle
"The best preparation for tomorrow is doing your best today." H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
"What a wonderful thought it is that some of the best days of our lives haven't happened yet."
"Life is a highway, but you're not a car."
"My advice to you is get married: if you find a good wife you'll be happy; if not, you'll become a philosopher." - Socrates
"Start by doing what's necessary; then do what's possible; and suddenly you are doing the impossible." Francis of Assisi
"Cover your wounds, don't show your scars Smile for friends and carry on" -Kid Cudi
"Most people are about as happy as they make up their minds to be." Abraham Lincoln
"Apathy always triumphs. Eventually. When it gets around to it." - Neil T Stacey
"20 years of schooling and they put you on the day shift" - Bob Dylan, Subterranean Homesick Blues. More applicable now than ever.
"We are all two things, in a way, are we not? Deep in the marrow? Angel and devil, light and dark. The pull between the two is the active verb which energizes our lives."
"The only wrong answer is the one you perceive to be wrong."
"Things need not have happened to be true. Tales and dreams are the shadow-truths that will endure when mere facts are dust and ashes, and forgot." -Morpheus, Sandman
"Photos are the only way, to hold on to what you knew, because the moments they show never change, when the people in them do." - Erin Hanson
"If you say that getting the money is the most important thing, you'll spend your life completely wasting your time. You'll be doing things you don't like doing in order to go on living, that is to go on doing thing you don't like doing, which is stupid." - Alan W. Watts
"The person we were yesterday made the person we are today"
"The beauty of a woman must be seen from in her eyes, because that is the doorway to her heart, the place where love resides."-Audrey Hepburn
"No valid plans for the future can be made by those who have no capacity for living now." - Alan Watts
"It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop." - Confucius
"Man, if you have to ask what jazz is, you'll never know" - Louis Armstrong
"If you have to ask what jazz is, you'll never know" - Louis Armstrong If you have to ask what jazz is, you'll never know" -
"Just remember, kid, you can quicker get back a million dollars that was stole than a word that you gave away." - Eddie, A View From The Bridge
"We're looking at our lives through broken lenses. And all we can see are the cracks." - Sinslayer
"Anyone who stops learning is old, whether at twenty or eighty. Anyone who keeps learning stays young. The greatest thing in life is to keep your mind young." Henry Ford
"Stop setting goals. Goals are pure fantasy unless you have a specific plan to achieve them." Stephen Covey
"Just as we develop our physical muscles through overcoming opposition - such as lifting weights - we develop our character muscles by overcoming challenges and adversity." Stephen Covey
"We become what we think about most of the time, and that"s the strangest secret."  Earl Nightingale
"Disappointment is a sort of bankruptcy- the bankruptcy of a soul that expends too much in hope and expectation" - Eric Hoffer
"The greatest mistake you can make in life is to be continually fearing you will make one." Elbert Hubbard
"You know what the greatest tragedy in the whole world is?" ...
"After all these years, I see that I was mistaken about Eve in the beginning; it is better to live outside the Garden with her than inside it without her." - Mark Twain, Diaries of Adam & Eve
"All our dreams can come true if we have the courage to pursue them." --Walt Disney
"You become the average of the five people you surround yourself with."  Tim Ferriss
"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names."  John F. Kennedy
"Evil is evil. Lesser, greater, middling makes no difference. The degree is arbitrary. The definition"s blurred. If I"m to choose between one evil and another, I"d rather not choose at all." - Geralt of Rivia, Witcher Series
"Never regret anything that made you smile."  Mark Twain
"Your future self is begging you to make the necessary changes in your life"
"If you can dream it, you can do it." - Walt Disney
"Good things come to people who wait, but better things come to those who go out and get them." --Anonymous
"Talent can make an individual oblivious to the power of will" - Drunk me, likely also someone before me
"Listen with the intent to understand, not the intent to reply." Stephen Covey
"The key is not to prioritize what's on your schedule, but to schedule your priorities." Stephen Covey
"You have to think anyway, so why not think big?" Donald Trump
"If you're interested in 'balancing' work and pleasure, stop trying to balance them. Instead make your work more pleasurable." Donald Trump
"Ideas are easy. It"s the execution of ideas that really separates the sheep from the goats."  Sue Grafton
"To light a candle is to cast a shadow."
"The high road is very pretty, my lord. But you'll have a hard time marching your armies down it." - Roose Bolton, Game of Thrones
"I can see the sun, but even if I cannot see the sun, I know that it exists. And to know that the sun is there - that is living." - The Brothers Karamazov, Fyodor Dostoyevsky
"You are not your job, you're not how much money you have in the bank. You are not the car you drive. You're not the contents of your wallet. You are not your fucking khakis. You are all singing, all dancing crap of the world." - Chuck Palahniuk, Fight Club
"I am part of the Universe, there's nothing to fear." - A part of the Universe
"In love, no one can harm anyone else; we are each responsible for our own feelings and cannot blame someone else for what we feel." -Paulo Coelho, Eleven Minutes
Zeus now addressed the immortals: "What a lamentable thing it is that men should blame the gods and regard us as the source of their troubles when it is their own wickedness that brings them sufferings worse than any which Destiny allots them." Homer, The Iliad
"Money buys love, but love can't buy money." Bruce Lee
"The internet has developed this thing about me  and I'm not even a computer guy, you know? I don't know why it is happening. I'm trying not to lemme say this: I'm now of the mindset that, when in Rome, if you can't beat 'em, join 'em." - Nicolas Cage
"When God wants to judge a nation, He gives them wicked rulers." (John Calvin)
Don't just stand there with a stupid look on your face  do something useful with a stupid look on your face! - Glynn James & Michael Stephen Fuchs (Death of Empires, 2014)
Don't just stand there with a stupid look on your face  do something useful with a stupid look on your face!" - Glynn James/Michael Stephen Fuchs (Death of Empires, 2014)
"Pork sausage."  Ramsay Bolton
"Sometimes the fall kills you. And sometimes, when you fall, you fly." - Neil Gaiman, The Sandman
"The highest form of patriotism is dissent." -Hunter Stockton Thompson
"It is a well-known fact that those people who must want to rule people are, ipso facto, those least suited to do it... anyone who is capable of getting themselves made President should on no account be allowed to do the job" - Douglas Adams
"The world is full of wood for your fires of desire, care, you might just burn along with it"
"I'm selfish, impatient and a little insecure. I make mistakes, I am out of control and at times hard to handle. But if you can't handle me at my worst, then you sure as hell don't deserve me at my best." - Marilyn Monroe
"understanding relates differences in power and power relates differences in understanding"
"Don't get a nigga wrong. I get tempted by the rewards that all come along with making 'nigga songs.' But what does it mean if I'm a Muslim and you're a Jew and because of that alone we don't get along?" -- Jay Electronica
"Once the power of love overcomes the love of power, the world will know peace" - Jimi Hendrix
"Why should I be sad? I have lost someone who didn"t love me. But they lost someone who loved them."
"Continuous effort - not strength or intelligence - is the key to unlocking our potential." - Winston Churchill
"Faith which does not doubt is dead faith."  Miguel de Unamuno (1864-1936) The Agony of Christianity (1931)
"If men could only know each other, they would neither idolize nor hate."  Elbert Hubbard
"People hate as they love, unreasonably." - William Makepeace Thackeray
"Best men are moulded out of faults." William Shakespeare
"A great artist is a great man in a great child." Victor Hugo
"Security is mostly a superstition. It does not exist in nature, nor do the children of men as a whole experience it. Avoiding danger is no safer in the long run than outright exposure. Life is either a daring adventure, or nothing." Helen Keller
"The only thing worse than being blind is having sight but no vision." Helen Keller
"You cannot climb the ladder of success dressed in the costume of failure." Zig Ziglar
"This is one moment, / But know that another / Shall pierce you with a sudden painful joy. " -T.S. Eliot
"People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does bathing - that's why we recommend it daily." Zig Ziglar
"You were born to win, but to be a winner, you must plan to win, prepare to win, and expect to win." Zig Ziglar
"What you get by achieving your goals is not as important as what you become by achieving your goals." Zig Ziglar
"There's only one way we can have world peace, and it's not to fight for it for it." -Me "When the power of love overcomes the love of power the world will know peace." -Jim Hendrix
"It is by going down into the abyss that we recover the treasures of life. Where you stumble, there lies your treasure." Joseph Campbell
"It is by going down into the abyss that we recover the treasures of life. Where you stumble, there lies your treasure." Joseph Campbell
"to feel a significance in the real world is not enough to live out a lucky life" - marina diamandis
"I do not know what I may appear to the world; but to myself I seem to have been only like a boy playing on the seashore, and diverting myself in now and then finding a smoother pebble or a prettier shell than ordinary, whilst the great ocean of truth lay all undiscovered before me." -Isaac Newton
"Everything you"ve ever wanted is on the other side of fear."  George Addair
"Every love story is a ghost story." - David Foster Wallace, The Pale King
"I disapprove of what you say, but I will defend to the death your right to say it." - Voltaire
"Democracy is a stupid idea anyway!" "We agree. It's demagogue-prone. That's a disease to which electoral systems are vulnerable. Yet demagogues are easy to identify. They gesture a lot and speak with pulpit rhythms, using words that ring of religious fervor and god-fearing sincerity."-Frank Herbert
"In school they got brainwashed, like all of us, into believing the myth of the American Inventor...
"Many men go fishing their entire lives without knowing it isn't fish they're after" - Henry David Thoreau
"We all could be giants. We just have to stop thinking so small."
"Every day we change the world. But to change the world in a way that means anything, that takes more time than most people have. It never happens all at once. It's slow. It's methodical. It's exhausting. We don't all have the stomach for it." -Elliot (Mr. Robot)
"Failure is not falling down?, but staying down"-Robert Schuller
"Society has arisen out of the works of peace; the essence of society is peace making." - Ludwig van Mises
"I don't have pet peeves, I have major psychotic fucking hatreds, ok? And it makes the world a lot easier to sort out." - George Carlin
"Do not hire a man who does your work for money, but him who does it for love of it." Henry David Thoreau
"The secret of getting ahead is getting started." -Mark Twain
"Health and cheerfulness naturally beget each other." -Joseph Addison
"If you want to awaken all of humanity, awaken all of yourself." - Lao Tzu
"I feel like I'm too busy writing history to read it." Kanye West
"I never dreamed about success. I worked for it." - Estee Lauder
"The grief that does not speak, Whispers the o'er-fraught heart, and bids it break."  William Shakespeare (1564-1516) Macbeth, act 4, scene 3 (1606)
"You did not disturb me, said the pegasus. I disturbed myself, that I might speak to you. " - Robin McKinley, Pegasus
"The best revenge is to be unlike him who performed the injury." Marcus Aurelius
"Adopt the pace of nature: her secret is patience." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"Write it on your heart that every day is the best day in the year." Ralph Waldo Emerson
"The first month is pure luck. It's mom's money  you know that kid that comes to your house and goes 'dog, my mom picked twelve out of twelve in the football pool, she won five-hundred dollars.' Let me see that fuckin' witch do it again."  Joey Diaz
"Ones who travel paved roads will never discover new lands" -unknown
"Journalism needs a spine-transplant." - Dan Rather, (2016)
"Absence sharpens love, presence strengthens it." Benjamin Franklin
"Today, someone's Freedom is related to the Family or the Company, not to the Constitution. A Universal Basic Income is needed to free young people, women and blue collar workers from modern slavery." - Me
"The irony of the Information age is that it has given new respectability to uninformed opinion." John Lawton (veteran reporter), speaking to the American Association of Broadcast Journalists in 1995
"Religion was invented when the first con man met the first fool." - Mark Twain
"Educating the mind without educating the heart is no education at all."  Aristotle
"Death is always a surprise, even when it isn't." -Stuart McLean.
"Every day, do something to move the ball forward." Jayne Atkinson, actress
"I tell you folks, all politics is applesauce." -Will Rogers
"To turn your dreams into reality, all your resources, efforts and concentration should be aligned in the same direction." - Roopleen
"Smile in the mirror. Do that every morning and you'll start to see a big difference in your life." - Yoko Ono
"In a play, even the audience is simply part of the performance." -Aramaki (Ghost in the Shell SAC)
"The secret of change is to focus all of your energy, not on fighting the old but on building the new" - Unknown
"Music is reflection of self, we just explain it, and then we get our checks in the mail." -Eminem
"When you are content to be simply yourself and don't compare or compete, everyone will respect you." Lao Tzu
"I can"t think of anything more disheartening than living a life without a clear purpose." - Daniel Willey
"When I was a child, my great teacher was a dog. A dog who taught me we're just part of the animal kingdom. We're not the only beings with personalities, and minds capable of reasoning. Certainly not the only beings with emotions like happiness, sadness, fear, despair." -Jane Goodall
"Follow your bliss and doors will open where there were no doors before." - Joseph Campbell, The Power of Myth
"It don't take much strength to pull a trigger. But try and get up day after day and work for a living. That's strength." --A Bronx Tale
"It"s the friends you can call up at 4 a.m. that matter." - Marlene Dietrich
"There is nothing so useless as doing efficiently that which should not be done at all." Peter Drucker
"The ultimate goal of farming is not the growing of crops, but the cultivation and perfection of human beings."  Masanobu Fukuoka (1913-2008) The One-Straw Revolution (1975) translated by Larry Korn, Chris Pearce, and Tsune Kurosawa (1978)
"She's just a perfect beautiful memory, and I'm just a visitor in a small part of her life."
"The only perfect people I know are the ones I haven't met" -Eric Nicholls
"WE can AFFORD all we NEED, we CANNOT AFFORD what we WANT." -President John Henry Eden/ Fallout 3
"Kindness in words creates confidence. Kindness in thinking creates profoundness. Kindness in giving creates love." - Lao Tzu
"The government doesn't even give a fuck about its white people. Just imagine how they feel about my black ass." -- Prodigy of Mobb Deep
"You may be right, dead right, as you speed along in your argument
"Anything that improves the probability of the future is good"- Elon Musk
"Everybody's got a responsibility, whether they choose to own up to it or not." - Random guy on the news from Chadbourn, NC
"Everybody's got a responsibility, whether they choose to own up to it or not." - Random guy on the news from Chadbourn, NC
"Good food is healthy food. Food is supposed to sustain you so you can live better, not so you can eat more. Some people eat to live, and some people live to eat." - Yolanda Adams
"Normal is an illusion. What is normal for the spider is chaos for the fly."  Morticia Addams
'I quote others only in order the better to express myself.'
"By and large, language is a tool for concealing the truth." -George Carlin
"The only way to make sense out of change is to plunge into it, move with it, and join the dance." -Alan Watts
"To err is human; to really foul things up requires a computer."  BILL VAUGHAN
"You're an Angel. Beware of those who collect feathers."
"A lie that can't be disproven is no different from the truth."
"Our Age of Anxiety is, in great part, the result of trying to do today"s jobs with yesterday"s tools!" - Marshall McLuhan
"Best feeling in the word is being someone who want you as much as you want them" Unknown
"Chaos and The Cosmos are two opposite things, yet we live in both of them" -Me
[REQUEST] Looking for a quote that would be applicable to this work situation
"All war is psychological. One way to win a war is simply change the subject."  John Brandenburg
"I tell you, if one wants to be active, one must not be afraid of going wrong, must not be afraid of making mistakes now and then. Many people think that they will become good just by doing no harm - but that's a lie. That way lies stagnation, mediocrity. " -Van Gogh
"When people show you who they are, believe them the first time." - Maya Angelou
"To have what you have never had, you have to do what you have never done." - Roy T. Bennett, The Light in the Heart
"Nothing is more powerful than an idea whose time has come" -Victor Hugo
"For I thought I had every word, every sentence thought out for what to say when the time came. Though as time did come, I realized that my actions had already done the speaking for me. "
"Defending a position by citing free speech is the ultimate concession. You're saying that the most compelling thing you can say for your position is that it's not literally illegal to express." - Randall Monroe, xkcd creator
"Imagination is more important than knowledge. Knowledge is limited. Imagination encircles the world." - Albert Einstein
"Your beliefs don't make you a better person. your behavior does." - Sukhraj S. Dhillon.
"Nothing does Reason more Right, than the Coolness of those that offer it: for Truth often suffers more by the heat of its defenders than from the arguments of its opposers."  William Penn (1644-1718) Some Fruits of Solitude in Reflections and Maxims, part 1 (1682)
"Money is numbers and numbers never end. If it takes money to be happy, your search for happiness will never end." - Bob Marley
"Sometimes you have to be cruel to be kind."
"to clean one's shirt, it is necessary to use soap. However, if it is not then rinsed out, the garment will not truly be clean. Similarly, the practitioners mind will not fully be liberated until he severs attachment to everything, including the Dharma itself." -Buddha
"You know what the best thing is about the end of the day? Tomorrow, it starts all over again." - Douglas Coupland, JPod
"Just because something isn't important to you, doesn't mean it isn't important." - Robbie Papenfus
"Is fat really the worst thing a human being can be? Is fat worse than vindictive, jealous, shallow, vain, boring, evil, or cruel? Not to me."  J. K. Rowling
"The harder I practice, the luckier I get" -Arnold Palmer
"Living a life of honesty creates peace of mind, and peace of mind is priceless."
"For a man to value himself on courage without any reference to the occasions on which it is exercised, is to value himself on a quality possessed in a far higher degree by a dog, especially if the dog is mad" - Jeremy Bentham
"You have to know why you get up every morning." -Dan Buettner
"I've always understood luck be a combination of opportunity and preparation" - Casey Neistat
"I would rather die of passion than boredom." - Vincent Van Gogh
"The more thoroughly we know ourselves, through experience, the less easily we fall in love." Ted Hughes
"Are you spending time with your family? Good. Because a man that doesn't spend time with his family is never a real man" - The Godfather
"Humor can make a serious difference. In the workplace, at home, in all areas of life  looking for a reason to laugh is necessary. A sense of humor helps us to get through the dull times, cope with the difficult times, enjoy the good times and manage the scary times." - Steve Goodier
"Preventing conflicts is the work of politics; establishing peace is the work of education." - Maria Montessori
"As long as you live keep smiling because it brightens everybody's day." - Vin Scully
"Changes in any constitution originate, without exception, within the ruling class itself, and only when this class becomes the seat of disunion" - Plato
* -Kurt Vonnegut
"The quality of a man's life is in direct proportion to his commitment to excellence, regardless of his chosen field of endeavor." - Vince Lombardi Jr.
"I said "Somebody should do something about that." Then I realized I am somebody." - Lily Tomlin
"Those who are silent when others are oppressed are guilty of oppression themselves." - Hussain Ibn Ali
"The intellect of two thousand asses cannot bring forth a single man"s thought. Democracy is a system where people are counted not weighed."
"Telling the truth is the slow, mundane, difficult route to a meaningful life. Anything else is cheating."  Donald Miller
"The things that interest people most are usually none of their business."  George Bernard Shaw
"Art is magic delivered from the lie of being truth."  Theodor Adorno (1903-1969) Minima Moralia, section 143 (1951) translated by E.F.N. Jephcott (1974)
"In the end, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends." - Martin Luther King, Jr.
"Ability is what you're capable of doing. Motivation determines what you do. Attitude determines how well you do it." - Lou Holtz
